,index,title,tag,artist,year,views,features,lyrics,id
23,34,C.R.E.A.M.,rap,Wu-Tang Clan,1994,1984638,{},"


What that nigga want, God?
Word up, look out for the cops though (Wu-Tang five finger shit, fam)
Cash rules-
Word up, two for fives over here, baby
Word up, two for fives, niggas got garbage down the way
Word up, know what I'm sayin'?
Cash rules everything around me, C.R.E.A.M. get-
Yeah, check this old fly shit out, word up
(Cash rules everything around me) Take you on a natural joint
(C.R.E.A.M. get the money)
(Dollar dollar bill, y'all) Here we, here we go, check this shit, yo


I grew up on the crime side, the New York Times side
Stayin' alive was no jive
Had secondhands, Mom's bounced on old man
So then we moved to Shaolin land
A young youth, yo, rockin' the gold tooth, 'Lo goose
Only way I begin the G off was drug loot
And let's start it like this, son
Rollin' with this one and that one, pullin' out gats for fun
But it was just a dream for the teen
Who was a fiend, started smokin' woolies at 16
And runnin' up in gates and doin' hits for high stakes
Makin' my way on fire escapes
No question, I would speed for cracks and weed
The combination made my eyes bleed
No question, I would flow off and try to get the dough all
Stickin' up white boys in ball courts
My life got no better, same damn 'Lo sweater
Times is rough and tough like leather
Figured out I went the wrong route
So I got with a sick-ass clique and went all out
Catchin' keys from 'cross seas
Rollin' in MPV's, every week we made forty G's
Yo, nigga, respect mine, or here go the TEC-9
Ch-chick-pow! Move from the gate now

Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all
Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all


It's been twenty-two long, hard years, I'm still strugglin'
Survival got me buggin', but I'm alive on arrival
I peep at the shape of the streets
And stay awake to the ways of the world 'cause shit is deep
A man with a dream with plans to make cream
Which failed; I went to jail at the age of fifteen
A young buck sellin' drugs and such, who never had much
Tryin' to get a clutch at what I could not-
The court played me short, now I face incarceration
Pacin', goin' upstate's my destination
Handcuffed in the back of a bus, forty of us
Life as a shorty shouldn't be so rough
But as the world turned, I learned life is hell
Livin' in the world no different from a cell
Every day I escape from Jakes givin' chase
Sellin' base, smokin' bones in the staircase
Though I don't know why I chose to smoke sess
I guess that's the time when I'm not depressed
But I'm still depressed, and I ask: what's it worth?
Ready to give up so I seek the old Earth
Who explained workin' hard may help you maintain
To learn to overcome the heartaches and pain
We got stick-up kids, corrupt cops, and crack rocks
And stray shots, all on the block that stays hot
Leave it up to me while I be livin' proof
To kick the truth to the young black youth
But shorty's runnin' wild, smokin' sess, drinkin' beer
And ain't tryna hear what I'm kickin' in his ear
Neglected for now, but yo, it gots to be accepted
That what? That life is hectic

Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all
Cash rules everything around me (My niggas gots to do what they gotta do)
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all (To get through, know what I'm sayin'?)
Cash rules everything around me (Because you can't just get by no more)
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all (Word up, you gotta get over, straight up and down)
Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all


Yeah, yeah
Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all
Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all
Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all
Cash rules everything around me
C.R.E.A.M., get the money
Dollar dollar bill, y'all-all-all, yeah",28
37,51,Juicy,rap,The Notorious B.I.G.,1994,3528473,{},"
(""Fuck all you hoes!"" Get a grip, motherfucker!)
Yeah, this album is dedicated
To all the teachers that told me I'd never amount to nothin'
To all the people that lived above the buildings that I was hustlin' in front of
Called the police on me when I was just tryin' to make some money to feed my daughter (it's all good)
And all the niggas in the struggle
You know what I'm sayin'? It's all good, baby baby


It was all a dream, I used to read Word Up! magazine
Salt-n-Pepa and Heavy D up in the limousine
Hangin' pictures on my wall
Every Saturday Rap Attack, Mr. Magic, Marley Marl
I let my tape rock 'til my tape popped
Smokin' weed in Bambú, sippin' on Private Stock
Way back, when I had the red and black lumberjack
With the hat to match
Remember Rappin' Duke? Duh-ha, duh-ha
You never thought that hip-hop would take it this far
Now I'm in the limelight 'cause I rhyme tight
Time to get paid, blow up like the World Trade
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Remember when I used to eat sardines for dinner
Peace to Ron G, Brucie B, Kid Capri
Funkmaster Flex, Lovebug Starski
I'm blowin' up like you thought I would
Call the crib, same number, same hood, it's all good
And if you don't know, now you know, nigga

You know very well (Yeah)
Who you are (Money, hoes and clothes)
Don't let 'em hold you down (Bankrolls, yeah, haha)
Reach for the stars (It's all good)
You had a goal (C'mon)
But not that many (It's all good)
'Cause you're the only one
I'll give you good and plenty (Check it)


I made the change from a common thief
To up close and personal with Robin Leach
And I'm far from cheap, I smoke skunk with my peeps all day
Spread love, it's the Brooklyn way
The Moët and Alizé keep me pissy, girls used to diss me
Now they write letters 'cause they miss me
I never thought it could happen, this rapping stuff
I was too used to packing gats and stuff
Now honeys play me close like butter play toast
From the Mississippi down to the East Coast
Condos in Queens, indo for weeks
Sold out seats to hear Biggie Smalls speak
Living life without fear
Puttin' five karats in my baby girl ear
Lunches, brunches, interviews by the pool
Considered a fool 'cause I dropped out of high school
Stereotypes of a black male misunderstood
And it's still all good
And if you don't know, now you know, nigga

You know very well (C'mon)
Who you are (Bankrolls)
Don't let 'em hold you down (Clothes)
Reach for the stars (Mansions)
You had a goal
But not that many (It's all good)
'Cause you're the only one
I'll give you good and plenty ('94)


Super Nintendo, Sega Genesis
When I was dead broke, man, I couldn't picture this
50-inch screen, money-green leather sofa
Got two rides, a limousine with a chauffeur
Phone bill about two G's flat
No need to worry, my accountant handles that
And my whole crew is loungin'
Celebrating every day, no more public housin'
Thinkin' back on my one-room shack
Now my mom pimps an Ac' with minks on her back
And she loves to show me off of course
Smiles every time my face is up in The Source
We used to fuss when the landlord dissed us
No heat, wonder why Christmas missed us
Birthdays was the worst days
Now we sip Champagne when we thirsty
Uh, damn right I like the life I live
'Cause I went from negative to positive and it's all (It's all good, nigga)
And if you don't know, now you know, nigga

You know very well (Money)
Who you are (Hoes and clothes)
Don't let 'em hold you down (Bankrolls)
And if you don't know, now you know, nigga
Reach for the stars (That's right)
You had a goal (It's all good)
But not that many (All good)
'Cause you're the only one (East coast, represent)
I'll give you good and plenty (C'mon)
And if you don't know, now you know, nigga


Representin' B-Town in the house (Biggie Smalls)
Junior Mafia, mad flavor (Bad Boy)
Uh, uh, yeah, aight (I see you, Cooch)


You know very well
Who you are
Don't let 'em hold you down
Reach for the stars
You had a goal
But not that many
'Cause you're the only one
I'll give you good and plenty


Biggie Smalls, it's all good, nigga
Junior Mafia, it's all good, nigga
Bad Boy, it's all good, nigga
It's all good
That's right, '94
And on and on, and on and on
You know very well
It's all good
Who you are
Yeah
Don't let 'em hold you down
Reach for the stars

",43
45,60,Ten Crack Commandments,rap,The Notorious B.I.G.,1997,1144477,{},"
1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9


It's the ten crack commandments, what?
Nigga can't tell me nothing about this coke
Can't tell me nothing about this crack, this weed, for my hustlin' niggas
Niggas on the corner I ain't forget you niggas, my triple beam niggas


I've been in this game for years, it made me a animal
There's rules to this shit, I wrote me a manual
A step-by-step booklet for you to get
Your game on track, not your wig pushed back
Rule Nombre Uno: never let no one know
How much dough you hold 'cause you know
The cheddar breed jealousy 'specially
If that man fucked up, get yo' ass stuck up
Number Two: never let 'em know your next move
Don't you know bad boys move in silence and violence?
Take it from your highness (Uh-huh)
I done squeezed mad clips at these cats for they bricks and chips
Number Three: never trust nobody
Your moms'll set that ass up, properly gassed up
Hoodied and masked up, shit, for that fast buck
She be laying in the bushes to light that ass up
Number Four: I know you heard this before
""Never get high on your own supply""
Number Five: never sell no crack where you rest at
I don't care if they want an ounce, tell 'em, ""Bounce!""
Number Six: that goddamn credit? Dead it
You think a crackhead paying you back? Shit, forget it
Seven: this rule is so underrated
Keep your family and business completely separated
Money and blood don't mix like two dicks and no bitch
Find yourself in serious shit
Number Eight: never keep no weight on you
Them cats that squeeze your guns can hold jums too
Number Nine shoulda been Number One to me:
If you ain't gettin' bagged, stay the fuck from police
If niggas think you snitchin', they ain't tryna listen
They be sittin' in your kitchen, waiting to start hittin'
Number Ten: a strong word called 'consignment'
Strictly for live men, not for freshmen
If you ain't got the clientele, say, ""Hell no!""
'Cause they gon' want they money rain, sleet, hail, snow
Follow these rules you'll have mad bread to break up
If not, twenty-four years on the wake up
Slug hit your temple, watch your frame shake up
Caretaker did your makeup, when you passed
Your girl fucked my man Jake up
Heard in three weeks, she sniffed a whole half a cake up
Heard she suck a good dick, and can hook a steak up
Gotta go, gotta go, more pies to bake up, word up (Uh)

Crack King, Frank Wiz-zhite


(1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 8
1, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
1, 1, 1, 1, 1, 2, 3, 4, 4, 5
1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9
10.......10)",51
51,67,A Milli,rap,Lil Wayne,2008,1237174,{},"
Bangladesh
Young Money!
You dig?
Mack, I'm going in


A millionaire, I'm a Young Money millionaire
Tougher than Nigerian hair
My criteria compared to your career just isn't fair
I'm a venereal disease, like a menstrual bleed
Through the pencil, and leak on the sheet of the tablet in my mind
'Cause I don't write shit, 'cause I ain't got time
'Cause my seconds, minutes, hours go to the almighty dollar
And the almighty power of that ch-cha-cha-chopper
Sister, brother, son, daughter, father; mother-fuck a copper
Got the Maserati dancin' on the bridge, pussy poppin'
Tell the coppers: ""Ha-ha-ha-ha
You can't catch him, you can't stop him""
I go by them goon rules: if you can't beat 'em, then you pop 'em
You can't man 'em, then you mop 'em
You can't stand 'em, then you drop 'em
You pop 'em 'cause we pop 'em like Orville Redenbacher

Motherfucker, I'm ill


A million here, a million there
Sicilian bitch with long hair, with coke in her derriere
Like smoking the thinnest air
I open the Lamborghini, hopin' them crackers see me
Like, ""Look at that bastard Weezy!""
He's a beast, he's a dog, he's a mothafuckin' problem
Okay, you're a goon, but what's a goon to a goblin?
Nothin', nothin', you ain't scarin' nothin'
On some faggot bullshit: call 'em Dennis Rodman
Call me what you want, bitch! Call me on my Sidekick!
Never answer when it's private, damn, I hate a shy bitch
Don't you hate a shy bitch? Yeah, I ate a shy bitch
She ain't shy no more, she changed her name to My Bitch
Yeah, nigga, that's my bitch, so when she ask
For the money when you through, don't be surprised, bitch!
And it ain't trickin' if you got it
But you like a bitch with no ass: You ain't got shit
Motherfucker, I'm ill, not sick
And I'm okay, but my watch sick, yeah, my drop sick
Yeah, my Glock sick, and my knot thick - I'm it


Motherfucker, I'm ill

See, they say I'm rappin' like B.I.G., Jay, and 2Pac
André 3000, where is Erykah Badu at? Who that?
Who that said they gon' beat Lil Wayne?
My name ain't Bic, but I keep that flame, man
Who that one that do that, boy?
You knew that true that, swallow
And I be the shit, now you got loose bowels
I don't owe you like two vowels
But I would like for you to pay me by the hour
And I'd rather be pushin' flowers
Than to be in the pen sharin' showers
Tony told us this world was ours
And the Bible told us every girl was sour
Don't play in her garden and don't smell her flower
Call me Mr. Carter or Mr. Lawn Mower
Boy, I got so many bitches, like I'm Mike Lowrey
Even Gwen Stefani said she couldn't doubt me
Motherfucker, I say ""Life ain't shit without me""
Chrome lips pokin' out the coupe, look like it's poutin'
I do what I do, and you do what you can do about it
Bitch, I can turn a crack rock into a mountain - dare me
Don't you compare me, 'cause there ain't nobody near me
They don't see me but they hear me
They don't feel me but they fear me
I'm illy, C3, 3 Peat",59
58,75,My Name Is,rap,Eminem,1999,1464039,{},"


Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? (Excuse me) My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
(Can I have the attention of the class for one second?)
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady


Hi, kids, do you like violence? (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Wanna see me stick nine-inch nails through each one of my eyelids? (Uh-huh)
Wanna copy me and do exactly like I did? (Yeah, yeah)
Try 'cid and get fucked up worse than my life is? (Huh?)
My brain's dead weight, I'm tryna get my head straight
But I can't figure out which Spice Girl I want to impregnate (Oh)
And Dr. Dre said, ""Slim Shady, you a basehead"" (Uh-uh)
""Then why's your face red? Man, you wasted""
Well, since age 12, I felt like I'm someone else
'Cause I hung my original self from the top bunk with a belt
Got pissed off and ripped Pamela Lee's tits off
And smacked her so hard I knocked her clothes backwards like Kris Kross
I smoke a fat pound of grass, and fall on my ass
Faster than a fat bitch who sat down too fast
Come here, slut; ""Shady, wait a minute, that's my girl, dawg""
I don't give a fuck, God sent me to piss the world off

Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady


My English teacher wanted to flunk me in junior high (Shh)
Thanks a lot, next semester I'll be 35
I smacked him in his face with an eraser, chased him with a stapler
And stapled his nuts to a stack of paper (Ow)
Walked in the strip club, had my jacket zipped up
Flashed the bartender, then stuck my dick in the tip cup
Extraterrestrial, running over pedestrians in a spaceship While they're screaming at me, ""Let's just be friends""
99 percent of my life, I was lied to
I just found out my mom does more dope than I do (Damn)
I told her I'd grow up to be a famous rapper
Make a record about doin' drugs and name it after her
(Oh, thank you)
You know you blew up when the women rush your stands
And try to touch your hands like some screamin' Usher fans
(Ahh, ahh, ahh)
This guy at White Castle asked for my autograph (Dude, can I get your autograph?)
So I signed it, ""Dear Dave, thanks for the support, asshole""

Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady


Stop the tape, this kid needs to be locked away (Get him)
Dr. Dre, don't just stand there, operate
I'm not ready to leave, it's too scary to die (Fuck that)
I'll have to be carried inside the cemetery and buried alive
(Huh, yup)
Am I comin' or goin'? I can barely decide
I just drank a fifth of vodka, dare me to drive? (Go ahead)
All my life I was very deprived
I ain't had a woman in years and my palms are too hairy to hide (Whoops)
Clothes ripped like the Incredible Hulk
I spit when I talk, I'll fuck anything that walks (Come here)
When I was little, I used to get so hungry I would throw fits
How you gonna breastfeed me, Mom? You ain't got no tits
I lay awake and strap myself in the bed
With a bulletproof vest on and shoot myself in the head (Bang)
'Cause I'm steamin' mad (Grr)
And by the way, when you see my dad (Yeah?)
Tell him that I slit his throat in this dream I had

Hi, my name is, what? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, what?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, who? My name is, huh?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady
Hi, my name is, huh? My name is, who?
My name is, chka-chka, Slim Shady",68
65,82,Empire State of Mind,rap,JAY-Z,2009,2424632,"{""Alicia Keys""}","
Yeah


Yeah, I'm out that Brooklyn, now I'm down in Tribeca
Right next to De Niro, but I'll be hood forever
I'm the new Sinatra, and since I made it here
I can make it anywhere, yeah, they love me everywhere
I used to cop in Harlem-hola, my Dominicanos (Dimelo!)
Right there up on Broadway, brought me back to that McDonald's
Took it to my stash spot, 560 State Street
Catch me in the kitchen, like a Simmons whippin' pastry
Cruisin' down 8th Street, off-white Lexus
Drivin' so slow, but BK is from Texas
Me? I'm out that Bed-Stuy, home of that boy Biggie
Now I live on Billboard and I brought my boys with me
Say what up to Ty Ty, still sippin' Mai Tais
Sittin' courtside, Knicks and Nets give me high fives
Nigga, I be spiked out, I could trip a referee
Tell by my attitude that I'm most definitely from

In New York (Ayy, aha) (Uh, yeah)
Concrete jungle (Yeah) where dreams are made of
There's nothin' you can't do (Yeah) (Okay)
Now you're in New York (Aha, aha, aha) (Uh, yeah)
These streets will make you feel brand-new (New)
Big lights will inspire you (Come on) (Okay)
Let's hear it for New York (You welcome, OG) (Uh)
New York (Yeah), New York (Uh) (I made you hot, nigga)


Catch me at the X with OG at a Yankee game
Shit, I made the Yankee hat more famous than a Yankee can
You should know I bleed blue, but I ain't a Crip though
But I got a gang of niggas walkin' with my clique though
Welcome to the meltin' pot, corners where we sellin' rock
Afrika Bambaataa shit, home of the hip-hop
Yellow cab, gypsy cab, dollar cab, holla back
For foreigners, it ain't fair, they act like they forgot how to add
Eight million stories out there in the naked
City, it's a pity half of y'all won't make it
Me? I gotta plug Special Ed, ""I Got It Made""
If Jeezy's payin' LeBron, I'm payin' Dwyane Wade
Three dice cee-lo, three-card Marley
Labor Day Parade-rest in peace, Bob Marley
Statue of Liberty, long live the World Trade
Long live the king, yo-I'm from the Empire State, that's

In New York (Ayy) (Uh, yeah)
Concrete jungle where dreams are made of
There's nothin' you can't do (That boy good) (Okay)
Now you're in New York (Welcome to the bright lights, baby) (Uh, yeah)
These streets will make you feel brand-new
Big lights will inspire you (Okay)
Let's hear it for New York (Uh)
New York (Yeah), New York (Uh)


Lights is blinding, girls need blinders
So they can step out of bounds quick, the side lines is
Lined with casualties who sip the life casually
Then gradually become worse - don't bite the apple, Eve!
Caught up in the in-crowd, now you're in-style
Into the winter gets cold, en vogue with your skin out
City of sin is a pity on a whim
Good girls gone bad, the city's filled with them
Mami, took a bus trip, now she got her bust out
Everybody ride her, just like a bus route
""Hail Mary"" to the city, you're a virgin
And Jesus can't save you, life starts when the church end
Came here for school, graduated to the high life
Ball players, rap stars, addicted to the limelight
MDMA got you feelin' like a champion
The city never sleeps, better slip you a Ambien

In New York (Ayy, ow) (Uh, yeah)
Concrete jungle where dreams are made of
There's nothin' you can't do (Okay)
Now you're in New York (Uh, yeah)
These streets will make you feel brand-new
Big lights will inspire you (Okay)
Let's hear it for New York (Uh)
New York (Yeah), New York (Uh)


One hand in the air for the big city (Oh)
Street lights, big dreams, all lookin' pretty (Oh)
No place in the world that could compare (Nah)
Put your lighters in the air, everybody say
""Yeah, yeah"" (Come on, come on)
""Yeah, yeah"" (Come on)


In New York (Uh, yeah)
Concrete jungle where dreams are made of
There's nothin' you can't do (Okay)
Now you're in New York (Uh, yeah)
These streets will make you feel brand-new
Big lights will inspire you (Okay)
Let's hear it for New York (Uh)
New York (Yeah), New York (Uh)",75
66,83,Renegade,rap,JAY-Z,2001,1164393,{Eminem},"
Motherfuckers say that I'm foolish, I only talk about jewels (Bling-bling)
Do you fools listen to music or do you just skim through it?
See, I'm influenced by the ghetto you ruined
The same dude you gave nothin', I made somethin' doin'
What I do through and through and
I give you the news with a twist, it's just his ghetto point of view
The renegade, you been afraid I penetrate pop culture
Bring 'em a lot closer to the block where they pop toasters
And they live with they moms, got dropped roadsters
From botched robberies, niggas crouched over
Mami's knocked up 'cause she wasn't watched over
Knocked down by some clown
When child support knocked, ""No, he's not around""
Now, how that sound to ya? Jot it down
I bring you through the ghetto without ridin' 'round
Hidin' down, duckin' strays from frustrated youths stuck in they ways
Just read a magazine that fucked up my day
How you rate music that thugs with nothin' relate to it?
I help them see they way through it, not you
Can't step in my pants, can't walk in my shoes
Bet everything you worth, you'll lose your tie and your shirt

Since I'm in a position to talk to these kids and they listen
I ain't no politician, but I'll kick it with 'em a minute
'Cause see, they call me a menace and if the shoe fits, I'll wear it
But if it don't, then y'all'll swallow the truth, grin and bear it
Now who's the king of these rude, ludicrous, lucrative lyrics?
Who could inherit the title, put the youth in hysterics
Usin' his music to steer it, sharin' his views and his merits?
But there's a huge interference, they're sayin' you shouldn't hear it
Maybe it's hatred I spew, maybe it's food for the spirit
Maybe it's beautiful music I made for you to just cherish
But I'm debated, disputed, hated and viewed in America
As a motherfuckin' drug addict, like you didn't experiment?
Now, now, that's when you start to stare at who's in the mirror
And see yourself as a kid again, and you get embarrassed
And I got nothin' to do but make you look stupid as parents
You fuckin' do-gooders, too bad you couldn't do good at marriage (Haha)
And do you have any clue what I had to do to get here?
I don't think you do, so stay tuned and keep your ears glued to the stereo
'Cause here we go, he's Jigga-Jur-Jigga-Jih-Jigga
And I'm the sinister Mr. Kiss-My-Ass is just a


Renegade, never been afraid to say
What's on my mind at any given time of day
'Cause I'm a renegade
Never been afraid to talk about anything
(Anything?), anything (Anything)
Renegade, never been afraid to say
What's on my mind at any given time of day
'Cause I'm a renegade
Never been afraid to holler about anything
(Anything?), anything (Anything)

I had to hustle, my back to the wall, ashy knuckles
Pockets filled with a lotta lint, not a cent
Gotta vent, lotta innocent lives lost on the project bench
What you hollerin'? Gotta pay rent, bring dollars in
By the bodega, iron under my coat, feelin' braver
Durag wrappin' my waves up, pockets full of hope
Do not step to me
I'm awkward, I box lefty
An orphan, my pops left me
And often my mama wasn't home
Could not stress to me, I wasn't grown
'Specially on nights I brought somethin' home to quiet the stomach rumblings
My demeanor thirty years my senior
My childhood didn't mean much, only raisin' green up
Raisin' my fingers to critics, raisin' my head to the sky
Big, I did it, multi before I die
No lie, just know I chose my own fate
I drove by the fork in the road and went straight


See, I'm a poet to some, a regular modern-day Shakespeare
Jesus Christ, the king of these Latter-day Saints here
To shatter the picture in which of that as they paint me as
A monger of hate, satanist, scatter-brained atheist
But that ain't the case, see, it's a matter of taste
We as a people decide if Shady's as bad as they say he is
Or is he the latter, a gateway to escape?
Media scapegoat who they can be mad at today
See, it's as easy as cake, simple as whistlin' ""Dixie""
While I'm wavin' the pistol at sixty Christians against me
Go to war with the Mormons, take a bath with the Catholics
In holy water, no wonder they tried to hold me under longer
I'm a motherfuckin' spiteful, delightful eyeful
The new Ice Cube, motherfuckers hate to like you
What did I do? (Huh?), I'm just a kid from the gutter
Makin' his butter off these bloodsuckers, 'cause I'm a motherfuckin'

Renegade, never been afraid to say
What's on my mind at any given time of day
'Cause I'm a renegade
Never been afraid to talk about anything
(Anything?), anything (Anything)
Renegade, never been afraid to say
What's on my mind at any given time of day
'Cause I'm a renegade
Never been afraid to holler about anything
(Anything?), anything (Anything)
Renegade, never been afraid to say
What's on my mind at any given time of day
'Cause I'm a renegade
Never been afraid to talk about anything
(Anything?), anything (Anything)
Renegade, never been afraid to say
What's on my mind at any given time of day
'Cause I'm a renegade
Never been afraid to holler about anything
(Anything?), anything (Anything)",78
76,95,All Falls Down,rap,Kanye West,2004,1434979,"{""Syleena Johnson""}","
Oh, when it all, it all falls down
Yeah, this the real one, baby
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
Uh, Chi-Town, stand up!
Oh, when it all, it all falls down
Southside, Southside
We gon' set this party off right
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
Westside, Westside
We gon' set this party off right
Oh, when it all


Man, I promise, she's so self-conscious
She has no idea what she doin' in college
That major that she majored in don't make no money
But she won't drop out, her parents'll look at her funny
Now, tell me that ain't insecurr
The concept of school seems so securr
Sophomore, three yurrs, ain't picked a carurr
She like, ""Fuck it, I'll just stay down hurr and do hair""
'Cause that's enough money to buy her a few pairs
Of new Airs, 'cause her baby daddy don't really care
She's so precious with the peer pressure
Couldn't afford a car, so she named her daughter Alexis
She had hair so long that it looked like weave
Then she cut it all off, now she look like Eve
And she be dealin' with some issues that you can't believe
Single black female addicted to retail, and well

Oh, when it all, it all falls down
And when it falls down, who you gon' call now?
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
C'mon, c'mon, and when it falls down
Oh, when it all


Man, I promise, I'm so self-conscious
That's why you always see me with at least one of my watches
Rollies and Pashas done drove me crazy
I can't even pronounce nothing, pass that Ver-say-see!
Then I spent four hundred bucks on this
Just to be like, ""Nigga, you ain't up on this""
And I can't even go to the grocery store
Without some Ones that's clean and a shirt with a team
It seem we livin' the American Dream
But the people highest up got the lowest self-esteem
The prettiest people do the ugliest things
For the road to riches and diamond rings
We shine because they hate us, floss 'cause they degrade us
We tryna buy back our 40 acres
And for that paper, look how low we'll stoop
Even if you in a Benz, you still a nigga in a coupe


Oh, when it all, it all falls down
Come on, come on
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
And when it falls down, who you gon' call now?
Oh, when it all, it all falls down
Come on, come on
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
And when it all falls down

I say, ""Fuck the police,"" that's how I treat 'em
We buy our way out of jail, but we can't buy freedom
We'll buy a lot of clothes, but we don't really need 'em
Things we buy to cover up what's inside
'Cause they made us hate ourself and love they wealth
That's why shorty's hollerin', ""Where the ballers at?""
Drug dealer buy Jordan, crackhead buy crack
And the white man get paid off of all of that
But I ain't even gon' act holier than thou
'Cause fuck it, I went to Jacob with 25 thou
Before I had a house and I'd do it again
'Cause I wanna be on 106 & Park, pushin' a Benz
I want to act ballerific like it's all terrific
I got a couple past-due bills, I won't get specific
I got a problem with spendin' before I get it
We all self-conscious, I'm just the first to admit it


Oh, when it all, it all falls down
C'mon, c'mon
And when it falls down, who you gon' call now?
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
C'mon c'mon, and when it falls down
Oh, when it all, it all falls down
Southside, Southside
We gon' set this party off right
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
Westside, Westside
We gon' set this party off right
Oh when it all, it all falls down
Chi-Town, Chi-Town
We gon' show 'em how we get down
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
Now, Syleena, you just like a safe belt, you saved my life
C'mon
Oh when it all, it all falls down
I'm tellin' you all, it all falls down
",86
79,98,N.Y. State of Mind,rap,Nas,1994,1931190,{},"


Yeah, yeah
Ayo, Black-it's time, word (Word, it's time, man)
It's time, man (Aight, man, begin)
Yeah-straight out the fuckin' dungeons of rap
Where fake niggas don't make it back
I don't know how to start this shit, yo-now;


Rappers; I monkey flip 'em with the funky rhythm
I be kickin', musician inflictin' composition
Of pain, I'm like Scarface sniffin' cocaine
Holdin' an M16, see, with the pen I'm extreme
Now, bullet holes left in my peepholes
I'm suited up with street clothes, hand me a 9 and I'll defeat foes
Y'all know my steelo, with or without the airplay
I keep some E&J, sittin' bent up in the stairway
Or either on the corner bettin' Grants with the cee-lo champs
Laughin' at base-heads, tryna sell some broken amps
G-packs get off quick, forever niggas talk shit
Reminiscin' about the last time the task force flipped
Niggas be runnin' through the block shootin'
Time to start the revolution, catch a body, head for Houston
Once they caught us off-guard, the MAC-10 was in the grass, and
I ran like a cheetah, with thoughts of an assassin
Picked the MAC up, told brothers ""Back up!"" - the MAC spit
Lead was hittin' niggas, one ran, I made him back-flip
Heard a few chicks scream, my arm shook, couldn't look
Gave another squeeze, heard it click, ""Yo, my shit is stuck!""
Tried to cock it, it wouldn't shoot, now I'm in danger
Finally pulled it back and saw three bullets caught up in the chamber
So, now I'm jettin' to the buildin' lobby
And it was full of children, prob'ly couldn't see as high as I be
(So, what you sayin'?) It's like the game ain't the same
Got younger niggas pullin' the triggers, bringin' fame to their name
And claim some corners, crews without guns are goners
In broad daylight, stick-up kids, they run up on us
.45's and gauges, MAC's in fact
Same niggas will catch you back-to-back, snatchin' your cracks
In black, there was a snitch on the block gettin' niggas knocked
So hold your stash 'til the coke price drop
I know this crackhead who said she gotta smoke nice rock
And if it's good, she'll bring you customers and measuring pots
But yo, you gotta slide on a vacation
Inside information keeps large niggas erasin' and their wives basin'
It drops deep as it does in my breath
I never sleep, 'cause sleep is the cousin of death
Beyond the walls of intelligence, life is defined
I think of crime when I'm in a New York State of Mind

New York state of mind
New York state of mind
New York state of mind
New York state of mind


Be havin' dreams that I'm a gangsta, drinkin' Moëts, holdin' TEC's
Makin' sure the cash came correct, then I stepped
Investments in stocks, sewin' up the blocks to sell rocks
Winnin' gunfights with mega-cops
But just a nigga walkin' with his finger on the trigger
Make enough figures until my pockets get bigger
I ain't the type of brother made for you to start testin'
Give me a Smith & Wesson, I'll have niggas undressin'
Thinkin' of cash flow, Buddha and shelter
Whenever frustrated, I'ma hijack Delta
In the PJ's, my blend tape plays, bullets are strays
Young bitches is grazed, each block is like a maze
Full of black rats trapped, plus the Island is packed
From what I hear in all the stories when my peoples come back
Black, I'm livin' where the nights is jet-black
The fiends fight to get crack, I just max, I dream I can sit back
And lamp like Capone, with drug scripts sewn
Or the legal luxury life, rings flooded with stones, homes
I got so many rhymes, I don't think I'm too sane
Life is parallel to Hell, but I must maintain
And be prosperous, though we live dangerous
Cops could just arrest me, blamin' us; we're held like hostages
It's only right that I was born to use mics
And the stuff that I write is even tougher than dykes
I'm takin' rappers to a new plateau, through rap slow
My rhymin' is a vitamin held without a capsule
The smooth criminal on beat breaks
Never put me in your box if your shit eats tapes
The city never sleeps, full of villains and creeps
That's where I learned to do my hustle, had to scuffle with freaks
I'm a addict for sneakers, 20's of Buddha and bitches with beepers
In the streets I can greet ya, about blunts I teach ya
Inhale deep like the words of my breath
I never sleep, 'cause sleep is the cousin of death
I lay puzzled as I backtrack to earlier times
Nothing's equivalent to the New York state of mind

New York state of mind
New York state of mind
New York state of mind
New York state of mind


""Nasty Nas-""",89
95,116,The World Is Yours,rap,Nas,1994,1012100,{},"


(It's yours)
Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
(It's yours)
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?


I sip the Dom P, watchin' Gandhi 'til I'm charged, then
Writin' in my book of rhymes, all the words past the margin
To hold the mic I'm throbbin', mechanical movement
Understandable smooth shit that murderers move with
The thief's theme, play me at night, they won't act right
The fiend of hip-hop has got me stuck like a crack pipe
The mind activation, react like I'm facin'
Time like Pappy Mason, with pens I'm embracin'
Wipe the sweat off my dome, spit the phlegm on the streets
Suede Timbs on my feets makes my cipher complete
Whether cruisin' in a Sikh's cab or Montero Jeep
I can't call it, the beats make me fallin' asleep
I keep fallin', but never fallin' six feet deep
I'm out for presidents to represent me (Say what?)
I'm out for presidents to represent me (Say what?)
I'm out for dead presidents to represent me

Whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
(It's yours)
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?


To my man Ill Will, God bless your life (It's yours)
To my peoples throughout Queens, God bless your life
I trip, we box up crazy bitches, aimin' guns in all my baby pictures
Beef with housing police, release scriptures that's maybe Hitler's
Yet I'm the mild, money-gettin' style, rollin' foul
The versatile, honey-stickin', wild, golden child
Dwellin' in the Rotten Apple, you get tackled
Or caught by the devil's lasso, shit is a hassle
There's no days for broke days when sellin' smoke pays
While all the old folks pray to Jesús, soakin' they sins in trays
Of holy water, odds against Nas is slaughter
Thinkin' a word best describin' my life to name my daughter
My strength, my son, the star will be my resurrection
Born in correction, all the wrong shit I did, he'll lead in right direction
How you livin'? Large or broke on charge cards and mediocre?
You flippin' coke or playin' spit, spades, and strip poker?

(It's yours)
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
(It's yours)
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
Yo, the world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
(It's yours)


Break it down
It's yours, it's yours
It's yours, it's yours


I'm the young city bandit, hold myself down single-handed
For murder raps, I kick my thoughts alone, get remanded
Born alone, die alone, no crew to keep my crown or throne
I'm deep by sound alone, caved inside, 1,000 miles from home
I need a new nigga for this black cloud to follow
'Cause while it's over me it's too dark to see tomorrow
Tryin' to maintain, I flip, fill the clip to the tip
Picturin' my peeps not eatin' can make my heartbeat skip
And I'm amped up, they locked the champ up, even my brain's in handcuffs
Headed for Indiana, stabbin' women like the Phantom
The crew is lampin' Big Willie style
Check the chip-toothed smile, plus I profile wild
Stash loot in fly clothes, burnin' dollars to light my stoge
Walk the blocks with a bop, checkin' dames, plus the games people play
Bust the problems of the world today

(It's yours)
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
(It's yours)
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this? (Yeah)
The world is yours, the world is yours
It's mine, it's mine, it's mine-whose world is this?
(It's yours)


(Break it down) Yeah, aight
To everybody in Queens, the foundation (It's yours)
The world is yours
To everybody uptown, yo, the world is yours (It's yours)
The world is yours
To everybody in Brooklyn
Y'all know the world is yours (It's yours)
The world is yours
Everybody in Mount Vernon, the world is yours (It's yours)
Long Island, yo, the world is yours (It's yours)
Staten Island, yeah, the world is yours (It's yours)
South Bronx, the world is yours (It's yours)
Aight",109
117,141,Forever,rap,"Drake, Kanye West, Lil Wayne & Eminem",2009,2061952,"{""Drake / Kanye West / Lil Wayne & Eminem""}","
It may not mean nothin' to y'all
But understand, nothin' was done for me
So I don't plan on stoppin' at all
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane
I'm shuttin' shit down in the mall
And tellin' every girl she the one for me
And I ain't even plannin' to call
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane


Last name Ever, first name Greatest
Like a sprained ankle, boy, I ain't nothin' to play with
Started off local, but thanks to all the haters
I know G-IV pilots on a first name basis
In your city, faded off the brown, Nino
She insist she got more class, we know
Swimmin' in the money, come and find me, Nemo
If I was at the club, you know I balled, chemo
Dropped the mixtape, that shit sounded like an album
Who'd have thought a countrywide tour'd be the outcome?
Labels want my name beside a X, like Malcolm
Everybody got a deal, I did it without one
Yeah, nigga, I'm about my business
Killin' all these rappers, you would swear I had a hit list
Everyone who doubted me is askin' for forgiveness
If you ain't been a part of it, at least you got to witness, bitches

It may not mean nothin' to y'all
But understand, nothin' was done for me
So I don't plan on stoppin' at all
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane
I'm shuttin' shit down in the mall
And tellin' every girl she the one for me
And I ain't even plannin' to call
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane


Ever-ever, Mr. West is in the buildin'
Ain't no question who about to kill 'em
I used to have hood dreams, big fame, big chains
I stuck my dick inside this life until that bitch came
And went hard all fall like the ball teams
Just so I can make it rain all spring
Y'all seen my story, my glory
I had raped the game young, you can call it statutory
When a nigga blow up they gonna build statues for me
Old money, Benjamin Button, ""What?"" nothin'
Now it's super bad chicks givin' me McLovin
You would think I ran the world like Michelle's husband
You would think these niggas know me when they really doesn't
Like they was down with the old me, no you fuckin' wasn't
Um, you're such a fuckin' loser
He ain't even go to class, Bueller
Trade the Grammy plaques just to have my granny back
Remember she had that bad hip like a fanny pack?
Chasin' the stardom will turn you to a maniac
All the way in Hollywood and I can't even act
They pull the cameras out and goddamn, he snap
I used to want this thing forever, y'all can have it back

It may not mean nothin' to y'all
But understand, nothin' was done for me
So I don't plan on stoppin' at all
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane
I'm shuttin' shit down in the mall
And tellin' every girl she the one for me
And I ain't even plannin' to call
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane


Okay, hello, it's the Martian, Space Jam Jordans
I want this shit forever, wake up and smell the garden
Fresher than the harvest, step up to the target
If I had one guess, then I guess I'm just New Orleans
And I will never stop like I'm runnin' from the cops
Hop up in my car and told my chauffeur, ""To the top""
Life is such a fuckin' roller coaster, then it drops
But what should I scream for? This is my theme park
My mind shine even when my thoughts seem dark
Pistol on my side, you don't wanna hear that thing talk
Let the king talk, check the price and pay attention
Lil Wayne, that's what they gotta say or mention
I'm like Nevada in the middle of the summer
I'm restin' in the lead, I need a pillow and a cover
Shh, my foot's sleepin' on the gas
No brake pads, no such thing as last, uh

It may not mean nothin' to y'all
But understand, nothin' was done for me
So I don't plan on stoppin' at all
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane
I'm shuttin' shit down in the mall
And tellin' every girl she the one for me
And I ain't even plannin' to call
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane


There they go, packin' stadiums as Shady spits his flow
Nuts they go, Macadamian, they go so ballistic, whoa
He can make them look like bozos
He's wonderin' if he should spit this slow, fuck no
Go for broke, his cup just runneth over, oh no
He ain't had him a buzz like this
Since the last time that he overdosed
They been waitin' patiently for Pinocchio to poke his nose
Back into the game and they know
Rap will never be the same as befo'
Bashin' in the brains of these hoes
And establishin' a name as he goes
The passion in the flame is ignited
You can't put it out once we light it
This shit is exactly what the fuck
That I'm talkin' about when we riot
You dealin' with a few true villains
Who stand inside of a booth, truth-spillin'
And spit true feelings until our tooth fillings
Come flyin' up out of our mouths, now, rewind it
Payback, motherfucker
For the way that you doubted me, how's it taste?
When I slap the taste outta your mouth
With the bass so loud that it shakes the place
I'm Hannibal Lecter, so just in case you're thinkin' of savin' face
You ain't gonna have no face to save
By the time I'm through with this place, so Drake


It may not mean nothin' to y'all
But understand, nothin' was done for me
So I don't plan on stoppin' at all
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane
I'm shuttin' shit down in the mall
And tellin' every girl she the one for me
And I ain't even plannin' to call
I want this shit forever, mane, ever, mane, ever, mane",147
120,144,Stan,rap,Eminem,2000,3298983,{Dido},"


My tea's gone cold, I'm wondering why I
Got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad
My tea's gone cold, I'm wondering why I
Got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad


Dear Slim, I wrote you, but you still ain't callin'
I left my cell, my pager and my home phone at the bottom
I sent two letters back in autumn, you must not've got 'em
There probably was a problem at the post office or somethin'
Sometimes I scribble addresses too sloppy when I jot 'em
But anyways, fuck it, what's been up, man? How's your daughter?
My girlfriend's pregnant too, I'm 'bout to be a father
If I have a daughter, guess what I'ma call her?
I'ma name her Bonnie
I read about your Uncle Ronnie too, I'm sorry
I had a friend kill himself over some bitch who didn't want him
I know you probably hear this every day, but I'm your biggest fan
I even got the underground shit that you did with Skam
I got a room full of your posters and your pictures, man
I like the shit you did with Rawkus too, that shit was phat
Anyways, I hope you get this, man, hit me back
Just to chat, truly yours, your biggest fan, this is Stan

My tea's gone cold, I'm wondering why I
Got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad


Dear Slim, you still ain't called or wrote, I hope you have a chance
I ain't mad, I just think it's fucked up you don't answer fans
If you didn't want to talk to me outside your concert, you didn't have to
But you coulda signed an autograph for Matthew
That's my little brother, man, he's only six years old
We waited in the blisterin' cold
For you, for four hours, and you just said no
That's pretty shitty, man, you're like his fuckin' idol
He wants to be just like you, man, he likes you more than I do
I ain't that mad, though I just don't like bein' lied to
Remember when we met in Denver?
You said if I'd write you, you would write back
See, I'm just like you in a way: I never knew my father neither
He used to always cheat on my mom and beat her
I can relate to what you're sayin' in your songs
So when I have a shitty day, I drift away and put 'em on
'Cause I don't really got shit else
So that shit helps when I'm depressed
I even got a tattoo with your name across the chest
Sometimes I even cut myself to see how much it bleeds
It's like adrenaline, the pain is such a sudden rush for me
See, everything you say is real, and I respect you 'cause you tell it
My girlfriend's jealous 'cause I talk about you 24/7
But she don't know you like I know you, Slim, no one does
She don't know what it was like for people like us growin' up
You gotta call me, man, I'll be the biggest fan you'll ever lose
Sincerely yours, Stan-P.S. We should be together too

My tea's gone cold, I'm wondering why I
Got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad


Dear Mr. I'm-Too-Good-to-Call-or-Write-My-Fans
This'll be the last package I ever send your ass
It's been six months, and still no word-I don't deserve it?
I know you got my last two letters, I wrote the addresses on 'em perfect
So this is my cassette I'm sendin' you, I hope you hear it
I'm in the car right now, I'm doin' 90 on the freeway
Hey, Slim, I drank a fifth of vodka, you dare me to drive?
You know the song by Phil Collins, ""In the Air of the Night""
About that guy who coulda saved that other guy from drownin'
But didn't, then Phil saw it all, then at a show he found him?
That's kinda how this is: you coulda rescued me from drownin'
Now it's too late, I'm on a thousand downers now-I'm drowsy
And all I wanted was a lousy letter or a call
I hope you know I ripped all of your pictures off the wall
I loved you, Slim, we coulda been together-think about it!
You ruined it now, I hope you can't sleep and you dream about it
And when you dream I hope you can't sleep and you scream about it
I hope your conscience eats at you and you can't breathe without me
See, Slim-shut up, bitch! I'm tryin' to talk
Hey, Slim, that's my girlfriend screamin' in the trunk
But I didn't slit her throat, I just tied her up-see? I ain't like you
'Cause if she suffocates she'll suffer more and then she'll die too
Well, gotta go, I'm almost at the bridge now
Oh, shit, I forgot-how am I supposed to send this shit out?!

My tea's gone cold, I'm wondering why I
Got out of bed at all
The morning rain clouds up my window
And I can't see at all
And even if I could it'd all be gray
But your picture on my wall
It reminds me that it's not so bad, it's not so bad


Dear Stan, I meant to write you sooner, but I just been busy
You said your girlfriend's pregnant now, how far along is she?
Look, I'm really flattered you would call your daughter that
And here's an autograph for your brother; I wrote it on a Starter cap
I'm sorry I didn't see you at the show, I must've missed you
Don't think I did that shit intentionally just to diss you
But what's this shit you said about you like to cut your wrists too?
I say that shit just clownin', dawg, come on, how fucked up is you?
You got some issues, Stan, I think you need some counselin'
To help your ass from bouncin' off the walls when you get down some
And what's this shit about us meant to be together?
That type of shit'll make me not want us to meet each other
I really think you and your girlfriend need each other
Or maybe you just need to treat her better
I hope you get to read this letter, I just hope it reaches you in time
Before you hurt yourself, I think that you'll be doin' just fine
If you relax a little, I'm glad I inspire you, but Stan
Why are you so mad? Try to understand that I do want you as a fan
I just don't want you to do some crazy shit
I seen this one shit on the news a couple weeks ago that made me sick
Some dude was drunk and drove his car over a bridge
And had his girlfriend in the trunk, and she was pregnant with his kid
And in the car they found a tape, but they didn't say who it was to
Come to think about it, his name was-it was you


Damn...",772
139,170,21 Questions,rap,50 Cent,2003,1704831,"{""Nate Dogg""}","
New York City
You are now rockin'
With 50 Cent
You gotta love it


I just wanna chill and twist the lah
Catch stunts in my 7-45
You drive me crazy, shorty, I
Need to see you and feel you next to me
I provide everything you need, and I
Like your smile, I don't want to see you cry
Got some questions that I got to ask
And I hope you can come up with the answers, babe


Girl, it's easy to love me now
Would you love me if I was down and out?
Would you still have love for me?
Girl, it's easy to love me now
Would you love me if I was down and out?
Would you still have love for me?

If I fell off tomorrow, would you still love me?
If I didn't smell so good, would you still hug me?
If I got locked up and sentenced to a quarter century
Could I count on you to be there to support me mentally?
If I went back to a hooptie from a Benz
Would you poof and disappear like some of my friends?
If I was hit and I was hurt, would you be by my side?
If it was time to put in work, would you be down to ride?
I get out and peel a nigga cap, chill and drive
I'm askin' questions to find out how you feel inside
If I ain't rap 'cause I flip burgers at Burger King
Would you be ashamed to tell your friends you're feelin' me?
In the bed, if I used my tongue, would you like that?
If I wrote you a love letter, would you write back?
Now we could have a little drink, you know, a nightcap
And we could go do what you like, I know you like that (Like that)


Girl, it's easy to love me now
Would you love me if I was down and out?
Would you still have love for me?
Girl, it's easy to love me now
Would you love me if I was down and out?
Would you still have love for me?

Now would you leave me if your father found out I was thuggin'?
Do you believe me when I tell you, you the one I'm lovin'?
Are you mad 'cause I'm askin' you 21 questions?
Are you my soulmate? 'Cause if so, girl, you a blessing
Do you trust me enough to tell me your dreams?
I'm starin' at you, tryna figure how you got in them jeans
If I was down, would you say things to make me smile?
I'll treat you how you want to be treated, just teach me how
If I was with some other chick and someone happened to see
And when you asked me about it I said it wasn't me
Would you believe me? or up and leave me?
How deep is our bond if that's all it takes for you to be gone?
We only humans, girl, we make mistakes
To make it up, I'll do whatever it take
I love you like a fat kid love cake
You know my style, I say anything to make you smile


Girl, it's easy to love me now
Would you love me if I was down and out?
Would you still have love for me?
Girl, it's easy to love me now
Would you love me if I was down and out?
Would you still have love for me?

Could you love me in a Bentley?
Could you love me on a bus?
I'll ask 21 questions and they all about us
Could you love me in a Bentley?
Could you love me on a bus?
I'll ask 21 questions and they all about us",168
148,179,Still D.R.E.,rap,Dr. Dre,1999,1331848,"{""Snoop Dogg""}","


Yeah, nigga, we're still fuckin' wit' you
Still waters run deep
Still Snoop Dogg and D.R.E.
'99, nigga, guess who's back
Still, still doin' that shit, huh, Dre?
Oh for sho'
Yeah
Check me out


It's still Dre Day nigga, AK nigga
Though I've grown a lot, can't keep it home a lot
'Cause when I frequent the spots that I'm known to rock
You hear the bass from the truck when I'm on the block
Ladies they pay homage, but haters say Dre fell off
How? Nigga, my last album was The Chronic (Nigga)
They wanna know if he still got it
They say rap's changed, they wanna know how I feel about it
(If you ain't up on thangs)
Dr. Dre is the name, I'm ahead of my game
Still puffin' my leaves, still fuck with the beats
Still not lovin' police (Huh-uh)
Still rock my khakis with a cuff and a crease (For sho')
Still got love for the streets, reppin' 213 (For life)
Still the beats bang, still doin' my thang
Since I left ain't too much changed, still

I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.
I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.


Since the last time you heard from me I lost some friends
Well, hell, me and Snoop, we dippin' again
Kept my ear to the streets, signed Eminem
He's triple platinum, doin' 50 a week
Still, I stay close to the heat
And even when I was close to defeat, I rose to my feet
My life's like a soundtrack I wrote to the beat
Treat rap like Cali weed: I smoke 'til I'm 'sleep
Wake up in the A.M., compose a beat
I bring the fire 'til you're soakin' in your seat
It's not a fluke, it's been tried, I'm the truth
Since ""Turn Out the Lights"" from the World Class Wreckin Cru
I'm still at it, after mathematics
In the home of drive-bys and ak-matics
Swap meets, sticky green, and bad traffic
I dip through, then I give you (Still) D.R.E.

I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.
I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.


It ain't nothin' but more hot shit
Another classic CD for y'all to vibe with
Whether you're coolin' on the corner wit' your fly bitch (Biatch)
Laidback in the shack, play this track
I'm representin' for the gangstas all across the world
Still (Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl)
I'll break your neck, damn near put your face in your lap
Niggas try to be the king, but the ace is back
(So if you ain't up on thangs)
Dr. Dre be the name (What?), still runnin' the game
Still got it wrapped like a mummy
Still ain't trippin', love to see young blacks get money
Spend time out the hood, take they moms out the hood
Hit my boys off with jobs, no more livin' hard (Nah, nah)
Barbeques every day, drivin' fancy cars (Hey, hey)
Still gon' get mine regardless (Still)

I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.
I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.
I'm representin' for them gangstas all across the world
(Still) Hittin' them corners in them low-lows, girl
Still takin' my time to perfect the beat
And I still got love for the streets, it's the D.R.E.


Right back up in your mothafuckin' ass
9-5 plus four pennies, add that shit up
D.R.E. right back up on top of thangs
Smoke some wit' your Dogg
No stress, no seeds, no stems, no sticks!
Some of that real sticky-icky-icky
Ooh wee! Put it in the air!
Well, you's a fool, D-R
Ha-ha",180
159,190,Big Poppa,rap,The Notorious B.I.G.,1995,1874899,{},"
Uh, uh, check it out (Yeah), uh
Junior M.A.F.I.A., uh (He-he)
Uh (I like this) yeah, yeah
Nine-fo' (Keep bangin')


To all the ladies in the place with style and grace
Allow me to lace these lyrical douches in your bushes (Uh)
Who rock grooves and make moves with all the mamis?
The back of the club, sippin' Moët is where you'll find me (What?)
The back of the club, mackin' hoes, my crew's behind me (Uh)
Mad question askin', blunt passin'
Music blastin', but I just can't quit
Because one of these honeys Biggie got to creep with (That's right)
Sleep with, keep the ep a secret, why not? (Uh)
Why blow up my spot 'cause we both got hot?
Now check it: I got more mack than Craig, and in the bed
Believe me, sweetie, I got enough to feed the needy (Come on)
No need to be greedy, I got mad friends with Benzes
C-notes by the layers, true fuckin' players (Uh)
Jump in the Rover and come over, tell your friends jump in the GS3
I got the chronic by the tree cuz (Let's go)

I love it when you call me Big Poppa
Throw your hands in the air if you's a true player
I love it when you call me Big Poppa
To the honeys gettin' money, playin' niggas like dummies
I love it when you call me Big Poppa
You got a gun up in your waist, please don't shoot up the place (Why?)
'Cause I see some ladies tonight that should be havin' my baby (Uh), baby (Uh)


Straight up, honey, really I'm askin'
Most of these niggas think they be mackin', but they be actin'
Who they attractin' with that line (What?), ""What's your name? What's your sign?""
Soon as he buy that wine, I just creep up from behind (That's right)
And ask you what your interests are, who you be with
Things that make you smile, what numbers to dial
You gon' be here for a while? I'm gon' go call my crew, you go call your crew
We can rendezvous at the bar around 2 (Come on)
Plans to leave, throw the keys to Little Cease (Uh-huh)
Pull the truck up front, and roll up the next blunt
So we can steam on the way to the telly, go fill my belly (G)
A T-bone steak, cheese eggs and Welch's grape
Conversate for a few, 'cause in a few we gon' do
What we came to do, ain't that right, boo? (True)
Forget the telly-we just go to the crib
And watch a movie in the jacuzzi, smoke Ls while you do me

I love it when you call me Big Poppa
Throw your hands in the air if you's a true player (Come on, yeah)
I love it when you call me Big Poppa
To the honeys gettin' money, playin' niggas like dummies (Uh)
I love it when you call me Big Poppa
You got a gun up in your waist, please don't shoot up the place (Why?)
'Cause I see some ladies tonight that should be havin' my baby, baby (Uh)


(How you livin', Biggie Smalls?) In mansion and Benzes
Givin' ends to my friends, and it feels stupendous
Tremendous cream: fuck a dollar and a dream (Heh)
Still tote gats, strapped with infrared beams (That's right) (What?)
Choppin' Os (Uh-huh), smokin' la in Optimos
Money, hoes and clothes: all a nigga knows (All a nigga knows)
A foolish pleasure? Whatever
I had to find the buried treasure (For what?), so grams I had to measure
However, livin' better now, Coogi sweater now
Drop top BMs, I'm the man, girlfriend


Yeah, honey, check it
Tell your friends to get with my friends
And we can be friends
Shit, we can do this every weekend (That's right), alright?
Is that aight wit' you?
Yeah, keep bangin'

I love it when you call me Big Poppa
Throw your hands in the air if you's a true player
I love it when you call me Big Poppa
To the honeys gettin' money, playin' niggas like dummies (Uh)
I love it when you call me Big Poppa
You got a gun up in your waist, please don't shoot up the place (Why?)
'Cause I see some ladies tonight that should be havin' my baby, baby (Uh)


Check it out
Nine-fo' shit for that ass, uh
Puff Daddy, Biggie Smalls, Junior M.A.F.I.A.
Represent, baby, baby, uh",191
173,206,Lose Yourself,rap,Eminem,2002,6263971,{},"
Look, if you had one shot or one opportunity
To seize everything you ever wanted in one moment
Would you capture it, or just let it slip? Yo


His palms are sweaty, knees weak, arms are heavy
There's vomit on his sweater already, mom's spaghetti
He's nervous, but on the surface he looks calm and ready
To drop bombs, but he keeps on forgetting
What he wrote down, the whole crowd goes so loud
He opens his mouth, but the words won't come out
He's choking, how? Everybody's joking now
The clock's run out, time's up, over, blaow
Snap back to reality, ope there goes gravity, ope
There goes Rabbit, he choked, he's so mad but he won't
Give up that easy, no, he won't have it, he knows
His whole back's to these ropes, it don't matter, he's dope
He knows that but he's broke, he's so stagnant, he knows
When he goes back to this mobile home, that's when it's
Back to the lab again, yo, this old rhapsody
Better go capture this moment and hope it don't pass him, and

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go (Go)
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go (Go)
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better...


His soul's escaping through this hole that is gaping
This world is mine for the taking, make me king
As we move toward a New World Order
A normal life is boring; but superstardom's
Close to post-mortem, it only grows harder
Homie grows hotter, he blows, it's all over
These hoes is all on him, coast-to-coast shows
He's known as the Globetrotter, lonely roads
God only knows, he's grown farther from home, he's no father
He goes home and barely knows his own daughter
But hold your nose, 'cause here goes the cold water
These hoes don't want him no more, he's cold product
They moved on to the next schmoe who flows
He nose-dove and sold nada, and so the soap opera
Is told, it unfolds, I suppose it's old, partner
But the beat goes on, da-da-dom, da-dom, dah-dah, dah-dah

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go (Go)
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go (Go)
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better...


No more games, I'ma change what you call rage
Tear this motherfuckin' roof off like two dogs caged
I was playin' in the beginning, the mood all changed
I've been chewed up and spit out and booed off stage
But I kept rhymin' and stepped right in the next cypher
Best believe somebody's payin' the Pied Piper
All the pain inside amplified by the
Fact that I can't get by with my nine-to-
Five and I can't provide the right type of life for my family
'Cause man, these goddamn food stamps don't buy diapers
And there's no movie, there's no Mekhi Phifer, this is my life
And these times are so hard, and it's gettin' even harder
Tryna feed and water my seed, plus teeter-totter
Caught up between bein' a father and a prima donna
Baby mama drama, screamin' on her, too much for me to wanna
Stay in one spot, another day of monotony's
Gotten me to the point I'm like a snail, I've got
To formulate a plot or end up in jail or shot
Success is my only motherfuckin' option, failure's not
Mom, I love you, but this trailer's got
To go; I cannot grow old in Salem's Lot
So here I go, it's my shot, feet, fail me not
This may be the only opportunity that I got

You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go (Go)
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better lose yourself in the music
The moment, you own it, you better never let it go (Go)
You only get one shot, do not miss your chance to blow
This opportunity comes once in a lifetime, yo
You better...


You can do anything you set your mind to, man",207
180,216,Changes,rap,2Pac,1998,1839457,{Talent},"
Ooh, yeah (Ooh)
(Come on, come on)


I see no changes, wake up in the morning and I ask myself
Is life worth livin'? Should I blast myself?
I'm tired of bein' poor and, even worse, I'm black
My stomach hurts so I'm lookin' for a purse to snatch
Cops give a damn about a negro
Pull the trigger, kill a nigga, he's a hero
""Give the crack to the kids, who the hell cares?
One less hungry mouth on the welfare""
First ship 'em dope and let 'em deal to brothers
Give 'em guns, step back, watch 'em kill each other
""It's time to fight back,"" that's what Huey said
Two shots in the dark, now Huey's dead
I got love for my brother
But we can never go nowhere unless we share with each other
We gotta start makin' changes
Learn to see me as a brother instead of two distant strangers
And that's how it's supposed to be
How can the Devil take a brother if he's close to me? Uh
I'd love to go back to when we played as kids
But things change, and that's the way it is

(Come on, come on)
That's just the way it is (Changes)
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is (That's the way it is, what?)
Aww, yeah-yeah (Hear me)
(Oh my, oh my, come on, come on)
That's just the way it is (That's just the way it is, the way it is)
Things'll never be the same
(Never be the same, yeah, yeah, yeah, aww, yeah)
That's just the way it is (Way it is)
Aww, yeah (Come on, come on)


I see no changes, all I see is racist faces
Misplaced hate makes disgrace to races
We under, I wonder what it takes to make this
One better place, let's erase the wasted
Take the evil out the people, they'll be actin' right
'Cause both black and white are smokin' crack tonight
And the only time we chill is when we kill each other (Kill each other)
It takes skill to be real, time to heal each other
And although it seems heaven-sent
We ain't ready to see a black president, uh (Oh-ooh)
It ain't a secret, don't conceal the fact
The penitentiary's packed and it's filled with blacks
But some things will never change (Never change)
Try to show another way, but you stayin' in the dope game (Ooh)
Now tell me, what's a mother to do?
Bein' real don't appeal to the brother in you (Yeah)
You gotta operate the easy way
""I made a G today,"" but you made it in a sleazy way
Sellin' crack to the kids (Oh-oh), ""I gotta get paid"" (Oh)
Well hey, well that's the way it is

(Come on, come on)
That's just the way it is (Changes)
Things'll never be the same
That's just the way it is (That's the way it is, what?)
Aww, yeah (Hear me)
(Oh my, oh my, come on, come on)
That's just the way it is (That's just the way it is, the way it is)
Things'll never be the same
(Never be the same, yeah, yeah, yeah, aww, yeah)
That's just the way it is (Way it is)
Aww, yeah (Aww, yeah, aww, yeah)


We gotta make a change
It's time for us as a people to start makin' some changes
Let's change the way we eat
Let's change the way we live
And let's change the way we treat each other
You see, the old way wasn't workin'
So it's on us to do what we gotta do to survive


And still I see no changes, can't a brother get a little peace?
It's war on the streets and the war in the Middle East (Ooh, yeah)
Instead of war on poverty
They got a war on drugs so the police can bother me
And I ain't never did a crime I ain't have to do
But now I'm back with the facts, givin' it back to you (Ooh)
Don't let 'em jack you up, back you up
Crack you up and pimp-smack you up
You gotta learn to hold your own
They get jealous when they see you with your mobile phone
But tell the cops they can't touch this
I don't trust this, when they try to rush, I bust this
That's the sound of my tool, you say it ain't cool
My mama didn't raise no fool (Oh)
And as long as I stay black, I gotta stay strapped
And I never get to lay back
'Cause I always got to worry 'bout the payback
Some buck that I roughed up way back
Comin' back after all these years
""Rat-a-tat-tat-tat-tat,"" that's the way it is

(Uh)
That's just the way it is (Just the way it is, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Things'll never be the same (Yeah)
That's just the way it is (The way it is)
Aww, yeah (Some things will never change, oh my)
(I'm tryna make a change)
(You're my brother, you're my sister, yeah)
That's just the way it is (The way it is, the way it is)
Things'll never be the same (You're my brother, you're my sister)
That's just the way it is, aww, yeah
Some things'll never change",213
191,228,Hail Mary,rap,2Pac,1997,1560686,"{Outlawz,""Prince Ital Joe""}","


Makaveli in this, Killuminati
All through your body (All through your body)
The blow is like a 12-Gauge shotty (Uh) feel me!
(Come with me Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see)
And God said he should send his one begotten son
(What do we have here now Do you wanna ride or die)
To lead the wild into the ways of the man
Follow me! (La la-da-la la la la la)
Eat my flesh, flesh of my flesh!


Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La la-da-la la la la la


I ain't a killer, but don't push me
Revenge is like the sweetest joy next to gettin' pussy
Picture paragraphs unloaded, wise words bein' quoted
Peeped the weakness in the rap game and sewed it
Bow down, pray to God, hopin' that he's listenin'
Seein' niggas comin' for me through my diamonds when they glistenin'
Now pay attention: bless me please, Father, I'm a ghost
In these killing fields, Hail Mary, catch me if I go
Let's go deep inside the solitary mind of a madman
Screams in the dark, evil lurks, enemies see me flee
Activate my hate, let it break to the flame
Set trip, empty out my clip, never stop to aim
Some say the game is all corrupt and fucked in this shit
Stuck, niggas is lucky if we bust out this shit
Plus, Mama told me never stop until I bust a nut
Fuck the world if they can't adjust, it's just as well, Hail Mary

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La, da-da, da, da, da-da, da
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La, da-da, da, da, da-da, da


Penitentiaries is packed with promise-makers
Never realized the precious time that bitch niggas is wastin'
Institutionalized, I live my life a product made to crumble
But too hardened for a smile, we're too crazy to be humble
We ballin', catch me, Father, please
'Cause I'm fallin' in the liquor store
Pass the Hennessy, I hear you callin', can I get some more?
Hell, 'til I reach Hell, I ain't scared
Mama checkin' in my bedroom, I ain't there
I got a head with no screws in it, what can I do?
One life to live, but I got nothin' to lose
Just me and you on a one-way trip to prison, sellin' drugs
We all wrapped up in this livin', life as thugs
To my homeboys in Clinton Max doin' their bid
Raise hell to this real shit and feel this
When they turn out the lights, I'll be there in the dark
Thuggin' eternal through my heart
Now hail Mary, nigga!

Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La, da-da, da, da, da-da, da
Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
La, da-da, da, da, da-da, da


They got a A-P-B out on my thug family
Since Outlawz run these streets like these scandalous freaks
Our enemies die now, walk around half-dead
Head down, K-blasted off of Hennessy and Thai Chronic
Mixed in, now I'm twisted, blistered and high
Visions of me thug-livin' gettin' me by
Forever live, and I multiply, survived by thugs
When I die they won't cry unless they comin' with slugs


Peep the whole scene and whatever's goin' on around me
Brain kind of cloudy, smoked out, feelin' rowdy
Ready to wet the party up
And whoever in that motherfucker, nasty new street slugger
My heat seeks suckers on the regular
Mashin' in a stolen Black Ac' Integra
Cocked back, sixty seconds 'til the draw, that's when I'm deadin' ya
Feet first, you've got a nice Gat but my heat's worse
From a thug to preachin' church
I gave you love, now you eatin' dirt
Needin' work, and I ain't the nigga to put you on
'Cause word is bond
When I was broke, I had to hustle 'til dawn
That's when the sun came up, there's only one way up
Hold your head and stay up
To all my niggas, get your pay and weight up

If it's on, then it's on, we rape beat-breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate?
To this shit I don't got be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate
If it's on, then it's on, we rape beat-breaks
Outlawz on a paper chase, can you relate?
To this shit I don't got be the shit I gotta take
Dealin' with fate, hopin' God don't close the gate


Come with me!
Hail Mary, nigga, run quick, see
What do we have here now?
Do you wanna ride or die?
We've been travelin' on this weary road
Sometimes life can be a heavy load
But we ride, ride it like a bullet
Hail Mary, hail Mary (Hail Mary)
We won't worry, everything will curry
Free like the bird in the tree
We won't worry, everything will curry
Yes, we free like the bird in the tree
We runnin' from the penitentiary
This is the time for we liberty
Hail Mary, hail Mary!


Westside, Outlawz
Makaveli the Don, solo
Killuminati, The 7 Days",223
193,230,Ether,rap,Nas,2001,1577304,{},"


Fuck Jay-Z
What's up, niggas?
Ayo, I know you ain't talkin' about me, dog (You? What?)
Fuck Jay-Z
You been on my dick, nigga
You love my style, nigga (Uh, uh, uh, uh)
Fuck Jay-Z


(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you, the king, you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I'll prove you lost already (Uh)


Brace yourself for the main event, y'all impatiently waitin'
It's like a AIDS test, what's the results?
Not positive, who's the best, Pac, Nas and B.I.G.?
Ain't no best, east, west, north, south, flossed out
Greetings, I embrace y'all with napalm
Blows up, no guts left, chest, face gone
How could Nas be garbage? Semi-autos at your cartilage (Uh)
Burner at the side of your dome, come out of my throne
I got this locked since '91 (Uh), I am the truest
Name a rapper that I ain't influenced
Gave y'all chapters, but now I keep my eyes on the Judas
With Hawaiian Sophie fame, kept my name in his music, check it

(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you, the king, you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly (Haha)
(Lose) I'll prove you lost already (Uh)


Ayo, pass me the weed (Tsk, there you go)
Put my ashes out on these niggas, man (Ain't no doubt)
Ayo, you faggots, y'all kneel and kiss the motherfuckin' ring


(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you, the king, you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I'll prove you lost already


I've been fucked over, left for dead, dissed and forgotten
Luck ran out, they hoped that I'd be gone, stiff and rotten
Y'all just piss on me, shit on me, spit on my grave (Uh)
Talk about me, laugh behind my back, but in my face
Y'all some well-wishin' (Bitch niggas), friendly-actin', envy-hidin' snakes
With your hands out for my money, man, how much can I take?
When these streets keep callin', heard it when I was sleep
That this Gay-Z and Cock-a-Fella Records wanted beef (What?)
Started cockin' up my weapon, slowly loadin' up this ammo
To explode it on a camel (Haha) and his soldiers I can handle
This for dolo and his manuscript just sound stupid
When KRS already made a album called Blueprint (Dick)
First Biggie's your man, then you got the nerve to say
That you better than B.I.G., dick-suckin' lips (Ha)
Why don't you let the late, great veteran live?

I will
Not lose (God's son across the belly, I'll prove you lost already), uh
The king is back
Where my crown at? (Ill Will)
Ill Will, rest in peace, let's do it, niggas


(I) Fuck with your soul like ether
(Will) Teach you, the king, you know you
(Not) God's Son across the belly
(Lose) I'll prove you lost already


Y'all niggas deal with emotions like bitches
What's sad is I love you 'cause you're my brother, you traded your soul for riches
My child, I've watched you grow up to be famous
And now I smile like a proud dad watchin' his only son that made it
You seem to be only concerned with dissin' women
Were you abused as a child? Scared to smile, they called you ugly?
Well, life is harsh, hug me, don't reject me
Or make records to disrespect me, blatant or indirectly
In '88 you was gettin' chased through your building
Callin' my crib and I ain't even give you my numbers
All I did was give you a style for you to run with
Smilin' in my face, glad to break bread with the God
Wearin' Jaz' chains, no TECs, no cash, no cars
No jail bars, Jigga, no pies, no case
Just Hawaiian shirts, hangin' with little Chase
You a fan, a phony, a fake, a pussy, a Stan
I'll still whip your ass, you thirty-six in a karate class?
You Tae-Bo ho, tryna work it out, you tryna get brolic?
Ask me if I'm tryna kick knowledge?
Nah, I'm tryna kick the shit you need to learn, though
That ether, that shit that make your soul burn slow (Burn slow)
Is he Dame Diddy, Dame Daddy or Dame Dummy?
Oh, I get it, you Biggie and he's Puffy (Ill)
Rockefeller died of AIDS, that was the end of his chapter
And that's the guy y'all chose to name your company after?
Put it together, I rock hoes, y'all rock fellas
And now y'all tryna take my spot, fellas?
Feel these hot rocks, fellas, put you in a dry spot, fellas
In a pine box with nine shots from my Glock, fellas
Foxy got you hot 'cause you kept your face in her puss
What you think, you gettin' girls now 'cause of your looks? (Girls, girls, girls, haha)
Negro, please, ha, you no-mustache-havin'
With whiskers like a rat, compared to Beans, you wack
And your man stabbed Un and made you take the blame
You ass, went from Jaz to hangin' with Kane, to Irv, to B.I.G
And Eminem murdered you on your own shit
You a dick-ridin' faggot, you love the attention
Queens niggas run you niggas, ask Russell Simmons, ha
R-O-C get gunned up and clapped quick
J.J. Evans get gunned up and clapped quick
Your whole damn record label, gunned up and clapped quick
Shawn Carter to Jay-Z, damn, you on Jaz dick
So little Shawny's gettin' gunned up and clapped quick
How much of Biggie's rhymes is gon' come out your fat lips? (Nigga)
Wanted to be on every last one of my classics
You pop shit, apologize, nigga, just ask Kiss",225
198,238,Lifes a Bitch,rap,Nas,1994,1225050,{AZ},"


Ayo, what's up, what's up?
Let's keep it real, son, count this money
You know what I'm sayin'? Yeah, yeah
Ayo, put the Grants over there in the safe
You know what I'm sayin'?
'Cause we spendin' these Jacksons
The Washingtons go to wifey, you know how that go
I'm sayin' that's what this is all about, right?
Clothes, bankrolls, and hoes
You know what I'm sayin'?
Yo, then what, man, what?!


Visualizin' the realism of life in actuality
Fuck who's the baddest, a person's status depends on salary
And my mentality is money-orientated
I'm destined to live the dream for all my peeps who never made it
'Cause yeah, we were beginners in the hood as Five Percenters
But somethin' must've got in us, 'cause all of us turned to sinners
Now some restin' in peace and some are sittin' in San Quentin
Others, such as myself, are tryin' to carry on tradition
Keepin' this Schweppervescent street ghetto essence inside us
'Cause it provides us with the proper insight to guide us
Even though we know, somehow we all gotta go
But as long as we leavin' thievin'
We'll be leavin' with some kind of dough
So, until that day we expire and turn to vapors
Me and my capers will be somewhere stackin' plenty papers
Keepin' it real, packin' steel, gettin' high
'Cause life's a bitch and then you die

Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we get high
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we puff lye
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we get high
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we puff lye


I woke up early on my born day; I'm 20, it's a blessin'
The essence of adolescence leaves my body, now I'm fresh and
My physical frame is celebrated 'cause I made it
One quarter through life, some godly-like thing created
Got rhymes 365 days annual, plus some
Load up the mic and bust one, cuss while I pus from
My skull, 'cause it's pain in my brain vein, money maintain
Don't go against the grain, simple and plain
When I was young at this I used to do my thing hard
Robbin' foreigners, take they wallets, they jewels and rip they green cards
Dipped to the projects, flashin' my quick cash
And got my first piece of ass, smokin' blunts with hash
Now it's all about cash in abundance
Niggas I used to run with is rich or doin' years in the hundreds
I switched my motto; instead of sayin', ""Fuck tomorrow!""
That buck that bought a bottle could've struck the lotto
Once I stood on the block, loose cracks produce stacks
I cooked up and cut small pieces to get my loot back
Time is illmatic, keep static like wool fabric
Pack a 4-matic to crack your whole cabbage

Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we get high
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we puff lye
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we get high
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die, that's why we puff lye
'Cause you never know when you're gonna go
Life's a bitch and then you die

",231
200,240,Fuck tha Police,rap,N.W.A,1988,2360514,{},"


Right about now, N.W.A court is in full effect
Judge Dre presiding
In the case of N.W.A versus the Police Department
Prosecuting attorneys are MC Ren, Ice Cube
And Eazy-motherfucking-E
Order, order, order!
Ice Cube, take the motherfucking stand
Do you swear to tell the truth, the whole truth
And nothing but the truth so help your black ass?
You goddamn right
Well, won't you tell everybody what the fuck you gotta say?


Fuck the police comin' straight from the underground
A young nigga got it bad 'cause I'm brown
And not the other color, so police think
They have the authority to kill a minority
Fuck that shit, 'cause I ain't the one
For a punk motherfucker with a badge and a gun
To be beating on and thrown in jail
We can go toe-to-toe in the middle of a cell
Fuckin' with me 'cause I'm a teenager
With a little bit of gold and a pager
Searchin' my car, lookin' for the product
Thinkin' every nigga is sellin' narcotics
You'd rather see me in the pen
Than me and Lorenzo rollin' in a Benz-o
Beat a police out of shape
And when I'm finished, bring the yellow tape
To tape off the scene of the slaughter
Still getting swole off bread and water
I don't know if they fags or what
Search a nigga down and grabbing his nuts
And on the other hand, without a gun, they can't get none
But don't let it be a black and a white one
'Cause they'll slam ya down to the street top
Black police showing out for the white cop
Ice Cube will swarm
On any motherfucker in a blue uniform
Just 'cause I'm from the CPT
Punk police are afraid of me, huh
A young nigga on the warpath
And when I'm finished, it's gonna be a bloodbath
Of cops dying in L.A. 
Yo, Dre, I got something to say

Fuck the police, fuck- fuck-
Fuck the police, fuck- fuck-
Fuck the police, fuck the- fuck the-
Fuck the police (Example of scene one)


Pull your goddamn ass over right now!
Aw shit, now what the fuck you pullin' me over for?
'Cause I feel like it!
Just sit your ass on the curb and shut the fuck up!
Man, fuck this shit
Alright, smart-ass, I'm taking your black ass to jail!
MC Ren, will you please give your testimony
To the jury about this fucked up incident?


Fuck the police and Ren said it with authority
Because the niggas on the street is a majority
A gang is with whoever I'm steppin'
And the motherfuckin' weapon is kept in
A stash spot for the so-called law
Wishing Ren was a nigga that they never saw
Lights start flashing behind me
But they're scared of a nigga, so they mace me to blind me
But that shit don't work, I just laugh
Because it gives them a hint not to step in my path
For police, I'm saying, ""Fuck you, punk!""
Reading my rights and shit, it's all junk
Pulling out a silly club, so you stand
With a fake-ass badge and a gun in your hand
But take off the gun so you can see what's up
And we'll go at it, punk, and I'ma fuck you up
Make you think I'ma kick your ass
But drop your gat, and Ren's gonna blast
I'm sneaky as fuck when it comes to crime
But I'ma smoke 'em now and not next time
Smoke any motherfucker that sweats me
Or any asshole that threatens me
I'm a sniper with a hell of a scope
Takin' out a cop or two, they can't cope with me
The motherfuckin' villain that's mad
With potential to get bad as fuck
So I'ma turn it around
Put in my clip, yo, and this is the sound (*Gunshots*)
Yeah, somethin' like that
But it all depends on the size of the gat
Takin' out a police would make my day
But a nigga like Ren don't give a fuck to say

Fuck the police, fuck the- fuck the-
Fuck the police, fuck the- fuck the-
Fuck the police, fuck the- fuck-
Fuck the police


*Knocking*
Yeah, man, what you need?
Police, open now (Aww, shit)
We have a warrant for Eazy-E's arrest (*Battering ram*)
Get down and put your hands right where I can see 'em! (Move, motherfucker, move now!)
What the fuck did I do, man? What did I do?
Just shut the fuck up and get your motherfucking ass on the floor! (You heard the man, shut the fuck up!)
But I didn't do shit
Man, just shut the fuck up!
Eazy-E, won't you step up to the stand
And tell the jury how you feel about this bullshit?


I'm tired of the motherfuckin' jackin'
Sweating my gang, while I'm chillin' in the shack, and
Shining the light in my face, and for what?
Maybe it's because I kick so much butt
I kick ass, or maybe 'cause I blast
On a stupid ass nigga when I'm playing with the trigger
Of an Uzi or an AK
'Cause the police always got somethin' stupid to say
They put out my picture with silence
'Cause my identity by itself causes violence
The E with the criminal behavior
Yeah, I'm a gangsta, but still, I got flavor
Without a gun and a badge, what do you got?
A sucker in a uniform waiting to get shot
By me or another nigga
And with a gat, it don't matter if he's smaller or bigger
(Size don't mean shit, he's from the old school, fool)
And as you all know, E's here to rule
Whenever I'm rollin', keep lookin' in the mirror
And ears on cue, yo, so I can hear a
Dumb motherfucker with a gun
And if I'm rollin' off the eight, he'll be the one
That I take out, and then get away
While I'm driving off laughing, this is what I'll say

Fuck the police, fuck the- fuck the-
Fuck the police, fuck-
Fuck the police, fuck- fuck-
Fuck the police (The verdict)


The jury has found you guilty of being a redneck, white bread, chicken shit motherfucker
Wait, that's a lie! That's a goddamn lie!
Get him out of here! (I want justice!)
Get him the fuck out my face! (I want justice!)
Out, right now!
Fuck you, you black motherfuckers!


Fuck the police
Fuck the police
Fuck the police",243
201,243,In da Club,rap,50 Cent,2003,2005139,{},"


Go, go, go, go, go, go
Go shawty, it's your birthday
We gon' party like it's your birthday
And we gon' sip Bacardi like it's your birthday
And you know we don't give a fuck, it's not your birthday


You can find me in the club, bottle full of bub'
Look, mami, I got the X if you into takin' drugs
I'm into havin' sex, I ain't into makin' love
So come give me a hug if you into gettin' rubbed
You can find me in the club, bottle full of bub'
Look, mami, I got the X if you into takin' drugs
I'm into havin' sex, I ain't into makin' love
So come give me a hug if you into gettin' rubbed


When I pull up out front, you see the Benz on dubs (Uh-huh)
When I roll twenty deep, it's twenty nines in the club (Yeah)
Niggas heard I fuck with Dre, now they wanna show me love
When you sell like Eminem and the hoes, they wanna fuck (Woo)
Look homie, ain't nothin' changed: hoes down, G's up
I see Xzibit in the cut, hey nigga, roll that weed up! (Roll it!)
If you watch how I move, you'll mistake me for a player or pimp
Been hit with a few shells, but I don't walk with a limp (I'm aight)
In the hood in L.A. they sayin', ""50, you hot"" (Uh-huh)
They like me, I want 'em to love me like they love Pac
But holla in New York, the niggas'll tell you I'm loco (Yeah)
And the plan is to put the rap game in a chokehold (Uh-huh)
I'm fully focused, man, my money on my mind
Got a mil' out the deal and I'm still on the grind (Woo)
Now Shorty said she feelin' my style, she feelin' my flow (Uh-huh)
Her girlfriend with her, they bi and they ready to go (Okay)

You can find me in the club, bottle full of bub'
Look, mami, I got the X if you into takin' drugs
I'm into havin' sex, I ain't into makin' love
So come give me a hug if you into gettin' rubbed
You can find me in the club, bottle full of bub'
Look, mami, I got the X if you into takin' drugs
I'm into havin' sex, I ain't into makin' love
So come give me a hug if you into gettin' rubbed (Rubbed)


My flow, my show brought me the dough
That bought me all my fancy things
My crib, my cars, my clothes, my jewels
Look, nigga, I done came up and I ain't changed (What? What? Yeah)


And you should love it way more than you hate it
Nigga, you mad? I thought that you'd be happy I made it (Woo)
I'm that cat by the bar toastin' to the good life
You that faggot-ass nigga tryin' to pull me back, right?
When my joint get to pumpin' in the club, it's on
I wink my eye at yo' bitch, if she smiles, she gone
If the roof on fire, let the motherfucker burn
If you talkin' about money, homie, I ain't concerned
I'ma tell you what Banks told me:
""Cuz, go 'head, switch the style up
If niggas hate, then let them hate, and watch the money pile up""
Or we can go upside your head with a bottle of bub'
They know where we fuckin' be

You can find me in the club, bottle full of bub'
Look, mami, I got the X if you into takin' drugs
I'm into havin' sex, I ain't into makin' love
So come give me a hug if you into gettin' rubbed
You can find me in the club, bottle full of bub'
Look, mami, I got the X if you into takin' drugs
I'm into havin' sex, I ain't into makin' love
So come give me a hug if you into gettin' rubbed (Ha-ha-ha-ha)


Don't try to act like you don't know where we be neither, nigga
We in the club all the time, nigga, so pop, pop off, nigga
G-Unit",233
205,247,It Was a Good Day,rap,Ice Cube,1992,1463692,{},"


Break 'em
Yeah
Yeah
Yeah
Uh


Just wakin' up in the morning, gotta thank God
I don't know, but today seems kinda odd
No barking from the dog, no smog
And Momma cooked a breakfast with no hog
I got my grub on, but didn't pig out
Finally got a call from a girl I wanna dig out
Hooked it up for later as I hit the door
Thinkin', ""Will I live another twenty-four?""
I gotta go 'cause I got me a drop-top
And if I hit the switch, I can make the ass drop
Had to stop at a red light
Lookin' in my mirror and not a jacker in sight
And everything is alright
I got a beep from Kim, and she can fuck all night
Called up the homies and I'm askin' y'all
""Which park are y'all playin' basketball?""
Get me on the court and I'm trouble
Last week, fucked around and got a triple double
Freakin' niggas every way, like MJ
I can't believe today was a good day

Drove to the pad and hit the showers
Didn't even get no static from the cowards
'Cause just yesterday them fools tried to blast me
Saw the police and they rolled right past me
No flexin', didn't even look in a nigga's direction
As I ran the intersection
Went to Short Dog's house, they was watchin' Yo! MTV Raps
What's the haps on the craps?
Shake 'em up, shake 'em up, shake 'em up, shake 'em
Roll 'em in a circle of niggas
And watch me break 'em with the 7, 7-11, 7-11
7, even back door Little Joe
I picked up the cash flow
Then we played bones, and I'm yellin': ""Domino!""
Plus nobody I know got killed in South Central LA
Today was a good day


Left my nigga's house paid
Picked up a girl been tryna fuck since the 12th grade
It's ironic, I had the brew, she had the chronic
The Lakers beat the Supersonics
I felt on the big fat fanny
Pulled out the jammy and killed the punani
And my dick runs deep, so deep
So deep put her ass to sleep
Woke her up around one
She didn't hesitate to call Ice Cube the top gun
Drove her to the pad and I'm coastin'
Took another sip of the potion, hit the three-wheel motion
I was glad everything had worked out
Dropped her ass off and then chirped out
Today was like one of those fly dreams
Didn't even see a berry flashin' those high beams
No helicopter lookin' for a murder
Two in the morning, got the Fatburger
Even saw the lights of the Goodyear Blimp
And it read ""Ice Cube's a Pimp"" (Yeah)
Drunk as hell, but no throwin' up
Halfway home and my pager still blowin' up
Today I didn't even have to use my AK
I gotta say, it was a good day

Hey, wait, wait a minute!
Pooh, stop this shit!
What the fuck am I thinkin' about?",237
206,248,Through the Wire,rap,Kanye West,2003,1228114,{},"


Last October Grammy-nominated producer KANYE WEST was in a nearly fatal car accident. His jaw was fractured in nearly three places. Two weeks later he recorded this song with his mouth still wired shut... so the world could feel his pain!


Yo, Gee, they can't stop me from rappin', can they?
Can they, Hop?


Through the fire, to the limit, to the wall
For a chance to be with you, I'd gladly risk it all
Through the fire, through whatever, come what may
For a chance at loving you, I'd take it all the way
Right down to the wire, even through the fire


I spit it through the wire, man
There's too much stuff on my heart right now, man
I'd gladly risk it all right now
It's a life-or-death situation, man
Y'all, y'all don't really understand how I feel right now, man
It's your boy, Kanye to the...
Chi-Town, what's goin' on?
Uh-huh, yeah, yeah

I drink a Boost for breakfast, an Ensure for dessert
Somebody ordered pancakes, I just sip the sizzurp
That right there could drive a sane man berserk
Not to worry, Mr. H-to-the-Izzo's back to wizzerk
How do you console my mom or give her light support
Tellin' her her son's on life support?
And just imagine how my girl feel
On the plane scared as hell that her guy look like Emmett Till
She was with me before the deal, she'd been tryna be mine
She a Delta, so she'd been throwin' that Dynasty sign
No use in me tryna be lyin', I been tryna be signed
Tryin' to be a millionaire, how I used two lifelines
In the same hospital where Biggie Smalls died
The doctor said I had blood clots, but I ain't Jamaican, man
Story on MTV and I ain't tryna make a band
I swear, this right here, history in the makin', man


Through the fire, to the limit, to the wall
For a chance to be with you, I'd gladly risk it all
Through the fire, through whatever, come what may
For a chance at loving you, I'd take it all the way
Right down to the wire, even through the fire


I really apologize for everything right now
If it's unclear at all, man
They got my mouth wired shut
For like... I dunno, the doctor said like six weeks
Y'know, he had, I had reconstructive surgery on my jaw
I looked in the mirror
And half my jaw was in the back of my mouth, man
I couldn't believe it
But I'm still here for y'all right now, man
This what I got to say right here, dawg
Yeah, turn me up, yeah, uh

What if somebody from the Chi' that was ill got a deal
On the hottest rap label around?
But he wasn't talkin' 'bout coke and birds
It was more like spoken word, 'cept he's really puttin' it down?
And he explained the story 'bout how Blacks came from glory
And what we need to do in the game
Good dude, bad night, right place, wrong time
In the blink of a eye, his whole life changed
If you could feel how my face felt
You would know how Mase felt (Mason Betha!)
Thank God I ain't too cool for the safe belt
I swear to God, driver two wanna sue
I got a lawyer for the case, to keep what's in my safe safe
My dawgs couldn't tell if I...
I looked like Tom Cruise in Vanilla Sky, it was televised
There's been an accident like GEICO
They thought I was burnt up like Pepsi did Michael
I must got a angel, 'cause look how death missed his ass
Unbreakable, what, you thought they'd call me Mr. Glass?
Look back on my life like the Ghost of Christmas Past
Toys ""R"" Us where I used to spend that Christmas cash
And I still won't grow up, I'm a grown-ass kid
Swear I should be locked up for stupid shit that I did
But I'm a champion, so I turned tragedy to triumph
Make music that's fire, spit my soul through the wire

Through the fire, to the limit, to the wall
For a chance to be with you, I'd gladly risk it all
Through the fire, through whatever, come what may
For a chance at loving you, I'd take it all the way
Right down to the wire, even through the fire


Y'know what I'm sayin'?
When the doctor told me I had, um
That I was gonna have to have a plate in my chin
I said, ""Dawg, don't you realize I'll never make it on a plane now?""
""It's bad enough I got all this jewelry on!""
You can't be serious, man",238
210,252,California Love,rap,2Pac,1995,1136468,"{""Dr. Dre"",""Roger Troutman""}","
California love


California knows how to party
California knows how to party
In the city of L.A
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rockin', we keep it rockin'


Now let me welcome everybody to the Wild Wild West
A state that's untouchable like Eliot Ness
The track hits your eardrum like a slug to your chest
Pack a vest for your Jimmy in the city of sex
We in that sunshine state where the bomb-ass hemp be
The state where you never find a dance floor empty
And pimps be on a mission for them greens
Lean mean money-making-machines servin' fiends
I been in the game for ten years makin' rap tunes
Ever since honeys was wearin' Sassoon
Now it's '95 and they clock me and watch me
Diamonds shinin', lookin' like I robbed Liberace
It's all good, from Diego to the Bay
Your city is the bomb if your city makin' pay
Throw up a finger if you feel the same way
Dre puttin' it down for Californ-i-a

California knows how to party
California knows how to party (Yes, they do)
In the city of L.A
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rockin', we keep it rockin'


Shake, shake it, baby
Shake, shake it, mama
Shake it, Cali
Shake it, shake it, baby
Shake it, shake it, shake it, shake it


Out on bail, fresh out of jail, California dreamin'
Soon as I step on the scene, I'm hearin' hoochies screamin'
Fiendin' for money and alcohol, the life of a Westside player
Where cowards die and the strong ball
Only in Cali where we riot, not rally, to live and die
In L.A. we wearin' Chucks, not Ballys (Yeah, that's right)
Dressed in Locs and Khaki suits, and ride is what we do
Flossin' but have caution: we collide with other crews
Famous because we throw grams
Worldwide, let them recognize from Long Beach to Rosecrans
Bumpin' and grindin' like a slow jam
It's Westside, so you know the Row won't bow down to no man
Say what you say, but give me that bomb beat from Dre
Let me serenade the streets of L.A
From Oakland to Sac-town, the Bay Area and back down
Cali is where they put their mack down; give me love!

California knows how to party
California knows how to party (Yes, they do)
In the city of L.A
In the city of good ol' Watts
In the city, the city of Compton
We keep it rockin', we keep it rockin'


South Central
Uh, that's right
Now make it shake


Shake, shake it, baby
Shake, shake it, mama
Shake it, Cali
Shake it, shake it, baby
Shake it, shake it, shake it, shake it


Shake it, Cali
Uh, uh, West Coast
Uh, yeah, uh, uh, Long Beach in the house
Uh, yeah, Oaktown
Oakland definitely in the house
Frisco, Frisco

And you know L.A. up in here
Pasadena, where you at?
Yeah, Inglewood
Inglewood always up to no good
Even Hollywood tryin' to get a piece, baby
Sacramento, Sacramento where you at?
Throw it up, y'all! Throw it up, throw it up!
I can't see ya
Let's show these fools how we do it over on this Westside
'Cause you and I know it's the best side
Yeah, that's right
West Coast, West Coast",244
212,254,Nuthin But a G Thang,rap,Dr. Dre,1992,1218629,"{""Snoop Dogg""}","


One, two, three and to the four
Snoop Doggy Dogg and Dr. Dre is at the door
Ready to make an entrance so back on up
'Cause you know we're 'bout to rip shit up
Give me the microphone first so I can bust like a bubble
Compton and Long Beach together, now you know you in trouble
Ain't nuthin' but a G thang, baby
Two loced out niggas going crazy
Death Row is the label that pays me
Unfadeable so please don't try to fade this (Hell yeah)
But, um, back to the lecture at hand
Perfection is perfected so I'ma let 'em understand
From a young G's perspective
And before me dig out a bitch I have to find a contraceptive
You never know, she could be earnin' her man and learnin' her man
And at the same time burnin' her man
Now, you know I ain't with that shit, Lieutenant
Ain't no pussy good enough to get burnt while I'm up in it (Yeah)
And that's realer than Real-Deal Holyfield
And now you hookers and hoes know how I feel
Well, if it's good enough to get broke off a proper chunk
I'll take a small piece of some of that funky stuff

It's like this and like that and like this and a-
It's like that and like this and like that and a-
It's like this and like that and like this and a-
Dre, creep to the mic like a phantom


Well, I'm peepin' and I'm creepin' and I'm creepin'
But I damn near got caught 'cause my beeper kept beepin'
Now it's time for me to make my impression felt
So sit back, relax, and strap on your seat belt
You never been on a ride like this befo'
With a producer who can rap and control the micstro
At the same time with the dope rhyme that I kick
You know and I know, I flow some old funky shit
To add to my collection, the selection
Symbolizes dope, take a toke, but don't choke
If you do, you'll have no clue
Of what me and my homie Snoop Dogg came to do


It's like this and like that and like this and a-
It's like that and like this and like that and a-
It's like this, and who gives a fuck about those?
So just chill 'til the next episode

You've got the feeling
Rock the other side
You've got the feeling (Yeah, yeah)


Fallin' back on that ass with a hellafied gangsta lean
Gettin' funky on the mic like a old batch of collard greens
It's the capital S, oh, yes, I'm fresh, N, double-O, P
D, O, double-G, Y, D, O, double-G, you see
Showin' much flex when it's time to wreck a mic
Pimpin' hoes and clockin' a grip like my name was Dolemite
Yeah, and it don't quit
I think they in the mood for some motherfuckin' G shit (Hell yeah)
So, Dre (What up, Dogg?)
Gotta give 'em what they want (What's that, G?)
We gotta break 'em off somethin' (Hell yeah)
And it's gotta be bumpin' (City of Compton)


Is where it takes place, so when asked, your attention
Mobbin' like a motherfucker but I ain't lynchin'
Droppin' the funky shit that's makin' the sucker niggas mumble
When I'm on the mic, it's like a cookie, they all crumble
Try to get close and your ass'll get smacked
My motherfuckin' homie Doggy Dogg has got my back
Never let me slip, 'cause if I slip, then I'm slippin'
But if I got my nina, then you know I'm straight trippin'
And I'ma continue to put the rap down, put the mac down
And if you bitches talk shit, I have to put the smack down
Yeah, and you don't stop
I told ya I'm just like a clock when I tick and I tock
But I'm never off, always on to the break of dawn
C-O-M-P-T-O-N and the city they call Long Beach
Puttin' the shit together
Like my nigga D.O.C., no one can do it better

Like this, that and this and a-
It's like that and like this and like that and a-
It's like this, and who gives a fuck about those?
So just chill 'til the next episode


You've got the feeling
Rock the other side
You've got the feeling (Yeah, yeah)
You've got the feeling
Rock the other side
You've got the feeling (Yeah, yeah)
You've got the feeling
Rock the other side
You've got the feeling (Yeah, yeah)",246
230,278,BedRock,rap,Young Money,2009,1317888,{Lloyd},"
I-I-I-I can make your bed rock (Young Money)
I-I-I-I can make your bed rock, girl (Kane is in the building, nigga)
I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
I-I-I-I can make your bed rock


Uh, she got that good-good, she Michael Jackson bad
I'm attracted to her, or her attractive ass
And now we murderers, because we kill time
I knock her lights out and she still shine
I hate to see her go but I love to watch her leave
But I keep her running back and forth; soccer team
Cold as a winter's day, hot as a summer's eve
Young Money thieves steal your love and leave


I like the way you walking if you walking my way
I'm that Red Bull, now let's fly away
Let's buy a place, with all kind of space
I'll let you be the judge, and-and-and I'm the case
I'm Gudda Gudda, I put her under
I see me with her, no Stevie Wonder
She don't ever wonder, 'cause she know she bad
And I got her, nigga: grocery bag

Ooh baby, I be stuck to you like glue, baby
Wanna spend it all on you, baby
My room is the G-spot
Call me Mr. Flintstone, I can make your bed rock


(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock, girl
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock (Ayy!)


Okay, I get it, let me think, I guess it's my turn
Maybe it's time to put this pussy on your sideburns
He say I'm bad, he prob'ly right
He pressing me like button-downs on a Friday night
I'm so pretty like, be on my pedal bike
Be on my low starch, be on my egg whites
He say, ""Nicki don't stop, you the bestest""
And I'd just be coming off the top, asbestos


I love your sushi roll, hotter than wasabi
I race for your love, ""Shake'n Bake"" Ricky Bobby
I'm at the W, but I can't meet you in the lobby
Girl, I gotta watch my back, 'cause I'm not just anybody
I seen em stand in line just to get beside her
I let her see the Aston and let the rest surprise her
That's when we disappear, you need GPS to find her
Oh, that was your girl? I thought I recognized her

Ooh baby, I be stuck to you like glue, baby
Wanna spend it all on you, baby
My room is the G-spot
Call me Mr. Flintstone, I can make your bed rock


(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock, girl
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock (Ayy!)


She like tanning, I like staying in
She like romance and I like rolling with friends
She said I'm caged in, I think her conscience is
She's watching that Oxygen, I'm watching ESPN
But when that show ends, she all over my skin, lotion
Slow-mo motions, rollercoastin'
Like back, forth, hold it
She poses like it's for posters and I poke like I'm suppose to
Take this photo if you for me, she said: ""Don't you ever show this!""
I'm too loyal and too focused
To be losing and be hopeless
When I spoke this, she rejoiced it, said ""Your words get me open""
So I closed it, where your clothes is?
I'm only loving for the moment

She ain't got a man, but she's not alone
Miss Independent, yeah, she got her own
Hey gorgeous, um, I mean flawless, well
That's what you are, how I see it is how I call it, yeah
Look-look at how she walk, m-hmm, she know she bad
Do-do your thang baby, I ain't even mad
And I ain't leavin' fast, I'ma stay awhile
Hold your head, Chris, I-I'ma take it down!


Ooh baby, I be stuck to you like glue, baby
Wanna spend it all on you, baby
My room is the G-spot
Call me Mr. Flintstone, I can make your bed rock (Young Money, Yea , Yea)


(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock, girl
(Gudda Gudda, T-Streets, Mack Maine, J Millz)
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock (Ayy!)
(Tyga Tyga)


Ooh baby, I be stuck to you like glue, baby
(Drizzy Drake, Nicki Minaj)
Wanna spend it all on you, baby
(Hey Chanel, Lil Twist, Lil Chuckie, and Young Lloyd, AYEE!)
My room is the G-spot
Call me Mr. Flintstone, I can make your bed rock


(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(We Young Money)
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock, girl
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock
(Ooh) I-I-I-I can make your bed rock (Ayy!)",261
246,296,Marshall Mathers,rap,Eminem,2000,1064086,{},"
You know, I just don't get it
Last year I was nobody, this year I'm selling records
Now everybody wants to come around
Like I owe 'em somethin'
The fuck you want from me, ten-million dollars?
Get the fuck outta here


You see, I'm just Marshall Mathers (Marshall Mathers)
I'm just a regular guy
I don't know why all the fuss about me (Fuss about me)
Nobody ever gave a fuck before
All they did was doubt me (Did was doubt me)
Now everybody wanna run their mouth
And try to take shots at me (Take shots at me)


Yo, you might see me joggin', you might see me walkin'
You might see me walkin' a dead Rottweiler dog
With its head chopped off in the park with a spiked collar
Hollerin' at him 'cause the son of a bitch won't quit barkin'
Or leanin' out a window with a cocked shotgun
Drivin' up the block in the car that they shot Pac in
Looking for Big's killers, dressin' ridiculous
Blue and red, like I don't see what the big deal is
Double barrel 12-gauge bigger than Chris Wallace
Pissed off 'cause Biggie and Pac just missed all this
Watchin' all these cheap imitations get rich off 'em
And get dollars that shoulda been theirs like they switched wallets
And amidst all this Crist' poppin' and wristwatches
I just sit back and just watch and just get nauseous
And walk around with an empty bottle of Remy Martin
Startin' shit like some twenty-six-year-old skinny Cartman (Goddamn it!)
An anti-Backstreet and Ricky Martin
Whose instinct's to kill *NSYNC, don't get me started
These fuckin' brats can't sing and Britney's garbage
What's this bitch, retarded? Give me back my sixteen dollars!
All I see is sissies in magazines smilin'
Whatever happened to wilin' out and being violent?
Whatever happened to catchin' a good old-fashioned passionate ass-whoopin'
And gettin' your shoes, coat and your hat tooken?

New Kids on the Block suck a lot of dick
Boy, girl groups make me sick
And I can't wait 'til I catch all you faggots in public
I'ma love it (Hahaha)


Vanilla Ice don't like me (Uh-uh), he said some shit in Vibe to spite me (Yo)
Then went and dyed his hair just like me (Haha)
A bunch of little kids wanna swear just like me
And run around screamin' ""I don't care, just bite me!"" (Na-na)
I think I was put here to annoy the world
And destroy your little four-year-old boy or girl
Plus I was put here to put fear in faggots who spray Faygo Root Beer (Hehe)
And call themselves clowns 'cause they look queer
Faggy 2 Dope and Silent Gay
Claimin' Detroit, when y'all live twenty miles away (Fuckin' punks)
And I don't wrestle, I'll knock you fuckin' faggots the fuck out
Ask 'em about the club they was at when they snuck out
After they ducked out the back when they saw us and bugged out (ahh)
Ducked down and got paintballs shot at they truck - blaow!
Look at y'all runnin' your mouth again
When you ain't seen a fuckin' mile road south of 10
And I don't need help from D12 to beat up two females
In make-up who may try to scratch me with Lee Nails
""Slim Anus""? You damn right, slim anus
I don't get fucked in mine like you two little flamin' faggots

'Cause I'm just Marshall Mathers (Marshall Mathers)
I'm not a wrestler guy
I'll knock you out if you talk about me (You talk about me)
Come and see me on the streets alone
If you assholes doubt me (Assholes doubt me)
And if you wanna run your mouth
Then come take your best shot at me (Best shot at me)


Is it because you love me that y'all expect so much of me?
You little groupie bitch, get off me, go fuck Puffy
Now because of this blonde mop that's on top
Of this fucked up head that I've got, I've gone pop?
The underground just spunned around and did a 360
Now these kids diss me and act like some big sissies
""Oh, he just did some shit with Missy
So now he thinks he's too big to do some shit with MC Get-Bizzy""
My fuckin' bitch mom's suin' for ten-million
She must want a dollar for every pill I've been stealin'
Shit, where the fuck you think I picked up the habit?
All I had to do was go in her room and lift up her mattress
Which is it, bitch: Mrs. Briggs or Ms. Mathers?
It doesn't matter,  faggot
Talkin' about I fabricated my past
He's just aggravated I won't ejaculate in his ass (Ugh!)
So tell me, what the hell is a fella to do?
For every million I make, another relative sues
Family fightin' and fussin' over who wants to invite me to supper
All of a sudden I got ninety-some cousins (Hey it's me!)
A half-brother and sister who never seen me
Or even bothered to call me until they saw me on TV
Now everybody's so happy and proud
I'm finally allowed to step foot in my girlfriend's house (Hey!)
And then to top it off I walked to the newsstand
To buy this cheap-ass little magazine with a food stamp
Skipped to the last page, flipped right fast
And what do I see? A picture of my big white ass
Okay, let me give you motherfuckers some help
Uh, here, ""XXL! XXL!""
Now your magazine shouldn't have so much trouble to sell
Aw, fuck it, I'll even buy a couple myself

'Cause I'm just Marshall Mathers (Marshall Mathers)
I'm just a regular guy
I don't know why all the fuss about me (Fuss about me)
Nobody ever gave a fuck before
All they did was doubt me (Did was doubt me)
Now everybody wanna run their mouth
And try to take shots at me (Take shots at me)
Because I'm just Marshall Mathers (Marshall Mathers)
I'm just a regular guy
I don't know why all the fuss about me (Fuss about me)
Nobody ever gave a fuck before
All they did was doubt me (Did was doubt me)
Now everybody wanna run their mouth
And try to take shots at me (Take shots at me)",282
279,332,Hit Em Up,rap,2Pac,1996,3604497,{Outlawz},"
Sucka-ass
I ain't got no motherfuckin' friends
That's why I fucked yo' bitch, you fat motherfucka!
(Take money) West Side, Bad Boy killas
(Take money) (You know) You know who the realest is
(Take money) niggas, we bring it too
That's a'ight, ha ha
(Take money)


First off, fuck your bitch and the clique you claim
Westside when we ride, come equipped with game
You claim to be a player, but I fucked your wife
We bust on Bad Boys, niggas fucked for life
Plus, Puffy tryna see me, weak hearts I rip
Biggie Smalls and Junior M.A.F.I.A. is some mark-ass bitches
We keep on comin' while we runnin' for your jewels
Steady gunnin', keep on bustin' at them fools, you know the rules
Lil' Caesar, go ask your homie how I'll leave ya
Cut your young-ass up, leave you in pieces, now be deceased
Lil' Kim, don't fuck around with real Gs
Quick to snatch yo' ugly ass off the streets, so fuck peace!
I'll let them niggas know it's on for life
Don't let the Westside ride tonight (Ha ha)
Bad Boy murdered on wax and killed
Fuck with me and get yo' caps peeled, you know

See, grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac, uh
Who shot me? But you punks didn't finish
Now you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Nigga, I hit 'em up! (Yeah)


Check this out, you motherfuckers know what time it is
I don't even know why I'm on this track
Y'all niggas ain't even on my level
I'ma let my lil' homies ride
On you bitch-made ass Bad Boy bitches, feel it!


Get out the way yo, get out the way yo
Biggie Smalls just got dropped
Little Mu', pass the MAC and let me hit him in his back
Frank White needs to get spanked right for settin' traps
Little accident murderer, and I ain't never heard of ya
Poisonous gats attack when I'm servin' ya
Spank ya, shank ya whole style when I gank
Guard your rank 'cause I'ma slam your ass in the paint
Puffy weaker than the fuckin' block I'm runnin' through, nigga
And I'm smokin' Junior M.A.F.I.A. in front of you, nigga
With the ready power tucked in my Guess under my Eddie Bauer
Your clout petty/sour, I push packages every hour; I hit 'em up!

Grab your Glocks when you see 2Pac
Call the cops when you see 2Pac, uh
Who shot me? But you punks didn't finish
Now you 'bout to feel the wrath of a menace
Nigga, we hit 'em up!


Peep how we do it, keep it real as penitentiary steel
This ain't no freestyle battle
All you niggas gettin' killed with your mouths open
Tryna come up off of me, you in the clouds hopin'
Smokin' dope, it's like a sherm high
Niggas think they learned to fly
But they burn, motherfucker, you deserve to die
Talkin' about you gettin' money, but it's funny to me
All you niggas livin' bummy while you fuckin' with me
I'm a self-made millionaire
Thug livin', out of prison, pistols in the air (ha ha)
Biggie, remember when I used to let you sleep on the couch
And beg a bitch to let you sleep in the house?
Now it's all about Versace, you copied my style
Five shots couldn't drop me, I took it and smiled
Now I'm back to set the record straight
With my AK, I'm still the thug that you love to hate
Motherfucker, I hit 'em up!

I'm from N-E-W Jers' where plenty of murders occurs
No points or commas, we bring the drama to all you herbs
Now go check the scenario: Lil' Cease
I'll bring you fake G's to your knees, coppin' pleas in de Janeiro
Little Kim, is you coked up or doped up?
Get your little Junior Whopper click smoked up
What the fuck, is you stupid?
I take money, crash and mash through Brooklyn
With my click lootin', shootin' and pollutin' your block
With a 15-shot cocked Glock to your knot
Outlaw MAFIA clique movin' up another notch
And your pop stars popped and get mopped and dropped
All your fake-ass East Coast props brainstormed and locked


You's a beat biter, a Pac style taker
I'll tell you to your face, you ain't shit but a faker
Softer than Alizé with a chaser
About to get murdered for the paper
E.D.I. Mean approach the scene of the caper
Like a loc, with Little Ceas' in a choke
Gun totin' smoke, we ain't no motherfuckin' joke
Thug Life, niggas better be knowin'
We approachin' in the wide open, gun smokin'
No need for hopin', it's a battle lost
I got 'em crossed as soon as the funk is boppin' off
Nigga, I hit 'em up!


Now you tell me who won
I see them, they run, hahahaha
They don't wanna see us
Whole Junior M.A.F.I.A. clique dressin' up tryna be us
How the fuck they gonna be the mob
When we always on our job?
We millionaires
Killin' ain't fair, but somebody gotta do it
Oh yeah, Mobb Deep, you wanna fuck with us?
You little young-ass motherfuckers
Don't one of you niggas got sickle-cell or somethin'?
You're fuckin' with me, nigga
You fuck around and have a seizure or a heart attack
You better back the fuck up
Before you get smacked the fuck up
This is how we do it on our side
Any of you niggas from New York that wanna bring it, bring it!
But we ain't singin', we bringin' drama
Fuck you and yo' motherfuckin' mama!
We gon' kill all you motherfuckers!
Now when I came out I told you it was just about Biggie
Then everybody had to open their mouth
With a motherfuckin' opinion
Well, this is how we gonna do this: fuck Mobb Deep! Fuck Biggie!
Fuck Bad Boy as a staff, record label, and as a motherfuckin' crew!
And if you wanna be down with Bad Boy, then fuck you too!
Chino XL, fuck you too!
All you motherfuckers, fuck you too!
(Take money, take money)
All of y'all motherfuckers, fuck you, die slow!
Motherfucker, my .44 make sho' all y'all kids don't grow!
You motherfuckers can't be us or see us
We motherfuckin' Thug Life ridas
Westside 'til we die!
Out here in California, nigga, we warned ya
We'll bomb on you motherfuckers! We do our job!
You think you mob? Nigga, we the motherfuckin' mob!
Ain't nothin' but killas
And the real niggas, all you motherfuckers feel us
Our shit goes triple and 4-quadruple
You niggas laugh 'cause our staff got guns under they motherfuckas belts
You know how it is: when we drop records, they felt
You niggas can't feel it, we the realest
Fuck 'em, we Bad Boy killas!",320
338,409,Pursuit of Happiness Nightmare,rap,Kid Cudi,2009,1170471,"{MGMT,Ratatat}","
Mmmm, ay-oh
Hey...
Ratatat, yeah!
Na-na-na-nah
Na-na-na-nah


Crush a bit, little bit, roll it up, take a hit
Feelin' lit, feelin' right, 2 AM, summer night
I don't care, hand on the wheel
Driving drunk, I'm doing my thing
Rolling the Midwest side and out
Living my life, getting out dreams
People told me slow my roll, I'm screaming out ""Fuck that""
I'ma do just what I want, looking ahead, no turning back
If I fall, if I die, know I lived it to the fullest
If I fall, if I die, know I lived and missed some bullets


I'm on the pursuit of happiness, and I know
Everything that shine ain't always gonna be gold, hey
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good
I'm on the pursuit of happiness and I know
Everything that shine ain't always gonna be gold, hey
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good

Tell me what you know about dreamin', dreamin'?
You don't really know about nothin', nothin'
Tell me what you know about the night terrors every night
5 AM, cold sweats, waking up to the sky
Tell me what you know about dreams, dreams?
Tell me what you know about night terrors? Nothing
You don't really care about the trials of tomorrow
Rather lay awake in the bed full of sorrow


I'm on the pursuit of happiness, and I know
Everything that shine ain't always gonna be gold, hey
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good
I'm on the pursuit of happiness, and I know
Everything that shine ain't always gonna be gold, hey
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good


I'm on the pursuit of happiness
I know everything that shine ain't always gold
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good



I'm on the pursuit of happiness, and I know
Everything that shine ain't always gonna be gold, hey
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good
I'm on the pursuit of happiness, and I know
Everything that shine ain't always gonna be gold, hey
I'll be fine once I get it
I'll be good


Pursuit of happiness, yeah
I gon' get it, I'll be good
Oh...
Oh man, oh, ugh...
Room's spinning, room's spinning...
Pat, Zuli...
Oh fuck
Oh my God, why'd I drink so much and smoke so much? Oh
Oh, fuck",401
377,465,Till I Collapse,rap,Eminem,2002,2447887,"{""Nate Dogg""}","
'Cause sometimes you just feel tired
Yo, left, yo, left
Feel weak and when you feel weak
Yo, left, right, left
You feel like you wanna just give up
Yo, left, yo left
But you gotta search within you
Yo, left, right, left
Try to find that inner strength and just pull that shit out of you
Yo, left, yo left
And get that motivation to not give up
Yo, left, right, left
And not be a quitter, no matter how bad
Yo, left, yo left
You wanna just fall flat on your face and collapse
Yo, left, right, left


'Til I collapse I'm spillin' these raps long as you feel 'em
'Til the day that I drop you'll never say that I'm not killin' 'em
'Cause when I am not, then I'ma stop pennin' 'em
And I am not hip-hop and I'm just not Eminem
Subliminal thoughts, when I'ma stop sendin' 'em?
Women are caught in webs, spin 'em and hock venom
Adrenaline shots of penicillin could not get the illin' to stop
Amoxicillin's just not real enough
The criminal, cop-killin', hip-hop villain
A minimal swap to cop millions of Pac listeners
You're comin' with me, feel it or not
You're gonna fear it like I showed ya the spirit of God lives in us
You hear it a lot, lyrics to shock
Is it a miracle or am I just product of pop fizzin' up?
Fa' shizzle, my wizzle, this is the plot, listen up
You bizzles forgot, Slizzle does not give a fuck

'Til the roof comes off, 'til the lights go out
'Til my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
'Til the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit 'til my bones collapse
'Til the roof comes off, 'til the lights go out
Until the roof, until the roof
'Til my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
The roof comes off, the roof comes off
'Til the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
Until my legs, until my legs
I'ma rip this shit 'til my bones collapse
Give out from underneath me


Music is like magic, there's a certain feelin' you get
When you real and you spit, and people are feelin' your shit
This is your moment, and every single minute you spend
Tryna hold on to it 'cause you may never get it again
So while you're in it, try to get as much shit as you can
And when your run is over, just admit when it's at its end
'Cause I'm at the end of my wits with half the shit that gets in
I got a list, here's the order of my list that it's in
It goes: Reggie, Jay-Z, 2Pac and Biggie
André from OutKast, Jada, Kurupt, Nas, and then me
But in this industry I'm the cause of a lot of envy
So when I'm not put on this list, the shit does not offend me
That's why you see me walk around like nothing's botherin' me
Even though half you people got a fuckin' problem with me
You hate it, but you know respect you got to give me
The press's wet dream, like Bobby and Whitney - Nate, hit me!

'Til the roof comes off, 'til the lights go out
'Til my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
'Til the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit 'til my bones collapse
'Til the roof comes off, 'til the lights go out
Until the roof, until the roof
'Til my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
The roof comes off, the roof comes off
'Til the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
Until my legs, until my legs
I'ma rip this shit 'til my bones collapse
Give out from underneath me


Soon as a verse starts, I eat at an MC's heart
What is he thinking? How not to go against me, smart
And it's absurd how people hang on every word
I'll prob'ly never get the props I feel I ever deserve
But I'll never be served, my spot is forever reserved
If I ever leave Earth, that would be the death of me first
'Cause in my heart of hearts I know nothin' could ever be worse
That's why I'm clever when I put together every verse
My thoughts are sporadic, I act like I'm an addict
I rap like I'm addicted to smack like I'm Kim Mathers
But I don't wanna go forth and back in constant battles
The fact is I would rather sit back and bomb some rappers
So this is like a full-blown attack I'm launchin' at 'em
The track is on some battlin' raps, who wants some static?
'Cause I don't really think that the fact that I'm Slim matters
A plaque and platinum status is wack if I'm not the baddest, so

'Til the roof comes off, 'til the lights go out
'Til my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
'Til the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
I'ma rip this shit 'til my bones collapse
'Til the roof comes off, 'til the lights go out
Until the roof, until the roof
'Til my legs give out, can't shut my mouth
The roof comes off, the roof comes off
'Til the smoke clears out, am I high? Perhaps
Until my legs, until my legs
I'ma rip this shit 'til my bones collapse
Give out from underneath me


Until the roof, until the roof
The roof comes off, the roof comes off
Until my legs, until my legs
Give out from underneath me
I, I will not fall, I will stand tall
Feels like no one could beat me",440
393,481,Ms. Jackson,rap,OutKast,2000,1400432,{},"
Yeah, this one right here goes out
To all the baby's mamas' mamas
Mamas, mamas, baby mamas' mamas
Yeah, go like this


I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times
I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times


My baby's drama mama don't like me
She be doin' things like havin' them boys
Come from her neighborhood to the studio, tryna fight me
She needs to get a piece of the American pie and take her bite out
That's my house, I'll disconnect the cable and turn the lights out
And let her know her grandchild is a baby and not a pay check
Private school, daycare, shit, medical bills-I pay that
I love your mom and everything
But see, I ain't the only one who laid down
She wanna rib you up to start a custody war
My lawyers stay down
She never got a chance to hear my side of the story
We was divided
She had fish fries, cookouts for my child's birthday, I ain't invited
Despite it I show her the utmost respect when I fall through
All you, do is defend that lady when I call you, yeah

I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times
I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times


Me and your daughter got a special thang goin' on
You say it's puppy love; we say it's full-grown (Arroof)
Hope that we feel this, feel this way forever
You can plan a pretty picnic but you can't predict the weather
Ms. Jackson


Ten times out of nine, now if I'm lyin', find
The quickest muzzle, throw it on my mouth and I'll decline
King meets queen, then the puppy love thing
Together dream 'bout that crib with the Goodyear swing
On the oak tree, I hope we feel like this forever
Forever, forever ever? Forever, ever?
Forever never seems that long until you're grown
And notice that the day-by-day ruler can't be too wrong
Ms. Jackson, my intentions were good, I wish I could
Become a magician to abracadabra all the sadder
Thoughts of me, thoughts of she, thoughts of he
Asking what happened to the feeling that her and me had
I pray so much about it, need some knee pads
It happened for a reason, one can't be mad
So know this, know that everything's cool
And yes, I will be present on the first day of school and graduation

I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times
I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times


""Look at the way he treats me""
Shit, look at the way you treat me
You see, your little nosy-ass homegirls
Done got your ass sent up the creek, G
Without a paddle, you left to straddle and ride this thing on out
Now you and your girl ain't speakin' no more
'Cause my dick all in her mouth
Know what I'm talkin' about?
Jealousy, infidelity, envy, cheating, beating
In the year 2G, they be the same thing
So who you placin' the blame on?
You keep on singin' the same song; let bygones be bygones
And you can go on and get the hell on, you and your mama


I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times
I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times
I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times
I'm sorry, Ms. Jackson, ooh, I am for real
Never meant to make your daughter cry
I apologize a trillion times",452
394,482,Rappers Delight,rap,Sugarhill Gang,1979,1236704,{},"
I said a hip-hop, the hippie, the hippie
To the hip, hip-hop and you don't stop the rockin'
To the bang-bang boogie, say up jump the boogie
To the rhythm of the boogie, the beat


Now, what you hear is not a test, I'm rapping to the beat
And me, the groove, and my friends are gonna try to move your feet
You see, I am Wonder Mike and I'd like to say hello
A to the black, to the white, the red and the brown, the purple and yellow
But first, I gotta bang-bang the boogie to the boogie
Say up jump the boogie to the bang-bang boogie
Let's rock, you don't stop
Rock the rhythm that'll make your body rock
Well so far you've heard my voice, a but I brought two friends along
And next on the mic is my man Hank, come on, Hank, sing that song


Check it out, I'm the C-A-S-AN, the O-V-A and the rest is F-L-Y
You see, I go by the code of the doctor of the mix and these reasons I'll tell you why
You see I'm six foot one and I'm tons of fun and I dress to a tee
You see, I got more clothes than Muhammad Ali and I dress so viciously
I got bodyguards, I got two big cars, that definitely ain't the wack
I got a Lincoln continental and a sunroof Cadillac
So after school, I take a dip in the pool, which is really on the wall
I got a color TV so I can see the Knicks play basketball
Hear me talking 'bout checkbooks, credit cards, more money a than a sucker could ever spend
But I wouldn't give a sucker or a bum from the Rucker, not a dime 'til I made it again

Everybody go, ""Hotel, motel, whatcha gonna do today?"" (Say what?)
'Cause I'ma get a fly girl, gonna get some spank and drive off in a def OJ
Everybody go, ""Hotel, motel, Holiday Inn""
You see, if your girl starts acting up, then you take her friend


A Master Gee, a my mellow?
It's on you so what you gonna do?


Well it's on and on and on, on and on
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn
I said a M-A-S, a T-E-R, a G with a double E
I said I go by the unforgettable name of the man they call the Master Gee
Well, my name is known all over the world
By all the foxy ladies and the pretty girls
I'm going down in history
As the baddest rapper there ever could be
Now I'm feeling the highs and you're feeling the lows
The beat starts getting into your toes
You start popping your fingers and stomping your feet
And moving your body while you're sitting in your seat
And then damn, you start doing the freak
I said damn, a right outta your seat
Then you throw your hands high in the air
You're rocking to the rhythm, shake your derriere
You're rocking to the beat without a care
With the sure-shot MCs for the affair
Now, I'm not as tall as the rest of the gang
But I rap to the beat just the same
I got a little face and a pair of brown eyes
All I'm here to do ladies is hypnotize
Singing on and on and on, on and on
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn
A singing on and on and on, on and on
Like a hot ready to pop the pop the pop dibbie dibbie
Pop the pop, pop, you don't dare stop
A come alive, y'all gimme what you got
I guess by now you can take a hunch
And find that I am the baby of the bunch
But that's okay, I still keep in stride
'Cause all I'm here to do is just a wiggle your behind
Singing on and on and on, on and on
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn
A singing on and on and on, on and on
Rock-rock, y'all, a get on the floor

I'm gonna freak ya here, I'm gonna freak you there
I'm gonna move you outta this atmosphere


'Cause I'm one of a kind and I'll shock your mind
I'll put the t-t-tickets in your behind
I said a 1-2-3-4, come on, girls, a get on the floor
A come alive, y'all, a gimme what ya got
'Cause I'm guaranteed to make you rock
I said 1-2-3-4, tell me Wonder Mike what are you waiting for?


Said a hip-hop, the hippie to the hippie
The hip, hip-a-hop and you don't stop rockin'
To the bang-bang, the boogie, say up jump the boogie
To the rhythm of the boogie, the beat


A-skiddlee bebop, we rock a scooby doo
And guess what, America, we love you
A 'cause ya rock and a roll with a so much soul
You could rock 'til you're hundred and one years old
I don't mean to brag, I don't mean to boast
But we're like hot butter on a breakfast toast
We rock it up, a baby bubba
Baby bubba to the boogie, the bang-bang, the boogie
To the beat, beat, it's so unique
Come on, everybody, and dance to the beat



A hip-hop, the hippie, the hippie
To the hip, hip-hop and you don't stop
A rock it out, baby bubba, to the boogie, the bang-bang
The boogie to the boogie, the beat


I say I can't wait 'til the end of the week
When I'm rapping to the rhythm of a groovy beat
An attempt to raise your body heat
A just blow your mind so a that you can't speak
A do a thing, but a rock and shuffle your feet
And let it change up to a dance called the freak
And when ya finally do come into your rhythmic beat
Rest a little while so ya don't get weak
I know a man named Hank
He has more rhymes than a serious bank
So come on, Hank, a sing that song
A to the rhythm of the boogie, the bang-bang, the bong


Well, I'm Imp the Dimp, the ladies pimp
The women fight for my delight
But I'm the grandmaster with the three MCs
That shock the house for the young ladies
And when you come inside, into the front
You do the freak, spank, and do the bump
And when the sucker MCs try to prove a point
We're treacherous trio, a with a serious joint
A from sun to sun and from day to day
I sit down and write a brand new rhyme
Because they say that miracles never cease
I've created a devastating masterpiece
I'm gonna rock the mic 'til you can't resist
Everybody, I say it goes like this
Well, I was coming home late one dark afternoon
Reporter stopped me for a interview
She said she's heard stories and she's heard fables
That I'm vicious on the mic and the turntables
This young reporter, I did adore
So I rocked a vicious rhyme like I never did before
She said, ""Damn, fly guy, I'm in love with you
The Casanova legend must have been true""
I said, ""By the way, baby, what's your name?""
Said ""I go by the name Lois Lane""
And you could be my boyfriend, you surely can
Just let me quit my boyfriend called Superman
I said, ""He's a fairy, I do suppose
Flying through the air in pantyhose
He may be very sexy or even cute
But he looks like a sucker in a blue and red suit""
I said, ""You need a man who's got finesse
And his whole name across his chest
He may be able to fly all through the night
But can he rock a party 'til the early light?
He can't satisfy you with his little worm
But I can bust you out with my super sperm""
I go do it, I go do it, I go do it, do it, do it
An' I'm here and I'm there, I'm Big Bank Hank, I'm everywhere
A just throw your hands up in the air
And party hardy like you just don't care
Let's do it, a don't stop, y'all, a tick a tock, y'all, you don't stop


It go, ""Hotel, motel, a what you gonna do today?"" (Say what?)
'Cause I'm gon' get a fly girl, gonna get some spank and drive off in a def OJ
Everybody go, ""Hotel, motel, Holiday Inn""
You see, if your girl starts acting up, then you take her friend


I say skip, dive, what can I say?
I can't fit 'em all inside my OJ
So I just take half and bust them out
I give the rest to Master Gee so he could shock the house


It was twelve o'clock a one Friday night
I was rocking to the beat and feeling alright
Everybody was dancing on the floor
Doing all the things they never did before
And then this fly, fly girl with a sexy lean
She came into the bar, she came into the scene
As she traveled deeper inside the room
All the fellas checked out her white Sassons
She came up to the table, looked into my eyes
Then she turned around and shook her behind
So I said to myself, its time for me to release
My vicious rhyme I call my masterpiece
And now people in the house, this is just for you
A little rap to make you boogaloo
Now, the group ya hear is called Phase 2
And let me tell ya something we're a hell of a crew
Once a week we're on the street
Just a cutting the jams and making it freak
For you to party, got to have the moves
So we'll get right down and give you a groove
For you to dance you got to be hype
So we'll get right down and make ya rock
Now the system's on and the girls are there
You definitely have a rocking affair
But let me tell ya something, there's still one fact
That to have a party, got to have a rap
So when the party's over you're making it home
And trying to sleep before the break of dawn
And while ya sleeping, you start to dream
And thinking how ya danced on the disco scene
A name appears in your mind
Yeah, a name you know that was right on time
It was Phase 2 a just a doing the do
Rocking ya down 'cause ya know we could
To the rhythm of the beat that makes ya freak
A come alive, girls, a get on your feet
To the rhythm of the beat, to the beat, the beat
To the double beat-beat that it makes ya freak
To the rhythm of the beat that says you go on
On and on until the break of dawn
Now I got a man coming on right now
He's guaranteed to throw down
He goes by the name of Wonder Mike
A come on, Wonder Mike, do what ya like


I say, a can of beer that's sweeter than honey
Like a millionaire that has no money
Like a rainy day that is not wet
Like a gambling fiend that does not bet
Like Dracula without his fangs
Like the boogie to the boogie without the boogie-bang
Like collard greens that don't taste good
Like a tree that's not made out of wood
Like going up and not coming down
Is just like the beat without the sound, no sound
To the beat, beat, ya do the freak
Everybody just rock and dance to the beat
Have you ever went over a friend's house to eat
And the food just ain't no good?
I mean the macaroni's soggy, the peas are mushed
And the chicken tastes like wood
A so you try to play it off like you think you can
By saying that you're full
And then your friend says, ""Mama, he's just being polite
He ain't finished, uh-uh, that's bull""
A so your heart starts pumping and you think of a lie
And you say that you already ate
And your friend says, ""Man, there's plenty of food""
So you pile some more on your plate
But while the stinky food's steaming, your mind starts to dreaming
Of the moment that it's time to leave
And then you look at your plate and your chicken's slowly rotting
Into something that looks like cheese
Oh, so you say that's it, I got to leave this place
I don't care what these people think
I'm just sitting here making myself nauseous
With this ugly food that stinks
Oh, so you bust out the door while it's still closed
Still sick from the food you ate
And then you run to the store for quick relief
From a bottle of Kaopectate
And then you call your friend a two weeks later
To see how he has been
And he says ""I understand about the food
Baby bubba, but we're still friends""


A with a hip-hop, the hippie to the hippie
The hip, hip-hop and you don't stop the rockin'
To the bang-bang boogie, say up jump the boogie
To the rhythm of the boogie, the beat


I said, ""A Hank, a can ya rock?
Can ya rock to the rhythm that just don't stop?
A can ya hip me to the shoobie doo?""
I said, ""A come on, make, m-make the people move""


I go toot the horns and then ring the bell
Because I am the man with the clientele
And if ya ask me why I rock so well
I'm Big Bank, I got clientele
And from the time I was only six years old
I never forgot what I was told
It was the best advice that I ever had
It came from my wise dear old dad
He said, ""Sit down, punk, I wanna talk to you
And don't say a word until I'm through
Now there's a time to laugh, a time to cry
A time to live and a time to die
A time to break and a time to chill
To act civilized or act real ill
But whatever ya do in your lifetime
Ya never let a MC steal your rhyme""
So from '66 to this very day
I'll always remember what he had to say
So when the sucker MCs try to chump my style
I let them know that I'm versatile
I got style, finesse and a little black book
That's filled with rhymes and I know you wanna look
But the thing that separates you from me
And that is called originality
Because my rhymes are on from what you've heard
I didn't even bite, not a god**** word
And I say a little more later on tonight
So the sucker MCs can bite all night
A tick a tock, y'all, a beat-beat y'all
A lets rock, y'all, ya don't stop


It go, ""Hotel, motel, a whatcha gonna do today?"" (Say what?)
'Cause I'ma get a fly girl, gonna get some spank, and drive off in a def OJ
Everybody go, ""Hotel, motel, Holiday Inn""
You see, if your girl starts acting up, then you take her friends


A like that, y'all, a to the beat, y'all
A beat-beat, y'all, ya don't stop
A Master Gee, am I mellow?
It's on you, so whatcha gonna do?


Well, like Johnny Carson on the late show
A like Frankie Crocker in stereo
A like the Bar-Kays singing ""Holy Ghost""
The sounds I throw down, a they're played the most
Just a like my man, a Captain Sky
Whose name he earned with his super sperm
We rock and we don't stop
A get off, y'all, I'm here to give you whatcha got
A to the beat that it makes you freak
And come alive girl, a get on your feet
A like a Perry Mason without a case
Like Farrah Fawcett without her face
Like the Bar-Kays on the mic
Like getting right down for you tonight
Like moving your body so ya don't know how
Right to the rhythm and throw down
Like coming alive to the Master Gee
The brother who rocks so viciously
I said the age of one, my life begun
At the age of two, I was doing the do
At the age of three, it was you and me
Rocking to the sounds of the Master Gee
At the age of four, I was on the floor
Giving all the freaks what they bargained for
At the age of five, I didn't take no jive
'Cause with the Master Gee, it's all the way live
At the age of six, I was a picking up sticks
Rapping to the beat, my stick was fixed
At the age of seven, I was rocking in heaven
Don't ya know I went off?
I gotta run on down to the beat, you see
Getting right on down, making all the girls
Just take of their clothes to the beat, the beat
To the double beat-beat that makes you freak
At the age of eight I was a really great
'Cause every night, you see, I had a date
At the age of nine I was a right on time
'Cause every night I had a party rhyme
We're going on and on, and on, on and on
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn
A saying on and on, and on, on and on
Like a hot buttered the pop the pop the popcorn
A going on and on, and don't ya dare stop
A rock-rock, y'all, a gimme what ya got
'Cause I'm a hell of a man when I'm on the mic
I am the definite freak's delight
I'm a hell of a man when I'm on the mic
I am the definite freak's delight
They call me the Master Gee, you see
The brother who rocks so viciously


I'm gonna move ya here, I'm gonna move ya there
I'm gonna move you outta this atmosphere
'Cause I'm one of a kind and I'll shocks your mind
I'll put the t-t-tickets in your behind
Said, just rock it to the east and move it to the west
Move it toward the lady you love-love the best
Master Gee, get it on
Taggin' all the girls, goin' down
(Gimme time, I'ma shock your mind)
(A come and jig-jig-jigglin' your behind)",453
398,488,Stronger,rap,Kanye West,2007,1438598,{},"


Work it, make it, do it, makes us
Harder, better, faster, stronger


N-Now th-that that don't kill me
Can only make me stronger
I need you to hurry up now
'Cause I can't wait much longer
I know I got to be right now
'Cause I can't get much wronger
Man, I've been waiting all night now
That's how long I been on ya
(Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger)
(I need you right now!)
(More than ever, hour after hour
Work-)
(I need you right now!)

Let's get lost tonight
You could be my black Kate Moss tonight
Play secretary, I'm the boss tonight
And you don't give a fuck what they all say, right?
Awesome, the Christian in Christian Dior
Damn, they don't make 'em like this anymore
I ask, 'cause I'm not sure
Do anybody make real shit anymore?
Bow in the presence of greatness
'Cause right now, thou hast forsaken us
You should be honored by my lateness
That I would even show up to this fake shit
So go ahead, go nuts, go apeshit!
'Specially in my Pastellé, on my Bape shit
Act like you can't tell who made this
New Gospel, homie, take six
And take this, haters!


N-Now th-that that don't kill me
Can only make me stronger
I need you to hurry up now
'Cause I can't wait much longer
I know I got to be right now
'Cause I can't get much wronger
Man, I've been waiting all night now
That's how long I been on ya
(Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger)
(I need you right now!)
(More than ever, hour after hour
Work-)
(I need you right now!) Me likey!

I don't know if you got a man or not
If you made plans or not
If God put me in your plans or not
I'm trippin', this drink got me saying a lot
But I know that God put you in front of me
So how the hell could you front on me?
There's a thousand you's, there's only one of me
I'm trippin', I'm caught up in the moment, right?
'Cause it's Louis Vuitton Don night
So we gon' do everything that Kan like
Heard they'd do anything for a Klondike
Well, I'd do anything for a blonde dyke
And she'll do anything for the limelight
And we'll do anything when the time's right
Uh, baby, you're makin' it-
(Harder, better, faster, stronger)


N-Now th-that that don't kill me (Oh)
Can only make me stronger (Oh)
I need you to hurry up now (Oh)
'Cause I can't wait much longer (Oh)
I know I got to be right now (Oh)
'Cause I can't get much wronger (Oh)
Man, I've been waiting all night now
That's how long I been on ya
(Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger)
(I need you right now!)
(I need you right now!)

You know how long I've been on ya
Since Prince was on Apollonia
Since O.J. had Isotoners
Don't act like I never told ya
Don't act like I never told ya
Don't act like I never told ya
Don't act like I never told ya
Don't act like I never told ya
Baby, you're makin' it
(Harder, better, faster, stronger)


N-Now th-that that don't kill me
Can only make me stronger
I need you to hurry up now
'Cause I can't wait much longer
I know I got to be right now
'Cause I can't get much wronger
Man, I've been waiting all night now
That's how long I been on ya
(Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger)
(I need you right now!)
(I need you right now!)
Right now!
Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger
(I need you right now!)
(I need you right now!)


You know how long I've been on ya
Since Prince was on Apollonia
Since O.J. had Isotoners
Don't act like I never told ya
You know how long I've been on ya
Since Prince was on Apollonia
Since O.J. had Isotoners
Don't act like I never told ya


Told ya, told ya
Never told ya...told ya, told ya, told ya
Never told ya...told ya, told ya, told ya
Never told ya...told ya, told ya, told ya
Never told ya...told ya, told ya, told ya
Never over...Never over... Never over... Never over...
Never over...Never over... Never over... Never over...
(Harder, better, faster, stronger)
Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger
More than ever, hour after hour
Work is never over
Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger
More than ever, hour after hour
Work is never over
Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger
More than ever, hour after hour
Work is never over
Work it harder, make it better
Do it faster, makes us stronger
More than ever, hour after hour
Work is never over",525
402,493,Not Afraid,rap,Eminem,2010,1750861,{},"
I'm not afraid (I'm not afraid)
Yeah
To take a stand (To take a stand)
It's been a ride
Everybody (Everybody)
I guess I had to
Come take my hand (Come take my hand)
Go to that place to get to this one
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Now some of you
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Might still be in that place
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
If you're tryna get out
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road
Just follow me, I'll get you there


You can try and read my lyrics off of this paper before I lay 'em
But you won't take the sting out these words before I say 'em
'Cause ain't no way I'ma let you stop me from causin' mayhem
When I say I'ma do somethin', I do it, I don't give a damn what you think
I'm doin' this for me, so fuck the world
Feed it beans, it's gassed up if it thinks it's stoppin' me
I'ma be what I set out to be, without a doubt, undoubtably
And all those who look down on me, I'm tearin' down your balcony
No ifs, ands or buts, don't try to ask him why or how can he
From Infinite down to the last Relapse album he's
Still shittin' whether he's on salary, paid hourly
Until he bows out or he shits his bowels out of him
Whichever comes first, for better or worse
He's married to the game
Like a ""fuck you"" for Christmas, his gift is a curse
Forget the Earth, he's got the urge to pull his dick from the dirt
And fuck the whole universe

I'm not afraid (I'm not afraid)
To take a stand (To take a stand)
Everybody (Everybody)
Come take my hand (Come take my hand)
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road


Okay, quit playin' with the scissors and shit, and cut the crap
I shouldn't have to rhyme these words in a rhythm for you to know it's a wrap
You said you was king, you lied through your teeth
For that, fuck your feelings
Instead of gettin' crowned, you're gettin' capped
And to the fans, I'll never let you down again, I'm back
I promise to never go back on that promise
In fact, let's be honest, that last Relapse CD was ""ehh""
Perhaps I ran them accents into the ground
Relax, I ain't goin' back to that now
All I'm tryna say is get back, click-clack-blaow!
'Cause I ain't playin' around
There's a game called circle and I don't know how
I'm way too up to back down
But I think I'm still tryna figure this crap out
Thought I had it mapped out
But I guess I didn't, this fuckin' black cloud still follows me around
But it's time to exorcise these demons
These ma'fuckers are doin' jumpin' jacks now

I'm not afraid (I'm not afraid)
To take a stand (To take a stand)
Everybody (Everybody)
Come take my hand (Come take my hand)
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road


And I just can't keep livin' this way
So startin' today
I'm breakin' out of this cage
I'm standin' up, I'ma face my demons
I'm mannin' up, I'ma hold my ground
I've had enough, now I'm so fed up
Time to put my life back together right now


It was my decision to get clean, I did it for me
Admittedly I probably did it subliminally for you
So I could come back a brand-new me
You helped see me through
And don't even realize what you did, 'cause believe me you
I've been through the wringer
But they can do little to the middle finger
I think I got a tear in my eye, I feel like the king of
My world, haters can make like bees with no stingers
And drop dead: no more beef lingers
No more drama from now on, I promise
To focus solely on handlin' my responsibilities as a father
So I solemnly swear to always treat this roof like my daughters and raise it
You couldn't lift a single shingle on it
'Cause the way I feel, I'm strong enough to go to the club
Or the corner pub and lift the whole liquor counter up
'Cause I'm raisin' the bar
I'd shoot for the moon, but I'm too busy gazin' at stars
I feel amazin', and I'm-

I'm not afraid (I'm not afraid)
To take a stand (To take a stand)
Everybody (Everybody)
Come take my hand (Come take my hand)
We'll walk this road together, through the storm
Whatever weather, cold or warm
Just lettin' you know that you're not alone
Holla if you feel like you've been down the same road",463
415,506,Straight Outta Compton,rap,N.W.A,1988,1625352,{},"
You are now about to witness the strength of street knowledge


Straight outta Compton!
Crazy motherfucker named Ice Cube
From the gang called Niggas Wit Attitudes
When I'm called off, I got a sawed-off
Squeeze the trigger, and bodies are hauled off
You too, boy, if you fuck with me
The police are gonna have to come and get me
Off your ass, that's how I'm going out
For the punk motherfuckers that's showing out
Niggas start to mumble, they wanna rumble
Mix 'em and cook 'em in a pot, like gumbo
Going off on the motherfucker like that
With a gat that's pointed at your ass
So give it up smooth
Ain't no telling when I'm down for a jack move
Here's a murder rap to keep y'all dancin'
With a crime record like Charles Manson
AK-47 is the tool
Don't make me act a motherfucking fool
Me you can go toe to toe, no maybe
I'm knocking niggas out the box, daily
Yo, weekly, monthly and yearly
Until them dumb motherfuckers see clearly
That I'm down with the capital C-P-T
Boy, you can't fuck with me
So when I'm in your neighborhood, you better duck
'Cause Ice Cube is crazy as fuck
As I leave, believe I'm stompin'
But when I come back boy, I'm coming straight outta Compton
(Compton Compton Compton)
(City of Compton, City of Compton)

Yo, Ren! (What's up?)
Tell 'em where you from!


Straight outta Compton, another crazy-ass nigga
More punks I smoke, yo, my rep gets bigger
I'm a bad motherfucker, and you know this
But the pussy-ass niggas won't show this
But I don't give a fuck, I'ma make my snaps
If not from the records, from jacking or craps
Just like burglary, the definition is jacking
And when I'm legally armed it's called packing
Shoot a motherfucker in a minute
I find a good piece of pussy and go up in it
So if you're at a show in the front row
I'ma call you a bitch or dirty-ass ho
You'll probably get mad like a bitch is supposed to
But that shows me, slut, you're not opposed to
A crazy motherfucker from the street
Attitude legit, 'cause I'm tearing up shit
MC Ren controls the automatic
For any dumb motherfucker that starts static
Not the right hand, 'cause I'm the hand itself
Every time I pull an AK off the shelf
The security is maximum and that's a law
R-E-N spells Ren, but I'm raw
See, 'cause I'm the motherfucking villain
The definition is clear, you're the witness of a killin'
That's taking place without a clue
And once you're on the scope, your ass is through
Look, you might take it as a trip
But a nigga like Ren is on a gangsta tip
Straight outta Compton
(Compton Compton Compton)
(City of Compton, City of Compton)

Eazy is his name, and the boy is coming


Straight outta Compton
Is a brother that'll smother your mother
And make your sister think I love her
Dangerous motherfucker raising hell
And if I ever get caught, I make bail
See, I don't give a fuck, that's the problem
I see a motherfucking cop, I don't dodge him
But I'm smart, lay low, creep a while
And when I see a punk pass, I smile
To me it's kinda funny, the attitude showing a nigga driving
But don't know where the fuck he's going, just rolling
Looking for the one they call Eazy
But here's a flash, they'll never seize me
Ruthless, never seen, like a shadow in the dark
Except when I unload
You see a spark and jump over hesitation
And hear the scream of the one who got the last penetration
Feel a little gust of wind and I'm jetting
But leave a memory no one'll be forgetting
So what about the bitch who got shot? Fuck her!
You think I give a damn about a bitch? I ain't a sucker
This is an autobiography of the E
And if you ever fuck with me
You'll get taken by a stupid dope brother who will smother
Word to the motherfucker, straight outta Compton
(Compton Compton Compton)
(City of Compton, City of Compton)

Damn, that shit was dope!",483
424,516,Heartless,pop,Kanye West,2008,1175109,{},"
In the night, I hear 'em talk
The coldest story ever told
Somewhere far along this road
He lost his soul to a woman so heartless
How could you be so heartless?
Oh, how could you be so heartless?


How could you be so
Cold as the winter wind when it breeze, yo?
Just remember that you talkin' to me though
You need to watch the way you talkin' to me, yo
I mean, after all the things that we been through
I mean, after all the things we got into
Ayo, I know of some things that you ain't told me
Ayo, I did some things but that's the old me
And now you wanna get me back and you gon' show me
So you walk around like you don't know me
You got a new friend, well, I got homies
But in the end, it's still so lonely

In the night, I hear 'em talk
The coldest story ever told
Somewhere far along this road
He lost his soul to a woman so heartless
How could you be so heartless?
Oh, how could you be so heartless?


How could you be so Dr. Evil?
You're bringin' out a side of me that I don't know
I decided we wasn't gon' speak so
Why we up 3 AM on the phone?
Why do she be so mad at me fo'?
Homie, I don't know, she's hot and cold
I won't stop, won't mess my groove up
'Cause I already know how this thing go
You run and tell your friends that you're leavin' me
They say that they don't see what you see in me
You wait a couple of months, then you gon' see
You'll never find nobody better than me


In the night, I hear 'em talk (Me)
The coldest story ever told
Somewhere far along this road
He lost his soul to a woman so heartless
How could you be so heartless?
Oh, how could you be so heartless?

Talk and talk and talk and talk
Baby, let's just knock it off
They don't know what we been through
They don't know 'bout me and you
So I got somethin' new to see
And you just gon' keep hatin' me
And we just gon' be enemies
I know you can't believe
I could just leave it wrong
And you can't make it right
I'm gon' take off tonight into the night


In the night, I hear 'em talk
The coldest story ever told
Somewhere far along this road
He lost his soul to a woman so heartless
How could you be so heartless? (How, how?)
Oh, how could you be so heartless?


On and on and on and on
And on and, and on and on and on",526
429,521,99 Problems,rap,JAY-Z,2003,1216032,{},"


If you're havin' girl problems, I feel bad for you, son
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one


I've got the Rap Patrol on the gat patrol
Foes that wanna make sure my casket's closed
Rap critics that say he's Money, Cash, Hoes
I'm from the hood, stupid! What type of facts are those?
If you grew up with holes in your zapatos
You'd celebrate the minute you was havin' dough
I'm like, ""Fuck critics, you can kiss my whole asshole!
If you don't like my lyrics, you can press fast forward.""
Got beef with radio if I don't play they show
They don't play my hits, well, I don't give a shit, so
Rap mags try and use my black ass
So advertisers can give 'em more cash for ads
Fuckers, I don't know what you take me as
Or understand the intelligence that Jay Z has
I'm from rags to riches, niggas, I ain't dumb
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one - hit me!

99 problems, but a bitch ain't one
If you're havin' girl problems, I feel bad for you, son
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one - hit me!


The year is '94, in my trunk is raw
In my rearview mirror is the motherfuckin' law
Got two choices, y'all: pull over the car or
Bounce on the devil, put the pedal to the floor
And I ain't tryin' to see no highway chase with Jake
Plus I got a few dollars, I can fight the case
So I pull over to the side of the road
I heard, ""Son, do you know why I'm stopping you for?""
'Cause I'm young and I'm black and my hat's real low?
Do I look like a mind reader, sir? I don't know
Am I under arrest or should I guess some more?
""Well, you was doing 55 in a 54
License and registration and step out of the car
Are you carrying a weapon on you? I know a lot of you are.""
I ain't steppin' out of shit, all my paper's legit
""Well, do you mind if I look around the car a little bit?""
Well, my glove compartment is locked, so is the trunk in the back
And I know my rights, so you gon' need a warrant for that
""Aren't you sharp as a tack?
You some type of lawyer or something?
Somebody important or something?""
Well, I ain't passed the bar, but I know a little bit
Enough that you won't illegally search my shit
""Well, we'll see how smart you are when the K9 come!""
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one - hit me!

99 problems, but a bitch ain't one
If you're havin' girl problems, I feel bad for you, son
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one - hit me!
99 problems, but a bitch ain't one
If you're havin' girl problems, I feel bad for you, son
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one


Now once upon a time not too long ago
A nigga like myself had to strong-arm a ho
This is not a ho in the sense of havin' a pussy
But a pussy havin' no goddamn sense, try and push me
I try to ignore him, talk to the Lord
Pray for him, but some fools just love to perform
You know the type, loud as a motorbike
But wouldn't bust a grape in a fruit fight
And only thing that's gon' happen is I'ma get to clappin'
And he and his boys gonna be yappin' to the Captain
And there I go, trapped in the Kit-Kat again
Back through the system with the riff-raff again
Fiends on the floor, scratchin' again
Paparazzis with they cameras, snappin' em
D.A. try to give a nigga shaft again
Half a mil' for bail 'cause I'm African
All because this fool was harassin' them
Tryin' to play the boy like he's saccharine
But ain't nothin' sweet 'bout how I hold my gun
I got 99 problems, bein' a bitch ain't one - hit me!

99 problems, but a bitch ain't one
If you're havin' girl problems, I feel bad for you, son
I got 99 problems, but a bitch ain't one - hit me!


You crazy for this one, Rick
It's your boy",497
436,529,No Love,rap,Eminem,2010,1641096,"{""Lil Wayne""}","
Love, love
Love, love, love

Don't hurt me
Don't hurt me no more
Young Money, yeah
No more
Love


Throw dirt on me and grow a wildflower
But it's ""Fuck the world,"" get a child out her
Yeah, my life a bitch, but you know nothing 'bout her
Been to hell and back, I can show you vouchers (No love)
I'm rollin' Sweets, I'm smokin' sour
Married to the game, but she broke her vows
That's why my bars are full of broken bottles
And my nightstands are full of open Bibles
Uh, I think about more than I forget
But I don't go around fire expectin' not to sweat
And these niggas know I lay 'em down, make your bed
Bitches try to kick me while I'm down, I'll break your leg
Money outweighin' problems on a triple beam
I'm stickin' to the script, you niggas skippin' scenes
Uh, be good or be good at it
Fuckin' right, I got my gun, semi-Cartermatic
Yeah, put a dick in they mouth, so I guess it's fuck what they say
I'm high as a bitch, up, up and away
Man, I'll come down in a couple of days
Okay, you want me up in the cage?
Then I'll come out in beast mode
I got this world stuck in the safe, combination is the G code
It's Weezy, motherfucker, Blood gang, and I'm in bleed mode
All about my dough, but I don't even check the peephole
So you can keep knockin', but won't knock me down
No love lost, no love found

It's a little too late to say that you're sorry now (Yeah)
You kicked me when I was down
But what you say just don't (Hurt me)
That's right, it don't (Hurt me)
And I don't need you (No more)
Don't wanna see you (No more)
Ha, bitch, you get no (Love)
You showed me nothing but hate (Haha!)
You ran me into the ground
But what comes around goes around (Yeah)
And I don't need you (Don't hurt me)
That's right, you don't (Hurt me)
And I don't need you (No more)
Don't wanna see you
Ha, bitch, you get (No love)
No! (No love) No! (No love) No! (No love)
Ha, bitch, you get (No love)
No! (No love) No! (No love)
And I don't need you (No more)
Get 'em!


I'm alive again, more alive than I have been
In my whole entire life, I can (Yeah)
See these people's ears perk up as I begin to spaz with the pen
Uh, I'm a little bit sicker than most
Shit's finna get thick again, they say the competition is stiff
But I get a hard dick from this shit, now stick it in
I ain't never giving in again (Yeah)
Caution to the wind, complete freedom
Look at these rappers, how I treat 'em
So why the fuck would I join 'em when I beat 'em? (Yeah!)
They call me a freak, 'cause I like to
Spit on these pussies 'fore I eat 'em (Haha)
Man, get these wack cocksuckers off stage!
Where the fuck is Kanye when you need him? (Oh!)
Snatch the mic from 'em, bitch, I'ma let you finish in a minute
Yeah, that rap was tight, but I'm (Yeah!)
'Bout to spit the greatest verse of all time
So you might want to go back to the lab tonight and, um (Yeah!)
Scribble out them rhymes you were gonna spit
And start over from scratch and write new ones
But I'm afraid that it ain't gonna make no difference
When I rip this stage and tear it in half tonight
It's an adrenaline rush to feel the bass thump
From the place all the way to the parking lot, fellow
Set fire to the mic and ignite the crowd (Yeah)
You can see the sparks from hot metal (Yeah)
Cold-hearted, from the day I Bogarted
The game, my soul started to rot, fellow (Yeah)
When I'm not even in my harshest
You can still get roasted, 'cause Marsh is not mellow
'Til I'm topplin' from the top, I'm not gonna stop
I'm standin' on my Monopoly board (Uh)
That means I'm on top of my game
And it don't stop 'til my hip don't hop anymore (Shit)
When you're so good that you can't say it
'Cause it ain't even cool for you to sound cocky anymore (Shit)
People just get sick 'cause you spit
These fools can't drool or dribble a drop anymore (Ow!)
And you can never break my stride (Nope)
You'll never slow the momentum at any moment
I'm 'bout to blow, you'll never take my pride
Killin' the flow, slow venom
And the opponent is gettin' no mercy, mark my words
Ain't lettin' up, relentless, I smell blood
I don't give a fuck, keep givin' them hell
Where was you when I fell and needed help up?
You get no love

It's a little too late to say that you're sorry now (Uh)
You kicked me when I was down
But what you say just don't (Hurt me)
Yeah, that's right, it don't (Hurt me)
And I don't need you (No more)
Don't wanna see you (No more)
Ha, bitch, you get no (Love)
You showed me nothing but hate (Yeah!)
You ran me into the ground
But what comes around goes around
And I don't need you (Don't hurt me)
That's right, you don't (Hurt me)
And I don't need you (No more)
Don't wanna see you
Ha, bitch, you get (No love)
No! (No love) No! (No love) No! (No love)
Ha, bitch, you get (No love)
No! (No love) No! (No love)
And I don't need you (No more)
Ha, bitch, you get (No love)",530
437,530,The Real Slim Shady,rap,Eminem,2000,2926565,{},"
May I have your attention, please?
May I have your attention, please?
Will the real Slim Shady please stand up?
I repeat, will the real Slim Shady please stand up?
We're gonna have a problem here...


Y'all act like you never seen a white person before
Jaws all on the floor like Pam like Tommy just burst in the door
And started whoopin' her ass worse than before
They first were divorced, throwin' her over furniture (Agh!)
It's the return of the ""Oh, wait, no way, you're kidding
He didn't just say what I think he did, did he?""
And Dr. Dre said... nothing, you idiots!
Dr. Dre's dead, he's locked in my basement (Ha ha!)
Feminist women love Eminem
""Chicka, chicka, chicka, Slim Shady, I'm sick of him
Look at him, walkin' around, grabbin' his you-know-what
Flippin' the you-know-who,"" ""Yeah, but he's so cute though""
Yeah, I probably got a couple of screws up in my head loose
But no worse than what's goin' on in your parents' bedrooms
Sometimes I wanna get on TV and just let loose
But can't, but it's cool for Tom Green to hump a dead moose
""My bum is on your lips, my bum is on your lips""
And if I'm lucky, you might just give it a little kiss
And that's the message that we deliver to little kids
And expect them not to know what a woman's clitoris is
Of course, they're gonna know what intercourse is
By the time they hit fourth grade
They've got the Discovery Channel, don't they?
We ain't nothin' but mammals-well, some of us, cannibals
Who cut other people open like cantaloupes
But if we can hump dead animals and antelopes
Then there's no reason that a man and another man can't elope
But if you feel like I feel, I got the antidote
Women, wave your pantyhose, sing the chorus, and it goes-

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?


Will Smith don't gotta cuss in his raps to sell records (Nope)
Well, I do, so fuck him and fuck you too!
You think I give a damn about a GRAMMY?
Half of you critics can't even stomach me, let alone stand me
""But Slim, what if you win, wouldn't it be weird?""
Why, so you guys could just lie to get me here?
So you can sit me here next to Britney Spears?
Shit, Christina Aguilera better switch me chairs
So I can sit next to Carson Daly and Fred Durst
And hear 'em argue over who she gave head to first
Little bitch put me on blast on MTV
""Yeah, he's cute, but I think he's married to Kim, hee-hee""
I should download her audio on MP3
And show the whole world how you gave Eminem VD (Agh!)
I'm sick of you little girl and boy groups
All you do is annoy me, so I have been sent here to destroy you
And there's a million of us just like me
Who cuss like me, who just don't give a fuck like me
Who dress like me; walk, talk and act like me
And just might be the next best thing, but not quite me

'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?


I'm like a head trip to listen to, 'cause I'm only givin' you
Things you joke about with your friends inside your livin' room
The only difference is I got the balls to say it in front of y'all
And I don't gotta be false or sugarcoat it at all
I just get on the mic and spit it
And whether you like to admit it, I just shit it
Better than ninety percent of you rappers out can
Then you wonder: ""How can kids eat up these albums like Valiums?""
It's funny, 'cause at the rate, I'm going, when I'm thirty
I'll be the only person in the nursing home flirting
Pinching nurse's asses when I'm jacking off with Jergens
And I'm jerking, but this whole bag of Viagra isn't working
And every single person is a Slim Shady lurking
He could be working at Burger King, spittin' on your onion rings
Or in the parking lot, circling, screaming, ""I don't give a fuck!""
With his windows down and his system up
So will the real Shady please stand up
And put one of those fingers on each hand up?
And be proud to be outta your mind and outta control
And one more time, loud as you can, how does it go?

I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?
'Cause I'm Slim Shady, yes, I'm the real Shady
All you other Slim Shadys are just imitating
So won't the real Slim Shady please stand up
Please stand up, please stand up?


Ha ha, I guess there's a Slim Shady in all of us
Fuck it, let's all stand up!

",531
438,531,Love the Way You Lie,rap,Eminem,2010,2306127,{Rihanna},"
Just gonna stand there and watch me burn?
Well, that's all right because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry?
Well, that's all right because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie


I can't tell you what it really is, I can only tell you what it feels like
And right now, there's a steel knife in my windpipe
I can't breathe, but I still fight while I can fight
As long as the wrong feels right, it's like I'm in flight
High off her love, drunk from her hate
It's like I'm huffin' paint and I love her, the more I suffer, I suffocate
And right before I'm about to drown, she resuscitates me
She fuckin' hates me, and I love it - ""Wait!
Where you going?"" - ""I'm leaving you!"" - ""No, you ain't!
Come back!"" - We're runnin' right back, here we go again
It's so insane, 'cause when it's goin' good, it's goin' great
I'm Superman with the wind at his back, she's Lois Lane
But when it's bad, it's awful, I feel so ashamed
I snapped, ""Who's that dude?"", I don't even know his name
I laid hands on her, I'll never stoop so low again
I guess I don't know my own strength

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn?
Well, that's all right because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry?
Well, that's all right because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie


You ever love somebody so much you can barely breathe when you're with 'em?
You meet, and neither one of you even know what hit 'em
Got that warm fuzzy feelin', yeah, them chills, used to get 'em
Now you're gettin' fuckin' sick of lookin' at 'em?
You swore you'd never hit 'em, never do nothin' to hurt 'em
Now you're in each other's face
Spewin' venom in your words when you spit 'em
You push, pull each other's hair, scratch, claw, bit 'em
Throw 'em down, pin 'em
So lost in the moments when you're in 'em
It's the rage that took over, it controls you both
So they say you're best to go your separate ways
Guess that they don't know ya
'Cause today, that was yesterday, yesterday is over
It's a different day, sound like broken records playin' over
But you promised her, next time you'll show restraint
You don't get another chance, life is no Nintendo game
But you lied again
Now you get to watch her leave out the window
Guess that's why they call it window pane

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn?
Well, that's all right because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry?
Well, that's all right because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie


Now, I know we said things, did things that we didn't mean
Then we fall back into the same patterns, same routine
But your temper's just as bad as mine is, you're the same as me
When it comes to love you're just as blinded, baby, please
Come back, it wasn't you, baby, it was me
Maybe our relationship isn't as crazy as it seems
Maybe that's what happens when a tornado meets a volcano
All I know is I love you too much to walk away though
Come inside, pick up your bags off the sidewalk
Don't you hear sincerity in my voice when I talk?
Told you this is my fault, look me in the eyeball
Next time I'm pissed, I'll aim my fist at the drywall
Next time? There won't be no next time!
I apologize, even though I know it's lies
I'm tired of the games, I just want her back, I know I'm a liar
If she ever tries to fuckin' leave again, I'ma tie her
To the bed and set this house on fire, just gonna-

Just gonna stand there and watch me burn?
Well, that's all right because I like the way it hurts
Just gonna stand there and hear me cry?
Well, that's all right because I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie
I love the way you lie",532
447,544,POWER,rap,Kanye West,2010,2276788,{},"


I'm living in that 21st century, doing something mean to it
Do it better than anybody you ever seen do it
Screams from the haters got a nice ring to it
I guess every superhero need his theme music


No one man should have all that power
The clock's ticking, I just count the hours
Stop tripping, I'm tripping off the power
(21st-century schizoid man)


The system broken, the school's closed, the prison's open
We ain't got nothing to lose, motherfucker, we rolling
Huh? Motherfucker, we rolling
With some light-skinned girls and some Kelly Rowlands
In this white man world, we the ones chosen
So goodnight, cruel world, I'll see you in the morning
Huh? I'll see you in the morning
This is way too much, I need a moment

No one man should have all that power
The clock's ticking, I just count the hours
Stop tripping, I'm tripping off the power
'Til then, fuck that, the world's ours
And they say, and they say
And they say, and they say
And they say, and they say
(21st-century schizoid man)


Fuck SNL and the whole cast
Tell them Yeezy said they can kiss my whole ass
More specifically, they can kiss my asshole
I'm an asshole? You niggas got jokes
You short-minded niggas' thoughts is Napoleon
My furs is Mongolian, my ice brought the goalies in
I embody every characteristic of the egotistic
He knows he's so fuckin' gifted
I just needed time alone with my own thoughts
Got treasures in my mind, but couldn't open up my own vault
My childlike creativity, purity, and honesty
Is honestly being crowded by these grown thoughts
Reality is catching up with me
Taking my inner child, I'm fighting for custody
With these responsibilities that they entrusted me
As I look down at my diamond-encrusted piece

Thinking no one man should have all that power
The clock's ticking, I just count the hours
Stop tripping, I'm tripping off the powder
'Til then, fuck that, the world's ours
And they say, and they say
And they say, and they say
And they say, and they say
(21st-century schizoid man)


Colin Powells, Austin Powers
Lost in translation with a whole fuckin' nation
They say I was the abomination of Obama's nation
Well, that's a pretty bad way to start the conversation
At the end of the day, goddamnit, I'm killing this shit
I know damn well y'all feeling this shit
I don't need your pussy, bitch, I'm on my own dick
I ain't gotta power trip, who you goin' home with?
How Ye doing? I'm survivin'
I was drinkin' earlier, now I'm drivin'
Where the bad bitches, huh? Where you hidin'?
I got the power make your life so excitin'


Now this will be a beautiful death
I'm jumping out the window, I'm letting everything go
I'm letting everything go
Mmm, now this will be a beautiful death
I'm jumping out the window, I'm letting everything go
I'm letting everything go
Now this will be a beautiful death
Jumping out the window, letting everything go
Letting everything go
You got the power to let power go?
(21st-century schizoid man)",510
456,553,Jesus Walks,rap,Kanye West,2004,1045205,{},"
We at war
We at war with terrorism, racism
But most of all we at war with ourselves


(Jesus, walk)
God show me the way because the Devil's tryna break me down
(Jesus, walk with me)


You know what the Midwest is? Young and restless
Where restless (Niggas) might snatch your necklace
And next these (Niggas) might jack your Lexus
Somebody tell these (Niggas) who Kanye West is
I walk through the valley of the Chi where death is
Top floor the view alone will leave you breathless *gasps*
Try to catch it *gasps* it's kinda hard
Getting choked by detectives, yeah, yeah, now check the method
They be askin' us questions, harass and arrest us
Sayin' ""We eat pieces of shit like you for breakfast""
Huh? Y'all eat pieces of shit? What's the basis?
We ain't going nowhere but got suits and cases
A trunk full of coke, rental car from Avis
My mama used to say only Jesus can save us
Well mama I know I act a fool
But I'll be gone 'til November, I got packs to move
I hope

(Jesus, walk)
God show me the way because the Devil's tryna break me down
(Jesus, walk with me)
The only thing that I pray is that my feet don't fail me now
(Jesus, walk)
And I don't think there's nothin' I can do now to right my wrongs
(Jesus, walk with me)
I wanna talk to God but I'm afraid 'cause we ain't spoke in so long
(Jesus, walk)
God show me the way because the Devil's tryna break me down
(Jesus, walk with me)
The only thing that I pray is that my feet don't fail me now
(Jesus, walk)
And I don't think there's nothin' I can do now to right my wrongs
(Jesus, walk with me)
I wanna talk to God but I'm afraid 'cause we ain't spoke in so long
So long, so long
(Jesus, walk with me)


To the hustlers, killers, murderers, drug dealers, even the scrippers
(Jesus walks for them)
To the victims of welfare feel we livin' in Hell here, hell yeah
(Jesus walks for them)
Now, hear ye, hear ye, want to see Thee more clearly
I know He hear me when my feet get weary
'Cause we're the almost nearly extinct
We rappers is role models: we rap, we don't think
I ain't here to argue about His facial features
Or here to convert atheists into believers
I'm just tryna say the way school need teachers
The way Kathie Lee needed Regis, that's the way I need Jesus
So here go my single, dawg, radio needs this
They say you can rap about anything except for Jesus
That means guns, sex, lies, videotape
But if I talk about God my record won't get played, huh?
Well if this take away from my spins
Which'll probably take away from my ends
Then I hope this take away from my sins
And bring the day that I'm dreamin' about
Next time I'm in the club, everybody screamin' out

(Jesus, walk)
God show me the way because the Devil's tryna break me down
(Jesus, walk with me)
The only thing that I pray is that my feet don't fail me now

",519
460,557,Flashing Lights,pop,Kanye West,2007,1078113,{Dwele},"
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)


She don't believe in shootin' stars
But she believe in shoes and cars
Wood floors in the new apartment
Couture from the store's departments
You more like ""love to start shit""
I'm more of the trips to Florida
Ordered the hors d'oeuvres, views of the water
Straight from a page of your favorite author
And the weather so breezy
Man, why can't life always be this easy?
She in the mirror dancin' so sleazy
I get a call like, ""Where are you, Yeezy?""
And try to hit you with the ol-wu-wopte
'Til I got flashed by the paparazzi
Damn, these niggas got me
I hate these niggas more than a Nazi

As I recall, I know you love to show off
But I never thought that you would take it this far
But what do I know?
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
What do I know? Know
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)


I know it's been a while, sweetheart
We hardly talk, I was doin' my thang
I know I was foul, baby
Ayy, babe, lately, you've been all on my brain
And if somebody woulda told me a month ago
Frontin', though, yo, I wouldn't wanna know
If somebody woulda told me a year ago
It'll go get this difficult
Feelin' like Katrina with no FEMA
Like Martin with no Gina
Like a flight with no Visa
First class with the seat back, I still see ya
In my past, you on the other side of the glass
Of my memory's museum
I'm just sayin', hey, Mona Lisa
Come home, you know you can't roam without Caesar

As I recall, I know you love to show off
But I never thought that you would take it this far
But what do I know?
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
What do I know? Know
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)


As you recall, you know I love to show off
But you never thought that I would take it this far
But what do you know?
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
What do you know? Know
Flashing lights (Lights, lights)
Flashing lights (Lights, lights, lights, lights...)",523
471,568,Beautiful,rap,Eminem,2009,1631469,{},"
Lately I've been hard to reach
I've been too long on my own
Everybody has a private world where they can be alone
Are you calling me?
Are you tryin' to get through?
Are you reaching out for me?
I'm reaching out for you


I'm just so fucking depressed
I just can't seem to get out this slump
If I could just get over this hump
But I need something to pull me out this dump
I took my bruises, took my lumps
Fell down then I got right back up
But I need that spark to get psyched back up
In order for me to pick the mic back up
I don't know how or why or when
I ended up in this position I'm in
I'm starting to feel distant again
So I decided just to pick this pen
Up and try to make an attempt
To vent, but I just can't admit
Or come to grips with the fact that
I may be done with rap, I need a new outlet
And I know some shit's so hard to swallow
But I just can't sit back and wallow
In my own sorrow, but I know one fact:
I'll be one tough act to follow
One tough act to follow
I'll be one tough act to follow
Here today, gone tomorrow
But you'd have to walk a thousand miles-

In my shoes, just to see
What it's like to be me
I'll be you, let's trade shoes
Just to see what it'd be like to
Feel your pain, you feel mine
Go inside each other's minds
Just to see what we find
Look at shit through each other's eyes


But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you, so
Don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you, so


I think I'm startin' to lose my sense of humor
Everything's so tense and gloom
I almost feel like I gotta check the temperature
Of the room, just as soon as
I walk in, it's like all eyes on me
So I try to avoid any eye contact
'Cause if I do that, then it opens a door
For conversation like I want that
I'm not lookin' for extra attention
I just wanna be just like you
Blend in with the rest of the room
Maybe just point me to the closest restroom
I don't need no fuckin' man servant
Tryna follow me around and wipe my ass
Laugh at every single joke I crack
And half of 'em ain't even funny, like, ""Ha!
Marshall, you're so funny, man
You should be a comedian, goddamn!""
Unfortunately I am
I just hide behind the tears of a clown
So why don't you all sit down?
Listen to the tale I'm about to tell
Hell, we don't gotta trade our shoes
And you ain't gotta walk no thousand miles-

In my shoes, just to see
What it's like to be me
I'll be you, let's trade shoes
Just to see what it'd be like to
Feel your pain, you feel mine
Go inside each other's minds
Just to see what we find
Look at shit through each other's eyes


But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you, so
Don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you, so


Nobody asked for life to deal us
With these bullshit hands we're dealt
We gotta take these cards ourselves
And flip 'em, don't expect no help
Now, I could've either just sat
On my ass and pissed and moaned
Or take this situation in which I'm placed in
And get up and get my own
I was never the type of kid
To wait by the door and pack his bags
And sat on the porch and hoped and prayed
For a dad to show up who never did
I just wanted to fit in
In every single place, every school I went
I dreamed of being that cool kid
Even if it meant actin' stupid
Aunt Edna always told me:
""Keep making that face, it'll get stuck like that.""
Meanwhile, I'm just standin' there
Holdin' my tongue, tryin' to talk like this
'Til I stuck my tongue on that frozen
Stop sign pole at eight-years-old
I learned my lesson then, 'cause I wasn't
Tryin' to impress my friends no mo'
But I already told you my whole life story
Not just based on my description
'Cause where you see it from where you're sittin'
It's probably a 110% different
I guess we would have to walk a
Mile in each other's shoes at least
What size you wear? I wear 10's
Let's see if you can fit your feet-

In my shoes, just to see
What it's like to be me
I'll be you, let's trade shoes
Just to see what it'd be like to
Feel your pain, you feel mine
Go inside each other's minds
Just to see what we find
Look at shit through each other's eyes


But don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you, so
Don't let 'em say you ain't beautiful, oh
They can all get fucked, just stay true to you, so


Lately I've been hard to reach
I've been too long on my own (Oh)
Everybody has a private world
Where they can be alone (So)
Are you calling me?
Are you tryin'g to get through? (Oh)
Are you reaching out for me?
I'm reaching out for you (So)


Yeah
To my babies:
Stay strong
Your Dad'll be home soon
And to the rest of the world:
God gave you shoes
To fit you
So put 'em on and wear 'em
Be yourself, man
Be proud of who you are
Even if it sounds corny
Don't never let no one tell you
You ain't beautiful (So-oh-oh-oh-oh)",545
476,575,Homecoming,rap,Kanye West,2007,1096761,"{""Chris Martin""}","
Yeah
And you say Chi city!
Chi city! Chi city!


I'm comin' home again
Do you think about me now and then? (Yeah)
Do you think about me now and then?
'Cause I'm comin' home again (Ow!)
-Min' home again


I met this girl when I was three years old
And what I loved most, she had so much soul
She said, ""Excuse me, little homie, I know you don't know me
But my name is Windy and I like to blow trees.""
And from that point, I never blow her off
Niggas come from out of town, I like to show her off
They like to act tough, she like to toe 'em off
And make 'em straighten up their hat 'cause she know they soft
And when I grew up, she showed me how to go downtown
In the nighttime, her face lit up, so astoundin'
I told her in my heart is where she'll always be
She never messed with entertainers 'cause they always leave
She said, ""It felt like they walked and drove on me.""
Knew I was gang affiliated, got on TV and told on me
I guess that's why last winter she got so cold on me
She said, ""'Ye, keep makin' that, keep makin' that platinum and gold for me!""

I'm comin' home again
Do you think about me now and then?
Do you think about me now and then?
'Cause I'm comin' home again
-Min' home again
Do you think about me now and then?
Do you think about me now and then? Oh!
Now I'm comin' home again
Maybe we can start again


But if you really cared for her
Then you wouldn't've never hit the airport to follow your dreams
Sometimes I still talk to her
But when I talk to her, it always seems like she talkin' 'bout me
She said, ""You left your kids, and they just like you
They wanna rap and make soul beats just like you
But they just not you,"" and I just got through
Talkin' 'bout what niggas tryin' to do: just not new
Now everybody got the game figured out all wrong
I guess you never know what you got 'til it's gone
I guess that's why I'm here and I can't come back home
And guess when I heard that? When I was back home
Every interview, I'm representin' you, makin' you proud
Reach for the stars, so if you fall, you land on a cloud
Jump in the crowd, spark your lighters, wave 'em around
If you don't know by now, I'm talkin' 'bout Chi-Town

I'm comin' home again
Do you think about me now and then?
Do you think about me now and then?
'Cause I'm comin' home again
-Min' home again
Baby, do you remember when
Fireworks at Lake Michigan? Oh!
Now I'm comin' home again
-Min' home again
Baby, do you remember when
Fireworks at Lake Michigan? Oh!
Now I'm comin' home again
Maybe we can start again


Loy-oy-al, loy-oy-al
Comin' home again
Loy-oy-al, loy-oy-al
Comin' home again
Maybe we can start again",552
485,584,Space Bound,rap,Eminem,2010,1264859,{},"
We touch, I feel a rush; we clutch, it isn't much
But it's enough to make me wonder what's in store for us
It's lust, it's torturous, you must be a sorceress
'Cause you just did the impossible: gained my trust
Don't play games, it'll be dangerous
If you fuck me over, 'cause if I get burnt, I'ma show ya
What it's like to hurt, 'cause I been treated like dirt before ya
And love is evil - spell it backwards, I'll show ya
Nobody knows me, I'm cold, walk down this road all alone
It's no one's fault but my own, it's the path I've chosen to go
Frozen as snow, I show no emotion whatsoever so
Don't ask me why I have no love for these muh'fuckin' hoes
Bloodsuckin' succubuses, what the fuck is up with this?
I've tried in this department, but I ain't had no luck with this
It sucks, but it's exactly what I thought it would be like
Tryin' to start over, I got a hole in my heart
But some kind of emotional roller coaster
Is something I won't go on
So you toy with my emotions, so it's over
It's like an explosion every time I hold ya
Wasn't joking when I told ya
You take my breath away, you're a supernova, and I'm a-

I'm a space-bound rocket ship and your heart's the Moon
And I'm aimin' right at you, right at you
250,000 miles on a clear night in June
And I'm aimin' right at you
Right at you, right at you


I'll do whatever it takes, when I'm with you, I get the shakes
My body aches when I ain't with you, I have zero strength
There's no limit on how far I would go, no boundaries, no lengths
Why do we say that until we get that person that we think's
Gonna be that one? And then once we get 'em, it's never the same
You want 'em when they don't want you
Soon as they do, feelings change
It's not a contest and I ain't on no conquest for no mate
I wasn't lookin' when I stumbled on to you, musta been fate
But so much is at stake, what the fuck does it take?
Let's cut to the chase 'fore the door shuts in your face
Promise me if I cave in and break and leave myself open
That I won't be makin' a mistake, 'cause I'm a-


I'm a space-bound rocket ship and your heart's the Moon
And I'm aimin' right at you, right at you
250,000 miles on a clear night in June
And I'm aimin' right at you
Right at you, right at you

So, after a year and six months, it's no longer me that you want
But I love you so much it hurts, never mistreated you once
I poured my heart out to you, let down my guard, swear to God
I'll blow my brains in your lap, lay here and die in your arms
Drop to my knees and I'm pleadin', I'm tryna stop you from leavin'
You won't even listen, so fuck it, I'm tryna stop you from breathin'
I put both hands on your throat, I sit on top of you squeezin'
'Til I snap your neck like a Popsicle stick, ain't no possible reason
I can think of to let you walk up out this house and let you live
Tears stream down both of my cheeks
Now I let you go and just give
And 'fore I put that gun to my temple, I told you this


And I would've done anything for you
To show you how much I adored you
But it's over now, it's too late to save our love
Just promise me you'll think of me
Every time you look up in the sky and see a star, 'cause I'm a-


I'm a space-bound rocket ship and your heart's the Moon
And I'm aimin' right at you, right at you
250,000 miles on a clear night in June
And I'm so lost without you
Without you, without you",561
487,586,Superman,rap,Eminem,2002,1516202,"{""Dina Rae""}","
Mhmmm *inhales*
You high, baby?
Yeah, hahahaha
Yeah?
Talk to me
You want me to tell you something?
Uh-huh
I know what you wanna hear


'Cause I know you want me, baby, I think I want you too
(I think I love you, baby) I think I love you too (Oh-ooh)
I'm here to save you, girl, come be in Shady's world (Ooh-ooh, ooh)
I wanna grow together, let's let our love unfurl
You know you want me, baby, you know I want you too
They call me Superman, I'm here to rescue you
I wanna save you, girl, come be in Shady's world (Ooh-ooh)
(Oh boy, you drive me crazy) Bitch, you make me hurl


They call me Superman
Leap tall hoes in a single bound
I'm single now: got no ring on this finger now
I'd never let another chick bring me down
In a relationship; save it, bitch!
Babysit? You make me sick
Superman ain't savin' shit
Girl, you can jump on Shady's dick
Straight from the hip, cut to the chase
I tell a muhfuckin' slut to her face
Play no games, say no names
Ever since I broke up with what's-her-face
I'm a different man, kiss my ass
Kiss my lips? Bitch, why ask?
Kiss my dick, get my cash?
I'd rather have you whip my ass
Don't put out? I'll put you out
Won't get out? I'll push you out
Puss blew out, poppin' shit
Wouldn't piss on fire to put you out
Am I too nice? Buy you ice?
Bitch, if you died, wouldn't buy you life
What, you tryin' to be my new wife?
What, you Mariah? Fly through twice

But I do know one thing though
Bitches, they come, they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday (Yeah-yeah)
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway, ho


'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman


Don't get me wrong, I love these hoes
It's no secret, everybody knows
Yeah, we fucked-bitch, so what?
That's about as far as your buddy goes
We'll be friends, I'll call you again
I'll chase you around every bar you attend
Never know what kinda car I'll be in
We'll see how much you'll be partyin' then
You don't want that, neither do I
I don't wanna flip when I see you with guys
Too much pride, between you and I
Not a jealous man, but females lie
But I guess that's just what sluts do
How could it ever be just us two?
I'd never love you enough to trust you
We just met and I just fucked you

But I do know one thing though
Bitches, they come, they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway, ho


'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman
'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman


'Cause I know you want me, baby, I think I want you too
(I think I love you, baby) I think I love you too
I'm here to save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
I wanna grow together, let's let our love unfurl
You know you want me, baby, you know I want you too
They call me Superman, I'm here to rescue you
I wanna save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
(Oh boy, you drive me crazy) Bitch, you make me hurl

First thing you say: I'm not fazed
I hang around big stars all day
I don't see what the big deal is anyway
You're just plain old Marshall to me
Ooh yeah, girl, run that game
Hailie Jade, I love that name
Love that tattoo, what's that say?
""Rot In Pieces,"" uh, that's great
First off, you don't know Marshall
At all, so don't grow partial
That's ammo for my arsenal
I'll slap you off that bar stool
There goes another lawsuit
Leave handprints all across you
Good Lordy, whoadie
You must be gone off that water bottle
You want what you can't have
Ooh girl, that's too damn bad
Don't touch what you can't grab
End up with two backhands
Put anthrax on a Tampax
And slap you 'til you can't stand
Girl, you just blew your chance
Don't mean to ruin your plans


But I do know one thing though
Bitches, they come, they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then just sit your drunk ass on that fuckin' runway, ho


'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman
'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman


'Cause I know you want me, baby, I think I want you too
(I think I love you, baby) I think I love you too
I'm here to save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
I wanna grow together, let's let our love unfurl
You know you want me, baby, you know I want you too
They call me Superman, I'm here to rescue you
I wanna save you, girl, come be in Shady's world
(Oh boy, you drive me crazy) Bitch, you make me hurl


'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman
'Cause I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
I can't be your Superman, can't be your Superman
Can't be your Superman, your Superman, your Superman",564
489,588,Baby,pop,Justin Bieber,2010,2232442,{Ludacris},"


Oh, woah
Oh, woah
Oh, woah


You know you love me, I know you care
Just shout whenever and I'll be there
You want my love, you want my heart
And we will never, ever, ever be apart
Are we an item? Girl, quit playin'
We're just friends, what are you sayin'?
Said ""There's another,"" and looked right in my eyes
My first love broke my heart for the first time, and I was like


Baby, baby, baby oh
Like baby, baby, baby no
Like baby, baby, baby oh
Thought you'd always be mine, mine
Baby, baby, baby oh
Like baby, baby, baby no
Like baby, baby, baby oh
Thought you'd always be mine, mine

Oh, for you I would have done whatever
And I just can't believe we ain't together
And I wanna play it cool, but I'm losin' you
I'll buy you anything, I'll buy you any ring
And I'm in pieces, baby, fix me
And just shake me 'til you wake me from this bad dream
I'm goin' down, down, down, down
And I just can't believe my first love won't be around, and I'm like


Baby, baby, baby oh
Like baby, baby, baby no
Like baby, baby, baby oh
Thought you'd always be mine, mine
Baby, baby, baby oh
Like baby, baby, baby no
Like baby, baby, baby oh
Thought you'd always be mine, mine


(Luda)
When I was 13, I had my first love
There was nobody that compared to my baby
And nobody came between us, nor could ever come above
She had me goin' crazy
Oh, I was starstruck
She woke me up daily, don't need no Starbucks
She made my heart pound, and skip a beat when I see her in the street and
At school on the playground, but I really wanna see her on the weekend
She knows she's got me dazing, 'cause she was so amazin'
And now my heart is breakin', but I just keep on sayin'

Baby, baby, baby oh
Like baby, baby, baby no
Like baby, baby, baby oh
Thought you'd always be mine, mine
Baby, baby, baby oh
Like baby, baby, baby no
Like baby, baby, baby oh
Thought you'd always be mine, mine


I'm gone, yeah yeah yeah
Now I'm all gone, yeah yeah yeah
Now I'm all gone, yeah yeah yeah
Now I'm all gone, gone, gone, gone, I'm gone",566
491,590,Dear Mama,rap,2Pac,1995,1460491,{},"
You are appreciated


When I was young, me and my mama had beef
Seventeen years old, kicked out on the streets
Though back at the time I never thought I'd see her face
Ain't a woman alive that could take my mama's place
Suspended from school, and scared to go home
I was a fool, with the big boys breakin' all the rules
I shed tears with my baby sister, over the years
We was poorer than the other little kids
And even though we had different daddies, the same drama
When things went wrong we'd blame Mama
I reminisce on the stress I caused, it was hell
Huggin' on my mama from a jail cell
And who'd think in elementary, hey
I'd see the penitentiary one day?
And runnin' from the police, that's right
Mama catch me, put a whoopin' to my backside
And even as a crack fiend, Mama
You always was a black queen, Mama
I finally understand
For a woman it ain't easy tryin' to raise a man
You always was committed
A poor single mother on welfare, tell me how you did it
There's no way I can pay you back, but the plan
Is to show you that I understand: you are appreciated

Lady, don't you know we love ya? (Dear Mama)
Sweet lady, place no one above ya (You are appreciated)
Sweet lady, don't you know we love ya?


Now, ain't nobody tell us it was fair
No love from my daddy, 'cause the coward wasn't there
He passed away and I didn't cry
'Cause my anger wouldn't let me feel for a stranger
They say I'm wrong and I'm heartless, but all along
I was lookin' for a father, he was gone
I hung around with the thugs, and even though they sold drugs
They showed a young brother love
I moved out and started really hangin'
I needed money of my own, so I started slangin'
I ain't guilty, 'cause even though I sell rocks
It feels good puttin' money in your mailbox
I love payin' rent when the rent is due
I hope you got the diamond necklace that I sent to you
'Cause when I was low you was there for me
You never left me alone, because you cared for me
And I could see you comin' home after work late
You're in the kitchen, tryin' to fix us a hotplate
You just workin' with the scraps you was given
And Mama made miracles every Thanksgivin'
But now the road got rough, you're alone
You're tryin' to raise two bad kids on your own
And there's no way I can pay you back, but my plan
Is to show you that I understand: you are appreciated

Lady, don't you know we love ya? (Dear Mama)
Sweet lady, place no one above ya (You are appreciated)
Sweet lady, don't you know we love ya?


Pour out some liquor and I reminisce
'Cause through the drama, I can always depend on my mama
And when it seems that I'm hopeless
You say the words that can get me back in focus
When I was sick as a little kid
To keep me happy there's no limit to the things you did
And all my childhood memories
Are full of all the sweet things you did for me
And even though I act crazy
I gotta thank the Lord that you made me
There are no words that can express how I feel
You never kept a secret, always stayed real
And I appreciate how you raised me
And all the extra love that you gave me
I wish I could take the pain away
If you can make it through the night, there's a brighter day
Everything will be alright if you hold on
It's a struggle every day, gotta roll on
And there's no way I can pay you back, but my plan
Is to show you that I understand: you are appreciated

Lady, don't you know we love ya? (Dear Mama)
Sweet lady, place no one above ya (You are appreciated)
Sweet lady, don't you know we love ya? (Dear Mama)
Sweet lady, lady (Dear Mama)
Lady, lady",568
510,614,Forgot About Dre,rap,Dr. Dre,1999,1650066,{Eminem},"
Y'all know me, still the same OG
But I been low-key
Hated on by most these niggas
With no cheese, no deals and no G's
No wheels and no keys
No boats, no snowmobiles, and no skis
Mad at me 'cause I can finally afford to provide my family with groceries
Got a crib with a studio and it's all full of tracks
To add to the wall full of plaques
Hangin' up in the office and back at my house like trophies
Did y'all think I'ma let my dough freeze?
Ho, please
You better bow down on both knees
Who you think taught you to smoke trees?
Who you think brought you the oldies?
Eazy-E's, Ice Cube's, and D.O.C.'s
The Snoop D-O-double-G's
And the group that said, ""Motherfuck the police!""
Gave you a tape full of dope beats
To bump when you stroll through in your hood
And when your album sales wasn't doin' too good
Who's the Doctor they told you to go see?
Y'all better listen up closely
All you niggas that said that I turned pop or The Firm flopped
Y'all are the reason that Dre ain't been gettin' no sleep
So fuck y'all, all of y'all!
If y'all don't like me, blow me!
Y'all are gon' keep fuckin' around with me and turn me back to the old me

Nowadays, everybody wanna talk like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre
Nowadays, everybody wanna talk like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre


So what do you say to somebody you hate (What?)
Or anyone tryna bring trouble your way?
Wanna resolve things in a bloodier way? (Yup)
Just study a tape of N.W.A
One day I was walkin' by
With a Walkman on, when I caught a guy
Gave me an awkward eye ('Chu lookin' at?)
And strangled him up in the parking lot with his Karl Kani
I don't give a fuck if it's dark or not
I'm harder than me tryna park a Dodge
When I'm drunk as fuck
Right next to a humongous truck in a two-car garage
Hoppin' out with two broken legs tryna walk it off
Fuck you too, bitch, call the cops
I'ma kill you and them loud-ass motherfuckin' barkin' dogs
And when the cops came through
Me and Dre stood next to a burnt-down house
With a can full of gas and a hand full of matches
And still weren't found out (Right here!)
So from here on out, it's the Chronic II
Startin' today and tomorrow's anew
And I'm still loco enough to choke you to death with a Charleston Chew
Chicka-chicka-chicka Slim Shady
Hotter than a set of twin babies
In a Mercedes Benz with the windows up
When the temp goes up to the mid-80s
Callin' men ladies
Sorry Doc, but I been crazy
There's no way that you can save me
It's okay, go with him, Hailie (Dada?)

Nowadays, everybody wanna talk like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre
Nowadays, everybody wanna talk like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre


If it was up to me, you motherfuckers'd stop
Comin' up to me with your hands out
Lookin' up to me like you want somethin' free
When my last CD was out, you weren't bumpin' me
But now that I got this little company
Everybody wanna come to me
Like it was some disease, but you won't get a crumb from me
'Cause I'm from the streets of C-Compton! (Compton!)
I told 'em all
All 'em little gangstas, who you think helped mold 'em all?
Now you wanna run around talkin' 'bout guns like I ain't got none
What, you think I sold 'em all
'Cause I stay well off?
Now all I get is hate mail all day sayin' Dre fell off
What, 'cause I been in the lab
With a pen and a pad tryin' to get this damn label off?
I ain't havin' that
This is the millennium of Aftermath
It ain't gon' be nothin' after that
So give me one more platinum plaque
And fuck rap, you can have it back
So where's all the Mad Rappers at?
It's like a jungle in this habitat
But all you savage cats know that I was strapped with gats
While you were cuddlin' a Cabbage Patch

Nowadays, everybody wanna talk
Like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre
Nowadays, everybody wanna talk
Like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre


Nowadays, everybody wanna talk like they got somethin' to say
But nothin' comes out when they move their lips
Just a bunch of gibberish
And motherfuckers act like they forgot about Dre",590
578,690,Bohemian Rhapsody,rock,Queen,1975,9247817,{},"
Is this the real life? Is this just fantasy?
Caught in a landslide, no escape from reality
Open your eyes, look up to the skies and see
I'm just a poor boy, I need no sympathy
Because I'm easy come, easy go, little high, little low
Any way the wind blows doesn't really matter to me, to me


Mama, just killed a man
Put a gun against his head, pulled my trigger, now he's dead
Mama, life had just begun
But now I've gone and thrown it all away
Mama, ooh, didn't mean to make you cry
If I'm not back again this time tomorrow
Carry on, carry on as if nothing really matters


Too late, my time has come
Sends shivers down my spine, body's aching all the time
Goodbye, everybody, I've got to go
Gotta leave you all behind and face the truth
Mama, ooh (Any way the wind blows)
I don't wanna die
I sometimes wish I'd never been born at all



I see a little silhouetto of a man
Scaramouche, Scaramouche, will you do the Fandango?
Thunderbolt and lightning, very, very frightening me
(Galileo) Galileo, (Galileo) Galileo, Galileo Figaro magnifico
But I'm just a poor boy, nobody loves me
He's just a poor boy from a poor family
Spare him his life from this monstrosity
Easy come, easy go, will you let me go?
Bismillah! No, we will not let you go
(Let him go) Bismillah! We will not let you go
(Let him go) Bismillah! We will not let you go
(Let me go) Will not let you go
(Let me go) Will not let you go
(Never, never, never, never let me go) Ah
No, no, no, no, no, no, no
(Oh, mamma mia, mamma mia) Mamma mia, let me go
Beelzebub has a devil put aside for me, for me, for me!


So you think you can stone me and spit in my eye?
So you think you can love me and leave me to die?
Oh, baby, can't do this to me, baby!
Just gotta get out, just gotta get right outta here

(Ooh)
(Ooh, yeah, ooh, yeah)
Nothing really matters, anyone can see
Nothing really matters
Nothing really matters to me
Any way the wind blows",1063
582,695,Best I Ever Had,rap,Drake,2009,1515733,{},"
You know, a lot of girls be
Thinkin' my songs are about them
This is not to get confused
This one's for you


Baby, you my everything, you all I ever wanted
We could do it real big, bigger than you ever done it
You be up on everything, other hoes ain't never on it
I want this forever, I swear I can spend whatever on it
'Cause she hold me down every time I hit her up
When I get right, I promise that we gon' live it up
She made me beg for it 'til she give it up
And I say the same thing every single time
I say, you the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had (Ayy)
Best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had
I say, you the fuckin'

Know you got a roommate, call me when there's no one there
Put the key under the mat and you know I be over there (Yup)
I be over there, shawty, I be over there
I be hittin' all the spots that you ain't even know was there
And you don't even have to ask twice
You could have my heart or we could share it like the last slice
Always felt like you was so accustomed to the fast life
Have a nigga thinkin' that he met you in a past life
Sweatpants, hair tied, chillin' with no make-up on
That's when you're the prettiest
I hope that you don't take it wrong
You don't even trip when friends say
""You ain't bringin' Drake along?""
You know that I'm workin', I'll be there soon as I make it home
And she a patient in my waiting room
Never pay attention to the rumors and what they assume
And until them girls prove it
I'm the one that never get confused with, 'cause


Baby, you my everything, you all I ever wanted
We could do it real big, bigger than you ever done it
You be up on everything, other hoes ain't never on it
I want this forever, I swear I can spend whatever on it
'Cause she hold me down every time I hit her up
When I get right, I promise that we gon' live it up
She made me beg for it 'til she give it up
And I say the same thing every single time
I say, you the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had (Ayy)
Best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had
I say, you the fuckin'

Sex, Love, Pain, baby, I be on that Tank shit
Buzz so big I could probably sell a blank disc
When my album drop, bitches'll buy it for the picture
And niggas'll buy it too and claim they got it for they sister
Magazine paper, girl, the money ain't the issue
They bring dinner to my room and ask me to initial
She call me the referee 'cause I be so official
My shirt ain't got no stripes, but I can make your pussy whistle
Like the Andy Griffith theme song
And who told you to put them jeans on?
Double cup love, you the one I lean on
Feelin' for a fix, then you should really get your fiend on
Yeah, just know my condo is the crack spot
Every single show, she out there reppin' like a mascot
Get it from the back and make your fuckin' bra strap pop
All up in your slot 'til a nigga hit the jackpot, I'm saying


Baby, you my everything, you all I ever wanted
We could do it real big, bigger than you ever done it
You be up on everything, other hoes ain't never on it
I want this forever, I swear I can spend whatever on it
'Cause she hold me down every time I hit her up
When I get right, I promise that we gon' live it up
She made me beg for it 'til she give it up
And I say the same thing every single time
I say, you the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had (Ayy)
Best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had
I say, you the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the fuckin' best (Ayy), you the fuckin' best (Ayy)
You the best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had (Ayy)
Best I ever had (Ayy), best I ever had

Uhh, ah yeah
See, this the type of joint you gotta dedicate to somebody
Just make sure they that special somebody
Young Money, yeah, yeah
You know who you are
I got you",672
602,724,Suicidal Thoughts,rap,The Notorious B.I.G.,1994,1534647,{},"
Hello?
Aw shit, nigga! The fuck time is it, man?
Oh, God damn
Nigga, do you know what time it is?
Aw shit, what the fuck's goin' on?
You aight?
Ah, nigga, what the fuck is wrong with you?


When I die, fuck it, I wanna go to hell
'Cause I'm a piece of shit, it ain't hard to fuckin' tell (What you talkin' 'bout, man?)
It don't make sense, goin' to heaven with the goodie-goodies
Dressed in white, I like black Timbs and black hoodies (Aw, man)
God'll probably have me on some real strict shit
No sleepin' all day, no gettin' my dick licked
Hangin' with the goodie-goodies, loungin' in paradise
Fuck that shit, I wanna tote guns and shoot dice (You talkin' some crazy shit now, nigga)
All my life I been considered as the worst
Lyin' to my mother, even stealin' out her purse (Ah)
Crime after crime, from drugs to extortion
I know my mother wish she got a fuckin' abortion
She don't even love me like she did when I was younger (Yo, get a hold of yourself, nigga)
Suckin' on her chest just to stop my fuckin' hunger
I wonder; if I died, would tears come to her eyes?
Forgive me for my disrespect, forgive me for my lies (You're buggin', B)
My baby mother's eight months, her little sister's two
Who's to blame for both of them? (Nah, nigga, not you)
I swear to God I want to just slit my wrists and end this bullshit
Throw the Magnum to my head, threaten to pull shit (Nigga, what the fuck?)
And squeeze until the bed's completely red (It's too late for this shit, man)
I'm glad I'm dead, a worthless fuckin' buddha head
The stress is buildin' up, I can't- I can't believe (Ayo, I'm on my way over there, man)
Suicide's on my fuckin' mind, I wanna leave
I swear to God I feel like death is fuckin' callin' me
But nah, you wouldn't understand
Nigga, talk to me please, man!
You see, it's kinda like the crack did to Pookie in New Jack
Except when I cross over, there ain't no comin' back (Ayo, ayo, man, I'm out)
Should I die on the train track like Ramo in Beat Street? (I'ma call you when I get in the car)
People at the funeral frontin' like they miss me (Ayo, where your girl at, man?)
My baby mama kiss me, but she glad I'm gone (Yo, put your girl on the phone, nigga!)
She know me and her sister had somethin' goin' on
I reach my peak, I can't speak (Ayo, you listenin' to me, motherfucker?)
Call my nigga Chic, tell him that my will is weak (Ayo, c'mon, nigga)
I'm sick of niggas lyin' (Cut that), I'm sick of bitches hawkin' (Ayo)
Matter of fact, I'm sick of talkin' (Nigga, yo, yo, Big! Ayo, chill!)
*Gunshot*
Ayo, Big! Ayo, Big!

Please hang up and try your call again
Please hang up- Is a recording",695
607,729,Dance with the Devil,rap,Immortal Technique,2001,1169615,{},"


I once knew a nigga whose real name was William
His primary concern was makin' a million
Bein' the illest hustler that the world ever seen
He used to fuck movie stars and sniff coke in his dreams
A corrupted young mind at the age of 13
Nigga never had a father and his mom was a fiend
She put the pipe down, but for every year she was sober
Her son's heart simultaneously grew colder
He started hangin' out, sellin' bags in the projects
Checkin' the young chicks, lookin' for hit-and-run prospects
He was fascinated by material objects
But he understood money never bought respect
He built a reputation, 'cause he could hustle and steal
But got locked once and didn't hesitate to squeal
So criminals he chilled with didn't think he was real
You see, me and niggas like this have never been equal
I don't project my insecurities on other people
He fiended for props like addicts with pipes and needles
So he felt he had to prove to everyone he was evil
A feeble-minded young man with infinite potential
The product of a ghetto-bred capitalistic mental
Coincidentally dropped out of school to sell weed
Dancin' with the Devil, smoked until his eyes would bleed
But he was sick of sellin' trees and gave in to his greed

Everyone tryin' to be trife never face the consequences
You probably only did a month for minor offenses
Ask a nigga doin' life if he had another chance
But then again, there's always the wicked that knew in advance
Dance forever with the Devil on a cold cell block
But that's what happens when you rape, murder, and sell rock
Devils used to be God's angels that fell from the top
There's no diversity because we're burnin' in the melting pot


So Billy started robbin' niggas, anything he could do
To get his respect back in the eyes of his crew
Startin' fights over little shit up on the block
Stepped up to sellin' mothers and brothers the crack rock
Workin' overtime for makin' money for the crack spot
Hit the jackpot, and wanted to move up to cocaine
Fulfillin' the Scarface fantasy stuck in his brain
Tired of the block niggas treatin' him the same
He wanted to be major like the cut throats and the thugs
But when he tried to step to 'em, niggas showed him no love
They told him any motherfuckin' coward can sell drugs
Any bitch nigga with a gun can bust slugs
Any nigga with a red shirt can front like a Blood
Even Puffy smoked a motherfucker up in the club
But only a real thug can stab someone 'til they die
Standin' in front of them, starin' straight into their eyes
Billy realized that these men were well-guarded
And they wanted to test him before business started
Suggested rapin' a bitch to prove he was cold-hearted
So now he had a choice between goin' back to his life
Or makin' money with made men up in the cyph'
His dreams about cars and ice made him agree
A hardcore nigga is all he ever wanted to be
And so he met them Friday night at a quarter to three

Everyone tryin' to be trife never face the consequences
You probably only did a month for minor offenses
Ask a nigga doin' life if he had another chance
But then again, there's always the wicked that knew in advance
Dance forever with the Devil on a cold cell block
But that's what happens when you rape, murder, and sell rock
Devils used to be God's angels that fell from the top
There's no diversity because we're burnin' in the melting pot


They drove around the projects slow while it was rainin'
Smokin' blunts, drinkin' and jokin' for entertainment
Until they saw a woman on the street, walkin' alone
Three in the mornin', comin' back from work, on her way home
And so they quietly got out the car and followed her
Walkin' through the projects, the darkness swallowed her
They wrapped her shirt around her head
And knocked her onto the floor
""This is it, kid, now you got your chance to be raw""
So Billy yoked her up and grabbed the chick by the hair
And dragged her into a lobby that had nobody there
She struggled hard, but they forced her to go up the stairs
They got to the roof and then held her down on the ground
Screamin', ""Shut the fuck up, and stop movin' around!""
The shirt covered her face, but she screamed and clawed
So Billy stomped on the bitch until he'd broken her jaw
The dirty bastards knew exactly what they were doin'
They kicked her until they cracked her ribs and she stopped movin'
Blood leakin' through the cloth, she cried silently
And then they all proceeded to rape her violently
Billy was made to go first, but each of them took a turn
Rippin' her up and chokin' her until her throat burned
Her broken jaw mumbled for God, but they weren't concerned
When they were done and she was lyin'
Bloody, broken and bruised
One of them niggas pulled out a brand new .22
They told him that she was a witness of what she'd gone through
And if he killed her, he was guaranteed a spot in the crew
He thought about it for a minute, she was practically dead
And so he leaned over and put the gun right to her head

I'm fallin' and I can't turn back
I'm fallin' and I can't turn back


Right before he pulled the trigger and ended her life
He thought about the cocaine with the platinum and ice
And he felt strong standin' along with his new brothers
Cocked the gat to her head and pulled back the shirt cover
But what he saw made him start to cringe and stutter
'Cause he was starin' into the eyes of his own mother
She looked back at him and cried 'cause he had forsaken her
She cried more painfully than when they were rapin' her
His whole world stopped, he couldn't even contemplate
His corruption had successfully changed his fate
And he remembered how his mom used to come home late
Workin' hard for nothin', because now what was he worth?
He turned away from the woman that had once given him birth
And cryin' out to the sky, 'cause he was lonely and scared
But only the Devil responded, 'cause God wasn't there
And right then he knew what it was to be empty and cold
And so he jumped off the roof and died with no soul
They say death takes you to a better place, but I doubt it
After that, they killed his mother, and never spoke about it
And listen, 'cause the story that I'm tellin' is true
'Cause I was there with Billy Jacobs, and I raped his mom too
And now the Devil follows me everywhere that I go
In fact, I'm sure he's standin' among one of you at my shows
And every street cypher, listenin' to little thugs flow
He could be standin' right next to you, and you wouldn't know
The Devil grows inside the hearts of the selfish and wicked
White, brown, yellow and black - color is not restricted
You have a self-destructive destiny when you're inflicted
And you'll be one of God's children that fell from the top
There's no diversity because we're burnin' in the melting pot
So when the Devil wants to dance with you, you better say never
Because a dance with the Devil might last you forever




Oh, y'all motherfuckers thought it was over, huh?
Well, it's not, you didn't count on a fallen angel gettin' back
Into the grace of God and comin' after you
Y'all niggas ain't shit, your producers ain't shit
Your fuckin' A & R ain't shit
I'll fuckin' wipe my ass with your demo deal
Yo, Diabolic, take this motherfucker's head off!


Go 'head and grip Glocks
I'll snap your trigger finger in six spots
You'll have to lip lock with hypodermic needles to lick shots
I'll watch you topple flat
Put away your rings and holla back
Can't freestyle; you're screwed off the top, like bottle caps
Beneath the surface
I'm overheatin' your receiving circuits
By unleashin' deeper verses than priests speak in churches
What you preach is worthless
Your worship defeat the purpose
Like President Bush takin' bullets for the secret service
Beyond what y'all fathom, I shit on cats and jaw tap 'em
Show no compassion, like havin' a straight-faced orgasm
Tour jack 'em, have his half-a-10 bitch suck my friend's dick
In the meantime, you can french kiss this clenched fist
Diabolic: a one-man brigade spreadin' cancer plague
Fist-fuckin' a pussy's face, holdin' a hand grenade
So if I catch you bluffin', faggot, you're less than nothin'
I just had to get that stress off my chest like breast reduction


You motherfuckers are nothin', you cannot harm me
I'll resurrect every aborted baby and start an army
Storm the planet, huntin' you down, 'cause I'm on a mission
To split your body into a billion one-celled organisms
Immortal Technique'll destroy your religion, you stupid bitch
You're faker than blue-eyed crackers nailed to a crucifix
I'm 'bout to blow up, like NASA Challenger computer chips
Arsenic language transmitted revolutionarily
I'm like time itself: I'm gonna kill you inevitably
Chemically bomb you, fuck usin' a chrome piece
I'm Illmatic, you won't make it home, like Jerome's niece
I'll sever your head diagonally for thinkin' of dissin' me
And then use your dead body to write my name in calligraphy
This puppet democracy brain-washed your psychology
So you're nothin', like diversity without equality
And your crew is full of more faggots than Greek mythology
Usin' numerology to count the people I sent to Heaven
Produces more digits than 22 divided by seven
You're like Kevin Spacey: your style is usually suspect
You never killed a cop, you, not a motherfuckin' thug yet
Your mind is empty and spacious
Like the part of the brain that appreciates culture in a racist
Face it, you're too basic, you're never gonna make it
Like children walkin' through Antarctica, butt-naked",700
610,732,Roses,rap,OutKast,2003,1016592,{},"
Caroline (Caroline), see, Caroline
All the guys would say she's mighty fine (mighty fine)
But mighty fine only got you somewhere half the time
And the other half either got you
Cussed out or coming up short
Yeah, now dig this, now even though (even though)
You'd need a golden calculator to divide (to divide)
The time it took to look inside and realize
That real guys go for real down to Mars girls, haha, yeah


I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh

Caroline, (Caroline), see
She's the reason for the word 'bitch' (bitch)
I hope she's speedin' on the way to the club
Tryna hurry up to get to a baller or singer or somebody like that
And try to put on her make up in the mirror and crash, crash
Crash into a ditch (Just playin')
She needs a golden calculator to divide (to divide)
The time it takes to look inside and realize
That real guys go for real down to Mars girls, yeah


I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh


Well, she's got a hottie's body but her attitude is potty
When I met her at a party, she was hardly acting naughty
I said, ""Shorty, would you call me?""
She said, ""Pardon me, are you balling?""
I said ""Darling, you sound like a prostitute pausing""
Oh, so you're one them freaks
Get geeked at the sight of an ATM receipt
But game been peeped, droppin' names, she's weak
Trickin' off this bitch is lost, must take me for a geek
A quick way to eat, a neat place to sleep
A rent-a-car for a week, a trick for a treat
No go on the raw sex, my AIDS test is flawless
Regardless, we don't want to get involved with all them lawyers
And judges just to hold grudges in a courtroom
I wanna see your support bra, not support you
(Not support you, not support you)

I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, I
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
I know you'd like to think your shit don't stank, but
Lean a little bit closer, see
Roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh
Yeah, roses really smell like poo-poo-ooh

Better come back down to Mars
Girl, quit chasing cars
What happens when the dough gets low
Bitch, you ain't that fine, no way, no way, no way
Better come back down to Mars
Girl, quit chasing cars
What happens when the dough gets low
Bitch, you ain't that fine, no way, no way, no way


Crazy bitch
Crazy bitch
Crazy bitch
Crazy bitch
Crazy bitch
Crazy bitch
Crazy bitch
(Bitch) Crazy bitch
(Stupid-ass bitch) Crazy bitch
(Old punk-ass bitch) Crazy bitch
(Old dumb-ass bitch) Crazy bitch
(A bitch's bitch) Crazy bitch
(Just a bitch) Crazy bitch
(Stupid-ass bitch) Crazy bitch
(Old punk-ass bitch) Crazy bitch
(Old dumb-ass bitch) Crazy bitch
(A bitch's bitch) Crazy bitch
(Just a bitch)",1065
645,771,Like Toy Soldiers,rap,Eminem,2004,1259688,{},"
Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left, we all fall down...


Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left, we all fall down
Like toy soldiers
Bit by bit, torn apart
We never win, but the battle wages on
For toy soldiers


I'm supposed to be the soldier who never blows his composure
Even though I hold the weight of the whole world on my shoulders
I ain't never supposed to show it
My crew ain't supposed to know it
Even if it means goin' toe-to-toe with a Benzino
It don't matter, I never drag 'em in battles that I can't handle
'Less I absolutely have to, I'm supposed to set an example
I need to be the leader, my crew looks for me to guide 'em
If some shit ever does pop off, I'm supposed to be beside 'em
That Ja shit, I tried to squash it, it was too late to stop it
There's a certain line you just don't cross, and he crossed it
I heard him say Hailie's name on a song and I just lost it
It was crazy, the shit went way beyond some JAY-Z and Nas shit
And even though the battle was won, I feel like we lost it
I spent so much energy on it, honestly I'm exhausted
And I'm so caught in it, I almost feel I'm the one who caused it
This ain't what I'm in hip-hop for, it's not why I got in it
That was never my object, for someone to get killed
Why would I wanna destroy somethin' I helped build?
It wasn't my intentions, my intentions were good
I went through my whole career without ever mentionin' ****
And that was just outta respect, for not runnin' my mouth
And talkin' about somethin' that I knew nothin' about
Plus Dre told me stay out, this just wasn't my beef
So I did, I just fell back, watched and gritted my teeth
While he's all over TV, down-talkin' the man
Who literally saved my life, like fuck it, I understand
This is business, and this shit just isn't none of my business
But still knowin' the shit could pop off at any minute, 'cause-

Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left, we all fall down
Like toy soldiers
Bit by bit, torn apart
We never win, but the battle wages on
For toy soldiers


There used to be a time when you could just say a rhyme and
Wouldn't have to worry about one of your people dyin'
But now it's elevated, 'cause once you put someone's kids in it
The shit gets escalated-it ain't just words no more, is it?
It's a different ballgame, you call names and you ain't just rappin'
We actually tried to stop the 50 and Ja beef from happenin'
Me and Dre had sat with him, kicked it and had a chat with him
And asked him not to start it, he wasn't gonna go after him
Until Ja started yappin' in magazines how he stabbed him
Fuck it, 50, smash him! Mash on him, let him have it
Meanwhile my attention's pulled in another direction
Some receptionist at The Source who answers phones at his desk
Has an erection for me and thinks that I'll be his resurrection
Tries to blow the dust off his mic and make a new record
But now he's fucked the game up 'cause one of the ways I came up
Was through that publication, the same one that made me famous
Now the owner of it has got a grudge against me for nothin'?
Well, fuck it, that motherfucker could get it too, fuck him then!
But I'm so busy bein' pissed off, I don't stop to think
That we've just inherited 50's beef with Murder Inc.
And he's inherited mine, which is fine, ain't like either of us mind
We still have soldiers that's on the front line
Who's willin' to die for us as soon as we give the orders
Never to extort us, strictly to show they support us
And maybe shout 'em out in a rap or up in a chorus
To show 'em we love 'em back and let 'em know how important
It is to have Runyon Avenue soldiers up in our corners
Their loyalty to us is worth more than any award is
But I ain't tryna have none of my people hurt or murdered
It ain't worth it, I can't think of a perfecter way to word it
Than to just say that I love y'all too much to see the verdict
I'll walk away from it all 'fore I let it go any further
But don't get it twisted, it's not a plea that I'm coppin'
I'm just willin' to be the bigger man, if y'all can quit poppin'
Off at the jaws, well, then I can, 'cause frankly I'm sick of talkin'
I'm not gonna let someone else's coffin rest on my conscience
'Cause-

Step by step, heart to heart
Left, right, left, we all fall down
Like toy soldiers
Bit by bit, torn apart
We never win, but the battle wages on
For toy soldiers",735
660,791,The Next Episode,rap,Dr. Dre,2000,1066158,"{""Snoop Dogg""}","
La-da-da-da-dah
It's the motherfuckin' D-O-double-G (Snoop Dogg!)
La-da-da-da-dah
You know I'm mobbin' with the D-R-E, yeah, yeah, yeah
You know who's back up in this motherfucker
What? What? What? What?
So blaze the weed up then, blaze it up, blaze it up!
Just blaze that shit up, nigga! Yeah, 'sup, Snoop?


Top Dogg, bite 'em all, nigga, burn the shit up
D-P-G-C, my nigga, turn that shit up
C-P-T, L-B-C, yeah, we hookin' back up
And when they bang this in the club, baby, you got to get up
Thug niggas, drug dealers, yeah, they givin' it up
Lowlife, yo' life, boy, we livin' it up
Takin' chances while we dancin' in the party for sure
Slipped my ho a forty-fo' when she got in the back do'
Bitches lookin' at me strange, but you know I don't care
Step up in this motherfucker just a-swangin' my hair
Bitch, quit talkin', Crip walk if you down with the set
Take a bullet with some dick and take this dope on this jet
Out of town, put it down for the Father of Rap
And if yo' ass get cracked, bitch, shut yo' trap
Come back, get back, that's the part of success
If you believe in the S, you'll be relievin' your stress

La-da-da-da-dah
It's the motherfuckin' D-R-E (Dr. Dre, motherfucker!)
La-da-da-da-dah


You know I'm mobbin' with the D-O-double-G
Straight off the fuckin' streets of C-P-T
King of the beats, you ride to 'em in your Fleet (Fleetwood)
Or Coupe DeVille rollin' on dubs
How you feel? Whoopty whoop, nigga what?
Dre and Snoop chronic'd out in the 'llac
With D.O.C. in the back, sippin' on 'gnac (Yeah)
Clip in the strap, dippin' through hoods (What hood?)
Compton, Long Beach, Inglewood
South Central out to the West Side, it's California Love
This California bud got a nigga gang of pub
I'm on one, I might bail up in the Century Club
With my jeans on, and my team strong
Get my drink on and my smoke on
Then go home with somethin' to poke on ('Sup bitch?)
Loc, it's on for the two-triple-oh
Comin' real, it's the next episode


Hold up, hey
For my niggas who be thinkin' we soft, we don't play
We gonna rock it 'til the wheels fall off
Hold up, hey
For my niggas who be actin' too bold, take a seat
Hope you ready for the next episode
Hey, hey, hey, hey
Smoke weed every day
",744
678,810,No Vaseline,rap,Ice Cube,1991,1653007,{},"


Damn
Forgot to do somethin', let me see, uh
Oh, yeah- it ain't over, motherfuckers
The motherfuckin' saga continues
Y'all motherfuckers ready for N.W.A? Well, get the fuck up
A bitch is a bitch, so if you're poor-
It was once said by a man who couldn't quit, dope-
Ice Cube writes the rhymes that I say
But now, since he stepped the fuck off
Here's what they think about you
That punk Ice Cube-
Here's what they think about you
Cube was suckin' so much New York dick
Here's what they think about you
Real niggas? Them niggas Dre and Yella used to wear lipstick and lace
Here's what they think about you
Why y'all let his punk ass in the group
Here's what they think about you
When they was in London, they wasn't no good without fuckin' Ice Cube
Here's what they think about you
When I bought the tape, all I know is I wanted my motherfuckin' money back
Here's what they think about you
I smell-
Here's what they think about you
N.W.A. ain't shit without Ice Cube
Here's what they think about you
Here's what they think about you
Cube was suckin' so much New York dick
Here's what they think about you
Real niggas? Them niggas Dre and Yella used to wear lipstick and lace
Here's what they think about you
That punk Ice Cube-
Here's what they think about you
Why y'all let his punk ass in the group
Here's what they think about you
I smell-
When I bought the tape, all I know is I wanted my motherfuckin' money back
Here's what they think about you
N.W.A. ain't shit without Ice Cube
Fuck all y'all

Goddamn, I'm glad y'all set it off
Used to be hard, now you're just wet and soft
First you was down with the AK
And now I see you on a video with Michel'le
Looking like straight bozos
I saw it coming, that's why I went solo
And kept on stompin'
While y'all motherfuckers moved straight outta Compton
Living with the whites
One big house and not another nigga in sight
I started off with too much cargo
Dropped four niggas, now I'm making all the dough
White man just ruling
The Niggas With Attitudes? Who you foolin'?
Y'all niggas just phony
I put that on my mama and my dead homies
Yella Boy's on your team, so you're losing
Ayy, yo, Dre, stick to producing
Calling me Arnold, but you been a dick
Eazy-E saw your ass and went in it quick
You got jealous when I got my own company
But I'm a man and ain't nobody humping me
Trying to sound like Amerikkka's Most
You could yell all day, but you don't come close
'Cause you know I'm the one that flow
You done run a hundred miles, but you still got one to go
With the L-E-N-C-H M-O-B
And y'all disgrace the C-P-T
'Cause you're getting fucked out your green
By a white boy, with no Vaseline

Now you're getting done without Vaseline
Now you're getting done without Vaseline
Now you're getting done without Vaseline
Damn, it feels good to see people, on it


The bigger the cap, the bigger the peeling
Who gives a fuck about a punk-ass villain?
You're getting fucked real quick
And Eazy dick is smelling like MC Ren's shit
Tried to tell you a year ago
But Willie D told me to let a ho be a ho, so
I couldn't stop you from getting ganked
Now let's play big bank take little bank
Tried to diss Ice Cube, it wasn't worth it
'Cause the broomstick fit your ass so perfect
Cut my hair? Nah, cut them balls
'Cause I heard you like giving up the drawers
Gang-banged by your manager, fella
Getting money out your ass like a motherfucking ready teller
Giving up the dollar bills
Now they got The Villain with a purse and high-heels
So don't believe what Ren say
'Cause he's going out like Kunta Kinte
But I got a whip for you, Toby
Used to be my homie, now you act like you don't know me
It's a case of divide and conquer
'Cause you let a Jew break up my crew
House nigga gotta run and hide
Yelling Compton, but you moved to Riverside
So don't front, MC Ren
'Cause I remember when you drove a B210
Broke as a motherfucking joke
Let you on the scene to back up the first team
It ain't my fault, one nigga got smart
And they ripping your asshole apart
By taking your green
Oh, yeah, The Villain does get fucked with no Vaseline

Now you're getting done- get- getting done
Now you're getting done- get- getting done
Now you're getting done without Va- Va- Va- Va- Vaseline


I never have dinner with the president
I never have dinner with the president
I never have dinner with the president
And when I see your ass again, I'll be hesitant
Now I think you a snitch
Throw a house nigga in a ditch
Half pint bitch, fucking your homeboys, you little maggot
Eazy-E turned faggot
With your manager, fella
Fucking MC Ren, Dr. Dre, and Yella
But if they were smart as me
Eazy-E would be hanging from a tree
With no Vaseline
Just a match and a little bit of gasoline
Light 'em up, burn 'em up, flame on
'Til that Jheri curl is gone
On a permanent vacation
Off the massa plantation
Heard you both got the same bank account
Dumb nigga, what you thinking 'bout?
Get rid of that devil real simple
Put a bullet in his temple
'Cause you can't be the Nigga 4 Life crew
With a white Jew telling you what to do
Pulling wools with your scams
Now I gotta play The Silence of the Lambs
With a midget who's a punk too
Tryin' to fuck me, but I'd rather fuck you
Eric Wright
Punk, always into something, gettin' fucked at night
By Mister Shitpacker
Bend over for the goddamn cracker
No Vaseline


Motherfuckin' nosejob havin'-ass
Motherfuckin' Jheri Curl light, Ambi wearing motherfuckin' bitch",761
689,822,Ambitionz Az a Ridah,rap,2Pac,1996,1078285,{},"
I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
Let's get ready to rumble!
Now, you know how we do it, like a G
What really go on in the mind of a nigga
That get down for theirs
Constantly, money over bitches
Not bitches over money
Stay on your grind, nigga
My ambitions as a ridah
My ambitions as a ridah


So many battlefield scars while driven in plush cars
This life as a rap star is nothin' without guard
Was born rough and rugged, addressin' the mass public (Hahaha)
My attitude was ""fuck it,"" 'cause motherfuckers love it
To be a soldier, must maintain composure at ease
Though life is complicated, only what you make it to be
(And ) Uh, and my ambitions as a ridah (Excuse me, baby)
To catch her while she hot and horny, go up inside her (Got ya)
Then I spit some game in her ear, ""Go to the telly, ho!""
Equipped with money in a Benz 'cause, bitch, I'm barely broke (Hahaha)
I'm smokin' bomb-ass weed, feelin' crucial
From player to player, the game's tight, the feeling's mutual
From hustlin' and prayers to breakin' motherfuckers to pay us
I got no time for these bitches (Hell no,) 'cause these hoes tried to play us
I'm on a meal ticket mission, want a mil' so I'm wishin'
Competition got me blitzed on that bullshit they stressin' (Booyah)
I'ma rhyme though, clown hoes like it's mandatory
No guts, no glory, my nigga, bitch got the game distorted
Now it's on and it's on because I said so (Haha)
Can't trust a bitch in the business so I got with Death Row (Yeah)
Now these money-hungry bitches gettin' suspicious
Started plottin' and plannin' on a scheme to come and trick us (Haha)
But thug niggas be on point and game tight (Yeah)
Me, Syke and Bogart are strapped up the same night
Got problems, then handle it, motherfuckers see me
These niggas is jealous, 'cause deep in they hearts they wanna be me
Uh, yeah (Haha,) and now you got me right beside ya
Hopin' you listen, I catch you payin' attention
To my ambitions as a ridah

I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me (My ambitions as a ridah)
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
(I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah)


It was my only wish to rise above these jealous
Coward motherfuckers I despise, when it's time to ride
I was the first to hop inside (Let's go, nigga, let's go,) give me the .9
I'm ready to die right here tonight and motherfuck they life (Yeah, nigga!)
That's what they screamin' as they drill me, but I'm hard to kill
So open fire, I see you kill me, witness my steel (That's all you niggas got? Hahaha)
Spittin' at adversaries, envious and after me
I'd rather die before they capture me, watch me bleed
Mama (Dear Mama,) come rescue me, I'm suicidal, thinkin' thoughts
I'm innocent so there'll be bullets flyin' when I'm caught (Shoot)
Fuck doin' jail time, better day, sacrifice
Won't get a chance to do me like they did my nigga Tyson
Thuggin' for life, and if you right, then, nigga, die for it
Let them other bustas try, at least you tried for it (Hahaha)
When it's time to die, then be a man and pick the way you leave (Yeah, nigga)
Fuck peace and the police, my ambitions as a ridah


I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me (My ambitions as a ridah)
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G

My murderous lyrics, equipped with spirits of the thugs before me
Stay off the block, evade the cops 'cause I know they comin' for me
I been hesitant to reappear, been away for years (I'm back, baby)
Now I'm back, my adversaries been reduced to tears
Question my methods to switch up speeds, sure as some bitches bleed
Niggas'll feel the fire of my mother's corrupted seed
(Buck-buck-buck-buck-buck) Blast me but they didn't finish, didn't diminish
My powers, so now I'm back to be a motherfuckin' menace (Them niggas cowards)
They cowards, that's why they tried to set me up
Had bitch-ass niggas (Bitch-ass niggas) on my team so indeed they wet me up (Punk niggas)
But I'm back reincarnated, incarcerated
At the time I contemplate the way that God made it
Lace 'em with lyrics that's legendary, musical mercenary
For money I'll have these motherfuckers buried
I been gettin' much mail in jail, niggas tellin' me to kill it (Hahaha)
Knowin' when I get out they gon' feel it (Yeah, right)
Witness the realest, a who-ridah when I put the shit inside
The cries from all your people when they find her, must remind ya
(Thug life) My history'll prove I been it
Revenge on them niggas that played me and all the cowards that was down wit' it
Now it's your nigga right beside ya
Hopin' you listen, got you payin' attention to my ambitions
As a ridah


I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
(My ambitions as a ridah)
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me
Got the police bustin' at me
But they can't do nothin' to a G
I won't deny it, I'm a straight ridah
You don't wanna fuck with me",780
710,850,Without Me,rap,Eminem,2002,3212844,{},"
Obie Trice, real name, no gimmicks (*record scratch*)


Two trailer park girls go 'round the outside
'Round the outside, 'round the outside
Two trailer park girls go round the outside
'Round the outside, 'round the outside


Guess who's back, back again
Shady's back, tell a friend
Guess who's back, guess who's back
Guess who's back, guess who's back
Guess who's back, guess who's back
Guess who's back


I've created a monster, 'cause nobody wants to
See Marshall no more; they want Shady, I'm chopped liver
Well, if you want Shady, this what I'll give ya
A little bit of weed mixed with some hard liquor
Some vodka that'll jump-start my heart quicker
Than a shock when I get shocked at the hospital
By the doctor when I'm not co-operating
When I'm rocking the table while he's operating (Hey!)
You waited this long, now stop debating
'Cause I'm back, I'm on the rag and ovulating
I know that you got a job, Ms. Cheney
But your husband's heart problem's complicating
So the FCC won't let me be
Or let me be me, so let me see
They try to shut me down on MTV
But it feels so empty without me
So, come on and dip, bum on your lips
Fuck that, cum on your lips and some on your tits
And get ready, 'cause this shit's about to get heavy
I just settled all my lawsuits, fuck you, Debbie!

Now this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me
'Cause we need a little controversy
'Cause it feels so empty without me
I said this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me
'Cause we need a little controversy
'Cause it feels so empty without me


Little hellions, kids feeling rebellious
Embarrassed, their parents still listen to Elvis
They start feeling like prisoners, helpless
'Til someone comes along on a mission and yells, ""Bitch!""
A visionary, vision is scary
Could start a revolution, polluting the airwaves
A rebel, so just let me revel and bask
In the fact that I got everyone kissing my ass (*smack*)
And it's a disaster, such a catastrophe
For you to see so damn much of my ass-you asked for me?
Well, I'm back, na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na
Fix your bent antenna, tune it in, and then I'm gonna
Enter in, and up under your skin like a splinter
The center of attention, back for the winter
I'm interesting, the best thing since wrestling
Infesting in your kid's ears and nesting
Testing, ""Attention please""
Feel the tension soon as someone mentions me
Here's my ten cents; my two cents is free
A nuisance, who sent? You sent for me?

Now this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me
'Cause we need a little controversy
'Cause it feels so empty without me
I said this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me
'Cause we need a little controversy
'Cause it feels so empty without me


A tisk-it a task-it, I'll go tit-for-tat with
Anybody who's talking ""This shit, that shit""
Chris Kirkpatrick, you can get your ass kicked
Worse than them little Limp Bizkit bastards
And Moby? You can get stomped by Obie
You thirty-six year old baldheaded fag, blow me
You don't know me; you're too old, let go
It's over, nobody listens to techno
Now let's go, just give me the signal
I'll be there with a whole list full of new insults
I've been dope, suspenseful with a pencil
Ever since Prince turned himself into a symbol
But, sometimes, the shit just seems
Everybody only wants to discuss me
So this must mean I'm disgusting
But it's just me, I'm just obscene
Though I'm not the first king of controversy
I am the worst thing since Elvis Presley
To do black music so selfishly
And use it to get myself wealthy (Hey!)
There's a concept that works
Twenty million other white rappers emerge
But no matter how many fish in the sea
It'd be so empty without me

Now this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me
'Cause we need a little controversy
'Cause it feels so empty without me
I said this looks like a job for me
So everybody, just follow me
'Cause we need a little controversy
'Cause it feels so empty without me


Hum, dei-dei, la-la, la-la-la-la-la
La-la-la-la-la, la-la-la-la
Hum, dei-dei, la-la, la-la-la-la-la
La-la-la-la-la, la-la-la-la
Kids!",811
723,865,Keep Ya Head Up,rap,2Pac,1993,1712247,{},"
Little something for my godson Elijah
And a little girl named Corin


Some say the blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
I say the darker the flesh, then the deeper the roots (Oh)
I give a holla to my sisters on welfare
2Pac cares if don't nobody else care (Oh)
And, uh, I know they like to beat you down a lot
When you come around the block, brothers clown a lot
But please don't cry, dry your eyes, never let up
Forgive, but don't forget, girl, keep ya head up
And when he tells you you ain't nothin', don't believe him
And if he can't learn to love you, you should leave him
'Cause, sister, you don't need him
And I ain't tryin' to gas you up, I just call 'em how I see 'em (You don't need him)
You know what makes me unhappy? (What's that?)
When brothers make babies
And leave a young mother to be a pappy (Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah)
And since we all came from a woman
Got our name from a woman and our game from a woman (Yeah, yeah)
I wonder why we take from our women
Why we rape our women, do we hate our women?
(Why? Why? Why? Why? Why? Why?)
I think it's time to kill for our women
Time to heal our women, be real to our women
And if we don't, we'll have a race of babies
That will hate the ladies that make the babies (Oh, yeah-yeah)
And since a man can't make one
He has no right to tell a woman when and where to create one
So will the real men get up?
I know you're fed up, ladies, but keep ya head up

(Keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things are gonna get easier
(Keep-keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things'll get brighter
(Oh-oh, keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things are gonna get easier
(Keep-keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things'll get brighter


Ayo, I remember Marvin Gaye used to sing to me
He had me feelin' like black was the thing to be
And suddenly the ghetto didn't seem so tough
And though we had it rough, we always had enough
I huffed and puffed about my curfew and broke the rules
Ran with the local crew and had a smoke or two
I realize Mama really paid the price
She nearly gave her life to raise me right (Oh, yeah-yeah)
And all I had to give her was my pipe dream
Of how I'd rock the mic and make it to the bright screen
I'm tryin' to make a dollar out of fifteen cents
It's hard to be legit and still pay your rent
And in the end, it seems I'm headin' for the pen'
I try to find my friends, but they're blowin' in the wind
Last night, my buddy lost his whole family
It's gonna take the man in me to conquer this insanity (Oh, no, no, no)
It seems the rain'll never let up
I try to keep my head up and still keep from gettin' wet up, huh
You know, it's funny, when it rains it pours
They got money for wars, but can't feed the poor
Said it ain't no hope for the youth
And the truth is it ain't no hope for the future
And then they wonder why we crazy, huh
I blame my mother for turnin' my brother into a crack baby
We ain't meant to survive 'cause it's a set-up
And even though you're fed up, huh, you got to keep ya head up

(Keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things are gonna get easier
(Keep-keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things'll get brighter
(Oh-oh, keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things are gonna get easier
(Keep-keep ya head up)
Ooh, child, things'll get brighter


And, uh, to all the ladies havin' babies on they own
I know it's kinda rough and you're feelin' all alone
Daddy's long gone and he left you by your lonesome
Thank the Lord for my kids even if nobody else want 'em
'Cause I think we can make it, in fact, I'm sure
And if you fall, stand tall and come back for more (Oh-oh)
'Cause ain't nothin' worse than when your son
Wants to know why his daddy don't love him no mo'
You can't complain, you was dealt this hell of a hand
Without a man, feelin' helpless (I know you were)
Because there's too many things for you to deal with
Dyin' inside, but outside you're lookin' fearless
While the tears is rollin' down your cheeks
You're steady hopin' things don't all fall this week (Yeah)
'Cause if it did, you couldn't take it (Yeah)
And don't blame me, I was given this world, I didn't make it (Oh, yeah)
And now my son's gettin' older and older
And cold from havin' the world on his shoulders
While the rich kids is drivin' Benz
I'm still tryin' to hold on to survivin' friends (Oh, yeah)
And it's crazy, it seems it'll never let up
But, huh, please, you got to keep your head up",826
744,893,Cant Tell Me Nothing,rap,Kanye West,2007,1825243,{},"
La, la, la la (Yeah)
Wait 'til I get my money right


I had a dream I could buy my way to heaven
When I awoke, I spent that on a necklace
I told God I'd be back in a second
Man, it's so hard not to act reckless
To whom much is given, much is tested
Get arrested, guess until he get the message
I feel the pressure, under more scrutiny
And what I do? Act more stupidly
Bought more jewelry, more Louis V
My mama couldn't get through to me
The drama, people suing me
I'm on TV talking like it's just you and me
I'm just saying how I feel, man
I ain't one of the Cosbys, I ain't go to Hillman
I guess the money should've changed him
I guess I should've forgot where I came from

La, la, la la (Ayy!)
Wait 'til I get my money right
La, la, la la (Yeah!)
Then you can't tell me nothing, right?
Excuse me, was you saying something?
Uh-uh, you can't tell me nothing (Yeah! Haha!)
You can't tell me nothing (Yeah! Yeah!)
Uh-uh, you can't tell me nothing (Yeah!)


Let up the suicide doors
This is my life, homie, you decide yours
I know that Jesus died for us
But I couldn't tell ya who decide wars
So I parallel double-parked that motherfucker sideways
Old folks talking 'bout, ""Back in my day""
But homie, this is my day
Class started two hours ago, oh, am I late?
No, I already graduated
And you can live through anything if Magic made it
They say I talk with so much emphasis
Ooh, they so sensitive
Don't ever fix your lips like collagen
And say something when you gon' end up apolog'ing
Let me know if it's a problem then
Aight, man, holla, then

La, la, la la
Wait 'til I get my money right
La, la, la la (Yeah!)
Then you can't tell me nothing, right?
Excuse me, was you saying something?
Uh-uh, you can't tell me nothing
You can't tell me nothing
Uh-uh, you can't tell me nothing


Let the champagne splash, let that man get cash
Let that man get past
He don't even stop to get gas
If he can move through the rumors
He can drive off of fumes 'cause
How he move in a room full of no's?
How he stay faithful in a room full of hoes?
Must be the pharaohs, he in tune with his soul
So when he buried in a tomb full of gold
Treasure, what's your pleasure?
Life is a-uh-depending how you dress her
So if the Devil wear Prada, Adam Eve wear nada
I'm in between, but way more fresher
With way less effort
'Cause when you try hard, that's when you die hard
Your homies looking like, ""Why, God?""
When they reminisce over you, my God

La, la, la la
Wait 'til I get my money right
La, la, la la
Then you can't tell me nothing, right?
Excuse me, was you saying something?
Uh-uh, you can't tell me nothing
You can't tell me nothing
Uh-uh, you can't tell me nothing


La, la, la la
Wait 'til I get my money right
La, la, la la
Then you can't tell me nothing, right?
(I'm serious, nigga, I got money)



",848
748,900,Get Low,rap,Lil Jon & The East Side Boyz,2002,1369552,"{""Ying Yang Twins""}","
3-6-9, damn, you fine
Hoping she can sock it to me one more time
Get low
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
To the window (To the window)
To the wall (To the wall)
Till the sweat drop down my balls (My balls)
Till all these bitches crawl (Crawl)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)


Shawty crunk, so fresh, so clean
Can she fuck? That question been harassing me
In the mind, this bitch is fine
I done came to the club 'bout 50-11 times
Now can I play with your panty line?
The club owner said I need to calm down
Security guard's gonna sweat me now
Nigga drunker than a motherfucker, threaten me now

She getting crunk in the club, I mean she work it
And I like to see the females twerking
Taking her clothes off, buckey naked
ATL, ho, don't disrespect it
A-pop your pussy like this
Cause Yin Yang Twins in this b-i-itch
Lil Jon and the East Side Boys with me
And we all like to see ass and titties
Now bring your ass over here, ho
And let me see you get low if you want this thug
Now take it to the floor (To the floor)
And if your ass wanna act, you can keep your ass where you're at


3-6-9, damn, you fine
Hopin' she can sock it to me one more time
Get low
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
To the window (To the window)
To the wall (To the wall)
Till the sweat drop down my balls (My balls)
Till all these bitches crawl (Crawl)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)

Let me see you get low (You scared, you scared)
Drop that ass to the floor (You scared, you scared)
Let me see you get low (You scared, you scared)
Drop that ass to the floor (You scared, you scared)
Drop that ass, aye, shake it fast, aye
Pop that ass to the left and the right, aye
Drop that ass, aye, shake it fast, aye
Pop that ass to the left and the right, aye
Now, back, back, back it up
Aye, now, back, back, back it up
Aye, now, back, back, back it up
Aye, now, back, back, back it up
Now, stop (Oh!) Then wiggle with it (Yeah!)
Now, stop (Oh!) Then wiggle with it (Yeah!)
Now, stop (Oh!) Then wiggle with it (Yeah!)
Now, stop (Oh!) Then wiggle with it, wiggle with it


3-6-9, damn, you fine
Hoping she can sock it to me one more time
Get low
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
To the window (To the window)
To the wall (To the wall)
Till the sweat drop down my balls (My balls)
Till all these bitches crawl (Crawl)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)

Now give me my dub back, go and get your friend
Stupid bitch standing there while I'm drinking my Henn'
Steady looking at me, still asking questions
Time's up, nigga, pass me another contestant
Ho, move to the left if you ain't 'bout 50
Done talked through 3 or 4 songs already
Looking at a nigga with your palm out
Bitch, I ain't even seen you dance
Twerk something, baby, work something, baby
Pop your pussy on the pole, do your thang, baby
Slide down that bitch a little bit, then stop
Get back on the floor, catch your balance, then drop
Now bring it back up, clap your ass like hands
I just wanna see your ass dirty dance
Yin Yang, we done done again
And put it on the map like ""Hahn!""


3-6-9, damn, you fine
Hoping she can sock it to me one more time
Get low
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
To the window (To the window)
To the wall (To the wall)
Till the sweat drop down my balls (My balls)
Till all these bitches crawl (Crawl)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)


Yeah, y'all twerking a little bit, ladies
But you gotta twerk a little bit harder than that
Now right now, I need all the ladies
That know they look good tonight
We want y'all to do this shit like this
Bend over to the front, touch your toes
Back that ass up and down and get low (Get low)
Bend over to the front, touch your toes
Back that ass up and down and get low (Get low)
Bend over to the front, touch your toes
Back that ass up and down and get low (Get low)
Bend over to the front, touch your toes
Back that ass up and down and get low (Get low)


3-6-9, damn, you fine
Hoping she can sock it to me one more time
Get low
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
Get low (Get low)
To the window (To the window)
To the wall (To the wall)
Till the sweat drop down my balls (My balls)
Till all these bitches crawl (Crawl)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)
Till all skeet-skeet, motherfucker (Motherfucker)
Till all skeet-skeet, goddamn (Goddamn)",852
765,921,Cleanin Out My Closet,rap,Eminem,2002,1616362,{},"
Where's my snare?
I have no snare in my headphones
There you go
Yeah
Yo, yo


Have you ever been hated or discriminated against?
I have, I've been protested and demonstrated against
Picket signs for my wicked rhymes, look at the times
Sick is the mind of the motherfuckin' kid that's behind
All this commotion, emotions run deep as oceans, explodin'
Tempers flarin' from parents, just blow 'em off and keep goin'
Not takin' nothin' from no one, give 'em hell long as I'm breathin'
Keep kickin' ass in the morning and takin' names in the evenin'
Leave 'em with a taste as sour as vinegar in they mouth
See, they can trigger me, but they'll never figure me out
Look at me now! I bet you're prolly sick of me now
Ain't you, Mama? I'ma make you look so ridiculous now!

I'm sorry, Mama
I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet (One more time!)
I said I'm sorry, Mama
I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet (Ha!)


I got some skeletons in my closet and I don't know if no one knows it
So before they throw me inside my coffin and close it
I'ma expose it; I'll take you back to '73
Before I ever had a multi-platinum-selling CD
I was a baby, maybe I was just a couple of months
My faggot father must've had his panties up in a bunch
'Cause he split, I wonder if he even kissed me goodbye
No, I don't, on second thought, I just fuckin' wished he would die
I look at Hailie, and I couldn't picture leavin' her side
Even if I hated Kim, I'd grit my teeth and I'd try
To make it work with her at least for Hailie's sake, I maybe made some mistakes
But I'm only human, but I'm man enough to face 'em today
What I did was stupid, no doubt it was dumb
But the smartest shit I did was take the bullets out of that gun
'Cause I'da killed 'em, shit, I woulda shot Kim and him both
It's my life, I'd like to welcome y'all to The Eminem Show

I'm sorry, Mama
I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet (One more time!)
I said I'm sorry, Mama
I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet (Uh)


Now, I would never diss my own mama just to get recognition
Take a second to listen 'fore you think this record is dissin'
But put yourself in my position, just try to envision
Witnessin' your mama poppin' prescription pills in the kitchen
Bitchin' that someone's always goin' through her purse and shit's missin'
Goin' through public housing systems, victim of Münchausen's Syndrome
My whole life I was made to believe I was sick when I wasn't
'Til I grew up, now I blew up, it makes you sick to your stomach, doesn't it?
Wasn't it the reason you made that CD for me, Ma?
So you could try to justify the way you treated me, Ma?
But guess what, you're gettin' older now, and it's cold when you're lonely
And Nathan's growin' up so quick, he's gonna know that you're phony
And Hailie's gettin' so big now, you should see her, she's beautiful
But you'll never see her, she won't even be at your funeral (Ha-ha!)
See, what hurts me the most is you won't admit you was wrong
Bitch, do your song, keep tellin' yourself that you was a mom!
But how dare you try to take what you didn't help me to get?!
You selfish bitch, I hope you fuckin' burn in hell for this shit!
Remember when Ronnie died and you said you wished it was me? (Hehe)
Well, guess what? I am dead-dead to you as can be!

I'm sorry, Mama
I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet (One more time!)
I said I'm sorry, Mama
I never meant to hurt you
I never meant to make you cry
But tonight I'm cleanin' out my closet",873
833,998,Poker Face,pop,Lady Gaga,2008,2466148,{},"
Mum mum mum mah
Mum mum mum mah
Mum mum mum mah
Mum mum mum mah
Mum mum mum mah


I wanna hold 'em like they do in Texas, please (Woo)
Fold 'em, let 'em hit me, raise it, baby, stay with me (I love it)
LoveGame intuition, play the cards with spades to start
And after he's been hooked, I'll play the one that's on his heart


Oh, woah-oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
I'll get him hot, show him what I've got
Oh, woah-oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
I'll get him hot, show him what I've got

Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)


P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)


I wanna roll with him, a hard pair we will be (Woo)
A little gamblin' is fun when you're with me (I love it, woo)
Russian roulette is not the same without a gun
And baby, when it's love, if it's not rough, it isn't fun, fun


Oh, woah-oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
I'll get him hot, show him what I've got
Oh, woah-oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
I'll get him hot, show him what I've got

Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)


P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)
(Mum mum mum mah)
(Mum mum mum mah)


I won't tell you that I love you
Kiss or hug you
'Cause I'm bluffin' with my muffin
I'm not lyin', I'm just stunnin' with my love-glue-gunnin'
Just like a chick in the casino
Take your bank before I pay you out
I promise this, promise this
Check this hand 'cause I'm marvelous

Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)
Can't read my, can't read my
No, he can't read my poker face
(She's got me like nobody)


P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(She's got me like nobody)
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)
P-p-p-poker face, f-f-fuck her face
(Mum mum mum mah)",1316
858,1026,Shook Ones Part II,rap,Mobb Deep,1995,1598277,{},"
Word up son, word
Yeah, to all the killers and a hundred dollar billers
Yo I got the phone thing, know I'm sayin', keep your eyes open
For real niggas who ain't got no feelings
Keep your eyes open
No doubt, no doubt son, I got this, I got this
Just watch my back, I got the front, yo
Check it out now
Word up, say it to them niggas, check this out it's a murder


I got you stuck off the realness, we be the infamous
You heard of us, official Queensbridge murderers
The Mobb comes equipped for warfare, beware
Of my crime family who got 'nough shots to share
For all of those who wanna profile and pose
Rock you in your face, stab your brain with your nose bone
You all alone in these streets, cousin
Every man for they self in this land we be gunnin'
And keep them shook crews runnin', like they supposed to
They come around, but they never come close to
I can see it inside your face, you're in the wrong place
Cowards like you just get they whole body laced up
With bullet holes and such
Speak the wrong words, man, and you will get touched
You can put your whole army against my team and
I guarantee you it'll be your very last time breathin'
Your simple words just don't move me
You're minor, we're major
You're all up in the game and don't deserve to be a player
Don't make me have to call your name out
Your crew is featherweight, my gunshots'll make you levitate
I'm only nineteen, but my mind is old
And when the things get for real, my warm heart turns cold
Another nigga deceased, another story gets told
It ain't nothin' really, ayo Dun, spark the Philly
So I can get my mind off these yellow-backed niggas
Why they still alive? I don't know, go figure
Meanwhile back in Queens the realness and foundation
If I die, I couldn't choose a better location
When the slugs penetrate, you feel a burnin' sensation
Gettin' closer to God in a tight situation now
Take these words home and think it through
Or the next rhyme I write might be about you

Son, they shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
Scared to death, scared to look, they shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
Scared to death, scared to look
Livin' the life that of diamonds and guns
There's numerous ways you can choose to earn funds
So some get shot, locked down, and turn nuns
Cowardly hearts and straight up shook ones, shook ones
He ain't a crook, son, he's just a shook one


For every rhyme I write it's twenty-five to life
Yo, it's a must, in gats we trust, safeguardin' my life
Ain't no time for hesitation, that only leads to incarceration
You don't know me, there's no relation
Queensbridge and we don't play
I don't got time for your petty-thinkin' mind
Son, I'm bigger than those
Claimin' that you pack heat, but you're scared to hold
And once the smoke clears, you'll be left with one in your dome
Thirteen years in the projects-my mentality is what, kid?
You talk a good one, but you don't want it
Sometimes I wonder, do I deserve to live?
Or am I gonna burn in Hell for all the things I did?
No time to dwell on that, 'cause my brain reacts
Front if you want, kid, lay on your back
I don't fake jax, kid, you know I bring it to you live
Stay in a child's place, kid, you out of line
Criminal minds thirsty for recognition
I'm sippin', E&J got my mind flippin'
I'm buggin', diggin' my ways out of holes by hustlin'
Get that loot, kid, you know my function
'Cause long as I'm alive, I'ma live illegal
And once I get on, I'ma put on all my peoples
React quick, spit lyrics like MACs, I hit your dome up
When I roll up, don't be caught sleepin', 'cause I'm creepin'

Son, they shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
Scared to death, scared to look, they shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
Scared to death, scared to look, they shook
(We live the life that of diamonds)
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
Scared to death, scared to look, they shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
Livin' the life that of diamonds and guns
There's numerous ways you can choose to earn funds
So some get shot, locked down, and turn nuns
Cowardly hearts and straight up shook ones, shook ones
He ain't a crook, son, he's just a shook one


To all the villains and a hundred dollar billers
To real brothers who ain't got no feelings
G-yeah, the whole Bridge
Queens get the money
41st side, keepin' it real, you know
Queens get the money

",988
875,1046,Sing for the Moment,rap,Eminem,2002,1177104,{},"
These ideas are nightmares to white parents
Whose worst fear is a child with dyed hair and who likes earrings
Like whatever they say has no bearing
It's so scary in a house that allows no swearing
To see him walkin' around with his headphones blarin'
Alone in his own zone, cold and he don't care, he's
A problem child, and what bothers him all comes out
When he talks about his fuckin' dad walkin' out (Bitch!)
'Cause he hates him so bad that he blocks him out
If he ever saw him again he'd probably knock him out
His thoughts are wacked, he's mad so he's talkin' back
Talkin' black, brainwashed from rock and rap
He sags his pants, do-rags and a stockin' cap
His stepfather hit him so he socked him back
And broke his nose, his house is a broken home
There's no control, he just lets his emotions go


(Come on!) Sing with me (Sing!), sing for the year (Sing it!)
Sing for the laughter and sing for the tear (Come on!)
Sing it with me, it's just for today
Maybe tomorrow the good Lord will take you away

Entertainment is changin', intertwinin' with gangsters
In the land of the killers, a sinner's mind is a sanctum
Holy or unholy, only have one homie
Only this gun, lonely 'cause don't anyone know me
Yet everybody just feels like they can relate (Huh-uh)
I guess words are a motherfucker, they can be great
Or they can degrade, or even worse, they can teach hate
It's like these kids hang on every single statement we make
Like they worship us, plus all the stores ship us platinum
Now how the fuck did this metamorphosis happen?
From standin' on corners and porches just rappin'
To havin' a fortune, no more kissin' ass
But then these critics crucify you (Yep), journalists try to burn you
Fans turn on you, attorneys all want a turn at you
To get they hands on every dime you have
They want you to lose your mind every time you mad
So they can try to make you out to look like a loose cannon
Any dispute won't hesitate to produce handguns
That's why these prosecutors wanna convict me
Strictly just to get me off of these streets quickly
But all they kids be listenin' to me religiously
So I'm signin' CDs while police fingerprint me
They're for the judge's daughter, but his grudge is against me
If I'm such a fuckin' menace, this shit doesn't make sense, B
It's all political, if my music is literal
And I'm a criminal, how the fuck can I raise a little girl?
I couldn't, I wouldn't be fit to
You're full of shit too, Guerrera, that was a fist that hit you! (Bitch!)

(Come on!) Sing with me (Sing!), sing for the year (Sing it!)
Sing for the laughter and sing for the tear (Sing that shit!)
Sing it with me, it's just for today
Maybe tomorrow the good Lord will take you away


They say music can alter moods and talk to you
Well, can it load a gun up for you and cock it too?
Well, if it can, then the next time you assault a dude
Just tell the judge it was my fault and I'll get sued
See, what these kids do is hear about us totin' pistols
And they wanna get one 'cause they think the shit's cool
Not knowin' we really just protectin' ourselves
We entertainers, of course the shit's affectin' our sales
You ignoramus, but music is reflection of self
We just explain it, and then we get our checks in the mail
It's fucked up, ain't it? How we can come from practically nothin'
To bein' able to have any fuckin' thing that we wanted
That's why we sing for these kids who don't have a thing
Except for a dream and a fuckin' rap magazine (Ha-ha!)
Who post pin-up pictures on they walls all day long
Idolize they favorite rappers and know all they songs
Or for anyone who's ever been through shit in they lives
So they sit and they cry at night, wishin' they'd die
'Til they throw on a rap record and they sit and they vibe
We're nothin' to you, but we're the fuckin' shit in they eyes
That's why we seize the moment, try to freeze it and own it
Squeeze it and hold it 'cause we consider these minutes golden
And maybe they'll admit it when we're gone
Just let our spirits live on
Through our lyrics that you hear in our songs, and we can-

Sing with me (Sing!), sing for the year (Sing it!)
Sing for the laughter and sing for the tear (Come on!)
Sing it with me, it's just for today
Maybe tomorrow the good Lord will take you away


Sing with me (Sing!), sing for the year (Sing it!)
Sing for the laughter and sing for the tear (Come on!)
Sing it with me, it's just for today
Maybe tomorrow the good Lord will take you away",1010
911,1092,Hotel California,rock,Eagles,1976,2326328,{},"
On a dark desert highway
Cool wind in my hair
Warm smell of colitas
Rising up through the air
Up ahead in the distance
I saw a shimmering light
My head grew heavy and my sight grew dim
I had to stop for the night


There she stood in the doorway
I heard the mission bell
And I was thinkin' to myself
""This could be Heaven or this could be Hell""
Then she lit up a candle
And she showed me the way
There were voices down the corridor
I thought I heard them say


""Welcome to the Hotel California
Such a lovely place (Such a lovely place)
Such a lovely face
Plenty of room at the Hotel California
Any time of year (Any time of year)
You can find it here""

Her mind is Tiffany-twisted
She got the Mercedes bends, uh
She got a lot of pretty, pretty boys
That she calls friends
How they dance in the courtyard
Sweet summer sweat
Some dance to remember
Some dance to forget


So I called up the Captain
""Please bring me my wine""
He said, ""We haven't had that spirit here
Since 1969""
And still those voices are callin'
From far away
Wake you up in the middle of the night
Just to hear them say


""Welcome to the Hotel California
Such a lovely place (Such a lovely place)
Such a lovely face
They livin' it up at the Hotel California
What a nice surprise (What a nice surprise)
Bring your alibis""

Mirrors on the ceiling
The pink champagne on ice, and she said
""We are all just prisoners here
Of our own device""
And in the master's chambers
They gathered for the feast
They stab it with their steely knives
But they just can't kill the beast


Last thing I remember, I was
Running for the door
I had to find the passage back
To the place I was before
""Relax,"" said the night man
""We are programmed to receive
You can check out any time you like
But you can never leave""

",1060
912,1093,Stairway to Heaven,rock,Led Zeppelin,1971,1739568,{},"


There's a lady who's sure all that glitters is gold
And she's buying a stairway to Heaven
When she gets there she knows, if the stores are all closed
With a word she can get what she came for
Ooh, ooh, and she's buying a stairway to Heaven
There's a sign on the wall, but she wants to be sure
'Cause you know sometimes words have two meanings
In a tree by the brook, there's a songbird who sings
Sometimes all of our thoughts are misgiven


Ooh, it  makes me wonder
Ooh, makes me wonder


There's a feeling I get when I look to the West
And my spirit is crying for leaving
In my thoughts I have seen rings of smoke through the trees
And the voices of those who stand looking

Ooh, it makes me wonder
Ooh, really makes me wonder


And it's whispered that soon if we all call the tune
Then the piper will lead us to reason
And a new day will dawn for those who stand long
And the forests will echo with laughter


Oh-oh-oh-oh-woahhh


If there's a bustle in your hedgerow, don't be alarmed now
It's just a spring clean for the May queen
Yes, there are two paths you can go by, but in the long run
There's still time to change the road you're on


And it makes me wonder
Ohh, woah


Your head is humming, and it won't go, in case you don't know
The piper's calling you to join him
Dear lady, can you hear the wind blow? And did you know
Your stairway lies on the whispering wind?



And as we wind on down the road
Our shadows taller than our soul
There walks a lady we all know
Who shines white light and wants to show
How everything still turns to gold
And if you listen very hard
The tune will come to you at last
When all are one, and one is all
To be a rock and not to roll


And she's buying a stairway to Heaven",1061
969,1169,Monster,rap,Kanye West,2010,4674807,"{JAY-Z,""Rick Ross"",""Nicki Minaj"",""Bon Iver""}","
I shoot the lights out
Hide 'til it's bright out
Oh, just another lonely night
Are you willing to sacrifice your life?


Bitch, I'm a monster, no-good bloodsucker
Fat motherfucker, now look who's in trouble
As you run through my jungles, all you hear is rumbles
Kanye West samples, here's one for example


Gossip, gossip, nigga, just stop it
Everybody know I'm a motherfuckin' monster
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
Profit, profit, nigga, I got it
Everybody know I'm a motherfuckin' monster
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands

Uh, the best living or dead hands down, huh
Less talk, more head right now, huh
And my eyes more red than the devil is
And I'm 'bout to take it to another level, bitch
Matter who you go and get, ain't nobody cold as this
Do the rap and the track, triple-double, no assists
And my only focus is stayin' on some bogus shit
Arguin' with my older bitch, actin' like I owe her shit
I heard the beat, the same raps that gave the track pain
Bought the chain that always give me back pain
Fucking up my money so, yeah, I had to act sane
Chi nigga, but these hoes love my accent
Chick came up to me and said, ""This the number to dial
If you wanna make your number one your number two now""
Mix that Goose and Malibu, I call it ""Malibooyah""
Goddamn, Yeezy always hit 'em with a new style
Know that motherfucker, well, what you gon' do now?
Whatever I wanna do, gosh, it's cool now
Know I'm gonna do, ah, it's the new now
Think you motherfuckers really really need to cool out
'Cause you'll never get on top of this
So, mami, best advice is just to get on top of this
Have you ever had sex with a pharaoh?
Ah, put the pussy in a sarcophagus
Now she claiming that I bruised her esophagus
Head of the class and she just won a swallowship
I'm livin' in the future so the present is my past
My presence is a present, kiss my ass

Gossip, gossip, nigga, just stop it
Everybody know I'm a motherfuckin' monster
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert (Yeah)
Profit, profit, nigga, I got it
Everybody know I'm a motherfuckin' monster
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands


Sasquatch, Godzilla, King Kong, Loch Ness
Goblin, ghoul, a zombie with no conscience
Question, what do these things all have in common?
Everybody knows I'm a motherfuckin' monster
Conquer, stomp ya, stop your silly nonsense
Nonsense, none of you niggas know where the swamp is
None of you niggas have seen the carnage that I've seen
I still hear fiends scream in my dreams
Murder, murder in black convertibles, I
Kill a block, I murder the avenues, I
Rape and pillage your village, women and children
Everybody want to know what my Achilles heel is
Love, I don't get enough of it
All I get is these vampires and bloodsuckers
All I see is these niggas I made millionaires
Millin' about, spillin' they feelings in the air
All I see is these fake fucks with no fangs
Tryna draw blood from my ice-cold veins
I smell a massacre
Seems to be the only way to back you bastards up

Gossip, gossip, nigga, just stop it
Everybody know I'm a motherfuckin' monster
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
Profit, profit, nigga, I got it
Everybody know I'm a motherfuckin' monster
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands at the concert
I'ma need to see your fuckin' hands


Pull up in the monster, automobile gangsta
With a bad bitch that came from Sri Lanka
Yeah, I'm in that Tonka, color of Willy Wonka
You could be the king, but watch the queen conquer
Okay, first things first, I'll eat your brains
Then I'ma start rocking gold teeth and fangs
'Cause that's what a motherfuckin' monster do
Hair dresser from Milan, that's the monster 'do
Monster Giuseppe heel, that's the monster shoe
Young Money is the roster and a monster crew
And I'm all up, all up, all up in the bank with the funny face
And if I'm fake, I ain't notice 'cause my money ain't
So let me get this straight, wait, I'm the rookie?
But my features and my shows ten times your pay?
50K for a verse, no album out
Yeah, my money's so tall that my Barbies got to climb it
Hotter than a Middle Eastern climate, violent
Tony Matterhorn, dutty wine it, wine it
Nicki on them titties when I sign it
That's how these niggas so one-track-minded
But really, really I don't give an F-U-C-K
""Forget Barbie, fuck Nicki, sh-she's fake""
""She on a diet,"" but my pockets eatin' cheesecake
And I'll say, bride of Chucky, it's child's play
Just killed another career, it's a mild day
Besides, Ye, they can't stand besides me
I think me, you, and Am' should ménage Friday
Pink wig, thick ass, give 'em whiplash
I think big, get cash, make 'em blink fast
Now look at what you just saw, this is what you live for
Ah, I'm a motherfuckin' monster


I, I crossed the limelight
And I'll, I'll let God decide
And I, I wouldn't last these shows
So I, I am headed home (Headed home)
I, I crossed the limelight
And I'll, I'll let God decide, 'cide (No)
And I, I wouldn't last these shows
So I, I am headed home (Head home)
I, I crossed the limelight (No, the limelight)
And I'll, I'll let God decide, 'cide
And I, I wouldn't last these shows
So I, I am headed home


",1149
997,1212,The Way I Am,rap,Eminem,2000,1383739,{},"
...Man, whatever


Dre, just let it run
Ayo, turn the beat up a little bit
Ayo
This song is for anyone
Fuck it, shut up and listen
Ayo


I sit back with this pack of Zig-Zag's and this bag
Of this weed, it gives me the shit needed to be
The most meanest MC on this, on this Earth
And since birth I've been cursed with this curse to just curse
And just blurt this berserk and bizarre shit that works
And it sells and it helps in itself to relieve
All this tension, dispensin' these sentences
Gettin' this stress that's been eatin' me recently off
Of this chest and I rest again peacefully (Peacefully)
But at least have the decency in you
To leave me alone, when you freaks see me out
In the streets when I'm eatin' or feedin' my daughter
To not come and speak to me (Speak to me), I don't know you
And no, I don't owe you a motherfuckin' thing
I'm not Mr. N'Sync, I'm not what your friends think
I'm not Mr. Friendly, I can be a prick
If you tempt me, my tank is on empty (Is on empty)
No patience is in me and if you offend me
I'm liftin' you ten feet (Liftin' you ten feet) in the air
I don't care who was there and who saw me just jaw you
Go call you a lawyer, file you a lawsuit
I'll smile in the courtroom and buy you a wardrobe
I'm tired of all you (Of all you), I don't mean to be mean
But that's all I can be, it's just me

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
'Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, that's just the way I am


Sometimes I just feel like my father, I hate to be bothered
With all of this nonsense, it's constant
And, ""Oh, it's his lyrical content
The song 'Guilty Conscience' has gotten such rotten responses.""
And all of this controversy circles me
And it seems like the media immediately
Points a finger at me (Finger at me)
So I point one back at 'em, but not the index or pinkie
Or the ring or the thumb, it's the one you put up
When you don't give a fuck, when you won't just put up
With the bullshit they pull, 'cause they full of shit too
When a dude's gettin' bullied and shoots up his school
And they blame it on Marilyn (On Marilyn) and the heroin
Where were the parents at? And look where it's at!
Middle America, now it's a tragedy
Now it's so sad to see, an upper-class city
Havin' this happenin' (This happenin') then attack
Eminem 'cause I rap this way (Rap this way) but I'm glad
'Cause they feed me the fuel that I need for the fire to burn
And it's burnin', and I have returned

And I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
'Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, that's just the way I am


I'm so sick and tired of bein' admired
That I wish that I would just die or get fired
And dropped from my label, let's stop with the fables
I'm not gonna be able to top a ""My Name Is""
And pigeon-holed into some poppy sensation
To cop me rotation at rock 'n' roll stations
And I just do not got the patience (Got the patience)
To deal with these cocky Caucasians
Who think I'm some wigger who just tries to be black 'cause I talk
With an accent and grab on my balls so they always
Keep askin' the same fuckin' questions (Fuckin' questions)
What school did I go to, what hood I grew up in
The why, the who, what, when, the where and the how
'Til I'm grabbin' my hair and I'm tearin' it out
'Cause they drivin' me crazy (Drivin' me crazy), I can't take it
I'm racin', I'm pacin', I stand and I sit
And I'm thankful for every fan that I get
But I can't take a shit in the bathroom without
Someone standin' by it! (Standin' by it) No, I won't sign your autograph
You can call me an asshole, I'm glad

'Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
Radio won't even play my jam
'Cause I am whatever you say I am
If I wasn't, then why would I say I am?
In the paper, the news, every day I am
I don't know, that's just the way I am

",1197
1005,1222,Devil In a New Dress,rap,Kanye West,2010,1733723,"{""Rick Ross""}","


Uh
Uh
I love it, though
I love it, though, huh, you know?


Uh, put your hands to the constellations
The way you look should be a sin, you my sensation
I know I'm preachin' to the congregation
We love Jesus, but you done learned a lot from Satan
I mean, a nigga did a lot of waiting
We ain't married, but tonight I need some consummation


May the Lord forgive us, may the gods be with us
In that magic hour, I seen good Christians
Make brash decisions, oh, she do it
What happened to religion? Oh, she lose it
She putting on her makeup, she casually allure
Text message break-ups, the casualty of tour
How she gon' wake up and not love me no more?
I thought I was the asshole, I guess it's rubbin' off
Hood phenomenon, the LeBron of rhyme
Hard to be humble when you stunting on a jumbotron
I'm looking at her like, ""This what you really wanted, huh?""
Why we argue anyway? Oh, I forgot, it's summertime

Put your hands to the constellations
The way you look should be a sin, you my sensation
I know I'm preachin' to the congregation
We love Jesus, but she done learned a lot from Satan
Satan, Satan, Satan
I mean, a nigga did a lot of waiting
We ain't married, but tonight I need some consummation


When the sun go down, it's the magic hour, the magic hour
And outta all the colors that'll fill up the skies
You got green on your mind, I can see it in your eyes
Why you standing there with your face screwed up?
Don't leave while you're hot, that's how Mase screwed up
Throwin' shit around, the whole place screwed up
Maybe I should call Mase so he could pray for us
I hit the Jamaican spot, at the bar, take a seat
I ordered the jerk, she said you are what you eat
You see, I always loved that sense of humor
But tonight, you should have seen how quiet the room was
The Lyor Cohen of Dior Homme
That's ""Dior Homme,"" not ""Dior, homie""
The crib Scarface, could it be more Tony?
You love me for me, could you be more phony?

Put your hands to the constellations
The way you look should be a sin, you my sensation
Haven't said a word, haven't said a word to me this evening
Cat got your tongue?




Lookin' at my bitch, I bet she give your ass a bone
Lookin' at my wrist, it'll turn your ass to stone
Stretch limousine, sipping rosé all alone
Double-headed monster with a mind of his own
Cherry-red chariot, excess is just my character
All-black tux, nigga's shoes lavender
I never needed acceptance from all you outsiders
Had cyphers with Yeezy before his mouth wired (Uh)
Before his jaw shattered, climbing up the Lord's ladder
We still speedin', running signs like they don't matter, uh
Hater talkin' never made me mad
Never that, not when I'm in my favorite paper tag
Therefore, G4s at the Clearport
When it come to tools, fool, I'm a Pep Boy
When it came to dope, I was quick to export
Never tired of ballin', so it's on to the next sport
New Mercedes sedan, the Lex' sport
So many cars, DMV thought it was mail fraud
Different traps I was gettin' mail from
Polk County, Jacksonville, right in Melbourne
Whole clique appetites had tapeworms
Spinnin' Teddy Pendergrass vinyl as my J burns
I shed a tear before the night's over
God bless the man I put this ice over (Uh)
Getting 2Pac money twice over
Still a real nigga, red Coogi sweater, dice-roller
I'm makin' love to the angel of death
Catchin' feelings, never stumble, retracin' my steps (Uh)
Uh",1207
1027,1253,Hallelujah,rock,Leonard Cohen,1984,3810370,{},"
Now I've heard there was a secret chord
That David played, and it pleased the Lord
But you don't really care for music, do ya?
It goes like this, the fourth, the fifth
The minor fall, the major lift
The baffled king composing ""Hallelujah""


Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah


Your faith was strong but you needed proof
You saw her bathing on the roof
Her beauty in the moonlight overthrew ya
She tied you to a kitchen chair
She broke your throne, and she cut your hair
And from your lips she drew the Hallelujah


Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah

You say I took the name in vain
I don't even know the name
But if I did, well really, what's it to ya?
There's a blaze of light in every word
It doesn't matter which you heard
The holy or the broken Hallelujah


Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah


I did my best, it wasn't much
I couldn't feel, so I tried to touch
I've told the truth, I didn't come to fool ya
And even though it all went wrong
I'll stand before the lord of song
With nothing on my tongue but hallelujah


Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah
Hallelujah, Hallelujah

Hallelujah, Hallelujah



Baby, I've been here before
I know this room, I've walked this floor
I used to live alone before I knew you
And I've seen your flag on the marble arch
Love is not a victory march
It's a cold and it's a broken Hallelujah


There was a time you let me know
What's really going on below
But now you never show it to me, do you?
And remember when I moved in you
The holy dove was moving too
And every breath we drew was Hallelujah


Maybe there's a God above
But all I've ever learned from love
Was how to shoot at someone who outdrew you
And it's not a cry that you hear at night
It's not somebody who's seen the light
It's a cold and it's a broken Hallelujah",1237
1029,1255,When Im Gone,rap,Eminem,2005,1494728,{},"
Yeah, it's my life
In my own words, I guess


Have you ever loved someone so much, you'd give an arm for?
Not the expression, no, literally give an arm for
When they know they're your heart and you know you are their armor
And you will destroy anyone who would try to harm her
But what happens when karma turns right around to bite you?
And everything you stand for turns on you to spite you?
What happens when you become the main source of her pain?
""Daddy, look what I made!"" ""Dad's gotta go catch a plane""
""Daddy, where's Mommy? I can't find Mommy, where is she?""
""I don't know, go play, Hailie, baby, your daddy's busy
Daddy's writin' a song, this song ain't gon' write itself
I'll give you one underdog, then you gotta swing by yourself""
Then turn right around on that song and tell her you love her
And put hands on her mother who's a spitting image of her
That's Slim Shady, yeah, baby, Slim Shady's crazy
Shady made me, but tonight Shady's rock-a-bye baby, ha

And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm lookin' down on you smilin'
And I didn't feel a thing
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back
And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm lookin' down on you smilin'
And I didn't feel a thing
So, baby, don't feel my pain, just smile back


I keep havin' this dream, I'm pushin' Hailie on the swing
She keeps screamin' she don't want me to sing
""You're makin' Mommy cry, why? Why is Mommy cryin'?""
""Baby, Daddy ain't leavin' no more"" ""Daddy, you're lyin'!
You always say that, you always say this is the last time
But you ain't leavin' no more, Daddy, you're mine!""
She's pilin' boxes in front of the door, tryna block it
""Daddy, please! Daddy, don't leave! Daddy, no, stop it!""
Goes in her pocket, pulls out a tiny necklace locket
It's got a picture, ""This'll keep you safe, Daddy, take it wit' ya!""
I look up, it's just me standin' in the mirror
These fuckin' walls must be talkin' 'cause, man, I can hear 'em
They're sayin', ""You got one more chance to do right and it's tonight
Now go out there and show 'em that you love 'em 'fore it's too late.""
And just as I go to walk out of my bedroom door
It turns to a stage, they're gone and the spotlight is on and I'm singin'

And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm lookin' down on you smilin'
And I didn't feel a thing
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back
And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm lookin' down on you smilin'
And I didn't feel a thing
So, baby, don't feel my pain, just smile back


Sixty-thousand people all jumpin' out their seat
The curtain closes, they're throwin' roses at my feet
I take a bow and ""Thank you all for comin' out""
They're screamin' so loud, I take one last look at the crowd
I glance down, I don't believe what I'm seein'
""Daddy, it's me! Help Mommy, her wrists are bleedin'!""
""But baby, we're in Sweden, how did you get to Sweden?""
""I followed you, Daddy, you told me that you weren't leavin'
You lied to me, Dad, and now you made Mommy sad
And I bought you this coin, it says 'Number One Dad'
That's all I wanted, I just wanna give you this coin
I get the point, fine, me and Mommy are goin'.""
""But baby, wait!"" - ""It's too late, Dad, you made the choice
Now go up there and show 'em that you love 'em more than us
That's what they want, they want you, Marshall, they keep
Screamin' your name, it's no wonder you can't go to sleep
Just take another pill, yeah, I bet you you will
You rap about it, yeah, word, kid, keep it real.""
I hear applause, all this time I couldn't see
How could it be that the curtain is closin' on me?
I turn around, find a gun on the ground, cock it
Put it to my brain, scream, ""Die, Shady!"" and pop it
The sky darkens, my life flashes, the plane that I was
Supposed to be on crashes and burns to ashes
That's when I wake up, alarm clock's ringin', there's birds singin'
It's spring and Hailie's outside swingin'
I walk right up to Kim and kiss her, tell her I miss her
Hailie just smiles and winks at her little sister, almost as if to say

And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm lookin' down on you smilin'
And I didn't feel a thing
So, baby, don't feel no pain, just smile back
And when I'm gone, just carry on, don't mourn
Rejoice every time you hear the sound of my voice
Just know that I'm lookin' down on you smilin'
And I didn't feel a thing
So, baby, don't feel my pain, just smile back

*Curtains closing*",1239
1056,1296,Gold Digger,rap,Kanye West,2005,2044039,"{""Jamie Foxx""}","


She take my money when I'm in need
Yeah, she's a triflin' friend indeed
Oh, she's a gold digger
Way over town that digs on me
(Uh)


(She give me money) Now, I ain't sayin' she a gold digger
(When I'm in need) But she ain't messin' with no broke niggas
(She give me money) Now, I ain't sayin' she a gold digger
(When I'm in need) But she ain't messin' with no broke niggas


(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head

Cutie the bomb, met her at a beauty salon
With a baby Louis Vuitton under her underarm
She said: ""I can tell you rock, I can tell by your charm
Far as girls, you got a flock
I can tell by your charm and your arm""
But I'm lookin' for the one, have you seen her?
My psychic told me she'll have a ass like Serena
Trina, Jennifer Lopez, four kids
And I gotta take all they bad asses to ShowBiz?
Okay, get your kids, but then they got their friends
I pulled up in the Benz, they all got up in
We all went to din' and then I had to pay
If you fuckin' with this girl, then you better be paid
You know why? It take too much to touch her
From what I heard she got a baby by Busta
My best friend said she used to fuck with Usher
I don't care what none of y'all say, I still love her


(She give me money) Now, I ain't sayin' she a gold digger
(When I'm in need) But she ain't messin' with no broke niggas
(She give me money) Now, I ain't sayin' she a gold digger
(When I'm in need) But she ain't messin' with no broke niggas


(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head

Eighteen years, eighteen years
She got one of your kids, got you for eighteen years
I know somebody payin' child support for one of his kids
His baby mama car and crib is bigger than his
You will see him on TV any given Sunday
Win the Super Bowl and drive off in a Hyundai
She was supposed to buy your shorty Tyco with your money
She went to the doctor, got lipo with your money
She walkin' around lookin' like Michael with your money
Shoulda got that insured, Geico for your money
If you ain't no punk
Holla, ""We want prenup! We want prenup!"" (Yeah!)
It's somethin' that you need to have
'Cause when she leave yo' ass, she gon' leave with half
Eighteen years, eighteen years
And on the eighteenth birthday, he found out it wasn't his?


(She give me money) Now, I ain't sayin' she a gold digger
(When I'm in need) But she ain't messin' with no broke niggas
(She give me money) Now, I ain't sayin' she a gold digger
(When I'm in need) But she ain't messin' with no broke niggas


(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head

Now, I ain't sayin' you a gold digger, you got needs
You don't want a dude to smoke, but he can't buy weed
You go out to eat, he can't pay, y'all can't leave
There's dishes in the back, he gotta roll up his sleeves
But while y'all washin', watch him
He gon' make it to a Benz out of that Datsun
He got that ambition, baby, look at his eyes
This week he moppin' floors, next week it's the fries
So stick by his side
I know there's dudes ballin', and yeah, that's nice
And they gonna keep callin' and tryin', but you stay right, girl
And when he get on, he'll leave yo' ass for a white girl


(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head, get down
(I gotta leave) Get down girl, go 'head


Let me hear that back",1267
1080,1325,Runaway,rap,Kanye West,2010,2556648,"{""Pusha T""}","


Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya, look at ya
Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya, look at ya
Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya, look at ya
Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya, look at ya (Ladies and gentlemen, ladies, ladies and gentlemen)


And I always find, yeah, I always find something wrong
You been puttin' up with my shit just way too long
I'm so gifted at finding what I don't like the most
So I think it's time for us to have a toast


Let's have a toast for the douchebags
Let's have a toast for the assholes
Let's have a toast for the scumbags
Every one of them that I know
Let's have a toast for the jerk-offs
That'll never take work off
Baby, I got a plan
Run away fast as you can

She find pictures in my email
I sent this bitch a picture of my dick
I don't know what it is with females
But I'm not too good at that shit
See, I could have me a good girl
And still be addicted to them hoodrats
And I just blame everything on you
At least you know that's what I'm good at


And I always find, yeah, I always find
Yeah, I always find something wrong
You been puttin' up with my shit just way too long
I'm so gifted at finding what I don't like the most
So I think it's time for us to have a toast


Let's have a toast for the douchebags
Let's have a toast for the assholes
Let's have a toast for the scumbags
Every one of them that I know
Let's have a toast for the jerk-offs
That'll never take work off
Baby, I got a plan
Run away fast as you can

Run away from me, baby
Ah, run away
Run away from me, baby (Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya)
Run away
When it starts to get crazy (Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya)
Then run away
Babe, I got a plan, run away as fast as you can
Run away from me, baby
Run away
Run away from me, baby (Look at, look at, look at, look at, look at, look at, look at ya)
Run away
When it starts to get crazy (Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya, look at ya)
Why can't she just run away?
Baby, I got a plan
Run away as fast as you can (Look at ya, look at ya, look at ya)


Twenty-four seven, three sixty-five, pussy stays on my mind
I-I-I-I did it, alright, alright, I admit it
Now pick your next move, you could leave or live with it
Ichabod Crane with that motherfuckin' top off
Split and go where? Back to wearing knockoffs?
Haha, knock it off, Neimans, shop it off
Let's talk over mai tais, waitress, top it off
Hoes like vultures, wanna fly in your Freddy loafers
You can't blame 'em, they ain't never seen Versace sofas
Every bag, every blouse, every bracelet
Comes with a price tag, baby, face it
You should leave if you can't accept the basics
Plenty hoes in the baller-nigga matrix
Invisibly set, the Rolex is faceless
I'm just young, rich, and tasteless, P

Never was much of a romantic
I could never take the intimacy
And I know I did damage
'Cause the look in your eyes is killing me
I guess you knew of that advantage
'Cause you could blame me for everything
And I don't know how I'ma manage
If one day, you just up and leave


And I always find, yeah, I always find something wrong
You been puttin' up with my shit just way too long
I'm so gifted at finding what I don't like the most
So I think it's time for us to have a toast


Let's have a toast for the douchebags
Let's have a toast for the assholes
Let's have a toast for the scumbags
Every one of them that I know
Let's have a toast for the jerk-offs
That'll never take work off
Baby, I got a plan
Run away fast as you can


",1295
1093,1346,Bad Romance,pop,Lady Gaga,2009,1228897,{},"
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
Caught in a bad romance
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
Caught in a bad romance
Ra-ra-ah-ah-ah
Roma Roma-ma
Gaga, ""Ooh la-la""
Want your bad romance
Ra-ra-ah-ah-ah
Roma, Roma-ma
Gaga, ""Ooh la-la""
Want your bad romance


I want your ugly, I want your disease
I want your everything as long as it's free
I want your love
Love, love, love, I want your love, oh, ey
I want your drama, the touch of your hand (Hey!)
I want your leather-studded kiss in the sand
I want your love
Love, love, love, I want your love
(Love, love, love, I want your love)

You know that I want you
And you know that I need you
I want it bad
Your bad romance


I want your love, and I want your revenge
You and me could write a bad romance (Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want your love, and all your lover's revenge
You and me could write a bad romance
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
Caught in a bad romance
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
Caught in a bad romance


Ra-ra-ah-ah-ah
Roma-roma-ma
Gaga, ""Ooh la-la""
Want your bad romance


I want your horror, I want your design
'Cause you're a criminal as long as you're mine
I want your love
Love, love, love, I want your love, uh
I want your psycho, your vertigo schtick (Hey!)
Want you in my rear window, baby, you're sick
I want your love
Love, love, love, I want your love
(Love, love, love, I want your love)

You know that I want you
And you know that I need you ('Cause I'm a free bitch, baby)
I want it bad
Your bad romance


I want your love, and I want your revenge
You and me could write a bad romance (Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want your love, and all your lover's revenge
You and me could write a bad romance
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
Caught in a bad romance
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
Caught in a bad romance


Ra-ra-ah-ah-ah
Roma-roma-ma
Gaga, ""Ooh la-la""
Want your bad romance
Ra-ra-ah-ah-ah
Roma-roma-ma
Gaga, ""Ooh la-la""
Want your bad romance

Walk, walk, fashion, baby
Work it, move that bitch crazy
Walk, walk, fashion, baby
Work it, move that bitch crazy
Walk, walk, fashion, baby
Work it, move that bitch crazy
Walk, walk, passion, baby
Work it, I'm a free bitch, baby


I want your love, and I want your revenge
I want your love, I don't wanna be friends
Je veux ton amour et je veux ta revanche
Je veux ton amour, I don't wanna be friends
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh)
(I want you back) No, I don't wanna be friends
(Caught in a bad romance) I don't wanna be friends
Want your bad romance
(Caught in a bad romance) Want your bad romance


I want your love, and I want your revenge
You and me could write a bad romance (Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want your love, and all your lover's revenge
You and me could write a bad romance
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
(Want your bad romance)
Caught in a bad romance (Want your bad romance)
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh
(Want your bad romance)
Caught in a bad romance


Ra-ra-ah-ah-ah
Roma, Roma-ma
Gaga, ""Ooh la-la""
Want your bad romance",1313
1117,1379,Gangstas Paradise,rap,Coolio,1995,2140572,"{""L.V. (South Central Cartel)""}","


As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
I take a look at my life and realize there's nothin' left
'Cause I've been blastin' and laughin' so long, that
Even my momma thinks that my mind is gone
But I ain't never crossed a man that didn't deserve it
Me be treated like a punk, you know that's unheard of
You better watch how you talkin' and where you walkin'
Or you and your homies might be lined in chalk
I really hate to trip, but I gotta loc
As they croak, I see myself in the pistol smoke
Fool, I'm the kinda G the little homies wanna be like
On my knees in the night, sayin' prayers in the streetlight


Been spendin' most their lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Been spendin' most their lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Keep spendin' most our lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Keep spendin' most our lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise

Look at the situation they got me facin'
I can't live a normal life, I was raised by the street
So I gotta be down with the hood team
Too much television watchin' got me chasin' dreams
I'm a educated fool with money on my mind
Got my ten in my hand and a gleam in my eye
I'm a loc'd out gangsta, set trippin' banger
And my homies is down so don't arouse my anger
Fool, death ain't nothin' but a heart beat away
I'm livin' life do or die, what can I say?
I'm 23 now, but will I live to see 24?
The way things is goin' I don't know


Tell me why are we so blind to see
That the ones we hurt are you and me?


Been spendin' most their lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Been spendin' most their lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Keep spendin' most our lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Keep spendin' most our lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise


Power and the money, money and the power
Minute after minute, hour after hour
Everybody's runnin', but half of them ain't lookin'
It's goin' on in the kitchen, but I don't know what's cookin'
They say I gotta learn, but nobody's here to teach me
If they can't understand it, how can they reach me?
I guess they can't, I guess they won't
I guess they frontin', that's why I know my life is out of luck, fool!

Been spendin' most their lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Been spendin' most their lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Keep spendin' most our lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise
Keep spendin' most our lives livin' in the gangsta's paradise


Tell me why are we so blind to see
That the ones we hurt are you and me?
Tell me why are we so blind to see
That the ones we hurt are you and me?",1352
1118,1380,So Appalled,rap,Kanye West,2010,1511656,"{JAY-Z,""Swizz Beatz"",RZA,""Pusha T"",""CyHi The Prynce""}","


One hand in the air if you don't really care
Two hands in the air if you don't really care
It's like that sometimes, I mean ridiculous
It's like that sometimes, this shit ridiculous
One hand in the air if you don't really care
Middle finger in the air if you don't really care
It's like that sometimes, man, ridiculous
Life can be sometimes ridiculous


I'm so appalled, Spalding, ball
Balding Donald Trump taking dollars from y'all
Baby, you're fired, your girlfriend hired
But if you don't mind, I'ma keep you on call
We above the law, we don't give a fuck 'bout y'all
I got dogs that'll chew a fuckin' hole through the wall
But since they all lovers, I need more rubbers
And if I don't use rubbers, need more covers
Housekeeping, I mean, goddamn
One time, let it be a bad bitch sweeping
That know we get O's like Cheerios
That know because they seen us in the videos
That know the day that you play me
Would be the same day MTV play videos
That was a little joke, voila
Praises due to the most high, Allah
Praises due to the most fly, Prada
Baby, I'm magic, tada
Address me as your highness, high as United
Thirty thousand feet up and you are not invited
Niggas be writing bullshit like they gotta work
Niggas is going through real shit, man, they out of work
That's why another goddamn dance track gotta hurt
That's why I'd rather spit something that got a purp'

Champagne wishes, thirty white bitches
I mean this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous
I mean this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Five-star dishes, different exotic fishes
Man, this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous


How should I begin this? I'm just so offended
How am I even mentioned by all these fuckin' beginners?
I'm so appalled, I might buy the mall
Just to show niggas how much more I have in store
I'm fresher than you all, so I don't have to pause
All of y'all can suck my balls through my drawers
Dark Knight feeling, die and be a hero
Or live long enough to see yourself become a villain
I went from the favorite to the most hated
But would you rather be underpaid or overrated?
Moral victories is for minor league coaches
And Ye already told you we major, you cockroaches
Show me where the boats is, Ferrari Testarossas
And Hammer went broke so you know I'm more focused
I lost thirty mil', so I spent another thirty
'Cause unlike Hammer, thirty million can't hurt me
Fuckin' insane, the fuck am I saying?
Not only am I fly, I'm fuckin' not playing
All these little bitches too big for they britches
Burning they little bridges, fuckin' ridiculous

Champagne wishes, thirty white bitches
I mean this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous
I mean this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Five-star dishes, different exotic fishes
Man, this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous


Success is what you make it, take it how it come
A half a mil' in twenties like a billion where I'm from
An arrogant drug dealer, the legend I become
CNN said I'd be dead by twenty-one
Blackjack, I just pulled an ace
As you looking at the king in his face
Everything I dream, motherfuckers, I'm watchin' it take shape
While to you I'm just a young rich nigga that lacks faith
Range Rove', leather roof, love war, fuck a truce
Still move a bird like I'm in bed with Mother Goose
Them hoes coming in a baker's dozen
Claiming they was with me when they know they really wasn't
I keep the city's best, never said she was the brightest
So if you had her too, it don't affect me in the slightest
I never met a bitch that didn't need a little guidance
So I dismiss her past until she disappoints your highness
I speak the gospel, hostile
Tony doing time for what he did to nostrils
Paranoid mind, I'm still under the watchful
Eye of the law, aspire for more
Them kilos came, we gave you Bobby Brown jaw
Flaws ain't flaws when it's you that makes the call
Flow similar to the legends of the falls
Spillin', I own you all, yuugh

One hand in the air if you don't really care
Two hands in the air if you don't really care
It's like that sometimes, I mean ridiculous
It's like that sometimes, this shit ridiculous
One hand in the air if you don't really care
Middle finger in the air if you don't really care
It's like that sometimes, man, ridiculous
Life can be sometimes ridiculous


Hah, I am so outrageous
I wear my pride on my sleeve like a bracelet
If God had an iPod, I'd be on his playlist
My phrases amazes the faces in places
The favorite, hah, my cup overrunneth with hundreds
Dummy, damn, it's hard not for me to waste it
The new Commandment, ""Thou shalt not hate, kid""
My movement is like the Civil Rights, I'm Ralph David
Abernathy, so call my lady Rosa Parks
I am nothing like them niggas, baby, those are marks
I met this girl on Valentine's Day, fucked her in May
She found out about April, so she chose to march
Hah, damn, another broken heart
I keep bitches by the twos, nigga, Noah's Ark
I got a seven on me, I call my 'dro Lamar
Plus a Trojan in my pocket, Matt Leinart, hah
G-A-T in the Pathfinder
'Cause you haters got PhDs
Y'all just some major haters and some math minors
Tiger Woods, don't make me grab iron


Ayy, yo, champagne wishes and thirty white bitches
You know this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous
You know this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Cars for the missus and furs for the mistress
You know that shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous
You know this shit is fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous
Fuckin' ridiculous


One hand in the air if you don't really care
Two hands in the air if you don't really care
It's like that sometimes, I mean ridiculous
It's like that sometimes, this shit ridiculous
One hand in the air if you don't really care
Middle finger in the air if you don't really care
It's like that sometimes, man, ridiculous
Life can be sometimes ridiculous, huh?",1353
1175,1451,Pumped Up Kicks,pop,Foster the People,2010,2272846,{},"
Robert's got a quick hand
He'll look around the room, he won't tell you his plan
He's got a rolled cigarette
Hanging out his mouth, he's a cowboy kid
Yeah, he found a six-shooter gun
In his dad's closet with a box of fun things
I don't even know what
But he's coming for you, yeah, he's coming for you, wait


All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet


Daddy works a long day
He be coming home late, and he's coming home late
And he's bringing me a surprise
'Cause dinner's in the kitchen and it's packed in ice
I've waited for a long time
Yeah, the sleight of my hand is now a quick-pull trigger
I reason with my cigarette
And say, ""Your hair's on fire, you must've lost your wits,"" yeah

All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet


Run, run, run, run
Ru-ru-ru-run, run, run
Ru-ru-ru-ru-run, run, run, run
Ru-ru-ru-run
Run, run, ru-run, run


All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run, outrun my gun
All the other kids with the pumped up kicks
You better run, better run faster than my bullet",1429
1188,1467,Hey Ya,pop,OutKast,2003,1801110,{},"
One, two, three, uh!


My baby don't mess around
Because she loves me so, and this I know for sure (Uh)
But does she really wanna
But can't stand to see me walk out the door? (Ah)
Don't try to fight the feeling
'Cause the thought alone is killing me right now (Uh)
Thank God for Mom and Dad
For sticking two together 'cause we don't know how (C'mon)


Hey ya! Hey ya!
Hey ya! Hey ya!
Hey ya! Hey ya!
Hey ya! Hey ya!


You think you've got it, oh, you think you've got it
But ""got it"" just don't get it till there's nothing at all (Ah!)
We get together, oh, we get together
But separate's always better when there's feelings involved (Ah)
If what they say is, ""Nothing is forever""
Then what makes, then what makes, then what makes
Then what makes, what makes, what makes love the exception?
So why oh, why oh, why oh, why oh, why oh
Are we so in denial when we know we're not happy here?
Y'all don't wanna hear me, you just wanna dance

Hey ya! (Uh-oh) Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
Don't want to meet your daddy
Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
Just want you in my Caddy (Uh-oh)
Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
Don't want to meet your mama (Uh-oh)
Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
Just want to make you cum-a' (Uh-oh)
Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
I'm, I'm, I'm, I'm just being honest (Uh-oh)
Hey ya!
I'm just being honest


Hey, all right now, all right now, fellas (Yeah?)
Now, what's cooler than being cool? (Ice Cold!)
I can't hear ya
I say what's, what's cooler than being cool? (Ice Cold!)
All right, all right, all right, all right, all right, all right, all right, all right
All right, all right, all right, all right, all right, all right
Okay now, ladies (Yeah?)
Now, we gon' break this thing down in just a few seconds
Now, don't have me break this thing down for nothing
Now, I want to see y'all on your baddest behavior
Lend me some sugar, I am your neighbor
Ah, here we go!

Shake it, sh-shake it, shake it, sh-shake it (Uh-oh)
Shake it, sh-shake it, shake it, shake it, sh-shake it (Uh-oh)
Shake it like a Polaroid picture, hey ya!
Shake it, sh-shake it, shake it, sh-shake it
Shake it, shake it (Okay), shake it, sugar
Shake it like a Polaroid picture


Now, all the Beyoncés and Lucy Lius
And baby dolls, get on the floor
You know what to do, oh, you know what to do
You know what to do


Hey ya! (Uh-oh) Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
Hey ya! (Uh-oh) Hey ya! (Uh-oh, hey ya!)
Hey ya! (Uh-oh) Hey ya! (Oh, oh, uh-oh)
Hey ya! (Uh-oh) Hey ya! (Uh-oh)
Hey ya! Hey ya!",1449
1244,1535,Hypnotize,rap,The Notorious B.I.G.,1997,1461330,{},"
Uh, uh, (Uh, come on)


Ha, sicker than your average, Poppa twist cabbage off instinct
Niggas don't think shit stink
Pink gators, my Detroit players
Timbs for my hooligans in Brooklyn (That's right)
Dead right, if the head right, Biggie there e'ry night
Poppa been smooth since days of Underoos
Never lose, never choose to, bruise crews who
Do somethin' to us, talk go through us (Come on, do it)
Girls walk to us, wanna do us, screw us
Who, us? Yeah, Poppa and Puff (He, he)
Close like Starsky and Hutch, stick the clutch
Dare I squeeze three at your cherry M-3 (Take that, take that, take that, ha ha!)
Bang every MC easily, busily
Recently niggas frontin', ain't sayin' nothin' (Nothin')
So I just speak my piece, keep my peace (Come on)
Cubans with the Jesus piece, with my peeps (Thank you)
Packin', askin', ""Who want it?"", you got it, nigga, flaunt it
That Brooklyn bullshit, we on it

Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see?
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your flashy ways
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see? (Uh-huh)
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me (Hypnotize)
And I just love your flashy ways (Uh-huh)
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid (Ha)


I put hoes in NY onto DKNY (Uh-huh)
Miami, D.C. prefer Versace (That's right)
All Philly hoes go with Moschino (Come on)
Every cutie with a booty bought a Coogi
Now who's the real dookie? Meaning, who's really the shit?
Them niggas ride dicks, Frank White push the six
Or the Lexus, LX, four and a half
Bulletproof glass, tints if I want some ass
Gonna blast, squeeze first, ask questions last
That's how most of these so-called gangsters pass
At last, a nigga rappin' about blunts and broads
Tits and bras, ménage à trois, sex in expensive cars
I'll still leave you on the pavement
Condo paid for, no car payment (Uh-uh)
At my arraignment, note for the plaintiff
""Your daughter's tied up in a Brooklyn basement""
Face it, not guilty, that's how I stay filthy (Not Guilty)
Richer than Richie, 'til you niggas come and get me (Come on)

Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see?
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your flashy ways
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see? (Uh-huh)
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me (Hypnotize)
And I just love your flashy ways (Uh-huh)
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid


I can fill you with real millionaire shit (I can fill ya)
Escargot, my car go one-sixty, swiftly (Come on)
Wreck it, buy a new one
Your crew run-run-run, your crew run-run
I know you sick of this, name brand nigga with
Flows, girls say he's sweet like licorice
So, get with this nigga, it's easy (Uh-huh)
Girlfriend, here's a pen, call me round ten
Come through, have sex on rugs that's Persian (That's right)
Come up to your job, hit you while you workin'
For certain, Poppa freakin', not speakin'
Leave that ass leakin', like rapper demo
Tell them ho take they clothes off slowly (Slowly)
Hit 'em with the force like Obi (Obi)
Dick black like Toby (Toby)
Watch me roam like Romey (Romey)
Lucky they don't owe me
Where the safe? Show me, homie (Say what, homie)

Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see?
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your flashy ways
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see? (Uh-huh)
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me (Hypnotize)
And I just love your flashy ways (Uh-huh)
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see?
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your flashy ways
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see?
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your flashy ways
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see? (Uh-huh)
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me (Hypnotize)
And I just love your flashy ways (Uh-huh)
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid
Biggie, Biggie, Biggie, can't you see?
Sometimes your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your flashy ways
Guess that's why they broke, and you're so paid",1517
1267,1568,Let It Be,rock,The Beatles,1970,1481859,{},"
When I find myself in times of trouble, Mother Mary comes to me
Speaking words of wisdom, ""Let it be""
And in my hour of darkness, she is standing right in front of me
Speaking words of wisdom, ""Let it be""


Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be


And when the brokenhearted people living in the world agree
There will be an answer, let it be
For though they may be parted, there is still a chance that they will see
There will be an answer, let it be


Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
Yeah, there will be an answer, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be



Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be


And when the night is cloudy, there is still a light that shines on me
Shine on 'til tomorrow, let it be
I wake up to the sound of music, Mother Mary comes to me
Speaking words of wisdom, ""Let it be""


Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
Oh, there will be an answer, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
Oh, there will be an answer, let it be
Let it be, let it be, let it be, yeah, let it be
Whisper words of wisdom, let it be",1575
1335,1659,Wish You Were Here,rock,Pink Floyd,1975,1884349,{},"
And disciplinary remains mercifully
Yes and um, I'm with you Derek, this star nonsense
Yes, yes, now which is it?
I am sure of it




So, so you think you can tell
Heaven from Hell? Blue skies from pain?
Can you tell a green field from a cold steel rail?
A smile from a veil? Do you think you can tell?
Did they get you to trade your heroes for ghosts?
Hot ashes for trees? Hot air for a cool breeze?
Cold comfort for change? Did you exchange
A walk-on part in the war
For a lead role in a cage?



How I wish, how I wish you were here
We're just two lost souls swimming in a fishbowl year after year
Running over the same old ground, what have we found?
The same old fears, wish you were here

",1638
1339,1664,Billie Jean,pop,Michael Jackson,1982,1529577,{},"
She was more like a beauty queen from a movie scene
I said, ""Don't mind, but what do you mean, I am the one
Who will dance on the floor in the round?""
She said I am the one
Who will dance on the floor in the round
She told me her name was Billie Jean
As she caused a scene
Then every head turned with eyes that dreamed of bein' the one
Who will dance on the floor in the round


People always told me, ""Be careful of what you do
Don't go around breakin' young girls' hearts"" (Hee-hee)
And mother always told me, ""Be careful of who you love
And be careful of what you do (Oh-oh)
'Cause the lie becomes the truth"" (Oh-oh)
Hey-ay


Billie Jean is not my lover
She's just a girl who claims that I am the one (Oh, baby)
But the kid is not my son, hoo!
She says I am the one (Oh, baby)
But the kid is not my son (Hee-hee-hee, no-no-no, hee-hee-hee)
Hoo!

For forty days and for forty nights, the law was on her side
But who can stand when she's in demand?
Her schemes and plans
'Cause we danced on the floor in the round, hee!
So take my strong advice, just remember to always think twice
(Don't think twice) Do think twice! (A-hoo!)
She told my baby we'd danced 'til three, then she looked at me
Then showed a photo of a baby cryin', his eyes were like mine (Oh, no)
'Cause we danced on the floor in the round, baby
(Ooh, hee-hee-hee)


People always told me, ""Be careful of what you do
And don't go around breakin' young girls' hearts""
(Don't break no hearts!) (Hee-hee)
But she came and stood right by me
Just the smell of sweet perfume (Ha-oh)
This happened much too soon (Ha-oh, ha-ooh)
She called me to her room (Ha-oh, hoo!)
Hey-ay


Billie Jean is not my lover (Hoo!)
She's just a girl who claims that I am the one
But the kid is not my son
No-no-no, no-no-no-no-no-no (Hoo!)
Billie Jean is not my lover
She's just a girl who claims that I am the one (Oh baby)
But the kid is not my son (Oh, no, no)
She says I am the one (Oh baby)
But the kid is not my son (No, hee-hee!)

Ah, hee-hee-hee!
Hee! Hoo!


She says I am the one, but the kid is not my son
No-no-no, hoo! (Ouw!)
Billie Jean is not my lover
She's just a girl who claims that I am the one
(You know what you did to me, baby)
But the kid is not my son
No-no-no, no-no-no-no (No-no-no, no-no-no)
She says I am the one
But the kid is not my son (No-no-no-no)


She says I am the one
You know what you did
She says he is my son
Breakin' my heart, babe
She says I am the one
Billie Jean is not my lover
Billie Jean is not my lover
Billie Jean is not my lover (She is just a girl)
Billie Jean is not my lover (She is just a girl)
(Don't call me Billie Jean)
Billie Jean is not my lover (She is just a girl)
(Hoo! She's not at the scene)
Billie Jean is not (Hee! Aaow! Ooh!)
Billie Jean is",1644
1350,1679,Dark Fantasy,rap,Kanye West,2010,1718133,{},"


You might think you've peeped the scene
You haven't, the real one's far too mean
The watered-down one, the one you know
Was made up centuries ago
They made it sound all wack and corny
Yes, it's awful blasted boring
Twisted fictions, sick addiction
Well, gather 'round, children, zip it, listen


Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh (Oh)
Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh
Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh (Oh)
Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh

Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I fantasized 'bout this back in Chicago
Mercy, mercy me, that Murciélago
That's me the first year that I blow
How you say broke in Spanish? Mi no hablo
Me drown sorrow in that Diablo
Me found bravery in my bravado
DJs need to listen to the models
You ain't got no fuckin' Yeezy in your Serato? (You ain't got no Yeezy, nigga?)
Stupid, but what the hell do I know?
I'm just a Chi-Town nigga with a Nas flow
And my chick in that new Phoebe Philo
So much head, I woke up to Sleepy Hollow


Can we get much higher?
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh


Look like a fat booty Celine Dion
Sex is on fire, I'm the King of Leona Lewis
Beyond the truest
Hey, teacher, teacher, tell me how do you respond to students?
And refresh the page and restart the memory?
Re-spark the soul and rebuild the energy?
We stopped the ignorance, we killed the enemy
Sorry for the night demons that still visit me
The plan was to drink until the pain over
But what's worse, the pain or the hangover?
Fresh air, rollin' down the window
Too many Urkels on your team, that's why your wins low
Don't make me pull the toys out, huh
Don't make me pull the toys
And fire up the engines, huh
And then they make noise

Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh


At the mall, there was a seance
Just kids, no parents
Then the sky filled with herons
Saw the devil in a Chrysler LeBaron
And the hell, it wouldn't spare us
And the fires did declare us
But after that, took pills, kissed an heiress
And woke up back in Paris


Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh, oh


Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh (Oh)
Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh
Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh (Oh)
Can we get much higher? (So high)
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh-oh, oh, oh",1660
1368,1705,Many Men Wish Death,rap,50 Cent,2003,1333008,{},"
Man, we gotta go get somethin' to eat
Man, I'm hungry as a motherfucker
Ayo man, damn
What's takin' homie so long, son?
50, calm down, he coming
(*nine gunshots*)
Ahh, ohh! What the fuck?!
Ah, son, pull off, pull off


Many men wish death upon me
Blood in my eye, dawg, and I can't see
I'm tryin' to be what I'm destined to be
And niggas tryin' to take my life away (C'mon)
I put a hole in a nigga for fuckin' with me
My back on the wall, now you gon' see
Better watch how you talk when you talk about me
'Cause I'll come and take your life away


Many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me
Lord, I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me

Now man, these pussy niggas puttin' money on my head
Go on and get your refund, motherfucker, I ain't dead
I'm the diamond in the dirt that ain't been found
I'm the underground king, and I ain't been crowned
When I rhyme, somethin' special happened every time
I'm the greatest, somethin' like Ali in his prime
I walk the block with the bundles
I've been knocked on the humble
Swing the ox when I rumble, show your ass what my gun do
Got a temper, nigga, go 'head, lose your head
Turn your back on me, get clapped and lose your legs
I walk around, gun on my waist, chip on my shoulder
Till I bust a clip in your face, pussy, this beef ain't over


Many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me
Lord, I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Have mercy on my soul
Somewhere my heart turned cold
Have mercy on many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me

Sunny days wouldn't be special if it wasn't for rain
Joy wouldn't feel so good if it wasn't for pain
Death gotta be easy, 'cause life is hard
It'll leave you physically, mentally, and emotionally scarred
This is for my niggas on the block twistin' trees in cigars
For the niggas on lock doin' life behind bars
I don't say ""Only God can judge me,"" 'cause I see things clear
Crooked-ass crackers will give my black-ass a hundred years
I'm like Paulie in Goodfellas, you can call me the Don
Like Malcolm by any means with my gun in my palm
Slim switched sides on me, let niggas ride on me
I thought we was cool, why you want me to die, homie?


Many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me
Lord, I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Have mercy on my soul
Somewhere my heart turned cold
Have mercy on many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me

Every night I talk to God, but he don't say nothin' back
I know he protectin' me, but I still stay with my gat
In my nightmares, niggas keep pullin' TECs on me
Psychic says some bitch done put a hex on me
The feds didn't know much when 'Pac got shot
I got a kite from the pens that told me Tut got knocked
I ain't gon' spell it out for you mu'fuckas all the time
Are you illiterate, nigga? You can't read between the lines?
In the Bible, it says what goes around, comes around
""Hommo"" shot me, three weeks later he got shot down
Now it's clear that I'm here for a real reason
'Cause he got hit like I got hit, but he ain't fuckin' breathin'


Many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me
Lord, I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Have mercy on my soul
Somewhere my heart turned cold
Have mercy on many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death 'pon me",1684
1380,1717,Clint Eastwood,rock,Gorillaz,2001,1316631,"{""Del The Funky Homosapien""}","
Hoo-hoo-hoo-hoo-hoo


I ain't happy, I'm feeling glad
I got sunshine in a bag
I'm useless, but not for long
The future is coming on
I ain't happy, I'm feeling glad
I got sunshine in a bag
I'm useless, but not for long
The future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on


(Hoo, yeah, haha)
Finally, someone let me out of my cage
Now, time for me is nothing, 'cause I'm countin' no age
Nah, I couldn't be there, now you shouldn't be scared
I'm good at repairs, and I'm under each snare
Intangible, bet you didn't think, so I command you to
Panoramic view, look, I'll make it all manageable
Pick and choose, sit and lose, all you different crews
Chicks and dudes, who you think is really kickin' tunes?
Picture you getting down in a picture tube
Like you lit the fuse, you think it's fictional?
Mystical? Maybe, spiritual hero
Who appears in you to clear your view when you're too crazy?
Lifeless to those, the definition for what life is
Priceless to you, because I put you on the hype shit
You like it? Gun smokin', righteous with one toke
Get psychic among those, possess you with one dose

I ain't happy, I'm feeling glad
I got sunshine in a bag
I'm useless, but not for long
The future is coming on
I ain't happy, I'm feeling glad
I got sunshine in a bag
I'm useless, but not for long
The future is coming on (That's right)
It's coming on, it's coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on


The essence, the basics, without it, you make it
Allow me to make this childlike in nature
Rhythm, you have it or you don't, that's a fallacy
I'm in them, every sproutin' tree, every child of peace
Every cloud and sea, you see with your eyes
I see destruction and demise, corruption in disguise (That's right)
From this fuckin' enterprise, now I'm sucked into your lies
Through Russel, not his muscles
But percussion he provides for me as a guide, y'all can see me now
'Cause you don't see with your eye, you perceive with your mind
That's the inner (Fuck 'em) so I'ma stick around with Russ and be a mentor
Bust a few rhymes so motherfuckers remember
Where the thought is, I brought all this
So you can survive when law is lawless (Right here)
Feelings, sensations that you thought was dead
No squealing and remember that it's all in your head

I ain't happy, I'm feeling glad
I got sunshine in a bag
I'm useless, but not for long
The future is coming on
I ain't happy, I'm feeling glad
I got sunshine in a bag
I'm useless, but not for long
My future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on


My future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
My future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
My future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
My future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
My future is coming on
It's coming on, it's coming on
My future",1698
1389,1732,Crank That Soulja Boy,rap,Soulja Boy,2007,1066005,{},"
Yuuuuuuu
Soulja Boy tell 'em
Ayy, I got this new dance for y'all called the Soulja Boy
You just gotta punch, then crank back three times from left to right


Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman that ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch
Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman dat ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch

Soulja Boy up in this ho
Watch me lean then watch me rock
Superman dat ho
Yeah, watch me crank that Robocop
Super fresh, now watch me jock
Jocking on them haters, man
When I do that Soulja Boy
I lean to the left then crank that thang, now (Yuuuuuu)
I'm jocking on yo' (I'm jocking on yo')
And if we get to fightin' then I'm cocking on yo' (Then I'm cocking on yo')
You catch me at yo' local party
Yes, I crank it everyday
Haters gettin' mad 'cause
""I got me some Bathin' Ape""


Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman that ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch
Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman dat ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch

I'm bouncin' on my toes
Watch me supersoak that ho
I'ma pass it to Arab and he gon' crank it up fo' sho'
Haters wanna be me, Soulja Boy, I'm the man
They be lookin' at my neck, sayin' it's the rubberband
Man (man), watch me do it (Watch me do it)
Dance (dance), let's get to it (Let's get to it)
Nope, you can't do it like me, though
So don't do it like me, folk
I see you tryna do it like me, man that dance was ugly


Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman that ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch
Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman dat ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch

I'm too fresh, off in that ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank that Roosevelt then super soak that ho
Supersoak that ho
Supersoak that ho
Supersoak that ho
Supersoak that ho
I'm too fresh, now watch me dooooooo it
Watch me shuffle, watch me yuuuuuuu
Watch me crank that Soulja Boy
Now Superman, yuuuuuuu
Superman, do it
Superman, do it


Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman that ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch
Soulja Boy off in this ho
Watch me crank it, watch me roll
Watch me crank dat Soulja Boy
Then Superman dat ho
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch me yuuuuuuu (Crank dat Soulja Boy)
Now watch


Yuuuuuuu
Yuuuuuuu",1711
1436,1801,All of the Lights,rap,Kanye West,2010,1615083,{},"


All of the lights
Lights, lights
All of the lights


Turn up the lights in here, baby
Extra bright, I want y'all to see this
Turn up the lights in here, baby
You know what I need, want you to see everything
Want you to see all of the lights


Fast cars, shooting stars
All of the lights, all of the lights
Until it's Vegas everywhere we are (All of the lights)
If you want it, you can get it for the rest of your life
If you want it, you can get it for the rest of your life

Somethin' wrong, I hold my head
MJ gone, our nigga dead
I slapped my girl, she called the feds
I did that time and spent that bread
I'm heading home, I'm almost there
I'm on my way, heading up the stairs
To my surprise, a nigga replacing me
I had to take him to that ghetto university


(All of the lights), lights
Cop lights, flashlights, spotlights
Strobe lights, street lights (All of the lights, all of the lights)
Fast life, drug life, thug life
Rock life every night (All of the lights)


Turn up the lights in here, baby
Extra bright, I want y'all to see this
Turn up the lights in here, baby
You know what I need, want you to see everything
Want you to see all of the lights


Restraining order, can't see my daughter
Her mother, brother, grandmother hate me in that order
Public visitation, we met at Borders
Told her she take me back, I'll be more supportive
I made mistakes, I bumped my head
Them courts sucked me dry, I spent that bread
She need her daddy, baby, please
Can't let her grow up in that ghetto university

(All of the lights), lights
Cop lights, flashlights, spotlights
Strobe lights, street lights (All of the lights, all of the lights)
Fast life, drug life, thug life
Rock life every night (All of the lights)


Turn up the lights in here, baby
Extra bright, I want y'all to see this
Turn up the lights in here, baby
You know what I need, want you to see everything
Want you to see all of the lights


Gettin' mine, baby
Gotta let these niggas know, yeah
Gettin' right, babe
You should go and get your own
Gettin' mine, baby
Gotta let these niggas know, yeah
Gettin' right, babe
You should go and get your own


Unemployment line, credit card declined
Did I not mention I was about to lose my mind?
And also was about to do that line
'Kay, okay, you know we going all the way this time
We going all the way this time
We going all the way this time
We going all the way this time
We going all the way this time

Turn up the lights in here, baby
Extra bright, I want y'all to see this
Turn up the lights in here, baby
You know what I need, want you to see everything
Want you to see all of the lights


Woah, woah
(I tried to tell you, but all I could say was oh)
Woah, woah
(I tried to tell you, but all I could say was oh)
Woah, woah
(I tried to tell you, but all I could say was oh)
Woah, woah
(I tried to tell you, but all I could say)",1781
1442,1812,Gorgeous,rap,Kanye West,2010,1770742,"{""Kid Cudi"",Raekwon}","


Ain't no question if I want it, I need it
I can feel it slowly drifting away from me
I'm on the edge, so why you playing? I'm saying
I will never ever let you live this down, down, down
Not for nothing, I've foreseen it, I dreamed it
I can feel it slowly drifting away from me
No more chances, if you blow this, you bogus
I will never ever let you live this down, down, down


Penitentiary chances, the devil dances
And eventually answers to the call of autumn
All them fallin' for the love of ballin'
Got caught with thirty rocks, the cop look like Alec Baldwin
Inter-century anthems based off inner-city tantrums
Based off the way we was branded
Face it, Jerome get more time than Brandon
And at the airport, they check all through my bag
And tell me that it's random
But we stay winning
This week has been a bad massage, I need a happy ending
And a new beginning and a new fitted
And some job opportunities that's lucrative
This the real world, homie, school finished
They done stole your dreams, you don't know who did it
I treat the cash the way the government treats AIDS
I won't be satisfied 'til all my niggas get it, get it?

Ain't no question if I want it, I need it
I can feel it slowly drifting away from me
I'm on the edge, so why you playing? I'm saying
I will never ever let you live this down, down, down


Is hip-hop just a euphemism for a new religion?
The soul music of the slaves that the youth is missing
But this is more than just my road to redemption
Malcolm West had the whole nation standing at attention
As long as I'm in Polo smiling, they think they got me
But they'd try to crack me if they ever see a Black me
I thought I chose a field where they couldn't sack me
If a nigga ain't shootin' a jumpshot, runnin' a track meet
But this pimp is at the top of Mount Olympus
Ready for the world's games, this is my Olympics
We make 'em say ho 'cause the game is so pimpish
Choke a South Park writer with a fishstick
I insisted to get up off of this dick
And these drugs, niggas can't resist it
Remind me when they tried to have Ali enlisted
If I ever wasn't the greatest, nigga, I must have missed it


Ain't no question if I want it, I need it
I can feel it slowly drifting away from me
I'm on the edge, so why you playing? I'm saying
I will never ever let you live this down, down, down

I need more drinks and less lights
And that American Apparel girl in just tights
She told the director she tryna get in a school
He said, ""Take them glasses off and get in the pool""
It's been a while since I watched the tube
'Cause like a Crip set, I got way too many blues for any more bad news
I was looking at my resume, feeling real fresh today
They rewrite history, I don't believe in yesterday
And what's a Black Beatle anyway, a fuckin' roach?
I guess that's why they got me sitting in fuckin' coach
My guy said I need a different approach
'Cause people is looking at me like I'm sniffin' coke
It's not funny anymore, try different jokes
Tell 'em hug and kiss my ass, X and O
And kiss the ring while they at it, do my thing while I got it
Play strings for the dramatic ending of that wack shit
Act like I ain't had a belt in two classes
I ain't got it, I'm coming after whoever who has it
I'm coming after whoever, who has it?
You blowin' up, that's good, fantastic
That, y'all, it's like that, y'all
I don't really give a fuck about it at all
'Cause the same people that tried to blackball me
Forgot about two things, my Black balls

Ain't no question if I want it, I need it
I can feel it slowly drifting away from me
I'm on the edge, so why you playing? I'm saying
I will never ever let you live this down, down, down


Ayy, yo
I done copped Timbs, lived in lenses, kid
Armani suits, fresh fruits, Bally boots, and Benzes
Counting up, smoking, one cuff
Live as a red Jag', a Louis bag, grabbin' a blunt, fuck it
Steam about a hundred and one L's
Kites off to jails, buyin' sweats, running up in Stetson
Nigga hat game was special
It matched every black pair of Nikes, throwing dice for decimals
The older head, bolder head, would train a soldier head
Make sure he right in the field, not a soldier dead
That meant code red, bent off the black skunk
The black Dutch, back of the old shed
If you can't live, you dying, you give or buy in
Keep it real or keep it moving, keep grinding
Keep shining, to every young man, this is a plan
Learn from others like your brothers Rae and Kanye


Not for nothing, I've forseen it, I dreamed it
I can feel it slowly drifting away from me
No more chances, if you blow this, you bogus
I will never ever let you live this down, down, down",1791
1444,1814,Mockingbird,rap,Eminem,2004,2129549,{},"
Yeah
I know sometimes
Things may not always make sense to you right now
But ayy
What'd Daddy always tell you?
Straighten up, little soldier, stiffen up that upper lip
What you cryin' about?
You got me


Hailie, I know you miss your mom, and I know you miss your dad
When I'm gone, but I'm tryin' to give you the life that I never had
I can see you're sad, even when you smile, even when you laugh
I can see it in your eyes, deep inside you wanna cry
'Cause you're scared, I ain't there
Daddy's with you in your prayers
No more cryin', wipe them tears
Daddy's here, no more nightmares
We gon' pull together through it
We gon' do it, Lainie-Uncle's crazy, ain't he?
Yeah, but he loves you, girl, and you better know it
We're all we got in this world, when it spins, when it swirls
When it whirls, when it twirls, two little beautiful girls
Lookin' puzzled, in a daze, I know it's confusin' you
Daddy's always on the move, Momma's always on the news
I try to keep you sheltered from it, but somehow it seems
The harder that I try to do that, the more it backfires on me
All the things growin' up as Daddy that he had to see
Daddy don't want you to see, but you see just as much as he did
We did not plan it to be this way, your mother and me
But things have got so bad between us, I don't see us ever bein'
Together ever again, like we used to be when we was teenagers
But then, of course, everything always happens for a reason
I guess it was never meant to be, but it's just something
We have no control over, and that's what destiny is
But no more worries, rest your head and go to sleep
Maybe one day we'll wake up and this'll all just be a dream

Now hush, little baby, don't you cry
Everything's gonna be alright
Stiffen that upper lip up, little lady, I told ya
Daddy's here to hold ya through the night
I know Mommy's not here right now, and we don't know why
We fear how we feel inside
It may seem a little crazy, pretty baby
But I promise, Momma's gon' be alright (Heh)


It's funny, I remember back one year when Daddy had no money
Mommy wrapped the Christmas presents up and stuck 'em under the tree
And said some of 'em were from me 'cause Daddy couldn't buy 'em
I'll never forget that Christmas, I sat up the whole night cryin'
'Cause Daddy felt like a bum-see, Daddy had a job
But his job was to keep the food on the table for you and Mom
And at the time, every house that we lived in
Either kept gettin' broken into and robbed or shot up on the block
And your mom was savin' money for you in a jar
Tryin' to start a piggy bank for you so you could go to college
Almost had a thousand dollars, 'til someone broke in and stole it
And I know it hurts so bad it broke your momma's heart
And it seemed like everything was just startin' to fall apart
Mom and Dad was arguin' a lot, so Momma moved back
On to Chalmers in the flat, one-bedroom apartment
And Dad moved back to the other side of 8 Mile on Novara
And that's when Daddy went to California with his CD
And met Dr. Dre  and flew you and Momma out to see me
But Daddy had to work, you and Momma had to leave me
Then you started seein' Daddy on the TV, and Momma didn't like it
And you and Lainie were too young to understand it
Papa was a rolling stone, Momma developed a habit
And it all happened too fast for either one of us to grab it
I'm just sorry you were there and had to witness it firsthand
'Cause all I ever wanted to do was just make you proud
Now I'm sittin' in this empty house
Just reminiscin', lookin' at your baby pictures, it just trips me out
To see how much you both have grown, it's almost like you're sisters now
Wow, guess you pretty much are, and Daddy's still here
Lainie, I'm talkin' to you too, Daddy's still here
I like the sound of that, yeah, it's got a ring to it, don't it?
Shh! Momma's only gone for the moment

Now hush, little baby, don't you cry
Everything's gonna be alright
Stiffen that upper lip up, little lady, I told ya
Daddy's here to hold ya through the night
I know Mommy's not here right now, and we don't know why
We fear how we feel inside
It may seem a little crazy, pretty baby
But I promise, Momma's gon' be alright


And if you ask me to, Daddy's gonna buy you a mockingbird
I'ma give you the world
I'ma buy a diamond ring for you, I'ma sing for you
I'll do anything for you to see you smile
And if that mockingbird don't sing and that ring don't shine
I'ma break that birdie's neck
I'll go back to the jeweler who sold it to ya
And make him eat every carat, don't fuck with Dad! (Ha-ha!)",1797
1564,1953,Blame Game,rap,Kanye West,2010,1577332,"{""John Legend""}","


Whose fault?


Let's play the blame game, I love you more
Let's play the blame game for sure
Let's call out names, names, I hate you more
Let's call out names, names for sure


I'll call you bitch for short
As a last resort and my first resort
You call me motherfucker for long
At the end of it, you know we both were wrong


But I love to play the blame game, I love you more
Let's play the blame game for sure
Let's call out names, names, I hate you more
Let's call out names, names for sure

On the bathroom wall I wrote
""I'd rather argue with you than to be with someone else""
I took a piss and dismiss it like ""fuck it""
And I went and found somebody else
Fuck arguing and harvesting the feelings
Yo, I'd rather be by my fuckin' self
'Til about 2 a.m. and I call back
And I hang up and I start to blame myself
Somebody help


Let's play the blame game, I love you more
Let's play the blame game for sure
Let's call out names, names, I hate you more
Let's call out names, names for sure


You weren't perfect, but you made life worth it
Stick around, some real feelings might surface
Been a long time since I spoke to you in a bathroom
Grippin' you up, fuckin' and chokin' you
What the hell was I supposed to do?
I know you ain't gettin' this type of dick from that local dude
And if you are, I hope you have a good time
'Cause I definitely be havin' mine
And you ain't finna see a mogul get emotional
Every time I hear about other niggas is strokin' you
Lie and say I hit you, he sittin' there consoling you
Runnin' my name through the mud, who's provoking you?
You should be grateful a nigga like me ever noticed you
Now you noticeable and can't nobody get control of you
1 a.m. and can't nobody get a hold of you
I'm callin' your brother's phone, like, what was I supposed to do?
Even though I knew he never told the truth
He was just gon' say whatever that you told him to
At a certain point, I had to stop asking questions
Y'all got dirt on each other like mud wrestlers
I heard he bought some coke with my money, that ain't right, girl
You gettin' blackmailed for that white girl
You always said, ""Yeezy, I ain't your right girl
You'll probably find one of them 'I like art'-type girls""
""All of the lights,"" she was caught in the hype, girl
And I was satisfied bein' in love with a lie
Now who to blame? You to blame?
Me to blame? For the pain
And it poured every time when it rained

Let's play the blame game, I love you more
Let's play the blame game for sure


Things used to be, now they not
Anything but us is who we are
Disguising ourselves as secret lovers
We've become public enemies
We walk away like strangers in the street
Gone for eternity
We erased one another
So far from where we came
With so much of everything
How do we leave with nothing?
Lack of visual empathy equates the meaning of L-O-V-E
Hatred and attitude tear us entirely
Chloe Mitchell


Let's play the blame game, I love you more
Let's play the blame game for sure
Let's call out names, names, I hate you more
Let's call out names, names, for sure


I can't love you this much, I can't love you this much
I can't love you this much, I can't love you this much
I can't love you this much, no, I can't love you this much
I can't love you this much, I can't love you this much

And I know that you are somewhere doing your thing
And when the phone called, it just ring and ring
You ain't pick up, but your phone accidentally called me back
And I heard the whole thing
I heard the whole thing, whole thing, whole thing, whole thing


Oh my God
Baby, you done took this shit to another motherfuckin' level
Now, a neighborhood nigga like me ain't supposed to be gettin' no pussy like this
Goddamn, goddamn
Who taught you how to get sexy for a nigga?
(Yeezy taught me)
You never used to talk dirty, but now you goddamn disgusting
My, my God, where'd you learn that?
(Yeezy taught me)
Look at you, motherfuckin' butt-ass-naked
With them motherfuckin' Jimmy Choos on
Who taught you how to put some motherfuckin' Jimmy Choos on?
(Yeezy taught me)
Yo, you took your pussy game up a whole 'nother level
This is some Cirque du Soleil pussy now, shit
You done went all porno on a nigga, okay?
And I-I-I-I, I love it, and I thank you
I thank you, my dick thanks you
How'd you learn, how, how did your pussy game come up?
(Yeezy taught me)
I was fuckin' parts of your pussy I'd never fucked before
I was in there like, ""Oh shit, I never been here before
I've never even seen this part of Pussy Town before""
It's like you got this shit reupholstered or some shit
What the fuck happened?
Who, who the fuck got your pussy all reupholstered?
(Yeezy reupholstered my pussy)
You know what, I got to thank Yeezy
And when I see that nigga, I'ma thank him
I'ma buy the album, I'ma download that motherfucker
I'ma shoot a bootlegger
That's how good I feel about this nigga
Ah
I still can't believe you got me this watch
This motherfucker is the exact motherfucker I wanted
With the bezel? This is the motherfucker I wanted
I saw this shit, I saw it, Twista had this shit on in The Source
I 'member, Twista had this motherfucker on in The Source
That's right, that's right
Yo, yo, babe, yo, yo, this the best birthday ever
Where'd you learn to treat a nigga like this?
(Yeezy taught me)
Yeezy taught you well
Yeezy taught you well",1944
1682,2127,Super Bass,rap,Nicki Minaj,2011,1444687,{},"
This one is for the boys with the boomin' system
Top down, AC with the cooler system
When he come up in the club, he be blazin' up
Got stacks on deck like he savin' up
And he ill, he real, he might gotta deal
He pop bottles and he got the right kind of build
He cold, he dope, he might sell coke
He always in the air, but he never fly coach
He a mothafuckin trip, trip, sailor of the ship, ship
When he make it drip, drip, kiss him on the lip, lip
That's the kinda dude I was lookin' for
And yes, you'll get slapped if you're lookin', ho
I said, excuse me, you're a hell of a guy
I mean, my, my, my, my, you're like pelican fly
I mean, you're so shy and I'm loving your tie
You're like slicker than the guy with the thing on his eye, oh


Yes, I did, yes, I did
Somebody please tell em who the F I is
I am Nicki Minaj, I mack them dudes up
Back coupes up and chuck the deuce up

Boy, you got my heartbeat runnin' away
Beatin' like a drum and it's comin' your way
Can't you hear that
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass?
He got that super bass
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Yeah, that's that super bass
Boom, boom, boom, badoom (Bass, bass)
Boom, boom, boom (Bass, yeah)
Boom, boom, boom, badoom (Bass, bass)
Boom, boom, boom (Bass)
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
He got that super bass
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Yeah, that's that super bass (Yo, yo)


This one is for the boys in the polos
Entrepreneur niggas and the moguls
He could ball with the crew, he could solo
But I think I like him better when he dolo
And I think I like him better with the fitted cap on
He ain't even gotta try to put the mack on
He just gotta give me that look, when he give me that look
Then the panties comin' off, off, uh
Excuse me, you're a hell of a guy
You know, I really got a thing for American guys
I mean, sigh, sickenin' eyes
I can tell that you're in touch with your feminine side, uh

Yes, I did, yes, I did
Somebody please tell 'em who the F I is
I am Nicki Minaj, I mack them dudes up
Back coupes up and chuck the deuce up


Boy, you got my heartbeat runnin' away
Beatin' like a drum and it's comin' your way
Can't you hear that
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass?
He got that super bass
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Yeah, that's that super bass
Boom, boom, boom, badoom (Bass, bass)
Boom, boom, boom (Bass, yeah)
Boom, boom, boom, badoom (Bass, bass)
Boom, boom, boom (Bass)
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
He got that super bass
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Yeah, that's that super bass (Yo, yo)


See, I need you in my life for me to stay
Know, know, know, know, know, I know you'll stay
No, no, no, no, no, don't go away, hey
Boy, you got my heartbeat runnin' away
Don't you hear that heartbeat comin' your way?
Oh, it be like
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Can't you hear that
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass?

Boy, you got my heartbeat runnin' away
Beatin' like a drum and it's comin' your way
Can't you hear that
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass?
He got that super bass
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Yeah, that's that super bass
Boom, boom, boom, badoom (Bass, bass)
Boom, boom, boom (Bass, yeah)
Boom, boom, boom, badoom (Bass, bass)
Boom, boom, boom (Bass)
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
He got that super bass
Boom, badoom, boom, boom, badoom, boom, bass
Yeah, that's that super bass (Yo, yo)",2110
1775,2259,Yesterday,rock,The Beatles,1965,1366010,{},"
Yesterday
All my troubles seemed so far away
Now it looks as though they're here to stay
Oh, I believe in yesterday
Suddenly
I'm not half the man I used to be
There's a shadow hanging over me
Oh, yesterday came suddenly


Why she had to go? I don't know, she wouldn't say
I said something wrong, now I long for yesterday


Yesterday
Love was such an easy game to play
Now I need a place to hide away
Oh, I believe in yesterday


Why she had to go? I don't know, she wouldn't say
I said something wrong, now I long for yesterday

Yesterday
Love was such an easy game to play
Now I need a place to hide away
Oh, I believe in yesterday


Mmm-mmm-mmm-mmm-mmm, hmm-hmm",2236
1852,2370,No Scrubs With Rap,rb,TLC,1999,1744368,"{""Lisa \\\""Left Eye\\\"" Lopes""}","
Oh-oh


A scrub is a guy that thinks he's fly
And is also known as a busta (Busta, busta)
Always talkin' 'bout what he wants
And just sits on his broke ass, so


No, I don't want your number (Uh, uh-uh, uh-uh)
No, I don't wanna give you mine and
No, I don't wanna meet you nowhere (No)
No, don't want none of your time and (Uh)


No, I don't want no scrub (Uh)
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me
Hangin' out the passenger side of his best friend's ride
Trying to holla at me (Woo)
I don't want no scrub
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me (Uh-uh, no love)
Hangin' out the passenger side of his best friend's ride (Uh-uh, uh-uh, uh-uh)
Trying to holla at me

Well a scrub checkin' me, but his game is kinda weak
And I know that he cannot approach me
'Cause I'm lookin' like class and he's lookin' like trash
Can't get wit' a deadbeat ass, so (Yeah)


No, I don't want your number
No, I don't wanna give you mine and (Said no)
No, I don't wanna meet you nowhere
No, don't want none of your time (Check it)


No, I don't want no scrub
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me (Uh-huh, come on)
Hangin' out the passenger side of his best friend's ride
Trying to holla at me (Ha)
I don't want no scrub (No scrubs)
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me (Uh-uh, no love)
Hangin' out the passenger side of his best friend's ride
Trying to holla at me


If you don't have a car and you're walkin'
Oh, yes son, I'm talkin' to you
If you live at home with your momma
Oh, yes son, I'm talkin' to you (Baby)
If you have a shorty that you don't show love
Oh, yes son (Yeah, yeah), I'm talkin' to you (Yeah, yeah)
Wanna get with me with no money
Oh no, I don't want no
No (No scrubs) scrub (No love)
No (No scrubs) scrub, no, no (No love)
No (Uh-uh, uh-uh, uh-uh, no scrubs) scrub, no, no, no, no (Uh-uh, uh-uh, uh-uh, no love)
No (Uh-uh, uh-uh, uh-uh) scrub, no, no (Uh, uh)

No, I don't want no scrub (No scrubs)
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me
Hangin' out the passenger side (Yeah) of his best friend's ride, oh
Trying to holla at me
I don't want no scrub, no
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me
Hangin' out the passenger side (Uh, uh) of his best friend's ride (Yeah)
Trying to holla at me, yeah


See, if you can't spatially expand my horizons (Horizons)
Then that leaves you in the class with scrubs, never risin' (Risin')
I don't find it surprisin' if you don't have the Gs (Gs)
To please me and bounce from here to the coast of overseas
So (So), let me give you somethin' to think about (Think about)
Inundate your mind with intentions to turn you out (Turn you out)
Can't forget the focus on the picture in front of me (In front of me)
You as clear as DVD on digital TV screens (Digital TV screens)
Satisfy my appetite with somethin' spectacular (Spectacular)
Check your vernacular, and then I'll get back to ya (Back to ya)
With diamond-like precision, insatiable is what I envision (Envision)
Can't detect acquisition from your friend's Expedition
Mister (Mister) Big Willy, if you really wanna know (Know, know)
Ask Chilli, could I be a silly ho? (Ho, ho) Not really
T-Boz and all my señoritas are steppin' on your FILAs
But you don't hear me though (But you don't hear me though)

No, I don't want no scrub (No)
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me (Uh-uh, uh-uh, uh)
Hangin' out the passenger side (Uh) of his best friend's ride (Yeah)
Trying to holla at me
I don't want no scrub, no (No scrub)
A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me (No love)
Hangin' out the passenger side of his best friend's ride
Trying to holla at me",2365
2019,2636,6 Foot 7 Foot,rap,Lil Wayne,2010,1848230,"{""Cory Gunz""}","
Six-foot, seven-foot, eight-foot bunch
Six-foot, seven-foot, eight-foot bunch


Ahem, excuse my charisma, vodka with a spritzer
Swagger down pat; call my shit Patricia
Young Money militia and I am the commissioner
You no wan' start Weezy 'cause the 'F' is for finisher
So misunderstood, but what's a world without enigma?
Two bitches at the same time; synchronized swimmers
Got the girl twisted 'cause she open when you twist her
Never met the bitch, but I fuck her like I missed her
Life is the bitch, and death is her sister
Sleep is the cousin-what a fuckin' family picture
You know Father Time, and we all know Mother Nature
It's all in the family, but I am of no relation
No matter who's buyin', I'm a celebration
Black and white diamonds; fuck segregation
Fuck that shit, my money up, you niggas just Honey Nut
Young Money runnin' shit, and you niggas just runner-ups
I don't feel I done enough, so I'ma keep on doin' this shit
Lil Tunechi or Young Tuna Fish

Six-foot, seven-foot, eight-foot bunch
Six-foot, seven-foot, eight-foot bunch


(I'm goin' back in...)
Okay, I lost my mind, it's somewhere out there stranded
I think you stand under me if you don't understand me
Had my heart broken by this woman named Tammy
But hoes gon' be hoes, so I couldn't blame Tammy
Just talked to Moms, told her she the sweetest
I beat the beat up; call it self-defense
Swear, man, I be seein' through these niggas like sequins
Niggas think they He-Men, pow, pow, the end
Talkin' to myself because I am my own consultant
Married to the money, fuck the world; that's adultery
You full of shit, you close your mouth and let yo' ass talk
Young Money eatin', all you haters do is add salt
Stop playin', bitch, I got this game on deadbolt
Mind so sharp I fuck around and cut my head off
Real nigga all day and tomorrow
But these motherfuckers talkin' crazy like they jaw broke
Glass half empty, half full, I'll spill ya
Try me and run into a wall; outfielder
You know I'ma ball 'til they turn off the field lights
The fruits of my labor, I enjoy 'em while they still ripe
Bitch, stop playin', I do it like a king do
If these niggas animals, then I'ma have a mink soon
Tell 'em bitches I say put my name on the wall
I speak the truth, but I guess that's a foreign language to y'all
And I call it like I see it, and my glasses on
But most of y'all don't get the picture 'less the flash is on
Satisfied with nothin', you don't know the half of it
Young Money, Cash Money
Paper chasin', tell that paper, ""Look, I'm right behind ya""
Bitch, real Gs move in silence like lasagna
People say I'm borderline crazy, sorta kinda
Woman of my dreams, I don't sleep so I can't find her
You niggas are gelatin, peanuts to an elephant
I got through that sentence like a subject and a predicate
Yeah, with a swag you would kill for
Money too strong; pockets on bodybuilder
Jumped in a wishin' well, now wish me well
Tell 'em kiss my ass, call it kiss and tell

Word to my mama, I'm out of my lima bean
Don't wanna see what that drama mean
Get some Dramamine
Llama scream, hotter than summer sun on a Ghana queen
Now all I want is hits, bitch, Wayne signed a fiend
I played the side for you niggas that's tryna front, and see
Son of Gun, Son of Sam, you nigga's the son of me
Pause for this dumber speech, I glow like Buddha
Disturb me, and you'll be all over the flo' like Luda
Bitch, I flow like scuba, bitch, I'm bold like Cuba
And I keep a killer ho, she gon' blow right through ya
I be mackin', 'bout my stackin', now I pack like a mover
Shout to ratchet for backin' out on behalf of my shooter
Niggas think they high as I, I come laugh at your ruler
Cash Money cold, bitch, but our actions is cooler
Wayne, these niggas out they mind
I done told these fuck niggas so many times
That I keep them bucks steady on my mind
Tuck these, I fuck these on your mind, pause
To feed them, on my grind, did I get a little love
Keep throwin' my sign in the middle
Hit 'em up, piece on my side
'Cause ain't no peace on my side, bitch
I'm a man, I visit urinals abroad
Tune told me to, I'm shootin' when the funeral outside
I'm uptown, thoroughbred, a BX nigga, ya heard? Gunna",2635
2206,2914,Crazy Rap Colt 45  2 Zig-Zags,rap,Afroman,2000,1011195,{},"
Wait a minute, man, hey, check this out, man (Tell it)
It was this blind man, right? (This man) It was this blind man, right?
He was feelin' his way down the street with a stick, right? (Hey)
He walked past this fish market, you know what I'm sayin'?
(Fish market?) He stopped, he took a deep breath, he said
*sniffs* ""Woo good morning ladies"" (Hahahahaha)
You like that shit, man? Hey man, I've got a gang of that shit, man
Hey, I'll tell you what, we'll all have a good time
We'll fool on the drum, and hey
Hey if everybody crowd around the mic'
I'll tell you all these motherfuckin' jokes I got
First I'm gonna start off like that, hey help me sing it, homeboy


Said Colt 45 and two Zig-Zags, baby, that's all we need
We can go to the park, after dark, smoke that tumbleweed
As the marijuana burn, we can take our turn
Singin' them dirty rap songs
Stop and hit the bong like Cheech & Chong
And sell tapes from here to Hong Kong
So roll, roll, roll my joint, pick out the seeds and stems
Feelin' high as hell, flyin' through Palmdale, skatin' on Dayton rims
So roll, roll, the '83 Cadillac Coupe DeVille
If my tapes and my CDs just don't sell, I bet my Caddy will

Well, it was just sundown in a small white town
They call it East Side Palmdale (Well)
When the Afroman walked through the white land
Houses went up for sale (Sale)
Well, I was standing on the corner sellin' rap CDs
When I met a little girl named Jan (Jan), I let her ride in my Caddy
'Cause I didn't know her daddy was the leader of the Ku Klux Klan
(Haha) We fucked on the bed, fucked on the floor (Woo)
Fucked so long I grew a fuckin' afro
Then I fucked to the left (Left), fucked to the right (Right)
She sucked my dick 'til the shit turned white (Haha)
Thought to myself, ""Sheeba-sheeba"", got my ass lookin' like a zebra
I put on my clothes and I was on my way
Until her daddy pulled up in a Chevrolet (Oh)
So I ran, I jumped out the back window
But her daddy, he was waitin' with a two-by-four
Oh (Haha), he beat me to the left, he beat me to the right
The motherfucker whooped my ass all night
But I ain't mad at her prejudiced dad
That's the best damn pussy I ever had (Haha)
Got a bag of weed and a bottle of wine (Woo)
I'm gonna fuck that bitch just one more time


Colt 45 and two Zig-Zags, baby, that's all we need (Come on)
We can go to the park, after dark, smoke that tumbleweed
And as the marijuana burn, we can take our turn
Singin' them dirty rap songs
Stop and hit the bong like Cheech & Chong
And sell tapes from here to Hong Kong
So roll, roll, roll my joint, pick out the seeds and stems
Feelin' high as hell, flyin' through Palmdale, skatin' on Dayton rims
(Come on) So roll, roll, the '83 Cadillac Coupe DeVille
If my tapes and my CDs just don't sell, I bet my Caddy will (Uh)

I met this lady in Hollywood
She had green hair, but damn she looked good
I took her to my house because she was fine
But she whooped out a dick that was bigger than mine
I met this lady from Japan, never made love with an African
I fucked her once, I fucked her twice
I ate that pussy like shrimp-fried rice
Don't be amazed at the stories I tell ya (Tell ya)
I met a woman in the heart of Australia
Had a big butt and big titties too
So I hopped in her ass like a Kangaroo
See, I met this woman from Hawaii
Stuck it in her ass and she said ""AIEE!""
Lips was breakfast, pussy was lunch
Then her titties busted open with Hawaiian Punch
I met Colonel Sanders' wife in the state of Kentucky
She said, ""I'd fry some chicken if you'd just fuck me""
I came in her mouth, it was a crisis
I gave her my secret blend of Herbs 'n' Spices


Colt 45 and two Zig-Zags, baby, that's all we need (Uh)
We can go to the park, after dark, smoke that tumbleweed (Uh)
And as the marijuana burn, we can take our turn
Singin' them dirty rap songs
Stop and hit the bong like Cheech & Chong
(Ay, wait a minute man, check this out man, ayy ha)
And sell tapes from here to Hong Kong

I met Dolly Parton in Tennessee
Her titties were filled with Hennessy
That country music really drove me crazy
But I rode that ass and said, ""Yes, Miss Daisy""
Met this lady in Oklahoma, put that pussy in a coma
Met this lady in Michigan, I can't wait 'til I fuck that bitch again
Met a real black girl down in South Carolina
Fucked her until she turned into a white albino
Fucked this hooker in Iowa, I fucked her on credit, so I owe her
(Haha) Fucked this girl down in Georgia
Came in her mouth, man, I thought I told ya?
Met this beautiful sexy hoe
She just ran across the border of Mexico
Fine young thing said her name's Maria
I wrapped her up just like a hot tortilla
I wanna get married, but I can't afford it
I know I'ma cry when she get deported


Colt 45 and two Zig-Zags, baby, that's all we need (Come on)
We can go to the park, after dark, smoke that tumbleweed (Uh)
And as the marijuana burn, we can take our turn
Singin' them dirty rap songs
Stop and hit the bong like Cheech & Chong
And sell tapes from here to Hong Kong
So roll, roll, roll my joint, pick out the seeds and stems
Feelin' high as hell, flyin' through Palmdale, skatin' on Dayton rims
(Come on) So roll, roll, the '83 Cadillac Coupe DeVille
If my tapes and my CDs just don't sell...

Extended version with a fourth and final verse:


Have you ever went over a girl's house to fuck
But the pussy just ain't no good? (Say what?)
I mean, you gettin' upset because you can't get her wet
Plus you in the wrong neighborhood
So you try to play it off and eat the pussy
But it take her so long to cum
Then a dude walk in, that's her big boyfriend
And he asks you, ""Where you from?""
So you wipe your mouth and you try to explain
You start talking real fast
But he already mad 'cause you fucking his woman
So he start beating on yo' ass, now your clothes all muddy
Your nose all bloody, your dick was hard but now it's soft
You thought you had a girl to rock your world
Now you still gotta go jack off
Said Colt 45 and two Zig-Zags, baby, that's all we need
We can go to the park, after dark, smoke that tumbleweed",2920
2214,2924,American Boy,rb,Estelle,2008,1328357,"{""Kanye West""}","
This a number one champion sound (Yeah)
Yeah, Estelle, we 'bout to get down (Get down)
Who the hottest in the world right now? (Uh)
Just touched down in London town (Uh)
Bet they give me a pound (Uh)
Tell 'em put the money in my hand right now (Yes)
Tell the promoter we need more seats
We just sold out all the floor seats


Take me on a trip, I'd like to go some day
Take me to New York, I'd love to see LA
I really want to come kick it with you
You'll be my American boy


He said, ""Hey, sister, it's really, really nice to meet ya""
I just met this 5-foot-7 guy who's just my type
Like the way he's speakin', his confidence is peakin'
Don't like his baggy jeans but I might like what's underneath them
And, no, I ain't been to MIA
I heard that Cali never rains and New York's wide awake
First let's see the West End, I'll show you to my bredrin
I'm likin' this American boy, American boy

Take me on a trip, I'd like to go some day
Take me to New York, I'd love to see LA
I really want to come kick it with you
You'll be my American boy, American boy


La, la la, la la, eya
La, la la, la la, eya
La, la la, la la, eya
Will you be my American boy? American boy


Can we get away this weekend? Take me to Broadway
Let's go shopping, maybe then we'll go to a café
Let's go on the subway, take me to your hood
I never been to Brooklyn and I'd like to see what's good
Dressed in all your fancy clothes
Sneakers lookin' fresh to death, I'm lovin' those Shell Toes
Walkin' that walk, talk that slick talk
I'm likin' this American boy, American boy


Take me on a trip, I'd like to go some day
Take me to New York, I'd love to see LA
I really want to come kick it with you
You'll be my American boy
Tell 'em wah gwan, blud!

Who killin' them in the UK?
Everybody gonna say, ""You, K""
Reluctantly, 'cause most of this press don't fuck with me
Estelle once said to me, ""Cool down, down
Don't act a fool now, now.""
I always act a fool oww, oww
Ain't nothing new now, now
He crazy, I know what you thinkin'
Ribena, I know what you're drinkin'
Rap singer, chain blinger
Holler at the next chick soon as you're blinkin'
What's your persona about this Americana rhymer?
Am I shallow 'cause all my clothes designer? Uh
Dressed smart like a London bloke (Yeah)
Before he speak his suit bespoke (Woop)
And you thought he was cute before
Look at this pea coat, tell me he's broke (Woo)
And I know you ain't into all that
I heard your lyrics, I feel your spirit
But I still talk that ca-a-ash
'Cause a lotta wags wanna hear it
And I'm feelin' like Mike at his baddest
Like The Pips at their gladdest
And I know they love it
So to hell with all that rubbish

Would you be my love, my love?
Would you be mine?
Would you be my love, my love?
Would you be mine?
Could you be my love, my love? (Ooh)
Would you be my American boy? American boy


Take me on a trip, I'd like to go some day (Ooh, someday)
Take me to Chicago, San Francisco Bay (I wanna see the Bay)
I really want to (You) come kick it with you (Ooh-ooh-ooh)
You'll be my American boy, American boy (Be my American boy)


Take me on a trip I'd like to go some day (I'd like to go some day)
Take me to New York, I'd love to see LA (See LA)
I really want to come kick it with you
You'll be my American boy, American boy


La, la la, la la, eya (La, la)
La, la la, la la, eya (Ooh, ooh)
La, la la, la la, eya
Will you be my American boy?",2927
2245,2986,All Star,rock,Smash Mouth,1999,1805582,{},"
Somebody once told me the world is gonna roll me
I ain't the sharpest tool in the shed
She was looking kind of dumb with her finger and her thumb
In the shape of an ""L"" on her forehead


Well, the years start comin' and they don't stop comin'
Fed to the rules and I hit the ground runnin'
Didn't make sense not to live for fun
Your brain gets smart but your head gets dumb
So much to do, so much to see
So what's wrong with taking the backstreets?
You'll never know if you don't go (W-w-wacko)
You'll never shine if you don't glow


Hey now, you're an all star
Get your game on, go play
Hey now, you're a rock star
Get the show on, get paid
(And all that glitters is gold)
Only shootin' stars break the mold

It's a cool place, and they say it gets colder
You're bundled up now, wait 'til you get older
But the meteor men beg to differ
Judging by the hole in the satellite picture
The ice we skate is getting pretty thin
The water's getting warm so you might as well swim
My world's on fire, how 'bout yours?
That's the way I like it and I'll never get bored


Hey now, you're an all star
Get your game on, go play
Hey now, you're a rock star
Get the show on, get paid
(All that glitters is gold)
Only shootin' stars break the mold


Go for the moon  (W-w-wacko, w-w-wacko)
Go for the moon  (W-w-wacko, w-w-wacko)
Go for the moon 
Go for the moon 


Hey now, you're an all star
Get your game on, go play
Hey now, you're a rock star
Get the show on, get paid
(And all that glitters is gold)
Only shooting stars...

Somebody once asked, ""Could I spare some change for gas?
I need to get myself away from this place""
I said, ""Yep, what a concept
I could use a little fuel myself and we could all use a little change""


Well, the years start comin' and they don't stop comin'
Fed to the rules and I hit the ground runnin'
Didn't make sense not to live for fun
Your brain gets smart but your head gets dumb
So much to do, so much to see
So what's wrong with taking the backstreets?
You'll never know if you don't go (Go!)
You'll never shine if you don't glow


Hey now, you're an all star
Get your game on, go play
Hey now, you're a rock star
Get the show on, get paid
(And all that glitters is gold)
Only shootin' stars break the mold


(And all that glitters is gold)
Only shooting stars break the mold",2993
2271,3035,Look at Me Now,rap,Chris Brown,2011,2726189,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Busta Rhymes""}","
I don't see how you can hate from outside of the club
You can't even get in!
Hahaha
Leggo


Yellow model chick, yellow bottle sippin'
Yellow Lamborghini, yellow top missin'
Yeah, yeah, that shit look like a toupée
I get what you get in ten years in two days
Ladies love me, I'm on my Cool J
If you get what I get, what would you say?
She wax it all off, Mr. Miyagi
And them suicide doors, hari-kari


Look at me now, look at me now (Oh)
I'm gettin' paper
Look at me now (Oh), look at me now (Yeah)
Fresher than a muh'fucka

Lil' nigga, bigger than gorilla
'Cause I'm killin' every nigga that can try to be on my shit
Better cuff your chick if you with her, I can get her
And she accidentally slip and fall on my dick
Oops, I said ""On my dick""
I ain't really mean to say ""On my dick""
But since we talkin' about my dick
All of you haters say hi to it
I'm done


Ayo, Breezy
Let me show you how to keep the dice rollin'
When you're doin' that thing over there, homie
(Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Let's go!


'Cause I'm feelin' like I'm runnin'
And I'm feelin' like I gotta get away, get away, get away
Better know that I don't and I won't ever stop
'Cause you know I gotta win everyday-day (Go)
See, they really really wanna pop me (Blow)
Just know that you will never flop me (Oh)
And I know that I can be a little cocky (No)
You ain't never gonna stop me
Every time I come, a nigga gotta set it
Then I gotta go, and then I gotta get it (Woo)
Then I gotta blow, and then I gotta show that
Any little thing a nigga think that he be doin' (Ooh-ooh)
'Cause it doesn't matter, 'cause I'm gonna da-da-da-da (Damn)
Then I'm gonna murder everything and anything
A ba-da-boom, a ba-da-bing, I gotta do a lotta things
That make it clearer to a couple niggas
That I always win and then I gotta get it again and again and then again
And I be doin' it to death
And now I move a little foul, a nigga better call a ref'
And everybody know my style and niggas know that I'm the best
When it come to doin' this and I be bangin' on my chest
And I bang in the East and I'm bangin' in the West
And I come to give you more and I will never give you less
You will hear it in the street or you could read it in the press
Do you really wanna know what's next? (Let's go!)
See the way we on and then we all up in the race
And you know we gotta go, don't try to keep up with the pace
And we strugglin' and hustlin' and sendin' in and gettin'
And we always gotta do it, take it to another place
Gotta taste it, and I gotta grab it
And I gotta cut all through this traffic
Just to be at the top of the throne
Better know I gotta have it (Have it)

Look at me now, look at me now (Oh)
I'm gettin' paper
Look at me now (Oh), look at me now (Yeah)
Fresher than a muh'fucka


Man, fuck these bitch-ass niggas, how y'all doin'?
I'm Lil Tunechi, I'm a nuisance
I go stupid, I go dumb like the Three Stooges
I don't eat sushi, I'm the shit
No, I'm pollution, no substitution
Got a bitch that play in movies in my jacuzzi, pussy juicy
I never gave a fuck about a hater
Got money on my radar, dressed like a skater
Got a big house, came with an elevator
You niggas ain't eatin', fuck it, tell a waiter
Marley said ""shoot 'em"", and I said ""okay""
If you wanted bullshit, then I'm like, ""¡Olé!""
I don't care what you say, so don't even speak
Your girlfriend a freak like Cirque Du Soleil
That's word to my flag, and my flag red
I'm out of my head, bitch, I'm outta my mind
From the bottom I climb, you ain't hotter than mine
(Nope) Not on my time, and I'm not even tryin'
What's poppin', slime? Nothin', five
And if they trippin', fuck 'em, five
I ain't got no time to shuck and jive
These niggas as sweet as pumpkin pie
CîROC and Sprite on a private flight
Bitch, I been tight since Guiding Light
And my pockets right, and my diamonds white
And my momma's nice, and my daddy's dead
You faggots scared 'cause I'm too wild
Been here for a while, I was like, ""Fuck trial""
I puts it down, I'm so Young Money
If you got eyes, look at me now, bitch!

Look at me now, look at me now (Haha! Oh)
I'm gettin' paper
Look at me now (Haha! Oh), look at me now (Yeah)
I'm fresher than a muh'fucka


Okay
Okay
Is that right?
I'm fresher than a muh'fuc-!",3046
2375,3199,Californication,rock,Red Hot Chili Peppers,1999,1295100,{},"
Psychic spies from China try to steal your mind's elation
And little girls from Sweden dream of silver-screen quotation
And if you want these kind of dreams, it's Californication


It's the edge of the world and all of Western civilization
The sun may rise in the East, at least it settled in a final location
It's understood that Hollywood sells Californication


Pay your surgeon very well to break the spell of aging
Celebrity skin: is this your chin or is that war you're waging?


First born unicorn
Hardcore soft porn


Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication

Marry me, girl, be my fairy to the world, be my very own constellation
A teenage bride with a baby inside getting high on information
And buy me a star on the boulevard, it's Californication


Space may be the final frontier but it's made in a Hollywood basement
And Cobain, can you hear the spheres singing songs off Station to Station?
And Alderaan's not far away, it's Californication


Born and raised by those who praise control of population
Well, everybody's been there, and I don't mean on vacation


First born unicorn
Hardcore soft porn


Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication



Destruction leads to a very rough road but it also breeds creation
And earthquakes are to a girl's guitar, they're just another good vibration
And tidal waves couldn't save the world from Californication


Pay your surgeon very well to break the spell of aging
Sicker than the rest, there is no test, but this is what you're craving


First born unicorn
Hardcore soft porn


Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication
Dream of Californication",3227
2439,3318,Promiscuous,rap,Nelly Furtado,2006,1209958,{Timbaland},"
Am I throwin' you off?
Nope
Didn't think so


How you doin', young lady?
That feeling that you giving really drives me crazy
You're dope, have a player 'bout to choke
I was at a loss for words first time that we spoke
You lookin' for a girl that'll treat you right?
How you lookin' for her in the daytime with the light?
You might be the type if I play my cards right
I'll find out by the end of the night
You expect me to just let you hit it?
But will you still respect me if you get it?
All I can do is try, gimme one chance (Chance)
What's the problem? I don't see no ring on your hand (Hand)
I'll be the first to admit it
I'm curious about you, you seem so innocent
You wanna get in my world, get lost in it?
Boy, I'm tired of runnin', let's walk for a minute

Promiscuous girl, wherever you are
I'm all alone, and it's you that I want
Promiscuous boy, you already know
That I'm all yours, what you waiting for?
Promiscuous girl, you're teasin' me
You know what I want, and I got what you need
Promiscuous boy, let's get to the point
'Cause we're on a roll, you ready?


Roses are red, some diamonds are blue
Chivalry is dead, but you're still kinda cute
Hey, I can't keep my mind off you
Where you at? Do you mind if I come through?
I'm out of this world, come with me to my planet
Get you on my level, do you think that you can handle it?
They call me Thomas, last name Crown
Recognize game, I'ma lay mine's down
I'm a big girl, I can handle myself
But if I get lonely, I'ma need your help
Pay attention to me, I don't talk for my health
I want you on my team -- So does everybody else
Shh, baby, we can keep it on the low (Low)
Let your guard down, ain't nobody gotta know (Know)
If you with it, girl, I know a place we can go
What kind of girl do you take me for?

Promiscuous girl, wherever you are
I'm all alone, and it's you that I want
Promiscuous boy, you already know
That I'm all yours, what you waiting for?
Promiscuous girl, you're teasin' me
You know what I want, and I got what you need
Promiscuous boy, let's get to the point
'Cause we're on a roll, you ready?


Don't be mad, don't get mean
Don't get mad, don't be mean
Hey, don't be mad, don't get mean
Don't get mad, don't be mean


Wait, I don't mean no harm
I can see you with my t-shirt on
I can see you with nothin' on
Feelin' on me before you bring that on
Bring that on?! -- You know what I mean
Girl, I'm a freak, you shouldn't say those things
I'm only trying to get inside of your brain
To see if you can work me the way you say
It's okay, it's alright
I got something that you gon' like
Hey, is that the truth or are you talking trash?
Is your game M.V.P like Steve Nash?

Promiscuous girl, wherever you are
I'm all alone, and it's you that I want
Promiscuous boy, I'm callin' ya name
But you're drivin' me crazy the way you're makin' me wait
Promiscuous girl, you're teasin' me
You know what I want, and I got what you need
Promiscuous boy, we're one in the same
So we don't gotta play games no more",3343
2883,4093,Work It,rap,Missy Elliott,2002,1249049,{},"
DJ, please pick up your phone, I'm on the request line
This is a Missy Elliott one-time exclusive, come on


Is it worth it? Let me work it
I put my thing down, flip it and reverse it
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
If you got a big-, let me search ya
And find out how hard I gotta work ya
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
C'mon


I'd like to get to know ya so I could show ya
Put the pussy on ya like I told ya
Give me all your numbers so I can phone ya
Your girl acting stank, then call me over
Not on the bed, lay me on your sofa
Call before you come, I need to shave my chocha
You do or you don't or you will or won't ya?
Go downtown and eat it like a vulture
See my hips and my tips, don't ya?
See my ass and my lips, don't ya?
Lost a few pounds and my waist for ya
This the kinda beat that go ra-ta-ta
Ra-ta-ta-ta-ta-ta-ta-ta-ta-ta
Sex me so good I say blah-blah-blah
Work it, I need a glass of water
Boy, oh boy, it's good to know ya
C'mon

Is it worth it? Let me work it
I put my thing down, flip it and reverse it
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
If you got a big-, let me search ya
And find out how hard I gotta work ya
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
C'mon


If you a fly gal, get your nails done
Get a pedicure, get your hair did
Boy, lift it up, let's make a toast-a
Let's get drunk, that's gonna bring us closer (Okay)
Don't I look like a Halle Berry poster?
See the Belvedere playing tricks on ya (Ah)
Girlfriend wanna be like me, never
You won't find a bitch that's even better (Ah)
I make you hot as Las Vegas weather
Listen up close while I take it backwards
sdrawkcab ti ekat ot ekil yssiM yaw eht hctaW
I'm not a prostitute, but I could give you what you want
I love your braids and your mouth full of fronts
Love the way my ass go bum-bum-bum-bum (Huh)
Keep your eyes on my bum-bum-bum-bum-bum (Okay)
You think you can handle this badonka-donk-donk (Woo)
Take my thong off and my ass go boom (Ugh)
Cut the lights on so you see what I could do (C'mon)

Is it worth it? Let me work it
I put my thing down, flip it and reverse it
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup (Ooh)
If you got a big-, let me search ya
And find out how hard I gotta work ya
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup (Huh)
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup (C'mon)
C'mon


Boys, boys, all type of boys
Black, White, Puerto Rican, Chinese boys (C'mon)
Why-thai, thai-o-toy-o-thai-thai
Rock-thai, thai-o-toy-o-thai-thai (C'mon)
Girls, girls, get that cash
If it's 9 to 5 or shaking your ass (Aha)
Ain't no shame, ladies do your thing (C'mon)
Just make sure you ahead of the game


Just 'cause I got a lot of fame super
Prince couldn't get me change my name, papa
Kunta Kinte a slave again, no sir
Picture Blacks saying, ""Oh yes'a, massa""
Picture Lil' Kim dating a pastor
Minute Man, Big Red could outlast ya
Who is the best? I don't have to ask ya
When I come out, you won't even matter (Ugh)
Why you act dumb like, uhhhh, duh?
So you act dumb like, uhhhhh, duh
As the drummer boy go ba-rom-pop-pom-pom (Ooh)
Give you some-some-some of this Cinnabun (C'mon)

Is it worth it? Let me work it
I put my thing down, flip it and reverse it
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup (Ooh)
If you got a big-, let me search ya
And find out how hard I gotta work ya
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
Ti esrever dna ti pilf, nwod gniht ym tup
C'mon


To my fellas (Ooh, good god!)
I like the way you work that (Uh-huh, la-la-la-la)
To my ladies (Whoo! Good god!)
You sure know how to work that


Yeah, it's Missy Elliott!
I hope y'all enjoying what y'all heard so far
I was sittin' here thinkin' like
Big Daddy Kane and Public Enemy
Salt n Pepa, Lyte, EPMD, LL, Run-DMC
KRS-One, Rakim
Most of them artists used to dance
And still get respected in the street
Don't be scared to Bankhead or Bogo
Or move as far as sold Michael Jackson 43 million
Shoot, errbody have the zipper jacket
And half of these thugs have the glove to match, ya feel me?
Yo, it's ok though, if you wanna be hard and ice grill
And Harlem Shake at the same time, whatever
Let's just have fun, it's hip-hop man, this is hip-hop!",4176
2941,4220,Yonkers,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2011,3173077,"{""Tyler / The Creator""}","
Uh, Wolf Haley, Golf Wang, go


I'm a fuckin' walkin' paradox, no, I'm not
Threesomes with a fuckin' triceratops, Reptar
Rappin' as I'm mockin' deaf rock stars
Wearin' synthetic wigs made of Anwar's dreadlocks
Bedrock, harder than a motherfuckin' Flintstone
Making crack rocks outta pussy nigga fishbones (Haha)
This nigga Jasper tryin' to get grown
About five, seven of his bitches in my bedroom (Hey)
Swallow the cinnamon, I'ma scribble this sin and shit
While Syd is tellin' me that she's been getting intimate with men
(Syd, shut the fuck up)
Here's the number to my therapist (Shit)
You tell him all your problems, he's fuckin' awesome with listenin' (Haha)


Uh, Wolf Haley, uh, Golf Wang
Uh, Wolf Haley, Golf fuckin' Wang

Jesus called, he said he's sick of the disses
I told him to quit bitchin', this isn't a fuckin' hotline
For a fuckin' shrink, sheesh, I already got mine
And he's not fuckin' workin', I think I'm wastin' my damn time
I'm clockin' three past six and goin' postal
This the revenge of the dicks, that's nine cocks that cock 9's
This ain't no V. Tech shit, or Columbine
But after bowling, I went home for some damn Adventure Time
(What'd you do?) I slipped myself some pink Xannies (Yeah)
And danced around the house in all-over print panties
My mom's gone, that fuckin' broad will never understand me
I'm not gay, I just wanna boogie to some Marvin
(What you think of Hayley Williams?)
Fuck her, Wolf Haley robbin' them
I'll crash that fuckin' airplane that that faggot nigga B.o.B is in
And stab Bruno Mars in his goddamn esophagus
And won't stop until the cops come in
I'm an overachiever, so how about I start a team of leaders
And pick up Stevie Wonder to be the wide receiver? (Cool)
Green paper, gold teeth, and pregnant golden retrievers
All I want, fuck money, diamonds, and bitches, don't need 'em
But where the fat ones at? I got somethin' to feed 'em
It's some cooking books, the black kids never wanted to read 'em
Snap back, green ch-ch-chia fuckin' leaves
It's been a couple months
And Tina still ain't perm her fuckin' weave
Damn

Uh, Wolf Haley, uh, Golf Wang
Uh, Wolf Haley, Golf Wang, yeah
Goddamn goblin
Wolf Haley, uh, Golf Wang
Uh, Wolf Haley, Golf Wang, yeah


They say success is the best revenge
So I beat DeShay up with the stack of magazines I'm in
Oh, not again, another critic writing report
I'm stabbin' any bloggin' faggot hipster with a pitchfork
Still suicidal, I am
I'm Wolf, Tyler put this fuckin' knife in my hand
I'm Wolf, Ace gon' put that fuckin' hole in my head
And I'm Wolf, that was me who shoved a cock in your bitch
(What the fuck, man?) Fuck the fame and all the hype, G
I just wanna know if my father would ever like me
But I don't give a fuck, so he's probably just like me
A motherfuckin' goblin
(Fuck everything, man) That's what my conscience said
Then it bunny-hopped off my shoulder, now my conscience dead
Now the only guidance that I had is splattered on cement
Actions speak louder than words, let me try this shit
Dead",4313
2953,4239,Freaks and Geeks,rap,Childish Gambino,2011,1609045,{},"
Alright, Gambino is a mastermind, fuck a bitch to pass the time
Mass appeal, orange rind, smoke your green, I'm spendin' mine
The beat is witches brew, but beware, this shit is potent
E.E. cummin' on her face, now that's poetry in motion
Yeah, Gambino make it work, I'm the boss, move somethin'
Yeah, this cool fuckin' suits me, swag two button
Yeah, these girls be actin' crazy when they're dancin': Black Swan
I ain't fuckin' at the club, put your clothes back on
Yeah, this beat is a disaster, 9/11 this track
Rappers wanna battle me, I have to mail their heads back
And my clique make that dinero, so it's time to meet the fuckers
I am runnin' this bitch, you are just a dog walker
Leavin' with your girl when we last seen each other
Yeah, you fuckin' with the baddest like we tag team Rihanna
Fly girl on her knees, she don't wanna come near me
Yeah, my dick is too big, there's a big bang theory
Got her picture in my iPhone, what do y'all think?
While y'all niggas masturbate, I'm in that Ariel Pink
If I am just a rapper, man, you could've fooled me
I'm the shit, when these dudes talk, they talkin' bull me, ah

Yeah, rah, rah, okay


Alright, I'm down with the black girls of every single culture
Filipino, Armenian girls on my sofa
Yeah, I like a white girl, sometimes we get together
Need a thick chick though
So it's black and yellow, black and yellow
Love is a trip, but fuckin' is a sport
Are there Asian girls here? Minority report
Put your team on the map, Blake Griffin on the court
Niggas bitin' off my tracks, need a knife and a fork
We the illest, need a nurse, here's the check, grab your purse
Unless we fuckin', then I'll pay for all the food on the Earth, man
I got some pussy that was insane
So insane, it's an enemy of Batman
I'm dominant, niggas call me faggot 'cause they closeted
I'm hot as shit, comin' out the backside of a rocket ship
It's monster shit, you dudes are the opposite of Loch Nesses
Respond to this, we can squash the beef right now like sausages
Chillin' with my n-words, say it like a white kid
Yes, your booty's big as hers, say that to my white bitch
So she don't get embarrassed, my dick is made of carrots
Bunnies wantin' to be fed it, I meant honeys, oh, forget it
I have worked all winter, I will not fail summer
In the back of a bush, like Gavin Rossdale's drummer
Yeah, my stinger's in her flower, I hope she let me pollinate
Workin' hard as shit, yeah, this beat is made from concentrate
Nigga, can't you tell that my sample of Adele
Was so hot, I got these hood niggas blowin' up my cell?
Swag out the ass, I'm the man, fuck chico
Took the G out your waffle, all you got left is your ego
Think about it for a second
Man, we eatin', where's your breakfast?
Man, you hungry, have this sandwich
Got my wallet, cheese, and lettuce
An elephant never forgets, so my dick remembers everything
Green inside your wallet is that pussy open sesame
Runnin' the game, fuck am I sayin'?
Runnin' the Earth, give me a month
Told all you niggas I'm in it to win it
'Cause havin' an Emmy just wasn't enough
You get sloppy drunk, I stay whiskey neat
My clique should be cancelled: Freaks and Geeks",4330
2999,4326,Killing in the Name,rock,Rage Against the Machine,1992,2092606,{},"
Killing in the name of


Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Uh!


Killing in the name of
Killing in the name of


Now you do what they told ya
Now you do what they told ya
Now you do what they told ya
Now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
But now you do what they told ya!
Well, now you do what they told ya

Those who died are justified
For wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
You justify those that died
By wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
Those who died are justified
For wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
You justify those that died
By wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites


Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Some of those that work forces
Are the same that burn crosses
Uh!


Killing in the name of
Killing in the name of


Now you do what they told ya
Now you do what they told ya
Now you do what they told ya
Now you do what they told ya
And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya
(Now you're under control) And now you do what they told ya

Those who died are justified
For wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
You justify those that died
By wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
Those who died are justified
For wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
You justify those that died
By wearing the badge, they're the chosen whites
Come on!


Ugh!
Yeah!
Come on!
Ugh!


Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Fuck you, I won't do what you tell me
Motherfucker!
Ugh!",4569
3091,4510,Swim Good,pop,Frank Ocean,2011,1040394,{},"
That's a pretty big trunk on my Lincoln Town Car, ain't it?
Big enough to take these broken hearts and put 'em in it
Now I'm drivin' 'round on the boulevard, trunk bleedin'
And every time the cops pull me over, they don't ever see them
They never see them


And I've got this black suit on
Roamin' around like I'm ready for a funeral
Five more miles 'til the road runs out


I'm about to drive in the ocean
I'ma try to swim from somethin' bigger than me
Kick off my shoes
And swim good, and swim good
Take off this suit
And swim good, and swim good, good


Got some pretty good beats on this 808s CD, yeah
Memory seats I'm sittin' on stay heated (Yeah)
I woulda put tints on my windows, but what's the difference?
If I feel like a Ghost, no Swayze
Ever since I lost my baby

I've had this black suit on
Roamin' around like I'm ready for a funeral
One more mile 'til the road runs out, out


I'm about to drive in the ocean
I'ma try to swim from somethin' bigger than me
Kick off my shoes
And swim good, and swim good
Take off this suit
And swim good, and swim good, good


I'm goin' off (Oh, my pretty love)
Don't try stopping me
I'm goin' off (Throw me a line)
Don't try saving (You broke my heart)
No flares (You broke my heart)
No vest (You drove my love)
And no fear
Waves are washin' me out


I'm about to drive in the ocean
I'ma try to swim from somethin' bigger than me
Kick off my shoes
And swim good, and swim good
Take off this suit
And swim good, and swim good, good

Don't die",4620
3210,4729,Novacane,rb,Frank Ocean,2011,1604654,{},"
I think I started something
I got what I wanted
Did-didn't I can't feel nothing, superhuman
Even when I'm fucking, Viagra popping
Every single record, autotuning
Zero emotion, muted emotion
Pitch corrected, computed emotion, uh-huh
I blame it on the model broad with the Hollywood smile, ow
Stripper booty and a rack like wow
Brain like Berkeley
Met her at Coachella
I went to see Jigga, she went to see Z Trip, perfect
I took a seat on the ice cold lawn
She handed me a ice blue bong, whatever
She said she wanna be a dentist really badly
She's in school paying
For tuition, doing porn in the Valley
At least you workin'
But, girl, I can't feel my face
What are we smoking anyway?
She said, ""Don't let the high go to waste""
But can you taste a little taste?

Novacane, baby, baby
Novacane, baby, I want you
Fuck me good, fuck me long, fuck me numb
Love me now, when I'm gone, love me none
Love me none, love me none
Numb, numb, numb, numb


Sink full of dishes, pacin' in the kitchen
Cocaine for breakfast, yikes
Bed full of women, flip on a tripod
Little red light on shootin'
I'm feelin' like Stanley Kubrick
This is some visionary shit
Been tryna film pleasure with my eyes wide shut
But it keeps on movin'
I blame it on the model broad with the Hollywood smile
Stripper booty with a rack like wow
I'll never forget ya
You put me on a feelin' I never had
Never had, never had (Never)
And ever since I've been tryna get it back
And pick it up and put it back
Now I'm something like the chemist on campus
But there's no drug around
Quite like what I found in you, you
I still can't feel my face
What am I smokin' anyway? (Ahh)
She said, ""Don't let the high go to waste"" (Ooh)
But can you taste a little taste?

Novacane, baby, baby (Ohh)
Novacane, baby, I want you
Fuck me good, fuck me long, fuck me numb
Love me now, when I'm gone, love me none
Love me none, love me none
Numb, numb, numb, numb


Novacane, novacane, novacane
Novacane, novacane (Ohh)
Numb the pain, numb the pain, numb the pain
Numb the pain, numb the pain (Ohh, ohh)
Novacane, novacane, novacane
Novacane, novacane
For the pain, for the pain (Ohh, ohh, ohh)
Novacane, novacane (Ooh)


Pretty girls involved with me
Making pretty love to me, pretty
Pity, pity
All the pretty girls involved with me
Making pretty love to me, pretty
Pity, pity
I can't feel a thing, I can't feel, I can't feel a thing
I can't feel a thing, I can't feel, feel, feel, feel her
I can't feel, feel her
Novacane, novacane, novacane
I can't feel, feel her
Novacane for the pain, for the pain
I can't, can't feel her
Feel her, feel her, ohh
Novacane, novacane-cane",4849
3362,4997,Mr. Brightside,rock,The Killers,2003,2892121,{},"
Coming out of my cage and I've been doing just fine
Gotta, gotta be down because I want it all
It started out with a kiss; how did it end up like this?
It was only a kiss; it was only a kiss
Now I'm falling asleep and she's calling a cab
While he's having a smoke and she's taking a drag
Now they're going to bed, and my stomach is sick
And it's all in my head, but she's touching his


Chest now, he takes off her
Dress now, let me go
And I just can't look; it's killing me
They're taking control


Jealousy, turning saints into the sea
Swimming through sick lullabies, choking on your alibis
But it's just the price I pay, destiny is calling me
Open up my eager eyes, 'cause I'm Mr. Brightside



I'm coming out of my cage, and I've been doing just fine
Gotta, gotta be down because I want it all
It started out with a kiss; how did it end up like this?
It was only a kiss, it was only a kiss
Now I'm falling asleep and she's calling a cab
While he's having a smoke and she's taking a drag
Now they're going to bed, and my stomach is sick
And it's all in my head, but she's touching his


Chest now, he takes off her
Dress now, let me go
'Cause I just can't look, it's killing me
They're taking control


Jealousy, turning saints into the sea
Swimming through sick lullabies, choking on your alibis
But it's just the price I pay, destiny is calling me
Open up my eager eyes, 'cause I'm Mr. Brightside



I never...
I never...
I never...
I never...",5139
3423,5117,Alphabet Aerobics,rap,Blackalicious,1999,1249240,{},"
(Now it's time for our wrap up
Let's give it everything we've got
Ready? Begin)


Artificial amateurs aren't at all amazing
Analytically, I assault, animate things
Broken barriers bounded by the bomb beat
Buildings are broken, basically I'm bombarding
Casually create catastrophes, casualties
Canceling cats, got their canopies collapsing
Detonate a dime of dank daily doin' dough
Demonstrations, Don Dada on the down low
Eating other editors with each and every energetic
Epileptic episode, elevated etiquette
Furious, fat, fabulous, fantastic
Flurries of funk felt, feeding the fanatics
Gift got great, global goods gone glorious
Gettin' godly in his game with the goriest
Hit 'em high, hella hype, historical
Hey holocaust hymns
Hear 'em holler at your homeboy
Imitators idolize, I intimidate
In an instant, I'll rise in an irate state
Juiced on my jams like Jheri curls jocking joints
Justly, it's just me, writing my journals
Kindly I'm kindling all kinds of ink on
Karate kick-type Brits in my kingdom
Let me live a long life, lyrically lessons is
Learned lame louses just lose to my livery
My mind makes marvelous moves, masses
Marvel and move, many mock what I've mastered
Niggas nap knowing I'm nice, naturally
Knack, never lack, make noise nationally
Operation, opposition, off, not optional
Out of sight, out of mind, wide beaming opticals
Perfected poem, powerful punchlines
Pummeling petty powder puffs in my prime
Quite quaint quotes keep quiet, it's Quannum
Quarrelers ain't got a quarter of what we got-uh
Really raw raps, risin' up rapidly
Riding the rushing radioactivity
Super scientifical sound search sought
Silencing super fire saps that are soft
Tales ten times talented, too tough
Take that, challengers, get a tune up
Universal, unique, untouched
Unadulterated, the raw uncut
Verb vice lord victorious valid
Violate vibes that are vain make 'em vanish
Why in my world would a wise wordsmith just
Weaving up words, weeded up on my workshift
Xerox my X-radiation holes extra large
X-height letters and xylophone tones
Yellow-back, yak mouth, young ones' yaws
Yesterday's lawn yardsale, I yawn
Zig-Zag zombies, zooming to the zenith
Zero in, Zen thoughts, overzealous rhyme
Zealots!

(Good... can you say it faster?)",5268
3677,5606,Boyz-N-Tha Hood G-Mix,rap,Eazy-E,1993,1621093,{Dresta},"
""Yeah, Gangsta Dresta done stepped in this, motherfucker. And this one goes out to all the O.G.'s out there. And I can't forget the baby gangstas, what's up, niggas? My nigga they came back with some of that old school original west coast shit, nigga. That got all of y'all on his dick in the first place, yeah. So run that shit, E, yeah.""


Cruisin' down the street in my '64
Jockin' the freaks, clockin' the dough
Went to the park to get the scoop
Knuckleheads out there cold shooting some hoops
A car pulls up, who can it be?
A fresh El Camino rolling Kilo G
He rolls down his window and he started to say
It's all about making that GTA


Cause the boys in the hood are always hard
You come talking that trash, we'll pull your card
Knowing nothing in life, but to be legit
Don't quote me, boy, cause I ain't said shit


Donald B's in the place to give me the pace
He said, ""My man JD is on freebase""
The boy JD was a friend of mine
'Til I caught him in my car trying to steal a Alpine
Chased him up the street to call a truce
The silly cluck-head pulls out a deuce-deuce
Little did he know, I had a loaded 12 gauge
One sucker dead, LA Times front page

Cause the boys in the hood are always hard
You come talking that trash we'll pull your card
Knowing nothing in life, but to be legit
Don't quote me, boy, cause I ain't said shit


Bored as fuck and I wanna get ill
So I went to a place where my homeboys chill
Niggas out there making that dollar
I pulled up in my '64 Impala
They greet me with a 40 and I start drinking
And from the 8-ball my breath start stinking
Left to get my girl to rock that body
Before I left I hit the Bacardi
Went to her house to get her out of the pad
Dumb ho said something that made me mad
She said something that I couldn't believe
So I grabbed the stupid bitch by her nappy ass weave
She started talking shit, wouldn't you know?
Reached back like a pimp, slapped the ho
Her father jumped up and he started to shout
So I bombed on pops, knocked his ol' ass out


Cause the boys in the hood are always hard
You come talking that trash we'll pull your card
Knowing nothing in life, but to be legit
Don't quote me, boy, cause I ain't said shit

Now I'm rolling hard, now under control
Then wrapped the '64 'round a telephone pole
I looked at my car and I said, ""Oh, brother
Throw it in the gutter and go buy another""
Walking home and I see the G ride
Now Kat is drivin Kilo on the side
As they busted a U, they got pulled over
A undercover cop in a dark green Nova
Now Kat got beat for resisting arrest
He socked the pig in the head for rippin' his Guess
Now G is caught for doing the crime
Fourth offense on the boy, he'll do some time


Cause the boys in the hood are always hard
You come talking that trash we'll pull your card
Knowing nothing in life, but to be legit
Don't quote me, boy, cause I ain't said shit


I went to get them out, but there was no bail
My niggas caused a riot in the county jail
Two days later in municipal court
Kilo G on trial straight cut a fart
Disruption of a court, said the judge
On a six-year sentence, my man didn't budge
Bailiff came over to turn him in
Kilo G looked up and gave a grin
He yelled out, ""Fire,"" then came Suzy
The bitch came in with a sub-machine Uzi
Police shot the girl, but didn't hurt her
Both upstate for attempted murder

Cause the boys in the hood are always hard
You come talking that trash we'll pull your card
Knowing nothing in life, but to be legit
Don't quote me, boy, cause I ain't said shit",5816
3820,5902,Wing$,rap,Macklemore & Ryan Lewis,2011,1123974,{},"
I was seven years old when I got my first pair
And I stepped outside, and I was like ""Momma
This air bubble right here, it's gonna make me fly""
I hit that court, and when I jumped
I jumped, I swear I got so high
""I touched the net! Mom, I touched the net!
This is the best day of my life""
Air Max's were next, that air bubble, that mesh
The box, the smell, the stuffing, the tread
At school, I was so cool, I knew that I couldn't crease 'em
My friends couldn't afford 'em, four stripes on their Adidas
On the court, I wasn't the best, but my kicks were like the pros, yo
Stick out my tongue so everyone could see that logo
Nike Air Flight, book bag was so dope
And then my friend Carlos's brother got murdered for his Fours
Whoa


See he just wanted a jump shot
But they wanted his Starter coat, though
Didn't wanna get caught from Genesee Park to Othello
You'd get clowned for those Pro Wings, with the velcro, those were not tight
I was tryna fly, without leaving the ground
'Cause I wanted to be like Mike, right, wanted to be him
I wanted to be that guy, I wanted to touch the rim
I wanted to be cool, and I wanted to fit in
I wanted what he had, America, it begins

I wanna fly, can you take me far away?
Give me a star to reach for
Tell me what it takes
And I'll go so high, I'll go so high
My feet won't touch the ground
Just stitch my wings and pull the strings
I bought these dreams that all fall down


We want what we can't have
The commodity makes us want it
So expensive, damn, I just got to flaunt it
Got to show 'em
So exclusive, this is that new shit
A hundred dollars for a pair of shoes, I would never hoop in
Look at me, look at me, I'm a cool kid
I'm an individual, yeah, but I'm part of a movement
My movement told me ""Be a consumer""
And I consumed it
They told me to just do it
I listened to what that swoosh said


Look at what that swoosh did
See it consumed my thoughts
""Are you stupid? Don't crease 'em! Just leave 'em in that box!""
Strangled by these laces, laces I can barely talk
That's my air bubble and I'm lost, if it pops
We are what we wear, we wear what we are
But see I look inside the mirror and think Phil Knight tricked us all
Will I stand for change, or stay in my box?
These Nikes help me define me
But I'm trying to take mine off

I wanna fly, can you take me far away?
Give me a star to reach for
Tell me what it takes
And I'll go so high, I'll go so high
My feet won't touch the ground
Just stitch my wings and pull the strings
I bought these dreams that all fall down


They started out with what I wear to school
That first day
Like these are what make you cool
And this pair, this would be my parachute
So much more than just a pair of shoes
Nah, this is what I am
What I wore, this is the source of my youth
This dream that they sold to you
For a hundred dollars and some change
Consumption is in the veins
And now I see it's just another pair of shoes",6142
3835,5926,The Morning,rb,The Weeknd,2011,1386624,{},"
I'm fucking gone right now
I'm fucking gone right now
""Listen, listen""


From the morning to the evening
Complaints from the tenants
Got the walls kicking like they six months pregnant
Drinking Alizé with our cereal for breakfast
Girls calling cabs at dawn quarter to seven
Sky's getting cold, we're flying from the north
Rockin' with our city like a sold out show
House full of pros that specialize in the ho'in'
Make that money rain as they taking off they clothes
Order plane tickets
Cali is the mission
Visit every month like I'm split life living
Let the world listen
If a hater's caught slipping
Then my niggas stay tight
Got my back like Pippen
Fast life gripping
Yeah, we still tippin'
Codeine cups paint a picture so vivid
Fakes try to mimic
Get girls timid
But behind closed doors they get poles so rigid

All that money, the money is the motive
All that money, the money is the motive
All that money, the money she be folding
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work


Push it to the limit
Push it through the pain
I push it for the pleasure like a virgin to the game
A virgin to that money
A virgin to the fame
So this my only chance
And when I'm over only pray
That I flow from the bottom
Closer to the top
The higher that I climb
The harder I'ma drop
These pussy ass niggas tryna hold on to their credit
So I tell them use a debit
Watch they image start to lessen
I warn them like discretion
Why these niggas testing?
Always fucking testing
Why these niggas testing?
Shit that I got them on straight bar hopping
To the music of the ambiance
Get shit popping
Zombies of the night (Zombies of the night)
Niggas ain't talking if they hyping to the crew
Get it in like pockets
Downtown loving
When the moon coming
Only place to find bassheads and hot women

All that money, the money is the motive
All that money, the money is the motive
All that money, the money she be folding
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work


Better slow down
She'll feel it in the morning
Ain't the kind of girl you'll be seeing in the morning
Too damn raw, ain't no nigga with her rollin'
Ain't no nigga that she holding
Man, her love is too damn foreign
Look at all that money
The money is the motive (The money is the motive)
All that money
The money she be folding (The money she be folding)
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work


All that money, the money is the motive
All that money, the money is the motive
All that money, the money she be folding
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work, girl, girl, put in work
Girl, put in work",6169
3897,6062,Wicked Games,rb,The Weeknd,2011,2049547,{},"
Woah, woah, ehh


I left my girl back home
I don't love her no more
And she'll never fucking know that
These fucking eyes that I'm staring at
Let me see that ass
Look at all this cash
And I emptied out my cards too
Now I'm fucking leaning on that


Bring your love, baby, I could bring my shame
Bring the drugs, baby, I could bring my pain
I got my heart right here
I got my scars right here
Bring the cups, baby, I could bring the drank
Bring your body, baby, I could bring you fame
And that's my motherfucking words too
Just let me motherfucking love you

Listen, ma, I'll give you all I got
Get me off of this, I need confidence in myself (Yeah, yeah, yeah, ohh, yeah)
Ohh, listen, ma, I'll give you all of me
Give me all of it, I need all of it to myself (Woah, woah)
So tell me you love me
(Only for tonight, only for the night)
Even though you don't love me (Ohh, ohh)
Just tell me you love me
(I'll give you what I need, I'll give you all of me)
Even though you don't love me (Ohh, ohh) (yeah, yeah) (yeah, yeah)


Let me see you dance
I love to watch you dance
Take you down another level
And get you dancing with the Devil
Take a shot of this
But I'm warning you
I'm on that shit that you can't smell, baby
So, put down your perfume


Bring your love, baby, I could bring my shame
Bring the drugs, baby, I could bring my pain
Oh, I got my heart right here
Oh, I got my scars right here
Bring the cups, baby, I could bring the drank
Bring your body, baby, I could bring you fame
And that's my motherfucking words too, ayy
So let me motherfucking love you

Listen, ma, I'll give you all I got
Get me off of this (off of this), I need confidence (confidence)  in myself (Ooh, eh, ehh)
Listen, ma, I'll give you all of me (Ooh)
Give me all of it, I need all of it to myself (I need all of it)
So tell me you love me, yeah
(Only for tonight, only for the night)
Even though you don't love me (Ohh, ohh)
Just tell me you love me
(I'll give you what I need, I'll give you all of me)
Even though you don't love me (Ohh, ohh)
Ohh",6310
3901,6075,No Diggity,rb,Blackstreet,1996,1369579,"{""Dr. Dre"",""Queen Pen""}","
Yeah
You know what?
I like the playettes
No diggity, no doubt, uh
Play on, playette
Play on, playette
Yo, Dre, drop the verse


It's going down, fade to Blackstreet
The homies got at me, collab' creations bump like acne
No doubt, I put it down, never slouch
As long as my credit can vouch, a dog couldn't catch me **** out
Tell me who can stop when Dre makin' moves
Attracting honeys like a magnet
Giving 'em eargasms with my mellow accent
Still moving this flavor
With the homies Blackstreet and Teddy
The original rump shakers

Shorty get down, good Lord
Baby got 'em open all over town
Strictly biz, she don't play around
Cover much grounds, got game by the pound
Getting paid is her forte
Each and every day, true player way
I can't get her out of my mind (Wow)
I think about the girl all the time (Wow-wow)
East side to the west side
Pushin' phat rides, it's no surprise
She got tricks in the stash, stacking up the cash
Fast when it comes to the gas
By no means average
She's on when she's got to have it
Baby, you're a perfect ten, I wanna get in
Can I get down so I can win?


I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Bag it up)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Bag it up, girl)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Bag it up)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Get up)

She's got class and style
Street knowledge by the pound
Baby never act wild
Very low-key on the profile
Catchin' feelings is a no
Let me tell you how it goes
Herb's the word, spin's the verb
Lovers, it curves, so freak what you heard
Rollin' with the phatness
You don't even know what the half is
You've got to pay to play
Just for shorty bang-bang to look your way
I like the way you work it
Trump tight all day, every day
You're blowing my mind, maybe in time
Baby, I can get you in my ride


I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Bag it up)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Oh, yeah)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Bag it up, babe)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Get up)

Hey yo, hey yo, hey yo, hey yo (Hey yo, that girl looks good)
Hey yo, hey yo, hey yo, hey yo (Play on, play on, play on)
Hey yo, hey yo, hey yo, hey yo (You're my kind of girl)
Hey yo, hey yo, hey yo, hey yo (Hey yo)


'Cause that's my peeps and we rolls deep
Flyin' first class from New York City to Blackstreet
What you know about me? Not a **** thing
Cartier wooden frames sported by my shorty
As for me, icy gleaming pinkie diamond ring
We bes the baddest clique up on the scene
Ain't you getting bored with these fake-**** broads?
I shows and proves, no doubt, I been diggin' you so
Please excuse if I come across rude, that's just me
And that's how a playette's got to be
Stay kickin' game with a capital G
Ask the peoples on my block, I'm as real as can be
Word is bond, faking moves never been my thing
So, Teddy, pass the word to your **** Chauncy
I'll be sending the call, let's say, around 3:30
Queen Pen and Blackstreet, it's no diggity (No diggity, no doubt, baby)


I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Girl, you got it going on)
I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Play on, play on, play on)
(Hey yo, hey yo, hey yo, hey yo) I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Hey, ooh)
(Hey yo, hey yo, hey yo, hey yo) I like the way you work it
No diggity, I got to bag it up (Hell, yeah, babe)


Yeah, come on
Becky in full effect (No doubt)
Lisa in full effect (Right)
Vicky in full effect (Uh-huh)
Tamika in full effect (Yeah)
Blaze in full effect (Right)
Ain't nothin' goin' on but the rent (No doubt)
Yeah, play on, playette (Play on, playette)
Play on (Play on), play on (play on)
'Cause I like it (Right)
No diggity, no doubt, yeah
Blackstreet productions
We out, we out (Right)
We out, we out",6320
4479,10229,Where Is the Love?,rap,Black Eyed Peas,2003,1461202,"{""Justin Timberlake""}","
What's wrong with the world, Mama?
People livin' like they ain't got no mamas
I think the whole world's addicted to the drama
Only attracted to things that'll bring you trauma
Overseas, yeah, we tryna stop terrorism
But we still got terrorists here livin'
In the USA, the big CIA
The Bloods and the Crips and the KKK
But if you only have love for your own race
Then you only leave space to discriminate
And to discriminate only generates hate
And when you hate, then you're bound to get irate, yeah
Madness is what you demonstrate
And that's exactly how anger works and operates
Man, you gotta have love just to set it straight
Take control of your mind and meditate
Let your soul gravitate to the love, y'all, y'all


People killin', people dyin'
Children hurtin', hear them cryin'
Can you practice what you preach?
And would you turn the other cheek?
Father, father, father, help us
Send some guidance from above
'Cause people got me, got me questioning
Where is the love?

(Love) Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love, the love, the love?


It just ain't the same, old ways have changed
New days are strange, is the world insane?
If love and peace is so strong
Why are there pieces of love that don't belong?
Nations droppin' bombs
Chemical gases filling lungs of little ones
With ongoing sufferin' as the youth die young
So ask yourself, is the lovin' really gone?
So I can ask myself, really, what is going wrong
With this world that we livin' in? People keep on givin' in
Makin' wrong decisions, only visions of them dividends
Not respectin' each other, deny thy brother
A war is goin' on, but the reason's undercover
The truth is kept secret, and swept under the rug
If you never know truth, then you never know love
Where's the love, y'all? Come on (I don't know)
And where's the truth, y'all? Come on (I don't know)
And where's the love y'all?


People killin', people dyin'
Children hurtin', hear them cryin'
Can you practice what you preach?
And would you turn the other cheek?
Father, father, father, help us
Send some guidance from above
'Cause people got me, got me questioning
Where is the love?

(Love) Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love?
(Love) Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love? (The love)
Where is the love, the love, the love?


I feel the weight of the world on my shoulder
As I'm gettin' older, y'all people gets colder
Most of us only care about money-makin'
Selfishness got us followin' the wrong direction
Wrong information always shown by the media
Negative images is the main criteria
Infecting the young minds faster than bacteria
Kids wanna act like what they see in the cinema
Yo, whatever happened to the values of humanity? (Yeah)
Whatever happened to the fairness and equality? (Yeah)
Instead of spreading love, we spreading animosity (Yeah)
Lack of understanding leading us away from unity
That's the reason why sometimes I'm feelin' under
That's the reason why sometimes I'm feelin' down
It's no wonder why sometimes I'm feelin' under
Gotta keep my faith alive 'til love is found
Now ask yourself

Where is the love?
Where is the love?
Where is the love?
Where is the love?


Father, father, father, help us
Send some guidance from above
'Cause people got me, got me questioning
Where is the love?


Now sing with me, y'all (One world, one world)
We only got (One world, one world)
That's all we got (One world, one world)
And something's wrong with it (Yeah)
Something's wrong with it (Yeah)
Something's wrong with the w-world, world, yeah
We only got (One world, one world)
That's all we got (One world, one world)",10680
5155,19524,The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air,rap,DJ Jazzy Jeff & The Fresh Prince,1992,2476629,{},"
Now this is a story all about how
My life got flipped turned upside down
And I'd like to take a minute, just sit right there
I'll tell you how I became the prince of a town called Bel-Air


In West Philadelphia born and raised
On the playground is where I spent most of my days
Chillin' out, maxin', relaxin' all cool
And all shootin' some b-ball outside of the school
When a couple of guys who were up to no good
Started makin' trouble in my neighborhood
I got in one little fight and my mom got scared
And said ""You're movin' with your auntie and uncle in Bel-Air""
I begged and pleaded with her day after day
But she packed my suitcase and sent me on my way
She gave me a kiss and then she gave me my ticket
I put my Walkman on and said ""I might as well kick it""
First class, yo, this is bad
Drinking orange juice out of a champagne glass
Is this what the people of Bel-Air living like?
Hmm, this might be all right
But wait, I hear they're prissy, bourgeois, and all that
Is this the type of place that they should send this cool cat?
I don't think so, I'll see when I get there
I hope they're prepared for the Prince of Bel-Air

Well, uh
The plane landed and when I came out
There was a dude, looked like a cop, standing there with my name out
I ain't trying to get arrested yet, I just got here
I sprang with the quickness like lightning, disappeared
I whistled for a cab and when it came near
The license plate said 'Fresh' and it had dice in the mirror
If anything I could say that this cab was rare
But I thought ""Nah, forget it, yo, Holmes, to Bel-Air!""


I pulled up to a house about seven or eight
And I yelled to the cabbie ""Yo', Holmes, smell ya later""
I looked at my kingdom, I was finally there
To sit on my throne as the Prince of Bel-Air",20444
5271,20544,Feel Good Inc.,rap,Gorillaz,2005,2017092,"{""De La Soul""}","
Hahahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
Feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
(Change, change, change, change)
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
(Change, change, change, change)
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good


City's breaking down on a camel's back
They just have to go, 'cause they don't know wack
So while you fill the streets, it's appealing to see
And you won't get out the county 'cause you're damned and free
You got a new horizon, its ephemeral style
A melancholy town where we never smile
And all I wanna hear is the message beep
My dreams, they've got to kiss me 'cause I don't get to sleep, no
(*beep*)

Windmill, windmill for the land
Turn forever, hand in hand
Take it all in on your stride
It is ticking, falling down
Love forever, love is free
Let's turn forever, you and me
Windmill, windmill for the land
Is everybody in?


Laughin' gas, these hazmats, fast cats
Linin' 'em up like ass cracks
Play these ponies at the track
It's my chocolate attack
Shit, I'm steppin' in the heart of this here (Yeah)
Care Bear repping in harder this year (Yeah)
Watch me as I gravitate, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha!
Yo, we gon' ghost town this Motown
With yo' sound, you in the blink
Gon' bite the dust, can't fight with us
With yo' sound, you kill the Inc
So don't stop, get it, get it (Get it)
Until you're cheddar headed
And watch the way I navigate, hahahahaha
(Ha! Haha! Haha! Haha! Ha!)

Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good


Windmill, windmill for the land
Turn forever, hand in hand
Take it all in on your stride
It is ticking, falling down
Love forever, love is free
Let's turn forever, you and me
Windmill, windmill for the land
Is everybody in?


Don't stop, get it, get it, peep how your captain's in it
(Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good)
Steady, watch me navigate, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha!
(Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good)
Don't stop, get it, get it, peep how your captain's in it
(Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good)
Steady, watch me navigate, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha!
(Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good)
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good (Hahaha!)
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good (Hahaha!)
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good (Hahaha!)
Sha, sha-ba-da, sha-ba-da-ca; feel good (Hahahahahaha!)",21569
6355,31340,It Wasnt Me,rap,Shaggy,2000,1092304,{Rikrok},"
Yo, man
Yo
Open up, man
Yo, what you want, man?
My girl just caught me
You made her catch you?
I don't know how I let this happen
With who?
The girl next door, ya know?
Man
I don't know what to do
Say it wasn't you
Alright


Honey came in and she caught me red-handed
Creepin' with the girl next door
Picture this, we were both butt naked
Bangin' on the bathroom floor
How could I forget that I had
Given her an extra key?
All this time she was standin' there
She never took her eyes off me

How ya fi give the woman access to your villa?
Trespasser and a witness, all the hacklin' a yuh pillow
You better watch your back before she turn into a killa
Best review the situation that you caught up inna
To be a true player, you haffi know how fi play
If she say, ""A night,"" convince her, say, ""A day""
Never admit to a word weh she say
And if she claim a yuh, tell her, ""Baby, no way!""


But she caught me on the counter (Wasn't me)
Saw me bangin' on the sofa (Wasn't me)
I even had her in the shower (Wasn't me)
She even caught me on camera (Wasn't me)
She saw the marks on my shoulder (Wasn't me)
Heard the words that I told her (Wasn't me)
Heard the screams gettin' louder (Wasn't me)
She stayed until it was over


Honey came in and she caught me red-handed
Creepin' with the girl next door
Picture this, we were both butt naked
Bangin' on the bathroom floor
I had tried to keep her from what
She was about to see
Why should she believe me
When I told her it wasn't me?

Mek she know say that she really no have right fi vex
A never you she see yah make the gigolo flex
A smaddy else weh favor you inna di complex
Seein' is believin', so you better change your specs
You know she a go bring a whole heap a things up from the past
All the likkle evidence, you betta know fi mask
Quick 'pon yuh answer, know how fi talk
But if she pack a gun, you know you betta run fast


But she caught me on the counter (Wasn't me)
Saw me bangin' on the sofa (Wasn't me)
I even had her in the shower (It wasn't me)
She even caught me on camera (Wa-wasn't me)
She saw the marks on my shoulder (Wasn't me)
Heard the words that I told her (Wasn't me)
Heard the screams gettin' louder (Wasn't me)
She stayed until it was over


Honey came in and she caught me red-handed
Creepin' with the girl next door
Picture this, we were both butt naked
Bangin' on the bathroom floor
How could I forget that I had
Given her an extra key?
All this time she was standin' there
She never took her eyes off me

Gonna tell her that I'm sorry for the pain that I've caused
I've been listenin' to your reasonin', it makes no sense at all
Need to tell her that I'm sorry for the pain that I've caused
You may think that you're a player, but you're completely lost
That's why I sing


Honey came in and she caught me red-handed
Creepin' with the girl next door
Picture this, we were both butt naked
Bangin' on the bathroom floor
How could I forget that I had
Given her an extra key?
All this time she was standin' there
She never took her eyes off me",33108
7003,37510,Bulls on Parade,rock,Rage Against the Machine,1996,1242084,{},"
Come wit' it now
Come wit' it now


The microphone explodes, shattering the mold
Either drop the hits like de la O or get the fuck off the commode
With the sure shot, sure to make the bodies drop
Drop and don't copy, yo, don't call this a co-op
Terror rains drenchin', quenchin' the thirst
Of the power dons, that five-sided Fistagon
The rotten sore on the face of Mother Earth gets bigger
The trigger's cold, empty your purse


Rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells
They rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells
They rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells
They rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells


Weapons, not food, not homes, not shoes
Not need, just feed the war, cannibal animal
I walk the corner to the rubble, that used to be a library
Line up to the mind cemetery now
What we don't know keeps the contracts alive and movin'
They don't gotta burn the books, they just remove 'em
While arms warehouses fill as quick as the cells
Rally 'round the family, pockets full of shells

Rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells
They rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells
They rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells
They rally 'round the family with a pocket full of shells


Bulls on parade, uh


Come wit' it now
Come wit' it now
Bulls on parade
Bulls on parade
Bulls on parade
Bulls on parade
Bulls on parade
Bulls on parade",39690
7480,42776,Circle of Life,pop,Carmen Twillie & Lebo M,1994,1050049,{},"
Nants ingonyama bagithi Baba
Sithi uhm ingonyama

Nants ingonyama bagithi baba
Sithi uhhmm ingonyama
Ingonyama

Siyo Nqoba
Ingonyama
Ingonyama nengw' enamabala


From the day we arrive on the planet
And blinking, step into the sun
There is more to see than can ever be seen
More to do than can ever be done

There is far too much to take in here
More to find than can ever be found
But the sun rolling high
Through the sapphire sky
Keeps great and small on the endless round

It's the Circle of Life
And it moves us all
Through despair and hope
Through faith and love
'Til we find our place
On the path unwinding
In the circle
The Circle of Life
It's the Circle of Life
And it moves us all
Through despair and hope
Through faith and love
'Til we find our place
On the path unwinding
In the circle
The Circle of Life",67220
7911,46693,8 Mile: B-Rabbit vs Papa Doc,rap,Eminem,2002,2285316,{},"
Now, everybody from the 313
Put your motherfuckin' hands up and follow me!
Everybody from the 313
Put your motherfuckin' hands up! Look, look
Now, while he stands tough
Notice that this man did not have his hands up
This Free World's got you gassed up
Now, who's afraid of the Big Bad Wolf?
One, two, three, and to the four
One Pac, two Pac, three Pac, four
Four Pac, three Pac, two Pac, one
You're Pac, he's Pac, no Pac, none
This guy ain't no motherfuckin' MC
I know everything he's 'bout to say against me
I am white, I am a fucking bum
I do live in a trailer with my mom
My boy Future is an Uncle Tom
I do got a dumb friend named Cheddar Bob
Who shoots himself in his leg with his own gun
I did get jumped by all six of you chumps
And Wink did fuck my girl
I'm still standin' here screaming, ""Fuck the Free World!""
Don't ever try to judge me, dude
You don't know what the fuck I've been through
But I know something about you
You went to Cranbrook, that's a private school
What's the matter, dawg? You embarrassed?
This guy's a gangster? His real name's Clarence
And Clarence lives at home with both parents
And Clarence' parents have a real good marriage
This guy don't wanna battle, he's shook
'Cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
He's scared to death, he's scared to look
At his fucking yearbook; fuck Cranbrook!
Fuck a beat, I'll go a cappella
Fuck a Papa Doc, fuck a clock, fuck a trailer
Fuck everybody! Fuck y'all if you doubt me!
I'm a piece of fucking white trash, I say it proudly
And fuck this battle, I don't wanna win, I'm outtie
Here, tell these people something they don't know about me

Yo...",49065
7936,46753,HiiiPoWeR,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2011,1570981,{},"
Everybody put three fingers in the air
The sky is falling, the wind is calling
Stand for something or die in the morning
Section.80, HiiiPoWeR


Visions of Martin Luther staring at me
Malcolm X put a hex on my future, someone catch me
I'm falling victim to a revolutionary song, the Serengeti's clone
Back to put you backstabbers back on your spinal bone
You slipped your disc when I slid you my disc
You wanted to diss, but jumped on my dick
Grown men never should bite their tongue
Unless you eatin' pussy that smell like it's a stale plum
I got my finger on the motherfuckin' pistol
Aimin' it at a pig, Charlotte's web is gonna miss you
My issue isn't televised and you ain't gotta tell the wise
How to stay on beat, because our life's an instrumental
This is physical and mental, I won't sugarcoat it
You'd die from diabetes if these other niggas wrote it
And everything on TV just a figment of imagination
I don't want a plastic nation, dread that like a Haitian
While you motherfuckers waiting, I be off the slave ship
Building pyramids, writing my own hieroglyphs

Just call the shit HiiiPoWeR
Nigga, nothing less than HiiiPoWeR
Five-star dishes, food for thought, bitches
I mean this shit is
Huey Newton going stupid, you can't resist his
HiiiPoWeR
Throw your hands up for HiiiPoWeR


Visions of Martin Luther staring at me
If I see it how he seen it, that would make my parents happy
Sorry, mama, I can't turn the other cheek
They wanna knock me off the edge like a fuckin' widow's peak, uh
And she always told me pray for the weak, uh
Them demons got me, I ain't prayed in some weeks, uh
Dear Lord, come save me, the devil's working hard
He probably clockin' double shifts on all of his jobs
Frightenin', so fuckin' frightenin'
Enough to drive a man insane, I need a license to kill
I'm standing on a field full of land mines
Doin' the moonwalk, hopin' I blow up in time
'Cause 2012 might not be a fuckin' legend
Tryna be a fuckin' legend, the man of mankind
Who said a Black man in the Illuminati?
Last time I checked, that was the biggest racist party
So get up off that slave ship
Build your own pyramids, write your own hieroglyphs

Just call the shit HiiiPoWeR
Nigga, nothing less than HiiiPoWeR
Five-star dishes, food for thought, bitches
I mean this shit is
Bobby Seale makin' meals, you can't resist his
HiiiPoWeR
Throw your hands up for HiiiPoWeR


Every day, we fight the system just to make our way
We been down for too long, but that's alright
We was built to be strong, 'cause it's our life, na-na-na
Every day, we fight the system, we fight the system
We fight the system (Never like the system)
We been down for too long, but that's alright, na-na-na


Who said a Black man in the Illuminati?
Last time I checked, that was the biggest racist party
Last time I checked, we was racin' with Marcus Garvey
On the freeway to Africa 'til I wreck my Audi
And I want everybody to view my autopsy
So you can see exactly where the government had shot me
No conspiracy, my fate is inevitable
They play musical chairs once I'm on that pedestal
Frightenin', so fuckin' frightenin'
Enough to drive a man insane, a woman insane
The reason Lauryn Hill don't sing, or Kurt Cobain
Loaded that clip and then said bang
The drama it bring is crazy, product of the late '80s
Tryna stay above water, that's why we shun the Navy
Pull your guns and play me, let's set it off
'Cause a riot, throw a Molotov
Somebody told me them pirates had got lost
'Cause we been off them slave ships
Got our own pyramids, write our own hieroglyphs

Just call the shit HiiiPoWeR
Yeah, nothing less than HiiiPoWeR
Five-star dishes, food for thought, bitches
I mean this shit is
Fred Hampton on your campus, you can't resist his
HiiiPoWeR
Throw your hands up for HiiiPoWeR


Thug life
Thug life

",49129
7957,46810,Viva la Vida,rock,Coldplay,2008,1597729,{},"
I used to rule the world
Seas would rise when I gave the word
Now in the morning, I sleep alone
Sweep the streets I used to own


I used to roll the dice
Feel the fear in my enemy's eyes
Listened as the crowd would sing
""Now the old king is dead, long live the king""


One minute I held the key
Next, the walls were closed on me
And I discovered that my castles stand
Upon pillars of salt and pillars of sand


I hear Jerusalem bells a-ringing
Roman cavalry choirs are singing
Be my mirror, my sword and shield
My missionaries in a foreign field
For some reason, I can't explain
Once you'd gone, there was never
Never an honest word
And that was when I ruled the world

It was a wicked and wild wind
Blew down the doors to let me in
Shattered windows and the sound of drums
People couldn't believe what I'd become


Revolutionaries wait
For my head on a silver plate
Just a puppet on a lonely string (Mmm, mmm)
Oh, who would ever want to be king?


I hear Jerusalem bells a-ringing
Roman cavalry choirs are singing
Be my mirror, my sword and shield
My missionaries in a foreign field
For some reason, I can't explain
I know Saint Peter won't call my name
Never an honest word
But that was when I ruled the world


(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)

(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
Hear Jerusalem bells a-ringing
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
Roman cavalry choirs are singing
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
Be my mirror, my sword and shield
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
My missionaries in a foreign field
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
For some reason, I can't explain
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-woah)
I know Saint Peter won't call my name
Never an honest word
But that was when I ruled the world


Mmm, mmm, mmm, mmm
Mmm, mmm, mmm, mmm
Mmm, mmm",49192
8101,47186,She,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2011,1334932,"{""Tyler / The Creator"",""Frank Ocean""}","
Golden rubbers in these denim pockets (Denim pockets)
On my waist, there's a black Glock (Black Glock)
New girl moved on the block (On the block)
She been plottin' on my brown cock (Brown cock)
Last night I slept over hers (Over hers)
During sex, I overheard (I overheard)
A sword sliced the air, I pulled out the na-na
Rolled off the bed, then shot back, pow-pow
Blood on the sheets, probably spillin' from my gash
Looked out the glass, seen him sprintin' on the grass
A real ninja, with the blade and the mask
Had them gold ninja stars, and red Supreme nunchuks
Now she tryna patch me up, but
Girl, I was just tryna get a nut bust
If that's your ex, you should probably own a pistol
But I'm guessin' it's wiser to exit with dude


The blinds wide open so he can
See you in the dark when you're sleepin'
Naked body, fresh out the shower
And you touch yourself after hours
Ain't no man allowed in your bedroom
You're sleeping alone in bed
But check your window (Swag)
He's at your window

Night light hits off, turnin' kisses to bites
I'm a down to Earth nigga with intentions that's right
You'll be down in Earth quicker if you diss me tonight
But I'll be the happiest if you decide to kick it tonight
We can chill and I can act like I don't wanna fuck
You can tell me all your problems like I really give one (Nope)
But I give two for us 'cause you're the one that I want
Don't wanna seem like a punk pussy that simps over punk pussy
See when I'm with my friends I just put on a front
But in the back of my top, I'm writing songs about we
We, as including I, and yourself, making three
Little ones, the drums are hitting pretty hard if you ask me
You're a pretty broad in the top three
Of things that I've been waiting to come, so
Meet me by the lake around 10 and skinny dippin' and then
We can begin the pretend game, I wanna be Finn from Adventure Time


The blinds wide open so he can
See you in the dark when you're sleepin'
Naked body, fresh out the shower
And you touch yourself after hours
Ain't no man allowed in your bedroom
You're sleeping alone in bed
But check your window
He's at your window

One, two; you're the girl that I want
Three, four, five, six, seven; shit
Eight is the bullets if you say no after all this
And I just couldn't take it, you're so motherfuckin' gorgeous
Gorgeous, baby you're gorgeous
I just wanna drag your lifeless body to the forest
And fornicate with it
But that's because I'm in love with you, cunt


I just wanna talk, and conversate
'Cause I usually just stalk you and masturbate
And I finally got the courage to ask you on a date
So just say yes, let the future fall into place (Cunt)
I just wanna talk and conversate
'Cause I usually just stalk you and masturbate
And I finally got the courage to ask you on a date
So just say yes, let the future fall into place, cunt


The blinds wide open so he can
See you in the dark when you're sleepin'
Naked body, fresh out the shower
And you touch yourself after hours
Ain't no man allowed in your bedroom
You're sleeping alone in bed
But check your window
He's at your window
The blinds wide open so he can
See you in the dark when you're sleepin'
Naked body, fresh out the shower
You touch yourself after hours
Ain't no man allowed in your bedroom
You're sleeping alone in bed
He's at your window

One, two; you're the girl that I want
Three, four, five, six, seven; shit
Eight is the bullets if you say no after all this
And I just couldn't take it, you're so motherfuckin' gorgeous
Gorgeous, gorgeous, gorgeous, gorgeous",49611
8135,47287,In the End,rock,Linkin Park,2001,1826080,{},"
(It starts with one) One thing, I don't know why
It doesn't even matter how hard you try
Keep that in mind, I designed this rhyme
To explain in due time all I know
Time is a valuable thing
Watch it fly by as the pendulum swings
Watch it count down to the end of the day
The clock ticks life away, it's so unreal (It's so unreal)
Didn't look out below
Watch the time go right out the window
Tryin' to hold on, didn't even know
I wasted it all just to watch you go


I kept everything inside
And even though I tried, it all fell apart
What it meant to me will eventually be
A memory of a time when I tried so hard


I tried so hard and got so far
But in the end it doesn't even matter
I had to fall to lose it all
But in the end it doesn't even matter

One thing, I don't know why
It doesn't even matter how hard you try
Keep that in mind, I designed this rhyme
To remind myself how I tried so hard
In spite of the way you were mockin' me
Actin' like I was part of your property
Rememberin' all the times you fought with me
I'm surprised it got so far
Things aren't the way they were before
You wouldn't even recognize me anymore
Not that you knew me back then
But it all comes back to me in the end


You kept everything inside
And even though I tried, it all fell apart
What it meant to me will eventually be
A memory of a time when I tried so hard


I tried so hard and got so far
But in the end it doesn't even matter
I had to fall to lose it all
But in the end it doesn't even matter

I've put my trust in you
Pushed as far as I can go
For all this
There's only one thing you should know
I've put my trust in you
Pushed as far as I can go
For all this
There's only one thing you should know


I tried so hard and got so far
But in the end it doesn't even matter
I had to fall to lose it all
But in the end it doesn't even matter",49719
8156,47358,Worldwide Choppers,rap,Tech N9ne,2011,1155852,"{Twista,Yelawolf,""Busta Rhymes"",Ceza,USO,D-Loc,""Twisted Insane"",JL}","
Sen kalk, bir minik mikrofonunu getir
Bak jak burada, diktafonuna tak
Kağıt, kalem bir de ilham alınacak
Tam gaz choppers, havada düşman avına çıkalım
Akalım, haydi bu battle'ı kazanalım


We started in the Midwest (Midwest, Midwest)
Now we 'bout to take it (Take it, take it, take it) all over the world, baby (Baby, baby)
This is the pinnacle (Pinnacle, pinnacle) Yeah, Tech N9ne (Tech N9ne)


Follow me all around the planet, I run the gamut on Sickology
They can never manage, we do damage with no apology
Pick 'em off they panic a little manic, 'cause I gotta be
Frantic, I'ma jam it, 'cause I'm an oddity
Gobble the track up like I'm grubbin' at Mama Nakas
I can pop at you proper 'cause I'm partners of Waka Flocka
Gimme the top of hip-hop
And watch him make 'em rock with a show-stopper
Chakras poppin' off the (Worldwide Choppers)
If you anybody, you notice it
Tech is the pinnacle, not a identical soul is it
Loaded, cold as the polar get
Wrote it quick and they quoted it
Yo, it exploded the flow, behold it, 'cause when the motor spit
Abdiea, bdiea, never to get free of the real
Better get just kneel to me or ready to get near my heels
Gimme the knock and I'ma chop
But he came and he went tomorrow
But I'ma lock it down and hop in the pocket like empanadas
Hit 'em up and get 'em up
I ain't done, I ain't did enough
Trippin' when I rip it, I be the ish when I spit 'em up
Sorta like I was liquored up and backin' up in the gut
Everybody be knowin' I be actin' up when I bust
From Missouri to Canada, I be keepin' the stamina
If you never been a fan of the man, the brand is unanimous
Can I cuss? Fuck anybody! Tech is calamitous
Leave 'em in the dust ain't nobody tough when I'm standin' up
Tech is hostile, he's awful
And really be wicked when he be off in a bottle
You wit' it, you dig it, you never lost the apostle
He sick and he give it the Poe and toss in Picasso
Killin' everybody off is the motto
And I be the only chopper that's tossed in a brothel
You said it's pathetic, my head is off in a taco
I sped and you bled and you in a coffin when I go

I'm light years ahead of my peers
Want some, you can come bring it right here (Worldwide Choppers)
Can't clown me, don't come 'round me
Bow down, I was crowned when they found me


Check it, I'm ahead of 'em
Chop it up with the veterans
A legend developin'
Ain't gotta tell him it's evident
Gotta notice an elephant
None of you niggas relevant
You're delicate, but lovin' every second of this


De vil alle tjekke, når vi ligger det
Kommer ind og smækker det, beatet - jeg vækker det
I ved hva', der kommer ud af min mund
Hænger med de vildeste gutter
Det minder mig om, vi stikker det af
For de kalder mig alle fucking chopper


What if I ran into you with a pogo stick
Hopped up on top of you rappers like a Jehovah's Witness
With a photo of Jesus and a paper pamphlet
And I threw up more churches like I was playin' Hamlet
Syllable burnin', that internal damage
Swing, batter, batter, but then I lay back on a hammock
Under an oak tree like I was peelin' pecans
But instead I'm peelin' rappers' heads, makin' a sand-a-wich
Pick up a .22 and put a bullet inside of a
Motherfucka from Westside, a 1987 box
I'm headed up, yeah, headed for bucks
Fuck 'em all, make them feel my dread like I had a head of locks
Feel every bump like you had bad shocks
But I hopped on the fuckin' beat and I worldwide chopped
Wanna fuck with Tech N9ne, twist up the pine
And smoke a beat with Mr. Busta Rhymes? Well sure, why not?
Really don't need to show any more of my cock
But I run across the stadium in a pair of your socks
In a trench coat with the pencil and a watch
Then drop a verse before you can focus to read the clocks
Slumerican is out of control
Heat it up, beat it up, then I gotta go
But I'ma dump truck, just send another load
Peter Piper dump a pile of peppers in your throats
With an alien probe, I'm light years-

I'm light years ahead of my peers
Want some, you can come bring it right here (Worldwide Choppers)
Can't clown me, don't come 'round me
Bow down, I was crowned when they found me


Twista
Like I gotta focus up in my rhythm or loosen the venom
And hit 'em and give 'em astig-a-ma-tism
And then I'ma spit 'em somethin' so full of vengeance
That everybody'll wanna devour the pieces
Of my enemies 'cause of cannibalism
Breakin' them off into particles
They get in a predicament that be never reversible
'Cause a nigga be too versatile, makin' you nervous
You could never compete with the colonel
I burn you, I'm an immortal, and that's the reason I murder you
Focus on my hocus pocus and make a likkle magic
After I wreck and check ya, then your respect I better have it
'Cause I'm an anomaly, then I'ma give a lobotomy
To any motherfucker challengin' my astronomy
Hoppin', I don't stop with the fire when the flames thrown
I'm one of the most popular choppers and my name's known
Throwin' it up in the air, takin' it there
We WWC, if you can't keep up shoulda stayed home
My alien knowledge be makin' other astronomers'
Work look as ancient as a discovery of paleontology
So play me and I'ma be shinin' on them haters
I'm finna be usin' it as energy, watch how radiant I'ma be
Like a helicopter when the words fly
Entire families all the way out to you girl die
If I catch you fuckin' with the most intricate lyricists
Don't even try to stop us, 'cause we choppers and we worldwide
And I'm-

I'm light years ahead of my peers
Want some, you can come bring it right here (Worldwide Choppers)
Can't clown me, don't come 'round me
Bow down, I was crowned when they found me


See, now they ask when I'ma stomp on my dude
And when I'ma cock it and pop it and what I'ma drop on my dude
Inevitably is that I'ma be the most incredible dude
To ever spit on the record and put it together, my dude (Worldwide Choppers)
And then they ask ""What in the world is you provin'
When you were already the best?"" and ""What the hell is he doin'?""
Well, I'ma be choppin' and cuttin'
And breakin' and beatin' and shakin'
And fuckin' everything up 'til I make no further mistake and
Bustin' everything up like a fuckin' angry Jamaican
And shuttin' everything up, especially the ones who be hatin'
They lovin' everything until I got 'em stutterin' stupid
You hear 'em now? ""D-d-d-d-don't do-do-do-do it!
P-p-p-please, wh-wh-wh-why you gotta t-try us?
W-w-w-w-we already know that you be the nicest""
And now I'ma come and kill 'em
Get 'em, hit 'em and finish 'em
And bang 'em in the head and diminish them
And then I'll hit 'em again at a minimum
Repeat it, comin' to killin' 'em
Then he be gotta be drillin' 'em
Thinkin', ""They gotta be feelin' him!""
Spittin' lithium, see the way a nigga be spillin' 'em
And gettin' 'em stupid to the point where there's no forgivin' him
Hopin' you're listenin' and you're payin' attention
And you're witnessin' the way that I be christenin' in the mic
And gettin' in the zone, I be flattenin' and packin' in
People from the front to the back and
They got me actin' a fool, I'm black and, nigga, now I'm home!


I'm light years ahead of my peers
Want some, you can come bring it right here (Worldwide Choppers)
Can't clown me, don't come 'round me
Bow down, I was crowned when they found me


My fire annihilate make fighters retire instantly
I'm choppin' 'em: call me Michael Myers in my vicinity
The way I be killin' 'em with rhythm, it get illegitimate
The Gilla will finish any in a predicament (Worldwide Choppers)
Any enemies in the vicinity, I gotta mack up
They know they never can get with me whenever they mention me
The history of a lyrical criminal more deadly than chemicals
Check my resume, they said the Gillgod's biblical (Worldwide Choppers)


I hit 'em with venom when I get up in 'em
I bend 'em and send 'em and you can feel me
Diggin' up in your brain and bringin' the pain
They often wanna kill me
Fillin' 'em with that fury, get up and hurry
You can feel the real me
Comin' up with that shit, I'm havin' a fit
And you will never peel me
Off of you when I'm on top of you, I got the drop on you
And poppin' often, hit 'em up with a bullet to the (Brain)
You can look into the eyes of a heathen, breathin'
You're fiendin' and dreamin' to find a demon, name Insane
I'm a worldwide (Chopper)",49799
8233,47562,I’m On One,rap,DJ Khaled,2011,1320886,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Rick Ross"",Drake}","


I get 'em up! (I'm on one)
I get 'em up! (Fuck it, I'm on one)
I get 'em up! (I said, ""I'm on one"")
DJ Khaled!


Ugh, I'm getting so throwed
I ain't went this hard since I was eighteen
Apologize if I say anything I don't mean
Like, ""What's up with your best friend?
We could all have some fun, believe me""
And, ""What's up with these new niggas?
And why they think it all comes so easy?""
But get it while you here, boy
'Cause all that hype don't feel the same next year, boy
Yeah, and I be right here in my spot
With a little more cash than I already got
Tripping off you 'cause you had your shot
With my skin tan and my hair long and my fans who been so patient
Me and 40 back to work, but we still smell like a vacation
Hate the rumors, hate the bullshit, hate these fucking allegations
I'm just feeling like the throne is for the taking-watch me take it

All I care about is money and the city that I'm from
I'ma sip until I feel it, I'ma smoke it 'til it's done
I don't really give a fuck and my excuse is that I'm young
And I'm only getting older, somebody should've told you


I'm on one, yeah
Fuck it, I'm on one, yeah
I said, ""I'm on one""
Fuck it, I'm on one
Two white cups and I got that drink
Could be purple or could be pink
'Pending on how you mix that shit
Money to be got and I'ma get that shit
'Cause I'm on one
I said, ""Fuck it, I'm on one""


Huh! I'm burning purple flowers, it's burning my chest (Huh)
I bury the most cash and burning the rest (Stuntin')
Walking on the clouds, suspended in thin air (Yeah)
The ones beneath me recognize the red bottoms I wear (Check it)
Burner in the belt, move the kids to the hills (Boss)
Bend shawty on the sink, do it for the thrill
Kiss you on your neck and tell you, ""Everything is great"" (Right)
Even though I'm out on bond and might be facing eight
Still running with the same niggas 'til the death of me
Never seen a million cash, gotta count it carefully (Haha)
Ever made love to the woman of your dreams (Woo!)
In a room full of money out in London as she screams? (Woo!)
Huh! Baby, I could take it there
Call Marc Jacobs personally to make a pair
So, yeah, we on one, the feeling ain't fair (Khaled)
And it's double MG until I get the chair, chyeah

All I care about is money and the city that I'm from (Huh)
I'ma sip until I feel it, I'ma smoke it 'til it's done
I don't really give a fuck, and my excuse is that I'm young
And I'm only getting older, somebody should've told you


I'm on one, yeah
Fuck it, I'm on one, yeah
I said ""I'm on one""
Fuck it, I'm on one
Two white cups and I got that drink
Could be purple or could be pink
'Pending on how you mix that shit
Money to be got and I'ma get that shit
'Cause I'm on one
I said, ""Fuck it, I'm on one""


I walk around the club, fuck everybody
And all my niggas got that heat, I feel like Pat Riley
Yeah, too much money ain't enough money
You know the feds listening-nigga, what money?
I'm a made nigga, I should dust something
You niggas on the bench, like the bus coming
Huh, ain't nothing sweet but the Swishers
I'm focused, might as well say ""cheese"" for the pictures
Ohh, I'm about to go Andre the Giant
You a sellout, but I ain't buying
Chopper dissect a nigga like science
Put an end to your world like the Mayans
This a celebration, bitches: Mazel tov
It's a slim chance I fall: Olive Oyl
""Tunechi"" be the name, don't ask me how I got it
I'm killing these hoes, I swear I'm tryna stop the violence

All I care about is money (Yeah) and the city that I'm from
I'ma sip until I feel it, I'ma smoke it 'til it's done
I don't really give a fuck, and my excuse is that I'm young
And I'm only getting older, somebody should've told you


I'm on one, yeah (Young Mula, baby)
Fuck it, I'm on one (YMCMB)
Yeah, I said, ""I'm on one"" (Uh-huh)
Fuck it, I'm on one
Two white cups and I got that drink
Could be purple or could be pink
'Pending on how you mix that shit
Money to be got and I'ma get that shit
'Cause I'm on one (Haha)
I said, ""Fuck it, I'm on one""


I get 'em up
I get 'em up
I get 'em up
DJ Khaled",50025
8338,47863,Rolling Stone,rb,The Weeknd,2011,1007777,{},"
Ooh
Yeah, yeah, yeah


Now you're thinkin' 'bout it
Girl you're thinkin' 'bout it
What we got here
How we fuckin' got here
They recognized
They just recognize
I'm in a life without a home so this recognition's not enough
I don't care about nobody else
Cause I've been on these streets way too long, too long, too long
Baby, I've been on this too long


'Cause getting faded too long
Got me on this rolling stone
So I take another hit
Kill another serotonin
With a hand full of beans
And a chest full of weed
Got me singing 'bout a bitch
While I'm blowing out my steam
Yeah, I know I got my issues
Why you think I fuckin' flow?
And I'ma keep on smoking 'til I can't hit another note

Ooh, but until then
I got you, ooh
Baby, I got you, ooh
Until you're used to my face
And my mystery fades
I got you, ooh


So, baby, love me, oh
Before they all love me
Until you won't love me, oh
Because they'll all love me, ooh
I'll be different, oh
I think I'll be different, ooh
I hope I'm not different, oh
And I hope you'll still listen


But until then
Baby, I got you, ooh
I got you, oh, ohh
Girl, I still got you, oh-ohh
And I got you, ooh, woah",50398
8495,48325,Marvins Room,rb,Drake,2011,3162239,{},"
Hello?
Yeah, I just walked in
Yeah, I'm good, you still working?
Tonight, right now?
Did I go out? Yeah, I went out, I went
I went to a couple of clubs
I never went to bed, shit
Wine or water?
Did you say something about a cold drink? I don't know
I'm delirious


Cups of the rosé
Bitches in my old phone
I should call one and go home
I've been in this club too long
The woman that I would try
Is happy with a good guy
But I've been drinkin' so much
That I'ma call her anyway and say

Fuck that nigga that you love so bad
I know you still think about the times we had
I say fuck that nigga that you think you found
And since you pick up, I know he's not around, oh, oh


Are you drunk right now?
I'm just sayin' you could do better
Tell me, have you heard that lately?
I'm just sayin' you could do better
And I'll start hatin' only if you make me


Uh, cups of the XO
All my people been here
I see all of her friends here
Guess she don't have the time to kick it no more
Flight's in the morning
What you doin' that's so important?
I've been drinkin' so much
That I'ma call you anyway and say


Fuck that nigga that you love so bad
I know you still think about the times we had
I say fuck that nigga that you think you found
And since you pick up, I know he's not around

Are you drunk right now?
I'm just sayin' you could do better
Tell me, have you heard that lately?
I'm just sayin' you could do better
And I'll start hatin' only if you make me


I think I'm addicted to naked pictures
And sittin' talkin' 'bout bitches that we almost had
I don't think I'm conscious of makin' monsters
Outta the women I sponsor 'til it all goes bad
But, shit, it's all good
We threw a party, yeah, we threw a party
Bitches came over, yeah, we threw a party
I was just callin' 'cause they were just leavin'
Talk to me, please, don't have much to believe in
I need you right now, are you down to listen to me?
Too many drinks have been given to me
I got some women that's livin' off me
Paid for their flights and hotels, I'm ashamed
Bet that you know them, I won't say no names
After a while, girl, they all seem the same
I've had sex four times this week, I'll explain
Havin' a hard time adjustin' to fame
Sprite in there mixed up
I've been talkin' crazy, girl, I'm lucky that you picked up
Lucky that you stayed on
I need someone to put this weight on
Fuck, I'm sorry

Are you drunk right now?
I'm just sayin' you could do better
Tell me, have you heard that lately?
I'm just sayin' you could do better
And I'll start hatin' only if you make me


You not gon' come?
I guess I'm 'bout to just kick it here then


Just throw up while I hold your hair back
Her white friend said, ""You niggas crazy,"" I hope no one heard that
Yeah, I hope no one heard that
'Cause if they did, we gon' be in some trouble, yeah
If they did, we gon' be in some trouble, trouble, oh",50895
8565,48523,Work Out,rap,J. Cole,2011,1227182,{},"
I want to see you work out for me, work out for me


Ayy, we've got a good thing
Don't know if I'ma see you again
But is that a good thing?
'Cause girl, I can't be your man, no ma'am
I know what's on your brain
You probably hoped it never would end
Like, ""Is it the real thing
Or is it just a one-night stand?""
Well then


Let me see you get high, then go low
Now, girl, won't you drop that thing down to the floor?
I'm here for one night, how far will you go?
I wanna see you (Work out for me, work out for me)
High, then go low
Now, girl, won't you drop that thing down to the floor?
I'm here for one night, how far will you go?
I wanna see you (Work out for me, work out for me)

She like them boys with the big ol' chains
Ridin' around town in a big ol' Range
I knew her when I rocked big ol' jeans
Now the little nigga doin' big ol' thangs
Would you look at that? I came back for her
Just to give it to ya, like you asked for it
Man, that thing in them jeans too fat for her
Rebounds so I caught her off the backboard
I told her: ""Baby girl, come here
Know I run the town even when I ain't from there.""
And I brag hardly, but just to show up at this party
I made what yo' nigga make in one year
That's unfair, but so is life, take a chance, roll the dice
Money can't buy you love, 'cause it's overpriced
Don't overthink, just hope it's right
I'm only here for the night


Ayy, we've got a good thing
Don't know if I'ma see you again
But is that a good thing?
'Cause girl, I can't be your man, no ma'am
I know what's on your brain
You probably hoped it never would end
Like, ""Is it the real thing
Or is it just a one-night stand?""
Well then

Let me see you get high, then go low
Now, girl, won't you drop that thing down to the floor?
I'm here for one night, how far will you go?
I wanna see you (Work out for me, work out for me)
High, then go low
Now, girl, won't you drop that thing down to the floor?
I'm here for one night, how far will you go?
I wanna see you (Work out for me, work out for me)


Carolina Blue kicks, fresh on the scene
Hottest nigga on the block
Damn, girl, you're mean
They be startin' shit, but it's yo' world
On my Martin shit: ""You go, girl!""
She bad and she know it
Some niggas save hoes, I'm not that heroic
Could you be my escort?
'Cause just like them two door Fords
Damn, they don't make 'em like you no more
Cole World, real Cole World
Them boys cool-me, I'm on fire
Know what's on my mind
Tryna see what's on yours tonight, tonight, tonight
Move slow, 'cause you wanna live fast
Up late so you'll probably skip class
Life is a test so before the night pass, get right, get right

Ayy, we've got a good thing
Don't know if I'ma see you again
But is that a good thing?
'Cause girl, I can't be your man, no ma'am
I know what's on your brain
You probably hoped it never would end
Like, ""Is it the real thing
Or is it just a one-night stand?""
Well then (Cole World)


Straight up, now tell me
Do you really wanna love me forever? (Oh oh oh)
Or is it just a hit-and-run?
(Well, hey) Straight up, I tell ya
I just really wanna cut when we together (Oh oh oh)
Come here, girl, let's get it on!
(Work out for me)
Straight up, now tell me
Do you really wanna love me forever? (Oh oh oh)
Or is it just a hit-and-run?
Well straight up, I tell ya
I just really wanna cut when we together (Oh oh oh)
Come here, girl, let's get it on!
(Work out for me)",51110
8629,48683,Someone Like You,pop,Adele,2011,1804078,{},"
I heard that you're settled down
That you found a girl and you're married now
I heard that your dreams came true
Guess she gave you things I didn't give to you
Old friend, why are you so shy?
Ain't like you to hold back or hide from the light


I hate to turn up out of the blue, uninvited
But I couldn't stay away, I couldn't fight it
I had hoped you'd see my face
And that you'd be reminded that for me, it isn't over


Never mind, I'll find someone like you
I wish nothing but the best for you, too
Don't forget me, I beg
I remember you said
Sometimes it lasts in love, but sometimes it hurts instead
Sometimes it lasts in love, but sometimes it hurts instead

You know how the time flies
Only yesterday was the time of our lives
We were born and raised in a summer haze
Bound by the surprise of our glory days


I hate to turn up out of the blue, uninvited
But I couldn't stay away, I couldn't fight it
I had hoped you'd see my face
And that you'd be reminded that for me, it isn't over


Never mind, I'll find someone like you
I wish nothing but the best for you, too
Don't forget me, I beg
I remember you said
Sometimes it lasts in love, but sometimes it hurts instead


Nothing compares, no worries or cares
Regrets and mistakes, they're memories made
Who would have known how bittersweet this would taste?


Never mind, I'll find someone like you
I wish nothing but the best for you
Don't forget me, I beg
I remember you said
Sometimes it lasts in love, but sometimes it hurts instead

Never mind, I'll find someone like you
I wish nothing but the best for you, too
Don't forget me, I beg
I remember you said
Sometimes it lasts in love, but sometimes it hurts instead
Sometimes it lasts in love, but sometimes it hurts instead",51294
8653,48749,Trust Issues,rap,Drake,2011,1039675,{},"
Uh
Aw yeah, aw yeah
Call up on drank and let's
Let's call up and, uh


All I care about is money and the city that I'm from
I'ma sip until I feel it, I'ma smoke it 'til it's done
I don't really give a fuck and my excuse is that I'm young
And I'm only getting older, somebody should've told you
I'm on one (Ayy), fuck it, I'm on one (Yeah)
I said I'm on one, fuck it, I'm on one, a strong one
Two white cups and I got that drink
It could be purple, it could be pink
Depending on how you mix that shit
Money to be got, and I'ma get that shit
'Cause I'm on one, fuck it, I'm on one
Aw yeah, aw yeah
You know what I'm
Oh yes, oh yeah
Oh yes, oh yeah
Uh, oh yes, oh yeah
Yeah, uh

You know what I'm sipping, I'll teach you how to mix it
But you're the only one 'cause I don't trust these bitches
I don't, I don't trust these bitches, they might catch me slipping
So you're the only one, 'cause I don't trust these bitches
They might, they might catch me slipping and put in something different
So you're the only one, 'cause I don't trust these bitches
I don't, I don't trust these bitches, they might catch me slipping
So you're the only one


Oh-woah, trust issues
Oh-woah, trust issues
Oh-woah, trust issues
Oh-woah, woah, woah, woah


Yeah, aw yeah, aw yeah
Let's call up on drank and let's all get wasted
On drank and let's all get faded, yeah, uh


Drizzy Drake, check me out
Coming live from the motherfuckin' North Side
Kick game, run game, run it real good
But never ever have my bitches sitting courtside
Same nigga that you knew way back when
You acting like it's somebody you don't know
Tell me, how the fuck we 'posed to stay friends
When you got a bunch of feelings that you don't show?
I could tell, I could tell, I could tell
Certain people don't like me no more
New shit don't excite me no more
Guess that they don't really make 'em like me no more, uh
You can look me in my eyes and see I ain't myself
'Cause if y'all what I created then I hate myself
But still, let them girls in and tell 'em all
Leave them cell phones on the table where we see them
I'm all day with it, man, AM to the PM
Niggas hating, I just wish that they would say it when they see him, oh

That's that shit that drives me crazy
And it's all that I've been getting lately
And it's probably why I'm scared to put the time in
Women want to fuck like they're me and I'm them
Looking for some things and I think that I can find 'em in you, in you


Oh-woah, trust issues
Oh-woah, trust issues
Oh-woah, trust issues
Oh-woah, woah, woah, woah


Yeah, aw yeah, aw yeah
Let's call up on drank and let's all get wasted
On drank and let's all get faded, yeah
Aw yeah, aw yeah
Call up on drank and let's
Let's call up on, uh",51360
8785,49126,Rigamortis,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2011,1589746,{},"
Alright, here we go, third take
Real quick, Ali
Mmm


Got me breathing with dragons
I'll crack the egg in your basket, you bastard
I'm Marilyn Manson with madness
Now just imagine the magic I light to asses
Don't ask for your favorite rapper
(He dead), yes, sir (Amen), church
(He dead), I killed him (Amen), bitch


And this is rigor mortis and it's gorgeous when you die
Ali recorded and I'm Morpheus, the matrix of my mind
I'm out the orbit, you an orphan and a hairdresser combined
I'm on the toilet when I rhyme, if you the shit, then I decline
I climax where you begin and then I end on cloud nine
And that's important when you morph into an angel in the sky
And don't be forging all my signatures, my listeners reply
And tell me that you biting style, you got a hell of an appetite
And I'ma be here for a while, just buckle up before the ride
Or knuckle up if you can fight, we always making 'em duck or die
A suit and tie is suitable and usual in suicide
CSI just might investigate this fucking parasite
(He dead, amen)
That's what they telling me
Aim it at your celebrity, this is studio felony
Ferragami so many and cool enough for the '70s
Nigga, payback's a bitch, and bitch, you been livin' in debt with me
Dead 'em all and especially
Leave a call on his mother voicemail that say that he rest in peace
Bigger chopper the recipe
Wrestling? That's irrelevant, rather rest at your residence
Whistling to the melody, couldn't think of a better D
Better be on your P and Q, it's just me, Jay Rock, Soul, and Q
Solar system and barbecue, nothing else you can do

(He dead), yup-yup (Amen), I killed him
(He dead, amen), amen
Got me breathing with dragons
I'll crack the egg in your basket, you bastard
I'm Marilyn Manson, don't ask for your favorite rapper
(He dead), yup-yup (Amen), I know
(He dead), for sure (Amen), amen
Got me breathing with dragons
I'll crack the egg in your basket, you bastard
I'm Marilyn Manson, don't ask for your favorite rapper


I wrapped him and made him Casper, I capture the likes of NASA
My pedigree to fly past ya, I'll pass the weed to the pastor
We all are sinners, won't you send us to Bible study faster?
Your hypocritist reaction a blasphemy, I assassin my casualty
And it's casually done, and tell 'em my salary come
In lump sum one hundreds, don't talk to me 'bout no money
The sun is under my feet, and I come in peace to compete
I don't run if you'd rather leap, my statistics go up in weeks
And I go visit the nearest creek, and I get busy on many MC
Really ballistic, anybody can see
Any assistance, everybody deceased
Some persistence, recognize I be
Really too vicious, the permanent beast
And the demolition breaking up the street
Better partition, better dot your T
And I gon' mention how the far you see
Putting my dick in the rap industry
Everybody bitching, getting mad at me
Recognize Kendrick in the battery
And I'm charged up, and the catastrophe
Is charged up, and the audacity
Of y'all fucks never could hassle me
And y'all luck just ran out, you'll see

(He dead), yup-yup (Amen), I know
(He dead), for sure (Amen), amen
Got me breathing with dragons
I'll crack the egg in your basket, you bastard
I'm Marilyn Manson, don't ask for your favorite rapper
(He dead), yup-yup (Amen), I know
(He dead), for sure (Amen), amen",51798
8788,49129,A.D.H.D,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2011,2291003,{},"
Uh-uh, fuck that


Eight doobies to the face, fuck that
Twelve bottles in the case, nigga, fuck that
Two pills and a half-weight, nigga, fuck that
Got a high tolerance when your age don't exist


Man, I swear my nigga trippin' off that shit again
Pick him up, then I set him in cold water
Then I order someone to bring him Vicodin
Hope that take the pain away
From the feelin' that he feel today
You know when you part of Section.80
You feel like no one can relate
'Cause you are, you are, a loner, loner
Marijuana endorphins make you stronger, stronger
I'm in the house party trippin' off
My generation sippin' cough syrup like it's water
Never no pancakes in the kitchen
Man, not one of our lives is caught up
In the daily superstition that the world is 'bout to end
Who gives a fuck? We never do listen
'Less it comes with an 808 (A melody and some hoes)
PlayStation and some drank (Technology bought my soul)
Lookin' around and all I see is a big crowd that's product of me
And they probably relatives relevant for a rebel's dream
Yep, her president is Black, she Black too
Purple Label on her back, but that tab is light blue
She take it straight to the head, then she look at me
She got ADHD

Eight doobies to the face, fuck that
Twelve bottles in the case, nigga, fuck that
Two pills and a half-weight, nigga, fuck that
Got a high tolerance when your age don't exist


Like woah-woah, woah, woah-woah, woah (Don't got a limit, just give me some more with it)
Woah-woah, woah, woah-woah, woah (Don't got a limit, just give me some more with it)
(They always told me ADHD did it)
Woah, woah-woah


And then she started
And then she started feelin' herself like no one else in this apartment
""Beg your pardon? Oh, I rap, baby, how old are you?""
She say twenty-two, I say twenty-three, ""Okay, then we are crack babies,"" damn
""Why you say that?"" She said, ""Where my drink at?""
""I'ma tell you later, just tell your neighbors and the police relax""
I stood up, shut the blind, closed the screen, Jumbotron
Made to the back where she reside, then she said, ""Read between the lines,"" yep
Hope that I get close enough when the lights turn down
And the fact that she just might open up when the Nuvo start to drown
Her body, and I know the both of us really deep in the mood now
It's nothin' we can do now, somebody walked in with a pound (Woah)
Of that Bay Area kush, she looked at me, then looked
At it, then she grabbed it, then she said, ""Get it understood""
""You know why we crack babies? Because we born in the '80s
The ADHD crazy""

Eight doobies to the face, fuck that
Twelve bottles in the case, nigga, fuck that
Two pills and a half-weight, nigga, fuck that
Got a high tolerance when your age don't exist


Like woah-woah, woah, woah-woah, woah (Don't got a limit, just give me some more with it)
Woah-woah, woah, woah-woah, woah (Don't got a limit, just give me some more with it)
(They always told me ADHD did it)
Woah, woah-woah


You can have all my shine, I'll give you the light
Double cup, deuce, four, six, just mix it in Sprite
Ecstasy, 'shrooms, blow, 'dro, hoes, whatever you like
You can have all my shine, I'll give you the light

",51801
8819,49214,Niggas in Paris,rap,JAY-Z & Kanye West,2011,6255019,{},"
We're gonna skate to one song, one song only
Ball so hard, motherfuckers wanna fine me


So I ball so hard, motherfuckers wanna fine me
But first niggas gotta find me
What's fifty grand to a motherfucker like me? Can you please remind me?
(Ball so hard) This shit crazy
Y'all don't know that don't shit faze me
The Nets could go 0 for 82
And I'd look at you like this shit gravy
(Ball so hard) This shit weird
We ain't even 'posed to be here
(Ball so hard) Since we here
It's only right that we'd be fair
Psycho, I'm liable to go Michael, take your pick
Jackson, Tyson, Jordan, Game 6
(Ball so hard) Got a broke clock
Rollies that don't tick-tock
Audemars that's losing time
Hidden behind all these big rocks
(B-ball so hard) I'm shocked too
I'm supposed to be locked up too
You escaped what I escaped
You'd be in Paris getting fucked up too
(B-ball so hard) Let's get faded
Le Meurice for like six days
Gold bottles, scold models
Spillin' Ace on my sick J's
(Ball so hard) Bitch, behave
Just might let you meet Ye
Chi-Town's D. Rose
I'm moving the Nets, BK

Ball so hard, motherfuckers wanna fine me
That shit cray, that shit cray, that shit cray
B-ball so hard, motherfuckers wanna fine me
That shit cray, that shit cray, that shit cray


She said, ""Ye, can we get married at the mall?""
I said, ""Look, you need to crawl 'fore you ball""
Come and meet me in the bathroom stall
And show me why you deserve to have it all
(Ball so hard) That shit cray, ain't it, Jay?
(B-ball so hard) What she order, fish fillet?
(B-ball so hard) Your whip so cold, this old thing?
(Ball so hard) Act like you'll ever be around motherfuckers like this again
Bougie girl, grab her hand
Fuck that bitch, she don't wanna dance
Excuse my French, but I'm in France, ahah, I'm just sayin'
Prince Williams ain't do it right, if you ask me
'Cause I was him, I would have married Kate and Ashley
What's Gucci, my nigga? What's Louis, my killer?
What's drugs, my dealer? What's that jacket, Margiela?
Doctors say I'm the illest 'cause I'm suffering from realness
Got my niggas in Paris and they going gorillas, huh


I don't even know what that means
No one knows what it means, but it's provocative
No, it's not, it's gross
Gets the people going

Ball so hard, motherfuckers wanna fine me
B-ball so hard, motherfuckers wanna fine me


You are now watching the throne
Don't let me get in my zone
Don't let me get in my zone
Don't let me get in my zone
These other niggas is lyin'
Actin' like the summer ain't mine
(I got that hot bitch in my home)
You know how many hot bitches I own?
Don't let me get in my zone
Don't let me get in my zone
Don't let me get in my zone
Don't let me get in my zone
The stars is in the building
They hands is to the ceiling
I know I'm 'bout to kill it
How you know? I got that feeling
You are now watching the throne
Don't let me into my zone
Don't let me into my zone
(I'm definitely in my zone)
",51899
8846,49317,Otis,rap,JAY-Z & Kanye West,2011,1208557,"{""Otis Redding""}","


It makes it easier, easier to bear
You won't regret it, no, no, no
Some girls, they don't forget it
Love is their only happiness
Squee'- Squee'- Squee'-
(Sounds so soulful, don't you agree?)
Squeeze her, don't tease her, never leave her


Uh, I invented swag
Poppin' bottles, puttin' supermodels in the cab
Proof
I guess I got my swagger back, truth
New watch alert, Hublots
Or the big-face Rollie, I got two of those
Arm out the window, through the city, I maneuver slow
Cock back, snapback, see my cut through the holes, Hov

Damn, Yeezy and Hov, where the hell you been?
Niggas talking real reckless, stuntmen
I adopted these niggas, Phillip Drummond them
Now I'm 'bout to make 'em tuck they whole summer in
They say I'm crazy, well, I'm 'bout to go dumb again
They ain't seen me 'cause I pulled up in my other Benz
Last week, I was in my other, other Benz
Throw your diamonds up 'cause we in this bitch another 'gain


Photoshoot fresh, looking like wealth
I'm 'bout to call the paparazzi on myself
Uh, live from the Mercer
Run up on Yeezy the wrong way, I might murk ya
Flee in the G450, I might surface
Political refugee, asylum can be purchased
Uh, everything's for sale
I got five passports, I'm never going to jail


I made ""Jesus Walks,"" I'm never going to hell
Couture-level flow is never going on sale
Luxury rap, the Hermès of verses
Sophisticated ignorance, write my curses in cursive
I get it custom, you a customer
You ain't accustomed to going through customs, you ain't been nowhere, hah?
And all the ladies in the house got 'em showing off
I'm done, I'll hit you up maña- nah

Welcome to Havana
Smoking Cubanos with Castro in cabanas
Viva México, Cubano
Dominicano, all the plugs that I know
Driving Benzes with no benefits
Not bad, huh, for some immigrants?
Build your fences, we diggin' tunnels
Can't you see we gettin' money up under you?


Can't you see the private jets flying over you?
Maybach bumper sticker read, ""What would Hova do?""
Jay is chillin' (Uh), Ye is chillin' (Uh)
What more can I say? We killin' 'em
Hold up before we end this campaign
As you can see, we done bodied the damn lames
Lord, please let them accept the things they can't change
And pray that all of they pain be champagne


Scream it
Give it
Scream it",52019
8847,49318,No Church in the Wild,rap,JAY-Z & Kanye West,2011,3244876,"{The-Dream,""Frank Ocean""}","


Human beings in a mob
What's a mob to a king?
What's a king to a god?
What's a god to a non-believer
Who don't believe in anything?
Will he make it out alive?
Alright, alright
No church in the wild


Tears on the mausoleum floor
Blood stains the Colosseum doors
Lies on the lips of a priest
Thanksgiving disguised as a feast
Rolling in the Rolls-Royce Corniche
Only the doctors got this, I'm hiding from police
Cocaine seats
All white like I got the whole thing bleached
Drug dealer chic
I'm wondering if a thug's prayers reach
Is Pius pious 'cause God loves pious?
Socrates asked whose bias do y'all seek?
All for Plato, screech
I'm out here balling, I know y'all hear my sneaks
Jesus was a carpenter, Yeezy laid beats
Hova flow the Holy Ghost, get the hell up out your seats
Preach

Human beings in a mob
What's a mob to a king?
What's a king to a god?
What's a god to a non-believer
Who don't believe in anything?
Will he make it out alive?
Alright, alright
No church in the wild


I live by you, desire
I stand by you, walk through the fire
Your love is my scripture
Let me in through your encryption
Yeah, yeah


Coke on her Black skin made it stripe like a zebra
I call that jungle fever
You will not control the threesome
Just roll the weed up until I get me some
We formed a new religion
No sins as long as there's permission
And deception is the only felony
So never fuck nobody without telling me
Sunglasses and Advil
Last night was mad real
Sun coming up, 5 a.m.
I wonder if they got cabs still
Thinking 'bout the girl in all leopard
Who was rubbing the wood like Kiki Shepard
Two tattoos, one read, ""No apologies""
The other said, ""Love is cursed by monogamy""
That's something that the pastor don't preach
That's something that a teacher can't teach
When we die, the money, we can't keep
But we'll probably spend it all 'cause the pain ain't cheap
Preach

Human beings in a mob
What's a mob to a king?
What's a king to a god?
What's a god to a non-believer
Who don't believe in anything?
Will he make it out alive?
Alright, alright
No church in the wild


No church in the wild
No church in the wild
No church in the wild",52020
8849,49320,Gotta Have It,rap,JAY-Z & Kanye West,2011,1200716,{},"


Turn my headphones up
Louder
Uh-huh, uh-huh
What you need, what-what you need
I got what you need, what-what you need
What you need, what-what you need
I got what you need


Hello, hello, hello, hello, white America, assassinate my character
Money matrimony, yeah, they tryna break the marriage up
Who gon' act phony or who gon' try to embarrass ya?
I'ma need a day off, I think I'll call Ferris up
Bueller had a Muller, but I switched it for a Mille
'Cause I'm richer, and prior to this shit, was movin' free base
Had a conference with the DJs (Yeah?), Puerto Rico, three days
Poli with the PDs, now they got our shit on replay
Sorry I'm in pajamas, but I just got off the PJ
And last party we had, they shut down Prive
Ain't that where the Heat play? (Yup)
Niggas hate ballers these days (Yup)
Ain't that like LeBron James?
Ain't that just like D-Wade? Wait

What you need, what-what you need
I got what you need, what-what you need
What you need, what-what you need
I got what you need


What's up, what's up, what's up, what's up, motherfucker? Where my money at?
You gon' make me come down to your house where your mommy at
Mummy wrap the kids, have 'em cryin' for they mommy back
Dummy that your daddy is, tell him I just want my racks
Racks on racks on racks (Racks)
Maybachs on 'Bachs on 'Bachs on 'Bachs on 'Bachs
Who in that? Oh shit, it's just Blacks on Blacks on Blacks
Hundred stack, how you get it? Nigga, layin' raps on tracks
I wish I could give you this feeling, I'm planking on a million
I'm riding through your hood, you can bank I ain't got no ceiling
Made a left on Nostrand Ave, (Right), we in Bed-Stuy
Made a right on 79th, I'm coming down South Shore Drive
I remain Chi-Town, Brooklyn 'til I die


Take 'em on home
I got what you need, what-what you need
Take 'em on home
What you need, what-what you need
I got what you need, what-what you need
Take 'em on home
Tryna hurt my name, huh?",52022
8892,49443,Halo,pop,Beyonc,2009,1550729,{Beyoncé},"
Remember those walls I built?
Well, baby, they're tumblin' down
And they didn't even put up a fight
They didn't even make a sound
I found a way to let you in
But I never really had a doubt
Standin' in the light of your halo
I got my angel now


It's like I've been awakened
Every rule I had you breakin'
It's the risk that I'm takin'
I ain't never gonna shut you out


Everywhere I'm lookin' now
I'm surrounded by your embrace
Baby, I can see your halo
You know you're my savin' grace
You're everything I need and more
It's written all over your face
Baby, I can feel your halo
Pray it won't fade away

I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo, halo
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo
Halo


Hit me like a ray of sun
Burnin' through my darkest night
You're the only one that I want
Think I'm addicted to your light
I swore I'd never fall again
But this don't even feel like fallin'
Gravity can't begin
To pull me back to the ground again


It's like I've been awakened
Every rule I had you breakin'
The risk that I'm takin'
I'm never gonna shut you out


Everywhere I'm lookin' now
I'm surrounded by your embrace
Baby, I can see your halo
You know you're my savin' grace
You're everything I need and more
It's written all over your face
Baby, I can feel your halo
Pray it won't fade away

I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo, halo
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo, halo
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo
Halo
Halo
Ooh


Everywhere I'm lookin' now
I'm surrounded by your embrace
Baby, I can see your halo
You know you're my savin' grace
You're everything I need and more
It's written all over your face
Baby, I can feel your halo
Pray it won't fade away


I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo, halo
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo
Halo, oh oh
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo, halo
I can feel your halo, halo, halo
I can see your halo, halo
Halo",52158
9046,50012,Headlines,rap,Drake,2011,1930140,{},"
I might be too strung out on compliments
Overdosed on confidence
Started not to give a fuck and stopped fearin' the consequence
Drinkin' every night because we drink to my accomplishments
Faded way too long, I'm floatin' in and out of consciousness
And they sayin' I'm back, I'd agree with that
I just take my time with all this shit, I still believe in that
I had someone tell me I fell off, ooh, I needed that
And they want to see me pick back up, well, where'd I leave it at?
I know I exaggerated things, now I got it like that
Tuck my napkin in my shirt 'cause I'm just mobbin' like that
You know good and well that you don't want a problem like that
You gon' make someone around me catch a body like that
No, don't do it (Ayy), please don't do it (Ayy)
'Cause one of us goes in and we all go through it (Ayy)
And Drizzy got the money, so Drizzy gon' pay it
Those my brothers, I ain't even gotta say it
That's just something they know


They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
Yeah, they know, yeah
That the real is on the rise
Fuck them other guys
I even gave 'em a chance to decide
Now it's something they know
They know, they know, they know (Yeah)

I be yellin' out, ""Money over everything,"" money on my mind
Then she wanna ask when it got so empty
Tell her I apologize, happened over time
She says, ""They miss the old Drake,"" girl, don't tempt me
""If they don't get it, they'll be over you
That new shit that you got is overdue
You better do what you supposed to do""
I'm like, ""Why I gotta be all that?""
But still, I can't deny the fact that it's true
Listening to you expressin' all them feelings
Soap-opera rappers, all these niggas sound like all my children
And that's who you thinkin' is 'bout to come and make a killin'?
I guess it really is just me, myself, and all my millions
You know that they ain't even got it like that
You gon' hype me up and make me catch a body like that
'Cause I live for this, it isn't just a hobby like that
When they get my shit and play it, I ain't even gotta say it, they know


They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
Yeah, they know, yeah
That the real is on the rise
Fuck them other guys
I even gave 'em a chance to decide
Now it's something they know
They know, they know, they know

I be yellin' out, ""Money over everything,"" money on my mind
Mind, mind-mind
Tell 'em I apologize, it happened over time
Time, time-time
They know
They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know
They know, they know, they know (Yeah)

",52766
9100,50200,Smells Like Teen Spirit,rock,Nirvana,1991,2297062,{},"
Load up on guns, bring your friends
It's fun to lose and to pretend
She's over-bored and self-assured
Oh no, I know a dirty word


Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello


With the lights out, it's less dangerous
Here we are now, entertain us
I feel stupid and contagious
Here we are now, entertain us
A mulatto, an albino
A mosquito, my libido


Yeah, hey, yay

I'm worse at what I do best
And for this gift, I feel blessed
Our little group has always been
And always will until the end


Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello


With the lights out, it's less dangerous
Here we are now, entertain us
I feel stupid and contagious
Here we are now, entertain us
A mulatto, an albino
A mosquito, my libido


Yeah, hey, yay




And I forget just why I taste
Oh yeah, I guess it makes me smile
I found it hard, it's hard to find
Oh well, whatever, never mind

Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello, how low
Hello, hello, hello


With the lights out, it's less dangerous
Here we are now, entertain us
I feel stupid and contagious
Here we are now, entertain us
A mulatto, an albino
A mosquito, my libido


A denial, a denial
A denial, a denial
A denial, a denial
A denial, a denial
A denial",52968
9101,50204,Bonfire,rap,Childish Gambino,2011,2573180,{},"
Okay, it's Childish Gambino, homegirl drop it like the NASDAQ
Move white girls like there's coke up my asscrack
Move black girls 'cause, man, fuck it, I'll do either
I love pussy, I love bitches, dude, I should be runnin' PETA
In Adidas, with some short shorts, B-O-O all over me
My green is where it's supposed to be, your green is in my grocery
This Asian dude, I stole his girl, and now he got that Kogi beef
My dick is like an accent mark, it's all about the over E's
Hot like a parked car
I sound weird like ""nigga"" with a hard 'R'
Fly like the logo on my cousin's 440
Eatin' Oreos like these white girls that blow me
Vodka for my ladies, whiskey for a grown man
Hangin' in the islands, lookin' for Earl like Toejam
I made the beat retarded, so I'm callin' it a slow jam
Butcher and I know it, man, kill beef, go ham
These rappers are afraid of him
'Cause I'm a beast, bitch, ""grrr"", Invader Zim
Gambino is a call girl, fuck you, pay me
Brand new whip for these niggas like slavery
Told me I was awful and that shit did not faze me
Tell me how I suck again, my memory is hazy
""You're my favorite rapper now"", yeah, dude, I better be
Or you can fuckin, kiss my ass, Human Centipede
You wanna see my girl? I ain't that dumb
You wanna see my girl? Check Maxim
""Man, why does every black actor gotta rap some?""
I don't know, all I know is I'm the best one

It's a bonfire, turn the lights out
I'm burnin' everything you mothafuckas talk about
It's a bonfire, turn the lights out
I'm burnin' everything you mothafuckas talk about


You know these rapper dudes talk shit, start killin'
Fuck that, got goons like an archvillain
I'm from the South, ain't got no accent, don't know why
So this rap is child's play, I do my name like Princess Di
Yeah, they say they want the realness, rap about my real life
Told me I should just quit, ""First of all, you talk white
Second off, you talk like you haven't given up yet""
Rap's stepfather, yeah, you hate me but you will respect
I put in work, ask Ludwig
Put my soul on the track like shoes did
Played this for my cousin, now he can't even think straight
Black and white music? Now, nigga, that's a mixtape
Shoutout to my blerds, they represent the realness
Shoutout to Gambino Girls, my dick is in the building
I know you hate me 'cause your little cousin play me out
I like black girls who nerdy but when they dance they be sayin' ""Ow""
I'm sorry for who followed me
Chillin' with a Filipina at your local Jollibee
Yeah, I'm in her ass like sodomy
So if you see my hand under the table, don't bother me
I don't talk soft, that's that other guy
I'm screamin' ""What the fuck is up?"" like I ain't seen the sky
The shit I'm doin' this year? Insanity
Made the beat then murdered it, Casey Anthony
These rappers don't know what to do
'Cause all I did was act me, like a Looney Tune
And I'll give you all of me until there's nothing left
I swear this summer will be summer Camp, bitch",52970
9127,50345,Thinkin Bout You,rb,Frank Ocean,2012,3587748,{},"
A tornado flew around my room before you came
Excuse the mess it made, it usually doesn't rain in
Southern California, much like Arizona
My eyes don't shed tears, but boy, they pour when


I'm thinkin' 'bout you, ooh no, no, no
I've been thinkin' bout you, you know, know, know
I've been thinkin' bout you, do you think about me still?
Do ya, do ya?


Or do you not think so far ahead?
'Cause I been thinkin' bout forever, ooh
Or do you not think so far ahead?
'Cause I been thinkin' bout forever, ooh


No, I don't like you, I just thought you were cool enough to kick it
Got a beach house I could sell you in Idaho
Since you think I don't love you, I just thought you were cute
That's why I kissed you
Got a fighter jet, I don't get to fly it though, I'm lying down

Thinkin' 'bout you, ooh no, no, no
I've been thinkin' bout you, you know, know, know
I've been thinkin' bout you, do you think about me still?
Do ya, do ya?


Or do you not think so far ahead?
'Cause I been thinkin' bout forever, ooh
Or do you not think so far ahead?
'Cause I been thinkin' bout forever, ooh


Yes, of course, I remember, how could I forget (How could I forget?) how you feel? (How you feel)
You know you were my first time, a new feel
It won't ever get old, not in my soul, not in my spirit, keep it alive
We'll go down this road 'til it turns from color to black and white


Or do you not think so far ahead?
'Cause I been thinkin' bout forever, ooh
Or do you not think so far ahead?
'Cause I been thinkin' bout forever, ooh",53152
9154,50426,Drank In My Cup,rap,Kirko Bangz,2011,1527850,{},"


I done came down, hold up
Grip the grain, roll up
And your girlfriend want a nigga like me
Cause I ain't tryin' to control her
She call me when she wants a change
Black diamond, my pinky ring
And she know you weak and we ain't the same
You hit the scene, I make the scene
I'm in her head like Maybelline
H-Town so I'm made for lean
I'm in her soul, I make her scream
I don't ride the toll, don't pay the change
I'm EZ tag like Peter Pan
She want a man, don't need a man
I'm flying down your boulevard
She cookin' dinner with your pans
Draped up, dripped out
Your bitch know what I'm taking 'bout
Pulls up, pull out
We get it poppin' in the parking lot
She like to do it with the lights on
Don't matter to me if it's dark or not
I'm G'd up, East up
Fossil pants, I'm hard as rock

Girl I know how much you really want somebody
Want somebody that don't really need you
Girl I know how much you really want somebody
Want somebody that ain't trying to keep
You heard what I said, that could put you to bed
That ain't tryin' to love you baby, just fuck you instead
And don't tell 'em nothing baby, you know that I'm comin' baby
Just hit up my phone whenever you need you some company
Got this drank in my cup, oh yeah
I got this drank in my cup
I got this drank in my cup, cup, cup


I done came down, came up
Slow pitch, change up
Same hood, same style, same drink, same cup
She call me when she wanna fuck
I never call, she knows what's up
Same page, same book, different song, same hook
Everytime her nigga trippin', she on the phone with the same crook
And everytime I pull up, she hit me with that same look
Lips bitin', hips right
She left her man for that get right
I'm in the middle, like midnight
Only if you got that sit tight
Only if you got that wine fine
Only if you got that sip type
Only if you got that mind bomb
Only if you got that zip tight
Eat that shit like wonton
Jokin' baby, I'm pimp tight
I'm used to bein' that one and done
But girl you got that g-get right

[Girl I know how much you really want somebody
Want somebody that don't really need you
Girl I know how much you really want somebody
Want somebody that ain't trying to keep
You heard what I said, that could put you to bed
That ain't tryin' to love you baby, just fuck you instead
And don't tell 'em nothing baby, you know that I'm comin' baby]

[Got this drank in my cup, oh yeah
I got this drank in my cup
I got this drank in my cup, cup, cup]


H-Town, oh yeah, I got this drank in my cup
I got this drank in my cup
I came down, hold up, hold up, I said hold up
Hold up, I done came down like hold up
Hold up, hold up, fuck, 'chea",53272
9167,50513,Doing It Wrong,rap,Drake,2011,1845237,{},"
When a good thing goes bad, it's not the end of the world
It's just the end of a world that you had with one girl
And she's the reason it happened, but she's overreacting
And it's all because she don't want things to change


So cry if you need to, but I can't stay to watch you
That's the wrong thing to do
Touch if you need to, but I can't stay to hold you
That's the wrong thing to do
Talk if you need to, but I can't stay to hear you
That's the wrong thing to do
'Cause you'll say you love me, and I'll end up lying
And say, ""I love you too""


But I need someone different
You know it, oh, you know it
Oh, you know it, we both know it
I need someone different
You know it, oh, you know it
Oh, you know it, we both know it
Something's been missing
You know it, oh, she knows it
Oh, I know it, we all know it
I need someone different
Oh, oh

We live in a generation of not being in love and not being together
But we sure make it feel like we're together
'Cause we're scared to see each other with somebody else


So cry if you need to, but I can't stay to watch you
That's the wrong thing to do
Touch if you need to, but I can't stay to hold you
That's the wrong thing to do
Talk if you need to, but I can't stay to hear you
That's the wrong thing to do
'Cause you'll say you love me, and I'll end up lying
And say, ""I love you too""


But I need someone different
You know it, oh, you know it
Oh, you know it, we both know it
I need someone different
You know it, oh, you know it
Oh, you know it, we both know it
Something's been missing
You know it, oh, she knows it
Oh, I know it, we all know it
I need someone different
Oh, oh
",53388
9286,50868,She Will,rap,Lil Wayne,2011,1178584,{Drake},"
Young Money!
Yeah
Four
Ahem!


I tell her, ""Now go and pop that pussy for a real nigga""
I already know that life is deep, but I still dig her
Niggas is jealous, but really I could care less
I'm in Hell's Kitchen with an apron and a hairnet
Devil on my shoulder, the Lord as my witness
So on my Libra scale I'm weighin' sins and forgiveness
What goes around comes around like a hula hoop
Karma is a bitch? Well, just make sure that bitch is beautiful
Life on the edge, I'm danglin' my feet
I tried to pay attention but attention paid me
Haters can't see me: nose-bleed seats
And today I went shoppin' and talk is still cheap
I rock to the beat of my drum set
I been at the top for a while and I ain't jump yet
But I'm Ray Charles to the bullshit
Now jump up on that dick and do a full split!

Uh, she just started to pop it for a nigga
And looked back and told me, ""Baby, it's real.""
And I say, ""I ain't doubt you for a second.""
I squeeze it and I could tell how it feel
I wish we could take off and go anywhere but here
Baby, you know the deal
And she bad, so maybe she won't, ugh
But shit, then again, maybe she will, yeah
Do it for the realest niggas in the fuckin' game right now
She will, yeah
Do it for the realest niggas in the fuckin' game right now
She will, she will, she will, ugh
Maybe for the money and the power and the fame right now
She will, she will, she will (Ugh)
Do it for the realest niggas in the fuckin' game right now
She will


Yeah


I tell her, ""Now go and pop that pussy for me!""
Haters can't see me, but them bitches still lookin' for me
And you could take that to the bank and deposit that
Put your two cents in and get a dollar back
Some people hang you out to dry like a towel rack
I'm all about I, give the rest of the vowels back
I like my girl thick, not just kinda fine
Eat her 'til she cry-call that ""whine 'n' dine""
Try to check me and I'ma have 'em checkin' pulses
They say, ""Choose wisely,"" that's why I was chosen
Rockin' like asphalt, it's the cash fault
Looked in the face of Death and took its mask off
Now, I like my house big and my grass soft
I like my girl face south and her ass north
But I'm Ray Charles to the bullshit
Now hop up on that dick and do a full split!

Uh, she just started to pop it for a nigga
And looked back and told me, ""Baby, it's real.""
And I say, ""I ain't doubt you for a second.""
I squeeze it and I could tell how it feel
I wish we could take off
And go anywhere but here, baby, you know the deal
'Cause she bad so maybe she won't
Uh, but shit, then again, maybe she will
Do it for the realest niggas
In the fuckin' game right now, she will
Do it for the realest niggas
In the fuckin' game right now, she will
Maybe for the money and the power
And the fame right now, she will
Do it for the realest niggas
In the fuckin' game right now, she will


Uh, she just started to pop it for a nigga
And looked back and told me, ""Baby, it's real.""
And I say I ain't doubt you for a second
I squeeze it and I could tell how it feel (I feel like the sky is opening, and I am entering)
I wish we could take off and go anywhere but here baby you know the deal
(Feel like like the world is falling and I am rising)
'cause she bad, so maybe she won't
Uh, but shit then again maybe she will
Carter 4 Tunechi
Do it for the realest niggas in the fuckin' game right now
She will
Do it for the realest niggas in the fuckin' game right now
She will, she will, she will
Maybe for the money and the power and the fame right now
She will, she will, she will
Do it for the realest niggas in the fuckin' game right now
She will, she will, she will
I think I love her",53819
9379,51155,Skinny Love,rock,Bon Iver,2007,1217158,{},"
Come on, skinny love, just last the year
Pour a little salt, we were never here
My my my, my my my, my my
Staring at the sink of blood and crushed veneer
I tell my love to wreck it all
Cut out all the ropes and let me fall
My my my, my my my, my my
Right in this moment, this order's tall


And I told you to be patient
And I told you to be fine
And I told you to be balanced
And I told you to be kind
And in the morning I'll be with you
But it will be a different kind
And I'll be holding all the tickets
And you'll be owning all the fines


Come on, skinny love, what happened here?
Suckle on the hope in light brassieres
My my my, my my my, my my
Sullen load is full, so slow on the split

And I told you to be patient
And I told you to be fine
And I told you to be balanced
And I told you to be kind
And now all your love is wasted
And then who the hell was I?
And I'm breaking at the britches
And at the end of all your lines


Who will love you?
Who will fight?
Who will fall far behind?",54121
9398,51190,Peso,rap,A$AP Rocky,2011,1426663,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","


I be that pretty mothafucka, Harlem's what I'm reppin'
Tell my niggas quit the bitchin', we gon' make it in a second
Never disrespected plus I'm well connected
With this coke that I imported, just important as your President
Swagger so impressive and I don't need a necklace
But these bitches get impressed when you pull up in that 7
Them 6's, them Benzes, I gets get the freshest
Raf Simons, Rick Owens usually what I'm dressed in
Blowing blunts rolling doobies up, smoking sections
Groupies rush hold they boobies up, in my direction
Quit with all the fronting, you ain't 'round my clique for nothing
'Cause our presence is a present, just to kick it is a blessing


This is the way it goes, this is the way we roll
'Cause every day we on our pesos (Pesos)
This is the way it goes, this is the way we roll
'Cause every day we on our pesos (Pesos)
(Gun cock, gunshot, gun a likkle bwoy)
(Gun cock, gunshot, gun a likkle bwoy)
(Gun cock, gunshot, gun a likkle bwoy)
'Cause every day we on our pesos

Yo, yo, yo, your bitch just said I'm hot, man, I told her I agree
She gon' really think I'm hot if I told her my degrees
Pull up in that hard-top, showing off my keys
Graduate school of hard-knocks, I can show you my degrees
Couple A, B, C's, bad bitch, double D's
Popping E, I don't give a F, told you I'm a G
A.S.A.P., Stevie got it on his sleeve
But I got it on my chest, my nigga, this is what I breathe
Inhale, exhale, cocaine, X pills
Import, export, Harlem catching rec still
So mami, show me how that neck feel (Feel)
Later show me how the rest feel, for now just chill


This is the way it goes, this is the way we roll
'Cause every day we on our pesos
This is the way it goes, this is the way we roll
'Cause every day we on our pesos
(Gun cock, gunshot, gun a likkle bwoy)
(Gun cock, gunshot, gun a likkle bwoy)
(Gun cock, gunshot, gun a likkle bwoy)
'Cause every day we on our pesos
'Cause every day we on our pesos
'Cause every day we on our pesos",54160
9489,51463,Dont Stop Believin,rock,Journey,1981,2868577,{},"
Just a small-town girl, livin' in a lonely world
She took the midnight train goin' anywhere
Just a city boy, born and raised in South Detroit
He took the midnight train goin' anywhere


A singer in a smoky room
The smell of wine and cheap perfume
For a smile, they can share the night
It goes on and on and on and on


Strangers waitin'
Up and down the boulevard
Their shadows searchin' in the night
Streetlights, people
Livin' just to find emotion
Hidin' somewhere in the night


Workin' hard to get my fill
Everybody wants a thrill
Payin' anything to roll the dice
Just one more time

Some will win, some will lose
Some are born to sing the blues
Oh, the movie never ends
It goes on and on and on and on


Strangers waitin'
Up and down the boulevard
Their shadows searchin' in the night
Streetlights, people
Livin' just to find emotion
Hidin' somewhere in the night




Don't stop believin'
Hold on to that feelin'
Streetlights, people
Don't stop believin'
Hold on
Streetlights, people
Don't stop believin'
Hold on to that feelin'
Streetlights, people",54447
9499,51485,The Zone,rb,The Weeknd,2011,1224070,{Drake},"


Ooh ahh
Ooh ahh, ahh
Ohh yeah, yeah
Ooh ahh, ahh


Why you rushing me, baby?
It's only us, alone
I don't want to die tonight, baby
So lemme sip this slow
I'll give you what you called for
Just let me get in my zone
I'll be making love to her through you
So let me keep my eyes closed


And I won't see a damn thing
I can't feel a damn thing
But I'ma touch you right
I won't see a damn thing
I can't feel a damn thing
But I'ma touch you right (Oh yeah)

I'ma touch you right (Ooh yeah)
(Just let me sip this slow)
I'ma touch you right
(Let me get inside my zone)
I'ma touch you right (Oh yeah)
(Just let me)
Ohh ahh, ahh
Ooh yeah


And I'ma lean, 'til I fall, ooh yeah
And I don't give a damn
I felt the ground before
I left it all behind, baby
I didn't need no one
But I'm in need tonight baby
I've been alone for too long
Ohh, oh yeah


So, I won't say a damn thing
I can't feel a damn thing
But I'ma touch you right (Ooh, yeah)
Oh, I can't see a damn thing
I can't feel a damn thing
But I'ma touch you right (Ooh)

I'ma touch you right (Ohh yeah)
(Just let me sip this slow)
Ooh, I'ma touch you right
(Let me get inside my zone)
Ooh, I'ma touch you right
(Just let me)
Ohh ahh, ahh
Ooh, yeah




Whoa, all these broken hearts on that pole
Man, if pole dancing's an art, you know how many fuckin' artists I know?
Got some new bills in the mail, got some big favors I owe
Got some good things ahead of me when these bad bitches let go
Well girl let's go, walk your broken heart through that door
Sit your sexy ass on that couch
Wipe that lipstick off of your mouth
I take it slow
She in love with my crew
She said make enough so I can try some
I thought taking drugs just ain't you, be you
Yeah girl, just be you
And I do this shit for my hometown, it been going down, it ain't new
That's that north north, that up top
That OVO and that XO
Your girlfriend at our next show
But it's all good, don't stress though
First night fuck, never really planned it
Take a deep breath, no one need to panic
Lips so French, ass so Spanish
She don't really like attention, I don't know if she gon' manage out here
But she got me all up in my zone
Said she like the view I got in this place, shit I did all of that on my own
Aw yeah",54471
9586,51723,Mirror,rap,Lil Wayne,2011,1457979,"{""Bruno Mars""}","
Uh, with everything happening today
You don't know whether you're coming or going, but
You think that ya on your way
Life lined up on the mirror, don't blow it


Woah, look at me when I'm talking to you
You looking at me but I'm looking through you
I see the blood in your eyes
I see the love in disguise
I see the pain hidden in your pride
I see you're not satisfied
And I don't see nobody else
I see myself, I'm looking at the


Mirror on the wall (Woah)
Here we are again (Yeah)
Through my rise and fall (Uh)
You've been my only friend (Yeah)
You told me that they can
Understand the man I am
So why are we here
Talking to each other again?

Uh, I see the truth in your lies
I see nobody by your side
But I'm with you when you're all alone
And you correct me when I'm looking wrong
I see the guilt beneath the shame
I see your soul through your window pane
I see the scars that remain
I see Wayne, I'm lookin' at the..


Mirror on the wall
Here we are again (Yeah)
Through my rise and fall (Uh-huh)
You've been my only friend (My only friend)
You told me that they can't
Understand the man I am (They can't understand)
So why are we here (Misunderstood)
Talking to each other again? (Woah)


Looking at me now I can see my past
Damn, I look just like my fucking dad
Light it up, that's smoke and mirrors
I even look good in a broken mirror
I see my mama smile, that's a blessing
I see the change, I see the message
And no message coulda been any clearer
So I'm starting with the man in the...

Mirror on the wall (MJ taught me that)
Here we are again
Through my rise and fall (Uh)
You've been my only friend (Take 'em to Mars, man)
You told me that they can
Understand the man I am
So why are we
Talking to each other again? (Uh)
Mirror on the wall (Woah)
Here we are again (Yeah)
Through my rise and fall
You've been my only friend (Any questions?)
You told me that they can (I come to you)
Understand the man I am (You always have the answer)
So why are we here
Talking to each other again?


Mirror on the wall
Hey B.P, looks like I did take 'em to Mars this time
So why are we
Talking to each other again?",54727
9663,51947,Nobodys Perfect,rap,J. Cole,2012,1034835,"{""Missy Elliott""}","
Hey, oh yeah
Uh, Cole world
Uh, oh yeah


Yeah, this is for all the fans that waited, the bitch niggas that hated
Old hoes we dated, look, Mama, we made it
Your son out in Barbados, cheese, eggs, and potatoes
Smokin' weed on the beach as my mind workin' like Plato's
Analyzin' the world, fantasizin' 'bout girls
I'm handin' diamonds and pearls, and vandalizin' her curls
Sweatin' her weave out, moans as she breathes out
Fuck I'm doin' in parties with Hova and Steve Stoute
I step over piranha, death over dishonor
They killin' niggas for J's, that's death over designer
Hey, Cole heatin' up like that leftover lasagna
Remember when I used to be stressed over D'wana
Now a nigga only text and get stressed over Rihannas
I'm talkin' tens and better, hood bitches in Timbs and sweaters
And we always argue 'bout the same thing
And tell me, why we gotta argue about the same thing, same thing
Well

Nobody's perfect, uh
Nobody's perfect, ay ay, uh
Hey, but you're perfect for me
Nobody's perfect, uh (Ay, ay, ay)
Nobody's perfect, ay
Hey, but you're perfect for me
We rollin', we ridin'
He like to go inside and
I love to go all night and
We rock the boat, Poseidon
I love to call your name, name, name
Yeah, baby, I love to call your name, name, name, ay


Oh yeah, to my college girl: Take the weekend off and come home soon
I graduated way too long ago to be sneakin' all in your dorm room
But that thing tight like Fort Knox
So I call you when the tour stops
But baby, where your roommates?
Did you make sure the door's locked?
She love it when we get together
Smoke a little weed but her shit together
Now that I'm on I can pick and choose
Only fuck with hoes who got shit to lose
Yeah, I heard the stories 'bout different dudes
Her man on campus, but it's fine by me
She say she only fucked like four-five niggas
So you know you gotta multiply by three

Nobody's perfect, uh
Nobody's perfect, ay ay, uh
Hey, but you're perfect for me
Nobody's perfect, uh (Ay, ay, ay)
Nobody's perfect, ay
Hey, but you're perfect for me
We rollin', we ridin'
He like to go inside and
I love to go all night and
We rock the boat, Poseidon
I love to call your name, name, name
Yeah, baby, I love to call your name, name, name, ay",54969
9821,52521,The Real Her,rap,Drake,2011,1388870,"{""Lil Wayne"",""André 3000""}","
People around you should really have nothing to say
Me, I'm just proud of the fact that you've done it your way
And the weekend's here, started it right
Even if you only get part of it right
Live for today, plan for tomorrow
Party tonight, party tonight
Dying to meet your girlfriends that you said you might bring
If they're the ones that tell you that you do the right thing, ooh


Houston girls love the way it goes down
Atlanta girls love the way it goes down
Vegas girls love the way it goes down


But I gotta say, oh, baby, oh, baby, why is this so familiar?
Just met her, already feel like I know the real her
You must've done this before, this can't be your first time
We must've been here before, it's still fresh on my mind
You got that shit that somebody would look for, but won't find
You must've done this before, this can't be your first time

They keep telling me don't save you
If I ignore all that advice, then something isn't right
Then who will I complain to?
But the weekend's here, started it right
Even if I only get part of it right
Live for today, plan for tomorrow
Party tonight, party tonight
You got your guards up, I do too
There's things we might discover
'Cause you got a past and I do too
We're perfect for each other


Houston girls love the way it goes down
Atlanta girls love the way it goes down
Vegas girls love the way it goes down


But I gotta say, oh, baby, oh, baby, why is this so familiar?
Just met her, already feel like I know the real her
You must've done this before, this can't be your first time
We must've been here before, it's still fresh on my mind
You got that shit that somebody would look for, but won't find
You must've done this before, this can't be your first time (Woah)

'Cause to her, I'm just a rapper and soon, she'll have met another
So if tonight's an accident, tomorrow, we'll recover
And I know I'm not supposed to judge a book by its cover
I don't wan' be in the blind, but sometimes I Stevie Wonder
About her
And she with it if I'm with it, and I'm with it
I know what makes her smile, but I wan' know what makes her different
Or should I just be realistic? Lipstick on the glass
See, I know this ain't your first, but it's better than your last, Tunechi


You must've done this before, this can't be your first time
We must've been here before, it's still fresh on my mind
You got that shit that somebody would look for, but won't find
You must've done this before, this can't be your first time (Woah)


Shower her with dollar tips, shawty went and bought a whip
Guarantee the city remember your whole name, you throw that ho a scholarship
All of them ain't all equipped
And this saddens me, I see the pecking order
Quote-unquote bad bitches work the whole floor
Those that get laughed at sit off in a corner
Like a lab rat, nobody want her
Niggas that are married don't wanna go home
But we look up to them, they wish they were us
They want some new trim, we lust for some trust
Now the both of us are colorblind 'cause the other side looks greener
Which leaves your turf in a Boise state
Can't see a play or the team, 'cause
Everybody has an addiction, mine happens to be you
And those who say they don't, souls will later on say to them, ""That ain't true""
All of them will have an opinion
But y'all know what y'all can do with them
But if you unsure, I'll take you on tour
To a place you can stick that in
Well, sitting here sad as hell
Listening to Adele, I feel you, baby
""Someone Like You,"" more like someone unlike you
Or something that's familiar maybe
And I can tell that she wants a baby
And I can yell, girl, that you're crazy
Oh, what the hell? Nope, can't be lazy
Please be careful, bitches got the rabies",55599
9822,52523,Shot for Me,rap,Drake,2011,2106160,{},"
I can see it in your eyes, you're angry
Regret got shit on what you're feelin' now
Mad 'cause he ain't like me
Oh, you mad 'cause nobody ever did it like me
All the care I would take
All the love that we made
Now you're trying to find somebody to replace what I gave to you
It's a shame you didn't keep it
Alisha, Catya, I know that you gon' hear this
I'm the man, yeah, I said it
Bitch, I'm the man, don't you forget it
The way you walk, that's me
The way you talk, that's me
The way you got your hair up, did you forget that's me?
And the voice in your speaker right now, that's me
That's me
And the voice in your ear, that's me
Can't you see that I made it? Yeah, I made it
First I made you who you are and then I made it
And you're wasted with your latest
Yeah, I'm the reason why you always gettin' faded

Take a shot for me (Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh)
Take a shot for me (Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh)
Take a shot for me (Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh)
A shot for me (Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh)
A shot for me


Okay, look, I'm honest, girl, I can't lie, I miss you
You and the music were the only things that I'd commit to
I never cheated, for the record, back when I was with you
But you believed in everything but me, girl, I don't get you
She says, ""I know you changed
I never see you 'cause you're always busy doin' things""
I really wish she had a different way of viewin' things
I think the city that we're from just kinda ruined things
It's such a small place, not much to do but talk and listen
The men are jealous and the women all in competition
And all your friends tellin' you stories that you often misinterpret
And taint all the images of your Mr. Perfect
I could tell that you been cryin' all night, drinkin' all summer
Prayin' for your happiness, hope that you recover, uh
This is one I know you hated when you heard it
And it's worse because you know that I deserve it


Take a shot for me (Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh)
Take a shot for me (Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh)
Take a shot for me (Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh)
A shot for me (Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh)
A shot for me

Yeah
May your neighbors respect you
Trouble neglect you
Angels protect you
And Heaven accept you",55601
9937,53089,Come Together,rock,The Beatles,1969,1097073,{},"
Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me


Here come old flat-top, he come groovin' up slowly
He got ju-ju eyeball, he one holy roller
He got hair down to his knee
Got to be a joker, he just do what he please


Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me


He wear no shoeshine, he got toe-jam football
He got monkey finger, he shoot Coca-Cola
He say, ""I know you, you know me""
One thing I can tell you is you got to be free

Come together, right now
Over me


Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me


He bag production, he got walrus gumboot
He got Ono sideboard, he one spinal cracker
He got feet down below his knee
Hold you in his armchair, you can feel his disease


Come together, right now
Over me


Shoot me
Shoot me
Right!
Come, come, come, come

He roller-coaster, he got early warnin'
He got muddy water, he one mojo filter
He say, ""One and one and one is three""
Got to be good-lookin' 'cause he's so hard to see


Come together, right now
Over me


Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me
Shoot me
Ugh!


Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together, yeah
Come together",56218
10004,53296,Lotus Flower Bomb,rap,Wale,2011,1179884,{Miguel},"
Let me rap to you real quick
I wanna enjoy the luxury of like
Not knowing each other for real, hold up
Lotus flower bomb, firefly
When I'm low, she take me high
I can teach you all the sounds of love


Flower bomb, let me guess your favorite fragrance
And you got that bomb, huh, I'm tryna detonate you
No disrespecting baby, just tryna make you smile
Try to keep my spirits up, that's why I lays it down
Try to keep your spirits up, lil' vodka, whatever
Took you forever to get dressed, I acknowledge your effort
So I clap for her, she deserves an applause
Shawty working so hard, she deserve that Vuitton
Shawty, where your baton? Racing through my mind like
She heard that I got that work, I heard that she been on strike
Care to tell? I read your mind, she been on them dollars first
Caramel macchiatos when shawty get into work
I can be your boyfriend, be your nigga or a friend with perks
I'm just tryna work that, huh, they just tryna work your nerves
I'm just tryna read your mind, I'm just tryna feed you mine
I'm just tryna give you light, they just tryna leave you blind

We're living in a fantasy
I feel it when you dance with me
It's feeling like you need to be
My lady, my baby, yeah
Can't you see
I'm talking about eternity?
Tell me, would you care to be
My lady, my baby?


Flower bomb, can I blow up on your mind?
This is not no Sandra Bull', but you're Potion #9
Navigating through her eyes, destination to her thighs
And I hate to tell you too much 'cause I stay with too much pride
And we way too young to know love, maybe not, but we don't need no rush
Don't believe in love at first sight, but I believe in love at first, huh
Can I be with you just one night? I could wear you out inside
I could tell you like persistence, but I make you cum in tris
I just think we need one night, can't decide if I came right
Easy, baby, my thing tight, but that lotus flower just ain't right
I ain't thinking, I ain't right, can't decide, but I can't fight
Easy, baby, you the bomb and all but I be damned if I do not land mine
Or at least try, can I speak up? Was it peace out? Can we eat lunch?
Can we take shots? What's your flavor? Flat drinks we call A cups
I just think I need one night, slightly more if it's done right
With that gorgeous face, I don't know your name
It ain't important babe 'cause I'ma call you mine

We're living in a fantasy (Haha, Ralph)
I feel it when you dance with me
It's feeling like you need to be
My lady, my baby, yeah
Can't you see
I'm talking about eternity?
Tell me, would you care to be
My lady, my baby?


'Cause I don't know you, you don't know me
The clock keeps ticking, baby, what's it gon' be?
I don't know you, you don't know me
Let me teach you all the sounds of love
Ah-ah-ah-ah-ah, eh-eh-eh-eh-eh
Ee-ee-ee-ee-ee, I, O, U
Baby, this was for you (For you)
Lotus",56477
10065,53531,Dance A$$ Remix,rap,Big Sean,2011,1621680,"{""Nicki Minaj""}","
Ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Stop! Now make that motherfucker hammer time like
Go stupid, go stupid, go stupid


Wobble-dy wobble-dy wa wobble wobble
I'm st-stacking my paper my wallet look like a bible
I got girlies half naked that shit look like the grotto
How your waist anorexic and then your ass is colossal
Drop that ass make it boomerang
Take my belt off, bitch I'm Pootie Tang
Tippy tow tippy tay you gon' get a tip today
Fuck that you gonna get some dick today
I walk in with my crew and I'm breaking they necks
I'm looking all good I'm making her wet
They pay me respect they pay me in checks
And if she look good she pay me in sex (do it)
Bounce that ass (ass) it's the roundest
You the best, you deserve a crown bitch, right on that ass

Ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Stop! Now make that motherfucker hammer time like
Go stupid, go stupid, go stupid


Wobbledy wobble, wo-wo-wobble, wobbin'
Ass so fat, all these bitches' pussies is throbbin'
Bad bitches, I'm your leader, Phantom by the meter
Somebody point me to the best ass eater
Tell 'em ""Pussy clean"" I tell them ""Pussy squeaky""
Niggas give me brain 'cause all of them niggas geeky
If he got a Mandingo, then I buy him a dashiki
And bust this pussy open in the islands of Waikiki
Kiss my ass and my anus, 'cause it's finally famous
And it's finally soft, yeah, it's finally solved
I don't know, man, guess them ass shots wore off
Bitches ain't poppin', Google, my ass
Only time you on the net is when you Google my ass
Y-y-you fuckin' little whores, fu-fuckin' up my decors
Couldn't get Michael Kors if you was fuckin' Michael Kors
B-B-Big Sean, b-boy, how big is you
Give me all your money and give me all your residuals
Then slap it on my ass, ass, ass

Ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Stop! Now make that motherfucker hammer time like
Go stupid, go stupid, go stupid
H-h-h-h-h-hammer time


Woah, white girls, black girls, tall girls, fat girls
Shake that ass shake that ass, shake that ass
Shake that ass, shake that ass, shake that ass
Go, go
Short girls, small girls, skinny girls, all girls
Shake that ass shake that ass, shake that ass
Shake that ass, shake that ass, shake that ass
And I want all of that


Ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Ass ass ass ass ass ass ass ass
Stop! Now make that motherfucker hammer time like
Go stupid, go stupid, go stupid
Go stupid!",56737
10155,53802,American Pie,rock,Don McLean,1971,1001743,{},"
A long, long time ago
I can still remember
How that music used to make me smile
And I knew if I had my chance
That I could make those people dance
And maybe they'd be happy for a while
But February made me shiver
With every paper I'd deliver
Bad news on the doorstep
I couldn't take one more step
I can't remember if I cried
When I read about his widowed bride
But something touched me deep inside
The day the music died


So bye-bye, Miss American Pie
Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry
And them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
Singin', ""This'll be the day that I die""
""This'll be the day that I die""

Did you write the book of love
And do you have faith in God above
If the Bible tells you so?
Now do you believe in rock 'n roll
Can music save your mortal soul?
And can you teach me how to dance real slow?
Well, I know that you're in love with him
'Cause I saw you dancin' in the gym
You both kicked off your shoes
Man, I dig those rhythm and blues
I was a lonely teenage broncin' buck
With a pink carnation and a pickup truck
But I knew I was out of luck
The day the music died


I started singin', ""Bye-bye, Miss American Pie""
Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry
Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
And singin', ""This'll be the day that I die""
""This'll be the day that I die""


Now, for ten years we've been on our own
And moss grows fat on a rollin' stone
But that's not how it used to be
When the jester sang for the king and queen
In a coat he borrowed from James Dean
And a voice that came from you and me
Oh, and while the king was looking down
The jester stole his thorny crown
The courtroom was adjourned
No verdict was returned
And while Lennon read a book on Marx
The quartet practiced in the park
And we sang dirges in the dark
The day the music died

We were singin', ""Bye-bye, Miss American Pie""
Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry
Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
And singin', ""This'll be the day that I die""
""This'll be the day that I die""


Helter skelter in a summer swelter
The birds flew off with a fallout shelter
Eight miles high and fallin' fast
It landed foul on the grass
The players tried for a forward pass
With the jester on the sidelines in a cast
Now, the half-time air was sweet perfume
While the sergeants played a marching tune
We all got up to dance
Oh, but we never got the chance
'Cause the players tried to take the field
The marching band refused to yield
Do you recall what was revealed
The day the music died?


We started singin', ""Bye-bye, Miss American Pie""
Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry
Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
And singin', ""This'll be the day that I die""
""This'll be the day that I die""

Oh, and there we were, all in one place
A generation lost in space
With no time left to start again
So come on, Jack be nimble, Jack be quick
Jack Flash sat on a candlestick
'Cause fire is the devil's only friend
Oh, and as I watched him on the stage
My hands were clenched in fists of rage
No angel born in hell
Could break that Satan's spell
And as the flames climbed high into the night
To light the sacrificial rite
I saw Satan laughing with delight
The day the music died


He was singin', ""Bye-bye Miss American Pie""
Drove my Chevy to the levee, but the levee was dry
Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
And singin', ""This'll be the day that I die""
""This'll be the day that I die...""


I met a girl who sang the blues
And I asked her for some happy news
But she just smiled and turned away
I went down to the sacred store
Where I'd heard the music years before
But the man there said the music wouldn't play
And in the streets, the children screamed
The lovers cried and the poets dreamed
But not a word was spoken
The church bells all were broken
And the three men I admire most
The Father, Son, and the Holy Ghost
They caught the last train for the coast
The day the music died


And there I stood alone and afraid
I dropped to my knees and there I prayed
And I promised Him everything I could give
If only He would make the music live
And He promised it would live once more
But this time one would equal four
And in five years four had come to mourn
And the music was reborn


And they were singin', ""Bye-bye Miss American Pie""
Drove my Chevy to the levee but the levee was dry
And them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
Singin', ""This'll be the day that I die""
""This'll be the day that I die""


They were singin', ""Bye-bye Miss American Pie""
Drove my Chevy to the levee but the levee was dry
Them good old boys were drinkin' whiskey 'n rye
Singin', ""This'll be the day that I die...""",57030
10224,53983,Cant Hold Us,rap,Macklemore & Ryan Lewis,2011,4072714,"{""Ray Dalton""}","
Hey, hey, hey
Good to see you
Come on, dude, let's go
Yeah! Let's go!
Ha-ha-ha-ha alright
Alright, okay
Alright, okay
Alright, okay


Return of the Mack
Get 'em, what it is, what it does, what it is, what it isn't
Looking for a better way to get up outta bed
Instead of getting on the Internet
And checking on who hit me, get up
Thrift shop, pimp-strut walkin'
Little bit of humble, little bit of cautious
Somewhere between like Rocky and Cosby
Sweater game, nope nope, y'all can't copy, yeah
Bad, moonwalking, this here is our party
My posse's been on Broadway, and we did it our way
Grown music, I shed my skin and put my bones
Into everything I record to it and yet I'm on
Let that stage light go and shine on down
Got that Bob Barker suit game and Plinko in my style
Money, stay on my craft and stick around for those pounds
But I do that to pass the torch and put on for my town
Trust me on my I-N-D-E-P-E-N-D-E-N-T shit, hustlin'
Chasing dreams since I was fourteen
With the four-track, bussin'
Halfway cross that city with the back (back) pack (pack), fat (fat) cat (cat), crushin'
Labels out here, now they can't tell me nothin' (Hey, hey, hey)
We give that to the people, spread it across the country (Hey, hey, hey, oh)
Labels out here, now they can't tell me nothin' (Hey, hey, hey)
We give it to the people, spread it across the country (Hey, hey, hey, oh)

Can we go back? This is the moment
Tonight is the night, we'll fight 'til it's over
So we put our hands up
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Can we go back? This is the moment
Tonight is the night, we'll fight 'til it's over
So we put our hands up
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Like the ceiling can't hold us


Now, can I kick it? Thank you
Yeah, I'm so damn grateful
I grew up really wanting gold fronts
But that's what you get when Wu-Tang raised you
Y'all can't stop me
Go hard like I got a 808 in my heartbeat
And I'm eating at the beat like you gave a little speed
To a great white shark on Shark Week, raw!
Time to go off, I'm gone
Deuces, goodbye, I got a world to see
And my girl, she wanna see Rome
Caesar'll make you a believer
Nah, I never ever did it for a throne
That validation comes from giving it back to the people
Now sing a song, and it goes like
Raise those hands, this is our party (Hey, hey, hey)
We came here to live life like nobody was watching (Hey, hey, hey, oh)
I got my city right behind me, if I fall, they got me (Hey, hey, hey)
Learn from that failure, gain humility (Hey, hey, hey)
And then we keep marching, I said

Can we go back? This is the moment
Tonight is the night, we'll fight 'til it's over
So we put our hands up
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Can we go back? This is the moment
Tonight is the night, we'll fight 'til it's over
So we put our hands up
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Like the ceiling can't hold us


And so we put our hands up
And so we put our hands up
Whoa, whoa, whoa


Let's go!
Na na na na, na na na na (Uh-huh)
Hey (And all my people sing)
Na na na na, na na na na (Hey, hey, that's right)
Hey (Here we go, all right, uh)
And all my people sing
Na na na na, na na na na (You do it, Ray)
Oh (Ha-ha, let's go)
And all my people sing
Na na na na, na na na na
Mack-le-e-e-e-e-more!

Can we go back? This is the moment
Tonight is the night, we'll fight 'til it's over
So we put our hands up
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Like the ceiling can't hold us
Can we go back? This is the moment (Ooh)
Tonight is the night, we'll fight 'til it's over (Ooh)
So we put our hands up (Ooh)
Like the ceiling can't hold us (Ooh)
Like the ceiling can't hold us (Ooh)

",57234
10247,54045,212,rap,Azealia Banks,2011,3553650,"{""Lazy Jay""}","
Hey, I can be the answer
I'm ready to dance when the vamp up
And when I hit that dip get your camera
You could see I been that bitch since the Pamper
And that I am that young sis the beacon
The bitch who wants to compete and
-I can freak a fit that pump with the peep and
-You know what your bitch become when her weave in
-I just wanna sip that punch with your peeps and
Sit in that lunch if you're treatin'
-Kick it with your bitch who come from Parisian
-She know where I get mine from, and the season
-Now she wanna lick my plum in the evenin'
-And fit that ton-tongue d-deep in
-I guess that cunt getting eaten


I was in the 212
On the uptown A
Nigga you know what's up
Or don't you?
Word to who made ya
I'm a rude bitch nigga
What are you made up of?
I'm a eat your food up boo
I could bust your 8
I'm-a do one too
Fuck ya gon do?
When you do make bucks
I'm a look right nigga
Bet you do want to fuck!
Fuck him like you do want to cum
You're gay to get discovered in my 2 1 deuce
Cock-a-lickin' in the water by the blue bayou
Caught the warm goo
In your du-rag too son?
Nigga, you're a kool-aid dude
Plus your bitch might lick it
Wonder who let you come to 1 2
With your doo-doo crew son
Fuck are you into, huh?
Niggas better oooh-run-run
You could get shot homie
If you do want to put your guns up
Tell your crew don't front
I'm a hoodlum nigga
You know you were too once...
Bitch, I'm bout to blew up too
I'm the one today
I'm the new shit boo
Yung Rapunzel
Who are you bitch, new lunch?
I'm a ruin you cunt

A-yo, A-yo
I heard you ridin' with the same tall, tall tale
Tellin' em you made some
Sayin' you grindin' but you ain't goin' nowhere!
Why procrastinate girl?
You got a lot, but you just waste all yours and
They'll forget your name soon
And won't nobody be to blame but yourself, yeah


What you gon' do when I appear?
W-W-when I premiere?
Bitch the end of your lives are near
This shit been mine, mine!


Bitch I'm in the 212
With the fif cocked nigga
It's the 2 1 zoo
Fuck ya gon do
When ya goon sprayed up
Bet his bitch won't get him
Betcha you won't do much!
See, even if you do want to bust
Your bitch'll get you cut and touch your crew up too, Pop
You playing with your butter
Like your boo won't true
Cock the gun, too
Where you do eat poom, hun
I'm fuckin' with ya cutie q
What's your dick like homie?
What are you into?
What's the run dude?
Where do you wake up?
Tell your bitch keep hatin'
I'm the new one two, huh?
See I remember you when you were
The young new face but you do like to
Slumber don't you?
Now your boo up too hun
I'm-a ruin you, cunt!

What you gon' do when I appear?
W-W-when I premiere?
Bitch the end of your lives are near
This shit been mine, mine!",57315
10425,54706,Heartbeat,rap,Childish Gambino,2011,2063057,{},"
I wanted you to know
That I am ready to go, heartbeat
My heartbeat
I wanted you to know
Whenever you are around, can't speak
I can't speak
I wanted you to know
That I am ready to go, heartbeat
My heartbeat
I wanted you to know
Whenever you are around, can't speak
I can't speak


I know what your boy like
Skinny tie and a cuff type
He go and make breakfast
You walkin' round naked
I might just text you
Turn your phone over
When it's all over, no settlin' down
My text go to your screen, you know better than that
I come around when you least expect me
I'm sittin' at the bar when your glass is empty
You thinkin' that this song's comin' on to tempt me
I need to be alone like the way you left me
You start callin'; you start crying
I come over; I'm inside you
I can't find you, the girl that I once had
But the sex that we have isn't half bad
Text say that ""It's not fair""
That's code for ""He's not here""
And I'ma flirt with this new girl
And I'ma call if it don't work
So we fuck 'til it come to conclusions
All the things that we thought we were losin'
I'm a ghost, and you know this
That's why we broke up in the first place, 'cause

I wanted you to know
That I am ready to go, heartbeat
My heartbeat
I wanted you to know
Whenever you are around, can't speak
I can't speak
I wanted you to know
That I am ready to go, heartbeat
My heartbeat
I wanted you to know
Whenever you are around, can't speak
I can't speak


It's late-night Thursday
I know that you heard me
But you don't want the same thing
Hmm, well, two can play that game
So I'm chillin' with my girlfriend
But she not my real girlfriend
She got a key to my place but
She not my real girlfriend
Stupid, so dummy
Say the wrong thing, and wrong girls come runnin'
I'm paranoid that these girls want somethin' from me
And it's hard to make a dime go one-hunnid
And my dude freakin' out over a worse fate
She on time, but she late for they first date
'Cause he went and tried out a new condom
Slipped off in a threesome, good problems?
Right? Wrong
Askin' 'em if she'd wanna play games
We the Super Smash Brothers, but none of 'em you
I miss the sex where you kiss whenever you through
Sixty-nine is the only dinner for two
I was wrong, but would you have listened to you?
Uh, you were crazy
I got a heart, but the art of choking's
Only thing girls want when you in that smoke and light

I wanted you to know
That I am ready to go, heartbeat
My heartbeat
I wanted you to know
Whenever you are around, can't speak
I can't speak
I wanted you to know
That I am ready to go, heartbeat
My heartbeat
I wanted you to know
Whenever you are around, can't speak
I can't speak


So we're done? This the real shit?
We used to hold hands like field trips
I'm a jerk, but your dude is a real dick
I read his posts on your wall, and I feel sick
He ain't cool, he ball and all that
But he just a fake nigga who blog in all caps
You couldn't wait to date
I'm goin' straight for your thighs like the cake you ate
I give a fuck about the niggas that you say you ate
You know that I'm the best when I'm a-fake-tionate
I'm the best that you had, face it
J. and Keyshia are related: racist
I give you money; then you burn me (Bernie), then you made off (Madoff)
She ain't a killer, but she'd fuckin' blow your head off
I know he wonderin', ""What the fuck you hidin'?""
That we dated like raps about Bin Laden; ayo, fuck this
Are we datin'? Are we fuckin'?
Are we best friends? Are we somethin'
In between that?
I wish we never fucked, and I mean that

But not really
You say the nastiest shit in bed, and it's fuckin' awesome",58043
10502,54948,The Motto,rap,Drake,2011,3544292,"{""Lil Wayne""}","
I'm the fuckin' man, y'all don't get it, do ya?
Type of money, everybody acting like they knew ya
Go Uptown, New York City, bitch
Them Spanish girls love me like I'm Aventura
Tell Uncle Luke I'm out in Miami too
Clubbin' hard, fuckin' women, there ain't much to do
Wrist bling, got a condo up on Biscayne
Still gettin' brain from a thang, ain't shit changed
How you feel, how you feel, how you feel?
Twenty-five, sitting on twenty-five mil', uh
I'm in the building and I'm feeling myself
Rest in peace Mac Dre, I'ma do it for the Bay, okay
Gettin' paid, we'll holler whenever that stop
My team good, we don't really need a mascot
Tell Tune light one, pass it like a relay
YMCMB, you niggas more YMCA
Me, Franny, and Mally Mall at the crib-o
Shout goes out to Niko, J, and Chubbs, shout to Gibbo
We got Santa Margherita by the liter
She know even if I'm fucking with her, I don't really need her
Aww, that's how you feel, man? That's really how you feel?
'Cause the pimpin' ice cold, all these bitches wanna chill
I mean maybe she won't, then again, maybe she will
I can almost guarantee she know the deal, real nigga, what's up?

Now she want a photo, you already know, though
You only live once, that's the motto, nigga, YOLO
And we 'bout it every day, every day, every day
Like we sittin' on the bench, nigga, we don't really play
Every day, every day, fuck what anybody say
Can't see 'em 'cause the money in the way, real nigga, what's up?


One time, fuck one time
I'm callin' niggas out like the umpire
Seven grams in the blunt
Almost drowned in her pussy, so I swam to her butt
It's Eastside, we in this bitch
Wish a nigga would like a tree in this bitch
And if a leaf fall, put some weed in that bitch
That's my MO, add a B to that shit
I'm fucked up, tore down
I'm twisted, doorknob
Talk stupid, off with your head
Nigga, money talks, and Mr. Ed, yeah
I'm so Young Money
Got a drum on the gun, Energizer Bunny
Funny how honey ain't sweet like sugar
Ain't shit sweet, niggas on the street like hookers
I tongue-kiss her other tongue
Skeet, skeet, skeet, water gun
Oh my God, Becky, look at her butt, Tunechi

Now she want a photo, you already know, though (Yeah)
You only live once, that's the motto, nigga, YOLO
And we 'bout it every day, every day, every day
Like we sittin' on the bench, nigga, we don't really play
Every day, every day, fuck what anybody say
Can't see 'em 'cause the money in the way, real nigga, what's up?
Real nigga, what's up?
Now she want a photo, you already know, though
You only live once, that's the motto, nigga, YOLO
And we 'bout it every day, every day, every day
Like we sittin' on the bench, nigga, we don't really play
Every day, every day, fuck what anybody say
Can't see 'em 'cause the money in the way, real nigga, what's up?",58325
10504,54961,Under Ground Kings,rap,Drake,2011,1106199,{},"
Yeah


Bridge over troubled water, ice in my muddy water
Rich off a mixtape, got rich off a mixtape
Probably shouldn't be driving, it just got so much harder
Can't even see it straight, I can't even see it straight, ah
Fuck with me, I buy the shots
Live a little, 'cause niggas die a lot
And lie a lot, but I'm the truth, that's right, I fuckin' said it
The living proof that you ain't gotta die to get to heaven
You, girl, you right there, you look like you like this shit
How'd I know? How'd I know? That's me on some psychic shit
I could tell a lie if you askin' me my whereabouts
But I might talk that real if you ask me what I care about
Rap and bitches, rap and bitches, bitches and rappin'
Rappin' and bitches until all of it switches, I swear
It's been two years since somebody asked me who I was
I'm the greatest, man, I said that before I knew I was
That's what's important, what really happened before this
When me and my crew was all about this rapper from New Orleans
Singing, ""Walking like a man, finger on the trigger
I got money in my pocket, I'm a uptown nigga,"" ah
With fame on my mind, my girl on my nerves
I was pushing myself to get something that I deserve
That was back in the days, Acura days
I was a cold dude, I'm gettin' back to my ways

People always ask how I got my nice things
Take my crown to the grave, I'm an underground king
I bet we can make tonight the greatest story ever told
'Cause I'm down to spend whatever, lately, I've been on a roll
And I do it for the city 'cause you know the city love a nigga
Do it for the city 'cause you know the city love a nigga
Do it for the city 'cause you know the city love a nigga
Do it for the city (UGK, fuck these other niggas)


Sometimes I need that romance, sometimes I need that pole dance
Sometimes I need that stripper that's gon' tell me that she don't dance
Tell me lies, make it sound good, make it sound good
Do me like the women from my town would
Leather with that woodgrain, Persian rugs on wood floors
Talking all them good things, that's all I'm really good for
Memphis, Tennessee know, see, I start to go deep back
In Ridge Crest with my seat back with Yo Gotti and E-Mack
And these niggas got them diamonds glowin' in they mouth
And they rockin' furs like it's snowin' in the South
And every pretty girl tell me that's the shit that she like
So why am I in class if this is who I'm tryna be like?
So I drop out, lessons I was taught are quick to fade
Soon as I realize that turnin' papers in won't get me paid
And if I don't do nothing, I'ma ball
I'm countin' all day like the clock on the wall, yeah, I need that
Making major changes to the life I'm livin'
I had no choice, I had to prove I made the right decision
That was back in the days, Acura days
I was a cold dude, I'm gettin' back to my ways

People always ask how I got my nice things
Take my crown to the grave, I'm an underground king
I bet we can make tonight the greatest story ever told
'Cause I'm down to spend whatever, lately, I've been on a roll
And I do it for the city 'cause you know the city love a nigga
Do it for the city 'cause you know the city love a nigga
Do it for the city 'cause you know the city love a nigga
Do it for the city (UGK, fuck these other niggas)",58340
10506,54963,Cameras,rap,Drake,2011,1050604,{},"
No, no, no
I been callin' on, callin' on you
No, no, no
Yeah
I been callin' on, callin' on you
Uh


Word on road is the clique about to blow
You ain't gotta run and tell nobody, they already know
We've been living on a high, they've been talking on the low
But it's cool, know you heard it all before
That's why I asked you


How you mean? How you mean?
Thought you knew about the team, ayy, yeah
That's why I asked you, how you mean? How you mean?
Thought you knew about the team, ayy, yeah, heh, uh

How you mean? How you mean? What you know about the team?
Man, these niggas need to stop it, they be crowding up the scene
Baby girl, you need to stop it, all that pride and self-esteem
Got you angry about this girl I'm with in all them magazines
Baby, she look like a star, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
It look like we in love, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
Don't listen to the lies, I swear they all lies
You know, I could be your knight in shining Armor All tires
Trying to tell you I'm the one, come and holla at me
Before I'm on the next ting, YMCMB, ah


Ooh, finally got you right here (Said I finally got my baby)
Tonight, I'll ease your mind (Tonight, I'll ease your mind)
That's why I'm callin' on you (Why I'm callin' on you)
And, ooh, oh
Soft, you're love's desire (Soft, you're love's desire)
It's hard to stay away (Stay away)
You keep me callin' on you (You keep me callin' on you)


How you mean? How you mean?
Thought you knew about the team, ayy, yeah
How you mean? How you mean?
Thought you knew about the team, ayy, yeah, heh

How you mean? How you mean? What you know about the team?
You just know what you get told, girl, I see behind the scene
She spilled whiskey on her shirt, she gon' have to get it cleaned
She been going way too hard, someone has to intervene
Baby, she look like a star, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
It might look like I care, but only on camera
Only on camera, only on camera
Don't listen to the lies, I swear they all lies
You know, I could be your knight in shining Armor All tires
Girl, they love me like I'm Prince, like the new king with the crown
Bunch of Underground Kingz, thought you knew how we get down, huh?


Ooh, finally got you right here (Said I finally got my baby)
Tonight, I'll ease your mind (Tonight, I'll ease your mind)
That's why I'm callin' on you (Why I'm callin' on you)
And, ooh, oh
Soft, you're love's desire (Soft, you're love's desire)
It's hard to stay away (Stay away)
You keep me callin' on you (You keep me callin' on you)


How you mean? How you mean?
Thought you knew about the team, ayy
How you mean? How you mean?
Thought you knew about the team, ayy, yeah

Ah, call on you
Just mail me my ring back
Oh, I wanna call on you, baby
Can't keep that shit
Oh, I wanna call on you, baby
She said I could call on you, baby (Hahaha)
Ayy
La, da, da, da, da, la, da, da, da, da, baby

",58342
10507,54964,HYFR Hell Ya Fucking Right,rap,Drake,2012,3059718,"{""Lil Wayne""}","
Gotta do what I gotta do
Yeah
Uh


All my exes live in Texas like I'm George Strait
Or they go to Georgia State where
Tuition is handled by some random nigga that live in Atlanta
That she only see when she feels obligated
Admitted it to me the first time we dated
But she was no angel and we never waited
I took her for sushi, she wanted to fuck
So we took it to go, told 'em don't even plate it
And we never talked too much after I blew up
Just only ""hello"" or a ""happy belated""
And I think I text her and told her I made it
And that's when she text me and told me she prayed it
And that's when I text her and told her I love her
Then right after, texted and told her I'm faded
She asked what have I learned since getting richer?
I learned workin' with the negatives could make for better pictures
I learned Hennessy and enemies is one hell of a mixture
Even though it's fucked up, girl, I'm still fuckin' with ya, damn
Is it the fall? Time for me to revisit the past
There's women to call, there's albums to drop, there's liquor involved
There's stories to tell, we been through it all, damn
Interviews are like confessions
Get the fuck up out my dressing room, confusing me with questions like

Do you love this shit?
Are you high right now?
Do you ever get nervous?
Are you single?
I heard you fuck your girl, is it true?
You gettin' money?
You think them niggas you with is with you?


And I say hell yeah, hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right, fuckin' right, alright
And we say hell yeah, hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right, fuckin' right, alright


Uh, so much for being optimistic
They say love is in the air, so I
Hold my breath 'til my face turn purple
Keep a few bad bitches in my circle
My nuts hang like ain't no curfew
Bitch, if you wave, then I will surf you
I flew jet, she flew commercial
But we still met later that night
After my session, she came over
I was aggressive and she was sober
I gave her a pill, she started confessin'
And started undressin' and asked me to hold her
And so I did, but that was last month
And now she's texting me asking for closure, damn
She say this shit gon' catch up to me, I keep tissue paper
We eat each other whenever we at the dinner table
She say she hate that she love me and she wish I was average
Shit, sometimes I wish the same and I wish she wasn't married
Promises, I hope I never break 'em
Met a female dragon, had a fire conversation
But interviews are like confessions
Get the fuck up out my bedroom, confusing me with questions like

Do you love this shit?
Are you high right now?
Do you ever get nervous?
Are you single?
I heard you fuck your girl, is it true?
You gettin' money?
You think them niggas you with is with you?


And I say hell yeah, hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right, fuckin' right, alright
And we say hell yeah, hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right, damn right, alright
And we say hell yeah, hell yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right, fuckin' right, alright
And we say hell yeah, yeah, yeah, hell yeah
Fuckin' right, damn right, alright, aw, yeah


Yeah
Yeah
Aw, yeah, aw, yeah
Aw, yeah, aw, yeah",58343
10508,54965,Take Care,rb,Drake,2011,1841238,{Rihanna},"
I know you've been hurt by someone else
I can tell by the way you carry yourself
If you let me, here's what I'll do
I'll take care of you (I'll take, I'll take)
I've loved and I've lost


I've asked about you and they told me things
But my mind didn't change and I still feel the same
What's a life with no fun? Please don't be so ashamed
I've had mine, you've had yours, we both know, we know
They won't get you like I will, my only wish is I die real
'Cause that truth hurts and those lies heal
And you can't sleep thinkin' that he lies still
So you cry still, tears all in the pillowcase
Big girls all get a little taste, aw
Pushing me away so I give her space, aw
Dealin' with a heart that I didn't break
I'll be there for you, I would care for you
I keep thinking you just don't know
Tryna run from that, say you done with that
On your face, girl, it just don't show
When you're ready, just say you're ready
When all the baggage just ain't as heavy
And the party's over, just don't forget me
We'll change the pace and we'll just go slow
You won't ever have to worry
You won't ever have to hide
And you've seen all my mistakes
So look me in my eyes

'Cause if you let me
Here's what I'll do
I'll take care of you (I'll take, I'll take)
I've loved and I've lost
(Yeah)


It's my birthday, I'll get high if I want to
Can't deny that I want you, but I'll lie if I have to
'Cause you don't say you love me
To your friends when they ask you
Even though we both know that you do, you do
One time, been in love one time
You and all your girls in the club one time
All so convinced that you're followin' your heart
'Cause your mind don't control what it does sometimes
We all have our nights, though, don't be so ashamed
I've had mine, you've had yours, we both know, we know
You hate bein' alone, well, you ain't the only one
You hate the fact that you bought the dream and they sold you one
You love your friends, but somebody should've told you somethin'
To save you, instead, they say


Don't, tell me, I don't care if you hurt
I don't, tell you, you don't care if you're true
Don't, tell me, I don't care if you hurt
I don't, tell you, you don't care if you're true

I know you've been hurt by someone else
I can tell by the way you carry yourself
If you let me, here's what I'll do
I'll take care of you (I'll take, I'll take)
I've loved and I've lost",58344
10509,54966,Look What Youve Done,rap,Drake,2011,1821683,{},"
Yeah
Yeah
Man


It's like '09 in your basement and I'm in love with Nebby
And I still love her, but it fell through because I wasn't ready
And your back hurt, and your neck hurt and you smokin' heavy
And I sit next to you, and I lecture you because those are deadly
And then you ash it, and we argue about spendin' money on bullshit
And you tell me I'm just like my father, my one button, you push it
Now it's fuck you, I hate you, I'll move out in a heartbeat
And I leave out and you call me and you tell me that you sorry
And you love me and I love you and your heart hurts, mine does too
And it's just words and they cut deep, but it's our world, it's just us two
I see painkillers on the kitchen counter, I hate to see it all hurt so bad
But maybe I wouldn't have worked this hard if you were healthy and it weren't so bad, uh
Maybe I should walk up the street
And try and get a job at the bank
'Cause leave it up to me, J, and Neeks
We'll probably end up robbin' a bank
Then Wayne calls up my phone
Conversation wasn't that long
Gets me a flight to Houston in the morning
Oh, it's my time, yeah, it's on
He's thinkin' of signin' me, I come home
We make a mixtape with seventeen songs
And almost get a Grammy off of that thing
They love your son, man, that boy gone
You get the operation you dreamed of
And I finally send you to Rome
And get to make good on my promise
It all worked out, girl, we should've known
'Cause you deserve it

Is this shit real? Should I pinch you?
After all the things that we been through, I got you, yeah
Look what you've done, look what you've done
Look what you've done for me now, yeah
You knew that I was gon' be somethin'
When you're stressed out and you need somethin', I got you, yeah
Look what you've done, look what you've done
Look what you've, look what you've


It's like '06 in your backyard, I'm in love with Jade
And I'm still in love 'cause when it's that real is when it doesn't fade
And my father living in Memphis now, he can't come this way
Over some minor charges and child support that just wasn't paid, damn
Boohoo, sad story, Black American dad story
Know that I'm your sister's kid, but it still don't explain the love that you have for me
I remember sneaking in your pool after school dances
Damn, your house felt like the Hamptons
For all of my summer romances
I never really had no one like you, man, this all new shit
Made the world I know bigger
Changed the way that I viewed it
Had all this fightin' going on at the crib
You would calm me down when I lose it
Told you I think I'm done acting
Now I'm more in touch with the music
You said, either way, I'd be a star, I could go so far
Talked to me, then you got to me
Then you'd toss the keys and loan me your car, yeah
Just a young kid in a drop-top Lexus hopin' that I don't get arrested
Just another kid that's going through life so worried that I won't be accepted
But I could do anything
You said that, and you meant that
You took me places, you spent that
They said no, we went back
Checks bounced, but we bounced back
I put all the money in your accounts back
And I thank you, I don't know where I'd really be without that
It worked out, man, you deserve it

Is this shit real? Should I pinch you?
After all the things that we been through, I got you, yeah
Look what you've done, look what you've done
Look what you've done for me now, yeah
You knew that I was gon' be somethin'
When you're stressed out and you need somethin', I got you, yeah
Look what you've done, look what you've done
Look what you've, look what you've


Hi Aubrey
I'm here sitting with my son having a little talk
And he knew, knows how to get in touch with you now
To let you know how grateful I am for your help in keeping me in this
In this comfortable place
All I can say, Aubrey, is I remember the good times we had together
And the times I used to look after you
And I still have wonderful feeling about that
So God bless you
And I hope I'll see you",58345
10568,55101,Crew Love,rap,Drake,2012,1840905,"{""The Weeknd""}","
Ooh, ooh
Woah, yeah
Ooh (Yeah)


Take your nose off my keyboard
What you bothering me for?
There's a room full of niggas
What you following me for?
This ain't no fuckin' sing-along
So, girl, what you singin' for?
It's 'cause we blowing like a C4
Got my whole crew blowin' like a C4
Twenty, keep the bar rollin'
Fake IDs in the trash, we goin'
Straight to the top, rooftop glows
With a handful of girls and they all so foreign
Brain so poisoned, rainbows flowin'
Light-skinned chick, first flight from Poland
A whole lotta friends, first flight from Poland
A whole lotta cash comin' straight from Poland

Why? 'Cause they loving the crew
They loving the crew
They loving the crew
Oh, they loving the crew
Oh, they loving the crew
They loving the crew
They loving the crew
They loving the crew, woah


Yeah
Smokin' weed under star projectors
I guess we'll never know where Harvard gets us
But seein' my family have it all
Took the place of that desire for diplomas on the wall
And really, I think I like who I'm becoming
There's times where I might do it just to do it like it's nothing
There's times where I might blow like 50K on a vacation
For all my soldiers, just to see the looks on all they faces
All it took was patience
I got a lotta friends to come up off the strip for me
The same ones that'll come up off the hip for me
The realest niggas say, ""Your lyrics do shit for me""
I told my story and made history
Tell them I'ma need reservations for twenty
I've never really been one for the preservation of money, nah
I'd much rather spend it all while I'm breathin'
That OVO and that XO is everything you believe in, I know

They loving the crew
Oh, they loving the crew
Oh, they loving the crew
Loving the crew, oh
Oh, they loving the crew
They loving the crew
They loving the crew
They loving the crew
Woah


'Cause we blowin' like a C4
Got my whole crew blowin' like a C4
(If you broadcast swag, nigga, we the news in your city)",58497
10616,55218,Hate Sleeping Alone,rap,Drake,2011,1272841,{},"
She says, ""Kiss me like you miss me
Fuck me like you hate me
And when you're fuckin' someone else
Just fuck her like she ain't me""
Damn, those words are scary
Those words are scary, Virgin Mary
I just tell her to spare me
I was in love two years ago and gave the baggage to my ex
It's all for her to carry, bags she deserve to carry
I hate that ho, I make it so hard just to talk, don't I?
I get off-topic, don't I? I get it poppin', don't I?
I'll end up stoppin', won't I?
And by the time I end up stoppin'
You'll be rockin' one of the rings that you pointed out while shoppin' with a nigga, don't lie
Uh, she's losin' it right now
'Cause if I wasn't who I am, she would've been movin' in by now
But instead we're movin' slow, I guess she's used to it by now
And she gives me all her trust and I'm abusin' it right now
But this money comin' in is just confusin' shit right now
You just told me I ain't shit, I guess I'm provin' it right now, oh

I say I'd rather be with you, but you are not around
So I'ma call somebody up and see if they'd be down
'Cause I hate sleepin' alone, I hate sleepin' alone
Half the time, we don't end up fucking, I don't ask her for nothing
You leave me in the morning, I don't see her for months
But I just hate sleepin' alone, I hate sleepin' alone
So she's here and we're both so gone


Hotel to hotel, girl, I could use your company
Full name and birthday, I book a flight and you come to me
But she don't want a weekend, she wants all of me or none of me
If she can't work with all of me, then she says she done with me
You say that you're over me, you always end up under me
You know how it goes, don't be crazy, don't play dumb with me
Don't start with your shit, I put you back in your place
She tells me, ""I bet you won't, you won't say that to my face""
And hangs up, yeah, how dare you tell me it's tougher for you?
Like I don't hear about the niggas you fucking with too?
And whoever I be with, they got nothing on you
That's just something to do when there's nothing to do
Yeah, but she's losing it right now
She has choices she should make, I think she's choosing it right now
One more chance to make it right, I think I'm using it right now
You just said I never learn, I guess I'm proving it right now, oh

I say I'd rather be with you, but you are not around
So I'ma call somebody up and see if they'd be down
'Cause I hate sleepin' alone, I hate sleepin' alone
Half the time, we don't end up fucking, I don't ask her for nothing
You leave me in the morning, I don't see her for months
But I just hate sleepin' alone, I hate sleepin' alone
So she's here and we're both so gone


Oh, oh
She's here, we're so gone
Oh
Oh",58634
10625,55243,Over My Dead Body,rap,Drake,2011,2510453,{},"
How I'm feeling, it doesn't matter
'Cause you know I'm okay
Instead, I ask myself, ""Why do you worry?""
When you know, you know I'm the same
I know, I know you don't love me, baby
They're trying to take you away from me
Only over my dead body


I think I killed everybody in the game last year
Man, fuck it, I was on, though
And I thought I found the girl of my dreams at the strip club
Mmm-mmm, fuck it, I was wrong, though
Shout out to all my niggas livin' tax-free
Nowadays, it's six figures when they tax me
Oh well, guess you lose some and win some
Long as the outcome is income
You know I want it all and then some
Shout out to Asian girls, let the lights dim some
Shots came, I don't know where they was sent from
Probably some bad hoes I'm 'bout to take the hint from
Yeah, you know me well, nigga, yeah
I mean you ain't the only real nigga
They got me on these white women like Seal, nigga
Slave to the pussy, but I'm just playin' the field, nigga, yeah
Are these people really discussin' my career again?
Askin' if I'll be goin' platinum in a year again?
Don't I got the shit the world wanna hear again?
Don't Michael Jordan still got his hoop earring in?
Man, all of your flows bore me, paint dryin'
And I don't ever be trippin' off of what ain't mine
And I be hearin' the shit you say through the grapevine
But jealousy is just love and hate at the same time, yeah
It's been that way from the beginnin'
I just been playin', I ain't even notice I was winnin'
And this is the only sound you should fear
Man, these kids wear crowns over here and everything is alright

Oh, I know you don't love me, baby
They're trying to take you away from me
Only over my dead body


You say I'm old news, well, who the new star?
'Cause if I'm goin' anywhere, it's probably too far
Just performed at a bar mitzvah over in the States
Used half of the money to beat my brother's case
Red wine over fed time
But shout out to the niggas that's doin' dead time
And shout out to the bitches there when it's bedtime
And fuck you to the niggas that think it's their time
Yeah, don't make me take your life apart, boy
You and whoever the fuck gave you your start, boy
Oh, you wanna be a motherfuckin' funny guy?
Don't make me break your Kevin Hart, boy
Yeah, it's whatever
You know, feelin' good, livin' better
I think maybe I was numb to it last year
But you know I feel it now more than ever
My city love me like Mac Dre in the Bay
Second album, I'm back pavin' the way
The backpackers are back on the bandwagon
Like this was my comeback season back, back in the day
And I met your baby moms last night
We took a picture together, I hope she frames it
And I was drinkin' at the Palms last night
And ended up losin' everything that I came with, yeah
Feel like I've been here before, huh?
I still got ten years to go, huh?
And this is the only sound you should fear
Man, these kids wear crowns over here and everything is alright

Oh, I know you don't love me, baby
They're trying to take you away from me
Only over my dead body


Three in the morning, still going down",58661
10682,55428,Im Yours,rock,Jason Mraz,2008,1383324,{},"
Well you done done me in; you bet I felt it
I tried to be chill but you're so hot that I melted
I fell right through the cracks
Now I'm trying to get back

Before the cool done run out
I'll be giving it my bestest
Nothing's going to stop me but divine intervention
I reckon it's again my turn to win some or learn some


But I won't hesitate no more, no more
It cannot wait, I'm yours


Well open up your mind and see like me
Open up your plans and damn you're free
Look into your heart and you'll find
Love, love, love, love
Listen to the music of the moment, people dance and sing
We're just one big family
And it's our God-forsaken right to be
Loved, love, love, love, loved


So I won't hesitate no more, no more
It cannot wait, I'm sure
There's no need to complicate
Our time is short
This is our fate, I'm yours


Do you want to come on scootch on over closer, dear
And I will nibble your ear


I've been spending way too long checking my tongue in the mirror
And bending over backwards just to try to see it clearer
But my breath fogged up the glass
And so I drew a new face and I laughed

I guess what I be saying is there ain't no better reason
To rid yourself of vanities and just go with the seasons
It's what we aim to do
Our name is our virtue

But I won't hesitate no more, no more
It cannot wait - I'm yours


Well open up your mind and see like me (I won't hesitate)
Open up your plans and damn you're free (No more, no more)
Look into your heart and you'll find (It cannot wait)
The sky is yours (I'm sure)
So please don't, please don't, please don't (No need to complicate)
There's no need to complicate (Our time is short)
'Cause our time is short (This is)
This oh, this oh, this is our fate (our fate)
I'm yours",58874
11131,57298,Smooth Criminal,pop,Michael Jackson,1988,1423093,{},"
Ow!
Cha!
Shoo-cha-choo-cha!


As he came into the window
Was a sound of a crescendo
He came into her apartment
He left the bloodstains on the carpet
She ran underneath the table
He could see she was unable
So she ran into the bedroom
She was struck down, it was her doom


Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?

Annie, are you okay?
Will you tell us that you're okay?
There's a sound at the window
Then he struck you - a crescendo, Annie
He came into your apartment
Left the bloodstains on the carpet
And then you ran into the bedroom
You were struck down
It was your doom


Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?


You've been hit by-
You've been hit by-
A smooth criminal
Ow!


So they came into the outway
It was Sunday, what a black day
Mouth-to-mouth resuscitation
Sounding heartbeats, intimidations

Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
Annie, are you okay? Are you okay?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?
Annie, are you okay?
So, Annie, are you okay? Are you okay, Annie?


Annie, are you okay?
Will you tell us that you're okay?
There's a sound at the window
Then he struck you - a crescendo, Annie
He came into your apartment
Left the bloodstains on the carpet
And then you ran into the bedroom
You were struck down
It was your doom


Annie, are you okay? Annie, are you okay?
Are you okay, Annie?

You've been hit by-
You've been struck by-
A smooth criminal


Choo-cha, choo-cha
Ow!
Okay, I want everybody to clear the area right now!


Ow!
Hoo!
Hoo!
Hoo!
Hoo!
Ow!


Annie, are you okay? (I don't know)
Will you tell us that you're okay? (I don't know)
There's a sound at the window (I don't know)
Then he struck you, a crescendo, Annie? (I don't know)
He came into your apartment (I don't know)
Left bloodstains on the carpet (I don't know why, baby)
And then you ran into the bedroom (Help me)
You were struck down
It was your doom Annie (Dag gone it)
Annie are you okay? (Dag gone it, baby)
Will you tell us that you're okay? (Dag gone it, baby)
There's a sound at the window (Dag gone it, baby)
Then he struck you, a crescendo Annie (Hoo! Hoo!)
He came into your apartment, (Dag gone it)
Left bloodstains on the carpet (Hoo!)
And then you ran into the bedroom (Hoo! Hoo!)
You were struck down (Dag gone it)
It was your doom Annie (Ow!)


Ow!
Ow!
Shoo-cha-choo, shoo-cha-choo!
Ow!
Ow!",69620
11196,57582,Rolling in the Deep,rb,Adele,2010,1130043,{},"
There's a fire starting in my heart
Reaching a fever pitch and it's bringing me out the dark
Finally, I can see you crystal clear
Go ahead and sell me out and I'll lay your shit bare
See how I'll leave with every piece of you
Don't underestimate the things that I will do
There's a fire starting in my heart
Reaching a fever pitch, and it's bringing me out the dark


The scars of your love remind me of us
They keep me thinkin' that we almost had it all
The scars of your love, they leave me breathless
I can't help feeling


We could've had it all (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
Rolling in the deep (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
You had my heart inside of your hand (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
And you played it to the beat (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)

Baby, I have no story to be told
But I've heard one on you, now I'm gonna make your head burn
Think of me in the depths of your despair
Make a home down there, as mine sure won't be shared


(You're gonna wish you never had met me) The scars of your love remind me of us
(Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep) They keep me thinkin' that we almost had it all
(You're gonna wish you never had met me) The scars of your love, they leave me breathless
(Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep) I can't help feeling


We could've had it all (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
Rolling in the deep (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
You had my heart inside of your hand (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
And you played it to the beat (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
Could've had it all
Rolling in the deep
You had my heart inside of your hand
But you played it with a beating


Throw your soul through every open door (Ooh woah, oh)
Count your blessings to find what you look for (Woah)
Turn my sorrow into treasured gold (Ooh woah, oh)
You'll pay me back in kind and reap just what you sow

(You're gonna wish you never had met me)
We could've had it all (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
We could've had it all, yeah (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
It all, it all, it all (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)


We could've had it all (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
Rolling in the deep (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
You had my heart inside of your hand (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
And you played it to the beat (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
Could've had it all (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
Rolling in the deep (Tears are gonna fall, rolling in the deep)
You had my heart inside of your hand (You're gonna wish you never had met me)
But you played it, you played it, you played it
You played it to the beat",61289
11341,58153,Montreal,rb,The Weeknd,2011,1402198,{},"
Laisse tomber les filles
Laisse tomber les filles
Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera
Laisse tomber les filles
Laisse tomber les filles
Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera
Oui j'ai pleuré mais ce jour-là
Non, je ne pleurerai pas
Non, je ne pleurerai pas
Oui j'ai pleuré mais ce jour-là
Je ne pleurerai pas
Je ne pleurerai pas


I guess you had no idea that you could have persuaded me
Girl, you could have had me doing anything you pleased
Girl, you should have took your time and thought of what to say to me
'Cause I'm not as hard as I make it seem to be


And it could have went so many ways
So many ways it can go
'Cause ain't nobody feels the way that I feel when I'm alone
So if I said that I won't call
The lying comes natural to me
You probably could have had it all
You could have been that lonely star
If we just went on (Laisse tomber les filles, laisse tomber les filles)
If we just went on (Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera)
If we just went on (Laisse tomber les filles, laisse tomber les filles)
If we just went on (Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera)

Happiness exists when you don't know a thing
So I hope you don't think this song is about you
And only I can know how close you came
But baby I'm a pro at letting go
I love it when they come and go


It could have went so many ways
So many ways it can go
'Cause ain't nobody feels the way that I feel when I'm alone
So if I said that I won't call
The lying comes natural to me
You probably could have had it all
You could have been that lonely star
If we just went on (Laisse tomber les filles, laisse tomber les filles)
If we just went on (Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera)
If we just went on (Laisse tomber les filles, laisse tomber les filles)
If we just went on (Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera)
If we just went on (Laisse tomber les filles, laisse tomber les filles)
If we just went on (Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera)
If we just went on (Laisse tomber les filles, laisse tomber les filles)
If we just went on (Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera)



Laisse tomber les filles
Laisse tomber les filles
Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera
Laisse tomber les filles
Laisse tomber les filles
Un jour c'est toi qu'on laissera
Oui j'ai pleuré mais ce jour-là
Non, je ne pleurerai pas
Non, je ne pleurerai pas (Je ne pleurerai pas)
Oui j'ai pleuré mais ce jour-là
Je ne pleurerai pas
Je ne pleurerai pas (Je ne pleurerai pas)",61962
11351,58167,I Miss You,rock,blink-182,2003,2155764,{​​blink-182},"
I miss you, I miss you


Hello, there
The angel from my nightmare
The shadow in the background of the morgue
The unsuspecting victim
Of darkness in the valley
We can live like Jack and Sally if we want
Where you can always find me
And we'll have Halloween on Christmas
And in the night, we'll wish this never ends
We'll wish this never ends


I miss you, I miss you
I miss you, I miss you


Where are you?
And I'm so sorry
I cannot sleep, I cannot dream tonight
I need somebody and always
This sick, strange darkness
Comes creeping on, so haunting every time
And as I stare, I counted
The webs from all the spiders
Catching things and eating their insides
Like indecision to call you
And hear your voice of treason
Will you come home and stop this pain tonight?
Stop this pain tonight

Don't waste your time on me, you're already
The voice inside my head (I miss you, I miss you)
Don't waste your time on me, you're already
The voice inside my head (I miss you, I miss you)




Don't waste your time on me, you're already
The voice inside my head (I miss you, I miss you)
Don't waste your time on me, you're already
The voice inside my head (I miss you, I miss you)
Don't waste your time on me, you're already
The voice inside my head (I miss you, I miss you)
Don't waste your time on me, you're already
The voice inside my head (I miss you, I miss you)


I miss you, I miss you
I miss you, I miss you
I miss you, I miss you
I miss you, I miss you",61981
11513,58753,House of Balloons / Glass Table Girls,rb,The Weeknd,2011,1040892,{},"


Uh, oh, ayy, yeah, yeah


Been on another level since you came, no more pain
You look into my eyes, you can't recognize my face
You're in my world now, you can stay, you can stay
But you belong to me, ooh, you belong to me


If it hurts to breathe, open a window (Woo-ooh)
Oh, your mind wants to leave (Leave), but you can't go
Oh, this is a happy house (A happy house)
We're happy here (We're happy here)
In a happy house
Oh this is fun, fun, fun, fun
Fun, fun, fun, fun
Fun, fun, fun, fun

Music got you lost
Nights pass so much quicker than the days did
Same clothes, you ain't ready for your day shift
This place will burn you up
But, baby, it's okay, them my niggas next door
And they working in the trap, so get naughty if you want
So don't blame it on me that you didn't call your home
So don't blame it on me, girl, 'cause you wanted to have fun


If it hurts (Woo) to breathe
Open a window (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh, your mind wants to leave but you can't go (Ooh)
This is a happy house
We're happy here in a happy house
Oh this is fun, fun, fun, fun (This is fun)
Fun, fun, fun, fun (This is fun to me)
Fun, fun, fun, fun (Ooh)




Bring the 707 out
Bring the 707 out
Bring the 707 out
Bring the 707 out
Bring the 707 out
Bring the 7

Two puffs for the lady who be down for that
Whatever, together
Bring your own stash of the greatest, trade it
Roll a dub, burn a dub, cough a dub, taste it
Then watch us chase it
With a handful of pills, no chasers
Jaw clenching on some super-sized papers
And she bad and her head bad
Escaping, her van is a Wonderland
And it's half-past six
Read skies 'cause time don't exist
But when the stars shine back to the crib
Superstar lines back at the crib
And we can test out the tables
We got some brand new tables
All glass and it's four feet wide
But it's a must to get us ten feet high
She give me sex in a handbag
I get her wetter than a wet nap
And no closed doors
So I listen to her moans echo
""I heard he do drugs now""
You heard wrong, I been on it for a minute
We just never act a fool, that's just how we fuckin' live it
And when we act a fool, it's probably 'cause we mixed it
Yeah, I'm always on that okey dokey
Them white boys know the deal, ain't no fuckin' phony
Big O know the deal, he the one who showed me
Watch me ride this fucking beat like he fuckin' told me
""Is that your girl, what's her fucking story?""
""She kinda bad but she ride it like a fucking pony""
I cut down on her man, be her fuckin' story
Yeah, I'm talking 'bout you, man, get to know me
Ain't no offense, though, I promise you
If you a real man, dude, you gon' decide the truth
But I'm a nice dude with some nice dreams
And we could turn this to a nightmare: Elm Street

La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la
I'm so gone, so gone
Bring out the glass tables (Ooh, ooh)
Bring the 707 out
La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la
I'm so gone, so gone
Bring out the glass tables (Ooh, ooh)
Bring the 707 out
La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la
I'm so gone, so gone
Bring out the glass tables (La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la) (Ooh, ooh)
Bring the 707 out
La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la
I'm so gone, so gone
Bring out the glass tables
Bring the 707 out (La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la)
Bring the 707 out (La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la)
Bring the 707 out (La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la)
Ooh, la, la, la, la, la, la, la, la
La, la, la, la, la, la, la, la",62635
11537,58897,Blessed,rap,ScHoolboy Q,2012,1042634,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
What is life for a nigga like me?
Living out his backpack every night
Needed a new place to sleep
But this is now, nigga


One's for the money, two for the bitches
Three to get ready cause I feel I finally did it
Four's for the jealous rapper mad because he finished
Turn that mothafucka to a critic
Man, I got so much shit up on my plate, dog
I was hanging on them corners late
Pockets wasn't straight, bitch
I ain't gon' make it at this rate, dog, know what I'm saying?
Nigga praying up to God just hoping that he hear a nigga
I know the world got more problems and it's much bigger
But I figured, I'd get some shit up off my chest
To all my niggas I would die for, load my pistol up, go out and war for
To all my niggas that'll never make it out the streets
Fuck it, keep goin' hard, don't let 'em see you weak
To all my niggas first time stepping in the pen
Read a book and exercise, keep your spirit in
To all my niggas that's gon' fuck around and die today
Take our hats off, bow our heads and let us pray, just wanna say

Stay blessed my nigga, blessed my nigga
Really think about it, could be worse my nigga
Don't stress my nigga, yes, my nigga
We all blessed my nigga
Stay blessed my nigga, blessed my nigga
Really think about it, could be worse my nigga
Don't stress my nigga, yes, my nigga
We all blessed my nigga, ah


Now how the fuck I'm 'posed to say this?
You see my nigga just lost his son
While I'm here hugging on my daughter, I grip her harder
Kiss her on the head as I cry for a bit
Thinking of some bullshit to tell him
Like ""It'll be okay, you'll be straight, it'll be aight""
Well, fuck that shit
Whatever you need, yo, I got it!
Whether it's money or some weed or putting in work
Fuck it, then I'm riding
You know what's up, but now a nigga couldn't stick around
Told myself that after y'all moved
That I'd be a fuckin' fool, to be living by the street rules
""Fuck police"" tattoos, that happens when you ditch school
But anyway, keep the faith
Stay strong, bruh, remain solid, bruh
Keep playing ball, cuz
It's the only way up out it, bruh, a nigga proud of ya
Tell Floyd to enjoy his newborn seed
I'll have whatever he needs, we the last of a dying breed
Live life, smoke trees
See how far we've come but most, I'm sorry for your son

Stay blessed my nigga, blessed my nigga
Really think about it, could be worse my nigga
Don't stress my nigga, yes, my nigga
We all blessed my nigga
Stay blessed my nigga, blessed my nigga
Really think about it, could be worse my nigga
Don't stress my nigga, yes, my nigga
We all blessed my nigga, ah


And you ain't gotta shed no tear
I'll be everywhere but I'ma always be right here
I ain't forgot those years
I'll be everywhere but I'ma always be right here


Living in a premature place, wait
Never grow to see the pearly gates, break
Every time a bullet detonate, dates
Of obituary carry crates
Of a scary picture with a family member that relate to ya
In December you was finna pin another case
On your record in a stolen Expedition, play it safe
As the record spinning, you was hearing angels entertain
Every pun intended, that was wicked, coming from your brain
Recognize you listened and you didn't hit the block again
That's because the minute after you had knew you would be slain
Open up another chapter in the book and read 'gain
Story of a gun-clapper really tryna make a change
Everybody ain't blessed, my nigga
Yes, my nigga, you're blessed, take advantage, do your best, my nigga
Don't stress, you was granted everything inside this planet
Anything you imagine, you possess, my nigga
You reject these niggas that neglect your respect
For the progress of a baby step, my nigga
Step-step my nigga, one, two, skip-skip
Back-back, look both ways, pull it off the hip
Blast at anybody say that you can't flip
This crack into rap music every other zip is a track
Get used to it, get it off quick
Come back, give back to the city you've built
That's that, don't trip, see money, fuck niggas, dog
It ain't nothing but a bunch of fuck niggas, dog
In a minute everybody gon' be winning
Put a little faith in it then recognize that we all

Blessed my nigga, blessed my nigga
Really think about it, could be worse my nigga
Don't stress my nigga, yes, my nigga
We all blessed my nigga, ah

",62793
11584,59086,Stay Schemin,rap,Rick Ross,2012,1775112,"{Drake,""French Montana""}","
R.I.P. to all the real niggas worldwide!
Salute! Real shit


I ride for my niggas, dawg
I ride for my niggas
I slide for my niggas, dawg (Dawg)
I ride for my niggas
Stay schemin', niggas tryna get at me, dawg
I ride for my niggas
Stay schemin', niggas tryna get at me, dawg
I ride for my niggas


Damn, life's so short
Fuck it, I don't wanna go to court (Huh!)
Fuck it, got a budget for the lawyer, though
Fuck it, I'm on the run for the month (Woo!)
I'm in the bucket, paid 200 for it
My lil' niggas thuggin', even got me paranoid (Huh!)
I'm gettin' money, that's in any nigga category
Double M, I got Gs out in California (Huh!)
Maybach Music

I ride for my niggas, dawg
I ride for my niggas
I slide for my niggas, dawg (Dawg)
I ride for my niggas
Stay schemin' (Yeah), niggas tryna get at me, dawg
(Young Frankie Geechi Liberace, yeah)
I ride for my niggas


It bothers me when the gods get to actin' like the broads
Guess every team doesn't come complete with niggas like ours
That's why I see no need to compete with niggas like y'all
I just ask that when you see me you speak up, nigga, that's all
Don't be duckin' like you never wanted nothin'
It's feelin' like rap changed, it was a time it was rugged
Back when if a nigga reached it was for the weapon
Nowadays niggas reach just to sell they record
Spaghetti bolognese in the Polo Lounge
Me and my G from D.C., that's how I roll around
Might look light, but we heavy though
You think Drake will pull some shit like that? You never know
Million-dollar meetings in a Polo Lounge
Me and my man Oliver North, that's how I roll around
Shawty wanna tell me secrets 'bout a rap nigga
I tell that bitch it's more attractive when you hold it down
Kobe 'bout to lose a hundred fifty Ms
Kobe my nigga, I hate it had to be him
Bitch, you wasn't with me shootin' in the gym
(Huh! Bitch, you wasn't with me shootin' in the gym)
Tell Lucian I said ""fuck it,"" I'm tearin' holes in my budget
Bag her like we in Publix, and take her ass out in public
Ordered her the filet, told 'em, ""Butterfly it, she'll love it.""
She used to soda and nuggets, she really just out here thuggin'
I'm just hittin' my pinnacle, you and pussy identical
You like the fuckin' finish line; we can't wait to run into you
But let me get my mind off that
Young rich motherfucker gettin' mine off rap, with my niggas (Huh!)

I ride for my niggas, dawg
I ride for my niggas (Maybach Music)
I slide for my niggas, dawg (Dawg)
I ride for my niggas
Stay schemin', niggas tryna get at me, dawg
I ride for my niggas


From the hoopty coupe to that Ghost, dawg (Huh)
Pigeons on the roof like Ghost Dog (Huh)
Dwight Howard on the post, dawg (Huh)
My niggas got the powder through the post, dawg (Huh)
Watch the body tilt when you hit the head (Huh)
Niggas lost mills tryna beat the feds (Huh)
Ten grams off my last 250 now (Huh)
Big-ass crib, 250 down, damn!
Gave my nigga Max 7-5 (Huh)
Then gave my nigga Penthouse another 30 (Huh)
Fuck it, got me thinkin' like I'm 7-5 (Huh)
Damn, nigga ain't even seen 30


Huh, I ride for my niggas, dawg
I ride for my niggas (Maybach Music)
I slide for my niggas, dawg (Dawg)
I ride for my niggas
Stay schemin', niggas tryna get at me, dawg
I ride for my niggas

Maybach Music",62991
11650,59400,Say It Aint So,rock,Weezer,1993,1561989,{},"
Oh, yeah
Alright


Somebody's Heine
Is crowding my icebox
Somebody's cold one
Is giving me chills
Guess I'll just close my eyes


Oh, yeah
Alright
Feels good
Inside


Flip on the telly
Wrestle with Jimmy
Somethin' is bubblin'
Behind my back
The bottle is ready to blow

Say it ain't so
Your drug is a heartbreaker
Say it ain't so
My love is a life taker


I can't confront you
I never could do
That which might hurt you
So try and be cool
When I say
""This way
Is a water slide away from me that takes you further every day""
So be cool


Say it ain't so
Your drug is a heartbreaker
Say it ain't so
My love is a life taker


Dear daddy, I write you
In spite of years of silence
You've cleaned up, found Jesus
Things are good, or so I hear
This bottle of Stephen's
Awakens ancient feelin's
Like father, stepfather
The son is drowning in the flood
Yeah, yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah



Say it ain't so
Your drug is a heartbreaker
Say it ain't so
My love is a life taker",63338
11663,59478,Imagine,rock,John Lennon,1971,1488663,{},"
Imagine there's no heaven
It's easy if you try
No hell below us
Above us, only sky
Imagine all the people
Living for today
I


Imagine there's no countries
It isn't hard to do
Nothing to kill or die for
And no religion too
Imagine all the people
Living life in peace
You


You may say I'm a dreamer
But I'm not the only one
I hope someday you'll join us
And the world will be as one

Imagine no possessions
I wonder if you can
No need for greed or hunger
A brotherhood of man
Imagine all the people
Sharing all the world
You


You may say I'm a dreamer
But I'm not the only one
I hope someday you'll join us
And the world will live as one",63416
11690,59588,Hands on the Wheel,rap,ScHoolboy Q,2012,1087774,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","


Crush a bit, little bit, roll it up, take a hit
Crush a bit, little bit, roll it up, take a hit
Crush a bit, little bit, roll it up, take a hit
Feeling lit, feeling light, 2 a.m., summer night
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel


Life for me is just weed and brews
See the hoes flock to you when your name is Q
Am I over-faded? Hell yeah it's true
Turn a beat on, ain't no limit to what I can do
See this Top Dawg in heat, but I'ma fuck the world
I'ma be on tunes 'til God re-furls
You sat me down, I'm still tryna get higher
You looked at me stupid when I twisted the fire
Meanwhile my nigga drunk as fuck
A nigga fucked up, we all fucked up
You done fucked up, I brought more blunts
Smoke back to up, you niggas know what's up
Too damn high, can't stand myself
I love drunk driving, man I'm something else
Heat on my side, you're more than welcome to melt
I'm 'bout to finish a pound, you're more welcome to help

Weed and brews, weed and brews
Life for me is just weed and brews
Weed and brews, weed and brews
Life for me is just weed and brews
I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
Yeah, you heard me right, I might fuck tonight
I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
Yeah, you heard me right, I might fuck tonight


Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel


Wait hold up, back in this mothafuckin' bitch once again
It's the pretty mothafucka with a 40 ounce of brew
My nigga Q and we drunker than a bitch
We getting millis mothafucka, yeah, uh
Nigga, weed and brews, unbelievable
Got a freak or two, in my vehicle
Got the purple drink, got the yellow drink
Then we mix it up, call it Pikachu
With a little bit of crack, little bit of dope
Little bit of smoke, little coke, little weed, when they on them (pills)
Little bit of E, little bit of shrooms
Little bit of deuce, what it do, hands on the (wheels)
And I keep the illest, trillest bitches while I'm swagging it
(Crush a bit, little bit) that's my pursuit of happiness

Weed and brews, weed and brews
Life for me is just weed and brews
Weed and brews, weed and brews
Life for me is just weed and brews
I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
Yeah, you heard me right, I might fuck tonight
I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
Yeah, you heard me right, I might fuck tonight


Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel, uhh, fuck that
Hands on the wheel


If I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
If I fucked her twice, I might change her life
If I change her life, she might hit my weed
We could have a some and we could round it off with three
Her, Mary and me, I'll keep it strictly G
My philosophy upon living right
Nigga weed and brews, and head every night
Hope the pussy nice, cause I'ma fight the bitch
Beat it down and shit, I be clowning with
Black Hippy crew, how swag am I
Be the reason why, she wanna drown my dick
But I soon realized, she was super dry
No paper planes, the Vegas will fly
Don't act surprised, too much Loc inside
Let's get stupid high, to where I can't reply
Love smoking dope, I won't compromise

Weed and brews, weed and brews
Life for me is just weed and brews
Weed and brews, weed and brews
Life for me is just weed and brews
I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
Yeah, you heard me right, I might fuck tonight
I fucked her once, then I could fuck her twice
Yeah, you heard me right, I might fuck tonight
Yeah


Bitch, gimme the disc",63546
11778,59988,We Are Young,pop,fun.,2011,1493611,"{""Janelle Monáe"",​fun.}","
Give me a second I, I need to get my story straight
My friends are in the bathroom
Getting higher than the Empire State
My lover, she's waiting for me just across the bar
My seat's been taken by some sunglasses asking 'bout a scar
And I know I gave it to you months ago
I know you're trying to forget it
But between the drinks and subtle things
The holes in my apologies
You know, I'm trying hard to take it back
So if by the time the bar closes
And you feel like falling down
I'll carry you home


Tonight
We are young
So let's set the world on fire
We can burn brighter
Than the sun
Tonight
We are young
So let's set the world on fire
We can burn brighter
Than the sun

Now I know that I'm not
All that you got
I guess that I, I just thought
Maybe we could find new ways to fall apart
But our friends are back
So let's raise the glass
'Cause I found someone to carry me home


Tonight
We are young
So let's set the world on fire
We can burn brighter
Than the sun
Tonight
We are young
So let's set the world on fire
We can burn brighter
Than the sun


Carry me home tonight
Just carry me home tonight
Carry me home tonight
Just carry me home tonight

The moon is on my side
I have no reason to run
So will someone come and carry me home tonight?
The angels never arrived
But I can hear the choir
So will someone come and carry me home?


Tonight
We are young
So let's set the world on fire
We can burn brighter
Than the sun
Tonight
We are young
So let's set the world on fire
We can burn brighter
Than the sun


So if by the time the bar closes
And you feel like falling down
I'll carry you home tonight",63985
11867,60318,Time,rock,Pink Floyd,1973,1200627,{},"


Ticking away the moments that make up a dull day
Fritter and waste the hours in an offhand way
Kicking around on a piece of ground in your hometown
Waiting for someone or something to show you the way
Tired of lying in the sunshine, staying home to watch the rain
You are young and life is long and there is time to kill today
And then one day you find ten years have got behind you
No one told you when to run, you missed the starting gun




And you run, and you run to catch up with the sun, but it's sinking
Racing around to come up behind you again
The sun is the same in a relative way, but you're older
Shorter of breath, and one day closer to death
Every year is getting shorter, never seem to find the time
Plans that either come to naught or half a page of scribbled lines
Hanging on in quiet desperation is the English way
The time is gone, the song is over, thought I'd something more to say

Home, home again
I like to be here when I can
And when I come home cold and tired
It's good to warm my bones beside the fire
Far away across the field
The tolling of the iron bell
Calls the faithful to their knees
To hear the softly spoken magic spells",64356
11960,60698,Summertime Sadness,pop,Lana Del Rey,2012,1277584,{},"
Kiss me hard before you go
Summertime sadness
I just wanted you to know
That, baby, you the best


I got my red dress on tonight
Dancin' in the dark in the pale moonlight
Done my hair up real big, beauty queen style
High heels off, I'm feelin' alive


Oh, my God, I feel it in the air
Telephone wires above are sizzlin' like a snare
Honey, I'm on fire, I feel it everywhere
Nothin' scares me anymore
(One, two, three, four)


Kiss me hard before you go
Summertime sadness
I just wanted you to know
That, baby, you the best

I got that summertime, summertime sadness
Su-su-summertime, summertime sadness
Got that summertime, summertime sadness
Oh, oh-oh-oh-oh


I'm feelin' electric tonight
Cruisin' down the coast goin' 'bout 99
Got my bad baby by my heavenly side
I know if I go, I'll die happy tonight


Oh, my God, I feel it in the air
Telephone wires above are sizzlin' like a snare
Honey, I'm on fire, I feel it everywhere
Nothin' scares me anymore
(One, two, three, four)


Kiss me hard before you go
Summertime sadness
I just wanted you to know
That baby, you the best


I got that summertime, summertime sadness
Su-su-summertime, summertime sadness
Got that summertime, summertime sadness
Oh, oh-oh-oh-oh

Think I'll miss you forever
Like the stars miss the sun in the mornin' sky
Later's better than never
Even if you're gone, I'm gonna drive (drive), drive


I got that summertime, summertime sadness
Su-su-summertime, summertime sadness
Got that summertime, summertime sadness
Oh, oh-oh-oh-oh


Kiss me hard before you go
Summertime sadness
I just wanted you to know
That, baby, you the best


I got that summertime, summertime sadness
Su-su-summertime, summertime sadness
Got that summertime, summertime sadness
Oh, oh-oh-oh-oh",64764
12130,61357,Comfortably Numb,rock,Pink Floyd,1979,1059200,{},"


Hello? (Hello, hello, hello)
Is there anybody in there?
Just nod if you can hear me
Is there anyone home?
Come on (Come on, come on), now
I hear you're feeling down
Well, I can ease your pain
And get you on your feet again
Relax (Relax, relax, relax)
I'll need some information first
Just the basic facts
Can you show me where it hurts?


There is no pain, you are receding
A distant ship, smoke on the horizon
You are only coming through in waves
Your lips move, but I can't hear what you're saying
When I was a child, I had a fever
My hands felt just like two balloons
Now I've got that feeling once again
I can't explain, you would not understand
This is not how I am

I have become comfortably numb




I have become comfortably numb


Okay (Okay, okay, okay)
Just a little pinprick
There'll be no more
But you may feel a little sick
Can you stand up? (Stand up, stand up)
I do believe it's working, good
That'll keep you going through the show
Come on, it's time to go


There is no pain, you are receding
A distant ship, smoke on the horizon
You are only coming through in waves
Your lips move, but I can't hear what you're saying
When I was a child, I caught a fleeting glimpse
Out of the corner of my eye
I turned to look, but it was gone
I cannot put my finger on it now
The child is grown, the dream is gone

I have become comfortably numb

",65489
12168,61565,Cartoon  Cereal,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,1058955,{Gunplay},"


I wanna hit line drives...
Wanna lose weight and keep eating...
For you...
Hey, whats up doc?


Now I was raised in a sandbox, next to you and her
You was holding the handgun, she was giving birth
To a baby boy to be just like you, I-I wonder what's that worth
I-I wonder if you ever knew that you was a role model to me first
The next day I-I woke up in the morning, seen you on the news
Looked in the mirror, then realized that I-I-I had something to prove
You told me, ""Don't be like me, just finish watching cartoons""
Which is funny now cause all I see is Wile E. Coyotes in the room


And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Yeah! Blow!)
And I run it (Yeah! Blow!)
That's ironic (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
Ironic (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
That's ironic (Y-Yeah!  Blow!)
Ironic (Yeah! Blow! Yeah!)
Salt all in my wounds
Hear my tears all in my tunes
Let my life loose in this booth
Just for you, mothafucka, hope y'all amused
And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Y-Yeah! Blow!)
And I run it (Yeah! Blow!)
That's ironic

Liberation... Leader...
Popular pie plant pictured here...
Wile E. Coyote! Wile E. Coyote!


This shit make a nigga just wanna write
Reminisce when I had the morning appetite
Apple Jacks and after that I hit the TV Guide
Animaniac the only thing that gave me peace of mind
I'm a maniac when aiming at the enemy that lied
Tell a story that I'll never grow to 25
Not to worry, every warrior will come and see euphoria
And that's a covenant I put on every tribe
Ain't nobody gon' tie your shoe
Nobody gon' abide by your rule
Nobody holding your gun
How come your tongue say, ""killa"" then kill my mood
Light speed living in the world you know
Little old me, feeling like a live wire
Bet I put some new tires on a lightning bolt
'Til I wreck into a pole, like a right to vote
I'm from the bottom of the jungle
Living in the bottom of the food chain
When you get a new chain, nigga take it from you
A new name, want stripes, and you a zebra look-alike
Hope another homicide don't numb you a nun do
Things we will never learn soon
In the era where we wanna earn soon
That's a error, you can smell it in the air
And everybody really doomed
That's why I'm backdooring you motherfuckas
All y'all can suck my dick
All them days at the county building
I'm 'bout to make my mama rich
Cartoons and (Cereal!) I ain't felt this (Good since!)
Scrooge McDuck (Here we go!), elementary hood shit

Now I was raised in a sandbox, next to you and her
You was holding the handgun, she was giving birth
To a baby boy to be just like you, I wonder what's that worth
I-I wonder if you ever knew that you was a role model to me first
The next day I-I woke up in the morning, seen you on the news
Looked in the mirror, then realized that I-I-I had something to prove
You told me, ""Don't be like me, just finish watching cartoons""
Which is funny now cause all I see is Wile E. Coyotes in the room


And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Yeah! Blow!)
And I run it (Yeah! Blow!)
That's ironic (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
Ironic (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
That's ironic (Y-Yeah!  Blow!)
Ironic (Yeah! Blow! Yeah!)
Salt all in my wounds
Hear my tears all in my tunes
Let my life loose in this booth
Just for you, mothafucka, hope y'all amused
And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Blow! Blow! Blow! Blow!)
And I run it (Y-Yeah! Blow!)
And I run it (Yeah! Blow!)
That's ironic

This shit make a nigga just wanna shit on everybody
Even with a pot to piss in
I'ma aim sloppy at a loud mouth, discharge
Dismiss any business of yours
Discounts never did amount to a check
That ya ass couldn't cash when the shit bounce
Everything dismounts, niggas gon' flip that car
AKs for the whole hood
House lick went down perfect
Two shots to the head he deserved it
I overheard it hit my bed with a bowl and remote control
Dark Wing Duck lost service
Mama said I'd better duck, she's nervous
Drama all up in the cut, hit the curtains
I mean don't intervene with no gun machine
This block stay jerking, the feds stay lurkin'
Emerging on everbody corner (Dash for it)
Get a toe tag when you play tag
With a task of a new (Task force)
Everybody wanna know my life
How did I make it (Past yours)
Well let me tell you like this
I've been running this shit since I (Asked for)
Cartoons and cereal


Now I was raised in a sandbox, next to you and her
You was holding the handgun, she was giving birth
To a baby boy to be just like you, I wonder what's that worth
I-I wonder if you ever knew that you was a role model to me first
The next day I-I woke up in the morning, seen you on the news
Looked in the mirror, then realized that I-I-I had something to prove
You told me, ""Don't be like me, just finish watching cartoons""
Which is funny now cause all I see is Wile E. Coyotes in the room
And I run it


Salt all in my wounds
Hear my tears all in my tunes
Let my life loose in this booth, just for you
Muhfucka, hope y'all amused!
I did wrong, karma came
Crackers gave me ball and chain
Friends, enemies all the same
State, fed, both can hang
Nobody can't mute me
But I never said nobody can't shoot me
Just another stat to the white folks
Still whip work to the white yolk, absolutely!
Everyday feel like the one before
Hunt the money, don't hunt the ho
If you do what you always done
Then you get what you always got
You dumb buffoons!
I ain't seen the back of my eyelids
For about the past 72 hours
Hand on my heart, face to the hood
I pledge every word you ever heard was honest
Yeah, this me, no mic
No cameras, no lights, just pain
Mama, how much trauma can I sustain?
Dirty money come with lots of stains
Road to riches come with lots of lanes
Just another player with lots of game
Never had shit, got lots to gain...


Just another player with lots of game
Never had shit, got lots to gain
(To be continued)",65722
12198,61668,Somebody That I Used to Know,pop,Gotye,2011,1737049,{Kimbra},"
Now and then I think of when we were together
Like when you said you felt so happy you could die
I told myself that you were right for me
But felt so lonely in your company
But that was love, and it's an ache I still remember


You can get addicted to a certain kind of sadness
Like resignation to the end, always the end
So when we found that we could not make sense
Well, you said that we would still be friends
But I'll admit that I was glad it was over


But you didn't have to cut me off
Make out like it never happened and that we were nothing
And I don't even need your love
But you treat me like a stranger, and that feels so rough
No, you didn't have to stoop so low
Have your friends collect your records and then change your number
I guess that I don't need that though
Now you're just somebody that I used to know
Now you're just somebody that I used to know
Now you're just somebody that I used to know

Now and then I think of all the times you screwed me over
But had me believing it was always something that I'd done
But I don't wanna live that way
Reading into every word you say
You said that you could let it go
And I wouldn't catch you hung up on somebody that you used to know


But you didn't have to cut me off
Make out like it never happened and that we were nothing (Ahhh)
And I don't even need your love (Oooh)
But you treat me like a stranger, and that feels so rough (Ahhh)
No, you didn't have to stoop so low (Oooh)
Have your friends collect your records and then change your number (Ahhh)
I guess that I don't need that though (Oooh)
Now you're just somebody that I used to know


Somebody (I used to know)
Somebody (Now you're just somebody that I used to know)
Somebody (I used to know)
Somebody (Now you're just somebody that I used to know)
(I used to know)
(That I used to know)
(I used to know)
Somebody",65848
12302,62093,We Belong Together,pop,Mariah Carey,2005,1027738,{},"
Sweet love, yeah


I didn't mean it when I said I didn't love you so
I shoulda held on tight, I never shoulda let you go
I didn't know nothing, I was stupid, I was foolish
I was lying to myself
I couldn't have fathomed I would ever be without your love
Never imagined I'd be sitting here beside myself
Guess I didn't know you, guess I didn't know me
But I thought I knew everything I never felt


The feeling that I'm feeling now that I don't hear your voice
Or have your touch and kiss your lips 'cause I don't have a choice
Oh, what I wouldn't give to have you lying by my side
Right here, 'cause, baby (We belong together)


When you left, I lost a part of me (Together)
It's still so hard to believe
Come back, baby, please
(Come back, come back, come back, come back)
'Cause we belong together
Who else am I gonna lean on when times get rough? (Who else)
Who's gonna talk to me on the phone 'til the sun comes up? (Who else)
Who's gonna take your place? There ain't nobody better (Who else)
Oh, baby, baby, we belong together

I can't sleep at night, when you are on my mind
Bobby Womack's on the radio
Singing to me, ""If you think you're lonely now""
Wait a minute, this is too deep (Too deep)
I gotta change the station
So I turn the dial, tryin' to catch a break
And then I hear Babyface, ""I only think of you""
And it's breaking my heart
I'm tryna keep it together, but I'm falling apart


I'm feelin' all out of my element
Throwin' things, cryin'
Tryin' to figure out where the hell I went wrong
The pain reflected in this song
Ain't even half of what I'm feeling inside
I need you, need you back in my life, baby (My life, my life)
(We belong together)


When you left, I lost a part of me (Together)
It's still so hard to believe
Come back, baby, please
(Come back, come back, come back, come back)
'Cause we belong together
Who else am I gonna lean on when times get rough? (Who will?)
Who's gonna talk to me on the phone 'til the sun comes up? (Who will?)
Who's gonna take your place? There ain't nobody better (Who will?)
Oh, baby, baby, we belong together, baby
(We belong together) (Who will?)

When you left, I lost a part of me (Who will?)
It's still so hard to believe (Who will?)
Come back, baby, please
(Come back, come back, come back, come back)
'Cause we belong together
Who am I gonna lean on when times get rough? (Who will?)
Who's gonna talk to me 'til the sun comes up? (Who will?)
Who's gonna take your place? There ain't nobody better (Who will?)
Oh, baby, baby, we belong together


(Who will? Who will? Who will?)
We belong together",66302
12415,62422,Some Nights,rock,fun.,2012,1049695,{​fun.},"
Some nights, I stay up cashing in my bad luck
Some nights, I call it a draw
Some nights, I wish that my lips could build a castle
Some nights, I wish they'd just fall off
But I still wake up, I still see your ghost
Oh, Lord, I'm still not sure what I stand for, oh
(Oh-ooh-woah) What do I stand for?
(Oh-ooh-woah) What do I stand for?
Most nights, I don't know anymore


Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh
Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh
Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh
Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh


This is it, boys, this is war
(Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh)
What are we waiting for?
(Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh)
Why don't we break the rules already?
I was never one to believe the hype
(Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh)
Save that for the black and white
(Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh)
Try twice as hard, and I'm half as liked
But here they come again to jack my style

And that's alright (That's alright)
I found a martyr in my bed tonight
She stops my bones from wondering
Just who I, who, I, who I am
Oh, who am I? Mmm, mmm


Well, some nights, I wish that this all would end
'Cause I could use some friends for a change
And some nights, I'm scared you'll forget me again
Some nights, I always win (I always win)
But I still wake up, I still see your ghost
Oh Lord, I'm still not sure what I stand for, oh
(Oh-ooh-woah-oh) What do I stand for?
(Oh-ooh-woah-oh) What do I stand for?
Most nights, I don't know


(Oh, come on) So this is it?
I sold my soul for this?
Washed my hands of that for this?
I miss my mom and dad for this?
(Oh, come on) No, when I see stars, when I s-
When I see stars, that's all they are
When I hear songs, they sound like a swan
So come on, oh, come on, oh, come on
Oh, come on

Well, that is it, guys, that is all
(Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh)
Five minutes in, and I'm bored again
(Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh)
Ten years of this, I'm not sure if anybody understands
This one is not for the folks at home
(Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh)
Sorry to leave, Mom, I had to go
(Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh)
Who the fuck wants to die alone
All dried up in the desert sun?


My heart is breaking for my sister
And the con that she called ""love""
And then I look into my nephew's eyes
Man, you wouldn't believe
The most amazing things
That can come from
Some terrible nights


Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh
Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh
Oh-woah, oh-ooh-woah-oh
Oh-ooh-woah-oh, oh-oh

The other night, you wouldn't believe
The dream I just had about you and me
I'd called you up, but we both agreed
It's for the best you didn't listen
It's for the best we gave our distance, oh
For the best, you didn't listen
It's for the best we get our distance, oh",66704
12595,63192,Survival Tactics,rap,Joey Bada$$,2011,1069695,"{""Joey Bada\\$\\$"",""Capital STEEZ""}","









Niggas don't want war, I'm a martian with an army of Spartans
Sparring with a knife in a missile fight
Get your intel right, your intelligence is irrelevant
But it's definite, I spit more than speech impediments
Brooklyn's the residence, the best and it's evident
We got 'em niggas P.E. nuts, like they elephants
Throw 'em in a trunk if they hate, though
We don't give a fuck as long as we collect our pay, so
Y'all collect pesos, your money ain't right here
I got them girls next to the wood like they Lightyear, I'm right chea
Tryna get a buzz, tryna pollinate
STEEZ got that presidential shit, time to inaugurate
My P.E. conglomerates, 'bout to P-E-E on any wanna-B-E, weak MC
Air 'em out or leave 'em empty, congratulate the semi-auto
Fire flame spitter like komodo
No time for fake people, they be Simmin' like Kimora
I'm the empor-ah in search of Theodora
My heart go, ""ba-boom, ba-boom, ba-boom-boom""
It's panic like Dora when shots blast
See I was raised that way, I'm from the place where they raised that 'K
Like every day in every way, and everywhere you go just ain't safe
The only thing that I can say to you is, ""Pray""
'Cause when niggas start equippin', and throw the clip in
Your blood drippin', and catch you slippin'
Another victim, don't know what's hit them-through his spinal
Just another man who defeated by survival
That's your biggest rival, in your whole life
These bars you can't handle, you better hold tight
They sayin' I'm the best, I'm like, ""You're so right""
Still ain't got enough shine to last the whole night, nigga

Yo, fuck the police, nigga
Fuck every ass-corrupt politician on Wall Street
P.E., public enemy, assassinate us, bitch!
Fuck that! Fuck everything, son
Fuck government, fuck listenin' and shit
You want fuckin' energy? Dickheads


It's like 6 milli' ways to die, my nigga, choose one
Doomsday comin', start investin' in a few guns
New gats, booby traps, and bazooka straps
Better play your cards right, no booster packs
Everybody claim they used to rap
But these ain't even punchlines no more, I'm abusing tracks
Leaving instrumentals blue and black
I'm in Marty McFly mode, so tell 'em that the future's back
Riding on hoverboards, wiping out motherboards
Start spitting fire, 'cause my motherfuckin' lung is scorched
King Arthur when he swung his sword
A king author, I ain't even use a pen in like a month or four
I had a hard time writing lyrics
Now I'm way over heads, science fiction
You can try and get it, I been the flyest with it
Wouldn't mind a feign of interest for your finest interest
They say hard work pays off
Well tell the Based God don't quit his day job
'Cause P.E.'s about to take off
With protons and electrons, homie, that's an A-bomb
Ugh, fuckin' ridiculous
Finger to the president screamin', ""Fuck censorship!""
If Obama got that president election
Then them P.E. boys 'bout to make an intervention
Fuck what I once said, I want the bloodshed
'Cause nowadays for respect, you gotta pump lead
I guess Columbine was listenin' to Chaka Khan
And Pokémon wasn't gettin' recognized at Comic-Con
It's like we've been content with losin'
And half our students fallen victim to the institution
Jobs are scarce since the Scientific Revolution
And little kids are shootin' Uzis 'cause it's given to 'em
Little weapon, code name: Smith and Wesson
And you'll be quick to catch a bullet like an interception
If your man's tryna disrespect it
Send a message and it's over in a millisecond, nigga
",67547
12697,63580,Over the Rainbow,pop,Judy Garland,1939,1233405,{},"
Somewhere over the rainbow
Way up high
There's a land that I heard of
Once in a lullaby


Somewhere over the rainbow
Skies are blue
And the dreams that you dare to dream
Really do come true


Someday I'll wish upon a star
And wake up where the clouds are far
Behind me
Where troubles melt like lemon drops
Away above the chimney tops
That's where you'll find me


Somewhere over the rainbow
Bluebirds fly
Birds fly over the rainbow
Why, then, oh, why can't I?

If happy little bluebirds fly
Beyond the rainbow
Why, oh, why can't I?",67962
12793,63992,Oldie,rap,Odd Future,2012,2812525,{},"
Yo, shout out to everybody that worked on the album, you feel me, son?
Yo, shouts out to Ty Dollas
Shouts out to Hodgy Daddies, shouts out to Left Brizzle
Shouts out to Domyen, shouts out to Frankie Ocean
Shouts out to Syd the Dude
Shouts out to L-Boy, awwwwk
I told you


The big-eared bandit is tossin' all his manners
In a bag and wrappin' them in Saran wrap bandages
Tossin' 'em in baskets with the rest of those sandwiches
So when he says, ""Catch up, nigga,"" it looks like an accident
Um, flowing like my pad is the maxiest
My bitch white and black like she's been mimicking a panda
It's the dark-skinned nigga, kissing bitches in Canada
Then kicking all out like Mr. Lawrence did Pamela
Put her in the chamber all against her Wilt Chamberlain
I never had a reason, nigga, I was just Ableton
Not a fucking Logic-contradicting dickhead (Not a Logic)
Flyer than an ostrich moshing in a tar pit
Semen-scented cheetah printed tee
In that 'Preme five-panel, I'll repeat it for the season (Hahaha)
Previous items in the present
With the normal-ass past like I cheated on my team
It's me (Tried to get that nigga, but, Golf Wang see, he did come back, though)

To have some type of knowledge that is one perception
But knowin' you own your opponent is a defeatin' bonus
I'm Zeus to a Kronos, cartilage cartridge is boneless
Smiles of cowards in lead showers, dead spouses in red blouses
Children who fled houses on Mustang horses and went joustin'
I'm on my Robin Hood shit, robbing in the hood
Whips, drugs, jewels and your pet, I'm stealin' your rims
Coke diamonds and your Vette, soldiers lace the fuckin' boot
And salute like the troop, when they shoot, you gon' brrrooop
It's KILLHodgy, nigga, stay the fuck off my stoop
And out my Kool-Aid, Juice


What's up, bitch?
Hodgy got the juice, I got the gin
Jasper got the Henny, my nigga, we get it in
Wolf Gang party at the hotel
I call a ho, you call a ho, and all the hoes tell
You know Left Brain need a freak (Yeah)
I need a bitch to go down like a Nitty beat
Yup, uh, and her ass fat
Don't be surprised if I ask where the hash at
Nigga, I'm tryna smoke, bitch, get higher (What up, what up, what's up, smoke)
Domo, where that Flocka Flame? Talking 'bout a lighter
Still bang salute me or just shoot me
'Cause if you don't salute me then my team will do the shooting
Yeah, my nigga Ace will pull the black jack
The king Mike G is in the cut with the black mac
We like the mafia, bitch, don't get to slacking up
And if these haters acting up, throw 'em in the aqueduct
Free my nigga Earl, yo, I don't really ask for much
But two bad bitches in front of me cunnilingus

(We out here)
What the fuck is caution?
Often I leave 'em flossing in KAWS, exes next to coffins
Lost in translation, the dreams you chase
Got you diving for the plates like you stealing home base
That's great, I'm home alone dreaming of two on ones
With Rihanna and Christina Milian, bring it on
And Travis is in the closet organizing and hanging the tramp
Three lettermans that Ace has been making him
No strays while we catching matinees, huh?
I'm getting blazed thinking 'bout those days
I had the top off the GT3 like toupees
One finger in the air, all's fair when crime pays
My grand scheme of things is to be attached
To the game like bitches to their wedding rings
And you don't even need to look 'cause we gleam obscene
In the light, ride slow to my yellow diamond shining
Like the Batman logo over Gotham, rock LA to Harlem
If you say, ""Get 'em, Mike G,"" then I got 'em
One man squadron, nigga, I'm a problem
From Briggs, I got bars and plans to
Pimp these Polish bitches into pop stars
Humanity kills, we all suffer from insanity still
And if I said it then it is or it's gonna be real
OF 'til I OD and I probably will, uh

It's still Mr. Smoke-a-Lotta-Pot, get your baby mommy popped
With my other snobby bop, do I love her? Probably not
Know your shit is not as hot as anything I fuckin' drop
Bitch, I'm in the zone, stand alone, like Macaulay Culk
I've been runnin' blocks since a snotty tot
Big wheel was a big deal with the water Glocks
Now I'm all grown, same song, just a different waltz
Fire what I talk, but still cooler than an Otter Pop
Op, Dom next shit in your wish list
Mad sick shit, mad dick for your bitches
On some slick shit, your mistress on my hit list
And I'm lifted 'til I'm stiff outta this bitch
Odd in your motherfuckin' area (Motherfuckin' area)
Blood clots give me five feet 'fore I bury ya
('Fore I bury ya)
Suicide flow, let the big wave carry ya
(Suicide flow, let the big wave carry ya)
Tyler got the mask like he held Jim Carrey up
And fuck your team, ho, nigga, wassup? (Wassup?)
Wolf Gang so you know we not givin' no fucks
You know me dog, I'm a chill in the cut
So I can cut it short, break it down, couple pounds, roll it up


Get me a Persian rug where the center looks like Galaga
Right, right


Rent a supercar for a day
Drive around with your friends, smoke a gram of that haze
Bro, easy on the ounce, that's a lot for a day
But just enough for a week, my nigga, what can I say?
I'm high and I'm bi, wait, I mean I'm straight
I'ma get you this wine, the runner just brought the grapes
My brother give it some time, Morris, and Day
Course you know the vibe's just as fly as the rhymes
On the song, cut and you could sample the feel
Headphone bleed, make this shit sound real
Used to work the grill, fat burger and fries
Then I made a mil' and them psychics was liars
Now, how many fucking crystal balls can I buy and own?
Humble old me had to flex for the folks
Down in Muscle Beach pumping iron and bone
Bumping oldies off my cellular phone
Yeah, bumping oldies off my cellular phone
Bumping oldies off my cellular phone


Goddammit!
Rapping is stupid and it's hard
Gotta do it over and over and over again but here it go


Hey, it's Jasper, not even a rapper
Only on this beat to make my racks grow faster
Got a TV show, so I guess I'm an actor
Pothead, half-baked, lookin' like Chappelle
Rollin' up a blunt with that fire from hell (Woo)
Still ignorant, still hit a bitch (Wow)
Wolf Gang, nigga, so I still don't give a shit (Woo)
Catch me in the back with Miley's on my lap (Shit)
Bong rips as I feel on that little bitch cat (Cat)


Hah, nigga came through with a 9-bar real quick
Just for the bitches, little bit of money in my pocket
Fuck it, Wolf Gang
Yeah, fuck that


Look, for contrast, here's a pair of lips
Swallowin' sarapin, settin' fire to sheriff's whips
(Whoops, whoops!) Fuckin' All-American terrorist
Crushin' rapper larynx to feed 'em a fuckin' carrot stick
And me? I just spent a year Ferrisin'
And lost a little sanity to show you what hysterics is
Spit 'til the lips meet the bottom of a barrel, so that sterile piss
Flow remind these niggas where embarrassed is
Narrow, tight line, might impair him since
I made it back to Fahrenheit, grimey get dinero type
Feral, fuckin' ill-apparel-wearin' pack of parasites
Threw his own youth off the roof after paradise
La di da di, back in here to fuck the party up
Raidin' fridges, tippin' over vases with a tommy gun
Never dollars, poppa make it rain hockey pucks
And sixty-day chips from fuckin' awesome anonymous
Call him bloated 'til he show 'em that the flow deluxe
Off the wall loafers, Four Loko in a cobra clutch
Vocals bold and rough, evoke a ho to pose as drum
And let me hit and beat it with a stick until the hole is numb
The culprit of the potent punch
Scoldin' hot as dunkin' scrotum in a Folgers cup
Or Nevada, drivin' drunk inside a stolen truck
And shittin' like his colon bust
Belly full of chicken and a fifth of old petroleum
Supernova, I'm rollin' over the novices
And roamin' through the forest and spittin' cold as his porridge is
Stay gold 'til the case closed and the story end
Post mortem porkin' this rap shit and record it
To escort it to the morgue again, lord of lips
Bored of this, forklift the tippy top, best under 40 list
Stormin' the gate, ensurin' the bass
Scorchin', leave these motherfuckers sore in torso and face (Ugh)
Get at me, we savages, half a pack of Apache
Indian pack of niggas who don't give a fuck if we nasty as flatulence
As a matter of fact, your swagger is tacky
So see me, you can't, like Crunchy Black catchin' a taxi
Uh, back like lateral passin'
With that motherfuckin' gladiator manner of rappin'
As an addict, I let Percocet and Xannies relax me
Fall back if your paddies is Maxi, please


OF, shit, that's all I got
From my bigger brother Frankie to my little brother Tac
From that father figure Clancy to that skatey nigga Nak
Shreddin' down 'Fax, Wolf Gang run the fuckin' block
Storefront, knee tat
Book cover is the same lettering on lettermans and cotton socks
And grip tape... and my shoes
Um, I was fifteen when I first drew that donut
Five years later, for our label, yeah, we own it
I started an empire, I ain't even old enough
To drink a fucking beer, I'm tipsy off this soda pop
This is for the niggers in the suburbs
And the white kids with nigga friends that say the n-word
And the ones who got called weird, fag, bitch, nerd
'Cause you was into jazz, kitty cats and Steven Spielberg
They say we ain't actin' right
Always try to turn our fuckin' color into black and white
But they'll never change 'em, never understand 'em
Radical's my anthem, turn my fuckin' amps up
So instead of critiquing and bitchin', bein' mad as fuck
Just admit, not only are we talented, we're rad as fuck, bitches


OFM, banging on your FM
Gnaw, 2011, yeah
Golf Wang",68399
12821,64089,Beez In The Trap,rap,Nicki Minaj,2012,1926870,"{""2 Chainz""}","
Yo
Man
Man
Uh


Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap


Uh, man, I been did that, man, I been popped off
And if she ain't tryin' to give it up, she get dropped off
Let me bust that U-ie, bitch, bust that open
Might spend a couple thou' just to bust that open
Rip it off, no joking, like your name Hulk Hogan
Niggas move weight in the South, but live in Hoboken
Bitch, I spit that crack, like I'm in that trap
So if you need a hit, then I'm with that bat (Bow!)

Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing (Tru!)
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap (Yeah)
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap (2 Chainz!)


Okay, now, Nicki, Nicki, Nicki, put it in your kidney
Got a new LS 450, ain't no keys in this doohickey
If I weren't rapping, I'd be trapping
If I weren't trapping, I'd be pimping
If I weren't pimping, I'd be getting it, period
I don't smoke no Bobby, but my denim be from Ricky (Ricky)
Got your girl on Molly, and we smokin' loud and drinkin' (Drinkin')
Got my top back so you can see what I been thinkin' (Thinkin')
I-If you know me then you know I've been thinking Franklin (Franklin)
Money (Money), thousands (Thousands)
True Religion trousers (Tell 'em!)
Got a private home, started from them public houses (Damn)
Hair weave killer (Killer), causing her arousal (Tru)
Audi A8, told them ""outtie 5000,"" uh!

Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap


Damn, damn, what they say about me?
I don't know man, fuck is on your biscuit
If I get hit, swinging on a big bitch
I don't know man, I'm shittin' on your whole life
Damn, damn, what they say about me?
I don't know man, fuck is on your biscuit
If I get hit, swinging on a big bitch
I don't know man, I'm shittin' on your whole life


Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap

Man, I'm out in Texas, man, I'm out in A-town
Then I'm up in Chi-town or Miami shuttin' it down
It's that New Orleans, it's LA or The Bay
It's New York, Philly, and the whole DMV
I'm a Detroit player, man, it's North-South Cack
Ohio, Pittsburgh, got St. Louis on deck
It's Delaware, Connecticut, it's New Jersey got hella bricks
It's Queens, Brooklyn, and yeah, they wildin'
Bronx, Harlem, and Staten Island


Bitches ain't shit and they ain't sayin' nothing
A hundred motherfuckers can't tell me nothing
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap
I beez in the trap, bee-beez in the trap


Damn, damn, what they say about me?
I don't know man, fuck is on your biscuit
If I get hit, swinging on a big bitch
I don't know man, I'm shittin' on your whole life
Damn, damn, what they say about me?
I don't know man, fuck is on your biscuit
If I get hit, swinging on a big bitch
I don't know man, I'm shittin' on your whole life",68515
13084,65285,The Recipe,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,1353941,"{""Dr. Dre""}","


(Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to)


Every morning when I wake up, uh
Money on my mind, good time to get caked up, uh
Sunshine coming through my blinds, I'm living, but
Really though, it's never enough, ten million, that's a must
Living in California, everybody wanna visit for
Women, weed and weather
They come for women, weed and weather
For the women, weed and weather
From all around the world for the women, weed and weather
These niggas'll kill for that, put it in your grill for that
Still everybody gotta build for that, me? I make mills off that
How the fuck y'all can't see I ride, when I drive
Down the block and you look outside
H-A-T-E in your eyes, I enter big money for the enterprise
It's a beautiful day, I guess, for a bitch to roll with Andre, I guess
Roll it up, baby, come and lift that dress
Then roll it up for me when I'm stressed

You might catch me in Atlanta looking like a boss
New Orleans and then Miami, party in New York
Texas, I be screwed up, Chi-Town, I be really pimpin'
But nothing like my hometown, I'm forever livin'


Women, weed and weather
They come for women, weed and weather
For the women, weed and weather
From all around the world for the women, weed and weather
Got that women, weed and weather
Don't it sound clever? Come and play
Wh-what more can I say? W-welcome to LA


Uhh, my nigga said he wanna fly out to get him some
Three W's only for a three-day run, bitch
Take them mothafuckin' panties off, you ain't no nun, shit
I be living in the sky every time I ride by them hoes
""Ribbon In The Sky"" on the radio 'cause Stevie know I control
Let it breathe, I control, California living 'til I am old
You want to be on to peak on the charts
So the peons can be gone and pee on their hearts
She in the coupe, she in the Neon
'Cause she on the BS before we can start
Fuck with a nigga, ride with a nigga
Let 'em know I'm priority, order me
Hennessy and, for my niggas, OG Killa
Call it Jason Voorhees, boy, he's on his job
Boy, he sure be having the marks on they mark
Pretty bitches and tire marks, let 'em inhale them pipe exhausts
Let 'em reveal how much it cost for this life, controlling my price?
No way, hell no, uh-uh
If I'm wrong, I don't wanna be right
We want to be on to peak on the charts
So the peons can be gone and pee on their hearts
Women, weed, weather, it's not my fault
That it's 82 degrees and my top peeled off

You might catch me in Atlanta looking like a boss
New Orleans and then Miami, party in New York
Texas, I be screwed up, Chi-Town, I be really pimpin'
But nothing like my hometown, I'm forever livin'


Women, weed and weather
They come for women, weed and weather
For the women, weed and weather
From all around the world for the women, weed and weather
Got that women, weed and weather
Don't it sound clever? Come and play
Wh-what more can I say? W-welcome to LA


Known for that homegrown where I come from
Smoke one, palm trees, double D's got 'em topless in the sun
I shall proceed, that's me, mothafuck your opinion
Huh, how many ways am I killing 'em? Shit, right around a billion
We on it, that mean we living for the moment
That mean she'll fuck 'til the morning, time and I got time
And I know that I'm in a position of controlling
Anything out by that ocean
I'm a boss, I'll buy that ocean, ain't nobody fucking with this

They want that shit, they often fiend
I give it to 'em, but in between
My time, I gotta tie shoestrings
Life's a trip when you want these things
I often slip and then I lean
Toward three W's in life
You know blow job need an application
Eating pussy make appetite
And yeah, my type, I like 'em brown
Just like my drink, the fuck you think?
I don't fuck with no hand-me-downs
See if you fuck, then it's after me
You know how much I'ma make it work?
You know her dress livin' in her purse
When you discuss your love for lust
Just make sure you visit here first: Cali


You might catch me in Atlanta looking like a boss
New Orleans and then Miami, party in New York
Texas, I be screwed up, Chi-Town, I be really pimpin'
But nothing like my hometown, I'm forever livin'


Women, weed and weather
They come for women, weed and weather
For the women, weed and weather
From all around the world for the women, weed and weather
Got that women, weed and weather
Don't it sound clever? Come and play
Wh-what more can I say? W-welcome to LA


(Smokin' weed with you
In the leaves, in the fall
I smoke with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
In the leaves, in the fall
I smoke with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you
'Cause you've taught me to
Smokin' weed with you)",69982
13117,65472,Cold,rap,Kanye West & DJ Khaled,2012,1118169,{},"
Uhh, can the headphones go louder?
Kanye West!
Yup, Swag King Cole, yup
DJ Khaled!


Can't a young nigga get money any more?
Tell PETA my mink is dragging on the floor
Can I have a bad bitch without no flaws
Come to meet me without no drawers?


Dinner with Anna Wintour, racing with Anja Rubik
I told you motherfuckers it was more than the music
In the projects one day, to Project Runway
We done heard all that loud-ass talking, we're used to it
I'm from where shorties fucked up, double-cupped up
Might even kill somebody and YouTube it
To whoever think their words affect me is too stupid
And if you can do it better than me, then you do it!
We flyer than a parakeet, floatin' with no parachute
Six thousand dollar pair of shoes, we made it to the Paris news!
Don't talk about style cause I embarrass you
Shut the fuck up when you talk to me 'fore I embarrass you

Can't a young nigga get money any more?
Tell PETA my mink is dragging on the floor
Can I have a bad bitch without no flaws
Come to meet me without no drawers?


And the whole industry want to fuck your old chick
Only nigga I got respect for is Wiz
And I'll admit, I had fell in love with Kim
Around the same time she had fell in love with him
Well that's cool, baby girl, do ya thang
Lucky I ain't had Jay drop him from the team
La Familia, Roc Nation
We in the building, we still keep it basement
Flyer than a parakeet, floatin' with no parachute
Six thousand dollar pair of shoes, I made it to the Paris news
Don't talk about style cause I'll embarrass you
Shut the fuck up when you talk to me 'fore I embarrass you
G.O.O.D. Music, we fresh, we fresh
Anything else, we detest, detest
Bitch-ass niggas got ass and breasts
All that said, let me ask this quest'


Can't a young nigga get money any more?
Tell PETA my mink is dragging on the floor
Can I have a bad bitch without no flaws
Come to meet me without

Don't talk to me 'bout style, nigga, I'll mothafuckin' embarrass you
Talking 'bout clothes, I'll mothafuckin' embarrass you
Hollering 'bout some hoes, I'll mothafuckin' embarrass you
Way too cold, I promise you'll need some Theraflu
(Uh, uh, uh, uh, uh) Get the Theraflu
(Uh, uh-uh, uh-uh, uh) Get the Theraflu
(Uh, uh-uh, uh-uh, uh, uh-uh, uh-uh)
(Uh, uh-uh, uh-uh, uh) Get the Theraflu


This Chicago, nigga
South Side, we in this bitch
East Side crazy, blow that loud
Low End, 39th, The Ickes
47th Street, Garfield Park, 79th
Stony Island, K-Town, Wild 100's
This Chi-Town, Dro City, The Village
Harvey World, O Block, 64th and Normal
64th and King Drive, what up?
83rd, Cottage Grove, the Gardens
This Chicago nigga!
The Dearborns, 55th, Cabrini-Green
Terror Town, West Side, Pocket Town
This Chicago! Halsted to the Ida B. Wells
New York City, Atlanta, London Town
Chiraq Drillinoise
This DJ Pharris, fuck around and get embarrassed",70202
13150,65587,Mercy,rap,Kanye West,2012,6951903,"{""Big Sean"",""Pusha T"",""2 Chainz""}","
Well, it is a weepin' and a moanin' and a gnashin' of teeth
It is a weepin' and a moanin' and a gnashin' of teeth
It is a-when it comes to my sound which is the champion sound
Believe, believe


O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy
Your chick, she so thirsty
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Believe)
O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy
Your chick, she so thirsty
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo
With your girl, she tryna jerk me
O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Woah, believe)
O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy
Your chick, she so thirsty (Boy)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Boy)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me

Okay, drop it to the floor, make that ass shake (Shake, shake)
Woah, make the ground move: that's an ass quake
Built a house up on that ass: that's an ass-state
Roll-roll-roll my weed on it: that's an ass tray
Say, Ye, say, Ye, don't we do this every day-day? (Huh?)
I work them long nights, long nights to get a payday (Huh?)
Finally got paid, now I need shade and a vacay
And niggas still hatin'
So much hate, I need a AK (AK)
Now we out in Paris, yeah, I'm Perrierin'
White girls politickin': that's that Sarah Palin
Get-get-get-get-get-gettin' hot, Californicatin'
I give her that D, 'cause that's where I was born and raised in


O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Swerve)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Swerve, believe)
O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Swerve)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Swerve)


Well, it is a weepin' and a moanin' (Swerve)
And a gnashin' of teeth (Swerve)
It is a weepin' and a mournin' (Swerve)
And a gnashin' of teeth (Swerve)
It is a-when it comes to my sound (Swerve)
Which is the champion sound (Swerve)
Believe, believe (Swerve)
Believe, believe (Swerve)

Yuugh! It's prime time, my top back, this pimp game, ho
I'm red leather, this cocaine, I'm Rick James, ho
I'm bill-droppin', Ms. Pac-Man, this pill-poppin' ass ho
I'm poppin' too, these blue dolphins need two coffins
All she want is some heel money
All she need is some bill money
He take his time, he counts it out
I weighs it up, that's real money
Check the neck, check the wrist
Them heads turnin': that's exorcist
My Audemars like Mardi Gras
That's Swiss time, and that's excellence
Two-door preference
Roof gone, George Jefferson
That white frost on that pound cake
So your Duncan Hines is irrelevant, woo
Lambo Murciélago
She go wherever I go
Wherever we go, we do it pronto, it's like-


O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Swerve)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Swerve, believe)
O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Swerve)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Swerve)

Well, it is a weepin' and a moanin' (Swerve)
And a gnashin' of teeth (Swerve)
It is a weepin' and a mournin' (Swerve)
And a gnashin' of teeth (Swerve)
It is a-when it comes to my sound (Swerve)
Which is the champion sound (Swerve)
Believe, believe (Swerve)
Believe (Swerve)


Well, it is a weepin' and a moanin'
And a gnashin' of teeth in the dancehall
And who no have teeth gwan rub pon dem gums
Cuh when time it comes to my sound
Which is the champion sound
The bugle has blown fi many times
And it still have one more time left
Cuh the amount of stripe weh deh pon our shoulder


Let the suicide doors up
I threw suicides on the tour bus
I threw suicides on the private jet
You know what that mean, I'm fly to death
I step in Def Jam buildin' like I'm the shit
Tell 'em gimme fifty million or I'ma quit
Most rappers' taste level ain't at my waist level
Turn up the bass 'til it's up-in-yo-face level
Don't do no press but I get the most press, kid
Plus, yo, my bitch make your bitch look like Precious
Somethin' 'bout Mary, she gone off that molly
Now the whole party is melting like Dalí
Now everybody is movin' they body
Don't sell me apartment, I'll move in the lobby (Yah)
Niggas is loiterin' just to feel important
You gon' see lawyers and niggas in Jordans (2 Chainz)


Okay, now catch up to my campaign
Coupe the color of mayonnaise
I'm drunk and high at the same time
Drinkin' champagne on the airplane (Tell 'em)
Spit rounds like a gun range (Baow)
Beat it up like Rampage
Hundred bands, cut your girl
Now your girl need a Band-Aid (Damn)
Grade A, A1
Chain the color of Akon
Black diamonds, backpack rhymin'
Co-signed by Louis Vuitton (Yep)
Horsepower, horsepower
All this Polo on, I got horsepower
Pound of this cost four thousand
Now I make it rain, she want more showers
Rain (Rain) pourin' (Pourin')
All my cars is foreign (Foreign)
All my broads is foreign (Foreign)
Money tall like Jordan


O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Swerve)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Swerve)
O-o-o-o-o-okay, Lamborghini Mercy (Swerve)
Your chick, she so thirsty (Swerve)
I-I-I-I-I'm in that two-seat Lambo (Swerve, believe)
With your girl, she tryna jerk me (Swerve, believe)


Well, it is a weepin' and a moanin' (Swerve)
And a gnashin' of teeth (Swerve)
It is a weepin' and a moanin' (Swerve)
And a gnashin' of teeth (Swerve)
It is a-when it comes to my sound (Swerve)
Which is the champion sound (Swerve)
Believe, believe (Swerve)
Believe, believe (Swerve)
Well, it is a weepin' and a moanin' and a gnashin' of teeth
It is a weepin' and a moanin' and a gnashin' of teeth
It is a-when it comes to my sound which is the champion sound
Believe, believe, believe, believe",70324
13167,65656,Born in the U.S.A.,rock,Bruce Springsteen,1984,1082352,{},"
Born down in a dead man's town
The first kick I took was when I hit the ground
You end up like a dog that's been beat too much
'Til you spend half your life just coverin' up


Born in the U.S.A
I was born in the U.S.A
I was born in the U.S.A
Born in the U.S.A


Got in a little hometown jam
So they put a rifle in my hand
Sent me off to a foreign land
To go and kill the yellow man


Born in the U.S.A
I was born in the U.S.A
I was born in the U.S.A
I was born in the U.S.A

Come back home to the refinery
Hiring man says, ""Son if it was up to me""
Went down to see my V.A. man
He said, ""Son, don't you understand""


I had a brother at Khe Sanh
Fighting off the Viet Cong
They're still there, he's all gone
He had a woman he loved in Saigon
I got a picture of him in her arms now


Down in the shadow of the penitentiary
Out by the gas fires of the refinery
I'm ten years burning down the road
Nowhere to run ain't got nowhere to go


Born in the U.S.A
I was born in the U.S.A. now
Born in the U.S.A
I'm a long gone Daddy in the U.S.A. now
Born in the U.S.A
Born in the U.S.A
Born in the U.S.A
I'm a cool rockin' Daddy in the U.S.A. now",70448
13384,66628,Goldie,rap,A$AP Rocky,2012,1850200,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
Aha, aha
I said it must be 'cause a nigga got dough
Extraordinary swag and a mouth full of gold
Hoes at my shows they be strippin' off they clothes
And them college girls write a nigga name on they toes
Niggas talk shit 'til they get lockjaw
Chrome to ya dome 'til ya get glockjaw
Party like a cowboy or a rockstar
Everybody play the tough guy 'til shit pop off


Let's take it to the basics, you in the midst of greatness
My Martin was a Maison, rocked Margielas with no laces
Cristal go by the cases, wait hold up that was racist
I would prefer the Aces, ain't no different when you taste it
A 40 ounce to chase it, that's just a understatement
I'm early to the party, but my 'Rari is the latest
Somehow it seems girls in they late teens
Remind me your favorite jeans cause they naked cause you famous
Life's a mothafucka, ain't it? These other rappers ain't us
So tell me what your name is, I'ma tell it to my stainless
You aim it 'fore you bang it let that banger leave you brainless
It's just me, myself, and I and mothafuckas that I came with
Miscellaneous niggas wanna hate on me
Until I tell 'em to they face they ain't no G
Low key, niggas mad cause I'm smooth puffin' Zig Zags
Tell 'em quit the riff raff bitchin' with your bitch ass

I said it must be 'cause a nigga got dough
Extraordinary swag and a mouth full of gold
Hoes at my shows they be strippin' off they clothes
And them college girls write a nigga name on they toes
Niggas talk shit 'til they get lockjaw
Chrome to ya dome 'til ya get glockjaw
Party like a cowboy or a rockstar
Everybody play the tough guy 'til shit pop off


Yes, I'm the shit, tell me do it stink?
It feel good wakin' up to money in the bank
Three model bitches, cocaine on the sink
And I'm so 'bout it 'bout it, I might roll up in a tank
Cause my chain came from Cuba, got a lock up on the link
And them red bottom loafers just to compliment the mink
Eyes chink, rollin' up that dank, blowin' on that stank
What you mean? Tell me what you drink, I'm on that kissin' pink
You could call me Billy Gates, got a crib in every state
Man on the moon, got a condo out in space
Open up your legs, tell me how it taste
And them niggas talkin' shit so tell 'em, ""Tell it to my face""
Tell that bitch, hop up on my dick, rolled up on her quick
In a six, told her suck a dick, motorboat her tits
I'm the shit, niggas mad cause I'm smooth puffin' Zig-Zags
Tell 'em quit the riff raff bitchin' with your bitch ass

I said it must be 'cause a nigga got dough
Extraordinary swag and a mouth full of gold
Hoes at my shows they be strippin' off they clothes
And them college girls write a nigga name on they toes
Niggas talk shit 'til they get lockjaw
Chrome to ya dome 'til ya get glockjaw
Party like a cowboy or a rockstar
Everybody play the tough guy 'til shit pop off


Oh, yeah, oh, right
Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah
Oh, yeah, oh, yeah
Oh, yeah
Everybody play the tough guy 'til shit pop off (Right, right)",71525
13514,67077,Dont Like.1,rap,"Kanye West, Chief Keef, Pusha T, Big Sean & Jadakiss",2012,2239173,"{""Kanye West / Chief Keef / Pusha T / Big Sean & Jadakiss""}","


Fraud niggas, y'all niggas, that's that shit I don't like
Your shit make-believe, rappin' about my own life
Real names kill things, that's that shit I won't write
'Cause my niggas still sellin' dope
Like they ain't on their third strikes
Campin' out in that corridor, fuck you waitin' on Jordans for?
I middle-man it for twenty-three
Just meet me somewhere 'round Baltimore
(Woo!) That's rare, nigga (Woo!) Ric Flair, nigga
(Woo!) The power's in my hair, nigga
(Woo!) I give this beat the chair, nigga
SoHo or Tribeca, three hoes: trifecta
Dope money, hope money, Hublot, my watch better
My pen's better, you don't write, trendsetter, you clone-like
Pay homage or K's vomit, ungrateful niggas I don't like-rrrah!


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Bang bang)
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Bang bang)
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Bang bang, haha!)
Sneak disser, that's that shit I don't like
(This Chicago, nigga!)

They smile in my face is what I don't like
They steal your whole sound: that's a soundbite
The media crucify me like they did Christ
They want to find me not breathin' like they found Mike
(Whoa-oh-oh) A girl'll run her mouth only out of spite
(Whoa-oh-oh) But I'd never hit a woman, never in my life
(Ayy!) I was in too deep like Mekhi Phife'
(Ayy!) In that pussy so deep, I could have drowned twice
(Whoa-oh-oh) Rose gold Jesus piece with the brown ice
(Whoa-oh-oh) Eatin' good: vegetarian with the brown rice
(Ayy!) Girls kissin' girls, 'cause it's hot, right?
(Ayy!) But unless they use a strap-on, then they not dykes
(Whoa-oh-oh) They ain't about that life, they ain't about that life
(Whoa-oh-oh) We hangin' out the window: it's about to be a Suge night
(Ayy!) Free Bump J, real nigga for life
(Ayy!) Shoutout to Derrick Rose, man, that nigga nice
(Whoa-oh-oh) Shoutout to L.E.P., Jay Boogie, right?
(Whoa-oh-oh) Chief Keef, King Louie, this is Chi, right? Right?!


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Right now)
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Right now)
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Right now)
Sneak disser, that's that shit I don't like
Don't like (Like) don't like (Right now)
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like
(Young Chop on the beat)

Fake Gucci, that's that shit that I don't like (Nah, nah)
Smokin' on this dope, higher than a kite
This bitch gon' love me now, she gon' let me pipe (yah)
Screamin', ""Sosa, that's that nigga that I like!"" (Sosa)
I don't want relations, I just want one night (One night)
'Cause a thirsty bitch, that's the shit that I don't like (Nah)
I got tats up on my arm 'cause this shit is life (That's life, tatted)
And I stunt so much in clothes 'cause I'm livin' life (Life, Louis, Gucci)
I come up on the scene, and I'm stealin' light
Bitch, I'm high off life, got me feelin' right (300)
Bitch, I'm Chief Keef, fuck who don't like!
An-an-and bitch, we GBE, we just go on sight (GBE baby)


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Right now)
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Right now)
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Right now)
Sneak disser, that's that shit I don't like
Chief Keef, Chi-Town, D-Town, you know?


Whoa, we are not one and the same
Nigga, I'm fuckin' insane, fuck is you sayin'?
Yo' ass been doin' the same
Shit, not doin' what you sayin', dang
I told yo' old bitch she was fuckin' a lame
Turn one ho to a train
Blaow, blang, my niggas holdin' that pain
I just hope you been prayin'-bang bang!
Ridin' for my niggas and that's for life
High class, I'm just surrounded by these lowlives
And I run this bitch like it's no lights
Goin' hard the whole night 'cause I ain't goin' back to my old life
I promise

A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like (right now!)
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (nah!)
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (right now!)
Sneak disser, that's that shit I don't like
HEEEEH!


I done sold purp (Purple), I done sold white (White)
Runnin' outta work, that's that shit I don't like (Nah)
She never let me hit it (Nah), she gave me dome twice (haha)
She blowin' up my phone, that's that bitch I don't like
Nah, jean jacket with the sleeves cut
Put the pressure on 'em, just when they think that I eased up
Thirty for the Cuban, 'nother thirty for the Jesus (Uh-huh)
Believe in ourselves when nobody else believed us, suckas!


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Bang bang)
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Bang bang)
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like (Bang bang)
Sneak disser, that's that shit I don't like",72024
13535,67194,Stand by Me,rb,Ben E. King,1960,1590384,{},"


When the night has come
And the land is dark
And the moon is the only light we'll see
No, I won't be afraid
Oh, I won't be afraid
Just as long as you stand, stand by me


So darlin', darlin', stand by me
Oh, stand by me
Oh, stand
Stand by me, stand by me


If the sky that we look upon
Should tumble and fall
Or the mountains should crumble to the sea
I won't cry, I won't cry
No, I won't shed a tear
Just as long as you stand, stand by me

And darlin', darlin', stand by me
Oh, stand by me
Whoa, stand now
Stand by me, stand by me




Darlin', darlin', stand by me
Oh, stand by me
Oh, stand now
Stand by me, stand by me

Whenever you're in trouble, won't you stand by me?
Oh, stand by me
Whoa, just stand now
Oh, stand, stand by me",72156
13684,67915,No Lie,rap,2 Chainz,2012,2133165,{Drake},"
EarDrummers, Mike WiLL Made-It
Yah! T.R.U., 2 Chainz!


I am smokin' on that gas, life should be on Cinemax
Movie, bought my boo bigger tits and a bigger ass
Who he's? Not I, I smoke strong; that Popeye
Louie V's in my archives, black diamonds; apartheid
Bread up and my top down, on the block with a block out
Hit your ass with that bla-kow, dope enough to go in yo' nostrils
I take your girl and kidnap her, feed her to my mattress
A skeleton in my closet, it's probably one of these dead-ass rappers
It's probably one of these pussy-ass niggas, don't try me, I'll pull that trigger
Got your car note in my cup, and your rent in my Swisher
That pussy so good I miss ya, head game's so vicious
And all I get is cheese, like I'm takin' pictures


Yeah, I say fuck you, 'less I'm with ya
If I take you out of the picture, I know real niggas won't miss ya
No lie, no lie, no lie-ee-i-ee-i
No lie, no lie, no lie-ee-i-ee-i
Real niggas say word
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
Real niggas say word
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
Real niggas say true
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
That's a thing I don't do, nah, I just do it for the niggas
That are tryna see a million 'fore they die, whattup?

2 Chainz and Champagne, you want true? That's true enough
Forbes list like every year, my office is my tour bus
She came through, she brought food, she got fucked, she knew whassup
She think I'm the realest out and I say, ""Damn, that makes two of us""
Aww, that look like what's her name, chances are it's what's her name
Chances are if she was acting up then I fucked her once and never fucked again
She could have a Grammy, I still treat her ass like a nominee
Just need to know what that pussy like so one time is fine with me
Young as an intern, but money like I built the shit
Streets talkin', they'll confirm, go ask them who just killed the shit
Stay keepin' my cup full so I'm extra charged like a state tax
Me and Chainz go way back, we don't talk shit, we just state facts
Yes, Lord


Yeah, I say fuck you, 'less I'm with ya
If I take you out of the picture, I know real niggas won't miss ya
No lie, no lie, no lie-ee-i-ee-i
No lie, no lie, no lie-ee-i-ee-i
Real niggas say word
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
Real niggas say word
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
Real niggas say true
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
That's a thing I don't do
Nah, I just do it for the niggas
That are tryna see a million 'fore they die
Whattup?

Name a nigga that want some, I'll out-rap his ass, out-trap his ass
Put his ass in a plastic bag with his trashy ass, take him out
Bring 'em in, them whole things, 2Pac without a nose ring
Thug Life, one wife, a mistress and a girlfriend
I did what they say I wouldn't, went where they say I couldn't (Tru!)
YSL belt buckle, y'all niggas sure is lookin'
Y'all niggas sure is lucky, two chains on my rugby
Left hand on that steering wheel, right hand on that pussy


Yeah, I say fuck you, 'less I'm with ya
If I take you out of the picture, I know real niggas won't miss ya
No lie, no lie, no lie-ee-i-ee-i
No lie, no lie, no lie-ee-i-ee-i
Real niggas say word
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
Real niggas say word
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
Real niggas say true
You ain't never told no lie, you ain't never told no lie
That's a thing I don't do, nah, I just do it for the niggas
That are tryna see a million 'fore they die, whattup?


Word, word, T.R.U",72995
13708,67992,I Dont Like,rap,Chief Keef,2012,1505373,"{""Lil Reese""}","
(Young Chop on the beat)
I'on like
GBE Baby
I'on like
Sos' baby
You know how we rockin' baby
Fake niggas, fake life


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Sneak dissers, that's that shit I don't like
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah


A popped bitch, that's that shit I don't like
I got a bad bitch, yeah, that bitch white
We smoke dope all day, all night
You smoke Reggie, that's that shit I don't like
We got a fuckin' Audi, that bitch all white (Skrr, skrr, skrr)
Pull up on your bitch, bet she gon' like
Sosa bitch, yeah, I done gon' hype
Pistol totin' and I'm shootin' on sight
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like
Your bitch want do the team, bet she won't fight
Bitch, we GBE; fuck who don't like!
And we ain't gon' fight, our guns gon' fight

A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Sneak dissers, that's that shit I don't like
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah


Fake True's, that's that shit I don't like
Fake shoes, that's that shit I don't like
Fake niggas, that's that shit I don't like
Stalking-ass bitch, shit I don't like
I done got indicted selling all white
But I won't never snitch, none in my life
I keep this shit 3hunna, bitch, I'm goin' right
With my niggas when it's time to start taking lives
Playing both sides, shit that I don't like
Wartime spark broad day, all night
Playing both sides, shit that I don't like
Wartime spark broad day, all night


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Sneak dissers, that's that shit I don't like
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah

I'm killing these niggas, shit that they don't like
Broski got the 30, he ain't tryna fight
Got your bitch, I was in it all night
Fredo in the cut, that's a scary sight
You not with the shits you can die tonight
I only want the top, I ain't tryna pipe
Them youngins with the shits, they be totin' pipe
Floatin' off at flat, I might take flight
3hunna, bitch, we hot, we done took flight
Taking shit down, we ain't like the price
Thirsty-ass bitches, shit that we don't like
OTFGBE your bitch like


A fuck nigga, that's that shit I don't like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Sneak dissers, that's that shit I don't like
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A snitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah
Don't like, like, don't like, like
A bitch nigga, that's that shit I don't like, nah",73573
13841,68591,Same Love,rap,Macklemore & Ryan Lewis,2012,3610020,"{""Mary Lambert""}","


When I was in the third grade, I thought that I was gay
'Cause I could draw, my uncle was, and I kept my room straight
I told my mom, tears rushing down my face
She's like, ""Ben, you've loved girls since before Pre-K!""
Trippin', yeah I guess she had a point, didn't she?
A bunch of stereotypes all in my head
I remember doing the math like, ""Yeah, I'm good at little league.""
A pre-conceived idea of what it all meant
For those that like the same sex had the characteristics
The right-wing conservatives think it's a decision
And you can be cured with some treatment and religion
Man-made, rewiring of a pre-disposition
Playing God, aw nah, here we go
America the brave still fears what we don't know
And ""God loves all his children"" is somehow forgotten
But we paraphrase a book written thirty-five hundred years ago
I don't know

And I can't change, even if I tried
Even if I wanted to
And I can't change, even if I tried
Even if I wanted to
My love, my love, my love
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm


If I was gay, I would think hip-hop hates me
Have you read the YouTube comments lately?
""Man, that's gay"" gets dropped on the daily
We've become so numb to what we're sayin'
Our culture founded from oppression
Yet we don't have acceptance for 'em
Call each other faggots behind the keys of a message board
A word rooted in hate, yet our genre still ignores it
""Gay"" is synonymous with the lesser
It's the same hate that's caused wars from religion
Gender to skin color, the complexion of your pigment
The same fight that led people to walk-outs and sit-ins
It's human rights for everybody, there is no difference
Live on and be yourself
When I was at church they taught me something else
If you preach hate at the service, those words aren't anointed
That holy water that you soak in has been poisoned
When everyone else is more comfortable remaining voiceless
Rather than fighting for humans that have had their rights stolen
I might not be the same, but that's not important
No freedom 'til we're equal, damn right I support it



And I can't change, even if I tried
Even if I wanted to
My love, my love, my love
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm


We press play, don't press pause: progress, march on!
With a veil over our eyes, we turn our back on the cause
'Til the day that my uncles can be united by law
Kids are walking 'round the hallway
Plagued by a pain in their heart
A world so hateful, some would rather die than be who they are
And a certificate on paper isn't gonna solve it all
But it's a damn good place to start
No law's gonna change us, we have to change us
Whatever god you believe in, we come from the same one
Strip away the fear, underneath it's all the same love
About time that we raised up!


And I can't change, even if I tried
Even if I wanted to
And I can't change, even if I tried
Even if I wanted to
My love, my love, my love
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm
She keeps me warm

Love is patient
Love is kind
Love is patient
Love is kind (not crying on Sundays)
Love is patient (not crying on Sundays)
Love is kind (not crying on Sundays)
Love is patient (not crying on Sundays)
Love is kind (not crying on Sundays)
Love is patient (not crying on Sundays)
Love is kind (not crying on Sundays)
Love is patient
Love is kind",81672
14051,69801,Numb,rock,Linkin Park,2003,1088311,{},"
I'm tired of being what you want me to be
Feeling so faithless, lost under the surface
I don't know what you're expecting of me
Put under the pressure of walking in your shoes


Caught in the undertow, just caught in the undertow
Every step that I take is another mistake to you
Caught in the undertow, just caught in the undertow


I've become so numb, I can't feel you there
Become so tired, so much more aware
I'm becoming this, all I want to do
Is be more like me and be less like you


Can't you see that you're smothering me?
Holding too tightly, afraid to lose control
'Cause everything that you thought I would be
Has fallen apart, right in front of you

Caught in the undertow, just caught in the undertow
Every step that I take is another mistake to you
Caught in the undertow, just caught in the undertow
And every second I waste is more than I can take


I've become so numb, I can't feel you there
Become so tired, so much more aware
I'm becoming this, all I want to do
Is be more like me and be less like you


And I know I may end up failing, too
But I know you were just like me
With someone disappointed in you


I've become so numb, I can't feel you there
Become so tired, so much more aware
I'm becoming this, all I want to do
Is be more like me and be less like you


I've become so numb, I can't feel you there
I'm tired of being what you want me to be
I've become so numb, I can't feel you there
I'm tired of being what you want me to be",74998
14279,70630,Pop That,rap,French Montana,2012,1711162,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Rick Ross"",Drake}","
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Drop that pussy, bitch
Pop that pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
I'm Young Papi, Champagne
Pop that, pop that, pop that
They know the face, and they know the name
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Bounce
Drop that pussy, bitch
What you twerkin' with?


Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that
Work, work, work, work, bounce
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that pussy
Work, work, work, what you twerkin' with? (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that
Work, work, work, work, bounce
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Work, work, work, what you twerkin' with? (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?

Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, Montana!
Work-work-work-work-work-work
What you twerkin' with?
Throw it, bust it open
Show me what you twerkin' with
Ass so fat need a lap dance
I'm in that white ghost chasin' Pac-Man
Hundred out the lot, I be leanin', that CÎROC
Hundred large, bring a mop
Car's tinted like Barack
Got a Brinks truck in my pocket (Pocket)
30 chains on my collar (Collar)
Two drops, no mileage (Mileage)
Top off like Wallace
And I'm inhalin' smoke, bitch know that (Know that)
Filthy rich before rap ('Fore rap)
Your new deal, I throw that (Throw that)
Three beans I'm on that (Haaan)
We pop a molly (Haaan), she bust it open (Haaan)
She seen the 'gatti (Haaan), that pussy soakin' (Woo!)


Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Shout out to the infernos
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Strawberries, Luke what it do?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Let's go
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?

I love my big booty bitches, my life a Godfather picture
Local club in my city, I fell in love with a stripper
Bitches know I'm that nigga, talkin' four-door Bugatti
I'm the life of the party, let's get these hoes on the Molly
You know I came to stunt, so drop that pussy, bitch
I got what you want, drop that pussy, bitch (Woo)
Film it, film it, this bitch want me to film it
Ballin', ballin' like I play for New England
Spend it, spend it, spend a stack every minute
That's 50... one hundred, I see no fuckin' limits
Shout out to Uncle Luke (Huh)
Shout out my bitches too (Huh)
We the 2 Live Crew
Two for me, two for you (Woo)
Feed them bitches carrots (Huh)
Fuck em like a rabbit
Sorry that's a habit, smoke a spliff and then I vanish


Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with? (Yeah)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce, don't stop)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Let's go
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?

I'm about bein' single, seein' double, makin' triple (Right)
I hope you pussy niggas hatin' never make a nickel (Right)
It's good to make it better when your people make it with you
Money comin', money goin', ain't like you could take it with you (Alright)
It's about to be a hit right now, fuck back then we the shit right now
Dropped Take Care, bought a mothafuckin' crib
And I'm pickin' up the keys to the bitch right now
OVO that's major shit, Toronto with me that's mayor shit
Gettin cheddar packs like K.D., OKC that's player shit
We don't dress alike, we don't rap alike
I shine different, I rhyme different
Only thing you got is some years on me
Man fuck you and your time difference
I'm Young Papi, Champagne
They know the face and they know the name
Got one watch that could prolly pay for like all your chains
And you'd owe me change, ah!
Greystone, 20 bottles that's all me
On the couch, wildin' out yelling free my niggas 'til they all free
One of my closest dawgs got three kids and they all three
But we always been that type of crew that been good without a plan B, so


Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy
What you twerkin' with?


Bitch! Stop talkin' that shit
And suck a nigga dick for some Trukfit
Okay I fuck a bitch and I'm gone
That's gangsta: Al Capone
I make that pussy spit like Bone
I'm talkin' 'bout bone, bone, bone bone
I'm fuckin' with French, excuse my French
I lose my mind before I lose my bitch
Money ain't a thing but a chicken wing
Bitch I ball like two eyelids
YMCM beat that pussy up, stop playin'
I make her ass scream and holla like rock bands
I'm a beast, I'm off the leash
I am rich like a bitch
On my Proactiv shit, pop that pussy like a zit
I go by the name Lil Tunechi
Your girl is a groupie
And nigga, you's a square
And I will twist you like in a Rubik's
Motherfucker I'm on my skateboard
Watch me do a trick, ho
I'm 5'5"" but I could 6-9
Then beat that pussy like Klitschko
It's French Montana, fuck Joe
It's Weezy F, fuck hoes
It's Truk the world
It's Truk yo girl
It's Trukfit by the truck load, biatch!


Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
Pop that, pussy, pussy (Oh yeah)
What you twerkin' with?
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop (I forgot)
Pop that, pop that, pop that (Bounce)
Don't stop, pop that, don't stop
What you twerkin' with?
Young Moolah, baby!",75898
14482,71365,Wonderwall,rock,Oasis,1995,1350887,{},"
Today is gonna be the day that they're gonna throw it back to you
By now, you shoulda somehow realised what you gotta do
I don't believe that anybody feels the way I do about you now


Backbeat, the word is on the street that the fire in your heart is out
I'm sure you've heard it all before, but you never really had a doubt
I don't believe that anybody feels the way I do about you now


And all the roads we have to walk are winding
And all the lights that lead us there are blinding
There are many things that I would like to say to you
But I don't know how


Because maybe
You're gonna be the one that saves me
And after all
You're my wonderwall

Today was gonna be the day, but they'll never throw it back to you
By now, you should've somehow realised what you're not to do
I don't believe that anybody feels the way I do about you now


And all the roads that lead you there were winding
And all the lights that light the way are blinding
There are many things that I would like to say to you
But I don't know how


I said maybe
You're gonna be the one that saves me
And after all
You're my wonderwall
I said maybe (I said maybe)
You're gonna be the one that saves me
And after all
You're my wonderwall


I said maybe (I said maybe)
You're gonna be the one that saves me (Saves me)
You're gonna be the one that saves me (Saves me)
You're gonna be the one that saves me (Saves me)",76654
14589,71860,Pyramids,rb,Frank Ocean,2012,2255934,{},"


Oh, oh, oh, oh
Set the cheetahs on the loose
Oh, oh, oh, oh
There's a thief out on the move
Oh, oh, oh, oh
Underneath our legion's view
Oh, oh, oh, oh
They have taken Cleopatra


Run run run, come back for my glory (Cleopatra)
Bring her back to me (Cleopatra)
Run run run, the crown of our pharaoh (Cleopatra)
The throne of our queen is empty (Cleopatra)


We'll run to the future, shining like diamonds
In a rocky world, rocky-rocky world
Our skin like bronze and our hair like cashmere
As we march to the rhythm on the palace floor
Chandeliers inside the pyramids tremble from the force
Cymbals crash inside the pyramids, voices fill up the halls

Set the cheetahs on the loose
There's a thief out on the move
Underneath our legion's view
They have taken Cleopatra, Cleopatra


The jewel of Africa, jewel
What good is a jewel that ain't still precious?
How could you run off on me? How could you run off on us?
You feel like God inside that gold
I found you laying down with Samson and his full head of hair
I found my black queen Cleopatra, bad dreams, Cleopatra


Remove her, send the cheetahs to the tomb
Our war is over, our queen has met her doom
No more, she lives no more, serpent in her room
No more, he has killed Cleopatra, Cleopatra




Big sun coming strong through the motel blinds
Wake up to your girl
For now, let's call her Cleopatra, Cleopatra
I watch you fix your hair
Then put your panties on in the mirror, Cleopatra
Then your lipstick, Cleopatra
Then your six-inch heels, catch her
She's headed to the pyramid

She's working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight


Pimping in my convos
Bubbles in my champagne, let it be some jazz playing
Top floor motel suite twisting my cigars
Floor model TV with the VCR
Got rubies in my damn chain
Whip ain't got no gas tank but it still got woodgrain
Got your girl working for me
Hit the strip and my bills paid
That keep my bills paid
Hit the strip and my bills paid
Keep a nigga bills paid


She's working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid

You showed up after work, I'm bathing your body
Touch you in places only I know
You're wet and you're warm just like our bathwater
Can we make love before you go?
The way you say my name makes me feel like
I'm that nigga but I'm still unemployed
You say it's big but you take it, ride cowgirl
But your love ain't free no more, baby
But your love ain't free no more


She's working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid, that's right
Working at the pyramid tonight, yeah
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight
Working at the pyramid
Working at the pyramid tonight

",77191
14642,72187,As Long As You Love Me,pop,Justin Bieber,2012,1613981,"{""Big Sean""}","
As long as you love me
(Love me, love me, love me, love me, love me, love me)
As long as you love me
(Love me, love me, love me, love me)
As long as you love me


We're under pressure (We're under pressure)
Seven billion people in the world tryna fit in (Tryna fit in)
Keep it together (Keep it together)
Smile on your face, even though your heart is frowning (Frowning)
But hey now (Hey now), you know, girl (You know, girl)
We both know, it's a cruel world (Cruel world)
But I will (But I will) take my chances


As long as you love me
We could be starving, we could be homeless, we could be broke
As long as you love me
I'll be your platinum, I'll be your silver, I'll be your gold
As long as you love me, love me
As long as you love me, love me

I'll be your soldier (I'll be your soldier)
Fighting every second of the day for your dreams, girl
(For your dreams, girl)
I'll be your Hova (I'll be your Hova)
You could be my Destiny's Child on the scene, girl
So don't stress (Don't stress), and don't cry (And don't cry)
Oh, we don't need no wings to fly (Wings to fly)
Just take (Take), my hand


As long as you love me
We could be starving, we could be homeless, we could be broke
As long as you love me
I'll be your platinum, I'll be your silver, I'll be your gold
As long as you love me, love me
As long as you love me, love me


Whoa, whoa, B-I-G
I don't know if this makes sense, but, you're my hallelujah
Give me a time and place, I'll rendezvous it
I'll fly you to it, I'll beat you there
Girl, you know I got you
Us, trust, a couple things I can't spell without 'U'
Now we on top of the world (World) 'cause that's just how we do
Used to tell me sky's the limit, now the sky's our point of view
Man, we stepping out, like whoa (Oh God)
Cameras point and shoot (Shoot)
Ask me, ""What's my best side?""
I stand back and point at you, you, you
The one that I argue with, feel like I need a new girl to be bothered with
But the grass ain't always greener on the other side
It's green where you water it
So I know, we got issues baby, true, true, true
But I'd rather work on this with you
Than to go ahead and start with someone new
As long as you love me

As long as you love me (Yeah, yeah, baby)
We could be starving, we could be homeless, we could be broke
As long as you love me
I'll be your platinum (Platinum), I'll be your silver, I'll be your gold


As long as you love me
As long as you love me
As long as you love me (I'll be your silver, I'll be your gold)
As long as you love me, you love me, you love me, yeah
(It's all I want, baby)
As long as you love me, you love me (Please don't go)
As long as you love me, as long as you love me
As long as you love me, yeah
As long as you love me (Love me, love me, love me, love me)",77547
14660,72231,The Scientist,rock,Coldplay,2002,1556545,{},"
Come up to meet you, tell you I'm sorry
You don't know how lovely you are
I had to find you, tell you I need you
Tell you I set you apart
Tell me your secrets, and ask me your questions
Oh, let's go back to the start
Running in circles, coming up tails
Heads on a science apart


Nobody said it was easy
It's such a shame for us to part
Nobody said it was easy
No one ever said it would be this hard
Oh, take me back to the start


I was just guessing at numbers and figures
Pulling the puzzles apart
Questions of science, science and progress
Do not speak as loud as my heart
Tell me you love me, come back and haunt me
Oh, and I rush to the start
Running in circles, chasing our tails
Coming back as we are

Nobody said it was easy
Oh, it's such a shame for us to part
Nobody said it was easy
No one ever said it would be so hard
I'm going back to the start


Oh-ooh ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ah-ooh ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Oh-ooh ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Oh-ooh ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh",77594
14732,72396,Yellow,rock,Coldplay,2000,1190805,{},"
Look at the stars, look how they shine for you
And everything you do
Yeah, they were all yellow
I came along, I wrote a song for you
And all the things you do
And it was called ""Yellow""
So then I took my turn
Oh, what a thing to have done
And it was all yellow


(Aah) Your skin, oh, yeah, your skin and bones
(Ooh) Turn into something beautiful
(Aah) You know, you know I love you so
You know I love you so


I swam across, I jumped across for you
Oh, what a thing to do
'Cause you were all yellow
I drew a line, I drew a line for you
Oh, what a thing to do
And it was all yellow

(Aah) Your skin, oh, yeah, your skin and bones
(Ooh) Turn into something beautiful
(Aah) And you know, for you, I'd bleed myself dry
For you, I'd bleed myself dry


It's true, look how they shine for you
Look how they shine for you
Look how they shine for
Look how they shine for you
Look how they shine for you
Look how they shine


Look at the stars
Look how they shine for you
And all the things that you do",77782
14878,72900,One More Night,pop,Maroon 5,2012,1068504,{},"
Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh


You and I go hard at each other like we're going to war
You and I go rough, we keep throwing things and slamming the doors
You and I get so damn dysfunctional, we stopped keeping score
You and I get sick, yeah, I know that we can't do this no more


Yeah but baby, there you go again, there you go again
Making me love you
Yeah, I stopped using my head, using my head
Let it all go
Got you stuck on my body, on my body like a tattoo
And now I'm feeling stupid, feeling stupid crawling back to you


So I cross my heart, and I hope to die
That I'll only stay with you one more night
And I know I've said it a million times
But I'll only stay with you one more night

Try to tell you ""no,"" but my body keeps on telling you ""yes""
Try to tell you ""stop,"" but your lipstick got me so out of breath
I'll be waking up in the morning, probably hating myself
And I'll be waking up, feeling satisfied, but guilty as hell


Yeah but baby, there you go again, there you go again
Making me love you (Making me love you)
Yeah, I stopped using my head, using my head
Let it all go (Let it all go)
Got you stuck on my body, on my body like a tattoo (Like a tattoo, yeah)
And now I'm feeling stupid, feeling stupid crawling back to you


So I cross my heart, and I hope to die (Yeah)
That I'll only stay with you one more night (Oh)
And I know I've said it a million times (Yeah)
But I'll only stay with you one more night (Yeah)


(Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh)
Yeah, baby, give me one more night
(Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh)
Yeah, baby, give me one more night (Whoa, yeah)
(Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh)
Yeah, baby, give me one more night
(Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh)
Oh yeah yeah

But baby, there you go again, there you go again
Making me love you
Yeah, I stopped using my head, using my head
Let it all go
Got you stuck on my body, on my body like a tattoo, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah


So I cross my heart, and I hope to die (Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh)
That I'll only stay with you one more night (Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
And I know I've said it a million times
(Oh, I've said it a million times)
But I'll only stay with you one more night
(Yeah, baby, give me one more night)
So I cross my heart and I hope to die (Yeah, yeah)
That I'll only stay with you one more night (Yeah, yeah)
And I know I've said it a million times (Yeah, yeah)
But I'll only stay with you one more night (Yeah, yeah)


I dunno
Whatever, whatever",78316
15025,73500,Super Rich Kids,rb,Frank Ocean,2013,2025967,"{""Earl Sweatshirt""}","
Too many bottles of this wine we can't pronounce
Too many bowls of that green, no Lucky Charms
The maids come around too much
Parents ain't around enough
Too many joy rides in daddy's Jaguar
Too many white lies and white lines
Super rich kids with nothing but loose ends
Super rich kids with nothing but fake friends


Start my day up on the roof
There's nothing like this type of view
Point the clicker at the tube
I prefer expensive news
New car, new girl
New ice, new glass
New watch, good times babe
It's good times, yeah
She wash my back three times a day
This shower head feels so amazing
We'll both be high, the help don't stare
They just walk by, they must don't care
A million one, a million two
A hundred more will never do

Too many bottles of this wine we can't pronounce
Too many bowls of that green, no Lucky Charms
The maids come around too much
Parents ain't around enough
Too many joy rides in daddy's Jaguar
Too many white lies and white lines
Super rich kids with nothing but loose ends
Super rich kids with nothing but fake friends


Real love, I'm searching for a real love
Oh, real love, I'm searching for a real love
Oh, real love


Alright, close your eyes to what you can't imagine
We are the Xanny-gnashing
Caddy-smashing, bratty assy
He mad, he snatched his daddy's Jag
And used the shit for batting practice
Adamant and he thrashing
Purchasing crappy grams with half the hand of cash you handed
Panic and patch me up
Pappy done latch-keyed us
Toying with Raggy Anns and Mammy done had enough
Brash as fuck, breachin' all these aqueducts
Don't believe us
Treat us like we can't erupt, yup

Polo sweats and Hermes blankets
Them label hoes be stealing my shit
And all they clothes revealing they tits
Pills, high enough to touch the rim in that bitch
We party in my living room
'Cause father is gone
And he left me this empire
That runs on its own
So all I got to do is whatever the fuck I want
All we ever do is whatever the fuck we want


We end our day up on the roof
I say I'll jump, I never do
But when I'm drunk I act a fool
Talking 'bout, do they sew wings on tailored suits
I'm on that ledge, she grabs my arm
She slaps my hand
It's good times, yeah
Sleeve rips off, I slip, I fall
The market's down like 60 stories
And some don't end the way they should
My silver spoon has fed me good
A million one, a million cash
Close my eyes and feel the crash

Too many bottles of this wine we can't pronounce
Too many bowls of that green, no Lucky Charms
The maids come around too much
Parents ain't around enough
Too many joy rides in daddy's Jaguar
Too many white lies and white lines
Super rich kids with nothing but loose ends
Super rich kids with nothing but fake friends


Real love, ain't that something rare
I'm searching for a real love, talking 'bout real love
Real love, yeah
Real love
I'm searching for a real love
Talkin' 'bout a real love",78960
15033,73513,Lost,rb,Frank Ocean,2012,2093659,{},"
Double D
Big full breasts on my baby
(Yo, we going to Florida)
Triple weight
Couldn't weigh the love I've got for the girl
And I just wanna know
Why you ain't been going to work
Boss ain't working you like this
He can't take care of you like this


Now you're lost, lost in the heat of it all
Girl, you know you're lost
Lost in the thrill of it all
Miami, Amsterdam, Tokyo, Spain, lost
Los Angeles, India, lost on a train, lost


Got on my buttercream silk shirt and it's Versace
(There he goes, one of God's own prototypes)
Hand me my triple weight
So I can weigh the work I got on your girl
(Too weird to live, too rare to die)
No, I don't really wish
I don't wish the titties would show
Nor have I ever, have I ever let you get caught?

Lost, lost in the heat of it all
Girl, you know you're lost
Lost in the thrill of it all
Miami, Amsterdam, Tokyo, Spain, lost
Los Angeles, India, lost on a train, lost


She's at a stove (Who)
Can't believe I got her out here cooking dope (Cooking dope)
I promise she'll be whipping meals up for a family of her own some day
Nothing wrong (Nothing wrong)
No, nothing wrong (Ain't nothing wrong) with a lie (Ooh)
Nothing wrong (Nothing wrong)
With another short plane ride (Ain't nothing wrong)
Through the sky (Up in the sky)
You and I (Just you and I)


Lost, lost in the heat of it all
Girl, you know you're lost
Lost in the thrill of it all
Miami, Amsterdam, Tokyo, Spain, lost
Los Angeles, India, lost on a train, lost


Love lost, lost? Love, love
Love lost, lost? Love, love
Love lost, love love, love lost
Faith is the substance-
Manos arriba!-
Then the other channel on the-",78963
15035,73515,Bad Religion,rb,Frank Ocean,2012,1678780,{},"
Taxi driver
Be my shrink for the hour
Leave the meter running
It's rush hour
So take the streets if you wanna
Just outrun the demons, could you?


He said ""Allahu akbar""
I told him, ""Don't curse me""
""Bo Bo, you need prayer""
I guess it couldn't hurt me
If it brings me to my knees, it's a bad religion, ooh
This unrequited love
To me, it's nothin' but a one-man cult
And cyanide in my styrofoam cup
I can never make him love me
Never make him love me
Love me, love me
Love me, love me
Love me, love me
Love me, love me
Love me, love

Taxi driver
I swear I've got three lives
Balanced on my head like steak knives
I can't tell you the truth about my disguise
I can't trust no one


And you say ""Allahu akbar""
I told him, ""Don't curse me""
""Bo Bo, you need prayer""
I guess it couldn't hurt me
If it brings me to my knees, it's a bad religion
Oh, unrequited love
To me, it's nothin' but a one-man cult
And cyanide in my styrofoam cup
I can never make him love me
Never make him love me
No, no, ahh


It's a, it's a bad religion
To be in love with someone
Who could never love you
Oh-oh-oh, only bad, only bad religion
Could have me feeling the way I do",78966
15036,73516,Pink Matter,pop,Frank Ocean,2012,2529442,"{""André 3000""}","
And the peaches and the mangos
That you could sell for me


What do you think my brain is made for
Is it just a container for the mind?
This great grey matter
Sensei replied, ""What is your woman?
Is she just a container for the child?""
That soft pink matter
Cotton candy, Majin Buu, oh, oh, ohh
Close my eyes and fall into you, you, you
My God, she's giving me pleasure


What if the sky and the stars are for show
And the aliens are watching live
From the purple matter?
Sensei went quiet then violent
And we sparred until we both grew tired
Nothing mattered
Cotton candy, Majin Buu, oh, oh, oh, oh
Dim the lights and fall into you, you, you
My God, giving me pleasure
Pleasure, pleasure, pleasure
Pleasure over matter

Hey, hey
Since you been gone, I been having withdrawals
You were such a habit to call
I ain't myself at all, had to tell myself, ""Naw
She better with some fella with a regular job""
I didn't wanna get her involved
By dinner Mr. Benjamin was sitting in awe
Hopped into my car; drove far
Far's too close and I remember my memory's no sharp
Butter knife, what a life, anyway
I'm building y'all a clock, stop, what am I, Hemingway?
She had the kind of body that would probably intimidate
Any of 'em that were un-southern, not me, cousin
If models are made for modelin'
Thick girls are made for cuddlin'
Switch worlds and we can huddle then
Who needs another friend? I need to hold your hand
You'd need no other man, we'd flee to other lands


Grey matter
Blue used to be my favorite color
Now I ain't got no choice
Blue matter

You're good at being bad, you're bad at being good
For heaven's sakes, go to hell, nah, knock on wood, hey
You're good at being bad (You're bad at being good)
For heaven's sakes, go to hell
For heaven's sakes, go to hell
Knock, knock, knock, knock on wood
Well, frankly, when that ocean so mu'fucking good
Make her swab the mu'fucking wood
Make her walk the mu'fucking plank
Make her rob a mu'fucking bank
With no mask on and a rusty revolver",78967
15037,73517,Forrest Gump,pop,Frank Ocean,2012,1373667,{},"
I wanna see your pom poms from the stands
Come on, come on


My fingertips and my lips
They burn from the cigarettes
Forrest Gump
You run my mind, boy
Running on my mind, boy
Forrest Gump


I know you, Forrest
I know you wouldn't hurt a beetle
But you're so buff and so strong
I'm nervous, Forrest
Forrest Gump


My fingertips and my lips
They burn from the cigarettes
Forrest Gump
You run my mind, boy
Running on my mind, boy
Forrest Gump

I saw your game, Forrest
I was screaming, ""Run forty-four!""
But you kept running past the end zone
Oh, where'd you go, Forrest?
Forrest Gump


My fingertips and my lips
They burn from the cigarettes
Forrest Gump
You run my mind, boy
Running on my mind, boy
Forrest Gump


Forrest green, Forrest blues
I'm remembering you
If this is love, I know it's true
I won't forget you
(You, you, oh, you, you)
It's for you, Forrest
(You, you, oh, you, you)
It's for you, Forrest
Forrest Gump",78968
15045,73556,The Art of Peer Pressure,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,1691111,{},"


Everybody, everybody, everybody
Everybody sit yo bitch-ass down
And listen to this true mothafuckin' story
Told by Kendrick Lamar on Rosecrans, ya bitch


Smokin' on the finest dope, ayy-ayy-ayy-ah
Drank until I can't no mo', ayy-ayy-ayy-ah
Really I'm a sober soul
But I'm with the homies right now
And we ain't askin' for no favors
Rush a nigga quick, then laugh about it later, ayy-ayy-ayy-ah
Really, I'm a peacemaker
But I'm with the homies right now
And Momma used to say (Say, say, say, say)
One day it's gon' burn you out (Woo)
One day it's gon' burn you out, out, out
One day it's gon' burn you out (You, you, you, you, you, you)
One day it's gon' burn you
But I'm with the homies right now



Me and my niggas four deep in a white Toyota
A quarter tank of gas, one pistol, an orange soda
Janky stash box when the federales'll roll up
Basketball shorts with the Gonzales Park odor
We on the mission for bad bitches and trouble
I hope the universe love you today
'Cause the energy we bringin' sure to carry away
A flock of positive activists that fill they body with hate
If it's necessary; bumpin' Jeezy first album, lookin' distracted
Speakin' language only we know, you think it's an accent
The windows roll down, all I see is a hand pass it
Hotboxin' like George Foreman grillin' the masses
Of the workin' world; we pulled up on a bunch of workin' girls
And asked them what they workin' with
Look at me, I got the blunt in my mouth
Usually I'm drug-free, but, shit, I'm with the homies


Yeah, nigga, we off a pill and Rémy Red
Come through and bust ya head, nigga!
Me and the homies
Sag all the way to the liquor store
Where my niggas pour up 4 and get twisted some more
Me and the homies
I ride for my mothafuckin' niggas
Hop out, do my stuff, then hop back in
Me and the homies
Matter of fact, I hop out that mothafucka
And be like ""doo-doo-doo-doot, doo-doo-doo-doo-doot!""

It's 2:30 and the sun is beamin'
Air conditioner broke and I hear my stomach screamin'
Hungry for anything unhealthy
And if nutrition can help me
I'll tell you to suck my dick, then I'll continue eatin'
We speedin' on the 405, passin' Westchester
You know, the light-skinned girls in all the little dresses
Good Lord, they knew we weren't from 'round there
'Cause every time we down there
We pullin' out the Boost Mobile SIM cards
Bougie bitches with no extensions
Hood niggas with bad intentions, the perfect combination
Before we sparked a conversation
We seen three niggas in colors we didn't like
Then started interrogatin'
I never was a gangbanger, I mean
I never was stranger to the fonk neither, I really doubt it
Rush a nigga quick and then we laugh about it
That's ironic, 'cause I've never been violent
Until I'm with the homies


(Just ridin', just ridin')
Me and the homies
(Bullshittin', actin' a fool)
Me and the homies
(Trippin', really trippin')
Me and the homies
(Just ridin', just ridin', just ridin')

Braggin' 'bout the episode we just had
A shot of Hennessy didn't make me feel that bad
I'm usually a true firm believer of bad karma
Consequences from evil will make your past haunt ya
We tryna conquer the city with disobedience
Quick to turn it up, even if we ain't got the CD in
But Jeezy still playin'
And our attitude is still ""nigga, what is you sayin'?""
Pull in front of the house
That we been campin' out for like two months
The sun is goin' down as we take whatever we want


Ayy, ayy, nigga, jackpot, nigga, pop the safe!
Ayy, nigga, I think there's somebody in this room!
Wait, what?!
Nigga, there's somebody in this room!


I hit the back window in search of any Nintendo
DVD's, plasma-screen TV's in the trunk
We made a right, then made a left, then made a right
Then made a left, we was just circlin' life
My mama called: ""Hello? What you doin'?"" - ""Kickin' it.""
I shoulda told her I'm probably 'bout to catch my first offense
With the homies
(Police sirens)
But - they made a right, then made a left
Then made a right, then another right
One lucky night with the homies


K. Dot, you faded, hood?
Yeah, we finally got that nigga faded
I think he hit the wrong blunt though
Ooh, which one?
Well, which one he talkin' about?
I was finna hit the one with the shenanigans in it
I pray he ain't hit that
Nah, that nigga straight, he ain't hit that one
Got the shenanigans? Give that nigga the shenanigans!
Nigga, I think we should push back to the city, fo' real doe
Nigga, for what?
What that nigga- what's that Jeezy song say, nigga?
""Last time I checked I was the man on these streets!""
Yeah, yeah, that shit right there
I'm tryna be the nigga in the street
There he go. Man, you don't even know how the shit go
Look, here's the plan, luv
We gon' use the kickback as an alibi, wait 'til the sun go down, roll out, complete the mission, drop K. Dot off at his mama van, at the park
'Cause I know he tryna fuck on Sherane tonight
That's what he's not gon' do
Then we all gon' meet back at the block at about 10:30
That's straight, but we should meet up around 12
I'm tryna fuck on somethin' too
Nigga, sit yo dumb-ass back down!
Nigga, you ain't doin' shit tonight!
Matter of fact, nigga, get in the mothafuckin' car!
We finna get active!

",79008
15153,74052,The Sound of Silence,rock,Simon & Garfunkel,1964,1718780,{},"
Hello darkness, my old friend
I've come to talk with you again
Because a vision softly creeping
Left its seeds while I was sleeping
And the vision that was planted in my brain
Still remains within the sound of silence


In restless dreams, I walked alone
Narrow streets of cobblestone
'Neath the halo of a street lamp
I turned my collar to the cold and damp
When my eyes were stabbed by the flash of a neon light
That split the night, and touched the sound of silence


And in the naked light I saw
Ten thousand people, maybe more
People talking without speaking
People hearing without listening
People writing songs that voices never shared
And no one dared disturb the sound of silence

""Fools,"" said I, ""You do not know
Silence like a cancer grows
Hear my words that I might teach you
Take my arms that I might reach you""
But my words, like silent raindrops, fell
And echoed in the wells of silence


And the people bowed and prayed
To the neon god they made
And the sign flashed out its warning
In the words that it was forming
And the sign said, ""The words of the prophets are written on the subway walls and tenement halls
And whispered in the sound of silence""",79538
15193,74158,Fix You,rock,Coldplay,2005,1152339,{},"
When you try your best, but you don't succeed
When you get what you want, but not what you need
When you feel so tired, but you can't sleep
Stuck in reverse
And the tears come streaming down your face
When you lose something you can't replace
When you love someone, but it goes to waste
Could it be worse?


Lights will guide you home
And ignite your bones
And I will try to fix you


And high up above or down below
When you're too in love to let it go
But if you never try, you'll never know
Just what you're worth

Lights will guide you home
And ignite your bones
And I will try to fix you




Tears stream down your face
When you lose something you cannot replace
Tears stream down your face, and I
Tears stream down your face
I promise you I will learn from my mistakes
Tears stream down your face, and I


Lights will guide you home
And ignite your bones
And I will try to fix you",79647
15238,74328,New God Flow.1,rap,"Kanye West, Pusha T & Ghostface Killah",2012,1162683,"{""Kanye West / Pusha T & Ghostface Killah""}","


Somebody been running a long time
Somebody-


Shake that body, party that bod-
Shake that body, party that bod-
Shake that body, party that body
Come and have a good time with G-O-D


I believe there's a God above me
I'm just the god of everything else
I put holes in everything else
""New God Flow,"" fuck everything else
Supreme dope dealer, write it in bold letters
They love a nigga's spirit like Pac at the Coachella
They said Push ain't fit with the umbrella
But I was good with the yay' as a wholesaler
I think it's good that 'Ye got a blow dealer
A hot temper matched with a cold killer
I came aboard for more than just to rhyme with him
Think '99, when Puff woulda had Shyne with him (Yuugh)
Matchin' Daytonas, rose gold on us
Goin' HAM in Ibiza done took a toll on us
But since you overdo it, I'ma pour more
Well if you goin' coupe, I'm goin' four door

Shake that body, party that bod- (That's rare, nigga)
Shake that body, party that bod- (Ric Flair, nigga)
Shake that body, party that body (Yeah, nigga)
Come and have a good time with G-O-D (Yeah)
Shake that body, party that bod- (Woah)
Shake that body, party that bod- (Woah)
Shake that body, party that body (It's the new God flow, niggas)
Come and have a good time with G-O-D (Yo)


Step on they necks 'til they can't breathe
Claim they five stars, but sell you dreams
They say death multiplies by threes
Line them all up and let's just see
Fuck 'em, 'Ye, fuck 'em, 'Ye
I wouldn't piss on that nigga with Grand Marnier
(Woo) They shit is shoppin' at Targét
(Woo) My shit is luxury Balmain
I'm balling, Amar'e
A nick' sold in the park, then I want in
What's a king without a crown, nigga? (What?)
What's a circus without you clown niggas? (Ha)
What's a brick from an out of town nigga
When you flood and you can drown niggas? (Yuugh)
Here's the G.O.O.D. Music golden child
M-A dollar sign, can't nobody hold me down

Shake that body, party that bod-
Shake that body, party that bod-
Shake that body, party that body
Come and have a good time with G-O-D


Hold up, I ain't trying to stunt, man
But the Yeezys jumped over the Jumpman
Went from most hated to the champion god flow
I guess that's a feeling only me and LeBron know
I'm living three dreams
Biggie Smalls', Dr. King, Rodney King's, uh
'Cause we can't get along, no resolution
'Til we drown all these haters, rest in peace to Whitney Houston
Cars, money, girls and the clothes
Aw, man, you sold your soul
Nah, man, mad people was frontin'
Aw, man, made somethin' from nothin'
Picture workin' so hard and you can't cut through
That can mess up your whole life, like an uncle that touched you
What has the world come to? I'm from the 3-1-2
Where cops don't come through and dreams don't come true
Like there the God go, in his Murcielago
From workin' McDonalds, barely payin' the car note
He even got enough to get his mama a condo
Then they ran up and shot him, right in front of his mom
Forty killings in a weekend, forty killings in a week
Man, the summer too hot, you can feel it in the street
Welcome to Sunday service, if you hope to someday serve us
We got green in our eyes, just follow my Erick Sermon
Did Moses not part the water with the cane?
Did strippers not make an ark when I made it rain?
Did Yeezy not get signed by Hov and Dame?
And ran to Jacob and made the new Jesus chains?
In Jesus' name, let the choir say
""I'm on fire, ayy,"" that's what Richard Pryor say
And we'll annihilate anybody that violate
Ask any dope boy you know, they admire 'Ye

Shake that body, party that bod-
Shake that body, party that bod-
Shake that body, party that body
Come and have a good time with G-O-D


Yeah, nigga
Yeah, I had my- I had my Jesus piece since '94
I don't know what I- I don't know what y'all talkin' 'bout
And my eagle
Still got it all in the bag, B (Yeah)
All I did was play possum (Yo, come on)


Six hundred Cuban cigar in the big tub
Medallion on, Dove soap on the fresh cut
With soap suds on the MAC-11
My big lion haven't ate since twelve and it's after seven
We feed the nigga like forty chickens
His tail wag when I send him a bag with just one victim
Uh-huh, now let me show you what my closet on
Gems in the display case, call it a rock-a-thon
I- I got soccer moms payin' for cock
Asians get it from behind while they cleanin' they wok
Comin' with flows that is toxic (Come on)
Deadly fumes when I'm in the room
Repercussions occur when you dry snitch
Red light, green light, one, two, three
Look mean, got my machine, cried and hit you, please
Said and shake that body, scar up that body
Should I kill him now Tone? I said, ""Probably""
Side bets are four and better
Bust hammers with pot holders
And yo, dead a cow for his fuckin' leather
I'm not bow-legged, but old school like Redd Foxx
My favorite color in my hustle days was red tops
My gold eagle arm shitted out a red rock
Threw it off my project roof and saw red dots
Kanye, shine a light on my Wallabees
You can have a good time with G-O-D


Shake that body, party that bod- (That's rare, nigga)
Shake that body, party that bod- (Ric Flair, nigga)
Shake that body, party that body (Yeah, nigga)
Come and have a good time with G-O-D (Yeah)
Shake that body, party that bod- (Woah)
Shake that body, party that bod- (Woah)
Shake that body, party that body (It's the new God flow, niggas)
Come and have a good time with G-O-D (Yo)


G.O.O.D. Music, G.O.O.D. Music
G.O.O.D. Music, G.O.O.D. Music
And all my niggas say, ""G.O.O.D. Music""
And all my ladies say, ""G.O.O.D. Music""",79864
15433,74987,Diced Pineapples,rap,Rick Ross,2012,1712804,"{Drake,Wale}","
Diced pineapple
Tonight you shall reach a height that the sky won't catch you
The highest form of my admiration
I ain't no connoisseur but I'm, kinda sure you will admire my taste
And before the sun graze ya, I'm tryin to see how deep you are
And believe me shorty I ain't talking 'bout no intimate conversation
I wanna see if I can make you reach things unobtainable
When I peek into your nature
And I promise you my goals will exceed any physical pleasure
I wanna, give you what's better than better
The better my effort, the wetter her treasure
The more these mere moments seem like heavens or, temporary forevers
Shorty get it together, hah, diced pineapple
May your love come down so my mind might have you
You designed my imagination
Let me redefine foreplay 'til you need five and
Tell me shorty you got it baby
If it's not it baby, hope it's progress baby
Let it all drip baby
If you stop that shaking, no more talking baby
No more talking baby

Shorty so fine, pussy so fresh
Diced pineapples, damn, my baby tastes the best
I nearly lost my mind, guess it was a test
Swept her off her feet and went and bought her ass a Lex
Paid it off cash so I never wrote a check
Leave my cars at her crib, I'm just stuntin' on her ex
Pussy's excellent and I know it sound a mess
I love to make her toes curl as I'm lickin' on her flesh (ugh)
Sex all night, couple shots of CÎROC
Crib on the water, got LeBron up the block
Money ain't the thing, baby, welcome to the mob
Diced pineapples, talking diamonds by the jar
Bitch so bad got me wishing I could sing
Her uniform Isabel Marant when you on the team
Double MG, them other niggas fell off
Baby girl, I just wanna see you well off


Call me crazy, shit at least you're calling
Feels better when you let it out, don't it girl?
Know it's easy to get caught up in the moment
When you say it cause you mad then you take it all back
Then we fuck all night 'til things get right
Then we fuck all night 'til things get right, aww yeah

Shorty so fine, pussy so fresh
Diced pineapples, I just bought my girl a set
I know my lifestyle wild, I do it for the set
She know how to make me smile and she do it with the sex
Pop bottles, make love, Thug Passion
Red bottoms, Moncler, high fashion
Belt buckles, door handles, gold plated
Balmain, rich denim, out in Vegas
French Riviera, baby girl lets take a trip
I'ma trip go to Cannes, France to catch a flick
Baby listen, this position is a blessing
And with your permission, hopefully you'll learn a lesson (ugh)
I'm so fly that I shouldn't even walk
She so fine she ain't even gotta talk
Diced pineapples, talking diamonds by the jar
She never wrote a song but I know that she's a star


Call me crazy, shit at least you're calling
Feels better when you let it out, don't it girl?
Know it's easy to get caught up in the moment
When you say it cause you mad then you take it all back
Then we fuck all night 'til things get right
Then we fuck all night 'til things get right, aww yeah

Something about her, probably can't live without her
Roll up some sour, let me kiss on her fountain
Mission accomplished, you increasing your heart rate
And I won't ever rest, we meet at the peak of your mountain
Eager to show you, thinking that I should know you
And you eager to work perfect, I can employ you
Designer shit spoil you, rub you down with the oil
To get on a higher tree, gonna have to climb a sequoia
Hol' up, showing off some Agent Provocateur
Rushing you out your drawers though patiently get you off
Hate when they be too anxious though, hate when they be too dull
Like to go deep but I hate to get too deeply involved
How sweet is you? (sweet is you?) Let me see some proof
Fuck making pussy talk, I like to make it sing a tune
All we need is we, we don't need no room
Right now I'm trying to eat, and we don't need a spoon


Call me crazy, shit at least you're calling
Feels better when you let it out, don't it girl?
Know it's easy to get caught up in the moment
When you say it cause you mad then you take it all back
Then we fuck all night 'til things get right
Then we fuck all night 'til things get right, aww yeah",80557
15556,75567,Swimming Pools Drank,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,6204808,{},"


Pour up (Drank), head shot (Drank)
Sit down (Drank), stand up (Drank)
Pass out (Drank), wake up (Drank)
Faded (Drank), faded (Drank)


Now I done grew up 'round some people livin' their life in bottles
Granddaddy had the golden flask
Backstroke every day in Chicago
Some people like the way it feels
Some people wanna kill their sorrows
Some people wanna fit in with the popular, that was my problem
I was in a dark room, loud tunes
Lookin' to make a vow soon
That I'ma get fucked up, fillin' up my cup I see the crowd mood
Changin' by the minute and the record on repeat
Took a sip, then another sip, then somebody said to me

Nigga, why you babysittin' only two or three shots?
I'ma show you how to turn it up a notch
First you get a swimming pool full of liquor, then you dive in it
Pool full of liquor, then you dive in it
I wave a few bottles, then I watch 'em all flock
All the girls wanna play Baywatch
I got a swimming pool full of liquor and they dive in it
Po-Pool full of liquor, I'ma dive in it


Pour up (Drank), head shot (Drank)
Sit down (Drank), stand up (Drank)
Pass out (Drank), wake up (Drank)
Faded (Drank), faded (Drank)


Okay, now open your mind up and listen me, Kendrick
I am your conscience, if you do not hear me
Then you will be history, Kendrick
I know that you're nauseous right now
And I'm hopin' to lead you to victory, Kendrick
If I take another one down
I'ma drown in some poison, abusin' my limit
I think that I'm feelin' the vibe, I see the love in her eyes
I see the feelin', the freedom is granted
As soon as the damage of vodka arrived
This how you capitalize, this is parental advice
Then apparently, I'm over-influenced by what you are doin'
I thought I was doin' the most 'til someone said to me

Nigga, why you babysittin' only two or three shots?
I'ma show you how to turn it up a notch
First you get a swimming pool full of liquor, then you dive in it
Pool full of liquor, then you dive in it
I wave a few bottles, then I watch 'em all flock
All the girls wanna play Baywatch
I got a swimming pool full of liquor and they dive in it
Po-Pool full of liquor, I'ma dive in it


Pour up (Drank), head shot (Drank)
Sit down (Drank), stand up (Drank)
Pass out (Drank), wake up (Drank)
Faded (Drank), faded (Drank)


I ride, you ride, bang
One chopper, one hundred shots, bang
Hop out, do you bang?
Two chopper, two hundred shots, bang
I ride, you ride, bang
One chopper, one hundred shots, bang
Hop out, do you bang?
Two chopper, two hundred shots, bang

Nigga, why you babysittin' only two or three shots?
I'ma show you how to turn it up a notch
First you get a swimming pool full of liquor, then you dive in it
Pool full of liquor, then you dive in it
I wave a few bottles, then I watch 'em all flock
All the girls wanna play Baywatch
I got a swimming pool full of liquor and they dive in it
Po-Pool full of liquor, I'ma dive in it


Pour up (Drank), head shot (Drank)
Sit down (Drank), stand up (Drank)
Pass out (Drank), wake up (Drank)
Faded (Drank), faded (Drank)


(Pool full of Kendrick's lies in it)
Aw man... where is she takin' me?
Where is she takin' me?
(Pool full of liquor, I'ma die in it)


All I, All I, All I, All I have in life is my new appetite for failure
And I got hunger pain that grow insane
Tell me, do that sound familiar?
If it do, then you're like me
Makin' excuse that your relief
Is in the bottom of the bottle and the greenest indo leaf
As the window open I release
Everything that corrode inside of me
I see you jokin', why you laugh?
Don't you feel bad? I probably sleep
And never ever wake up, never ever wake up, never ever wake up
In God I trust, but just when I thought I had enough


They stomped the homie out over a bitch?
K-Dot, you good, blood?
Now we can drop, ye we can drop you back off
That nigga's straight, man, that nigga ain't trippin'
We gon' do the same ol' shit
I'ma pop a few shots, they gon' run, they gon' run opposite ways
Fall right in ****'s lap
And he gon' tear they ass up, simple as that
And I hope that bitch that set him up out there
We gon' pop that bitch too
Wait hold up, ayy, I see somebody

Aha! Got them niggas, K-Dot, you good?
L****, you good?
Yeah, blood, I'm good - Dave, you good?
Dave? Dave, say somethin' - Dave?
These bitch-ass niggas killed my brother!",81159
15654,76033,Ill Mind of Hopsin 5,rap,Hopsin,2012,1640501,{},"
Man, I hate rap, but if the shoe fits, wear it
I've become a freak of nature all the kids stare at
Who walk around bumpin' Raw with the shit blarin'
Saying ""Fuck school!"" and droppin' out like a miscarriage
I'm embarrassed and I'm ashamed
I played a part in this devilish game
Makin' your common sense perish
But I ain't takin' the full blame
'Cause most of you chumps runnin' around here ain't never had strict parents
All of your brain cells rottin' from weed
You feelin' like if you ain't got it, life's not as complete
You havin' sex with every-motherfuckin'-body you see
With a past so dark that Satan'd jump out of his seat
But still you out in these streets, thinkin' you hot as can be
Without the knowledge to lead, so you just follow the sheep
Makin' sure your lame swag is all polished and clean
While your favorite rapper's like, ""Yeah, he got it from me""
You been brainwashed by a fake life that you're used to livin'
When I say the word ""fun,"" what do you envision?
Prolly drinkin' and smokin' out with your crew and chillin'
With clueless women you tryin' to bang, bumpin' New Edition
Is that all you think life really is?
Well, if so, then you're a fuckin' idiot
I honestly feel like grabbing your head and hitting it
Matter of fact, you don't even deserve a brain - give me it!
Do you even have any goals
Aside from baggin' these hoes and packin' a bowl?
Well, let me guess - no
You're only in school because your parents make you go
When all you do is play beer pong and hang out with the bros
Yo, society's got you livin' for a wack cause
You're a fuckin' adult with no skills at all
You don't read any books or play ball
You don't draw - you literally do nothing at all!
Still you fiend for the glamorous fruits
You don't have, 'cause you idolize rappers that do
And all they say is, ""I got money and it's stacked to the roof""
And now you think that it's gon' magically just happen to you?
How? Your lazy ass don't commit to labor
You pick somethin' up, try it out, and put it down two minutes later
Then you complain about your life 'cause it ain't gettin' catered
Now whoever tries to call you on your bullshit's a hater?
You wanna succeed, you have to try; or one day you'll get older
And regret it all 'cause you can't provide
Your friends are lowlives, don't act surprised
Look, just cut the bad fruit off of the tree, make the sacrifice

Girls, stop actin' like you want a guy
With traits like Romeo - bitch, that's a fuckin' lie!
You always talk about how every man's fake and you can't take it
And you want somethin' real - shut up, tramp, save it!
Twice a week you put on your makeup and damn bracelets
And head to the club half-naked with your ass shakin'
Pullin' a lowlife nigga who claim he cash-makin'
'Til you let him hit and find out he work at the gas station
One of them niggas got you pregnant and you can't raise it
But you caused it, your actions made a fat statement
You want Romeo, then act patient
And stop frontin' like he in the club posted in the back waitin'
It's the club, where guys put on a new persona
After they get loaded with a few Corona's
They always shoutin' and wild out
With habits that very few condone of
Then they look for beautiful brainless bitches like you to bone 'em
Then when they leave you, you cry and cry
Talkin' about, ""Oh my god, I can't find a guy!
I've spent so many years and I've tried and tried!
Why am I even on Earth? I should die!""
You want Romeo, you're not worthy
You're cock-thirsty, you're nasty and probably got herpes
Sometimes the secret to findin' is to stop searchin'
Try a new formula, 'cause your last one's not workin'

The term ""real nigga"" is publicly used
And I need to know what it means, 'cause I'm fuckin' confused
Are you one for always bustin' your tool
With nothin' to lose and somethin' to prove
To homies up in your crew?
Is it because you're sellin' drugs to get loot
And brag about how you done been shot and stabbed
Like it's fun to be you?
But your life's a struggle, right, and you just hustlin' through?
Nah, you hamster-ass nigga, you just stuck in a loop
Man, why do black people gotta be the only ones who can't evolve?
'Cause you in the streets actin' like a neanderthal
It's clear you can't stand the law
You're lost as an abandoned dog
And all you're interested in is fightin', rappin' and basketball
I can't even fuck with you
'Cause if we out in public, you gon' get caught stealin' some shit, and get my ass in trouble, too
You'll get old and be nothin'
Livin' life in these streets, thuggin'
And starting shit with anybody mean-muggin'
Look at you, a real nigga, thinkin' your life's cool
Girls used to turn me down for guys who were like you
'Til you grab their heart and shove a spearhead right through
Then they regret it because it wasn't the right move
Your ""real nigga"" talk seems bogus
A real nigga don't brag about being real as long as he knows it
And his future doesn't seem hopeless
A real nigga stays out of jail, handles shit and he keeps focused

To all you rappers whose soul is out in the wrong
You inspired the issue I wrote about in this song
You go to prowl on the young who roam around in the slums
See, this is what happens when rap's overcrowded with bums
Hope the hour is long when I'm rollin' out with your tongue
The man above is my guide, you know the power is strong
All you menacin' freaks are only in it for cheese
And the mass-control limit was breached - fuck hip-hop!
They only in it for cheese, and any eyewitness can see
They purposely makin' the innocent weak
My existence on this planet's for you, I ain't only here to benefit me
Yo, we need to make a change while there's still time
It is hard, and sometimes I struggle tryin' to reveal mine
I can guide you if you feel blind
I just need you to be willin' to journey into my ill mind",81646
15705,76257,Birthday Song,rap,2 Chainz,2012,2333836,"{""Kanye West""}","
Yeah birthday, it's your birthday
If I die, bury me inside the Louis store
Ha, uh, uh


They ask me what I do and who I do it for (yeah)
And how I come up with this shit up in the studio (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Gucci store (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Louis store (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (2 Chainz!)


She got a big booty so I call her Big Booty (booty)
Skrr, skrr, wrists movin', cookin', gettin' to it (cookin')
I'm in the kitchen (I'm in the kitchen) yams everywhere (yams)
Just made a juug (just made a juug) I got bands everywhere (bands)
You the realest nigga breathin' if I hold my breath (damn)
Referee with a whistle, brrrt, hold this tech (baow)
Extendo clip (extendo clip) extendo roll (extendo roll)
When yo girl leave me, she need a hair salon (damn)
Hair-Hair Weave Killer goin' on a trapathon (yeah)
See I done had more bombs, than Pakistan (boom)
Dope bomb, dro bomb and a pill bomb (bomb)
See nigga, I'm ballin', you in will call (true)
When I die, bury me inside the jewelry store (2 Chainz)
When I die, bury me inside the Truey store (true)
True to my religion, two everything, I'm too different
So when I die, bury me next to two bitches (two bitches)

They ask me what I do and who I do it for (yeah)
And how I come up with this shit up in the studio (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Gucci store (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Louis store (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho


Ah, Yeezy, Yeezy, how you do it, huh?
It's my birthday, I deserve to be greedy, huh?
She holdin' out, she ain't givin' to the needy, huh?
You go downstairs and fall asleep with the TV on
Y'all been together ten years, you deserve a ménage
'Specially if you put that BMW in a garage
'Specially if you paid a couple payments on her momma crib
Went to her niece's graduation, man, I hate those kids!
Last birthday, she got you a new sweater
Put it on, give her a kiss, and tell her ""Do better""
She said, ""How 'bout I get you jewelry from the West End?""
How 'bout she hit the Westin and get her best friend?
Ha, I'm jokin', I'm just serious, I asked her
""Don't be actin', like no actress, if we preachin', then we practice
Don't be reachin', don't be touchin' shit, we in Kanye West's Benz!
'Cause I will turn you back to a pedestrian, hah!""

They ask me what I do and who I do it for (yeah)
And how I come up with this shit up in the studio (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Gucci store (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Louis store (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho


It's your birthday (yeah) it's your birthday (uh)
Bad bitch contest, you in first place
You in first place, you in first place
Bad bitch contest, you in first place
I show up with a check to your workplace
Then hand the valet the keys to the Merces
Tell the DJ play your song, this shit come on
What I'm seeing from the back I can't front on
They ask me what I do and who I do it for
When I die, bury me inside the booty club
Get it, girl, get it, girl, get it, get it, girl
I might switch it up and get your girl


They ask me what I do and who I do it for (yeah)
And how I come up with this shit up in the studio (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Gucci store (tell 'em)
When I die, bury me inside the Louis store (true)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho (yeah)
All I want for my birthday is a big booty ho

Deuce and 'Ye
We like Snoop and Dre
Isn't this your birthday, baby?
You deserve a coupe today, whoa!
You in first place, you in first place
Bad bitch contest, you in first place",81901
15780,76705,Hey Jude,rock,The Beatles,1968,1076376,{},"
Hey Jude, don't make it bad
Take a sad song and make it better
Remember to let her into your heart
Then you can start to make it better


Hey Jude, don't be afraid
You were made to go out and get her
The minute you let her under your skin
Then you begin to make it better


And anytime you feel the pain, hey Jude, refrain
Don't carry the world upon your shoulders
For well you know that it's a fool who plays it cool
By making his world a little colder
Na na na na na na na na na na


Hey Jude, don't let me down
You have found her, now go and get her
(Let it out and let it in)
Remember (Hey Jude) to let her into your heart
Then you can start to make it better

So let it out and let it in, hey Jude, begin
You're waiting for someone to perform with
And don't you know that it's just you, hey Jude, you'll do
The movement you need is on your shoulder
Na na na na na na na na na yeah


Hey Jude, don't make it bad
Take a sad song and make it better
Remember to let her under your skin
Then you'll begin to make it (Woah, fucking hell!)
Better better better better better better, oh


Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
(Jude Judy Judy Judy Judy Judy ow wow)
Naa na na na na na na (Na na na), na na na na, hey Jude
(Jude Jude Jude Jude Jude)
Naa na na na na na na (Yeah yeah yeah), na na na na, hey Jude
(You know you can make, Jude Jude, You're not gonna break it)
Naa na (Don't make it bad Jude) na na na na na (Take a sad song and make it better), na na na na, hey Jude
Hey Jude, hey Jude wow
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Jude Jude Jude Jude Jude Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
(Na na na na na na na na na na na na)
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na (Make it Jude), na na na na, hey Jude
(Yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah yeah)
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
(Go listen to ya ma ma ma ma ma ma ma ma)
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude
Naa na na na na na na, na na na na, hey Jude",82381
15860,77129,Im Different,rap,2 Chainz,2012,1887239,{},"
Yeah
Yeah
2 Chainz
Mustard on the beat, ho!


I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Middle finger up to my competition
I'm different, yeah, I'm different (Yeah)
I'm different, yeah, I'm different (Yeah)
I'm different, yeah, I'm different (Tru)
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing


Pull up to the scene, but my roof gone (Roof gone)
When I leave the scene, bet your boo gone (Boo gone)
And I beat the pussy like a new song (Boom)
2 Chainz, but I got me a few on (Yup)
Everything hot, skip lukewarm (Ugh)
Tell shawty bust it open, Uncle Luke on
Got the present for the present and a gift wrapping
I don't feel good, but my trigger happy (Bah)
Bet the stripper happy, bet they wish they had me
And I wish a nigga would, like a kitchen cabinet
And me and you are cut from a different fabric
I fucked her so good, it's a bad habit (DamN)
Bitch, sit down, you got a bad atti'
Gave her the wrong number and a bad addy (Tru)
You ain't going nowhere like a bad navi'
Ass so big, I told her to look back at it (Whoa)
Look back at it (Whoa), look back at it (Whoa)
Then I put a fat rabbit on the Craftmatic
I am so high ... attic
I am so high, like a ... addict

I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Middle finger up to my competition
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different (Yeah)
I'm different, yeah, I'm different (Ugh)
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing


2 Chainz, got your girl on the celly
And when I get off the celly, I made her meet at the telly
When she meet at the telly, I put it straight in her belly
When it go in the belly, it ain't shit you can tell me, ugh (Ugh)
Hair long (Long), money long (Yeah)
Me and broke niggas, we don't get along (Nah)
Hair long (Long), money long (Yeah)
Me and broke niggas, we don't get along (Tell 'em)
I paid a thousand dollars for my sneakers
'Ye told you, a 100K for a feature
""Ee-err, ee-err"": sound of the bed (Bed)
Beat it up, beat it up; then, I get some head (Head)
Well, I might get some head; then, I beat it up
I don't give a fuck, switch it up, nigga, live it up (Up)
Yeah, it's going down, so get up (Up)
Might valet-park a Brinks truck (Ugh)

Mustard on the beat, ho!


I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing
Middle finger up to my competition
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
I'm different, yeah, I'm different
Pull up to the scene with my ceiling missing",82860
15998,77823,If I Were a Boy,pop,Beyonc,2008,1736507,{Beyoncé},"
If I were a boy
Even just for a day
I'd roll out of bed in the morning
And throw on what I wanted then go
Drink beer with the guys
And chase after girls
I'd kick it with who I wanted
And I'd never get confronted for it
'Cause they'd stick up for me


If I were a boy
I think I could understand
How it feels to love a girl
I swear I'd be a better man
I'd listen to her
'Cause I know how it hurts
When you lose the one you wanted
'Cause he's taken you for granted
And everything you had got destroyed

If I were a boy
I would turn off my phone
Tell everyone it's broken
So they'd think that I was sleepin' alone
I'd put myself first
And make the rules as I go
'Cause I'd know that she'd be faithful
Waitin' for me to come home
To come home


If I were a boy
I think I could understand, oh
How it feels to love a girl
I swear I'd be a better man
I'd listen to her
'Cause I know how it hurts
When you lose the one you wanted (Wanted)
'Cause he's taken you for granted (Granted)
And everything you had got destroyed


It's a little too late for you to come back
Say, it's just a mistake
Think I'd forgive you like that
If you thought I would wait for you
You thought wrong

But you're just a boy
You don't understand
(Yeah, you don't understand, oh)
How it feels to love a girl
Someday, you'll wish you were a better man
You don't listen to her
You don't care how it hurts
Until you lose the one you wanted
'Cause you've taken her for granted
And everything you have got destroyed
But you're just a boy...",83613
16057,78052,We Didnt Start the Fire,rock,Billy Joel,1989,1543365,{},"
Harry Truman, Doris Day
Red China, Johnnie Ray
South Pacific
Walter Winchell, Joe DiMaggio
Joe McCarthy, Richard Nixon
Studebaker, Television
North Korea, South Korea
Marilyn Monroe
Rosenbergs, H-Bomb
Sugar Ray, Panmunjom
Brando, The King And I,
And The Catcher In The Rye
Eisenhower, Vaccine
England's got a new queen
Marciano, Liberace
Santayana goodbye


We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it

Joseph Stalin, Malenkov
Nasser and Prokofiev
Rockefeller, Campanella
Communist Bloc
Roy Cohn, Juan Peron
Toscanini, Dacron
Dien Bien Phu Falls, ""Rock Around the Clock""
Einstein, James Dean
Brooklyn's got a winning team
Davy Crockett, Peter Pan
Elvis Presley, Disneyland
Bardot, Budapest, Alabama, Khrushchev
Princess Grace, Peyton Place
Trouble in the Suez


We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it


Little Rock, Pasternak
Mickey Mantle, Kerouac
Sputnik, Zhou En-lai
Bridge On The River Kwai
Lebanon, Charles de Gaulle
California baseball
Starkweather Homicide
Children of Thalidomide
Buddy Holly, Ben-Hur
Space Monkey, Mafia
Hula Hoops, Castro
Edsel is a no-go
U-2, Syngman Rhee
Payola and Kennedy
Chubby Checker, Psycho
Belgians in the Congo

We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it


Hemingway, Eichmann
Stranger in a Strange Land
Dylan, Berlin
Bay of Pigs invasion
Lawrence of Arabia
British Beatlemania
Ole Miss, John Glenn
Liston beats Patterson
Pope Paul, Malcolm X
British Politician sex
J.F.K. blown away
What else do I have to say?


We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it

Birth control, Ho Chi Minh
Richard Nixon back again
Moonshot, Woodstock
Watergate, punk rock
Begin, Reagan, Palestine
Terror on the airline
Ayatollahs in Iran
Russians in Afghanistan
Wheel of Fortune, Sally Ride
Heavy metal suicide
Foreign debts, homeless Vets
AIDS, crack, Bernie Goetz
Hypodermics on the shores
China's under martial law
Rock and Roller cola wars
I can't take it anymore


We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
But when we are gone
It will still burn on, and on
And on, and on


We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it
We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it
We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning
We didn't start the fire
No, we didn't light it
But we tried to fight it
We didn't start the fire
It was always burning
Since the world's been turning",83863
16193,78729,Just What I Am,rap,Kid Cudi,2012,1262200,"{""King Chip""}","
I'm just what you made God - not many I trust
I'ma go my own way God, take my fate to wherever you want
I'm out here, on my son, won't stop 'til I get me some
Club-hoppin', tryna get me some, bad bitches wanna get me sprung
Early in the morning, I'm wakin', bakin', drinkin', contemplatin'
Ain't no such thing as Satan, evil is what you make it
Thank the Lord for that burning bush
That big body Benz I was born to push
On my way I'm burning kush, nigga don't be worried 'bout us
Neighbors knockin' on the door, asking can we turn it down
I say, ""Ain't no music on"", she said, ""No, that weed is loud""
Nigga, we ballin', straight swaggin', lost Hawk, but I'm maintainin'
I've been told that I'm amazing, make sure keep that fire blazin', we livin'


I need smoke
I need to smoke
Who gon' hold me down now?
I wanna get high y'all
I wanna get high y'all
Need it need it to get by y'all
Can you get me high y'all?
I wanna get high y'all
I wanna get high y'all
Need it need it to get by y'all
Can you get me high y'all?

I'm just what you made God, just what you made God (Nee-need it)
I'm just what you made God, I'm just what you made
(Nee-need it) I'm just what you made God
I'm just what you made God, I'm just what you made God


Let me tell you 'bout my month y'all, in the shop and I had a ball
I had to ball for therapy, my shrink don't think that helps at all
Whatever, that man ain't wearing these leather pants
I diagnose my damn self, these damn pills ain't working fam
I- In my spare time, punching walls, fucking up my hand
I know that shit sound super cray but if you had my life you'd understand
But, I can't fold, some poor soul got it way worse
We're all troubled, in a world in trouble
It's scary to have a kid walk this Earth
I'm what you made God, fuck yes I'm so odd
Thinking 'bout all my old friends who weren't my friends all along
Hm, when it rains it pours, whiskey bottles on the sinks and floors
Everyday to find sane's a chore, amidst a dream with no exit doors


I need smoke
I need to smoke
Who gon' hold me down now?
I wanna get high y'all
I wanna get high y'all
Need it need it to get by y'all
Can you get me high y'all?
I wanna get high y'all
I wanna get high y'all
Need it need it to get by y'all
Can you get me high y'all?

I'm just what you made God, just what you made God (Nee-need it)
I'm just what you made God, I'm just what you made
(Nee-need it) I'm just what you made God
I'm just what you made God, I'm just what you made God


Need it to get by, ya
Willy",84641
16231,78930,Never Gonna Give You Up,pop,Rick Astley,1987,2019657,{},"


We're no strangers to love
You know the rules and so do I
A full commitment's what I'm thinking of
You wouldn't get this from any other guy


I just wanna tell you how I'm feeling
Gotta make you understand


Never gonna give you up
Never gonna let you down
Never gonna run around and desert you
Never gonna make you cry
Never gonna say goodbye
Never gonna tell a lie and hurt you


We've known each other for so long
Your heart's been aching, but you're too shy to say it
Inside, we both know what's been going on
We know the game, and we're gonna play it

And if you ask me how I'm feeling
Don't tell me you're too blind to see


Never gonna give you up
Never gonna let you down
Never gonna run around and desert you
Never gonna make you cry
Never gonna say goodbye
Never gonna tell a lie and hurt you
Never gonna give you up
Never gonna let you down
Never gonna run around and desert you
Never gonna make you cry
Never gonna say goodbye
Never gonna tell a lie and hurt you


Ooh (Give you up)
Ooh-ooh (Give you up)
Ooh-ooh
Never gonna give, never gonna give (Give you up)
Ooh-ooh
Never gonna give, never gonna give (Give you up)

We've known each other for so long
Your heart's been aching, but you're too shy to say it
Inside, we both know what's been going on
We know the game, and we're gonna play it


I just wanna tell you how I'm feeling
Gotta make you understand


Never gonna give you up
Never gonna let you down
Never gonna run around and desert you
Never gonna make you cry
Never gonna say goodbye
Never gonna tell a lie and hurt you
Never gonna give you up
Never gonna let you down
Never gonna run around and desert you
Never gonna make you cry
Never gonna say goodbye
Never gonna tell a lie and hurt you
Never gonna give you up
Never gonna let you down
Never gonna run around and desert you
Never gonna make you cry
Never gonna say goodbye
Never gonna tell a lie and hurt you",84851
16513,80522,Thrift Shop,rap,Macklemore & Ryan Lewis,2012,4699519,{Wanz},"
""Hey, Macklemore, can we go thrift shopping?""
What what, what, what
What what, what, what
What what, what, what
What what, what, what
What what, what, what
Bada, bada, bada doo da
What what, what, what
Bada, bada, bada doo da
What what, what, what
Bada, bada, bada doo da
Bada, bada, bada doo da
Bada, bada, bada doo da
Bada, bada, bada doo da
Bada, bada, bada doo da


I'm gonna pop some tags
Only got twenty dollars in my pocket
I'm, I'm, I'm huntin', lookin' for a come up
This is fucking awesome

Now
Walk into the club like, ""What up? I got a big cock""
Nah, I'm just pumped, I bought some shit from a thrift shop
Ice on the fringe is so damn frosty
The people like, ""Damn, that's a cold ass honkey""
Rollin' in hella deep, headed to the mezzanine
Dressed in all pink 'cept my gator shoes, those are green
Draped in a leopard mink, girl standin' next to me
Probably should've washed this, smells like R. Kelly sheets
Piss...
But shit, it was ninety-nine cents! (Bag it)
Coppin' it, washin' it, 'bout to go and get some compliments
Passin' up on those moccasins someone else has been walkin' in
Bummy and grungy, fuck it man, I am stunting and flossin'
And saving my money and I'm hella happy; that's a bargain, bitch
I'ma take your grandpa's style, I'ma take your grandpa's style
No, for real, ask your grandpa, can I have his hand-me-downs? (Thank you!)
Velour jumpsuit and some house slippers
Dookie brown leather jacket that I found diggin'
They had a broken keyboard, I bought a broken keyboard
I bought a skeet blanket, then I bought a knee board
Hello, hello, my ace man, my mellow
John Wayne ain't got nothing on my fringe game, hell no
I could take some Pro Wings, make 'em cool, sell those
The sneaker heads would be like, ""Ah, he got the Velcros""

I'm gonna pop some tags
Only got twenty dollars in my pocket
I'm, I'm, I'm huntin', lookin' for a come up
This is fucking awesome
I'm gonna pop some tags
Only got twenty dollars in my pocket
I'm, I'm, I'm huntin', lookin' for a come up
This is fucking awesome


What you know about rockin' a wolf on your noggin?
What you knowin' about wearin' a fur fox skin?
I'm diggin', I'm diggin', I'm searchin' right through that luggage
One man's trash, that's another man's come up
Thank your granddad for donatin' that plaid button-
Up shirt 'cause right now, I'm up in her skirt
I'm at the Goodwill, you can find me in the bins
I'm not, I'm not stuck on searchin' in that section (Mens)
Your grammy, your auntie, your mama, your mammy
I'll take those flannel zebra jammies second hand and I'll rock that, motherfucker
The built-in onesie with the socks on the motherfucker
I hit the party and they stop in that motherfucker
They be like, ""Oh, that Gucci? That's hella tight""
I'm like, ""Yo, that's fifty dollars for a T-shirt""
Limited edition, let's do some simple addition
Fifty dollars for a T-shirt, that's just some ignorant bitch shit
I call that getting-swindled-and-pimped shit
I call that getting tricked by business
That shirt's hella though
And having the same one as six other people in this club is a hella don't
Peep game, come take a look through my telescope
Tryna get girls from a brand?
Man, you hella won't! Man, you hella won't!

Goodwill, poppin' tags, yeah!


I'm gonna pop some tags
Only got twenty dollars in my pocket
I'm, I'm, I'm huntin', lookin' for a come up
This is fucking awesome


I'll wear your granddad's clothes
I look incredible
I'm in this big-ass coat
From that thrift shop down the road
I'll wear your granddad's clothes (Damn right)
I look incredible (Now come on, man)
I'm in this big-ass coat (Big-ass coat)
From that thrift shop down the road (Let's go, come on!)


I'm gonna pop some tags
Only got twenty dollars in my pocket
I'm, I'm, I'm huntin', lookin' for a come up
This is fucking awesome


""Is that your grandma's coat?""",86538
16635,81159,Clique,rap,"Kanye West, JAY-Z & Big Sean",2012,3724174,"{""Kanye West / JAY-Z & Big Sean""}","
What of the dollar you murdered for?
Is that the one fighting for your soul?
Or your brother's the one that you're running from?
But if you got money, fuck it, 'cause I want some
B-I-G
Who fuckin' with me?
Oh, God!
Woah


Okay, ain't nobody fuckin' with my clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
Ain't nobody fresher than my muhfuckin' clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
As I look around, they don't do it like my clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
And all these bad bitches, man, they want the-
They want the-, they want the- (B-I-G, oh God)
Go

I tell a bad bitch do whatever I say (Yup)
My block behind me, like I'm coming out the driveway (Swerve)
It's grind day, from Friday to next Friday (Woah)
I been up straight for nine days, I need a spa day (Spa day)
Yup, she try and gimme that poon-tang
I might let my crew bang, my crew deeper than Wu-Tang (Woah)
I'm rollin' with, ha, fuck I'm saying? Girl, you know my crew name
You know 2 Chainz? Skrrt! I'm pullin' up in that Bruce Wayne
But I'm the fuckin' villain, man, they kneelin' when I'm walking in the buildin'
Freaky women I be feelin' from the bank accounts I'm fillin'
What a feelin'! Ah man, they gotta be
Young player from the D that's killing everything that he see for the dough


Okay, ain't nobody fuckin' with my clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
Ain't nobody fresher than my ma'fuckin' clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
As I look around, they don't do it like my clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
And all these bad bitches, man, they want the-
They want the-, they want the-
Go


(Click clack, stick 'em up)
Yeah, I'm talkin' Ye (Clique) yeah, I'm talkin' Rih (Clique)
Yeah, I'm talkin' B (Clique) nigga, I'm talkin' me
Yeah, I'm talkin' bossy, I ain't talkin' Kelis
Your money too short, you can't be talkin' to me
Yeah, I'm talkin' LeBron, we ball in our family tree
G.O.O.D. Music drug-dealing cousin, ain't nothin' fuckin' with we
Me, turn that sixty-two to one-twenty-five, one-twenty-five to a two-fifty
Two-fifty to a half a, man, ain't nothin' nobody can do with me
Now, who with me? ¡Vámonos! Call me Hov or Jefe
Translation: I'm the shit, 'least that what my neck say
'Least that what my check say, lost my homie for a decade
Nigga down for like twelve years, ain't hug his son since the second grade
Uh, he never told-who he gon' tell?
We top of the totem pole
It's the Dream Team meets the Supreme Team
And all our eyes green, it only means one thing: you ain't fuckin' with the clique

Okay, ain't nobody fuckin' with my clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
Ain't nobody fresher than my ma'fuckin' clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
As I look around, they don't do it like my clique
Clique, clique, clique, clique
And all these bad bitches, man, they want the-
They want the-, they want the-


Break records at Louis, ate breakfast at Gucci
My girl a superstar all from a home movie
Bow on our arrival, the un-American idols
What niggas did in Paris, got 'em hangin' off the Eiffel
Yeah, I'm talkin' business, we talkin' CIA
I'm talkin' George Tenet, I seen him the other day
He asked me about my Maybach, think he had the same
Except mine tinted and his might have been rented
You know, white people get money, don't spend it
Or maybe they get money, buy a business
I rather buy eighty gold chains and go ign'ant
I know Spike Lee gon' kill me, but let me finish
Blame it on the pigment, we livin' no limits
Them gold Master P ceilings was just a figment
Of our imagination, MTV cribs
Now I'm lookin' at a crib right next to where TC lives
That's Tom Cruise, whatever she accuse
He wasn't really drunk, he just had a frew brews
Pass the refreshments, a cool, cool beverage
Everything I do need a news crew's presence
Speedboat swerve, homie, watch out for the waves
I'm way too Black to burn from sunrays
So I just meditate at the home in Pompeii
About how I could build a new Rome in one day
Every time I'm in Vegas they screamin' like, ""He's Elvis""
But I just wanna design hotels and nail it
Shit is real, got me feelin' Israelian
Like Bar Refaeli, or Gisele-no, that's Brazilian
Went through, deep depression when my mama passed
Suicide, what kinda talk is that?
But I been talkin' to God for so long
That if you look at my life I guess He talkin' back
Fuckin' with my clique

Ain't nobody fresher than my ma'fuckin' clique
As I look around, they don't do it like my clique
And all these bad bitches, man, they want the-
They want the- they want the-
Go

",87225
16680,81361,The House of the Rising Sun,rock,The Animals,1964,1246867,{},"
There is a house in New Orleans
They call the Rising Sun
And it's been the ruin of many a poor boy
And God, I know I'm one


My mother was a tailor
She sewed my new blue jeans
My father was a gamblin' man
Down in New Orleans


Now the only thing a gambler needs
Is a suitcase and a trunk
And the only time he'll be satisfied
Is when he's all drunk




Oh, mother, tell your children
Not to do what I have done
Spend your lives in sin and misery
In the House of the Rising Sun

Well, I got one foot on the platform
The other foot on the train
I'm goin' back to New Orleans
To wear that ball and chain


Well, there is a house in New Orleans
They call the Rising Sun
And it's been the ruin of many a poor boy
And God, I know I'm one",87427
16700,81442,Here Comes the Sun,rock,The Beatles,1969,1007852,{},"
Here comes the sun, doo da doo doo
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right


Little darling, it's been a long cold lonely winter
Little darling, it feels like years since it's been here


Here comes the sun, doo da doo doo
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right


Little darling, the smile's returning to the faces
Little darling, it seems like years since it's been here


Here comes the sun
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right

Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes
Sun, sun, sun, here it comes


Little darling, I feel that ice is slowly melting
Little darling, it seems like years since it's been clear


Here comes the sun, doo da doo doo
Here comes the sun, and I say
It's all right


Here comes the sun, doo da doo doo
Here comes the sun
It's all right
It's all right",87577
16856,82223,Chop Suey,rock,System of a Down,2001,1074309,{},"
We're rolling ""Suicide""


Wake up (Wake up)
Grab a brush and put a little makeup
Hide your scars to fade away the shakeup (Hide the scars to fade away the shakeup)
Why'd you leave the keys upon the table?
Here you go, create another fable, you wanted to
Grab a brush and put a little makeup, you wanted to
Hide the scars to fade away the shakeup, you wanted to
Why'd you leave the keys upon the table? You wanted to


I don't think you trust
In my self-righteous suicide
I cry when angels deserve to die


Ah! Wake up (Wake up)
Grab a brush and put a little makeup (A little bit)
Hide the scars to fade away the (Hide the scars to fade away the shakeup)
Why'd you leave the keys upon the table?
Here you go, create another fable, you wanted to
Grab a brush and put a little makeup, you wanted to
Hide the scars to fade away the shakeup, you wanted to
Why'd you leave the keys upon the table? You wanted to

I don't think you trust
In my self-righteous suicide
I cry when angels deserve to die
In my self-righteous suicide
I cry when angels deserve to die


Father, father, father, father
Father, father, father, father
Father, into your hands I commend my spirit
Father, into your hands
Why have you forsaken me?
In your eyes, forsaken me?
In your thoughts, forsaken me?
In your heart, forsaken me? Oh


Trust in my self-righteous suicide
I cry when angels deserve to die
In my self-righteous suicide
I cry when angels deserve to die",88430
16931,82611,Fluorescent Adolescent,rock,Arctic Monkeys,2007,1165173,{},"
You used to get it in your fishnets
Now you only get it in your night dress
Discarded all the naughty nights for niceness
Landed in a very common crisis
Everything's in order in a black hole
Nothing seems as pretty as the past though
That Bloody Mary's lacking in Tabasco
Remember when you used to be a rascal?


Oh, the boy's a slag, the best you ever had
The best you ever had is just a memory and those dreams
Weren't as daft as they seem, aren't as daft as they seem
My love, when you dream them up


Flicking through a little book of sex tips
Remember when the boys were all electric?
Now when she's told she's gonna get it
I'm guessing that she'd rather just forget it
Clinging 'till I'm getting sentimental
Said she wasn't going but she went still
Likes her gentlemen not to be gentle
Was it a Mecca dauber or a betting pencil?

Oh, the boy's a slag, the best you ever had
The best you ever had is just a memory and those dreams
Weren't as daft as they seem, not as daft as they seem
My love, when you dream them up


Oh, Flo, where did you go?
Where did you go? Where did you go?


You're falling about
You took a left off Last Laugh Lane
Just sounding it out
But you're not coming back again
You're falling about
You took a left off Last Laugh Lane
You were just sounding it out
But you're not coming back again


You used to get it in your fishnets
(Falling about)
Now you only get it in your night dress
Discarded all the naughty nights for niceness
(You took a left off Last Laugh Lane)
Landed in a very common crisis
Everything's in order in a black hole
(You were just sounding it out)
Is anything as pretty in the past though?
That Bloody Mary's lacking in Tabasco
(You're not coming back again)
Remember when you used to be a rascal?
(Oh...)",88856
17060,83356,Remember You,rap,Wiz Khalifa,2012,1123669,"{""The Weeknd""}","
She's about to earn some bragging rights
I'm 'bout to give it up like I've been holding back all night
Girl, take pride in what you want to do
Even if that means a new man every night inside of you
Baby, I don't mind
You can tell by how I roll
Cause my clique hot and my cup cold
My talk slurred cause I'm so throwed
And I'm wiping sweat from my last show
And he's TG and I'm XO
I'm only here for one night
Then I'ma be a memory
Say it in my ear, so I can hear what you say to me
I got cups full of that Rosé
Smoke anything that's passed to me
Don't worry 'bout my voice
I won't need it for what I'm about to do to you


Bad bitch, girl I think I might get used to you
I might have to take your number when I'm through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me
Bad bitch, girl I think I might get used to you
I might have to take your number when I'm through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me

Old rapping ass
Light years past the class
Hit it, don't have to pass
Nigga, we the new Aftermath
Niggas after fame, I just had to laugh
Niggas after fame, I'm after cash
You's a fan, I'm a player
I'm the man, you's a hater
And I only smoke papers
That's how you tell I'm Taylor'd
Nigga listen
Break it down, rolling weed on the island of my kitchen
And not a thing goes down without permission
Look, everything I got on I was made for
Everything that I got I done came for
All the shit that you see I done slaved for
All the cars and the crib, yeah that's paid for
Need I say more
Spend so much money on clothes
Said fuck a store, making my own
I hope that you're rolling one up while you're singing along
And know I was rolling one while I was making this song
Pour out some shots
You're taking too long
Young and I'm rich
And plus all of my friends on that Bombay and lemonade

Do to you
Bad bitch, girl I think I might get used to you
I might have to take your number when I'm through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me
Bad bitch, girl I think I might get used to you
I might have to take your number when I'm through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me


I'm on some gin, you on some gin
I'm moving slow, I'm driving fast
I hit the weed, you take the wheel
We lose control
Drop the top in that 69
And that motor roar in that old Chevelle
Can't say a thing, how you supposed to feel
Stacking all of this paper, dawg
I like to call this shit old news
And these haters jocking our old moves
Popping champagne cause we made it
Back of the Phantom, we faded
All of this shit that I did I probably won't remember tomorrow

Do to you
Bad bitch, girl I think I might get used to you
I might have to take your number when I'm through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me
Bad bitch, girl I think I might get used to you
I might have to take your number when I'm through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me


Oh, oh
Used to you
Through with you
All I ask of you is try to earn my memory
Make me remember you like you remember me
Used to you
Through with you
Memory, remember you",89640
17214,84096,Sherane a.k.a Master Splinters Daughter,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,1387277,{},"
Lord God, I come to you a sinner
And I humbly repent for my sins
I believe that Jesus is Lord
I believe that You raised him from the dead
I would ask that Jesus come to my life
And be my Lord and Savior
I receive Jesus to take control of my life
And that I may live for him from this day forth
Thank you, Lord Jesus, for saving me with your precious blood
In Jesus' name, amen


I met her at this house party on El Segundo and Central
She had the credentials of strippers in Atlanta
Ass came with a hump, from the jump she was a camel
I want to ride like Arabians, push an '04 Mercedes-Benz
""Hello, my name is Kendrick,"" she said, ""No, you're handsome""
Whispered in my ear, disappeared, then found her dancin'
Ciara had played in the background
The parade music we made had us all wearin' shades now, cool
""Where you stay?"" She said, ""Down the street from Dominguez High""
Okay, I know that's borderline Compton or Paramount
""Well, is it Compton?"" ""No,"" she replied
Then quickly start battin' her eyes
I strictly had wanted her thighs around me
Seventeen with nothin' but pussy stuck on my mental
My motive was rather sinful, ""What you tryna get into?""
She didn't tell, just gave me her Nextel
Dropped the number, we chirped the whole summer, and, well
The summer had passed, and now I'm likin' her
Conversation we havin' probably enticin' her
Who can imagine? Maybe my actions'll end up wifin' her
Love or lust, regardless, we'll fuck 'cause the trife in us
It's deep-rooted, the music of bein' young and dumb
Is never muted, in fact, it's much louder where I'm from
We know a lot 'bout each other, her mother was a crack addict
She live with her granny and her younger two brothers
Her favorite cousin Demetrius is irrepetible
Family history of gangbangin' did make me skeptical
But not enough to stop me from gettin' a nut
""I wanna come over, what's up?""
That's what I told her soon as this episode
Of Martin go off, I'm tryna get off
I was in heat like a cactus
My tactics of bein' thirsty probably could hurt me
But fuck it, I got some heart
Grabbed my mama keys, hopped in the car, then, oh boy
So now I'm down Rosecrans in a Caravan
Passin' Alameda, my gas meter in need of a pump
I got enough to get me through the traffic jam
At least I hope, 'cause my pockets broke as a promise, man
I'm thinkin' 'bout that sex
Thinkin' 'bout her thighs or maybe kissin' on her neck or maybe what position's next
Sent a picture of her titties, blowin' up my texts
I looked at 'em and almost ran my front bumper into Corvette
Enthused by the touch of a woman, she's a masseuse
And I'm a professional pornstar when off the Goose
I had a fifth in the trunk like Curtis Jackson for ransom
I'm hopin' to get her loose like an Uncle Luke anthem
I'm two blocks away, two hundred and fifty feet
And six steps from where she stay, she wavin' me 'cross the street
I pulled up, a smile on my face, and then I see
Two niggas, two black hoodies, I froze as my phone rang

Please leave your message for three-two-three
Record your message after the tone
Kendrick, where you at?
Damn, I'm sittin' here waitin' on my van
You told me you was gon' be back in fifteen minutes
Man, I gotta go up to the county buildin', man, these kids ready to eat
I'm ready to eat, shit
I gotta get them food stamps, come on now
You on your way or what?
I hope you ain't out there messin' with them damn hoodrats out there, shit
'Specially that lil' crazy-ass girl Sherane
And plus you got school tomorrow
You keep fuckin' around in them streets, you ain't gon' pass to the next grade
Eleventh grade
(Is that Kendrick on the phone?)
Your daddy callin' about some damn dominoes (Let me holler at him)
He want to holler at you too, go ahead, Kenny, go'n, shit
Hello? Yak, where my motherfuckin' dominoes at?
(Kenny), What?
I'm on his voicemail, damn fool (Oh), shit
Yak, where my motherfuckin' dominoes at?
This the second time I asked you to bring my fuckin' dominoes
Just give me the damn phone, shit, don't hang up, damn, let me
Kendrick, when you get this message, man, call me back (Keep losin' my goddamn dominoes, we gon' have to go in the backyard)
I need to know when you gon' bring back my damn car (And squab, homie)
This man fussin' 'bout some damn dominoes
It ain't all that serious, fuck, damn dominoes
Shit, I'ma miss my damn appointment, fuck
Fuck some damn dominoes, nobody wanna hear that
Nobody wanna hear your ass
Matter fact, cut my motherfuckin' oldies back on
You killin' my motherfuckin' vibe",90472
17215,84097,Bitch Dont Kill My Vibe,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,4925223,{},"


I am a sinner who's probably gonna sin again
Lord, forgive me
Lord, forgive me
Things I don't understand
Sometimes I need to be alone
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
I can feel your energy from two planets away
I got my drink, I got my music
I would share it, but today I'm yelling


Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe


Look inside of my soul and you can find gold and maybe get rich
Look inside of your soul and you can find out it never exist
I can feel the changes
I can feel a new life, I always knew life can be dangerous
I can say that I like a challenge and you tell me it's painless
You don't know what pain is
How can I paint this picture
When the color blind is hangin' with you?
Fell on my face and awoke with a scar
Another mistake livin' deep in my heart
Wear it on top of my sleeve in a flick
I can admit that it did look like yours
Why you resent every making of his?
Tell me your purpose is petty again
But even a small lighter can burn a bridge
Even a small lighter can burn a bridge

I can feel the changes
I can feel the new people around me just want to be famous
You can see that my city found me
Then put me on stages, to me that's amazin'
To you that's a quick check
With all disrespect, let me say this


I am a sinner who's probably gonna sin again
Lord, forgive me
Lord, forgive me
Things I don't understand
Sometimes I need to be alone
Bitch, don't kill my vibe! Bitch, don't kill my vibe!
I can feel your energy from two planets away
I got my drink, I got my music
I would share it, but today I'm yelling


Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe


I'm tryin' to keep it alive
And not compromise the feeling we love
You're tryin' to keep it deprived
And only co-sign what radio does
And I'm lookin' right past you
We live in a world, we live in a world on two different axles
You live in a world, you livin' behind the mirror
I know what you scared of
The feeling of feeling emotions inferior
This shit is vital, I know you had to
This shit is vital, I know you had to
Die in a pitiful vain, tell me a watch and a chain
Is way more believable, give me a feasible gain
Rather a seasonal name
I'll let the people know this is somethin' you can blame
On yourselves, you can remain stuck in a box
I'ma break out and then hide every lock
I'ma break out and then hide every lock

I can feel the changes
I can feel the new people around me just want to be famous
You can see that my city found me, then put me on stages
To me, that's amazin'
To you that's a quick check
With all disrespect, let me say this


I am a sinner who's probably gonna sin again
Lord, forgive me
Lord, forgive me
Things I don't understand
Sometimes I need to be alone
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
I can feel your energy from two planets away
I got my drink, I got my music
I would share it, but today I'm yelling


Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe

Bitch, don't kill my vibe
You ain't heard the coast like this in a long time
Don't you see that long line?
And they waiting on Kendrick like the first and the fifteenth
Threes in the air, I can see you are in sync
Hide your feelings, hide your feelings, now, what you better do
I'll take your girlfriend and put that pussy on the pedestal


Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Walk out the door and they scream it's alive
My New Year's resolution is to stop all the pollution
Talk too motherfuckin' much, I got my drink, I got my music


I say bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe




Ayy, K-Dot, get in the car, nigga!
Come on, we finna roll out!
Nigga, I got a pack of blacks and a beat CD
Get yo' freestyles ready!",90473
17216,84098,Money Trees,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,5577679,"{""Jay Rock""}","


Uh, me and my niggas tryna get it, ya bish (Ya bish)
Hit the house lick: tell me, is you wit' it, ya bish? (Ya bish)
Home invasion was persuasive (Was persuasive)
From nine to five I know it's vacant, ya bish (Ya bish)
Dreams of livin' life like rappers do (Like rappers do)
Back when condom wrappers wasn't cool (They wasn't cool)
I fucked Sherane and went to tell my bros (Tell my bros)
Then Usher Raymond ""Let It Burn"" came on (""Let Burn"" came on)
Hot sauce all in our Top Ramen, ya bish (Ya bish)
Park the car, then we start rhymin', ya bish (Ya bish)
The only thing we had to free our mind (Free our mind)
Then freeze that verse when we see dollar signs (See dollar signs)
You lookin' like a easy come-up, ya bish (Ya bish)
A silver spoon I know you come from, ya bish (Ya bish)
And that's a lifestyle that we never knew (We never knew)
Go at a reverend for the revenue


It go Halle Berry or hallelujah
Pick your poison, tell me what you doin'
Everybody gon' respect the shooter
But the one in front of the gun lives forever
(The one in front of the gun, forever)
And I been hustlin' all day
This-a-way, that-a-way
Through canals and alleyways, just to say
Money trees is the perfect place for shade
And that's just how I feel

Nah, nah
A dollar might just fuck your main bitch
That's just how I feel, nah
A dollar might say fuck them niggas that you came with
That's just how I feel, nah, nah
A dollar might just make that lane switch
That's just how I feel, nah
A dollar might turn to a million and we all rich
That's just how I feel


Dreams of livin' life like rappers do (Like rappers do)
Bump that new E-40 after school (Way after school)
You know, ""Big Ballin' With My Homies"" (My homies)
Earl Stevens had us thinkin' rational (Thinkin' rational, that's rational)
Back to reality, we poor, ya bish (Ya bish)
Another casualty at war, ya bish (Ya bish)
Two bullets in my Uncle Tony head (My Tony head)
He said one day I'll be on tour, ya bish (Ya bish)
That Louis Burgers never be the same (Won't be the same)
A Louis belt that never ease that pain (Won't ease that pain)
But I'ma purchase when that day is jerkin' (That day is jerkin')
Pull off at Church's, with Pirellis skirtin' (Pirellis skirtin')
Gang signs out the window, ya bish (Ya bish)
Hopin' all of 'em offend you, ya bish (Ya bish)
They say your hood is a pot of gold (A pot of gold)
And we gon' crash it when nobody's home

It go Halle Berry or hallelujah
Pick your poison, tell me what you doin'
Everybody gon' respect the shooter
But the one in front of the gun lives forever
(The one in front of the gun, forever)
And I been hustlin' all day
This-a-way, that-a-way
Through canals and alleyways, just to say
Money trees is the perfect place for shade
And that's just how I feel


Nah, nah
A dollar might just fuck your main bitch
That's just how I feel, nah
A dollar might say fuck them niggas that you came with
That's just how I feel, nah, nah
A dollar might just make that lane switch
That's just how I feel, nah
A dollar might turn to a million and we all rich
That's just how I feel


Be the last one out to get this dough? No way!
Love one of you bucket-headed hoes? No way!
Hit the streets, then we break the code? No way!
Hit the brakes when they on patrol? No way!
Be the last one out to get this dough? No way!
Love one of you bucket-headed hoes? No way!
Hit the streets, then we break the code? No way!
Hit the brakes when they on patrol? No way!

Imagine Rock up in them projects
Where them niggas pick your pockets
Santa Claus don't miss them stockings
Liquors spillin', pistols poppin'
Bakin' soda YOLA whippin'
Ain't no turkey on Thanksgivin'
My homeboy just dome'd a nigga
I just hope the Lord forgive him
Pots with cocaine residue
Every day I'm hustlin'
What else is a thug to do
When you eatin' cheese from the government?
Gotta provide for my daughter n'em
Get the fuck up out my way, bitch
Got that drum and I got them bands
Just like a parade, bitch
Drop that work up in the bushes
Hope them boys don't see my stash
If they do, tell the truth
This the last time you might see my ass
From the gardens where the grass ain't cut
Them serpents lurkin', Blood
Bitches sellin' pussy, niggas sellin' drugs
But it's all good
Broken promises, steal your watch
And tell you what time it is
Take your J's and tell you to kick it where a FootLocker is
In the streets with a heater under my Dungarees
Dreams of me gettin' shaded under a money tree


It go Halle Berry or hallelujah
Pick your poison, tell me what you doin'
Everybody gon' respect the shooter
But the one in front of the gun lives forever
(The one in front of the gun, forever)
And I been hustlin' all day
This-a-way, that-a-way
Through canals and alleyways, just to say
Money trees is the perfect place for shade
And that's just how I feel


Kendrick's Mom: Kendrick, just bring my car back, man. I called in for another appointment. I figured you weren't gonna be back here on time anyways. Look, shit, shit, I just wanna get out the house, man. This man is on one, he feelin' good as a motherfucker. Shit, I'm tryna get my thing goin', too. Just bring my car back. Shit, he faded. He feelin' good. Look, listen to him!
Kendrick's Dad: Girl, girl, I want your body, I want your body, 'cause of that big ol' fat ass. Girl, girl, I want your body, I want your body, 'cause of that big ol' fat ass
Kendrick's Mom: See, he high as hell. Shit, and he ain't even trippin' off them damn dominoes anymore. Just bring the car back!
Kendrick's Dad: Did somebody say dominoes?",90475
17218,84100,​m.A.A.d city,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,6924722,"{""MC Eiht""}","


If Pirus and Crips all got along
They'd probably gun me down by the end of this song
Seem like the whole city go against me
Every time I'm in the street, I hear-
Yawk! Yawk! Yawk! Yawk!


Man down, where you from, nigga?
Fuck who you know-where you from, my nigga?
Where your grandma stay, huh, my nigga?
This m.A.A.d city I run, my nigga


Brace yourself, I'll take you on a trip down memory lane
This is not a rap on how I'm slingin' crack or move cocaine
This is cul-de-sac and plenty Cognac and major pain
Not the drill sergeant, but the stress that weighin' on your brain
It was me, L Boog, and Yan Yan, YG Lucky ride down Rosecrans
It got ugly, wavin' yo' hand out the window - check yourself!
Uh, Warriors and Conans, hope euphoria can slow dance
With society, the driver seat the first one to get killed
Seen a light-skinned nigga with his brains blown out
At the same burger stand where *beep* hang out
Now this is not a tape recorder sayin' that he did it
But ever since that day, I was lookin' at him different
That was back when I was nine, Joey packed the nine
Pakistan on every porch is fine, we adapt to crime
Pack a van with four guns at a time
With the sliding door, fuck is up?
Fuck you shootin' for if you ain't walkin' up, you fuckin' punk?
Pickin' up the fuckin' pump, pickin' off you suckers
Suck a dick or die or sucker punch
A wall of bullets comin' from AK's, AR's, ""Ayy, y'all-duck!""
That's what Momma said when we was eatin' that free lunch
Aw man, goddamn, all hell broke loose
You killed my cousin back in '94, fuck yo' truce!
Now crawl your head in that noose
You wind up dead on the news
Ain't no peace treaty, just piecin' BGs up to pre-approve
Bodies on top of bodies, IVs on top of IVs
Obviously the coroner between the sheets like the Isleys
When you hop on that trolley, make sure your color's correct
Make sure you're corporate or they'll be callin' your mother collect
They say the governor collect all of our taxes, except
When we in traffic and tragic happens, that shit ain't no threat
You movin' backwards if you suggest that you sleep with a TEC
Go buy a chopper and have a doctor on speed dial, I guess
M.A.A.d. city

Man down, where you from, nigga?
Fuck who you know-where you from, my nigga?
Where your grandma stay, huh, my nigga?
This m.A.A.d city I run, my nigga


If Pirus and Crips all got along
They'd probably gun me down by the end of this song
Seem like the whole city go against me
Every time I'm in the street, I hear-
Yawk! Yawk! Yawk!-




Wake yo' punk-ass up!
It ain't nothin' but a Compton thang
G-yeah, real simple and plain
Let me teach you some lessons about the street
(Smoke somethin', nigga!)
Hood ('Sup, Cuz?)
It ain't nothin' but a Compton thang
G-yeah, how we do


Fresh outta school 'cause I was a high school grad'
Sleepin' in the living room of my momma's pad
Reality struck, I seen the white car crash
Hit the light pole, two niggas hopped out on foot and dashed
My pops said I needed a job, I thought I believed him
Security guard for a month and ended up leavin'
In fact, I got fired, 'cause I was inspired by all of my friends
To stage a robbery the third Saturday I clocked in
Projects tore up, gang signs get thrown up
Cocaine laced in marijuana
And they wonder why I rarely smoke now
Imagine if your first blunt had you foamin' at the mouth
I was straight tweakin', the next weekend we broke even
I made allegiance that made a promise to see you bleedin'
You know the reasons but still will never know my life
Kendrick a.k.a. ""Compton's Human Sacrifice""

G-yeah, cocaine, weed
Niggas been mixin' shit since the '80s, loc
Sherm sticks, butt-nakeds
Dip, make a nigga flip
Cluck heads all up and down the block and shit
One time's crooked and shit
Block a nigga in
Alondra, Rosecrans, Bullis, it's Compton


I'm still in the hood, loc, yeah that's cool
Shit, the hood took me under, so I follow the rules
But yeah, that's like me, I grew up in the hood where they bang
And niggas that rep colors is doin' the same thang
Pass it to the left so I can smoke on me
A couple drive-bys in the hood lately, shit
Couple of IV's with the fuckin' spray-can
Shots in the crowd, then everybody ran
Crew I'm finna slay, the street life I crave
Shots hit the enemy, hearts turn brave
Mount up, regulators in the whip
Down the boulevard with the pistol grip, yeah
Trip, we in the hood still
So, loc, grab a strap 'cause yeah, it's so real, yeah
Deal with the outcome, a strap in the hand
And a bird and ten grand's where a mothafucka stand

If I told you I killed a nigga at sixteen, would you believe me?
Perceive me to be innocent Kendrick you seen in the street
With a basketball and some Now and Laters to eat?
If I mentioned all of my skeletons, would you jump in the seat?
Would you say my intelligence now is great relief?
And it's safe to say that our next generation maybe can sleep
With dreams of bein' a lawyer or doctor
Instead of boy with a chopper that hold the cul-de-sac hostage
Kill 'em all if they gossip
The Children of the Corn, they vandalizin' the option
Of livin' a lie, drown their body with toxins
Constantly drinkin' and drive
Hit the powder, then watch this flame that arrive in his eye
Listen, coward, the concept is aim and then bang it and slide
Out that bitch with deposit, a price on his head, the tithes
Probably go to the projects, I
Live inside the belly of the rough, Compton, USA
Made me an Angel on Angel Dust - what?


m.A.A.d city
Compton


Nigga, pass Dot the bottle, damn!
You ain't the one that got fucked up
What you holdin' it for?
Niggas always actin' unsensitive and shit
Nigga, that ain't no word
Nigga, shut up!
Hey, Dot, you good, my nigga?
Don't even trip
Just lay back and drink that",90478
17219,84101,Sing About Me Im Dying of Thirst,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,3052024,{},"


When the lights shut off and it's my turn
To settle down, my main concern
Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me
I said when the lights shut off and it's my turn
To settle down, my main concern
Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me


I woke up this morning and figured I'd call you
In case I'm not here tomorrow
I'm hopin' that I can borrow
A peace of mind, I'm behind on what's really important
My mind is really distorted
I find nothing but trouble in my life
I'm fortunate you believe in a dream
This orphanage we call a ghetto is quite a routine
And last night was just another distraction
Or a reaction of what we consider madness
I know exactly what happened
You ran outside when you heard my brother cry for help
Held him like a newborn baby and made him feel
Like everything was alright in a fight he tried to put up
But the type of bullet that stuck
Had went against his will, that's blood spilled on your hands
My plan's rather vindictive
Everybody's a victim in my eyes
When I ride it's a murderous rhythm
And outside became pitch black
A demon glued to my back, whispering ""Get 'em!""
I got 'em and I ain't give a fuck
That same mentality I told my brother not to duck
In actuality it's a trip how we trip off of colors
I wonder if I'll ever discover a passion like you and recover
The life that I knew as a youngin
In pajamas and dun-ta-duns
When thunder comes it rains cats and dogs dumb
Niggas like me never prosper
Prognosis of a problem child, I'm proud and well-devoted
This Piru shit been in me forever
So forever I'ma push it, wherever, whenever
And I love you 'cause you love my brother like you did
Just promise me you'll tell this story when you make it big
And if I die before your album drop, I hope- 

Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me
I said when the lights shut off and it's my turn
To settle down, my main concern
Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me


You wrote a song about my sister on your tape
And called it Section.80
The message resembled ""Brenda's Got a Baby""
What's crazy was I was hearin' about it
But doubted your ignorance
How could you ever just put her on blast and shit?
Judgin' her past and shit?
Well, it's completely my future
Her nigga behind me right now askin' for ass and shit
And I'ma need that forty dollars
Even if I got to fuck, suck and swallow
In the parking lot, Gonzales Park, I'm followed
By a married man, and father of three
My titties bounce on the cadence of his tinklin' keys
Matter of fact, he my favorite 'cause he tip me with E's
He got a cousin named David and I seen him last week
This is the life of another girl damaged by the system
These foster homes, I run away and never do miss 'em
See, my hormones just run away and if I can get 'em
Back to where they used to be, then I'll probably be in the denim
Of a family gene that show women how to be woman
Or better yet, a leader, you need her to learn somethin'
Then you probably need to beat her, that's how I was taught
Three niggas in one room, first time I was tossed
And I'm exhausted, but fuck that ""Sorry for your loss"" shit
My sister died in vain, but what point are you tryna gain
If you can't fit the pumps I walk in?
I'll wait... Your rebuttal a little too late
And if you have a album date, just make sure I'm not in the song
'Cause I don't need the attention, bring enough of that on my own
And matter fact, did I mention that I physically feel great?
A doctor's approval is a waste of time, I know I'm straight
I'll probably live longer than you and never fade away
I'll never fade away, I'll never fade away, I know my fate
And I'm on the grind for this cake, I'ma get it or die tryin'
I'm eyein' every male gender with intentions of buyin'
You lyin' to these motherfuckers
Talkin' about you can help 'em with my story
You can help me if you sell this pussy for me, nigga
Don't ignore me, nigga, fuck your glory, nigga, you ain't shit...

When the lights shut off and it's my turn
To settle down, my main concern
Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me
I said when the lights shut off and it's my turn
To settle down, my main concern
Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me


Sometimes I look in the mirror
And ask myself: Am I really scared of passin' away?
If it's today, I hope I hear a
Cry out from Heaven so loud it can water down a demon
With the Holy Ghost 'til it drown in the blood of Jesus
I wrote some raps that made sure that my lifeline reekin'
The scent of a reaper, ensurin' that my allegiance
With the other side may come soon, and if I'm doomed
May the womb of my mother be blessed for many moons
I suffer a lot
And every day that glass mirror get tougher to watch
I tie my stomach in knots
And I'm not sure why I'm infatuated with death
My imagination is surely an aggravation of threats
That can come about, 'cause the tongue is mighty powerful
And I can name a list of your favorites that probably vouch
Maybe 'cause I'm a dreamer and sleep is the cousin of death
Really stuck in the schema of wonderin' when I'ma rest
And you're right, your brother was a brother to me
And your sister's situation was the one that pulled me
In a direction to speak on somethin'
That's realer than the TV screen
By any means, wasn't tryin' to offend or come between
Her personal life, I was like ""It need to be told""
Cursin' the life of twenty generations after her soul
Exactly what'd happen if I ain't continue rappin'
Or steady bein' distracted by money, drugs and 4-5's
I count lives, all on these songs
Look at the weak and cry, pray one day you'll be strong
Fightin' for your rights, even when you're wrong
And hope that at least one of you sing about me when I'm gone
Am I worth it? Did I put enough work in?

Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me
I said when the lights shut off and it's my turn
To settle down, my main concern
Promise that you will sing about me
Promise that you will sing about me


Promise that you'll sing about me forever
Promise that you'll sing about me for- ooooh
Promise that you'll sing about me forever
Promise that you'll sing about me for- ooooh
Promise that you'll sing about me forever
Promise that you'll sing about me for- ooooh
Promise that you'll sing about me forever
Promise that you'll sing about me for- ooooh




(On the phone)
""Ay, ay, ay, where you 'bout to go?""
""Nigga, the homie's brother-nigga, right here, he gone, my nigga, he gone!""
""Hey, come to the store for a nigga, one time.""
""We on the block right now, my nigga, like, we-nigga, we right here, my nigga.""
""Bring a nigga back a black!""
""Nigga-bruh-nigga, they just killed the homie's brother, my nigga. We right here on the block, my nigga... Al-alright, nigga-nigga, just come-alright, alright, just call me back, man, just call me back.""
""Bring a nigga back a black!""
(*Hangs up*)
""Ahh, fuck... So, so, what we gon' do, my niggas? What we gon' do?""
""Bro, we can go back right now, my nigga. Like... nigga, I don't give a fuck, my nigga. We can go back right now.""
""Fuck! I'm tired of this shit! I'm tired of fuckin' runnin', I'm tired of this shit! My brother, homie!""


Tired of runnin', tired of huntin'
My own kind, but retirin' nothin'
Tires are steady screechin', the driver is rubbin'
Hands on the wheel, who said we wasn't
Dyin' of thirst, dyin' of thirst, dyin' of thirst?


Dope on the corner, look at the coroner
Daughter is dead, mother is mournin' her
Stray bullets, AK bullets
Resuscitation was waitin' patiently, but they couldn't
Bring her back, who got the footage?
Channel 9, cameras is lookin'
It's hard to channel your energy when you know he crooked
Banana clip, split his banana pudding
I'm like Tre, that's Cuba Gooding
I know I'm good at
Dyin' of thirst, dyin' of thirst, dyin' of thirst


How many sins? I'm runnin' out
How many sins? I lost count
Dreams of ballin' like Spalding
But only shotty bounce
The reaper callin', I'm cottonmouth
Money is power (Money is power)
Yours is ours (Yours is ours)
Lay with a snitch, die with a coward
Hope we get rich, hope we can tower
Over the city with vanity with the music louder
The same song, a black flower
I'll show you how to
Dye your thirst, dye your thirst, dye your thirst


What are we doin'? Who are we foolin'?
Hell is hot, fire is proven
To burn for eternity, return of the student
That never learned how to live righteous but how to shoot it
Tired of runnin', choirs is hummin'
Tell us to visit, we lie about comin'
Now back to business, loadin' the guns in
Back of the Buick, your hood is feudin'
The beef is bubblin', it's no discussion
Hereditary, all of my cousins
Dyin' of thirst, dyin' of thirst, dyin' of thirst


Too many sins, I'm runnin' out
Somebody send me a well for the drought
See all I know is takin' notes
On takin' this life for granted, granted, if he provoke
My best days, I stress days
(Lord, forgive me for all my sins, for I not know-)
My best days, I stress days
Say ""fuck the world,"" my sex slave
Money, pussy, and greed-what's my next crave?
Whatever it is, know it's my next grave
Tired of runnin', tired of runnin', tired of tumblin'
Tired of runnin', tired of tumblin' - backwards
My momma say ""See, a pastor give me a promise
What if today was the rapture and you completely tarnished?
The truth will set you free, so to me be completely honest
You dyin' of thirst, you dyin' of thirst
So hop in that water, and pray that it works.""


Fuck! I'm tired of this shit!
I'm tired of fuckin' runnin', I'm tired of this shit!
That's my brother, homie!
Young man, come talk to me! Is that what I think that is?
I know that's not what I think that is
Why are you so angry?
See, you young men are dying of thirst
Do you know what that means?
That means you need water, holy water
You need to be baptized, with the spirit of the Lord
Do you want to receive God as your personal savior?
Okay, repeat after me:
""Lord God, I come to You a sinner.""
(Lord God, I come to You a sinner)
""And I humbly repent for my sins.""
(And I humbly repent for my sins)
""I believe that Jesus is Lord.""
(I believe that Jesus is Lord)
""I believe You raised Him from the dead.""
(I believe You raised Him from the dead)
""I would ask that Jesus come into my life.""
(I would ask that Jesus come in my life)
""And be my Lord and Savior.""
(And be my Lord and Savior)
""I receive Jesus to take control of my life.""
(I receive Jesus to take control of my life)
""And that I may live for Him from this day forward.""
(And that I may live for Him from this day forward)
""Thank you, Lord Jesus
For saving me with Your precious blood.""
(Thank you, Lord Jesus
For saving me with Your precious blood)
""In Jesus' name, amen.""
(In Jesus' name, amen)
Alright now, remember this day
The start of a new life - your REAL life",90479
17220,84102,Real,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,1125781,"{""Anna Wise""}","


I do what I wanna do
I say what I wanna say, when I feel, and I
Look in the mirror and know I'm there
With my hands in the air, I'm proud to say yeah
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real


I promise that I know you very well
Your eyes never lie, even if they tell
Sweet lullabies that come with a smell
Of a dozen roses flipping down the green hill
You're living in a world that come with plan B
Cause plan A never relay a guarantee
And plan C never could say just what it was
And your plans only can pan around love
You love him, you love them, you love her
You love so much, you love when love hurts
You love red bottom and gold that say ""Queen""
You love hand-bag on the waist of your jean
You love French tip and trip that pay for
You love bank slip that tell you we paid more
You love a good hand whenever the card dealt
But what love got to do with it when you don't love yourself?

I do what I wanna do
I say what I wanna say, when I feel, and I
Look in the mirror and know I'm there
With my hands in the air, I'm proud to say yeah
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, ('Cause before you know it, everything's gone)


I promise that I know you very well
Your eyes never lie, even if they fell
Out the sky and your optics turn stale
Where they mold that's green, I can see you fit the bill
Of living in a world that come with plan B
Cause plan A only can make another mistake
And you can't see success coming from plan C
When it all breaks, you'll still say you're lovely
And love them and love when you love her
You love so much, you love when love hurts
You love fast cars and dead presidents old
You love fast women, you love keepin' control
Of everything that you love, you love beef
You love streets, you love running, ducking police
You love your hood, might even love it to death
But what love got to do with it when you don't love yourself?

I do what I wanna do
I say what I wanna say, when I feel, and I
Look in the mirror and know I'm there
With my hands in the air, I'm proud to say yeah
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real ('Cause before you know it, everything's gone)


The reason why I know you very well
Cause we have the same eyes, can't you tell?
The days I tried to cover up and conceal
My pride, it only made it harder for me to deal
When living in a world that come with plan B
A scapegoat cause plan A don't come free
And plan C just an excuse like ""because""
Or the word ""but,"" but what if I got love?
I love them, I love when I love her
I love so much, I love when love hurts
I love first verse 'cause you're the girl I attract
I love second verse 'cause you're the homie that pack
Burner like a stove top, that love cooking from scratch
I love what the both of you have to offer
In fact, I love it so much, I don't love anything else
But what love got to do with it when I don't love myself
To the point I should hate everything I do love?
Should I hate living my life inside the club?
Should I hate her for watching me for that reason?
Should I hate him for telling me that I'm seizin'?
Should I hate them for telling me ""ball out""?
Should I hate street credibility I'm talkin' about
Hating all money, power, respect in my will
Or hating the fact none of that shit make me real?

Kenny, I ain't trippin' off them dominoes anymore. Just calling, sorry to hear what happened to your homeboy, but don't learn the hard way like I did, homie. Any nigga can kill a man, that don't make you a real nigga. Real is responsibility. Real is taking care of your motherfucking family. Real is God, nigga


I do what I wanna do
I say what I wanna say, when I feel, and I
Look in the mirror and know I'm there
With my hands in the air, I'm proud to say yeah
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real, I'm really, really, real
I'm real, I'm real (cause before you know it, everything's gone)


Alright, that's all I wanted to tell you. Just make sure you call us back when you get this message. Here go your mom
Boy, you better have my car on full all this time you done had my damn car, but look I ain't trippin'. Look, the neighbors say they seen you and your little friends over there by Food for Less and they was preaching to you over there telling you about the good book because right about now that's what y'all need. Oh, and Top Dawg called the house too. I guess they want you and Dave to come to the studio. But look, you take that music business serious, and put out something me and your dad can step to. Shit, you know we from Chicago, you know that's what we do


Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you
Sing my song, it's all for you


""If I don't hear from you by tomorrow, I hope you come back and learn from your mistakes. Come back a man, tell your story to these black and brown kids in Compton. Let 'em know you was just like them, but you still rose from that dark place of violence, becoming a positive person. But when you do make it, give back with your words of encouragement, and that's the best way to give back. To your city... And I love you Kendrick, if I don't hear you knocking on the door you know where I usually leave the key. Alright? Talk to you later, bye.""

(*Sound of a cassette tape being stopped and fast forwarded*)",90480
17358,84825,White Walls,rap,Macklemore & Ryan Lewis,2013,1175588,"{""ScHoolboy Q"",Hollis}","
I wanna be free
I wanna just live
Inside my Cadillac
That is my shit
Now throw it up (Man throw that up)
That's what it is (That's what it is)
In my C-A-D-I-L-L-A-C, bitch (Biatch!)


Can't see me through my tints (Nuh-uh)
I'm riding real slow (Slow motion)
In my paint, wet, drippin', shinin' like my 24s (Umbrella)
I ain't got 24s (Nuh-uh)
But I'm on those Vogues (Yeah)
That's those big white walls, r-r-round them hundred spokes
Old school like Olde English in that brown paper bag
I'm rollin' in that same whip that my granddad had
Hello, haters, damn y'all mad
30k on the Caddy, now how backpack rap is that?

I got that off-black Cadillac, midnight drive
Got that gas pedal, leaning back, taking my time
I'm rolling that roof off, letting in sky
I shine, the city never looked so bright


Man, I'm loungin'
In some shit Bernie Mac would've been proud of
Lookin' down from heaven like damn that's stylish
Smilin', don't pay attention to the mileage
Can I hit the freeway? Illegally going 120
Easy weavin' in and out of the traffic
They cannot catch me, I'm smashin'
I'm duckin', buckin' them out here
I'm lookin' fuckin' fantastic, I am up in a classic
Now I know what it's like under the city lights
Ridin' into the night, drivin' over the bridge
The same one we'd walk across as kids
Knew I'd have a whip but never one like this
Old school, old school
Candy paint, two-seater
Yeah, I'm from Seattle, there's hella Honda Civics
I couldn't tell you about paint either
But I really wanted a Caddy so I put in the hours
And rolled on over to the dealer
And I found the car I dreamed of, placed a bargain with this geezer
Got the keys in, as I was leavin' I started screamin'

I got that off-black Cadillac, midnight drive
Got that gas pedal, leaning back, taking my time
I'm rolling that roof off, letting in sky
I shine, the city never looked so bright


Yeah, uh
Backwoods and dope
White hoes in the backseat snortin' coke
She doing line after line like she's writing rhymes
I had her inhalin' my love, tryna blow her mind
Cadillac pimpin', my uncle was on
14, I stole his keys, me and my niggas was gone
Stealing portions of his liquor, water in his Patron
Drivin', smilin' like I won the fucking lottery homes
(Fuckin' lottery homes)
Tires with the spokes on it, and the Vogues too
Mustard and mayonnaise, keepin' the buns all on
My dogs hangin' out the window
Young as whoosh, fuckin' like we ball
Tryna fuck 'em all
Never park the whip, see what's poppin' at the mall
Meet a bad bitch, slap her booty with my paw
You can smoke the pussy, I was tearin' down the walls
I'm motherfuckin' awe-
-some, swear these sights tryna hypnotize
Grip the leather steerin' wheel while I grip the thighs
See the lust stuck up in her eyes
Maybe she like the ride or did she like the smoke?
Or does she want it low?
'Cause this shit a Coupe de Ville so you'll never know
So we cruise for minutes, my nigga fuck the limit
Got a window tinted, for sure a gangsta in it
Slide 'til the gas is finished
Q

Off-black Cadillac, midnight drive
Got that gas pedal, leaning back, taking my time
I'm rolling that roof off, letting in sky
I shine, the city never looked so bright
Got that off-black Cadillac, midnight drive
Got that gas pedal, leaning back, taking my time
I'm rolling that roof off, letting in sky
I shine, the city never looked so, looked so bright",91233
17363,84855,Breezeblocks,rock,alt-J,2012,1403504,{​​alt-J},"
She may contain the urge to run away
But hold her down with soggy clothes and breezeblocks
Cetirizine, your fever's gripped me again
Never kisses, all you ever send are fullstops (La la la la)
Do you know where the wild things go?
They go along to take your honey (La la la la)
Break down, now weep, build up breakfast
Now let's eat, my love, my love, love, love (La la la la)


Muscle to muscle and toe to toe
The fear has gripped me, but here I go
My heart sinks as I jump up
Your hand grips hand as my eyes shut
And I, ah-ah-ah-ah


Do you know where the wild things go?
They go along to take your honey (La la la la)
Break down, now sleep, build up breakfast
Now let's eat, my love, my love, love, love (La la la la)
She bruises, coughs, she splutters pistol shots
Hold her down with soggy clothes and breezeblocks
She's morphine, queen of my vaccine
My love, my love, love, love (La la la la)

Muscle to muscle and toe to toe
The fear has gripped me, but here I go
My heart sinks as I jump up
Your hand grips hand as my eyes shut
And I, ah-ah-ah-aha
Aah-ah-ah-ah, Aah-ah-ah-ah-aha-I (Shhhh)


She may contain the urge to run away
But hold her down with soggy clothes and breezeblocks
Germolene, disinfect the scene, my love, my love, love, love
But please don't go, I love you so, my lovely


Please don't go, please don't go
I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, please don't go
I love you so, I love you so
Please break my heart (Hey!)
Please don't go, please don't go
I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, please don't go
I love you so, I love you so
Please break my heart

Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so, I love you so
Please don't go, I'll eat you whole
I love you so, I love you so",91265
17491,85737,Hate Bein Sober,rap,Chief Keef,2012,1000319,"{""50 Cent"",""Wiz Khalifa""}","
Young Chop on the beat
I can't spell sober
I'm a smoker, Fredo a drinker, Tadoe off molly water
Sober, my bitches stay sober
Sober
Damn, I hate bein' sober
I hate bein' sober


Damn, I hate bein' sober, I'm a smoker
Fredo a drinker, Tadoe off molly water
But we can't spell sober
Ballout roll up, when we roll up, bitches be on us
All the hoes, they love smokin' and love drinkin'
Anti-sober for no reason
'Cause we can't spell sober
Ya'll know us, we smoke strong, bruh
Watch me roll up
'Cause I can't spell sober

On my tour bus we get dumb high, you's a floor boy
Fredo got a hangover, he totin' a Cobra
Last night he was shootin' shit up like O-Dog
Reesy rollin', Tadoe got hoes on mollies
Chief Sosa, Ballout, we high ridin' 'Raris
My bitches love drinkin', some love smokin'
Let my alcoholic bitch hit the dutch, she start chokin'
Call up D-Money, now we throw money
All these bitches off the shits walk around like some zombies
Call up D-Money, now we throw money
All these bitches off the shits walk around like some zombies


Damn, I hate bein' sober, I'm a smoker
Fredo a drinker, Tadoe off molly water
But we can't spell sober
Ballout roll up, when we roll up, bitches be on us
All the hoes, they love smokin' and love drinkin'
Anti-sober for no reason
'Cause we can't spell sober
Ya'll know us, we smoke strong, bruh
Watch me roll up
'Cause I can't spell sober


We got a hundred pounds of this shit (Yeah)
My stash house with them bricks (Yeah)
My pockets filled with them stacks (Uh)
My bitch be gone off a flat (Whoo)
She a hot tamale when she pop a molly
It's time to party, we party hard
Drinkin', smokin', drinkin', smokin', drinkin', smokin'
We high for sure
I came in back of that Rolls
Nigga, I ain't stuntin' them hoes (Nah)
I trick a bitch to suck dick, trick
What you spend on her, we spend on clothes
Too young for me, she want Sosa
Shooters in the Range Rover
That's GBE, when them .223's get to flyin', bitch, it's over
See my ring chain and my Rolex when I'm flexin'
Bitch, I got to get mine, nigga get outta line, I check 'em
See this gangsta shit's done to perfection
Nigga, better believe me, I make it look easy

Damn I hate bein' sober, I'm a smoker
Fredo a drinker, Tadoe off molly water
We can't spell sober
Ballout roll up, when we roll up bitches be on us
All the hoes they love smoking and love drinking
Anti-sober, for no reason
'Cause we can't spell sober
Ya know us, we smoke strong bruh
Watch me roll up
'Cause I can't spell sober


My weed so strong, my cheese so long (Cheese so long)
Roll so many joints soon I might need a lung (Might need a lung)
Spend so many grands that I might need some bands (Might need some bands)
That's your bitch, why she acting like she need a man? (Need a man)
I'm faded (Faded), talking mills 'cause I made it (Made it)
Talking pounds 'cause I smoke it (Smoke it)
Talking game 'cause I played it (Played it)
I'm wasted (Wasted), Rose thats my favorite (Favorite)
OG kush, you can taste it (Taste it)
Buying Cris' by the cases (By the cases)
I hate being sober
Don't smell no one smoking
Me and my niggas gon' roll up
Believe they gon' fire on you
You think you could roll up
You smoke by the ounce
Well, bitch, I smoke by the pound 'cause

Damn I hate bein' sober (Hahaha), I'm a smoker
Fredo a drinker (Uh), Tadoe off molly water
We can't spell sober (Sosa, what up nigga?)
Ballout roll up (What up Fredo?) when we roll up bitches be on us
All the hoes they love smoking and love drinking
Anti-sober, for no reason
'Cause we can't spell sober
Ya know us, we smoke strong bruh
Watch me roll up
'Cause I can't spell sober",92297
17532,85894,Love Sosa,rap,Chief Keef,2012,4541062,{},"
Fuckers in school telling me, always in the barber shop
""Chief Keef ain't 'bout this, Chief Keef ain't 'bout that""
My boy a BD on fucking Lamron and them
He, he, they say that nigga don't be putting in no work
Shut the fuck up
Y'all niggas ain't know shit
All y'all motherfuckers talkin' about
""Chief Keef ain't no hitter
Chief Keef ain't this
Chief Keef a fake""
Shut the fuck up
Y'all don't live with that nigga
Y'all know that nigga got caught with a ratchet
Shootin' at the police and shit
Nigga been on probation since fuckin' I don't know when
Motherfucker, stop fuckin' playin' him like that
Them niggas savages out there
If I catch another motherfucker talking sweet about Chief Keef
I'm fucking beatin' they ass
I'm not fucking playin' no more
Y'all know them niggas roll with Lil Reese and them
(Young Chop on the beat)
Love Sosa, bitches love Sosa, huh?
O End or no end, Raris and Rovers, ayy, li'l Cobra, ayy, ayy
Bang, Bang-bang, God, y'all some broke boys, God, y'all some broke boys

These bitches love Sosa, O End or no end
Fuckin' with them O boys, you gon' get fucked over
'Raris and Rovers, these hoes love Chief Sosa
Hit him with that cobra, now that boy slumped over
They do it all for Sosa, you boys ain't making no noise
Y'all know I'm a grown boy, your clique full of broke boys
God, y'all some broke boys, God, y'all some broke boys
We GBE dope boys, we got lots of dough, boy


These bitches love Sosa and they love them Glo Boys
Know we from the 'Go boy, but we cannot go, boy
No, I don't know old boy, I know he's a broke boy
'Raris and Rovers, convertible Lambos, boy
You know I got bands, boy, and it's in my pants, boy
Disrespect them O Boys, you won't speak again, boy
Don't think that I'm playin', boy, no, we don't use hands, boy
No, we don't do friends, boy, collect bands, I'm a landlord
I gets lots of commas, I can fuck your momma
I ain't with the drama, you can meet my llama
Ridin' with 3hunna, with three hundred foreigns
These bitches see Chief Sosa, I swear to God, they honored


These bitches love Sosa, O End or no end
Fuckin' with them O boys, you gon' get fucked over
'Raris and Rovers, these hoes love Chief Sosa
Hit him with that cobra, now that boy slumped over
They do it all for Sosa, you boys ain't making no noise
Y'all know I'm a grown boy, your clique full of broke boys
God, y'all some broke boys, God, y'all some broke boys
We GBE dope boys, we got lots of dough, boy

Don't make me call D. Rose, boy, he six double-O, boy
And he keep that pole, boy, you gon' get fucked over
Bitch, I done sell soda and I done sell coca
She gon' clap for Sosa, he gon' clap for Sosa
They do it for Sosa, them hoes, they do it for Sosa
Tadoe off the molly water, so nigga be cool like water
'Fore you get hit with this lava, bitch, I'm the trending topic
Don't care no price, I'll cop it, B, and your bitch steady jockin' me


These bitches love Sosa, O End or no end
Fuckin' with them O boys, you gon' get fucked over
'Raris and Rovers, these hoes love Chief Sosa
Hit him with that cobra, now that boy slumped over
They do it all for Sosa, you boys ain't making no noise
Y'all know I'm a grown boy, your clique full of broke boys
God, y'all some broke boys, God, y'all some broke boys
We GBE dope boys, we got lots of dough, boy",92464
17573,86218,La Vie En Rose,rb,Louis Armstrong,1950,2268106,{},"


Hold me close and hold me fast
The magic spell you cast
This is ""La vie en rose""
When you kiss me, heaven sighs
And though I close my eyes
I see ""La vie en rose""


When you press me to your heart
I'm in a world apart
A world where roses bloom
And when you speak, angels sing from above
Everyday words seem to turn into love songs
Give your heart and soul to me
And life will always be
""La vie en rose""

",92801
17587,86271,Backseat Freestyle,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,3795482,{},"


Uh, Martin had a dream
Martin had a dream
Kendrick have a dream


All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or die from lead shower
I pray my dick get big as the Eiffel Tower
So I can fuck the world for seventy-two hours


Goddamn I feel amazin', damn, I'm in the Matrix
My mind is livin' on cloud nine and this 9 is never on vacation
Start up that Maserati and - vroom-vroom! - I'm racin'
Poppin' pills in the lobby and I pray they don't find her naked
And I pray you niggas is hatin', shooters go after Judas
Jesus Christ, if I live life on my knees ain't no need to do this
Park it in front of Lueders, next to that Church's Chicken
All you pussies is losers, all my niggas is winners, screamin'-

All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or die from lead shower
I pray my dick get big as the Eiffel Tower
So I can fuck the world for seventy-two hours


Goddamn I got bitches, damn I got bitches
Damn I got bitches: wifey, girlfriend and mistress
All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or die from lead showers


I've got 25 lighters on my dresser, yessir
Put fire to that ass, body cast on a stretcher
And her body got that ass that a ruler couldn't measure
And it make me cum fast, but I never get embarrassed
And I recognize you have what I've been wantin' since that record
That Adina Howard had pop it fast to impress her
She rollin', I'm holdin' my scrotum and posin'
This voice here is golden, so fuck y'all, I goes in, and-


All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or die from lead shower
I pray my dick get big as the Eiffel Tower
So I can fuck the world for seventy-two hours

Goddamn I got bitches, damn I got bitches
Damn I got bitches: wifey, girlfriend and mistress
All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or, nigga, it's go time


I roll in dough with a good grind
And I run at ho with a baton
That's a relay race with a bouquet
They say, ""K, you goin' marry mines.""
Beeotch! No way, beeotch! No way
Beeotch! No way, beeotch! Okay
I'm never livin' life confined
As I feel you even if I'm blind
I can tell you who, what, when, where
How to sell your game right on time
Beeotch! Go play, beeotch! Go play
Beeotch! Go play, beeotch! I look like OJ
Killin' everything from pussy to a mothafuckin' Hit-Boy beat
She pussy poppin' and I got options like an audible, I be
C-O-M-P-T-O-N, I win, then ball at your defeat
C-O-M-P-T-O-N, my city, mobbin' in the street, yellin'-


All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or die from lead shower
I pray my dick get big as the Eiffel Tower
So I can fuck the world for seventy-two hours

Goddamn I got bitches, damn I got bitches
Damn I got bitches, wifey, girlfriend and mistress
All my life I want money and power
Respect my mind or die from lead showers


Let it run, Ali
Martin had a dream
Martin had a dream
Kendrick have a dream",92853
17588,86274,Poetic Justice,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2012,4525392,{Drake},"


Every second, every minute
Man, I swear that she can get it
Say if you a bad bitch, put your hands up high
Hands up high, hands up high
Tell 'em dim the lights down right now
Put me in the mood
I'm talkin' about dark room, perfume, go, go


I recognize your fragrance
Hold up, you ain't never gotta say shit
Uh, and I know your taste is
A little bit, hmm, high maintenance
Uh, everybody else basic
You live life on an everyday basis
With poetic justice, poetic justice
If I told you that a flower bloomed in a dark room
Would you trust it?
I mean, I write poems in these songs dedicated to you when
You're in the mood for empathy, there's blood in my pen
Better yet, where your friends and 'em?
I really wanna know you all
I really wanna show you off
Fuck that, pour up plenty of champagne
Cold nights when you curse this name
You called up your girlfriends
And y'all curled in that little bitty Range
I heard that she wanna go and party, she wanna go and party
Nigga, don't approach her with that Atari
Nigga, that ain't good game, homie, sorry
They say conversation rule a nation, I can tell
But I could never right my wrongs
'Less I write it down for real, P.S

You can get it, you can get it
You can get it, you can get it
And I know just, know just, know just
Know just, know just what you want
Poetic justice, put it in a song, alright
You can get it, you can get it
You can get it, you can get it
And I know just, know just, know just
Know just, know just what you want
Poetic justice, put it in a song, alright


I really hope you play this, 'cause ol' girl, you test my patience
With all these seductive photographs
And all these one-off vacations you've been takin'
Clearly a lot for me to take in, it don't make sense
Young East African girl, you too busy fuckin' with your other man
I was tryna put you on game, put you on a plane
Take you and your momma to the motherland
I could do it, maybe one day
When you figure out you're gonna need someone
When you figure out it's alright here in the city
And you don't run from where we come from
That sound like poetic justice, poetic justice
You were so new to this life, but goddamn, you got adjusted
I mean, I write poems in these songs, dedicated to the fun sex
Your natural hair and your soft skin
And your big ass in that sundress, ooh
Good God, what you doin' that walk for?
When I see that thing move
I just wish we would fight less and we would talk more
They say communication save relations, I can tell
But I can never right my wrongs
Unless I write 'em down for real, P.S

You can get it, you can get it
You can get it, you can get it
And I know just, know just, know just
Know just, know just what you want
Poetic justice, put it in a song, alright
You can get it, you can get it
You can get it, you can get it
And I know just, know just, know just
Know just, know just what you want
Poetic justice, put it in a song, alright


Every time I write these words they become a taboo
Makin' sure my punctuation curve, every letter here's true
Livin' my life in the margin and that metaphor was proof
I'm talkin' poetic justice, poetic justice
If I told you that a flower bloomed in a dark room
Would you trust it? I mean, you need to hear this
Love is not just a verb, it's you lookin' in the mirror
Love is not just a verb, it's you lookin' for it, maybe
Call me crazy, we can both be insane
A fatal attraction is common, and what we have common is pain
I mean, you need to hear this, love is not just a verb
And I can see power steerin', sex drive when you swerve
I want that interference, it's coherent, I can hear it
Uh-huh, that's your heartbeat
It either caught me or it called me, uh-huh
Read slow and you'll find gold mines in these lines
Sincerely, yours truly, and right before you go blind, P.S

You can get it, you can get it
You can get it, you can get it
And I know just, know just, know just
Know just, know just what you want
Poetic justice, put it in a song


""I'm gon' ask you one more time, homie
Where is you from? Or it is a problem.""
""Ayy, you over here for Sherane, homie?""
""Yo, I don't care who this nigga over here for
If he don't tell me where he from, it's a wrap! I'm sorry.""
""Hol' up, hol' up, hol' up, we gon' do it like this, okay?
I'ma tell you where I'm from, okay?
You gon' tell me where you from, okay?
Or where your grandma stay, where your mama stay, or where your daddy stay, okay?""
""Enough with all this talkin'.""
""Matter of fact, get out the van, homie! Get out the car before I snatch you out that motherfucker, homie!""",92856
17658,86657,SpongeBob SquarePants Theme Song,pop,SpongeBob SquarePants,2005,1289363,{},"
Are you ready, kids?
Aye, aye, Captain!
I can't hear you!
Aye, aye, captain!
Oh!


Who lives in a pineapple under the sea?
SpongeBob SquarePants!
Absorbent and yellow and porous is he
SpongeBob SquarePants!
If nautical nonsense be something you wish
SpongeBob SquarePants!
Then drop on the deck and flop like a fish!
SpongeBob SquarePants!


Ready?!
SpongeBob SquarePants!
SpongeBob SquarePants!
SpongeBob SquarePants!
SpongeBob SquarePants!

Ah-hah
Hahaha
Ah-hah, hahahar

",93364
17691,86822,Fuckin Problems,rap,A$AP Rocky,2012,7724360,"{Drake,""Kendrick Lamar"",""A\\$AP Rocky"",""2 Chainz""}","
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
If findin' somebody real is your fuckin' problem (Yeah)
Bring your girls to the crib, maybe we can solve it, ayy


Hold up, bitches simmer down (Uh)
Takin' hella long, bitch, give it to me now (Uh)
Make that thing pop like a semi or a 9
Ooh, baby like it raw with the shimmy shimmy ya, huh?
A$AP (Yeah), get like me (Uh)
Never met a motherfucker fresh like me (Yeah)
All these motherfuckers wanna dress like me (Uh)
But the chrome to your dome make you sweat like Keith
'Cause I'm the nigga, the nigga, nigga, like how you figure? (Yeah)
Gettin' figures and fuckin' bitches, she rollin' Swishers
Brought her bitches, I brought my niggas (Uh)
They gettin' bent up off the liquor (Uh)
She love my licorice, I let her lick it (Alright)
They say money make a nigga act niggerish (Uh)
But least a nigga, nigga rich
I be fuckin' broads like I be fuckin' bored
Turn a dyke bitch out, have her fuckin' boys, beast

(Hahahahaha) I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
If findin' somebody real is your fuckin' problem
Bring your girls to the crib, maybe we can solve it, ayy


Ooh, I know you love it when this beat is on
Make you think about all of the niggas you been leadin' on
Make me think about all of the rappers I've been feedin' on
Got a feelin' that's the same dudes that we speakin' on, oh word?
Ain't heard my album? Who you sleepin' on?
You should print the lyrics out and have a fuckin' read-along
Ain't a fuckin' sing-along 'less you brought the weed along
Then ju-, okay, I got it
Then just drop down and get your eagle on
Or we can stare up at the stars and put the Beatles on
All that shit you talkin' 'bout is not up for discussion
I will pay to make it bigger, I don't pay for no reduction
If it's comin' from a nigga I don't know, then I don't trust it
If you comin' for my head, then ma'fucker get to bustin'
Yes, Lord, I don't really say this often
But this long-dick nigga ain't for the long talkin', I'm beast

I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
If findin' somebody real is your fuckin' problem
Bring your girls to the crib, maybe we can solve it


Uh, yeah, ho, this the finale
My pep talk turn into a pep rally
Say she from the hood but she live inside in the valley, now
Vacay'd in Atlanta, then she goin' back to Cali (Mmm)
Got your girl on my line, world on my line
The irony, I fuck 'em at the same damn time
She eyein' me like a nigga don't exist
Girl, I know you want this dick
Girl, I'm Kendrick Lamar (Mmm)
A.K.A. Benz is to me just a car (Mmm)
That mean your friends-es need be up to par
See, my standards are pampered by threesomes tomorrow (Mmm) Kill 'em all, dead bodies in the hallway
Don't get involved, listen what the crystal ball say
Halle Berry, hallelujah
Holler back, I'll do ya, beast

I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem (Problem)
And yeah, I like to fuck, I got a fuckin' problem (Problem)
If findin' somebody real is your fuckin' problem
Bring your girls to the crib, maybe we can solve it, ayy

",93539
17755,87142,505,rock,Arctic Monkeys,2007,1464384,{},"
I'm going back to 505
If it's a seven-hour flight or a forty-five-minute drive
In my imagination, you're waiting lying on your side
With your hands between your thighs


Stop and wait a sec
When you look at me like that, my darling, what did you expect?
I'd probably still adore you with your hands around my neck
Or I did last time I checked


Not shy of a spark
The knife twists at the thought that I should fall short of the mark
Frightened by the bite, though it's no harsher than the bark
The middle of adventure, such a perfect place to start


I'm going back to 505
If it's a seven-hour flight or a forty-five-minute drive
In my imagination, you're waiting lying on your side
With your hands between your thighs



But I crumble completely when you cry
It seems like once again you've had to greet me with ""Goodbye""
I'm always just about to go and spoil the surprise
Take my hands off of your eyes too soon


I'm going back to 505
If it's a seven-hour flight or a forty-five minute drive
In my imagination, you're waiting lying on your side
With your hands between your thighs and a smile",93916
17775,87233,Crooked Smile,rap,J. Cole,2013,2673176,{TLC},"
Even though I-
On my way, on my way, on my way down
On my way, on my way, on my way down
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round


They tell me I should fix my grill 'cause I got money now
I ain't gon' sit around and front like I ain't thought about it
A perfect smile is more appealing, but it's funny how
My shit is crooked-look at how far I done got without it!
I keep my twisted grill, just to show the kids it's real
We ain't picture perfect, but we worth the picture still
I got smart, I got rich and I got bitches still
And they all look like my eyebrows: thick as hell
Love yourself, girl, or nobody will
Though you a woman I don't know how you deal
With all the pressure to look impressive and go out in heels
I feel for you, killin' yourself to find a man that'll kill for you
You wake up, put makeup on
Stare in the mirror, but it's clear that you can't face what's wrong
No need to fix what God already put his paintbrush on
Your roommate yelling, ""Why you gotta take so long?!""
What it's like to have a crooked smile

Even though I-
On my way, on my way, on my way down
On my way, on my way, on my way down (This crooked smile)
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round (Yeah)


To all the women with the flaws, know it's hard, my darling
You wonder why you're lonely and your man's not calling
You keep falling victim 'cause you're insecure
And when I tell you that you're beautiful you can't be sure
'Cause he don't seem to want you back and it's got you askin'
So all you see is what you lackin', not what you packin'
Take it from a man that loves what you got
And baby girl, you a star, don't let 'em tell you you're not
Now is it real? Eyebrows, fingernails, hair
Is it real? If it's not, girl, you don't care
'Cause what's real is somethin' that the eyes can't see
That the hands can't touch, that them broads can't be
And that's you, never let 'em see your frown
And if you need a friend to pick you up, I'll be around
And we can ride with the windows down, the music loud
I can tell you ain't laughed in a while
But I wanna see that crooked smile

Even though I-
On my way, on my way, on my way down
On my way, on my way, on my way down
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round


We got the crooked smile, we can style on 'em
Back round, crooked smile, we can style on 'em
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round


We don't look nothin' like the people on the screen
You know, the movie stars, picture perfect beauty queens
But we got dreams and we got the right to chase 'em
Look at the nation
That's a crooked smile braces couldn't even straighten
Seem like half the race is either on probation or in jail
Wonder why we inhale, 'cause we in Hell already
I ask: If my skin pale, would I then sell like Eminem or Adele?
But one more time for the 'Ville
And fuck all of that beef shit, nigga, let's make a mil
Hey officer man, we don't want nobody gettin' killed
Just open up that cell, let my brother outta jail
I got money for the bail now, and well now
If you askin' will I tell now-ayy, hell nah
I ain't snitchin' 'cause, man, they get them niggas stitches now
If you was around then you wouldn't need a witness now
How you like this crooked smile?

Even though I-
On my way, on my way, on my way down
On my way, on my way, on my way down (That crooked smile)
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round


We got the crooked smile, we can style on 'em
Back round, crooked smile, we can style on 'em
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round




La la la, la la la, la-la-la-la
La la la, la la la, la-la-la-la
La la la, la la la, la-la-la-la
La la la, la la la, la-la-la-la
On my way, on my way, on my way down
On my way, on my way, on my way down
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round
Back round
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round
Back round
You were the one that was tryna keep me way down
But like the sun, know you know I find my way back round
Round

",93987
17779,87246,Dreams and Nightmares Intro,rap,Meek Mill,2012,2611460,{},"
Ain't this what they've been waitin' for?
You ready? Uh, uh


I used to pray for times like this, to rhyme like this
So I had to grind like that to shine like this
And the matter of time I spent on some locked-up shit
In the back of the paddy wagon, cuffs locked on wrists
Seen my dreams unfold, nightmares come true
It was time to marry the game and I said, ""Yeah, I do""
If you want it you gotta see it with a clear-eyed view
Got a shorty, she tryna bless me like I said achoo
Like a nigga sneezed, nigga please, 'fore them triggers squeeze
I'm gettin' cream, never let them hoes get in between
Of what we started, lil' nigga but I'm lion-hearted
They love me when I was stuck and they hated when I departed
I go and get it regardless, draw it like I'm an artist
No crawlin', went straight to walkin', with foreigns in my garages
All foreign bitches ménagin', fuckin', suckin' and swallowin'
Anything for a dollar, they tell me get 'em, I got 'em
I did it without an album
I did shit with Mariah
Lil' nigga, I'm on fire
Icy as a hockey rink, Philly nigga, I'm flyer
When I bought the Rolls Royce they thought it was leased
Then I bought that new Ferrari, hater, rest in peace
Hater, rest in peace, rest in peace to the parking lot
Phantom so big, can't even fit in the parking spot
You ain't talkin' 'bout my niggas, then what you talkin' 'bout?
Gangstas move in silence, nigga, and I don't talk a lot
I don't say a word, I don't say a word
Was on my grind and now I got what I deserve, fuck nigga!
Maybach Music

Hold up, wait a minute (Minute), y'all thought I was finished? (Whoa)
When I bought that Aston Martin, y'all thought it was rented? (Yeah)
Flexin' on these niggas, I'm like Popeye on his spinach
Double M, yeah that's my team, Rozay the captain, I'm lieutenant
I'm the type to count a million cash then grind like I'm broke
That Lambo' my new bitch, she don't ride like my Ghost
I'm ridin' around my city with my hand strapped on my toast
'Cause these niggas want me dead and I gotta make it back home
'Cause my mama need that bill money, my son need some milk
These niggas tryna take my life, they fuck around, get killed
You fuck around, you fuck around, you fuck around, get smoked
'Cause these Philly niggas I brought with me don't fuck around, no joke, no
All I know is murder, when it come to me
I got young niggas that's rollin', I got niggas throwin' B's
I done did the DOA's, I done did the KOD's
Every time I'm in that bitch, I get to throwin' 30 G's
But now I'm hangin' out that drop head, I'm ridin' down on Collins (Skrrt)
They let my nigga Ern back home, that young nigga be wildin' (Let's go)
We young niggas, we mobbin' (Mobbin'), like Batman and we're robbin' (Whoa)
This two-door Maybach with my seat all reclinin'
I'm like, ""Real nigga, what up? Real nigga, what up?""
If you ain't about that murder game, then pussy nigga, shut up!
If you diss me in your raps I'll get yo' pussy-ass stuck up
When you touchdown in my hood, no that tour life ain't good
Catch me down in MIA at that Heat game on wood
With that Puma life on my feet like that little engine I could
Boy, I slide down on your block (Block), bike on 12 o'clock (Rah)
And they be throwin' deuces on the same nigga they watch (Meek Milly)
And I'm the king of my city 'cause I'm still callin' them shots
And these lames talkin' that bullshit the same niggas that flopped
I'm the same nigga from Berks Street with them nappy braids, that lock
The same nigga that came up and I had to wait for my spot
And these niggas hatin' on me, hoes waitin' on me
Still on that hood shit, my Rolls-Royce on E
They gon' remember me, I say remember me
So much money, have yo' friends turn in yo' enemies
And when there's beef, I turn my enemies to memories
With them bricks they go for 40, ain't no 10 a key
Hold up, broke nigga turned rich (Rich), love the game like Mitch
And if I leave, you think them pretty hoes gon' still suck my dick?
It was somethin' 'bout that Rollie when it first touched my wrist
Had me feelin' like that dope boy when he first touched that brick
I'm gone
Woo!",94014
18005,88643,All Gold Everything,rap,Trinidad James,2012,1977316,{},"
This shit sound like 007 on N64 and shit
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, James


Gold all in my chain, gold all in my ring
Gold all in my watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Nigga, nigga, nigga
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Nigga, nigga, nigga
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Gold all in my chain, gold all in my ring
Gold all in my watch
Don't believe me, just watch


This ain't for no fuck-nigga
If you a real nigga, then fuck with me
This one for the hood niggas
Hipster bitches that shop at Lenox
Dark skinned, light skinned
Asian and white women
Hypebeasts we know aboutchea'
Don't buy shoes unless they popular
For the hoes, my nigga
That's pussy poppin' at Magic City
Got that strong, my nigga
Then come match that shit with me
Smokin' mid, my nigga
Then don't pass that shit to me
This one for my niggas
And bitches 'bout that money (Cash Out)
Gotta love, Chesire Bridge
Them bad hoes at Onyx
I don't fuck with no snitches
So don't tell me who tellin'
This one for them colleges
Them bad hoes at Spelman
Shout out to them freshmen
On Instagram straight flexin'
Popped a molly, I'm sweatin', woo
Popped a molly, I'm sweatin', woo
Mama always told me: ""Boy, count your blessings.""
In God I trust, so I kept counting them Franklins
I'm too fly, you know this
Let me give your ass a checklist
One gold watch, two gold chains
Six gold rings, it's nothin' (Goddamn!)
OG Jordans, them high socks
No shirt on, I'm stuntin' (Okay!)
And this song for them fuck-niggas
Who hating on you this summer (Fuck 'em!)
Talk shit behind your back
But won't say shit in public (Fuck 'em!)

Gold all in my chain, gold all in my ring
Gold all in my watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Nigga, nigga, nigga
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Nigga, nigga, nigga
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Gold all in my chain, gold all in my ring
Gold all in my watch
Don't believe me, just watch",95546
18008,88652,Chum,rap,Earl Sweatshirt,2012,1314041,{},"
Something sinister to it, pendulum swinging slow
A degenerate moving through the city with criminals, stealth
Welcome to enemy turf, harder than immigrants work
""Golf"" is stitched into my shirt
Get up off the pavement, brush the dirt up off my psyche
Psyche, psyche


Can I get that, oh... let me get that beat in my headphones, louder


It's probably been 12 years since my father left
Left me fatherless
And I just used to say I hate him in dishonest jest
When honestly, I miss this nigga, like when I was six
And every time I got the chance to say it, I would swallow it
Sixteen, I'm hollow, intolerant, skip shots
I storm that whole bottle, I'll show you a role model
I'm drunk, pissy, pissing on somebody front lawn
Trying to figure out how and when the fuck I missed moderate
Momma often was offering peace offerings
Think, wheeze, cough, scoffing and he's off again
Searching for a big brother, Tyler was that
And plus he liked how I rap, the blunted mice in the trap
Too black for the white kids, and too white for the blacks
From honor roll to cracking locks up off them bicycle racks
I'm indecisive, I'm scatterbrained, and I'm frightened
It's evident in them eyes, where he hiding all them icicles at

Something sinister to it, pendulum swinging slow
A degenerate moving through the city with criminals, stealth
Welcome to enemy turf, harder than immigrants work
""Golf"" is stitched into my shirt
Get up off the pavement, brush the dirt up off my psyche
Psyche, psyche


Can I get that, oh... let me get that beat in my headphones, louder


Uh... time lapse, bars rotten, heart's bottomless pit
Was mobbin' deep as '96 Havoc and Prodigy did
We were the pottymouth posse, crash the party and dip
With all belongings then toss em out to the audience
Nothing was fucking awesome
Trying to make it from the bottom
His sins feeling as hard as Vince Carter's knee cartilage is
Supreme garment and weed gardeners garnishing spliffs
With Keef particles and entering apartments with 'zine article
Tolerance for boundaries, I know you happy now
Craven and these Complex fuck niggas done track me down
Just to be the guys that did it, like, ""I like attention""
Not the type where niggas trying to get a raise at my expense
Supposed to be grateful, right?
Like, ""Thanks so much,"" you made my life harder
And the ties between my mom and I are strained and tightened
Even more than they were before all of this shit
Been back a week and I already feel like calling it quits

Something sinister to it, pendulum swinging slow
A degenerate moving through the city with criminals, stealth
Welcome to enemy turf, harder than immigrants work
""Golf"" is stitched into my shirt
Get up off the pavement, brush the dirt up off my psyche
Psyche, psyche


Can I get that, oh... let me get that beat in my headphones, louder",95555
18239,90151,Stay,pop,Rihanna,2013,1733986,"{""Mikky Ekko""}","
All along it was a fever
A cold sweat, hot-headed believer
I threw my hands in the air, said, ""Show me something""
He said, ""If you dare, come a little closer""


Round and around and around and around we go
Oh now, tell me now, tell me now, tell me now you know


Not really sure how to feel about it
Something in the way you move
Makes me feel like I can't live without you
And it takes me all the way
I want you to stay


It's not much of a life you're living
It's not just something you take, it's given

Round and around and around and around we go
Oh, now tell me now, tell me now, tell me now you know


Not really sure how to feel about it
Something in the way you move
Makes me feel like I can't live without you
And it takes me all the way
And I want you to stay


Ooh, the reason I hold on
Ooh, 'cause I need this hole gone
Funny you're the broken one
But I'm the only one who needed saving
'Cause when you never see the light
It's hard to know which one of us is caving


Not really sure how to feel about it
Something in the way you move
Makes me feel like I can't live without you
And it takes me all the way
I want you to stay

Stay
I want you to stay
Ooh",97160
18385,90906,Ali Bomaye,rap,The Game,2012,1005651,"{""Rick Ross"",""2 Chainz""}","
Get my people out them chains, nigga
I mean handcuffs, time to man up
Put my hands up? Fuck you sayin', bruh?
'Cause I'm a black man in a Phantom
Or is it 'cause my windows tinted?
Car cost 300 thou' and I blow Indo in it (2 Chainz!)
You mad 'cause your daughter fuck with me on spring break
Well, I'ma fuck her till the springs break


Yeah, roll another one 'cause I'm winnin'
In my four-door, lookin' real photogenic
Gentleman attire, in threads that won't expire
I'm in a class of my own, my teacher got fired
Money gettin' long, pussy rate keep risin'
Versace outfit cost me 3,000
From the P houses, did it from the wee hours
Sellin' that chicken; no lemon pepper, no sweet and sour
First you get the power, then you get respect
I'm gettin' so much money I can buy your bitch
Take it how you wanna, if you wanna take it
I like clubs where all the women workin' naked
Fell in love with a waitress-what the fuck I'm thinkin'?
Bought that ho a ring, it was for her pinky
Uhn, that's pimpin', that's slick
Got a bottle of cologne that cost more than your rent

Fuck y'all mad at me for? Got a black card and a black Phantom
With a white bitch in Idaho, I do the same thing in (Montana)
Got a thick bitch in Atlanta, got a redbone in the Chi
Got two chains, they two-tone, two hundred racks, no lie


Ali Bomaye! Ali Bomaye!
I'm 'bout to rumble in the jungle in these new Kanye's
Ali Bomaye! Ali Bomaye!
My lawyer threw them gloves on and beat another case


Fuck y'all mad at me for, 'cause my belt got two G's on it?
Her bag got two C's on it? My daughter's stroller got D's on it?
Free Big Meech, free Boosie and C-Murder
Like New Orleans, like Baltimore, come to Compton you'll see murders
And my AR see murders, that's beef, nigga; no burgers
I'm insane and you Usain, nigga better turn on them burners
Got coke swimmin' in that glass jar, bitch, go turn on them burners!
Got dope to sell in this hotel, no half price, no retail
You a bitch nigga; no female, I smack niggas; Sprewell
I'm on the block like D12, I got the white; no D-12
Like a little nigga in Africa, I was born totin' that K
And that's real shit, no Will Smith and no Nona Gaye
But they yellin'...

Ali Bomaye! Ali Bomaye!
Thank God that a nigga seen another day
Ali Bomaye! Ali Bomaye!
Got a chopper and a bottle-fuck it, let 'em spray!


I take my case to trial, hire the Dream Team
Robbie Kardashian, Johnnie Cochran; I seen things
I dream big, I think sharp
Inhale smoke, Hawaiian tree bark
Humble yourself, you not a G, keep it one with yourself
Run to niggas for help, favors I keep one on the shelf
I got rifles with lasers, swing it just like the majors
Hit you right above navel
Now you swimmin' in pavement
Gold medals on my neck, I call it Michael Phelps
Hoes settlin' for less, I call 'em bottom shelf
Niggas tough on them blogs and never did nothin' at all
On the road to the riches, bitches not taggin' along


Unless it's ass in a thong, hit that ass and I'm gone
Disrespect my nigga Boss and I'm flashin' the chrome
I'm wavin' the TEC, Tity sprayin' the MAC
Extendos in the back, gonna lap
I got a bitch that look like Laila Ali sittin' in my lap
Got a call from Skateboard, pick 'em up at LAX
Speakin' skateboards, where Tune at? Fuck with him
I'll break a skateboard on a nigga back, 2 Chainz!

Skateboard on a nigga track
No lie, ""No Lie"" already got a plaque
Mama got a house, daughter got accounts
Just to think a nigga like me started with a ounce
Bad bitches and D-boys, we bring 'em out
If them niggas pussy, we douche 'em, we clean 'em out
This the voice of ghetto intelligence. If you got work
Go to work, don't work at your residence


...For presidents
Word to Muhammad, that triple beam is heaven-sent
Ridin' through the jungles in that mothafuckin' elephant
That's a gray Ghost, with the ears on it
Swimmin' through the hood like it got fins on it (Tell 'em!)
You know I got that work on the foreman grill
Weigh the mothafuckas in, made another mil
Got a nigga feelin' like Cassius Clay
Thrilla in Manilla, nigga want it, whip his ass today


Ali Bomaye! Ali Bomaye!
Thank God that a nigga seen another day
Ali Bomaye! Ali Bomaye!
Got a chopper and a bottle-fuck it, let 'em spray!


Ay, nigga guess what I just picked up?
Nigga, talk to yo nigga
Ay, my fuckin' Jesus piece! (Woo)
Ay, ay, ay nigga, nigga look at ya boy! Look at ya boy!
Ay nigga look, look real quick, real quick, look at Jesus eyes doe
Nigga they got diamonds in it! Nigga iced out!
Nigga iced out Jesus face on these bitches nigga
Ay don't ever question my religion i just put 50 stacks on Jesus face out here nigga. You see it, ay ay ay real quick, real quick, look at his headband (Ooh)
Nigga, Nigga look it! Look at ya boy nigga
Ay nigga I put the fuckin' rubies around a nigga fuckin' joint nigga
Yo chill here come Kanye, shut up don't
Let me turn my piece around",97993
18573,91761,A Thousand Years,pop,Christina Perri,2011,1454578,{},"
Heart beats fast
Colors and promises
How to be brave?
How can I love when I'm
Afraid to fall?
But watching you stand alone
All of my doubt
Suddenly goes away somehow


One step closer


I have died every day waiting for you
Darling, don't be afraid
I have loved you for a thousand years
I'll love you for a thousand more


Time stands still
Beauty in all she is
I will be brave
I will not let anything
Take away
What's standing in front of me
Every breath
Every hour has come to this

One step closer


I have died every day waiting for you
Darling, don't be afraid
I have loved you for a thousand years
I'll love you for a thousand more


And all along I believed I would find you
Time has brought your heart to me
I have loved you for a thousand years
I'll love you for a thousand more


One step closer
One step closer


I have died every day waiting for you
Darling, don't be afraid
I have loved you for a thousand years
I'll love you for a thousand more


And all along I believed I would find you
Time has brought your heart to me
I have loved you for a thousand years
I'll love you for a thousand more",98919
19134,95052,Long Live A$AP,rap,A$AP Rocky,2012,1268721,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
I thought I'd probably die in prison, expensive taste in women
Ain't had no pot to piss in, now my kitchen full of dishes
Nose bloody from that sniffin', your heroin addiction
Trigger finger itching, fuck parental supervision
This be that murder business, little Timmy got that semi
I ain't kidding, hide your kittens, hit your childrens with that Smith and
A bunch of ignant little niglets, hardheaded, never listen
Purp-purple sippin', finger twistin', teeth glisten like it's Memphis
A bunch of hypocritic Christians (Uh)
The land of no religion (Uh)
My Santa Claus was missing, catch you slippin' then it's Christmas
Motherfuck a wishlist, my ghetto was ambition
For my Benjis and my Bentley
And them bitches now I gets-gets
On the road to riches, a diamond ring, designer jeans
Choking on that biscuit 'til I'm no longer existing
I wonder if they miss me, as long as I make history
Now my soul is feeling empty, tell the reaper come and get me


Who said you can't live forever lied
Of course, I'm living forever
I'll forever, I'll live long
You can't ever deny my force
I'm living forever
I'll forever, I'll live

Riding through your city like that motherfucker mine
Or toting on that semi, rob a motherfucker blind
License plate says wipe me down, car from 1989
But a nigga sits so pretty call that motherfucker fine
Lost your motherfucking mind, what's on your mind?
Niggas talking down
Never talk to cops
Make him talk to God when I tote that 9, he ain't talking now
Tell 'em watch your spine, I mean watch your back
Better guide your track, better not look back
Now stay in line, don't step on cracks
So you break her back, I'm talking 'bout your mom (Uh)
Cause there's killers in my town (Uh)
Making hits, sniffing lines (Yeah)
Out committing crimes (Yeah)
Wait for shit to simmer down (Uh)
Corrupted little minds (Yeah)
8 and 9, finna shine (Yeah)
On the grind
Do you dirty with that shimmy shimmy ya (Uh)
Where they shoot without a purpose
Services 'n hearses
Kids who ain't deserve it
Can't survive a thing, you're worthless
Strangers make me nervous
Who's that peekin' in my window with a pistol to my curtains?

Who said you can't live forever lied
Of course, I'm living forever
I'll forever, I'll live long
You can't ever deny my force
I'm living forever
I'll forever, I'll live


Pretty nigga rich, Flacko be the shit
And that bitch know we poppin' so she poppin' on this dick
Nigga, RIP to Pimp, can't forget Little Flip
And I take it out to Memphis so shout out to Triple Six


Who said you can't live forever lied
Of course, I'm living forever
I'll forever, I'll live long
You can't ever deny my force
I'm living forever
I'll forever, I'll live",102526
19167,95214,All Too Well,country,Taylor Swift,2012,1171614,{},"
I walked through the door with you, the air was cold
But something 'bout it felt like home somehow
And I left my scarf there at your sister's house
And you've still got it in your drawer, even now


Oh, your sweet disposition and my wide-eyed gaze
We're singing in the car, getting lost upstate
Autumn leaves falling down like pieces into place
And I can picture it after all these days


And I know it's long gone and
That magic's not here no more
And I might be okay, but I'm not fine at all
Oh, oh, oh


'Cause there we are again on that little town street
You almost ran the red 'cause you were lookin' over at me
Wind in my hair, I was there
I remember it all too well

Photo album on the counter, your cheeks were turning red
You used to be a little kid with glasses in a twin-sized bed
And your mother's telling stories 'bout you on the tee-ball team
You taught me 'bout your past, thinking your future was me


And I know it's long gone and
There was nothing else I could do
And I forget about you long enough
To forget why I needed to


'Cause there we are again in the middle of the night
We're dancing 'round the kitchen in the refrigerator light
Down the stairs, I was there
I remember it all too well, yeah


Well maybe we got lost in translation
Maybe I asked for too much
But maybe this thing was a masterpiece
'Til you tore it all up
Running scared, I was there
I remember it all too well
And you call me up again
Just to break me like a promise
So casually cruel in the name of being honest
I'm a crumpled up piece of paper lying here
'Cause I remember it all, all, all
Too well

Time won't fly, it's like I'm paralyzed by it
I'd like to be my old self again, but I'm still trying to find it
After plaid shirt days and nights when you made me your own
Now you mail back my things and I walk home alone
But you keep my old scarf from that very first week
'Cause it reminds you of innocence and it smells like me
You can't get rid of it
'Cause you remember it all too well, yeah


'Cause there we are again when I loved you so
Back before you lost the one real thing you've ever known
It was rare, I was there
I remember it all too well


Wind in my hair, you were there
You remember it all
Down the stairs, you were there
You remember it all
It was rare, I was there
I remember it all too well",102701
19273,95546,My Way,pop,Frank Sinatra,1969,1154002,{},"
And now, the end is near
And so I face the final curtain
My friend, I'll say it clear
I'll state my case, of which I'm certain
I've lived a life that's full
I traveled each and every highway
And more, much more than this
I did it my way


Regrets, I've had a few
But then again, too few to mention
I did what I had to do
And saw it through without exemption
I planned each charted course
Each careful step along the byway
And more, much more than this
I did it my way


Yes, there were times, I'm sure you knew
When I bit off more than I could chew
But through it all, when there was doubt
I ate it up and spit it out
I faced it all, and I stood tall
And did it my way

I've loved, I've laughed and cried
I've had my fill, my share of losing
And now, as tears subside
I find it all so amusing
To think I did all that
And may I say, not in a shy way
Oh, no, oh, no, not me
I did it my way


For what is a man, what has he got?
If not himself, then he has naught
To say the things he truly feels
And not the words of one who kneels
The record shows I took the blows
And did it my way


Yes, it was my way",103066
19316,95678,Zombie,rock,The Cranberries,1994,1754218,{},"
Another head hangs lowly
Child is slowly taken
And the violence caused such silence
Who are we mistaken?


But you see, it's not me, it's not my family
In your head, in your head, they are fightin'
With their tanks and their bombs and their bombs and their guns
In your head, in your head, they are cryin'


In your head, in your head
Zombie, zombie, zombie-ie-ie
What's in your head, in your head?
Zombie, zombie, zombie-ie-ie-ie, oh


Du, du, du, du
Du, du, du, du
Du, du, du, du
Du, du, du, du

Another mother's breakin'
Heart is takin' over
When the violence causes silence
We must be mistaken


It's the same old theme, since 1916
In your head, in your head, they're still fightin'
With their tanks and their bombs and their bombs and their guns
In your head, in your head, they are dyin'


In your head, in your head
Zombie, zombie, zombie-ie-ie
What's in your head, in your head?
Zombie, zombie, zombie-ie-ie-ie, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, eh-eh-oh, ra-ra

",103212
19382,95936,Memories Back Then,rap,T.I.,2013,1538994,"{B.o.B,""Kendrick Lamar"",""Kris Stephens""}","
Ayy, in my apartment a long time ago
I knew a bad bitch, but she was kinda slow
Still gave it up when it's a few of us
She let me finger-fuck her on the school bus
We used to cut school with her and run train
She wanted to hang with us, we wanted one thang
Just penetratin' that throat, dawg
She choked on it like smoke, dawg
But whenever I fucked up my re-up
In a dice game I go see her
She'll give me enough to buy a quarter ounce
And then blow a blunt of that reefer
She used to buy a nigga new sneakers
Pay the bill on my beeper
Just so she can page to put a ""69""
And I know it time to go freak her
Then one day I just asked her
""Why you always give your ass up?
I mean, damn, these hoes get paid
All you do is get laid-this shit don't add up.""
She said, ""Tip, all I wanna do is feel love
Even if I know it ain't real love
Even if I know a nigga only finna hit it
And then never call back, I still fuck.""
And that's fucked up, but she so trill
I need somethin', she go steal
When the trap hot and police ride
Nigga, guess where we go chill?
For 'bout four years she held dope
And my four pounds 'til it go down
I remember shawty, she stayed down
I won't say her name 'cause she married now

When the lights go out
And I'm in my bed
I think of all the madness in my head
All of the things that I did back then
When I'm in my bed
I think of all the memories I've had
All of the things I did back then


She would always turn heads when she'd fall through
She would always make moves how a boss do
And she never gave any nigga time of day
But she the chick all the niggas tried to talk to
But when it came to me, she had a thing for me
When we kicked it she roll up the weed for me
And we'd both cut class post up in the cut steady
Watchin' just to see if the police comin'
We got close over time, her and I
Right around the time that I first got signed
Come to think about it I was 'bout 17
I ain't even have a license, couldn't even drive
I was goin' back and forth with each flight
Another show after show, each night
She became so suspicious of these other bitches
She'd go through my phone and we'd fight
Talk about torn between the two
Wasn't really much more that we could do
Wasn't really much space for us
But she stayed down with every tour she seen me do
But I guess one night I had a few
Huh, one night I had a few
Yeah, this little chick that caught my eye
I told her: ""Hurry up, meet me at the room!""
And no, I didn't have a contraceptive
What my common sense neglected
And two months later, next thing I know
I got a text that said ""I'm pregnant""
And you can almost bet she kept it
And that's the reason why you left me
On top of all that, it wasn't even mine
I went and got paternity tested-damn!

When the lights go out
And I'm in my bed
I think of all the madness in my head
All of the things that I did back then
When I'm in my bed
I think of all the memories I've had
All of the things I did back then


Wait, hol' up, is that you?
With them big ol' thighs after school?
Jay 305 had gave me high five
When I said I'm in hot pursuit
You said, ""I won't ride until Kendrick drive
A new Monte Carlo that cruise""
And that shot my pride, I tried to improv
But no freestyle I never do
You lookin' for the nigga with the tallest 'fetti
You overlookin' every nigga that ain't quite ready
To make it rain on you like I'm about to break a levee
Hol' up, that pussy petty
Yeah, your nails did, your hair did
Your cell phone is selfish
It only got numbers that come with a Hummer
Her new prima donna I smelt it
Tried to make you mine, ho!
Tried to make some time, ho!
But I ain't got the time or the patience
To stop and wait in line, ho!
Her dreams holds Versace
She fall for Armani
Only deal with rich niggas-fuck you and Mick Romney!
I'm grown now, I'm on my own now
I'm po-o-o-oppin'
Change my phone now when I get home now
I got o-o-o-options
Fast forward, wait, is that you?
With them big ol' thighs after school?
And your three kids and three baby daddies
Same car note that's overdue? I know

When the lights go out
And I'm in my bed
I think of all the madness in my head
All of the things that I did back then
When I'm in my bed
I think of all the memories I've had
All of the things I did back then",103467
19395,96012,1Train,rap,A$AP Rocky,2013,2171403,"{Yelawolf,""Big K.R.I.T."",""Kendrick Lamar"",""Danny Brown"",""Action Bronson"",""A\\$AP Rocky"",""Joey Bada\\$\\$""}","


Uh, feelin' like a vigilante or a missionary
Tell my A$AP killers, get they pistols ready
Send 'em to the cemetery with obituaries
Don't be scared, nigga, is you ready?
I've been thinkin' 'bout all the O's in my bank account (What?)
X the hoes in my bed is 'round the same amount (What?)
Ever since this new star fame came about
Or ever since me and Drizzy started hangin' out, huh
Young boy, let his gun bang, let his nuts hang
Transition to a Lamborghini from a Mustang
Drugs slang in the drug game with the hustling
(I know one thing) Anything is better than that 1 Train
Bag made of Goyard, cheffin' like I'm Boyar-
Dee, probably sellin' D in your local courtyard
Braids like I'm O-Dog, my la familia go hard
Down to my inlaws, they outlaws with no laws


We outlawed, then I bogart, any pros that got 'proached at
With a toe-tag, get broke off in the projects with a skateboard
I roll past and I blaze y'all like, ""Doo, doo,"" I hate y'all
When the beef cooked, I ate y'all like, ""Mmm, mmm!""
Let's play ball in a ballpark with all sharks and a blindfold
I rhyme cold, my K hot, your 9 cold, that bark like K9s on
That banana clip, straight from the rip
I'll make that shirt say R.I.P., I'm on some shit
If I'm not the hottest then Hell must have froze over
You thought it was safe then forgot what the code was
I carry traits of a traumatized soldier
Don't look in my face, I might snap, I might choke ya
Spine right out of place, give me dap like you 'posed to
Darts at your posters, dark nights like this
I metamorph like I'm 'posed to, I might slice my wrist
Or pretend like a vulture and drop off this cliff

Barely even conscious, talkin' to my conscience
Gettin' deeper in these flows like conches
I'm on my convict, don't drop bars, I drop prisons
Don't sell rocks, seen the spectrum through the prisms
Somehow bypassed the bias and the -isms
The violence and the killin', so given
They seen my pigment and thought that was the ign'ance
Unfortunately, I am not that type of niglet
But pass the pot, let me skillet
Just got back to the block from a 6 o'clock with Jigga
And I'm thinkin' 'bout signin' to the Roc
But my niggas on the block still assigned to the rocks
And I swear it hurt me soul
I try to prevail but when I preach I only hurt their sales
Like you're only gon' end up either dead or in jail
But you my nigga, wish you the best for real


When you mention my name amongst other white rappers
Or for that matter any fuckin' rapper, fuck it
Painter, skater, musician, trailer park, dirt-ditch-diggin'
Burger-flippin', eat, sleep, shittin' human bein', you would be in
Trouble to body-double or couple me to these others
'Cause comparatively speakin', my reach is beyond the bubble
That they put me in, my vision's beyond the Hubble's
I huddle with Nubians, new beginnin' again
You in school at 10, late, Radioactive's goin' gold
And so? Great! Do I give a flying duck
If I'm applyin' love to my rhymin' plus alignin' us?
Alabama's climbin' up-wait! No, I don't give a
Flying duck nothin' but a buckshot; ch-pow!
Motherfuck your life, pussy blood-clot
Ain't never been no rapper this cold since 2Pac was froze
And thawed out for a spot date at a Coachella show-Yelawolf

Weed a different color like a hoodrat bra and panties
And my flow be overhead like pots and pans in pantries
Antsy 'cause I'm high like Michael Jackson, penny loafers
Moonwalkin' on the sun, barefoot, with shades on
Bitch pussy smell like a penguin
Wouldn't hit that shit with my worst enemy's penis
Bitch, when I say this, I mean this
Ho, I'm the meanest
Dick so big, it's like from Earth to Venus
That molly got me nauseous, aw, shit, no off switch
Lawless, obnoxious, on that ""suck my cock"" shit
That is my synopsis, ostrich's posh shit
Hoes on some goth shit, stop it! You not this!
Novice, regardless, heartless and awkward
Cryin' tears of vodka, prima donna at the concert
Adonis smokin' chronic, 'bout to vomit gin and tonic
Just bein' honest, tell me, isn't that ironic?


Swiftly, I shift the Bimmer 860
A heavy smoker, so you know I brought the Blake with me
The moon's reflection off the lake hit me
You should have stayed with me
Now many Asian bitches lay with me
The face is silky like a tablecloth
My shorty gallop in the mornin' on the beach like a Chilean horse
Red roses dropped from boxes very often
Confetti torchin', drinkin' Henny like I'm Kenny Lofton
Outstandin', I fixed the game between Georgia Southern and Gramblin'
You see us scramblin', sellin' Susan Sarandon
The cloud of smoke like the phantom
Damn, this shit tastes like fantastic, uh
You see me comin' through in each state
Just so the lord could put the fork inside the cheesecake
Cuffed to my wrist, I've got the briefcase
The gavel slam, I'm a free man, try not to eat ham

Big K.R.I.T., shawty
Spit like my last breath: casket rap, six deep
Eyes closed, the black is back, out come the 'lac with flats
After that, bottles I can't pronounce, like, ""How you ask for that?""
Why you ask for crack and all you had was scratch?
All I had was rap, when all they had was wack
All I wanted was love and all they had was dap
Fuck them haters and fuck them hoes, a championship win is
The aftermath, ask LeBron, open palm, slap a bitch
Walk the plank or break a bank, I've been in the business of sinkin' ships
Chokin' niggas out with the anchors that they anchor with
Resuscitations cost the label, I'm taxin' if you want a hit
Clear, fuck your career, bitch, I was born here
Been a killer, '86er nigga, that's my born year
Get the fuck from 'round here, that's just my country ways
Suckin' on your momma's titty, bitchin' while I was choppin' blade
Grippin' grain, fuckin' hoes, candy paint like Everglades
Miss me with that rapper chatter, take that shit up with my bass
I put that on my soul, how could you ever doubt me?
Most rappers hopin' the world end so they won't have to drop another album
B.B. King saw the king in me, so why can't you?
In order to come up close, you'll have to dig up Cash and Elvis, too
(That wasn't no sample, nigga!)
Muddy water flow, Dixie rebel past
Fuck your Louis flag, poppin' benji tags on your wifey's ass (on your wifey's ass)
That's out of line, but in livin' color?
I'm more like Miya Bailey on you rap motherfuckers: a true artist",103554
19419,96136,Wild for the Night,rap,A$AP Rocky,2013,1401920,"{""A\\$AP Rocky"",Skrillex,""Birdy Nam Nam""}","
Wake up feeling blessed up, pistol on that dresser
Ain't afraid to show it, I'll expose it if I dress up
Riding in that Testa...rossa, nigga catch up
Sipping on that syrup, till I'm messed up, like yes sir
So now I'm getting change, people looking at me strange
Like nigga switching lanes, never changed, still the same
We fuck bitches, get paper, you fuck niggas on papers
We walk around with lasers, you prolly own some tasers
Lame niggas disgrace us, they girlfriends want date us
Got different hoes, I'm pimpin' hoes, you could tell by my paystubs
My niggas gettin' right, smokin' weed with dirty Sprite
I'm going wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'


Finna wild out for the weekend, me, myself, and I - my three friends
Nigga feeling froggy, then leap in, A$AP niggas finna sneak in
Middle finger to the critics, me and my nigga Skrillex
You know we finna kill it, A$AP we the trillest
You don't really want that Glock boy
You don't really wanna feel them shots boy
You a b-boy, I'm a block boy, I'm a D boy, I'm a hot boy
Six shots got me feelin' like 'Pac, boy, party all night, shit don't stop, boy
Drunk as fuck, and I'm ready to fight
Wilding for the night, fuck being polite, boy

Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'
Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'
Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'
Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'


It's the weekend and I'm creeping with my niggas
Drunk and disrespectful, callin' women bitches
I don't mean no harm but won't you and your friends-es
Meet us in the cut and we can do the business
God my witness that I only wanna kick it
And your girl just said they with us
So we rolling in them Benzes
Won't you pour it up and stop the babysitting
She got drunk as fuck and swallowed all my kids-es


Back to the Mac, tats on her back
Ass so fat, hit that from the back
When it clap from the back, she clappin' it back
She flat on her back and it's back to the trap
Fuck your pack, A$AP where it's at
Fuck nigga act, get clap lay flat
Fuck your dreams, leave a punk nigga dreamin'
Then you sleep, and you won't come back from the nap
Benjamin Three-Stack, it's a fact, she lives in my lap
On my Ou-Outkast, daddy fat, bitches on my sack
And you know them smokin' bitches rolling reefer got me open
Wildin' to the morning with my homies, tell 'em where we goin'

Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'
Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'
Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'
Wild for the night, fuck being polite, I'm goin'",103700
19428,96156,Fashion Killa,rap,A$AP Rocky,2013,1275266,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a trendy nigga
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a jiggy nigga
Uh, I said


Rocking (Uh), rolling (Uh)
Swagging to the max (Woo)
My bitch a fashion killer, she be busy poppin' tags (Alright)
She got a lot of Prada (Uh)
That Dolce and Gabbana (Uh)
I can't forget Escada (Uh)
And that Balenciaga (Yeah)
I'm sippin' purple syrup (Yeah)
Come be my Aunt Jemima (Right)
And if you is a rider, we'll go shoppin' like mañana (Right)
Her attitude Rihanna (Uh)
She get it from her mama (Yeah)
She jiggy like Madonna, but she trippy like Nirvana (Woo)
'Cause everything designer (Yeah)
Her jeans is Helmut Lang (Uh)
Shoes is Alexander Wang and her shirt the newest Donna
Karan (Yeah)
Wearin' all the Cartier frames
Jean Paul Gaultiers 'cause they match with her persona

Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a trendy nigga
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a jiggy nigga


I said I see your Jil Sanders (Uh)
Oliver Peoples (Yeah)
Costume National, your Ann Demeulemeester (Alright)
See Visvim be the sneaker (Uh)
Lanvin or Balmain (Uh)
Goyard by the trunk (Uh)
Her Isabel Marant (Alright)
I love your Linda Farrow, I adore your Dior (Uh)
Your Damir Doma (Uh)
Vena Cava from the store (Uh)
I crush down with that top down (Yeah)
Bossy see how I ride 'round (Yeah)
Mami in that Tom Ford
Papi in that Thom Browne (Uh)
Rick Owens, Raf Simons, boy, she got it by the stock (Uh)
She ball until she fall, that means she shop until she drop (Uh)
And Versace, got a lot (Uh)
But she may never wear it
But she save it so our babies will be flyer than their parents and...

Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a trendy nigga
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a jiggy nigga
I said her pistol go


Scoop back tees (Uh)
Breeze in coupe (Uh)
Smiling is your treasure, you're so well put together (Yeah, alright)
Bags and links (Uh)
Jeans and shoes (Yeah)
Spikes and patent leathers, different fabrics mixed together
Baby, you and me (Uh)
Me and you (Yeah)
Go away together, we could get away forever (Yeah)
All emotions clashing, thrashing, someone turn the light out
I met my baby expressed my passion on my fashion night out

Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a trendy nigga
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
Her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
I said her pistol go...
(Doot-doot-doot, bang-bang, boom-boom, pop-pop)
'Cause she a fashion killer, and I'm a jiggy nigga
I said her pistol go",103728
19609,97090,Bad,rap,Wale,2013,3656523,"{""Tiara Thomas""}","
Monogamy or whatever you call it
I'm startin' to think it ain't for er'ybody
Most of us is rushin' into it anyways
You know what I'm sayin'?
You ain't rushin' for love, and I ain't up here to judge
Let's neglect the what if's
And make it do what it does, let's get it


Is it bad that I never made love?
No, I never did it
But I sure know how to fuck
I'll be your bad girl, I'll prove it to ya
I can't promise that I'll be good to ya
'Cause I had some issues
I won't commit, no, not havin' it
But at least I can admit
That I'll be bad, no, to you (to you)
Yeah, I'll be good in bed
But I'll be bad to you
Bad that I never made love
No, I never did it
But I sure know how to fuck
(Let's get it!)

Bad girls ain't no good, and the good girls ain't no fun
And the hood girls want a smart nigga
College girls all want a thug
So it seems that we fiend what we don't need
Got a thing for a queen who know when to leave
I ain't 'bout to judge you, don't judge me
You ain't gotta really sing about your rap sheet
'Cause I heard you (bad, nooo)
In the literal sense I mean that
Rough sex, sayin' I love ya
But to kiss them is sayin' you mean that (bad, nooo)
I know, I just be callin' her mean-ass
Oh the irony, got the bomb indeed
But the problem is probably a deep past
Still I'm feelin' of somethin' I need bad
Thinkin' if I get her, I get her to need this
I don't need emotions to open your deep sea
I conceive an ocean by goin' between legs
Beg? Nope-bed, floor, dope; go for it, couch now
Slow motion around, put it down
Lord knows she was gone 'fore the morn', hold up


Is it bad that I never made love?
No, I never did it
But I sure know how to fuck
I'll be your bad girl, I'll prove it to ya
I can't promise that I'll be good to ya
'Cause I had some issues
I won't commit, no, not havin' it
But at least I can admit
That I'll be bad, no, to you (to you)
Yeah, I'll be good in bed
But I'll be bad to you
(Yeah, let me tell you 'bout her, look!)

She hurt feelings, she break hearts
She stay quiet, she play smart
She take pride in goin' out
And gettin' hollered at and sayin' nah
She no saint, but she don't pose
She don't wear make-up by the boatload
Ridin' through lake shore with the nose up
She don't really date much, but it slows her up
She got haters, but we all do
Heard you're winter-time cold, shawty, fall through
Baby, look at they approach, how they court you
All those minds games, nevermind, 'cause they all lose
(Bad, nooo) In the physical sense I mean that
I ain't tryna kiss up, suck up, feed gas
I ain't like them nigga you suckin' your teeth at, nope
Play big, trust me I'll humble yo' mean-ass
Look, shawty is actually in prevent
'Cause the one in front of her is workin' with deep threat
Yep-bed, floor, couch, more
More, shower, Lord, perm, done
Love? Nah, called in the morn'
Cell number wasn't on, goddamn!


Is it bad that I never made love?
No, I never did it
But I sure know how to fuck
I'll be your bad girl, I'll prove it to ya
I can't promise that I'll be good to ya
'Cause I had some issues
I won't commit, no, not havin' it
But at least I can admit
That I'll be bad, no, to you (to you)
Yeah, I'll be good in bed
But I'll be bad to you
Bad that I never made love
No, I never did it
But I sure know how to fuck
",104766
19653,97358,I Want It That Way,pop,Backstreet Boys,1999,1066233,{},"
Yeah-eh-eh


You are my fire
The one desire
Believe when I say
I want it that way
But we are two worlds apart
Can't reach to your heart
When you say
That I want it that way


Tell me why
Ain't nothing but a heartache
Tell me why
Ain't nothing but a mistake
Tell me why
I never wanna hear you say
I want it that way

Am I your fire?
Your one desire
Yes, I know it's too late
But I want it that way


Tell me why
Ain't nothing but a heartache
Tell me why
Ain't nothing but a mistake
Tell me why
I never wanna hear you say
I want it that way


Now I can see that we're falling apart
From the way that it used to be, yeah
No matter the distance
I want you to know
That deep down inside of me


You are my fire
The one desire
You are (You are, you are, you are)

Don't wanna hear you say
Ain't nothin' but a heartache
Ain't nothin' but a mistake
(Don't wanna hear you say)
I never wanna hear you say (Oh, yeah)
I want it that way


Tell me why
Ain't nothing but a heartache
Tell me why
Ain't nothing but a mistake
Tell me why
I never wanna hear you say (Don't wanna hear you say)
I want it that way
Tell me why
Ain't nothin' but a heartache
Ain't nothin' but a mistake
Tell me why
I never wanna hear you say (Never wanna hear you say, yeah)
I want it that way


'Cause I want it that way",105083
19730,97942,Love Me,rap,Lil Wayne,2013,3036026,"{Drake,Future}","
I'm on that good kush and alcohol (Mike WiLL Made-It)
I got some down bitches I can call (What's hatnin'?)
I don't know what I would do without y'all
I'ma ball 'til the day I fall (I'ma ball, ball, ball)


Yeah, long as my bitches love me (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
I can give a fuck 'bout no hater
Long as my bitches love me (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
Yeah, I can give a fuck 'bout no nigga
Long as these bitches love me


Uh, pussy-ass nigga, stop hatin'
Lil Tunechi got that fire
And these hoes love me like Satan, man
Yeah, fuck with me and get bodied
And all she eat is dick
She's on a strict diet, that's my baby
With no makeup, she a ten
And she the best with that head
Even better than Karrine
She don't want money
She want the time that we could spend
She said, ""'Cause I really need somebody
So tell me you're that somebody""
Girl, I fuck who I want, and fuck who I don't
Got that A1 credit, that's that filet mignon
She said, ""I never want to make you mad
I just want to make you proud""
I said, ""Baby, just make me cum
Then don't make a sound""
Slick Tunechi

I'm on that good kush and alcohol (Yeah)
I got some down bitches I can call (What's hatnin'?)
I don't know what I would do without y'all
I'ma ball 'til the day I fall (I'ma ball, ball, ball)


Yeah, long as my bitches love me (My bitches love me) (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
I can give a fuck 'bout no hater
Long as my bitches love me (My bitches love me, my bitches love me, my bitches love me) (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
Yeah, I can give a fuck 'bout no nigga
Long as these bitches love me


Uh, real nigga, fuck these haters
These hoes got pussies like craters
Can't treat these hoes like ladies, man
Pussy, money, weed, codeine
She said my dick feel like morphine
I hope my name taste like sardines to these niggas
She wake up, eat this dick
Call that breakfast in bed, 69, 96
I feel her heartbeat, I chest-to-chest with this bitch
Now turn around, face down; I'm arrestin' this bitch
Yeah, all my bitches love me, and I love all my bitches
But it's like as soon as I cum, I come to my senses
And I would say these hoes' names
But then I would be snitchin'
And these haters try to knock me
But they can't knock me off the hinges
Lil Tunechi

I'm on that good kush and alcohol (Yeah)
I got some down bitches I can call (What's hatnin'?)
I don't know what I would do without y'all (I don't know what I would do without y'all)
I'ma ball 'til the day I fall (I'ma ball, ball, ball) (I'ma ball)


Yeah, long as my bitches love me (My bitches love me) (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
I can give a fuck 'bout no hater
Long as my bitches love me (My bitches love me, my bitches love me, my bitches love me) (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
Yeah, I can give a fuck 'bout


I lost a few good bitches, met some more bad bitches
And I be schooling them niggas, pose for your class picture
Now kiss my ass if you hatin', I'm getting ass, or I'm skatin'
I lost a few good bitches, met some more bad bitches
And I be schooling them niggas, pose for your class picture
Now kiss my ass if you hatin', I'm getting ass, or I'm skatin'
Bitch


I'm on that good kush and alcohol (Tunech)
I got some down bitches I can call (What's hatnin'?)
I don't know what I would do without y'all (I don't know what I would do without y'all)
I'ma ball 'til the day I fall (I'ma ball, ball, ball) (I'ma ball)

Yeah, long as my bitches love me (My bitches love) (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
I can give a fuck 'bout no hater
Long as my bitches love me (My bitches love me, my bitches love me, my bitches love me) (Yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah; yeah, yeah)
Yeah, I can give a fuck 'bout no nigga (Yeah)
Long as these bitches love me",105686
19775,98124,Africa,rock,Toto,1982,1566001,{},"
I hear the drums echoing tonight
But she hears only whispers of some quiet conversation
She's coming in, 12:30 flight
Her moonlit wings reflect the stars that guide me towards salvation
I stopped an old man along the way
Hoping to find some old forgotten words or ancient melodies
He turned to me as if to say
""Hurry, boy, it's waiting there for you""


It's gonna take the lot to drag me away from you
There's nothing that a hundred men or more could ever do
I bless the rains down in Africa
Gonna take some time to do the things we never had


The wild dogs cry out in the night
As they grow restless longing for some solitary company
I know that I must do what's right
As sure as Kilimanjaro rises like Olympus above the Serengeti
I seek to cure what's deep inside
Frightened of this thing that I've become

It's gonna take the lot to drag me away from you
There's nothing that a hundred men or more could ever do
I bless the rains down in Africa
Gonna take some time to do the things we never had


Hurry, boy, she's waiting there for you


It's gonna take the lot to drag me away from you
There's nothing that a hundred men or more could ever do
I bless the rains down in Africa
I bless the rains down in Africa
I bless the rains down in Africa
I bless the rains down in Africa
I bless the rains down in Africa
Gonna take some time to do the things we never had",105876
19863,98532,Dont Look Back in Anger,rock,Oasis,1996,1083325,{},"
Slip inside the eye of your mind
Don't you know you might find
A better place to play?
You said that you'd never been
But all the things that you've seen
Slowly fade away


So I start a revolution from my bed
'Cause you said the brains I had went to my head
Step outside, summertime's in bloom
Stand up beside the fireplace
Take that look from off your face
You ain't ever gonna burn my heart out


And so, Sally can wait
She knows it's too late as we're walking on by
Her soul slides away
But don't look back in anger, I heard you say

Take me to the place where you go
Where nobody knows if it's night or day
Please don't put your life in the hands
Of a rock 'n' roll band
Who'll throw it all away


I'm gonna start a revolution from my bed
'Cause you said the brains I had went to my head
Step outside, 'cause summertime's in bloom
Stand up beside the fireplace
Take that look from off your face
'Cause you ain't ever gonna burn my heart out


And so, Sally can wait
She knows it's too late as she's walking on by
My soul slides away
But don't look back in anger, I heard you say




So, Sally can wait
She knows it's too late as we're walking on by
Her soul slides away
But don't look back in anger, I heard you say

So, Sally can wait
She knows it's too late as she's walking on by
My soul slides away
But don't look back in anger, don't look back in anger
I heard you say
At least not today",106380
19883,98680,Rich As Fuck,rap,Lil Wayne,2013,1374114,"{""2 Chainz""}","
Ugh, AK on my nightstand, right next to that Bible
But I swear, with these fifty shots, I'll shoot it out with Five-O
Pockets gettin' too fat, no Weight Watchers, no lipo
Money talks, bullshit walks on a motherfucking tightrope
And I make that pussy tap out, I knock that pussy out cold
Nigga, you get beat the crap out, but that's just how the dice roll
These hoes want that hose-pipe, so I give all these hoes pipe
She get on that dick and stay on, all night, like porch lights
Let's do it, fuck talking, we out here, we ballin'
And I'm spraying at these rusty niggas like WD-40
We fucked up, we Truk'd up; no if, ands, or butt-fucks
Bitch niggas go behind your back like nunchucks, and that's fucked up
But my hoes down, my cups up, my niggas down for whatever
These bitches think they're too fly, well, tell them hoes I pluck feathers
I'm Tunechi, Young Tunechi, I wear Trukfit, fuck Gucci
She blowing kisses at me with her pussy lips, smooches
And that's 2 Chainz


Look at you (Aw), now look at us
All my niggas look rich as fuck (Yeah)
All my niggas live rich as fuck (Yeah)
All-All my niggas look rich as fuck (Yeah)
Look at you (Look at you), now look at us (Now look at us)
All my niggas look rich as fuck (Bitch)
All my-All my niggas live rich as fuck (You hoe-ass bi-)
All my-All-All my ni-

Ugh, never talk to the cops, I don't speak Pig Latin
I turned a penny to a motherfuckin Janet Jackson
Tell the bitches that be hatin' I ain't got no worries
I just want to hit and run like I ain't got insurance, ho
What's your name? What's your sign? Zodiac Killer
All rats gotta die, even Master Splinter
Yeah, murder, one-eighty-seven
I be killing them bitches, I hope all dogs go to heaven
And I got Xanax, Percocet, promethazine with codeine
Call me Mr. Sandman, I'm sellin' all these hoes dreams
Got a white girl with big titties, flat-ass, TV screen
I keep a bad bitch, call me ""The B.B. King""
And you know I got that mouth out her
Then put that bitch out like a house fire
I'm killing these hoes like Michael Myers
I eat that cat just like a lion
And I can't trust none of these niggas
Can't trust none of these hoes
And I see your girl when I want
I got that ho TiVo'd, ugh
Got a red-ass bitch with a red-ass pussy
Nigga try me, that's a dead-ass pussy
Since y'all motherfuckers so blind to the fact
To tell you the truth, I don't care who's lookin'
All I know is I love my bitch
And pussy feel just like Heaven on Earth
Six feet deep, dick shovelin' the dirt
RIP: Rest In Pussy
Light that shit, then pass that shit, we gon' get so smoked out
And then I went, got locked up; every night, I dreamt I broke out
One time for them pussy niggas-that's that shit I don't like
We eatin' over here, nigga-fuck around and have a food fight
And that's 2 Chainz

Look at you (Uh), now look at us (Yeah)
All my niggas look rich as fuck (What?)
All my niggas live rich as fuck (What?)
All-all my niggas look rich as fuck (Yeah)
Look at you, now look at us (Get the fuck out y'all bitches, straight up)
All my niggas look rich as fuck (Any bitch who don't wanna give me no pussy)
All my-all my niggas live rich as fuck (Fuck you in your asshole, bitch)
All my-all-all my niggas look rich as fuck


And your nigga a hoe",106551
20285,100980,Nothing Else Matters,rock,Metallica,1991,1071853,{},"


So close, no matter how far
Couldn't be much more from the heart
Forever trusting who we are
And nothing else matters


Never opened myself this way
Life is ours, we live it our way
All these words I don't just say
And nothing else matters


Trust I seek and I find in you
Everyday, for us, something new
Open mind for a different view
And nothing else matters


Never cared for what they do
Never cared for what they know
But I know

So close, no matter how far
It couldn't be much more from the heart
Forever trusting who we are
And nothing else matters


Never cared for what they do
Never cared for what they know
But I know




I never opened myself this way
Life is ours, we live it our way
All these words I don't just say
And nothing else matters


Trust I seek and I find in you
Everyday, for us, something new
Open mind for a different view
And nothing else matters


Never cared for what they say
Never cared for games they play

Never cared for what they do
Never cared for what they know
And I know, yeah-yeah!




So close, no matter how far
Couldn't be much more from the heart
Forever trusting who we are
No, nothing else matters

",108832
20305,101269,Creep,rock,Radiohead,1992,1869297,{},"
When you were here before
Couldn't look you in the eye
You're just like an angel
Your skin makes me cry
You float like a feather
In a beautiful world
I wish I was special
You're so fuckin' special


But I'm a creep
I'm a weirdo
What the hell am I doing here?
I don't belong here


I don't care if it hurts
I wanna have control
I want a perfect body
I want a perfect soul
I want you to notice
When I'm not around
You're so fuckin' special
I wish I was special

But I'm a creep
I'm a weirdo
What the hell am I doing here?
I don't belong here
Oh, oh


She's running out the door
She's running out
She run, run, run, run
Run


Whatever makes you happy
Whatever you want
You're so fuckin' special
I wish I was special
But I'm a creep
I'm a weirdo
What the hell am I doing here?
I don't belong here
I don't belong here",109096
20320,101368,Sweater Weather,rock,The Neighbourhood,2012,1785724,{},"
And all I am is a man
I want the world in my hands
I hate the beach but I stand
In California with my toes in the sand
Use the sleeves of my sweater
Let's have an adventure
Head in the clouds but my gravity's centered
Touch my neck and I'll touch yours
You in those little high waisted shorts, oh


She knows what I think about
And what I think about
One love, two mouths
One love, one house
No shirt, no blouse
Just us, you find out
Nothing that I wouldn't wanna tell you about, no


'Cause it's too cold for you here
And now, so let me hold
Both your hands in the holes of my sweater

And if I may just take your breath away
I don't mind if there's not much to say
Sometimes the silence guides a mind
To move to a place so far away
The goosebumps start to raise
The minute that my left hand meets your waist
And then I watch your face
Put my finger on your tongue
'Cause you love the taste, yeah
These hearts adore
Everyone the other beats hardest for
Inside this place is warm
Outside it starts to pour


Comin' down
One love, two mouths
One love, one house
No shirt, no blouse
Just us, you find out
Nothing that I wouldn't wanna tell you about
No, no, no


'Cause it's too cold for you here
And now, so let me hold
Both your hands in the holes of my sweater
'Cause it's too cold for you here
And now, so let me hold
Both your hands in the holes of my sweater, woah

Woah, woah, woah
Woah, woah, woah, woah
Woah, woah
Woah, woah, woah, woah
Woah, woah


'Cause it's too cold for you here
And now, so let me hold
Both your hands in the holes of my sweater
'Cause it's too cold for you here
Now, let me hold
Both your hands in the holes of my sweater


And it's too cold, it's too cold
The holes of my sweater",109177
20327,101400,Demons,rock,Imagine Dragons,2012,1309887,{},"
When the days are cold and the cards all fold
And the saints we see are all made of gold
When your dreams all fail and the ones we hail
Are the worst of all, and the blood's run stale


I wanna hide the truth, I wanna shelter you
But with the beast inside, there's nowhere we can hide
No matter what we breed, we still are made of greed
This is my kingdom come, this is my kingdom come


When you feel my heat, look into my eyes
It's where my demons hide, it's where my demons hide
Don't get too close; it's dark inside
It's where my demons hide, it's where my demons hide


At the curtain's call it's the last of all
When the lights fade out, all the sinners crawl
So they dug your grave and the masquerade
Will come calling out at the mess you've made

Don't wanna let you down, but I am hell-bound
Though this is all for you, don't wanna hide the truth
No matter what we breed, we still are made of greed
This is my kingdom come, this is my kingdom come


When you feel my heat, look into my eyes
It's where my demons hide, it's where my demons hide
Don't get too close; it's dark inside
It's where my demons hide, it's where my demons hide


They say it's what you make, I say it's up to fate
It's woven in my soul, I need to let you go
Your eyes, they shine so bright, I wanna save that light
I can't escape this now, unless you show me how


When you feel my heat, look into my eyes
It's where my demons hide, it's where my demons hide
Don't get too close; it's dark inside
It's where my demons hide, it's where my demons hide",109206
20337,101487,Suit  Tie,pop,Justin Timberlake,2013,1079458,{JAY-Z},"
Ooh-oh
I be on my suit and tie, shit tied, shit tied
I be on my suit and tie, shit tied, shit
Can I show you a few things?
A few things, a few things, little baby
'Cause I be on my suit and tie, shit tied, shit
I be on my suit and tie, shit tied, shit
Let me show you a few things
Let me show you a few things
Wait a minute
You ready, JT?


I can't wait 'til I get you on the floor, good-lookin'
Going hot, so hot, just like an oven
And ow! Burned myself, but just had to touch it
And it's so fine, and it's all mine
Hey, baby, we don't mind all the watchin' (High)
'Cause if they study close, real close
They might learn somethin'
She ain't nothin' but a little doozy when she does it
She's so fire tonight

And as long as I've got my suit and tie
I'ma leave it all on the floor tonight
And you got fixed up to the nines
Let me show you a few things (Show you a few things)
All pressed up in black and white
And you're dressed in that dress I like
Love is swinging in the air tonight
Let me show you a few things (Show you a few things)
Let me show you a few things
Show you a few things about love
Now we're in the swing of love
Let me show you a few things
Show you a few things
Show you a few things about love, hey


Stop, let me get a good look at it
So thick, now I know why they call it a fatty
And ow!
Shit so sick got a hit and picked up a habit
That's alright, 'cause you're all mine (You're all mine)
Go on and show 'em who you call daddy
I guess they're just mad
'Cause, girl, they wish they had it
My killer, my Thriller, yeah, you're a classic
And you're all mine, tonight

And as long as I've got my suit and tie
I'ma leave it all on the floor tonight
And you got fixed up to the nines
Let me show you a few things
All pressed up in black and white
And you're dressed in that dress I like
Love is swinging in the air tonight
Let me show you a few things
Let me show you a few things
Show you a few things about love
Now we're in the swing of love
Let me show you a few things
Show you a few things about love, hey


Get out your seat, Hov!


Uh!
All black at the white shows
White shoes at the black shows
Green card for the Cuban links
Y'all sit back and enjoy the light show
Nothing exceeds like excess
Stoute got gout from having the best of the best
Is this what it's all about? I'm at the rest-
-aurant with my rant disturbing the guests
Years of distress, tears on the dress
Try to hide her face with some makeup sex
Uh!
This is truffle season
Tom Ford tuxedos for no reason
All Saints for my angel, Alexander Wang too
Ass-tight denim and some Dunks
I'll show you how to do this young, uh!
No papers, catch vapors
Get high, out Vegas
D'USSÉ's on doubles, ain't looking for trouble
You just got good genes so a nigga tryna cuff you
Tell your mother that I love her 'cause I love you
Tell your father we go farther as a couple
They ain't lose a daughter, got a son
I show you how to do this, huh! Uh

And as long as I've got my suit and tie
I'ma leave it all on the floor tonight
And you got fixed up to the nines
Let me show you a few things (Show you a few things)
All pressed up in black and white
And you're dressed in that dress I like
Love is swinging in the air tonight
Let me show you a few things (Show you a few things)
Let me show you a few things (A few things)
Show you a few things about love, love, love
Let me show you a few things (A few things)
Show you a few things about love, hey
Oh!

",109287
20445,102264,Bugatti,rap,Ace Hood,2013,1370133,"{""Rick Ross"",Future}","
We the motherfuckin best, nigga
Ace Hood
Super, Future


I come looking for you with Haitians
I stay smoking on good Jamaican
I fuck bitches from different races
You get money they started hating (Turn up!)
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti


Okay, niggas be hatin I'm rich as a bitch
100K I spent that on my wrist
200 dollars, I spent that on your bitch
Do me a model, put that on my list
Oh there he go in that foreign again
Killin the scene bring the coroner in
Murder she wrote, swallow or choke
Hit her and go home, I won't call her again
Woke up early morning, crib as big as a college
Smoke me a pound of the loudest
Whippin some shit with no mileage
Diamonds cost me a fortune
Them horses all in them Porsches
You pussies can't hardly afford it
4,200 my mortgage
Ballin on niggas like Kobe
Fuck all you haters you bore me
Only the real get a piece of the plate
Reppin my city I'm runnin my state
Give me a pistol then run with the K's
Niggas want beef then I visit ya place (Bang!)

I come looking for you with Haitians
I stay smoking on good Jamaican
I fuck bitches from different races
You get money they started hating (Turn up!)
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti


Yeah, and I'm at it again
There go that flow bringin tragedy in
Copped me a chain your salary spent
Niggas is sweet bring them cavities in
Countin money, hourly trend
Rolling them skinny like Olsen twins
Niggas is squares, coppin' a Benz
Neck full of Gold Olympian shit
Neimans, I'm blowing the check on they gear
Fall on some pussy then hop on the Lear
Strapped with them choppers back of the rear
Sak pase' them killers is here
Woke up early this morning, mind is tellin me money
Paper, mula, pockets is fat as a tumor
Millionaire nigga no rumor
Livin my life off of tuna
Wanted with me I deliver the beef
Real niggas only enjoyin the feast
Pull up a seat, bon appétit
No Louboutins put that red on your sneaks (Bang!)

I come looking for you with Haitians
I stay smoking on good Jamaican
I fuck bitches from different races
You get money they started hating (Turn up!)
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti


Mastermind, nigga
Photographs of dope boys, is all they taking
Finger prints on the Rolls Royce, is why they hatin'
Push a button on these broke boys, that's detonation
Walk a road to riches bare feet
I watch mama struggle now she livin' carefree
That's why I hustle for half a key that's 12 G's
I'm tryin' to bubble every summer a new LP
You gotta love me I got shooters out the D-League
Signin' bonus hit that man that's from thirty feet
Left in a puddle, finger prints is on hundred mill
And what it is?
Ricky Rozay and Ace Hood, we hella Trill
Yeah

I come looking for you with Haitians
I stay smoking on good Jamaican
I fuck bitches from different races
You get money they started hating (Turn up!)
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti
I woke up in a new Bugatti",110064
20803,104249,The Great Gatsby Chapter I,misc,F. Scott Fitzgerald,1925,1067486,{},"Then wear the gold hat, if that will move her;
If you can bounce high, bounce for her too,
Till she cry ""Lover, gold-hatted, high-bouncing lover,
I must have you!""
- Thomas Parke D'Invilliers.

In my younger and more vulnerable years my father gave me some advice that I've been turning over in my mind ever since.

""Whenever you feel like criticizing any one,"" he told me, ""just remember that all the people in this world haven't had the advantages that you've had.""

He didn't say any more, but we've always been unusually communicative in a reserved way, and I understood that he meant a great deal more than that. In consequence, I'm inclined to reserve all judgments, a habit that has opened up many curious natures to me and also made me the victim of not a few veteran bores. The abnormal mind is quick to detect and attach itself to this quality when it appears in a normal person, and so it came about that in college I was unjustly accused of being a politician, because I was privy to the secret griefs of wild, unknown men. Most of the confidences were unsought - frequently I have feigned sleep, preoccupation, or a hostile levity when I realized by some unmistakable sign that an intimate revelation was quivering on the horizon; for the intimate revelations of young men, or at least the terms in which they express them, are usually plagiaristic and marred by obvious suppressions. Reserving judgments is a matter of infinite hope. I am still a little afraid of missing something if I forget that, as my father snobbishly suggested, and I snobbishly repeat, a sense of the fundamental decencies is parcelled out unequally at birth.

And, after boasting this way of my tolerance, I come to the admission that it has a limit. Conduct may be founded on the hard rock or the wet marshes, but after a certain point I don't care what it's founded on. When I came back from the East last autumn I felt that I wanted the world to be in uniform and at a sort of moral attention forever; I wanted no more riotous excursions with privileged glimpses into the human heart. Only Gatsby, the man who gives his name to this book, was exempt from my reaction - Gatsby, who represented everything for which I have an unaffected scorn. If personality is an unbroken series of successful gestures, then there was something gorgeous about him, some heightened sensitivity to the promises of life, as if he were related to one of those intricate machines that register earthquakes ten thousand miles away. This responsiveness had nothing to do with that flabby impressionability which is dignified under the name of the ""creative temperament.""- it was an extraordinary gift for hope, a romantic readiness such as I have never found in any other person and which it is not likely I shall ever find again. No - Gatsby turned out all right at the end; it is what preyed on Gatsby, what foul dust floated in the wake of his dreams that temporarily closed out my interest in the abortive sorrows and short-winded elations of men.

My family have been prominent, well-to-do people in this Middle Western city for three generations. The Carraways are something of a clan, and we have a tradition that we're descended from the Dukes of Buccleuch, but the actual founder of my line was my grandfather's brother, who came here in fifty-one, sent a substitute to the Civil War, and started the wholesale hardware business that my father carries on to-day.

I never saw this great-uncle, but I'm supposed to look like him - with special reference to the rather hard-boiled painting that hangs in father's office I graduated from New Haven in 1915, just a quarter of a century after my father, and a little later I participated in that delayed Teutonic migration known as the Great War. I enjoyed the counter-raid so thoroughly that I came back restless. Instead of being the warm centre of the world, the Middle West now seemed like the ragged edge of the universe - so I decided to go East and learn the bond business. Everybody I knew was in the bond business, so I supposed it could support one more single man. All my aunts and uncles talked it over as if they were choosing a prep school for me, and finally said, ""Why - ye - es,"" with very grave, hesitant faces. Father agreed to finance me for a year, and after various delays I came East, permanently, I thought, in the spring of twenty-two.

The practical thing was to find rooms in the city, but it was a warm season, and I had just left a country of wide lawns and friendly trees, so when a young man at the office suggested that we take a house together in a commuting town, it sounded like a great idea. He found the house, a weather-beaten cardboard bungalow at eighty a month, but at the last minute the firm ordered him to Washington, and I went out to the country alone. I had a dog - at least I had him for a few days until he ran away - and an old Dodge and a Finnish woman, who made my bed and cooked breakfast and muttered Finnish wisdom to herself over the electric stove.

It was lonely for a day or so until one morning some man, more recently arrived than I, stopped me on the road.
""How do you get to West Egg village?"" he asked helplessly.

I told him. And as I walked on I was lonely no longer. I was a guide, a pathfinder, an original settler. He had casually conferred on me the freedom of the neighborhood.

And so with the sunshine and the great bursts of leaves growing on the trees, just as things grow in fast movies, I had that familiar conviction that life was beginning over again with the summer.

There was so much to read, for one thing, and so much fine health to be pulled down out of the young breath-giving air. I bought a dozen volumes on banking and credit and investment securities, and they stood on my shelf in red and gold like new money from the mint, promising to unfold the shining secrets that only Midas and Morgan and Maecenas knew. And I had the high intention of reading many other books besides. I was rather literary in college - one year I wrote a series of very solemn and obvious editorials for the ""Yale News.""- and now I was going to bring back all such things into my life and become again that most limited of all specialists, the ""well-rounded man."" This isn't just an epigram - life is much more successfully looked at from a single window, after all.

It was a matter of chance that I should have rented a house in one of the strangest communities in North America. It was on that slender riotous island which extends itself due east of New York - and where there are, among other natural curiosities, two unusual formations of land. Twenty miles from the city a pair of enormous eggs, identical in contour and separated only by a courtesy bay, jut out into the most domesticated body of salt water in the Western hemisphere, the great wet barnyard of Long Island Sound. They are not perfect ovals - like the egg in the Columbus story, they are both crushed flat at the contact end - but their physical resemblance must be a source of perpetual confusion to the gulls that fly overhead. To the wingless a more arresting phenomenon is their dissimilarity in every particular except shape and size.

I lived at West Egg, the - well, the less fashionable of the two, though this is a most superficial tag to express the bizarre and not a little sinister contrast between them. My house was at the very tip of the egg, only fifty yards from the Sound, and squeezed between two huge places that rented for twelve or fifteen thousand a season. The one on my right was a colossal affair by any standard - it was a factual imitation of some Hotel de Ville in Normandy, with a tower on one side, spanking new under a thin beard of raw ivy, and a marble swimming pool, and more than forty acres of lawn and garden. It was Gatsby's mansion. Or, rather, as I didn't know Mr. Gatsby, it was a mansion inhabited by a gentleman of that name. My own house was an eyesore, but it was a small eyesore, and it had been overlooked, so I had a view of the water, a partial view of my neighbor's lawn, and the consoling proximity of millionaires - all for eighty dollars a month.

Across the courtesy bay the white palaces of fashionable East Egg glittered along the water, and the history of the summer really begins on the evening I drove over there to have dinner with the Tom Buchanans. Daisy was my second cousin once removed, and I'd known Tom in college. And just after the war I spent two days with them in Chicago.

Her husband, among various physical accomplishments, had been one of the most powerful ends that ever played football at New Haven--a national figure in a way, one of those men who reach such an acute limited excellence at twenty-one that everything afterward savors of anti-climax. His family were enormously wealthy--even in college his freedom with money was a matter for reproach--but now he'd left Chicago and come east in a fashion that rather took your breath away: for instance he'd brought down a string of polo ponies from Lake Forest. It was hard to realize that a man in my own generation was wealthy enough to do that.

Why they came east I don't know. They had spent a year in France, for no particular reason, and then drifted here and there unrestfully wherever people played polo and were rich together. This was a permanent move, said Daisy over the telephone, but I didn't believe it--I had no sight into Daisy's heart but I felt that Tom would drift on forever seeking a little wistfully for the dramatic turbulence of some irrecoverable football game.

And so it happened that on a warm windy evening I drove over to East Egg to see two old friends whom I scarcely knew at all. Their house was even more elaborate than I expected, a cheerful red-and-white Georgian Colonial mansion, overlooking the bay. The lawn started at the beach and ran toward the front door for a quarter of a mile, jumping over sun-dials and brick walks and burning gardens - finally when it reached the house drifting up the side in bright vines as though from the momentum of its run. The front was broken by a line of French windows, glowing now with reflected gold and wide open to the warm windy afternoon, and Tom Buchanan in riding clothes was standing with his legs apart on the front porch.

He had changed since his New Haven years. Now he was a sturdy straw-haired man of thirty with a rather hard mouth and a supercilious manner. Two shining arrogant eyes had established dominance over his face and gave him the appearance of always leaning aggressively forward. Not even the effeminate swank of his riding clothes could hide the enormous power of that body - he seemed to fill those glistening boots until he strained the top lacing, and you could see a great pack of muscle shifting when his shoulder moved under his thin coat. It was a body capable of enormous leverage - a cruel body.

His speaking voice, a gruff husky tenor, added to the impression of fractiousness he conveyed. There was a touch of paternal contempt in it, even toward people he liked - and there were men at New Haven who had hated his guts.

""Now, don't think my opinion on these matters is final,"" he seemed to say, ""just because I'm stronger and more of a man than you are."" We were in the same senior society, and while we were never intimate I always had the impression that he approved of me and wanted me to like him with some harsh, defiant wistfulness of his own.
We talked for a few minutes on the sunny porch.

""I've got a nice place here,"" he said, his eyes flashing about restlessly.

Turning me around by one arm, he moved a broad flat hand along the front vista, including in its sweep a sunken Italian garden, a half acre of deep, pungent roses, and a snub-nosed motor-boat that bumped the tide offshore.

""It belonged to Demaine, the oil man."" He turned me around again, politely and abruptly. ""We'll go inside.""

We walked through a high hallway into a bright rosy-colored space, fragilely bound into the house by French windows at either end. The windows were ajar and gleaming white against the fresh grass outside that seemed to grow a little way into the house. A breeze blew through the room, blew curtains in at one end and out the other like pale flags, twisting them up toward the frosted wedding-cake of the ceiling, and then rippled over the wine-colored rug, making a shadow on it as wind does on the sea.

The only completely stationary object in the room was an enormous couch on which two young women were buoyed up as though upon an anchored balloon. They were both in white, and their dresses were rippling and fluttering as if they had just been blown back in after a short flight around the house. I must have stood for a few moments listening to the whip and snap of the curtains and the groan of a picture on the wall. There was a boom as Tom Buchanan shut the rear windows and the caught wind died out about the room, and the curtains and the rugs and the two young women ballooned slowly to the floor.

The younger of the two was a stranger to me. She was extended full length at her end of the divan, completely motionless, and with her chin raised a little, as if she were balancing something on it which was quite likely to fall. If she saw me out of the corner of her eyes she gave no hint of it - indeed, I was almost surprised into murmuring an apology for having disturbed her by coming in.

The other girl, Daisy, made an attempt to rise - she leaned slightly forward with a conscientious expression - then she laughed, an absurd, charming little laugh, and I laughed too and came forward into the room.

""I'm p-paralyzed with happiness."" She laughed again, as if she said something very witty, and held my hand for a moment, looking up into my face, promising that there was no one in the world she so much wanted to see.That was a way she had. She hinted in a murmur that the surname of the balancing girl was Baker. (I've heard it said that Daisy's murmur was only to make people lean toward her; an irrelevant criticism that made it no less charming.)

At any rate, Miss Baker's lips fluttered, she nodded at me almost imperceptibly, and then quickly tipped her head back again - the object she was balancing had obviously tottered a little and given her something of a fright. Again a sort of apology arose to my lips. Almost any exhibition of complete self-sufficiency draws a stunned tribute from me.

I looked back at my cousin, who began to ask me questions in her low, thrilling voice. It was the kind of voice that the ear follows up and down, as if each speech is an arrangement of notes that will never be played again. Her face was sad and lovely with bright things in it, bright eyes and a bright passionate mouth, but there was an excitement in her voice that men who had cared for her found difficult to forget: a singing compulsion, a whispered ""Listen,"" a promise that she had done gay, exciting things just a while since and that there were gay, exciting things hovering in the next hour.

I told her how I had stopped off in Chicago for a day on my way East, and how a dozen people had sent their love through me.

""Do they miss me?"" she cried ecstatically.
""The whole town is desolate. All the cars have the left rear wheel painted black as a mourning wreath, and there's a persistent wail all night along the north shore.""

""How gorgeous! Let's go back, Tom. To-morrow!"" Then she added irrelevantly: ""You ought to see the baby.""

""I'd like to.""

""She's asleep. She's three years old. Haven't you ever seen her?""

""Never.""

""Well, you ought to see her. She's --""

Tom Buchanan, who had been hovering restlessly about the room, stopped and rested his hand on my shoulder.

""What you doing, Nick?""

""I'm a bond man.""

""Who with?""

I told him.

""Never heard of them,"" he remarked decisively.

This annoyed me.

""You will,"" I answered shortly. ""You will if you stay in the East.""

""Oh, I'll stay in the East, don't you worry,"" he said, glancing at Daisy and then back at me, as if he were alert for something more. ""I'd be a God damned fool to live anywhere else.""

At this point Miss Baker said: ""Absolutely!"" with such suddenness that I started - it was the first word she uttered since I came into the room. Evidently it surprised her as much as it did me, for she yawned and with a series of rapid, deft movements stood up into the room.

""I'm stiff,"" she complained, ""I've been lying on that sofa for as long as I can remember.""

""Don't look at me,"" Daisy retorted, ""I've been trying to get you to New York all afternoon.""

""No, thanks,"" said Miss Baker to the four cocktails just in from the pantry, ""I'm absolutely in training.""

Her host looked at her incredulously.

""You are!"" He took down his drink as if it were a drop in the bottom of a glass. ""How you ever get anything done is beyond me.""

I looked at Miss Baker, wondering what it was she ""got done."" I enjoyed looking at her. She was a slender, small-breasted girl, with an erect carriage, which she accentuated by throwing her body backward at the shoulders like a young cadet. Her gray sun-strained eyes looked back at me with polite reciprocal curiosity out of a wan, charming, discontented face. It occurred to me now that I had seen her, or a picture of her, somewhere before.

""You live in West Egg,"" she remarked contemptuously. ""I know somebody there.""

""I don't know a single --""

""You must know Gatsby.""

""Gatsby?"" demanded Daisy. ""What Gatsby?""

Before I could reply that he was my neighbor dinner was announced; wedging his tense arm imperatively under mine, Tom Buchanan compelled me from the room as though he were moving a checker to another square.

Slenderly, languidly, their hands set lightly on their hips, the two young women preceded us out onto a rosy-colored porch, open toward the sunset, where four candles flickered on the table in the diminished wind.

""Why candles?"" objected Daisy, frowning. She snapped them out with her fingers. ""In two weeks it'll be the longest day in the year."" She looked at us all radiantly. ""Do you always watch for the longest day of the year and then miss it? I always watch for the longest day in the year and then miss it.""

""We ought to plan something,"" yawned Miss Baker, sitting down at the table as if she were getting into bed.

""All right,"" said Daisy. ""What'll we plan?"" She turned to me helplessly: ""What do people plan?""

Before I could answer her eyes fastened with an awed expression on her little finger.

""Look!"" she complained; ""I hurt it.""

We all looked - the knuckle was black and blue.

""You did it, Tom,"" she said accusingly. ""I know you didn't mean to, but you did do it. That's what I get for marrying a brute of a man, a great, big, hulking physical specimen of a --""

""I hate that word hulking,"" objected Tom crossly, ""even in kidding.""

""Hulking,"" insisted Daisy.

Sometimes she and Miss Baker talked at once, unobtrusively and with a bantering inconsequence that was never quite chatter, that was as cool as their white dresses and their impersonal eyes in the absence of all desire. They were here, and they accepted Tom and me, making only a polite pleasant effort to entertain or to be entertained. They knew that presently dinner would be over and a little later the evening too would be over and casually put away. It was sharply different from the West, where an evening was hurried from phase to phase toward its close, in a continually disappointed anticipation or else in sheer nervous dread of the moment itself.

""You make me feel uncivilized, Daisy,"" I confessed on my second glass of corky but rather impressive claret. ""Can't you talk about crops or something?""

I meant nothing in particular by this remark, but it was taken up in an unexpected way.

""Civilization's going to pieces,"" broke out Tom violently. ""I've gotten to be a terrible pessimist about things. Have you read 'The Rise of the Colored Empires' by this man Goddard?""

""Why, no,"" I answered, rather surprised by his tone.

""Well, it's a fine book, and everybody ought to read it. The idea is if we don't look out the white race will be - will be utterly submerged. It's all scientific stuff; it's been proved.""

""Tom's getting very profound,"" said Daisy, with an expression of unthoughtful sadness. ""He reads deep books with long words in them. What was that word we --""

""Well, these books are all scientific,"" insisted Tom, glancing at her impatiently. ""This fellow has worked out the whole thing. It's up to us, who are the dominant race, to watch out or these other races will have control of things.""

""We've got to beat them down,"" whispered Daisy, winking ferociously toward the fervent sun.

""You ought to live in California -"" began Miss Baker, but Tom interrupted her by shifting heavily in his chair.

""This idea is that we're Nordics. I am, and you are, and you are, and --"" After an infinitesimal hesitation he included Daisy with a slight nod, and she winked at me again. ""- And we've produced all the things that go to make civilization - oh, science and art, and all that. Do you see?""

There was something pathetic in his concentration, as if his complacency, more acute than of old, was not enough to him any more. When, almost immediately, the telephone rang inside and the butler left the porch Daisy seized upon the momentary interruption and leaned toward me.

""I'll tell you a family secret,"" she whispered enthusiastically. ""It's about the butler's nose. Do you want to hear about the butler's nose?""

""That's why I came over to-night.""

""Well, he wasn't always a butler; he used to be the silver polisher for some people in New York that had a silver service for two hundred people. He had to polish it from morning till night, until finally it began to affect his nose --""

""Things went from bad to worse,"" suggested Miss Baker.

""Yes. Things went from bad to worse, until finally he had to give up his position.""

For a moment the last sunshine fell with romantic affection upon her glowing face; her voice compelled me forward breathlessly as I listened - then the glow faded, each light deserting her with lingering regret, like children leaving a pleasant street at dusk.

The butler came back and murmured something close to Tom's ear, whereupon Tom frowned, pushed back his chair, and without a word went inside. As if his absence quickened something within her, Daisy leaned forward again, her voice glowing and singing.

""I love to see you at my table, Nick. You remind me of a - of a rose, an absolute rose. Doesn't he?"" She turned to Miss Baker for confirmation: ""An absolute rose?""

This was untrue. I am not even faintly like a rose. She was only extemporizing, but a stirring warmth flowed from her, as if her heart was trying to come out to you concealed in one of those breathless, thrilling words. Then suddenly she threw her napkin on the table and excused herself and went into the house.

Miss Baker and I exchanged a short glance consciously devoid of meaning. I was about to speak when she sat up alertly and said ""Sh!"" in a warning voice. A subdued impassioned murmur was audible in the room beyond, and Miss Baker leaned forward unashamed, trying to hear. The murmur trembled on the verge of coherence, sank down, mounted excitedly, and then ceased altogether.

""This Mr. Gatsby you spoke of is my neighbor --"" I said.

""Don't talk. I want to hear what happens.""

""Is something happening?"" I inquired innocently.

""You mean to say you don't know?"" said Miss Baker, honestly surprised. ""I thought everybody knew.""

""I don't.""

""Why --"" she said hesitantly, ""Tom's got some woman in New York.""

""Got some woman?"" I repeated blankly.

Miss Baker nodded.

""She might have the decency not to telephone him at dinner time. Don't you think?""

Almost before I had grasped her meaning there was the flutter of a dress and the crunch of leather boots, and Tom and Daisy were back at the table.

""It couldn't be helped!"" cried Daisy with tense gaiety.

She sat down, glanced searchingly at Miss Baker and then at me, and continued: ""I looked outdoors for a minute, and it's very romantic outdoors. There's a bird on the lawn that I think must be a nightingale come over on the Cunard or White Star Line.
He's singing away --"" Her voice sang: ""It's romantic, isn't it, Tom?""

""Very romantic,"" he said, and then miserably to me: ""If it's light enough after dinner, I want to take you down to the stables.""

The telephone rang inside, startlingly, and as Daisy shook her head decisively at Tom the subject of the stables, in fact all subjects, vanished into air. Among the broken fragments of the last five minutes at table I remember the candles being lit again, pointlessly, and I was conscious of wanting to look squarely at every one, and yet to avoid all eyes. I couldn't guess what Daisy and Tom were thinking, but I doubt if even Miss Baker, who seemed to have mastered a certain hardy scepticism, was able utterly to put this fifth guest's shrill metallic urgency out of mind. To a certain temperament the situation might have seemed intriguing - my own instinct was to telephone immediately for the police.

The horses, needless to say, were not mentioned again. Tom and Miss Baker, with several feet of twilight between them, strolled back into the library, as if to a vigil beside a perfectly tangible body, while, trying to look pleasantly interested and a little deaf, I followed Daisy around a chain of connecting verandas to the porch in front. In its deep gloom we sat down side by side on a wicker settee.

Daisy took her face in her hands as if feeling its lovely shape, and her eyes moved gradually out into the velvet dusk. I saw that turbulent emotions possessed her, so I asked what I thought would be some sedative questions about her little girl.

""We don't know each other very well, Nick,"" she said suddenly. ""Even if we are cousins. You didn't come to my wedding.""

""I wasn't back from the war.""

""That's true."" She hesitated. ""Well, I've had a very bad time, Nick, and I'm pretty cynical about everything.""

Evidently she had reason to be. I waited but she didn't say any more, and after a moment I returned rather feebly to the subject of her daughter.

""I suppose she talks, and - eats, and everything.""

""Oh, yes."" She looked at me absently. ""Listen, Nick; let me tell you what I said when she was born. Would you like to hear?""

""Very much.""

""It'll show you how I've gotten to feel about - things. Well, she was less than an hour old and Tom was God knows where. I woke up out of the ether with an utterly abandoned feeling, and asked the nurse right away if it was a boy or a girl. She told me it was a girl, and so I turned my head away and wept. 'all right,' I said, 'I'm glad it's a girl. And I hope she'll be a fool - that's the best thing a girl can be in this world, a beautiful little fool.""

""You see I think everything's terrible anyhow,"" she went on in a convinced way. ""Everybody thinks so - the most advanced people. And I know. I've been everywhere and seen everything and done everything."" Her eyes flashed around her in a defiant way, rather like Tom's, and she laughed with thrilling scorn. ""Sophisticated - God, I'm sophisticated!""

The instant her voice broke off, ceasing to compel my attention, my belief, I felt the basic insincerity of what she had said. It made me uneasy, as though the whole evening had been a trick of some sort to exact a contributory emotion from me. I waited, and sure enough, in a moment she looked at me with an absolute smirk on her lovely face, as if she had asserted her membership in a rather distinguished secret society to which she and Tom belonged.

Inside, the crimson room bloomed with light.

Tom and Miss Baker sat at either end of the long couch and she read aloud to him from the Saturday Evening Post. - the words, murmurous and uninflected, running together in a soothing tune. The lamp-light, bright on his boots and dull on the autumn-leaf yellow of her hair, glinted along the paper as she turned a page with a flutter of slender muscles in her arms.
When we came in she held us silent for a moment with a lifted hand.

""To be continued,"" she said, tossing the magazine on the table, ""in our very next issue.""

Her body asserted itself with a restless movement of her knee, and she stood up.

""Ten o'clock,"" she remarked, apparently finding the time on the ceiling. ""Time for this good girl to go to bed.""

""Jordan's going to play in the tournament to-morrow,"" explained Daisy, ""over at Westchester.""

""Oh - you're Jordan Baker.""

I knew now why her face was familiar - its pleasing contemptuous expression had looked out at me from many rotogravure pictures of the sporting life at Asheville and Hot Springs and Palm Beach. I had heard some story of her too, a critical, unpleasant story, but what it was I had forgotten long ago.

""Good night,"" she said softly. ""Wake me at eight, won't you.""

""If you'll get up.""

""I will. Good night, Mr. Carraway. See you anon.""

""Of course you will,"" confirmed Daisy. ""In fact I think I'll arrange a marriage. Come over often, Nick, and I'll sort of - oh - fling you together. You know - lock you up accidentally in linen closets and push you out to sea in a boat, and all that sort of thing --""

""Good night,"" called Miss Baker from the stairs. ""I haven't heard a word.""

""She's a nice girl,"" said Tom after a moment. ""They oughtn't to let her run around the country this way.""

""Who oughtn't to?"" inquired Daisy coldly.

""Her family.""

""Her family is one aunt about a thousand years old. Besides, Nick's going to look after her, aren't you, Nick? She's going to spend lots of week-ends out here this summer. I think the home influence will be very good for her.""
Daisy and Tom looked at each other for a moment in silence.

""Is she from New York?"" I asked quickly.

""From Louisville. Our white girlhood was passed together there. Our beautiful white --""

""Did you give Nick a little heart to heart talk on the veranda?"" demanded Tom suddenly.

""Did I?"" She looked at me.

""I can't seem to remember, but I think we talked about the Nordic race. Yes, I'm sure we did. It sort of crept up on us and first thing you know --""

""Don't believe everything you hear, Nick,"" he advised me.

I said lightly that I had heard nothing at all, and a few minutes later I got up to go home. They came to the door with me and stood side by side in a cheerful square of light. As I started my motor Daisy peremptorily called: ""Wait!""

""I forgot to ask you something, and it's important. We heard you were engaged to a girl out West.""

""That's right,"" corroborated Tom kindly. ""We heard that you were engaged.""

""It's libel. I'm too poor.""

""But we heard it,"" insisted Daisy, surprising me by opening up again in a flower-like way. ""We heard it from three people, so it must be true.""

Of course I knew what they were referring to, but I wasn't even vaguely engaged. The fact that gossip had published the banns was one of the reasons I had come East. You can't stop going with an old friend on account of rumors, and on the other hand I had no intention of being rumored into marriage.

Their interest rather touched me and made them less remotely rich - nevertheless, I was confused and a little disgusted as I drove away. It seemed to me that the thing for Daisy to do was to rush out of the house, child in arms - but apparently there were no such intentions in her head. As for Tom, the fact that he ""had some woman in New York."" was really less surprising than that he had been depressed by a book. Something was making him nibble at the edge of stale ideas as if his sturdy physical egotism no longer nourished his peremptory heart.

Already it was deep summer on roadhouse roofs and in front of wayside garages, where new red gas-pumps sat out in pools of light, and when I reached my estate at West Egg I ran the car under its shed and sat for a while on an abandoned grass roller in the yard. The wind had blown off, leaving a loud, bright night, with wings beating in the trees and a persistent organ sound as the full bellows of the earth blew the frogs full of life. The silhouette of a moving cat wavered across the moonlight, and turning my head to watch it, I saw that I was not alone - fifty feet away a figure had emerged from the shadow of my neighbor's mansion and was standing with his hands in his pockets regarding the silver pepper of the stars. Something in his leisurely movements and the secure position of his feet upon the lawn suggested that it was Mr. Gatsby himself, come out to determine what share was his of our local heavens.

I decided to call to him. Miss Baker had mentioned him at dinner, and that would do for an introduction. But I didn't call to him, for he gave a sudden intimation that he was content to be alone - he stretched out his arms toward the dark water in a curious way, and, far as I was from him, I could have sworn he was trembling. Involuntarily I glanced seaward - and distinguished nothing except a single green light, minute and far away, that might have been the end of a dock. When I looked once more for Gatsby he had vanished, and I was alone again in the unquiet darkness.",112043
20988,105829,Juice,rap,Chance the Rapper,2013,1340237,{},"


Thirsty, thirsty, tryna choose
I mean, I know I'm pretty cool
My Nitty bag, my kitty boost
I got the juice, I got the juice


Chano, Chatham's own
Foolies glad I'm home
Even my haters kinda glad I'm on
Rest In Peace to my Vagabond
Rapper song, singer, suspended, subpoena
For misdemeanors, dreamer
Held back ass is lowkey still a senior
And I still shake up BO Squad, praying for my BroBois
City on the come up, shout that nigga Sosa!
Shout my nigga Fat Trel, shout my nigga Joseph
Playing Buenos Aires while they sleepin': buenas noches!
Wonder if I wrote this, 'cause it's so crisp
The most brokest cold stockbroker, winter solstice
I could win an Oscar, Russian accent husky
Acid addict, costly avid actor, Kevin Costner

Juice! Juice! Juice! Juice!
I got the juice, I got the juice (Yup!)
Juice! Juice! Juice! Juice!
I got the juice, I got the juice (Yup!)


God give me one sentence more
Maybe I just gotta get suspended more?
Hashtag it, get mentions for it
Make you love it, get it trending more
And then act humble
Hear some bull that some dude mumble
Wantin' to jump dude, but let that nigga punk you
Knowin' bitch niggas wanna bring guns to the rumbles, IGH!
But I love y'all souls, don't let the juice spill Pac!
Blue pill pop 'til you feel good enough to pop
The popped bitch in the blue heels, yop!
That one, drown in the juice nigga
Hunnid proof get found in a youth nigga
Stop with all the tryna' introduce nigga
Everybody know you dude, you the new nigga!
How's it feel to be you? Yo no sé
I ain't really been myself since Rod passed
I ain't even really need that shop class
I ain't really been weak since pop's smashed
I'm a genius, a mothafuckin' pop smash
Hit sensei, master
Jack and Lindsey, Wiley, Kembe
Been paid, 10 Day been they FAFSA

Juice! Juice! Juice! Juice!
I got the juice, I got the juice (Yup!)
Juice! Juice! Juice! Juice!
I got the juice, I got the juice (Yup!)


Jugo, you never tasted paper
Tripped, racing yaself tryna' chase the paper
I just faced a Veg-er
And you love being Kobe when you make the lay-er
'Til you realize everybody in the world fuckin' hates the Lakers
And then everybody wanna sip
'Til the juice spill, everybody wanna bib
And then everybody wanna dip
Told you I ain't worried, I ain't scared of the booth
All you can do is spit a verse of the truth
Merge the mixture with the purest of fruits
And the thirst is the worst, it's the curse of the juice!


Juice! Juice! Juice! Juice!
I got the juice, I got the juice (Yup!)
Juice! Juice! Juice! Juice!
I got the juice, I got the juice (Yup!)

Thirsty, thirsty, tryna choose
I mean, I know I'm pretty cool
My Nitty bag, my kitty boost
I got the juice, I got the juice


(Juice, juice, juice, juice) Yup!
(Juice, juice, juice, juice) Yup!
Yup! Yup!
Yup!",113663
21009,106044,Started from the Bottom,rap,Drake,2013,3418931,{},"
Started...
Zombie on the track


Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now my whole team fuckin' here
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team here, nigga
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now my whole team here, nigga
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team fuckin' here


I done kept it real from the jump
Livin' at my momma's house, we'd argue every month
Nigga, I was tryna get it on my own
Workin' all night, traffic on the way home
And my uncle callin' me, like, ""Where you at?
I gave you the keys, told you bring it right back""
Nigga, I just think it's funny how it goes
Now I'm on the road, half a million for a show, and we-

Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now my whole team fuckin' here
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team here, nigga
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team fuckin' here
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team here, nigga


Boys tell stories 'bout the man
Say I never struggled, wasn't hungry, yeah, I doubt it
Nigga, I could turn your boy into the man
There ain't really much out here that's poppin' off without us
Nigga, we just want the credit where it's due
I'ma worry 'bout me, give a fuck about you
Nigga, just as a reminder to myself
I wear every single chain, even when I'm in the house
'Cause we-


Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now my whole team fuckin' here
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team here, nigga

No new niggas, nigga, we don't feel that
Fuck a fake friend, where your real friends at?
We don't like to do too much explainin'
Story stayed the same, I never changed it
No new niggas, nigga, we don't feel that
Fuck a fake friend, where your real friends at?
We don't like to do too much explainin'
Story stayed the same through the money and the fame
'Cause we-


Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now my whole team fuckin' here
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team here, nigga
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now my whole team here, nigga
Started from the bottom, now we're here
Started from the bottom, now the whole team here, nigga

",113898
21034,106275,Royals,pop,Lorde,2013,2091024,{},"
I've never seen a diamond in the flesh
I cut my teeth on wedding rings in the movies
And I'm not proud of my address
In a torn-up town, no postcode envy


But every song's like
Gold teeth, Grey Goose, trippin' in the bathroom
Bloodstains, ball gowns, trashin' the hotel room
We don't care, we're driving Cadillacs in our dreams
But everybody's like
Cristal, Maybach, diamonds on your timepiece
Jet planes, islands, tigers on a gold leash
We don't care, we aren't caught up in your love affair


And we'll never be royals (Royals)
It don't run in our blood
That kind of luxe just ain't for us
We crave a different kind of buzz
Let me be your ruler (Ruler)
You can call me queen bee
And baby, I'll rule (I'll rule, I'll rule, I'll rule)
Let me live that fantasy

My friends and I, we've cracked the code
We count our dollars on the train to the party
And everyone who knows us knows
That we're fine with this, we didn't come from money


But every song's like
Gold teeth, Grey Goose, trippin' in the bathroom
Bloodstains, ball gowns, trashin' the hotel room
We don't care, we're driving Cadillacs in our dreams
But everybody's like
Cristal, Maybach, diamonds on your timepiece
Jet planes, islands, tiger's on a gold leash
We don't care, we aren't caught up in your love affair


And we'll never be royals (Royals)
It don't run in our blood
That kind of luxe just ain't for us
We crave a different kind of buzz
Let me be your ruler (Ruler)
You can call me queen bee
And baby, I'll rule (I'll rule, I'll rule, I'll rule)
Let me live that fantasy

(Oh, oh-oh)
We're bigger than we ever dreamed
And I'm in love with being queen
(Oh, oh-oh)
Life is great without a care
We aren't caught up in your love affair


And we'll never be royals (Royals)
It don't run in our blood
That kind of luxe just ain't for us
We crave a different kind of buzz
Let me be your ruler (Ruler)
You can call me queen bee
And baby, I'll rule (I'll rule, I'll rule, I'll rule)
Let me live that fantasy


",114153
21246,107835,Mirrors,rb,Justin Timberlake,2013,3404043,{},"
Aren't you somethin' to admire?
'Cause your shine is somethin' like a mirror
And I can't help but notice
You reflect in this heart of mine
If you ever feel alone and
The glare makes me hard to find
Just know that I'm always
Parallel on the other side


'Cause with your hand in my hand and a pocket full of soul
I can tell you there's no place we couldn't go
Just put your hand on the glass
I'll be there to pull you through
You just gotta be strong


'Cause I don't wanna lose you now
I'm lookin' right at the other half of me
The vacancy that sat in my heart
Is a space that now you hold
Show me how to fight for now
And I'll tell you, baby, it was easy
Comin' back here to you once I figured it out
You were right here all along
It's like you're my mirror (Oh)
My mirror staring back at me  (Oh)
I couldn't get any bigger (Oh)
With anyone else beside me (Oh)
And now it's clear as this promise
That we're making
Two reflections into one
'Cause it's like you're my mirror (Oh)
My mirror staring back at me, staring back at me

Aren't you somethin', an original?
'Cause it doesn't seem merely assembled
And I can't help but stare, 'cause
I see truth somewhere in your eyes
I can't ever change without you
You reflect me, I love that about you
And if I could, I
Would look at us all the time


'Cause with your hand in my hand and a pocket full of soul
I can tell you there's no place we couldn't go
Just put your hand on the past
I'm here tryna pull you through
You just gotta be strong


'Cause I don't wanna lose you now
I'm lookin' right at the other half of me
The vacancy that sat in my heart
Is a space that now you hold
Show me how to fight for now
And I'll tell you, baby, it was easy
Comin' back here to you once I figured it out
You were right here all along
It's like you're my mirror (Oh)
My mirror staring back at me (Oh)
I couldn't get any bigger (Oh)
With anyone else beside me (Oh)
And now it's clear as this promise
That we're making
Two reflections into one
'Cause it's like you're my mirror (Oh)
My mirror staring back at me, staring back at me

Yesterday is history, oh
Tomorrow's a mystery, oh
I can see you lookin' back at me
Keep your eyes on me
Baby, keep your eyes on me


'Cause I don't wanna lose you now
I'm lookin' right at the other half of me
The vacancy that sat in my heart
Is a space that now you hold
Show me how to fight for now (You show me, baby)
And I'll tell you, baby, it was easy
Comin' back here to you once I figured it out
You were right here all along
It's like you're my mirror (Oh)
My mirror staring back at me (Oh)
I couldn't get any bigger (Oh)
With anyone else beside me (Oh)
And now it's clear as this promise
That we're making
Two reflections into one
'Cause it's like you're my mirror (Oh)
My mirror staring back at me, staring back at me

Ohh (Oh oh, oh oh)
Ohh (Oh oh, oh oh)
Ohh ohh (Oh oh, oh oh)
Uhh (Oh oh, oh oh)
Ohh (Oh oh, oh oh)


You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life


Now, you're the inspiration of this precious song
And I just wanna see your face light up since you put me on
So now I say goodbye to the old me, it's already gone
And I can't wait, wait, wait, wait, wait to get you home
Just to let you know, you are


You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life


Girl, you're my reflection, all I see is you
My reflection, in everything I do
You're my reflection and all I see is you
My reflection, in everything I do


You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life
You are, you are the love of my life",115743
21463,109449,Work,rap,Iggy Azalea,2013,1442260,{},"
Walk a mile in these Louboutins
But they don't wear these shits where I'm from
I'm not hating, I'm just telling you
I'm tryna let you know what the fuck that I've been through


Two feet in the red dirt, school skirt
Sugar cane, back lanes
Three jobs, took years to save
But I got a ticket on that plane
People got a lot to say
But don't know shit about where I was made
Or how many floors that I had to scrub
Just to make it past where I am from


No money, no family
16 in the middle of Miami
No money, no family
16 in the middle of Miami
No money, no family
16 in the middle of Miami
16 in the middle of Miami

I've been up all night, tryna get that rich
I've been work-work-work-work-workin' on my shit
Milked the whole game twice, gotta get it how I live
I've been work-work-work-work-workin' on my shit
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Workin' on my shit


You can hate it or love it
Hustle and the struggle is the only thing I'm trusting
Thoroughbred in a mud brick before the budget
White chick on that Pac shit
My passion was ironic
And my dreams were uncommon
Guess I gone crazy, first deal changed me
Robbed blind, basically raped me
Rose through the bullshit like a matador
Just made me madder and adamant to go at 'em
And even the score
So, I went harder
Studied the Carters till a deal was offered
Slept cold on the floor recording
At four in the morning
And now I'm passin' the bar like a lawyer
Immigrant, art ignorant
Ya ill intent was insurance for my benefit
Hate to be inconsiderate
But the industry took my innocence
Too late, now I'm in this bitch!
You don't know the half
This shit get real
Valley girls giving blowjobs for Louboutins
What you call that?
Head over heels


No money, no family
16 in the middle of Miami
No money, no family
16 in the middle of Miami
No money, no family
16 in the middle of Miami
16 in the middle of Miami


I've been up all night, tryna get that rich
I've been work-work-work-work-workin' on my shit
Milked the whole game twice, gotta get it how I live
I've been work-work-work-work-workin' on my shit
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Workin' on my shit

Pledge allegiance to the struggle
Ain't been easy
But cheers to Peezy for the weeks we lived out of duffle
Bags is all we had
Do anything for my Mama, I love you
One day I'll pay you back for the sacrifice
That ya managed to muscle
Sixteen, you sent me through customs so
All aboard my spaceship to Mercury
Turn first at the light that's in front me
'Cause every night I'ma do it like it's my last
This dream is all that I need
'Cause it's all that I ever had


Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Workin' on my shit
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Now get this work
Workin' on my shit",117463
21577,110038,Power Trip,rap,J. Cole,2013,3825936,{Miguel},"
Got me up all night
All I'm singin' is love songs
She got me up all night
Constant drinkin' and love songs
She got me up all night
Down-and-out with these love songs
She got me up all night
Drownin' out with these love songs
She got me up all night (Yeah)
All I'm singin' is love songs
She got me up all night (Yeah)
Constant drinkin' and love songs
She got me up all night (Yeah)
Down-and-out with these love songs
She got me open all night (Uh-huh)
Got me open all night, hey


Okay, back when I was sleeping in my mama crib
Or even back when I was up there in Mohammed crib
Paying seventeen hundred for the rent, money well spent
No heater, but a nigga made heat, may I vent?
Had a thing for ya, even wrote the song ""Dreams"" for ya
'Cause I had dreams for ya, thoughts of a ring for ya
Childish shit, you know child and shit
Anonymous flowers sent, you know coward shit
Now a nigga signed to Hov, took a power trip
Back home, I'm grown now, and the city's my throne now, huh
The same clubs that I used to get tossed out
Life got Kriss Kross'd: totally crossed out
'Cause now I'm in this bitch and I'm totally bossed out
Old chicks crying 'cause they know that they lost out
But I'm still on you, I'm still on you
My drink spill on me, while I feel on you, I'm sayin'-

Would you believe me if I said I'm in love?
Baby, I want you to want me
Would you believe me if I said I'm in love?
Baby, I want ya


And we are, we are, we are
Got me up all night
And we are, we are, we are
All I'm singin' is love songs
And we are, we are, we are
Got me up all night
And we are, we are, we are (She got me)
And we are, we are, we are (She got me)


Well, this has got to be the longest crush ever
If I ever get to fuck it'd be the longest bust ever
Love is a drug, like the strongest stuff ever and
Fuck it, I'm on one, you feel me?
She on a power trip, she got me where she want a nigga
Wife'ing in the club, man, my homies gon' disown a nigga
Like, ""Give me twenty dollars, dollars!""
Ass stupid, how you get to college, college?
I'm in your city and I'm wonderin' if you're home now
Went and found a man, but I'm hopin' you're alone now
Can't help but feeling like I dropped the ball, cliché
I used to pop up on you at the mall each day
Now, typically I kick game like East Bay
But you got a nigga freeze-framed yelling: ""Please play!""
For Pete's sake, homie, pull it together
Just fuck her one time and be through with forever, but-

Would you believe me if I said I'm in love?
Baby, I want you to want me
Would you believe me if I said I'm in love?
Baby, I want ya, yeah


And we are, we are, we are
Got me up all night
And we are, we are, we are
All I'm singin' is love songs
And we are, we are, we are
Got me up all night
And we are, we are, we are (She got me)
And we are, we are, we are (She got me)


Got me up all night (All night)
All I'm singin' is love songs
She got me up all night (All night)
Constant drinkin' and love songs
She got me up all night (All night)
Down-and-out with these love songs
She got me up all night (All night)
Drownin' out with these love songs
She got me up all night (Yeah)
All I'm singin' is love songs
She got me up all night (Yeah)
Constant drinkin' and love songs
She got me up all night (Yeah)
Down-and-out with these love songs
She got me open all night (Uh-huh)
Got me open all night, hey

Back when I was sleeping in my mama crib
*Space Bar Tap*

",118063
21668,110526,Blinded by the Light,rock,Manfred Mann's Earth Band,1976,2142723,"{""Manfred Mann\\'s Earth Band""}","
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night


Madman drummers bummers
Indians in the summer with a teenage diplomat
In the dumps with the mumps as the adolescent pumps
His way into his hat
With a boulder on my shoulder, feelin' kinda older
I tripped the merry-go-round
With this very unpleasin', sneezin' and wheezin'
The calliope crashed to the ground
The calliope crashed to the ground!


But she was blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night

Some silicone sister with a manager mister
Told me I got what it takes
She said ""I'll turn you on sonny to something strong
Play the song with the funky break""
And go-cart Mozart was checkin' out the weather chart
To see if it was safe outside
And little Early-Pearly came by in his curly-wurly
And asked me if I needed a ride
Asked me if I needed a ride!


But she was blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light


She got down but she never got tired
She's gonna make it through the night
She's gonna make it through the night




But mama, that's where the fun is
But mama, that's where the fun is
Mama always told me not to look into the eyes of the sun
But mama, that's where the fun is

Some brimstone baritone anticyclone rolling stone
Preacher from the east
Says, ""Dethrone the dictaphone, hit it in it's funny bone
That's where they expect it least""
And some new-mown chaperone was standin' in the corner
Watching the young girls dance
And some fresh-sown moonstone was messin' with his frozen zone
Reminding him of romance
The calliope crashed to the ground


But she was blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
Blinded by the light
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night


Blinded by the light
(Madman drummers bummers, Indians in the summer)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(With a teenage diplomat)
Blinded by the light
(In the dumps with the mumps as the adolescent pumps)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(His way into his hat)
Blinded by the light
(With a boulder on my shoulder, feelin' kinda older)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(I tripped the merry-go-round)
Blinded by the light
(With this very unpleasin', sneezin' and wheezin)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(The calliope crashed to the ground)
Blinded by the light
(Now Scott with a slingshot finally found a tender spot)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(And throws his lover in the sand)
Blinded by the light
(And some bloodshot forget-me-not said daddy's within earshot)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(Save the buckshot, turn up the band)
Blinded by the light
(Some silicone sister with a manager mister)
Revved up like a deuce, another runner in the night
(Told me I got what it takes)
Blinded by the light
(She said, ""I'll turn you on sonny to something strong"")

She got down, but she never got tired
She's gonna make it through the night",118560
21718,110766,Fly Me to the Moon,pop,Frank Sinatra,1964,3636368,"{""Count Basie""}","
Fly me to the moon
Let me play among the stars
And let me see what spring is like
On a-Jupiter and Mars
In other words, hold my hand
In other words, baby, kiss me


Fill my heart with song
And let me sing forevermore
You are all I long for
All I worship and adore
In other words, please be true
In other words, I love you




Fill my heart with song
Let me sing forevermore
You are all I long for
All I worship and adore
In other words, please be true
In other words, in other words
I love you",118812
21731,110834,Take On Me,pop,a-ha,1984,1323489,{​a-ha},"
We're talking away
I don't know what I'm to say
I'll say it anyway
Today's another day to find you
Shying away
I'll be coming for your love, okay?


Take on me (Take on me)
Take me on (Take on me)
I'll be gone
In a day or two


So needless to say
I'm odds and ends
But I'll be stumbling away
Slowly learning that life is okay
Say after me
It's no better to be safe than sorry

Take on me (Take on me)
Take me on (Take on me)
I'll be gone
In a day or two




All things that you say, yeah
Is it life or just to play my worries away?
You're all the things I've got to remember
You're shying away
I'll be coming for you anyway


Take on me (Take on me)
Take me on (Take on me)
I'll be gone
In a day
Take on me (Take on me)
Take me on (Take on me)
I'll be gone
In a day",118904
22024,113298,Like a Stone,rock,Audioslave,2003,1023705,{},"
On a cobweb afternoon in a room full of emptiness
By a freeway, I confess I was lost in the pages
Of a book full of death, reading how we'll die alone
And if we're good, we'll lay to rest anywhere we want to go


In your house, I long to be
Room by room, patiently
I'll wait for you there like a stone
I'll wait for you there alone


And on my deathbed, I will pray to the gods and the angels
Like a pagan to anyone who will take me to heaven
To a place I recall, I was there so long ago
The sky was bruised, the wine was bled, and there you led me on


In your house, I long to be
Room by room, patiently
I'll wait for you there like a stone
I'll wait for you there alone, alone



And on I read until the day was gone
And I sat in regret of all the things I've done
For all that I've blessed and all that I've wronged
In dreams until my death, I will wander on


In your house, I long to be
Room by room, patiently
I'll wait for you there like a stone
I'll wait for you there alone, alone",121557
22084,113908,U.O.E.N.O,rap,Rocko,2013,1621617,"{""Rick Ross"",Future}","


U.O.E.N.O it
Po high-class niggas
This shit sound crazy
Fly shit on me
You know what I'm sayin'?


This a thousand dollar pair of shoes and U.O.E.N.O it
This a thousand dollar cup of lean and U.O.E.N.O it
This a half a million dollar car, U.O.E.N.O it
I came up from bottom, U.O.E.N.O it
My niggas all ride with me on, U.O.E.N.O it
Got killers with me right now, U.O.E.N.O it
This a million dollar watch nigga, U.O.E.N.O it
Got a million dollar crib nigga, U.O.E.N.O it


Ay that monster truck, sit tall as fuck, it's so big can't even tow it
Don't like snakes keep my grass cut, so low can't even mow it
Sip Dom Peri', little high glow, no no we don't do Moet
If it ain't P.J., no Rose from me hostess don't even pour it
Specks on Tom Ford, button-down Michael Kors
Always on like the refrigerator, I'm plugged in, ho, you know it
A.P. and that Piguet, wear the Breitling when I'm bored
Got a Masterpiece and a 41-millimeter, and you ain't even know it
Keep the .45 in my pocket: ain't gon' show it 'til I have to pop it
Then you gon know it, damn who shot you, they don't even know it
Hawks game fuckin' floor it, TV seat front row it
Rocko Da Don CEO it, ain't gotta rap and you know it

This a thousand dollar pair of shoes and U.O.E.N.O it
This a thousand dollar cup of lean and U.O.E.N.O it
This a half a million dollar car, U.O.E.N.O it
I came up from bottom, U.O.E.N.O it
My niggas all ride with me on, U.O.E.N.O it
Got killers with me right now, U.O.E.N.O it
This a million dollar watch nigga, U.O.E.N.O it
Got a million dollar crib nigga, U.O.E.N.O it


That nigga sold you that re-rock, you ain't even know it
I'd die over these Reeboks, you ain't even know it
Put molly all in her champagne, she ain't even know it
I took her home and I enjoyed that, she ain't even know it
Got a hundred acres I live on, you ain't even know it
Got a hundred rounds in this AR, you ain't even know it
Got a bag of bitches I play with, on cloud 9 in my spaceship
Zoned out but he stay fresh from Zone 1 through Zone 6
Bricks all in my blood, birds all in my dreams
Boats all in my yard, lemon pepper my wings
I'm 'bout to get you fuck niggas wacked, you ain't even know it
Your main nigga bout to turn his back, you ain't even know it


This a thousand dollar pair of shoes and U.O.E.N.O it
This a thousand dollar cup of lean and U.O.E.N.O it
This a half a million dollar car, U.O.E.N.O it
I came up from bottom, U.O.E.N.O it
My niggas all ride with me on, U.O.E.N.O it
Got killers with me right now, U.O.E.N.O it
This a million dollar watch nigga, U.O.E.N.O it
Got a million dollar crib nigga, U.O.E.N.O it

I'm turned up every day, you don't even know it
Got your bitch with me right now, you don't even know it
We turn up in the club, you don't even know it
Got a hundred bottles comin', you don't even know it
We came up from nothin', you don't even know it
Drive a half a million dollar car, you don't even know it
This a thousand dollar pair of shoes, you don't even know it
Got a bitch that speak no English, she don't even know it


This a thousand dollar pair of shoes and U.O.E.N.O it
This a thousand dollar cup of lean and U.O.E.N.O it
This a half a million dollar car, U.O.E.N.O it
I came up from bottom, U.O.E.N.O it
My niggas all ride with me on, U.O.E.N.O it
Got killers with me right now, U.O.E.N.O it
This a million dollar watch nigga, U.O.E.N.O it
Got a million dollar crib nigga, U.O.E.N.O it",122189
22141,114254,When I Was Your Man,pop,Bruno Mars,2013,1091354,{},"
Same bed but it feels just a little bit bigger now
Our song on the radio but it don't sound the same
When our friends talk about you, all it does is just tear me down
'Cause my heart breaks a little when I hear your name


It all just sounds like oooooh ooh
Mmm, too young, too dumb to realize


That I should have bought you flowers
And held your hand
Should have gave you all my hours
When I had the chance
Take you to every party
'Cause all you wanted to do was dance
Now my baby's dancing
But she's dancing with another man


My pride, my ego, my needs, and my selfish ways
Caused a good, strong woman like you to walk out my life
Now I'll never, never get to clean up the mess I made (oh)
And it haunts me every time I close my eyes

It all just sounds like oooooh ooh
Mmm, too young, too dumb to realize


That I should have bought you flowers
And held your hand
Should have gave you all my hours
When I had the chance
Take you to every party
'Cause all you wanted to do was dance
Now my baby's dancing
But she's dancing with another man


Although it hurts
I'll be the first to say that I was wrong
Oh, I know I'm probably much too late
To try and apologize for my mistakes
But I just want you to know


I hope he buys you flowers
I hope he holds your hand
Give you all his hours
When he has the chance
Take you to every party
'Cause I remember how much you loved to dance
Do all the things I should have done
When I was your man

Do all the things I should have done
When I was your man",122542
22199,114813,Jme tire,rb,Gims,2013,1074059,{},"


J'me tire, me demande pas pourquoi j'suis parti sans motif
Parfois je sens mon cœur qui s'endurcit
C'est triste à dire mais plus rien n'm'attriste
Laisse-moi partir loin d'ici
Pour garder l'sourire, je me disais qu'y'a pire
Si c'est comme ça, bah fuck la vie d'artiste
Je sais qu'ça fait cliché d'dire qu'on est pris pour cible
Mais j'veux l'dire juste pour la rime


J'me tire dans un endroit où j'serai pas l'suspect
Après j'vais changer d'nom comme Cassius Clay
Un endroit où j'aurai plus besoin d'prendre le mic'
Un endroit où tout l'monde s'en tape de ma life


J'me tire, me demande pas pourquoi j'suis parti sans motif
Parfois je sens mon cœur qui s'endurcit
C'est triste à dire mais plus rien n'm'attriste
Laisse-moi partir loin d'ici
Pour garder l'sourire, je me disais qu'y'a pire
Si c'est comme ça, bah fuck la vie d'artiste
Je sais qu'ça fait cliché d'dire qu'on est pris pour cible
Mais j'veux l'dire juste pour la rime

Si j'reste, les gens me fuiront sûrement comme la peste
Vos interviews m'ont donné trop d'maux d'tête
La vérité c'est que j'm'auto-déteste
Faut qu'j'préserve tout c'qu'il me reste
Et tous ces gens qui voudraient prendre mon tél'
Allez leur dire que j'suis pas leur modèle
Merci à ceux qui disent ""Meu-gui on t'aime
Malgré ta couleur ébène""


J'me tire dans un endroit où j'serai pas l'suspect
Après j'vais changer d'nom comme Cassius Clay
Un endroit où j'aurai plus besoin d'prendre le mic'
Un endroit où tout l'monde s'en tape de ma life


J'me tire, me demande pas pourquoi j'suis parti sans motif
Parfois je sens mon cœur qui s'endurcit
C'est triste à dire mais plus rien n'm'attriste
Laisse-moi partir loin d'ici
Pour garder l'sourire, je me disais qu'y'a pire
Si c'est comme ça, bah fuck la vie d'artiste
Je sais qu'ça fait cliché d'dire qu'on est pris pour cible
Mais j'veux l'dire juste pour la rime

J'suis parti sans mentir, sans me dire
""Qu'est-ce que j'vais devenir ?""
Stop ! Ne réfléchis plus, Meu-gui
Stop ! Ne réfléchis plus, vas-y !
Parti sans mentir, sans me dire
""Qu'est ce que j'vais devenir ?""
Stop ! Ne réfléchis plus, Meu-gui
Stop ! Ne réfléchis plus, vas-y !


J'me tire, me demande pas pourquoi j'suis parti sans motif
Parfois je sens mon cœur qui s'endurcit
C'est triste à dire mais plus rien n'm'attriste
Laisse-moi partir loin d'ici
Pour garder l'sourire, je me disais qu'y'a pire
Si c'est comme ça, bah fuck la vie d'artiste
Je sais qu'ça fait cliché d'dire qu'on est pris pour cible
Mais j'veux l'dire juste pour la rime",123198
22384,115932,5 AM in Toronto,rap,Drake,2013,1486962,{},"
Yeah
This on some old Tommy Campos Dice Raw shit, you know?
For my niggas, though


Uh, you underestimated greatly
Most number ones ever, how long did it really take me?
The part I love most is they need me more than they hate me
So they never take shots, I got everybody on safety
I could load every gun with bullets that fire backwards
Probably wouldn't lose a single rapper
Niggas make threats, can't hear 'em over the laughter
Yeah, that's 'cause I'm headed to the bank, nigga
Sinatra lifestyle, I'm just bein' frank with ya
I mean, where you think she at when she ain't with ya?
Wildin', doin' shit that's way out of your budget
Owl sweaters inside her luggage, you gotta love it
Damn, this shit could go on a tape
Bitches lovin' my drive, I never give it a break
Give these niggas the look, the verse, and even the hook
That's why every song sound like Drake featurin' Drake
Str8, Y pree? Why is it always me?
Got us watchin' our words like it's wiretaps on the team
'Cause I show love, never get the same outta niggas
Guess it's funny how money can make change outta niggas
For real, some nobody started feelin' himself
A couple somebodies started killin' themself
A couple albums dropped, those are still on the shelf
I bet them shits would have popped if I was willin' to help
I got a gold trophy from the committee for validation
Bad press during the summer over allegations
I ain't lyin', my nigga, my time is money
That's why I ain't got time for a nigga whose time is coming
A lot of niggas PR stuntin' like that's the movement
And I'm the only nigga still known for the music, I swear
Fuck them niggas this year, I made Forbes list, nigga
Fuck your list, everything's lookin' gorgeous
Without me, rap is just a bunch of orphans
But if I stay, then this shit is a bunch of corpses
And me and my dread nigga from New Orleans
Stashin' money like hoarders off multi-platinum recordings
Eatin' like I'm seated at Swish, Sotto, and Joso's
Nothing Was The Same, this shit for Ezee and Coco
This shit for Karim, this shit for Jaevon
This shit for Julius, Milly Mill, boy, we do this shit for real
All them boys in my will, all them boys is my Wills
Anything happen to pop, then I got you like Uncle Phil
Weezy been on that edge, you niggas just need to chill
If anything happen to Papi, might pop a nigga for real
Comin' live from the screwface, livin' out a suitcase
But I'm feelin' good, Johnny got me pushin' two plates
My weight up, I refused to wait up, I started a new race
It's funny when you think a nigga blew up after Lupe
Niggas treat me like I've been here for 10
Some niggas been here for a couple, never been here again
I'm on my King James shit, I'm tryna win here again
A young nigga tryna win here again, man, what's up?

Ayy, yeah, a young nigga tryin' to win here again
If I like her, I just fly her to the city I'm in
I got her drinkin' with your boy
I got her fucked up, shorty, aww yeah",124418
22433,116418,Hive,rap,Earl Sweatshirt,2013,1432840,"{""Vince Staples"",""Casey Veggies""}","
Promise Heron I'll put my fist up, after I get my dick sucked
Quick buck, maybe a gold chain
With that fuckin' flow that's-s so belittles, man
They tentatively tend to turn and go when I am finished
Stone cold, hardly fucking with these niggas - nigga, listen
The description doesn't fit, if not a synonym of menace
Then forget it - in turn, these critics and interns
Admittin' the shit spitted, just burn like six furnaces
Writ, it affixed, learnin' them digits and simultaneously
Dispellin' one-trick-pony myths, isn't he?
One adolescent, fuckin' six-nigga energy
And crawlin' down 'fax like a rich nigga centipede
Crack ceramic and slap a hand out of cash account
Stamp and shoutin', thrashin', these niggas done let the kraken out
Crack-a-lackin' like snap, crackle, poppin' your ammo off
Hide your face, and throw your flannels off, Sweatshirt, nigga


'87 rooftop, Bronson
Whippin' hoopties, tryna boost raw chronic
Brutus in that booth, double scoop, hock, vomit up
Subrocin' thud, knockin' niggas teeth-loose
Bruh, I don't fuck with no cop - rollin' with that flow swamp
Catch me over stove top - rappin' to that coke rock
Passionless in old Jive clothin', with them doors wide open
Dim the floor lights, focused like it's nothin', 'cause it's nothin', bitch

From a city that's recession-hit
Stress niggas could flex metal with peddle to rake pennies in
Desolate testaments, tryin' to stay Jekyll-ish
But most niggas Hyde, and Brenda just stay pregnant
Breakin' News: Death's less important when the Lakers lose
It's lead in that baby food, heads try to make it through
Fish-netted legs for them eyes that she cater to
Ride dirty as the fuckin' sky that you prayin' to
So here I sit, eye in the pyramid
God spit it like it's truth serum in that beer and then
*blow* - disappear again, reappear bearded
On top of a Lear, steerin' it into the kid's ear again
Provider of the backdrop music
For the crack rock user and the mascot, Earl
Rawer than a skinned knee cap on a blacktop
Salivary glands, lighter fluid for the matchbox
Strikin' - wait, wait, who the fuck you badder than?
Boy, oh boy, I'm bad as burnt - pollo off the grill and shit
Spitter of the Little Nick, nimble, rickrollin'
Bitch niggas pick litter, piff-blower, plus I pillage shit


'87 rooftop, Bronson
Whippin' hoopties, tryna boost raw chronic
Brutus in that booth, double scoop, hock, vomit up
Subrocin' thud, knockin' niggas teeth-loose
Bruh, I don't fuck with no cop - rollin' with that flow swamp
Catch me over stove top - rappin' to that coke rock
Passionless in old Jive clothin', with them doors wide open
Dim the floor lights, focused like it's nothin', 'cause it's nothin', bitch

Quit with all that tough talk
Bro, we know you niggas ain't about shit
Come around, we gun 'em down
Bodies piled, Auschwitz
Bulletproof outfits, weapons concealed
I'm ready to kill - so test it, all my weapons is real
Sellin' thizz, couldn't tell 'em what the recipe is
Got 'em wishin' that they never gave these weapons to kids
Cheers, send chills up spines of fat bitches
After shows throwin' out sandwiches
Niggas get it how they live and I live for money
Other words, I'm gettin' money
Lil Boy told me when it's time to ride, they'll send up for me
Ain't nobody scarin' me, niggas ain't prepared for heat
Tools hit like pool sticks, the way I cue shit
If this was '88, I would have signed to Ruthless
'94, would've had 'em walkin' down death row
First is when the best go, hate is what the rest do
Voice inside my head told me, ""Wet 'em if they test you""
So it's Raging Waters season
That yomper big as Larry Johnson, leave your momma seedless
Everybody hard until it's only God they seein'
Kitten soft but in they songs be trappin' hard as Jeezy
I don't believe it, but to each his own
I ain't trippin' long as I can reach the chrome
Heat your home like Southern California Gas, police pass
Tell 'em ""Free Smalls,"" off Palm with the heat drawn
Strapped up long as the chief of police armed
Raised where the beasts are, north of the Beach
A couple streets past Baby J, bony niggas sprayin' K's
Ruger with the pork face, Jewish for the court case
Here to save you niggas from the sorbet, Coldchain

Like it's nothin', 'cause it's nothin', bitch",124957
22634,119449,Tapout,rap,Rich Gang,2013,1959025,"{""Lil Wayne"",Birdman,""Nicki Minaj"",""Mack Maine"",Future,Detail}","
(Rich Gang!) If you hatin', you just need some pussy
(Rich Girl) She fucked up when she gave me some pussy
I said, ""I fuck you better than that other nigga""
She say, ""Tune I'm 'bout to cum,"" I say, ""I'm cummin' wit ya""
She don't like them pretty niggas, sidity niggas
She ride this dick, her titties jiggle, that's my pillows
That's because I sleep in that ho, hit it when I wake up
Tell the pigs I say ""As-salamu alaykum"", uhh
My bitch a choosy lover, never fuck without a rubber
Sweet yellow-bone thing, I call her Honey Mustard
Pussy like a seashell, dick like a V-12
She say I drive her crazy, I say, ""Just keep on your seatbelt""
Bend it over, bust it open for me
Baby bend it over, bust it open for me, yeah
She say she love me, she just loves this dick
Come put that million dollar pussy on me, make me rich
Tunechi! (Blatt!)


She got that million dollar
Million dollar ooh, ooh, ooh
She got that million dollar
Million dollar ooh, ooh, ooh
And all I want to do is touch it (touch it, touch it)
Ooh, ooh, ooh
Make her tap out, tap out
Tap out, tap out, tap out (yeah)
And I'ma make her tap out, tap out (all day, all night)
Tap out, tap out, tap out (yeah)

Crib made her tap out, sauna made her tap out
Jet made her tap out, pilot with the map out
Million on the diamonds, million on the kitchen
Millions on the Maybach, glass top ceilings
Million dollar pussy, sleepin' on Versace
Sleeping on Fendi, sleepin on Cavalli
Married to the money, millions in the bank
Alexander McQueen, rich in the paint


I got that fuck you if you love me on some nigga shit
She got the million dollar seven figure nigga rich
We switch positions like we doin' yoga in this bitch
She get to shakin' then stiff


She got that million dollar
Million dollar ooh, ooh, ooh
She got that million dollar
Million dollar ooh, ooh, ooh
And all I want to do is touch it (touch it, touch it)
Ooh, ooh, ooh
Make her tap out, tap out
Tap out, tap out, tap out
And I'ma make her tap out, tap out
Tap out, tap out, tap out

Million dollar pussy, million dollar pussy (mm)
Six inch, pumps, play with his balls, dunks
Bald head, yup, don't want no Forrest, Gumps
Don't let me tell ya, twice, already told ya, once
(Eat that pussy)
Who-who-who-who-who got that baddest pussy on the planet?
D-boys love me, they don't understand it
Ohhhhh, deep throat (Rich Girl)
M-m-m-m-million dollar pussy might pounce on that ass
Threw them hundreds 'til I lose counts on that ass
Max out all of them accounts on that ass
Million dollar checks don't bounce on that ass
Pull up in that ""You can't afford this""
Only rap bitch on the Forbes list
Pussy jewelry make em say ""burr man""
R-r-r-r-r-rubs hands like Birdman


She got that million dollar (Rich Gang)
Million dollar ooh, ooh, ooh (Rich Girl)
She got that million dollar
(Sexy Slim, I see you, paradise home, yeah)
Million dollar ooh, ooh, ooh
(Flossing while you're shining, jumping out of Bugattis)
And all I want to do is touch it (touch it, touch it)
Touch it and touch it and touch it, touch it
And I'ma make her tap out, tap out (Yeah)
Tap out, tap out, tap out (Fuck this money game up, wild out)
And I'ma make her tap out, tap out (Yeah)
Tap out, tap out, tap out (Sweet D! Love you, baby girl)

I'm in love with your Egyptian skin
And your talk about religion
I'm in prison with the pussy
And I'm ballin', no cushion",128243
22681,119690,Bitch Dont Kill My Vibe Remix,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2013,1187408,{JAY-Z},"


I am a sinner who's probably gonna sin again
Lord forgive me, Lord forgive me
Things I don't understand
Sometimes I need to be alone
Bitch don't kill my vibe, bitch don't kill my vibe
I can feel your energy from two planets away
I got my drink, I got my music
I would share it but today I'm yelling
Bitch, don't kill my vibe; bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe; bitch, don't kill my vibe


Look inside of my soul
And you can find gold and maybe get rich
Hol' up
Trinidad Jame$ in four weeks
But now my album platinum and shit, so what?
Y'all keep the numbers
I'm more than another statistic, my nigga
This courtesy of Compton (Courtesy of Compton)
Brooklyn go hard, motherfucker
Love me on the East like I'm Chuck D
Dominicans wish that I was born there
I'm lookin' to be the god MC
You look at my hat and see thorns there
I look at the game and see porn there
I'm fuckin' this industry hard
I'm bagging this money, tea-bagging your honey
You thought I was fresh out the yard
Don't cry to me dummy, you're a lightweight
They tell me you nice and I'm like ""wait""
Go get me a knife, you're looking like steak
And when the stakes are high, I stake out for days
And when the water reside, you're Bobby Boucher
But we ain't thirsty nigga, never alert me, nigga
I got a P89 in a suitcase
I know you heard me, nigga, this is a burpee, nigga
Lyrical exercise, right now, homie, I'm in the extra vibe
Pipe down, on the curb, when you heard that I got these words
To the upper echelon, that's excellent (That's excellent)

I am a sinner who's probably gonna sin again
Lord forgive me, Lord forgive me
Things I don't understand
Sometimes I need to be alone
Bitch don't kill my vibe, bitch don't kill my vibe
I can feel your energy from two planets away
I got my drink, I got my music
I would share it but today I'm yelling
Bitch, don't kill my vibe; bitch, don't kill my vibe
Bitch, don't kill my vibe; bitch, don't kill my vibe


Up in the clouds, me and my spouse
Rumors on the ground gettin' too loud
Please turn them shits down, can't hear myself think
Turbulence, shit, almost spilled my drink
In the White House with a mink
Running through that bitch like it's my house
All up in the hall like a mall
Told you motherfuckers, all I do is ball
No, I don't 'member you, I don't intend to
Empty my memory bank
It's a million dollars in it, baby, Hilary Swank
Sittin' next to Hillary smellin' like dank
Presidential pardon, name one nigga out there harder than him
I'll wait
I've been in my wave like 20 years straight
I've been on my vibe like 20 years straight
Don't fuck up my high, fuck up my high
Nights like this, I could fuck up a pie
An still be straight (still be straight)
Fall back, bitch, I got a lot on my plate
Don't waste my breath
I don't know how many moons a nigga got left
Back to this joint, smokin' this shit like I'm tryna' prove a point
I'm the highest, the highest title, numero uno
Kill my vibe, that's your motherfuckin' funeral

Between you and me, turn eulogy to urinals, niggas pissed off
I ministered this generation by far
Leader of the new school
On my toes like a ballerina, who knew I'd be Black Swan?
World in my palms, ironically
I am the Globetrotters' best 'cause I didn't drop the ball
Told niggas when I was 16
That I'd write a 16 to put a nigga right on the big screen
In the paddy wagon with six teens
Should have been in the pen
But now my pen write with morphine
I heal niggas, touch down with more fiends
I kill niggas, audio crack, khakis to meal ticket
Cardio lap, was running for dear life
But now I'm running the map, bitch, I'm here nigga
Picture lil' ole me giving a fuck for what a fuck nigga gotta say
Nigga, you never be Jay, never be Nas, never be Snoop nor Dre
You ain't get killed in Vegas or in a Suburban
Nigga, Puff Daddy wasn't your favorite
So many washed up with detergent
But I don't dry tears, I just aim at them on purpose
Like blah, Mini-14 like blah
Empty out another magazine like blah
Let a young nigga get by (Doot!)
I kill 'em all when they try to kill my vibe (Doot! Doot!)
I am the bad, the good god, the last the hood got
The last that would try to pass a good job
If Shawn's a black Beatle then I need a 10 second drum solo
Bitch see you at Woodstock, ah!",128497
22992,122887,Blurred Lines,pop,Robin Thicke,2013,4583633,"{T.I.,""Pharrell Williams""}","
Everybody get up
Everybody get up
Hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey (Uh)
Hey, hey, hey (Ha-ha! Woo!)
Tune me up


If you can't hear what I'm trying to say (Hey girl, come here!)
If you can't read from the same page (Hey)
Maybe I'm going deaf (Hey, hey, hey)
Maybe I'm going blind (Hey, hey, hey)
Maybe I'm out of my mind (Hey, hey, hey)
Everybody get up


Okay, now he was close
Tried to domesticate you
But you're an animal
Baby, it's in your nature (Meow)
Just let me liberate you (Hey, hey, hey)
You don't need no takers (Hey, hey, hey)
That man is not your maker (Hey, hey, hey)
And that's why I'm gon' take a (Everybody get up)

Good girl
I know you want it (Hey)
I know you want it
I know you want it
You're a good girl
Can't let it get past me
You're far from plastic (Alright)
Talkin' 'bout getting blasted
I hate these blurred lines
I know you want it (Hey)
I know you want it (Oh yeah)
I know you want it
But you're a good girl
The way you grab me
Must wanna get nasty
Go ahead, get at me
Everybody get up (Come on!)


What do they make dreams for (Why?)
When you got them jeans on? (Why?)
What do we need steam for?
You the hottest bitch in this place
I feel so lucky (Hey, hey, hey)
You wanna hug me (Hey, hey, hey)
What rhymes with hug me? (Hey, hey, hey)
Hey! (Everybody get up)

Okay, now he was close
Tried to domesticate you
But you're an animal
Baby, it's in your nature (Uh-huh)
Just let me liberate you (Hey, hey, hey) (Uh-huh)
You don't need no takers (Hey, hey, hey) (Uh-huh)
That man is not your maker (Hey, hey, hey) (Uh-huh)
And that's why I'm gon' take a (Everybody get up)


Good girl
I know you want it
I know you want it (Hey)
I know you want it
You're a good girl
Can't let it get past me (Hey)
You're far from plastic (Oh)
Talkin' 'bout getting blasted (Everybody get up)
I hate these blurred lines (Hate them lines)
I know you want it (I hate them lines)
I know you want it (I hate them lines)
I know you want it
But you're a good girl (Good girl)
The way you grab me
Must wanna get nasty
Go ahead, get at me (Everybody get up)

Hustle Gang, homie
Let go
Ay say Rob, let me holla at 'em real quick
One thing I ask of you
Let me be the one you back that ass up to (Come on!)
Go from Malibu to Paris, boo (Yeah)
Had a bitch, but she ain't bad as you
So, hit me up when you pass through
I'll give you something big enough to tear your ass in two
Swag on 'em even when you dress casual
I mean, it's almost unbearable (Everybody get up)
In a hundred years not dare would I
Pull a Pharcyde, let you pass me by
Nothin' like your last guy, he too square for you
He don't smack that ass and pull your hair like that
So I'm just watchin' and waitin'
For you to salute the true big pimpin' (Okay)
Not many women can refuse this pimpin'
I'm a nice guy, but don't get it confused, get pimpin' (Everybody get up)


Shake your rump
Get down, get up-a
Do it like it hurt, like it hurt
What, you don't like work?
Hey! (Everybody get up)


Baby, can you breathe?
I got this from Jamaica
It always works for me
Dakota to Decatur (Uh-huh)
No more pretending (Hey, hey, hey) (Uh-huh)
'Cause now you're winning (Hey, hey, hey) (Uh-huh)
Here's our beginning (Hey, hey, hey) (Uh-huh)
I always wanted a


You're a good girl (Everybody get up)
I know you want it (Hey)
I know you want it
I know you want it
You're a good girl
Can't let it get past me (Oh yeah)
You're far from plastic (Alright)
Talkin' 'bout getting blasted
I hate these blurred lines (Everybody get up)
I know you want it (Hey)
I know you want it (Oh yeah)
I know you want it
But you're a good girl
The way you grab me
Must wanna get nasty (Hey)
Go ahead, get at me


Everybody get up
Everybody get up
Hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey",131845
23043,123146,A Whole New World,pop,Lea Salonga & Brad Kane,1992,1374713,{},"
I can show you the world
Shining, shimmering, splendid
Tell me, Princess
Now when did you last let your heart decide?
I can open your eyes
Take you wonder by wonder
Over, sideways and under
On a magic carpet ride

A whole new world
A new fantastic point of view
No one to tell us no
Or where to go
Or say we're only dreaming


A whole new world
A dazzling place I never knew
But when I'm way up here
It's crystal clear
That now, I'm in a whole new world with you

Now I'm in a whole new world with you


Unbelievable sights
Indescribable feeling
Soaring, tumbling, freewheeling
Through an endless diamond sky


A whole new world (Don't you dare close your eyes)
A hundred thousand things to see (Hold your breath, it gets better)
I'm like a shooting star
I've come so far
I can't go back to where I used to be


A whole new world (Every turn a surprise)
With new horizons to pursue (Every moment red-letter)


I'll chase them anywhere
There's time to spare
Let me share this whole new world with you


A whole new world

A whole new world


That's where we'll be


That's where we'll be


A thrilling chase


A wondrous place


For you and me",132111
23225,124369,IFHY,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2013,1638323,"{""Pharrell Williams"",""Tyler / The Creator""}","
I never would've thought that
Feelings could get thrown in the air
'Cause I accidentally caught that
I need some new boxing gloves
Shit got hectic whenever I fought back
For example, ten minutes can't go past without you brushing my thoughts
That's fourteen forty a day so I'll say a hundred and forty-four times
I think about you or something like that
Lost match, the fucking thought of you with somebody else
I don't like that; cellular convos getting left in the wrong
'Cause I get so fucking mad when you don't write back
This isn't a song, I just happen to rhyme when I get emo
And find time to write facts, fuck
I love you
Can we add some more color, um, like, some more, yellow?
Yeah, that's good


I fucking hate you, but I love you
I'm bad at keeping my emotions bubbled
You're good at being perfect
We're good at being troubled, yeah
I fucking hate you, but I love you
I'm bad at keeping my emotions bubbled
You're good at being perfect
We're good at being troubled, yeah

Girl, you fucking with my emotions
The fuck is all this noise about?
I even considered picking up smoking
You turned to a bitch, who let the dogs out?
But in my dog house
My bitch is the raddest
Crazy who makes me the happiest can make me the saddest
Look Alice, let's get lost in your wonder-er-land, fuck an atlas
You're perfectly perfect for me
What the fuck is this, practice?
Actually, if you even consider leaving
I'll lose a couple screws in due time, I'll stop breathin'
And you'll see the meaning of stalkin'
When I pop out the dark to find you
And that new dude that you're seein' with an attitude
Then proceed to fuck up your evenin'
Make sure you never meet again like goddamn vegans
'Cause when I hear your name, I cannot stop cheesin'
I love you so much that my heart stops beatin' when you're leavin'
And I'm grievin' and my heart starts bleedin'
Life without you has no goddamn meanin'
Sorry, I'm passive-aggressive for no goddamn reason
It's that my mood change like these goddamn seasons
I fall for you, but I love you

I'm bad at keeping my emotions bubbled
You're good at being perfect
We're good at being troubled
Yeah


The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it
The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it
The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it tonight
The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it
The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it
The sky's falling bitch, let's try to catch it tonight


C'mon baby, even though I hate you, I still love you
I love you
And Salem, my love (I know)
I'm passive aggressive (I'm sorry, fuck)
(Come here)
I like when we hold hands
(You're the best around)
See I get jealous (Fuck)
And if I see that nigga (If I see him)
I just might kill him, haha (Look)
(Look, I wanna strangle you, 'til you stop breathing)
Love, love, love
(Spend the rest of my life, looking for air)
(so you can breathe, or we can die together, you and me)
(Fuck, look)
I'm in love (Love)

I fucking hate you, but I love you
I'm bad at keeping my emotions bubbled
You're good at being perfect
We're good at being troubled, yeah
I fucking hate you, but I love you
I'm bad at keeping my emotions bubbled
You're good at being perfect
We're good at being troubled, yeah


""Yo, why is Samuel such a fucking dick?""
""He isn't such a badass actually. He's only here because he ran away, because some shit happened back home. He's actually a dweeb""
""Yo, what happened?""",133410
23497,125916,Still into You,rock,Paramore,2013,1020844,{},"
Can't count the years on one hand
That we've been together
I need the other one to hold you
Make you feel, make you feel better
It's not a walk in the park
To love each other
But when our fingers interlock
Can't deny, can't deny you're worth it


'Cause after all this time, I'm still into you


I should be over all the butterflies
But I'm into you (I'm into you)
And baby even on our worst nights
I'm into you (I'm into you)
Let 'em wonder how we got this far
'Cause I don't really need to wonder at all
Yeah, after all this time, I'm still into you

Recount the night that I first met your mother
And on the drive back to my house
I told you that, I told you that I loved ya
You felt the weight of the world
Fall off your shoulder
And to your favorite song
We sang along to the start of forever


And after all this time, I'm still into you


I should be over all the butterflies
But I'm into you (I'm into you)
And baby, even on our worst nights
I'm into you (I'm into you)
Let 'em wonder how we got this far
'Cause I don't really need to wonder at all
Yeah, after all this time, I'm still into you


Well, some things just, some things just make sense
And one of those is you and I (Hey)
Some things just, some things just make sense
And even after all this time (Hey)
I'm into you
Baby, not a day goes by
That I'm not into you

I should be over all the butterflies
But I'm into you (I'm into you)
And baby, even on our worst nights
I'm into you (I'm into you)
Let 'em wonder how we got this far
'Cause I don't really need to wonder at all
Yeah, after all this time, I'm still into you


I'm still into you
I'm still into you",135048
23546,126242,Let Her Go,pop,Passenger,2012,1460486,{},"



Well you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
And you let her go...


Staring at the bottom of your glass
Hoping one day you'll make a dream last
But dreams come slow and they go so fast
You see her when you close your eyes
Maybe one day you'll understand why
Everything you touch surely dies


But you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go

Staring at the ceiling in the dark
Same old empty feeling in your heart
'Cause love comes slow and it goes so fast
Well you see her when you fall asleep
But never to touch and never to keep
'Cause you loved her too much and you dived too deep


Well you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
And you let her go...


Oh, oh, woah, oh, oh
And you let her go
Oh, oh, woah, oh, oh
When you let her go
Whoa


'Cause you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
'Cause you only need the light when it's burning low
Only miss the sun when it starts to snow
Only know you love her when you let her go
Only know you've been high when you're feeling low
Only hate the road when you're missing home
Only know you love her when you let her go
And you let her go...",135402
23793,128353,Young and Beautiful,pop,Lana Del Rey,2013,1751863,{},"
I've seen the world, done it all
Had my cake now
Diamonds, brilliant, and Bel Air now
Hot summer nights, mid-July
When you and I were forever wild
The crazy days, city lights
The way you'd play with me like a child


Will you still love me when I'm no longer young and beautiful?
Will you still love me when I got nothing but my aching soul?
I know you will, I know you will, I know that you will
Will you still love me when I'm no longer beautiful?


I've seen the world, lit it up as my stage now
Channeling angels in the new age now
Hot summer days, rock and roll
The way you'd play for me at your show
And all the ways I got to know
Your pretty face and electric soul

Will you still love me when I'm no longer young and beautiful?
Will you still love me when I got nothing but my aching soul?
I know you will, I know you will, I know that you will
Will you still love me when I'm no longer beautiful?


Dear Lord, when I get to heaven
Please, let me bring my man
When he comes, tell me that You'll let him in
Father, tell me if You can
All that grace, all that body
All that face makes me wanna party
He's my sun, he makes me shine like diamonds


Will you still love me when I'm no longer young and beautiful?
Will you still love me when I got nothin' but my aching soul?
I know you will, I know you will, I know that you will
Will you still love me when I'm no longer beautiful?


Will you still love me when I'm no longer beautiful?
Will you still love me when I'm not young and beautiful?",137656
23856,129038,Take Me Home Country Roads,country,John Denver,1971,1221236,{},"
Almost Heaven, West Virginia
Blue Ridge Mountains, Shenandoah River
Life is old there, older than the trees
Younger than the mountains, growing like a breeze


Country roads, take me home
To the place I belong
West Virginia, mountain mama
Take me home, country roads


All my memories gather 'round her
Miner's lady, stranger to blue water
Dark and dusty, painted on the sky
Misty taste of moonshine, teardrop in my eye


Country roads, take me home
To the place I belong
West Virginia, mountain mama
Take me home, country roads

I hear her voice in the morning hour, she calls me
The radio reminds me of my home far away
Driving down the road, I get a feeling
That I should have been home yesterday, yesterday


Country roads, take me home
To the place I belong
West Virginia, mountain mama
Take me home, country roads
Country roads, take me home
To the place I belong
West Virginia, mountain mama
Take me home, country roads


Take me home, (Down) country roads
Take me home, (Down) country roads",138406
23993,130013,Get Lucky,pop,Daft Punk,2013,4046991,"{""Pharrell Williams"",""Nile Rodgers""}","
Like the legend of the phoenix, huh
All ends with beginnings
What keeps the planet spinning, uh-huh
The force from the beginning
Look


We've come too far
To give up who we are
So let's raise the bar
And our cups to the stars


She's up all night 'til the sun
I'm up all night to get some
She's up all night for good fun
I'm up all night to get lucky
We're up all night 'til the sun
We're up all night to get some
We're up all night for good fun
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky

The present has no ribbon
Your gift keeps on giving
What is this I'm feeling?
If you wanna leave, I'm with it, uh-huh


We've come too far
To give up who we are
So let's raise the bar
And our cups to the stars


She's up all night 'til the sun
I'm up all night to get some
She's up all night for good fun
I'm up all night to get lucky
We're up all night 'til the sun
We're up all night to get some
We're up all night for good fun
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky

She's up all night 'til the sun
I'm up all night to get some
She's up all night for good fun
I'm up all night to get lucky
We're up all night 'til the sun
We're up all night to get some
We're up all night for good fun
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky


She's up all night 'til the sun
I'm up all night to get some
She's up all night for good fun
I'm up all night to get lucky
We're up all night 'til the sun
We're up all night to get some
We're up all night for good fun
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky

We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get
We're up all night to get back together
We're up all night to get (Let's get funked again)
We're up all night to get (Funky)
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky


We've come too far
To give up who we are
So let's raise the bar
And our cups to the stars


She's up all night 'til the sun
I'm up all night to get some
She's up all night for good fun
I'm up all night to get lucky
We're up all night 'til the sun
We're up all night to get some
We're up all night for good fun
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky


We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky
We're up all night to get lucky",139968
24134,131273,No New Friends,rap,DJ Khaled,2013,1550794,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Rick Ross"",Drake}","
Another one
Yeah, I stay down with my day-one niggas
And we in the club, screamin'


No new friends, no new friends
No new friends, no, no new (DJ Khaled)
Still here with my day-one niggas
So you hear me say no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new
I still ride with my day-one niggas
I don't really need no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new
I stay down from day one, so I say
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
One more time
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas, stay down from day one, so I say
(Fuck a fake friend! Where your real friends at? Started!)

Man, this shit so ill that we had to restart it
H-town my second home like I'm James Harden
Money counter go *brrrr* when you sellin' out the Garden
Four-car garage, pornstar ménage
Birdman go *brrrr* 'cause he know this shit retarded
Fuck her on the floor 'fore we make it to the bed
That's what yo' ass really call started from the bottom
Yes, Lord, OVO Sound, man, I'm proud of my niggas
Knew that we would make it, never doubted my niggas
All my bitches love me; if I had a baby mama
She would probably be richer than a lot of you niggas
Ayy, that's luxury, dawg
Day-one niggas, man, y'all stuck with me, dawg
Ever since YouTube, niggas been callin' me the leader of the new school; fuck with me, dawg, yeah


No new friends, no new friends
No new friends, no, no new
Still here with my day-one niggas
So you hear me say no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new (Let's ride)
I still ride with my day-one niggas
I don't really need no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new
I stay down from day one, so I say
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
One more time
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas (Maybach)
Fuck all y'all niggas, stay down from day one, so I say

Your bitch all in my photographs
Ho niggas got hate for me
Big homies all certified
Nothin' niggas gon' take from me
Follow codes, study game
Feed fam, nigga, fuck fame
All black, my whip foreign
These bad hoes keep tiptoein'
Down in Turks and Caicos
Dope boy, that's my dress code
All I hug is blood, nigga
Khaled, that's my flesh, ho
All I want is love, nigga
Money bring that stress though
Smoke good, I love life
Strip club like e'ry night
E'ry night my same niggas
Day one, straight menace (Rozay!)


No new friends, no new friends
No new friends, no, no new (Huh, Maybach Music)
Still here with my day one niggas
So you hear me say no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new (Let's ride)
I still ride with my day one niggas
I don't really need no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new
I stay down from day one, so I say (Let's go)
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
One more time
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas, stay down from day one, so I say
(Fuck a fake friend! Where your real friends at?)

Ugh, I'm here with my niggas
I'm too high to be friendly
They throw dirt on my name
Well, that's why they still dig me
And I'm tired of all this hatin'
I thank God for my patience
I thank God for my homies
I wish we could trade places
Bitch, we good-fellas
Boy, all them niggas with you, they just pall bearers
And if we ball, catch us
Remember sip slow, live fast
Young Money, stay young
I been Cash Money since day one (Tunechi!)


No new friends, no new friends (Khaled fuck wit me)
No new friends, no, no new
Still here with my day one niggas
So you hear me say no new friends (Sue em)
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new (Let's ride)
I still ride with my day one niggas
I don't really need no new friends
No new friends, no new friends, no, no new
I stay down from day one, so I say
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas (Uh) except my niggas
One more time
Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck all y'all niggas, stay down from day one, so I say


Fuck all y'all niggas except my niggas
Fuck them other niggas
'Cause I'm down for my niggas",140752
24145,131320,Girls Love Beyoncé,rap,Drake,2013,2256692,"{""James Fauntleroy""}","
Look, I know girls love Beyoncé
Girls love to fuck with your conscience
Girls hate when niggas go missing
And shawty you ain't no different
These days it's hard to meet women
Feel like my love life is finished
I've been avoiding commitment
That's why I'm in this position
I'm scared to let somebody in on this
No new friends, no, no, no
You know how this shit go
You got your fair share of admirers that call your phone
You try to act like it's just me, but I am not alone
But if you're alone, then


Say my name, say my name
When no one is around you
Say, ""Baby, I love you""
If you ain't running games
Say my name, say my name
You actin' kinda shady, baby
Why the sudden change?
Say my name
Say my name
Say my name
Say my name, say my name
If no one is around you

Yeah, uh
Say my name, say my name
'Cause those other men are practice
And this ain't no time for actin'
And this ain't no time for games
And this ain't no time for uncertainty
And this ain't no time for locking your phone and not coming home
And startin' some shit when I'm in the zone
This is why I've been saying
No new friends, no, no, no
You know how this shit goes
This is not four years ago
Time escapes me
Now forget how it felt when this shit move slow
I come through in whips that make a young boy take the long way home
All my young boys 'round me saying, ""Get money and fuck these hoes""
Where we learn these values? I do not know what to tell you
I'm just trying to find a reason not to go out every evening
I need someone that'll help me think of someone besides myself
I need someone I leave through the front door with
'Cause we don't wanna hide no more
Plus you're not shy no more
Neither of us wanna play the side no more
No, I'm not alone
Even though nothing was the same
Let me get your ass alone
Let me make you say my name
Say my name

Say my name, say my name
When no one is around you
Say, ""Baby, I love you""
If you ain't running games
Say my name, say my name
You actin' kinda shady, baby
Why the sudden change?
Say my name
Say my name
Say my name
Say my name, say my name
If no one is around you",140797
24452,134913,The Seven Ages of Man All the worlds a stage,misc,William Shakespeare,1623,1764707,{},"
All the world's a stage,
And all the men and women merely players;
They have their exits and their entrances,
And one man in his time plays many parts,
His acts being seven ages. At first the infant,
Mewling and puking in the nurse's arms;
And then the whining schoolboy, with his satchel
And shining morning face, creeping like snail
Unwillingly to school. And then the lover,
Sighing like furnace, with a woeful ballad
Made to his mistress' eyebrow. Then a soldier,
Full of strange oaths, and bearded like the pard,
Jealous in honor, sudden and quick in quarrel,
Seeking the bubble reputation
Even in the cannon's mouth. And then the justice,
In fair round belly with good capon lined,
With eyes severe and beard of formal cut,
Full of wise saws and modern instances;
And so he plays his part. The sixth age shifts
Into the lean and slippered pantaloon,
With spectacles on nose and pouch on side;
His youthful hose, well saved, a world too wide
For his shrunk shank; and his big manly voice,
Turning again toward childish treble, pipes
And whistles in his sound. Last scene of all,
That ends this strange eventful history,
Is second childishness and mere oblivion,
Sans teeth, sans eyes, sans taste, sans everything.

Welcome. Set down your venerable burthen
And let him feed...",144742
24541,135616,Counting Stars,pop,OneRepublic,2013,1313601,{},"
Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be countin' stars
Yeah, we'll be countin' stars


I see this life, like a swinging vine
Swing my heart across the line
And in my face is flashing signs
Seek it out and ye' shall find


Old, but I'm not that old
Young, but I'm not that bold
And I don't think the world is sold
On just doing what we're told


I feel something so right doin' the wrong thing
I feel something so wrong doin' the right thing
I couldn't lie, couldn't lie, couldn't lie
Everything that kills me makes me feel alive

Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be countin' stars
Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be, we'll be countin' stars


I feel your love and I feel it burn
Down this river, every turn
Hope is our four-letter word
Make that money, watch it burn


Old, but I'm not that old
Young, but I'm not that bold
And I don't think the world is sold
On just doing what we're told


I feel something so wrong doin' the right thing
I couldn't lie, couldn't lie, couldn't lie
Everything that drowns me makes me wanna fly

Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be countin' stars
Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be, we'll be countin' stars


Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I learned
Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I learned
Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I learned
Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I learned


Everything that kills me makes me feel alive


Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be countin' stars
Lately, I've been, I've been losin' sleep
Dreamin' about the things that we could be
But baby, I've been, I've been prayin' hard
Said no more countin' dollars, we'll be, we'll be counting stars

Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I've learned
Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I've learned
Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I've learned
Take that money, watch it burn
Sink in the river the lessons I've learned",145495
24582,136079,Waves,pop,Mr. Probz,2013,1089333,{},"
My face above the water
My feet can't touch the ground
Touch the ground, and it feels like
I can see the sands on the horizon
Everytime you are not around


I'm slowly drifting away (drifting away)
Wave after wave, wave after wave
I'm slowly drifting (drifting away)
And it feels like I'm drowning
Pulling against the stream
Pulling against the stream


I wish I could make it easy
Easy to love me, love me
But still I reach, to find a way
I'm stuck here in between
I'm looking for the right words to say

I'm slowly drifting, drifting away
Wave after wave, wave after wave
I'm slowly drifting (drifting away)
And it feels like I'm drowning
Pulling against the stream
Pulling against the stream",145970
24708,137060,Favorite Song,rap,Chance the Rapper,2013,1613348,"{""Childish Gambino""}","
Chance, acid rapper, soccer, hacky sacker
Cocky khaki jacket jacker
Slap-happy faggot slapper, bah-bah
Iraqi rocket launcher
Shake that Laffy Taffy, jolly raunchy rapper
Dang, dang, dang, skeet, skeet, skeet
She do that thing for three retweets
The album feel like '92
Now take that ball 'fore he three-peat
Chance, ho, acid, cruising on that LSD
Asked Joseph about my deal
He looked back said, ""Hell yeah, let's eat""


This shit my favorite song, you just don't know the words
But I still fuck with you, you just ain't never heard
It go like, count that stack, pop that cap then down that Jack
All my niggas hit that xan, and all my ladies bob that back
This my jam, this my jam, this my jam, this my jam
I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam
This my jam, this my jam, this my jam, this my jam
I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm bout that jam

Young Rascal Flatts, young ass kid ass could rap
Fuck all the faculty, tobacco-packing acrobat
Back-to-back packin' bags back and forth with fifths of Jack and
Fourths of weed, I'm back to pack on hands
With young Cletus to pat my back
Real nigga with a nose ring, that's right
Just here to rap them songs
Rag on my hair, wrap weed in Vegas, rockin' Vagabonds
Sang a song, oh, you don't know? What?
Well, I still bang with you
Hang with you, sip drank with you
As long as I can sang with you like


This shit my favorite song, you just don't know the words
But I still fuck with you, you just ain't never heard
It go like, count that stack, pop that cap then down that Jack
All my niggas hit that xan, and all my ladies bob that back
This my jam, this my jam, this my jam, this my jam
I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam
This my jam, this my jam, this my jam, this my jam
I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm bout that jam


Niggas, please be focused, that Bino, you know this
He rep the home of Sosas, you know I'm from that Zone 6
You know I rep that Stone shit, you know your hood is so clit
As God as my witness, this Will Smith spit real shit
I'ma be that, CG busy gettin', where the weed at?
Bought your girl some new kneepads
You're fuckin' with the Fifi bag
My stars, egad, she said, ""This my favorite song""
""Hold my purse"", now she on the floor, droppin' like it's hot
You blast this shit in Abercrombie when your work is finished
Your mom won't play it in the car 'cause it got cursing in it
Your boy like, ""I'm the one who showed you""
He want his percentage
'Cause you were like, ""This ain't the nigga you said spittin', is it?""
Two-step, white dude's Harlem Shake
Why you laughing? 'Cause you Harlem Shake
I was never fake, I was just too good to be true
That's acid rap, we killed the track
You had your chance, and 'Bino too, ooh

This shit my favorite song, you just don't know the words
But I still fuck with you, you just ain't never heard
It go like, count that stack, pop that cap then down that Jack
All my niggas hit that xan, and all my ladies bob that back
This my jam, this my jam, this my jam, this my jam
I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam
This my jam, this my jam, this my jam, this my jam
I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm 'bout that jam, I'm bout that jam",146855
24710,137069,Cocoa Butter Kisses,rap,Chance the Rapper,2013,2582961,"{Twista,""VIC MENSA""}","
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na, igh
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na, igh


Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses
I miss my cocoa butter kisses
Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I miss my cocoa butter kisses


Okie dokie, alkie, keep it low-key like Thor lil' bro
Or he'll go blow the loudy, saudy of sour Saudi
Wiley up off peyote, wilin' like that coyote
If I sip any Henny, my belly just might be outie
Pull up inside a huggy, Starsky & Hutch a dougie
I just opened up the pack, in an hour I'll ash my lucky
Tonight she just yelling ""Fuck me""
Two weeks she'll be yelling ""Fuck me""
Used to like orange cassette tapes with Timmy, Tommy, and Chuckie
And Chuck E. Cheese's pizzas, Jesus pieces, sing Jesus love me
Put Visine inside my eyes so my grandma would fucking hug me
Oh, generation above me, I know you still remember me
My afro look just like daddy's, y'all taught me how to go hunting, blam

Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I miss my cocoa butter kisses
Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank (Innanet)
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Innanet)
(Kisses, kisses)


I will smoke a little something but I don't inhale
Everywhere that I go, everywhere, they be asking how's it going
Say the going's well, go figure, Victor's light skinned
Jesus got me feeling like Colin Powell, all praise to the God
God knows he's a pro, he's a pro like COINTEL
Check, checkmate, check me, take me to the bedroom
Like she know me well, I mean normally
You see Norma Jean wouldn't kick it with Farmer Phil
But these kids these days, they get so high
Burn trees, smoke chlorophyll, 'til they can't feel shit
Shit-faced, faced it, 15 hits on this L
Elevated, train, and the craziest thing
Got me feeling like Lauryn Hill, miseducated, my dick delegated
Rap Bill Bellamy, they said I shoulda never made it
Probably shoulda been dead or in jail
Deadbeat dad, enough of that jazz
Asshole, absinthe, thumpin' that glass
Are we there yet? Ice cubes in a bong
Rip, brain-dead, take a tug and then pass

I think we all addicted
Yeah, I think we all addicted
Really though, I think we all addicted (Yah)
I think we all addicted


Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my memories, my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I think we all addicted (Kisses, kisses)


Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I miss my cocoa butter kisses


I could make a flow, pitter patter with a patter pitter, juicy
Used to be in a jalabiya and a kufi
Trying hard not to be addicted to a groupie
I ended up on an album cover in a Coogi
You see, I be still a God but a goofy
You be flowing about drugs and a Uzi
That's the dual principle, sometimes I'ma be about some hoes
Sometimes I'ma wanna make a movie
And when it come to rapping fast, I'm the Higgs Boson (Yeah)
And though my style freakish
I could still break your body down to five pieces like I did Voltron
'Cause I'm addicted to the craft and I be off a OG
Know me, I'm the Obi-Wan Kenobi of the dope, see (What?)
Never scared of mean spirits, methamphetamine lyrics
Cooler like I'm off of codeine, low key
Don't be so judgmental, even though I'm reminiscing
If I don't know what I miss is
I'ma end up figuring out that it's home
And my mother and my grandmother cocoa butter kisses
This is just a testament to the ones that raised me
The ones that I praise and I'm thanking
I need 'em but the chronic all up in my clothes
And I wanna get a hug, and I can't 'cause I'm stanking
Never too old for a spanking, IGH!

Cigarettes on cigarettes, my momma think I stank
I got burn holes in my memories, my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I think we all addicted (Kisses, kisses)


Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
I miss my cocoa butter kisses (Kisses, kisses)
Cigarettes on cigarettes, my mama think I stank
I got burn holes in my hoodies, all my homies think it's dank
I miss my cocoa butter kisses
I miss my cocoa butter kisses



",146864
24711,137070,Pusha Man/Paranoia,rap,Chance the Rapper,2013,1318043,"{""Lili K"",""Nate Fox""}","


Ten damn days
And all I got to show for it is shoes and shows
And chauffeurs with road rage
Still the same damn ad-lib: IGH!, old ways
Still got a letterman, no practice
Still got a burner, man, no lacking
Still outtin' Jams nigga, no Jackson
No Jordan and we toe-tagging
I'll take you to the land where the lake made of sand
And the milk don't pour and the honey don't dance
And the money ain't yours
Now it's just a red pill
Got a blue and a handful of Advils
I'm the new Nitty, fuck it, Nitty the old me
So I'ma tell the buyer what Nitty told me


I got that mmm, mmm, I got that goddamn
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man
Pimp slappin', toe taggin', I'm just tryna fight the man
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man
I got that mmm, mmm, I got that goddamn
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man
Pimp slappin', toe taggin', I'm just tryna fight the man
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man

You a laaaaaaaame
And your bitch break down my weed sometimes
See my face in the streets, in the tweets
And a Reader or a RedEye if you read Sun-Times
She got blisters on her knees, she's a fiend for the D
Even though I only beat one time
One time, it was one two times
It was two plus me equals threesome time
Shouts out to Nate, I jackball and I bop, I flex
Got neck from all these thots I sex
Rastafari them shottas, yes
House safari, mi casa, yes
Poppy fields of that popeye
She came to party, she popped a molly
Said, ""Come to Papa"", she said, ""Papa, yes""


I got that mmm, mmm, I got that goddamn
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man
Pimp slappin', toe taggin', I'm just tryna fight the man
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man
I got that mmm, mmm, I got that goddamn
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man
Pimp slappin', toe taggin', I'm just tryna fight the man
I'm your pusha man, I'm your, I'm your pusha man



I've been riding around with my blunt on my lips
With the sun in my eyes and my gun on my hip
Paranoia on my mind, got my mind on the fritz
But a lot of niggas dyin', so my 9 with the shits
I've been riding around with my blunt on my lips
With the sun in my eyes and my gun on my hip
Paranoia on my mind, got my mind on the fritz
But a lot of niggas dyin', so my 9 with the shits


Move to the neighborhood; I bet they don't stay for good, watch
Somebody'll steal daddy's Rollie, call it the neighborhood watch
Pray for a safer hood when my paper good, watch
Captain Save-a-Hood, hood savior, baby boy
Still getting ID'd for Swishers (Mama still wash my clothes)
Still with the Save Money militia (I'ma still watch my bros)
Trapped in the middle of the map
With a little-bitty rock and a little bit of rap
That, with a literary knack
And a little shitty Mac, and like literally jack


I've been riding around with my blunt on my lips
With the sun in my eyes and my gun on my hip
Paranoia on my mind, got my mind on the fritz
But a lot of niggas dyin', so my 9 with the shits
I've been riding around with my blunt on my lips
With the sun in my eyes and my gun on my hip
Paranoia on my mind, got my mind on the fritz
But a lot of niggas dyin', so my 9 with the shits

They murking kids, they murder kids here
Why you think they don't talk about it? They deserted us here
Where the fuck is Matt Lauer at?
Somebody get Katie Couric in here
Probably scared of all the refugees
Look like we had a fuckin' hurricane here
They'll be shooting whether it's dark or not
I mean, the days is pretty dark a lot
Down here, it's easier to find a gun
Than it is to find a fucking parking spot
No love for the opposition, specifically a cop position
'Cause they've never been in our position
Getting violations from the nation, correlating, you dry snitchin'


I've been riding around with my blunt on my lips
With the sun in my eyes and my gun on my hip
Paranoia on my mind, got my mind on the fritz
But a lot of niggas dyin', so my 9 with the shits
I've been riding around with my blunt on my lips
With the sun in my eyes and my gun on my hip
Paranoia on my mind, got my mind on the fritz
But a lot of niggas dyin', so my 9 with the shits


I know you scared
You should ask us if we scared too
I know you scared
Me too
I know you scared
You should ask us if we scared too
If you was there
Then we'd just knew you cared too


It just got warm out, this the shit I've been warned 'bout
I hope that it storm in the mornin', I hope that it's pourin' out
I hate crowded beaches, I hate the sound of fireworks
And I ponder what's worse
Between knowing it's over and dyin' first
'Cause everybody dies in the summer
Wanna say your goodbyes, tell them while it's spring
I heard everybody's dying in the summer
So pray to God for a little more spring


I know you scared
You should ask us if we scared too
If you was there
Then we'd just knew you cared too",146865
24723,137132,Lost,rap,Chance the Rapper,2013,1038411,{Noname},"
My druggy, love me, when I'm ugly, hug me
When I'm bummy, scummy, I'm your hubby
Let's get lost
Let's get lost


Damn, I'm in so deep, girl, probably 'cause you're empty
You can't even speak (Igh), damn, your mouth so minty
Ooh, your mama hate me, daddy wouldn't let you
If he ever met me, if he ever met you
Put that shit behind us and put this in your sinus
Mine is all up in my gums, minus all that shit it's lined with
I say oh-oh-oh-oh, you been scratchin', you been fiendin'
I'ma fix you, I'ma fuck you, I'ma get rid of them demons
It's my


My druggy, when I'm ugly, hug me
When I'm bummy, scummy, I'm your hubby
Let's get lost, let's get lost

Damn, I need a minute, aight, leggo
She fell in love, it fell apart, aight, let go
She met her match, I let her match
She lit her match, she let me smoke
Yeah, me mad petty, yeah, me bogus
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, me know
Yeah, she knew too (Igh), it made her love it
Her pussy like me, her heart like, ""Fuck it""
So dance for daddy like Gator
Ain't no partners on this trip
And lose yourself in my room
And find yourself in my grip
I'm sayin'


My druggy, when I'm ugly, hug me
When I'm bummy, scummy, I'm your hubby
Let's get lost, let's get lost


I blessed myself inside your arms one day
Swear to God there I was when the dress
And the silver buttons fade away
Miss Mary Mattress, geriatrics
Fuck me into open caskets, I wanna die with this
I wanna stop seeing my psychiatrist
She said ""Pill pop, baby girl, 'cause I promise you, you tweaked
The empty bottled loneliness, this happiness you seek
The masochism that you preach
Practice backflips, tragic actress
On a movie with no screen
When the only time he loves me is naked in my dreams

My druggy, when I'm ugly, hug me
When I'm bummy, scummy, I'm your hubby
Let's get lost, let's get lost
Igh",146915
24732,137185,Ginseng Strip 2002,rap,Yung Lean,2013,1051799,{},"
2003
Arizona Iced Out Boys
Yung Leandoer, shawty
Emotional boys, 2001
Emotional shawties in this bitch
Makaveli


Bitches come and go, brah
But you know I stay
Bitches come and go, brah
But you know I stay
Got my balls licked
By a Zooey Deschanel look-alike cocaine addict
Razor blade to your head
Conflict, I'm a contradicted shit
Peeing on old people's houses is an inflict
2003 shit
This ain't no splitting bills shit
I'ma peel banana skids
While listenin' to R. Kelly's greatest hits

Yung Lean in the club
For some morphine (Morphine)
Yung Lean up in the club
For some morphine (Morphine)


Poppin' pills like zits
While someone vomits on your mosquito tits
Slitting wrists while dark evil spirits like Slytherin
Slither in with tricks, I'm sick
Acid trip makes my spitting sick
And makes me start hitting chicks
Knitting thick, shitting quick, fitting dick
Like transmitting shit with an AIDS stick
Think you're gay as fuck like a fish stick
Tequila shots and salt licks
Getting balls in your face like a free kick
Yung Lean stays motherfuckin' freaky (Bitch)


Yung Lean in the club
For some morphine (Morphine)
Yung Lean up in the club
For some morphine (Morphine)

Rotten teeth like Gargamel
I cast a spell, you keep on tryin' to yell
Bet your dead body stinks worse than my S'well
Well, Lean expels
Diagrams as if they were made in Excel
Fuck fat hoes like Adele
Get my dick stuck inside a lamp shell
Get it out with sperm cells and hair gel
Swim in Mexico, mademoiselle
Point and laugh while he fell
Who's laughing now, now that I'm explosive like Alfred Nobel
Yung Lean only attracts an older clientele
Very well (Bitch) (Yeah)",146963
24764,137406,Type Of Way,rap,Rich Homie Quan,2013,1280079,{},"


Rich Homie Quan
That's right, ho


My niggas been hustlin' trying to make him something
Ain't no telling what he'll do for the paper
Soufflé, I'm straight, I steak my plate
Sade, I'm a smooth operator


(I drop the top of my whip baby!)
That car I'm driving make you feel some type of way
That custom Breitling make you feel some type of way
This bitch I'm with got me feelin' some type a way
Is it because my homies rich you feel some type of way?
Some type of way, make you feel some type of way
Heard she wana fuck me, know you feel some type of way
Mr. CEO is what my title say
Me and my homies G'd your ho, he feel some type of way

Okay, now let's be real I know you feel some type of way
When I get to biting on her ear she make that Tyson face
I drop down to my knees thankful for life today
No naps just long sleep; hibernate
I can tell if he 12, right away
Go through hell cause I care, move you far away
Drop you off late, know he feel some type of way
I got hoes like golf trynna make what Tiger makes
I got a hide away, and I go there sometimes, to give my mind a break
I find a way, to still get through the struggle, what I'm tryna say
And I ain't lying today when I tell you that I love...


My niggas been hustlin' trying to make him something
Ain't no telling what he'll do for the paper
Soufflé, I'm straight, I steak my plate
Sade, I'm a smooth operator


(I drop the top of my whip baby!)
That car I'm driving make you feel some type of way
That custom Breitling make you feel some type of way
This bitch I'm with got me feelin' some type a way
Is it because my homies rich you feel some type of way?
Some type of way, make you feel some type of way
Heard she wana fuck me, know you feel some type of way
Mr. CEO is what my title say
Me and my homies G'd your ho, he feel some type of way

She got a Georgia peach on her rear end like a licence plate
No rookie, girl scout cookie got me high today
I probably make, more money in six months
Than what's in your papa's safe
Look like I robbed a bank
I set it off like Queen Latifah, cause I'm living single
I'm feeling cautious, I ain't scream when they served a subpoena
I heard that he the leader, come follow my tribe today
I fucked her now he heated, he feel some type of way
Don't know how to say, ain't the hardest man working?
Attention we pay, there's always a man lurking
No man perfect, but God
My head, I nod
Rich, homie, ugn...


My niggas been hustlin' trying to make him something
Ain't no telling what he'll do for the paper
Soufflé, I'm straight, I steak my plate
Sade, I'm a smooth operator


(I drop the top of my whip baby!)
That car I'm driving make you feel some type of way
That custom Breitling make you feel some type of way
This bitch I'm with got me feelin' some type a way
Is it because my homies rich you feel some type of way?
Some type of way, make you feel some type of way
Heard she wana fuck me, know you feel some type of way
Mr. CEO is what my title say
Me and my homies G'd your ho, he feel some type of way

I know you do
Don't look like that
Thank you Lord
Let's go, let's go!",147191
24944,139060,We Own It Fast  Furious,rap,2 Chainz & Wiz Khalifa,2013,1932247,{},"
It's Young Khalifa, man
2 Chainz!


Money's the motivation, money's the conversation
You on vacation, we gettin' paid, so
We on paycation, I did it for the fam
It's whatever we had to do, it's just who I am
Yeah, it's the life I chose
Gunshots in the dark, one eye closed
And we got it cookin' like a one-eyed stove
You can catch me kissin' my girl with both eyes closed, yeah
Perfectin' my passion, thanks for askin'
Couldn't slow down, so we had to crash it
You used plastic, we 'bout cash
I see some people ahead that we gon' pass, yeah!


I never feared death or dyin' (Woo)
I only fear never tryin' (Woo)
I am whatever I am
Only God can judge me now

One shot, everything rides on tonight
Even if I've got three strikes, I'ma go for it
This moment, we own it
And I'm not to be played with
Because it can get dangerous
See these people I ride with?
This moment (Uh), we own it


And the same ones that I ride with
Be the same ones that I die with
Put it all out on the line with
If you lookin' for me, you can find Wiz
In a new car or the crowd with
My new broad, that's a fine chick
Ain't no other squad I'm down with
Ain't no way around it
What you say? Tell me what you say
Workin' hard, reppin' for my dogs, do this every day
Takin' off, lookin' out for all, makin' sure we ball
Like the mob, all you do is call
Catch you if you fall, Young Khalifa


I never feared death or dyin' (Woo)
I only fear never tryin' (Woo) (Uh)
I am whatever I am
Only God can judge me now

One shot, everything rides on tonight
Even if I've got three strikes, I'ma go for it
This moment, we own it
And I'm not to be played with (I ride or die for mine)
Because it can get dangerous
See these people I ride with? (I ride or die for love)
This moment, we own it


This the biggest day of my life
We got big guns, been graduated from knives
It's the day in the life and I'm ready to ride
Got the spirit, I'm feelin' like a killer inside, uh
Financial outbreak, I'm free but I ain't out yet
Ridin' with the plug, so I'm close to the outlet
At the red light, rims sittin' offset
I look better on your girl than her outfit (Uh)


Stuck to the plan, always think that we would stand up, never ran
We the fam and loyalty never change up
Been down since day one, look at where we came from
Jumpin' out on anybody who try to say some
One thing about it: got a problem? I got the same one
Money rolls, we fold
Plenty clubs we closed
Follow the same code
Never turn our backs, our cars don't even lose control

One shot, everything rides on tonight
Even if I've got three strikes, I'ma go for it
This moment, we own it
And I'm not to be played with (I ride or die for mine)
Because it can get dangerous
See these people I ride with? (I ride or die for love)
This moment, we own it


Hahaha
Uh
This moment, we own it
I ride or die for mine
I'm ride or die material
One life to live, so here we go
This moment, we own it",148794
25142,140744,Papaoutai,pop,Stromae,2013,3286304,{},"


Dites-moi d'où il vient
Enfin je saurai où je vais
Maman dit que lorsqu'on cherche bien
On finit toujours par trouver
Elle dit qu'il n'est jamais très loin
Qu'il part très souvent travailler
Maman dit ""travailler c'est bien""
Bien mieux qu'être mal accompagné
Pas vrai ?


Où est ton papa ?
Dis-moi où est ton papa ?
Sans même devoir lui parler
Il sait ce qui ne va pas
Ah sacré papa
Dis-moi où es-tu caché ?
Ça doit, faire au moins mille fois que j'ai
Compté mes doigts
Hey !

Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, où t'es où, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, où t'es où, papaoutai ?
Où t'es
Où t'es...


Quoi, qu'on y croit ou pas
Y aura bien un jour où on n'y croira plus
Un jour ou l'autre on sera tous papa
Et d'un jour à l'autre on aura disparu
Serons-nous détestables ?
Serons-nous admirables ?
Des géniteurs ou des génies ?
Dites-nous qui donne naissance aux irresponsables ?
Ah dites-nous qui, tiens
Tout le monde sait comment on fait des bébés
Mais personne sait comment on fait des papas
Monsieur Je-sais-tout en aurait hérité, c'est ça
Faut l'sucer d'son pouce ou quoi ?
Dites-nous où c'est caché, ça doit
Faire au moins mille fois qu'on a
Bouffé nos doigts
Hey !

Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, où t'es où, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, où t'es où, papaoutai ?
Où t'es
Où t'es...


Où est ton papa ?
Dis-moi où est ton papa ?
Sans même devoir lui parler
Il sait ce qui ne va pas
Ah sacré papa
Dis-moi où es-tu caché ?
Ça doit, faire au moins mille fois que j'ai
Compté mes doigts
Hey
Où est ton papa ?
Dis-moi où est ton papa ?
Sans même devoir lui parler
Il sait ce qui ne va pas
Ah sacré papa
Dis-moi où es-tu caché ?
Ça doit, faire au moins mille fois que j'ai
Compté mes doigts
Hey !

Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, où t'es où, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, papaoutai ?
Où t'es, où t'es où, papaoutai ?
Où t'es
Où t'es...",150485
25270,141610,Work REMIX,rap,A$AP Ferg,2013,2968149,"{""French Montana"",""ScHoolboy Q"",""A\\$AP Rocky"",""A\\$AP Ferg"",""Trinidad James""}","
I gotta close the window before I record
'Cause New York don't know how to be quiet
(Work) Stand up!
(Work) Ferg!
Hoo! Hoo! Hoo!


Coogi down to the socks like I'm Biggie Poppa (baby)
Keep your girl head in my Tommy boxers
But really though, she a silly ho
'Cause you know the Fergenstein gettin' plenty dough
She don't get nothin' from a nigga though
All she get is hard dick and some Cheerios
Kinda silly though, but I'm lyrical
Bet I put him in the dirt with the penny loafs
No tint though, on my window
So you see a nigga shinin' in the Benzo
Ballin', got me feelin' like Jim Jones, I'm a pimp though
No limp though, couldn't copy my style in Kinkos
Put in work, run up on a killer, then I put him in the dirt
Run up in the building, semi gon' squirt
That's what a nigga get when they gettin' on my nerves
I ain't lyin', lay 'em on the curb
Ridin' on a killer who be comin' at Ferg (damn!)
Girl, you twerk, twerk that kitty, girl, make it purr
Put in work, Flacko put 'em in the dirt
French got the shovel, he gon' put him in the earth
Trinidad maniac with an all-gold hearse
Yeah, uh, put in work
ScHoolboy Q with a pound of the purp
So much work he'll smoke up the Earth
Polo Ground, A$AP World

(Haaan!) That ain't Kanye
That's Montana, loose cannon
He shot me, so I had to do it
Put him in the dirt, put him in it first
I just sold a swammy with ten homis on it
Her ass fat, you could park ten Tahoes on it
When they mask up, comin' for your ice
When they bare-faced, they comin' for your life
Baby, don't pray for me, pray for the weak
I'm drinkin' lean, it help me sleep
Illuminati? I'm from the streets
Never sold my body, we takin' bodies


Put in work, put in work
Put in work, put 'em in the dirt


Shout out that motherland
12-years-old with guns in hand
They don't ask no questions, nigga
All they do is bang bang bang
They don't ask no questions, all they do is bang bang
I said I do this for them shottas, Trinidad, I love ya
I do this for them shottas, Jamaica, I'm your brother
I know a bitch from VI
Yeah-yeah-yeah, that's my partner
You got a problem with it
Then-then-then-then that's your problem
I fuck with Asian niggas and I fuck with Migos
I fuck with Haitian niggas, all they speak is Creole
I said all I speak is real, y'all niggas might hate me
But that don't get no deal
I said no, that don't get no deal
I just now got my deal, but I been gettin' this money
No green card in this struggle
Immigration give you nothin' but work (put it in work)

YAWK-YAWK, YAWK-YAWK!
A lot of niggas died, should've been from Hoover Street
No, I do not have a car, but I could buy one every week
Pimpin' like I'm 33, move keys like I'm 36
Ship O's like I'm 28
Tacoma know I'm pushin' weight
O-X-Y, I'm in your state
Eatin' off your dinner plate
My heart live where Santa stay
Super fly, I need a cape
Bitches throwin' pussy back and forth, they on my dick
Passion drippin' off her lip
She say she never had a Crip
Uh, put in work, all big booties make it twerk
All big titties lift your shirt
Show a player what you're worth
Yeah, put in work, spray his ass in front of the church
Deacon said I did my shit
The pastor said, ""That nigga turnt""
Pop my collar on my shirt
Make these bitches go berserk
Shippin' units; Captain Kirk
Takin' xannies, poppin' percs
Might not last, I'll bomb you first
Turn your backseat to a hearse
Back to the lab with mother Earth
Had to give Young Ferg a verse

A lot of homies cried, due to crimes, homicide
Drivin' by, poppin' nines, Pakistan, Columbine
Outta line, pistols barkin' (argh argh), ride or die
Write a script, design a line, all I see is dollar signs
You want that pretty Flacko? Ratchets, designer jackets
The same niggas who jack it
Be the first who claim we faggots
My bitch is a movie actress
Side bitch won a beauty pageant
Got a chick that worked at Magic
But I'm so damn fine make a bitch look average
See, my daddy in Heaven, right next to Ferg's
You know what's up I'm throwin' bucks
Loaded Lux; put in work",151327
25272,141621,Shabba,rap,A$AP Ferg,2013,1902880,"{""A\\$AP Rocky"",""A\\$AP Ferg""}","


Short nigga but my dick tall
What I told your bitch, dog
Only thug nigga down at the Pitchfork
Dirty van bitches wanna suck my dick off
Pop a Xanny for a penny
Get to hit floor, run up in this shit raw
I got a girl, I ain't never got no fuckin' condoms
If she caught me, then that bitch would be pissed off (Real nigga shit)
Fergy be mobbing all day, prolly with Marty or Jay
Them my niggas from back in the day, Tarzan ain't showing his face
He prolly the one with the K, fronting then he letting it spray
Two shots to a bumboclaat man, Shabba Ranks let it go to your brain
Front then he coming your way, let the semi dump-dump then he coming your way
Dump when the bad man come, my yute don't ramp with me
Coupe full of bad hoes, they all wanna come with me
You got a coupe with a sad ho cause she wanna come with me
Shabba!

Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shab-Shabba Ranks
Eight gold rings like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Four gold chains like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
One gold tooth like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shab-Shabba Ranks
Eight gold rings like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Two bad bitches like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
One gold tooth like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks


Skinny nigga but my dick long (Pause!)
Stank puss make my dick soft
Probably bumping R. Kelly sipping Cristal
So you know the whole world getting pissed on
I don't really give a fuck if you pissed off
I just bought a Mac-11 from the thrift store
Traded for my gold chain and my pistol
Shoot a rocket make a mothafucka lift off
(Let's go)
Flacko be mobbing all day
With niggas that's chopping that yay
They chopping them choppas they handle my problems
Cause niggas be plotting these days
But the 'Rari kinda fast though, she told me pump my brakes
You stuck with a fat ho, and she wanna stuff her face
To all of my Dominican girls dem, all of my Caribbean girls dem
All my West Indian girls dem, I done fucked a million girls, damn
With a little ting a ling ling school bell a ring
Hit her with my ding-a-ling-a-ling, maybe run a train
And tell her that my niggas wanna bang and a little brain
And she wanna hang with the gang with a nigga named (Shabba!)

Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shab-Shabba Ranks
Eight gold rings like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Four gold chains like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
One gold tooth like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shab-Shabba Ranks
Eight gold rings like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Two bad bitches like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
One gold tooth like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks


I was broke last week but today be a new day
Mothafuckas like cavities, cause them niggas be too fake
Walk in this bitch with the new Wang, looking like Liu Kang
With a blonde bitch that wanna snoop cane
Then she get the Batman like Bruce Wayne (Master Bruce)
I be mobbing with the A, 'til my whole body decay
I don't give a fuck what you say, my whole team like a parade
Twelvyy got bags of the haze, Illi be smoking all day
Me and Rock run trains on the ho, he be like ""Bitch, don't touch my braids""
Ty Beats in VA putting producers in graves
Yams got a bottle of Henny, going straight to the face
Ty Nast got a bad ho, but she's tryna come my way
But he got my last ho, so shit man it's okay
(Shabba)

Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shab-Shabba Ranks
Eight gold rings like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Four gold chains like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
One gold tooth like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shab-Shabba Ranks
Eight gold rings like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Two bad bitches like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
One gold tooth like I'm Shab-Shabba Ranks
Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shabba Ranks...
Shab-Shabba Ranks, Shab-Shabba Ranks...",151336
25277,141641,Instant Crush,pop,Daft Punk,2013,1953901,"{""Julian Casablancas""}","
I didn't want to be the one to forget
I thought of everything I'd never regret
A little time with you is all that I get
That's all we need because it's all we can take
One thing I never see the same when you're 'round
I don't believe in him, his lips on the ground
I wanna take you to that place in the Roche
But no one gives us any time anymore
He asks me once if I'd look in on his dog
You made an offer for it, then you ran off
I got this picture of us kids in my head
And all I hear is the last thing that you said


""I listened to your problems, now listen to mine""
I didn't want to anymore, oh-oh-oh


And we will never be alone again
'Cause it doesn't happen every day
Kinda counted on you being a friend
Can I give it up or give it away?
Now I thought about what I wanna say
But I never really know where to go
So I chained myself to a friend
'Cause I know it unlocks like a door
And we will never be alone again
'Cause it doesn't happen every day
Kinda counted on you being a friend
Can I give it up or give it away?
Now I thought about what I wanna say
But I never really know where to go
So I chained myself to a friend
Some more again

It didn't matter what they wanted to see
He thought he saw someone that looked just like me
The summer memory that just never dies
We worked too long and hard to give it no time
He sees right through me, it's so easy with lies
Cracks in the road that I would try and disguise
He runs his scissors at the seam in the wall
He cannot break it down or else he would fall
One thousand lonely stars hiding in the cold
Take it, oh, I don't wanna sing anymore




""I listened to your problems, now listen to mine""
I didn't want to anymore, oh-oh-oh


And we will never be alone again
'Cause it doesn't happen every day
Kinda counted on you being a friend
Can I give it up or give it away?
Now I thought about what I wanna say
But I never really know where to go
So I chained myself to a friend
'Cause I know it unlocks like a door
And we will never be alone again
'Cause it doesn't happen every day
Kinda counted on you being a friend
Can I give it up or give it away?
Now I thought about what I wanna say
But I never really know where to go
So I chained myself to a friend
'Cause I know it unlocks like a-

I don't understand, don't get upset
I'm not with you
We're swimming around, it's all I do
When I'm with you


And we will never be alone again
'Cause it doesn't happen every day
Kinda counted on you being a friend
Can I give it up or give it away?
Now I thought about what I wanna say
But I never really know where to go
So I chained myself to a friend
'Cause I know it unlocks like a door
And we will never be alone again
'Cause it doesn't happen every day
Kinda counted on you being a friend
Can I give it up or give it away?
Now I thought about what I wanna say
But I never really know where to go
So I chained myself to a friend
'Cause I know it unlocks like a door

",151355
25431,142664,Under Pressure,rock,Queen & David Bowie,1981,1045100,{},"
Mmm num ba de
Dum bum ba be
Doo buh dum ba beh beh


Pressure pushing down on me
Pressing down on you, no man ask for
Under pressure that burns a building down
Splits a family in two
Puts people on streets


Um ba ba be
Um ba ba be
De day da
Ee day da- that's okay


It's the terror of knowing what this world is about
Watching some good friends screaming, ""Let me out!""
Pray tomorrow gets me higher
Pressure on people, people on streets

Day day de mm hm
Da da da ba ba
Okay
Chipping around, kick my brains around the floor
These are the days it never rains but it pours
Ee do ba be
Ee da ba ba ba
Um bo bo
Be lap
People on streets
Ee da de da de
People on streets
Ee da de da de da de da


It's the terror of knowing what this world is about
Watching some good friends screaming, 'Let me out'
Pray tomorrow gets me higher, high
Pressure on people, people on streets


Turned away from it all like a blind man
Sat on a fence but it don't work
Keep coming up with love but it's so slashed and torn
Why, why, why?
Love, love, love, love, love
Insanity laughs under pressure we're breaking

Can't we give ourselves one more chance?
Why can't we give love that one more chance?
Why can't we give love, give love, give love, give love
Give love, give love, give love, give love, give love?


Because love's such an old-fashioned word
And love dares you to care for
The people on the (People on streets) edge of the night
And love (People on streets) dares you to change our way of
Caring about ourselves
This is our last dance
This is our last dance
This is ourselves under pressure
Under pressure
Under pressure
Pressure",152350
25438,142702,Kiss Land,rb,The Weeknd,2013,1190219,{},"


When I got on stage, she swore I was six feet tall
But when she put it in her mouth
She can't seem to reach my
Ballin' ain't an issue for me
I'll make a hundred stacks right back next week
Do it all again, I'm faded off the wrong thing, the wrong thing
And I'll admit, baby, I'm a little camera-shy
But exceptions can be made, baby, 'cause you're too damn fly
For what it's worth, I hope you enjoy the show
'Cause if you're back here only takin' pictures
You gon' have to take your ass home


'Cause the only thing you're takin' is your clothes off
Go 'head, girl, strip it down, close your mouth
I just wanna hear your body talk


(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Oh girl, don't hold back, let it out
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Oh girl, don't hold back, let it out
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Don't hold back, let it out
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Don't hold back

You can meet me in the room where the kisses ain't free
You gotta pay with your body
Not really into kisses leading into nothing
I'm into shows every night, if you play your cards right
I might fuck around, bring your whole crew on tour
Fuck around, turn you to my West Coast girl
Until they book a show in NYC
Gotta fly back east where the city don't sleep
Woah, I'm tryna finish all this potion
Baby, take your time, tryna sip it 'til the mornin'
And if you're still up, I'm tryna fuck you in the mornin'
Said I'm two days strong
And never sleep until it's mornin', until the mornin'


'Cause the only thing you're takin' is your clothes off
Go 'head, girl, strip it down, close your mouth
I just wanna hear your body talk


(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Oh yeah, don't hold back, let it out
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Oh girl, don't hold back, let it out
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Don't hold back, let it out
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
(Nothing is going to change my love for you)
Oh yeah, don't hold back



I got a brand new place, I think I've seen it twice all year
I can't remember how it looks inside
So you can picture how my life's been
I went from starin' at the same four walls for 21 years
To seein' the whole world in just 12 months
Been gone for so long I might have just found God
Well, probably not, if I keep my habits up
Probably not if I can't keep up with lovin'
And I can't stand talkin' to brand new girls
Only bitches down to fuck when you shower them with ones
Probably not if my niggas round them up
Probably not if we take 'em to my spot
Probably not if I tweak all day just to sleep at night
Goddamn, I'm high
My doctor told me to stop
And he gave me somethin' to pop
And I mix it up with some Adderall's
And I wait to get to the top
And I mix it up with some alcohol and I pour it up in a shot
I don't care about you, why you worried 'bout me?
All I want is that smoke, give me all of that smoke
Last week was my rough week
I'm still drippin' down from my nose
And I don't know how to drive, I make my driver get high
But If he goes under that 110, believe my driver get fired
And I don't got any friends, I got XO in my bloodwork
And I'm posted up down in Florida, 
Ft. Lauderdale to that MIA
Cold drinks with Grand Marnier
To the break of dawn, Kahlua milk
White Russian when the sun hits
White Russians with tongue tricks
I like the feeling of tongue rings
She like the way my whole tongue flip
She grind hard for tuition
She grind hard 'til her teeth chip
I make her hide it with gold grills
I make her suck it with gold grills
In the back room of the VIP, she don't ever sleep...

This ain't nothing to relate to
This ain't nothing to relate to
This ain't nothing to relate to
This ain't nothing to relate to
Even if you tried, you tried, you tried
You tried, you tried, you tried
You tried, you tried, you tried
You tried, you tried, you tried
This ain't nothing to relate to
This ain't nothing to relate to
This ain't nothing to relate to
This ain't nothing to relate to
Even if you tried, you tried, you tried
You tried, you tried, you tried
You tried, you tried, you tried
You tried, you tried, you tried",152385
25469,142976,New Slaves,rap,Kanye West,2013,3072238,{},"
Chill, chill, chill, chill, chill, chill
Chill, chill, chill, chill, chill, chill


My mama was raised in the era when
Clean water was only served to the fairer skin
Doin' clothes, you woulda thought I had help
But they wasn't satisfied unless I picked the cotton myself
You see it's broke nigga racism
That's that ""Don't touch anything in the store""
And it's rich nigga racism
That's that ""Come in, please buy more""
""What you want, a Bentley? Fur coat? A diamond chain?
All you blacks want all the same things""
Used to only be niggas, now everybody playin'
Spendin' everything on Alexander Wang
New slaves


You see it's leaders and it's followers
But I'd rather be a dick than a swallower
You see it's leaders and it's followers
But I'd rather be a dick than a swallower

I throw these Maybach keys
I wear my heart on the sleeve
I know that we the new slaves
I see the blood on the leaves
I see the blood on the leaves
I see the blood on the leaves
I know that we the new slaves
I see the blood on the leaves
They throwin' hate at me
Want me to stay at ease
Fuck you and your corporation
Y'all niggas can't control me
I know that we the new slaves
I know that we the new slaves
I'm 'bout to wild the fuck out
I'm goin' Bobby Boucher
I know that pussy ain't free
You niggas pussy, ain't me
Y'all throwin' contracts at me
You know that niggas can't read
Throw on some Maybach keys
Fuck it, c'est la vie
I know that we the new slaves
Y'all niggas can't fuck with me
Y'all niggas can't fuck with Ye
Y'all niggas can't fuck with Ye
I'll move my family out the country
So you can't see where I stay
So go and grab the reporters
So I can smash their recorders
See, they'll confuse us with some bullshit
Like the New World Order
Meanwhile the DEA
Teamed up with the CCA
They tryna lock niggas up
They tryna make new slaves
See, that's that privately owned prison
Get your peace today
They prolly all in the Hamptons
Braggin' 'bout what they made
Fuck you and your Hampton house
I'll fuck your Hampton spouse
Came on her Hampton blouse
And in her Hampton mouth
Y'all 'bout to turn shit up
I'm 'bout to tear shit down
I'm 'bout to air shit out
Now what the fuck they gon' say now?

Nothing bad, nothing bad, noth-
Noth-Noth-, -ing bad, noth-noth-
Bad, nothing bad, nothing


I won't end this high, not this time again
So long, so long, so long, you cannot survive
And I'm not dyin', and I can't lose
I can't lose, no, I can't lose
'Cause I can't leave it to you
So let's get too high, get too high again
Too high again, too high, ooh hoo-hoo-hoo, woo
Yeah, h-h-h-high, h-high-high, high-high high-igh-high-high
H-high-igh, yeah, high, high-igh
Egyszer a Nap úgy elfáradt (mhm-igh)
Elaludt mély zöld tó ölén
Az embereknek fájt a sötét
Ő megsajnált, eljött közénk

[Produced by Che Pope, Sham Joseph, Ben Bronfman, Noah Goldstein, Travis Scott, Mike Dean & Kanye West]",152640
25508,143275,Black Skinhead,rap,Kanye West,2013,2626688,{},"


For my theme song (Black)
My leather black jeans on (Black)
My by-any-means on
Pardon, I'm getting my scream on (Black)
Enter the kingdom (Black)
But watch who you bring home
They see a black man with a white woman
At the top floor they gone come to kill King Kong
Middle America packed in (Black)
Came to see me in my black skin (Black)
Number one question they're askin'
Fuck every question you askin' (Black)
If I don't get ran out by Catholics (Black)
Here come some conservative Baptists
Claiming I'm overreactin'
Like them black kids in Chiraq, bitch


Four in the mornin', and I'm zonin'
They say I'm possessed, it's an omen
I keep it 300, like the Romans
300 bitches, where the Trojans?
Baby, we livin' in the moment
I've been a menace for the longest
But I ain't finished, I'm devoted
And you know it, and you know it

So follow me up cause this shit 'bout to go (Down)
I'm doing 500, I'm outta control (Now)
But there's nowhere to go (Now)
And there's no way to slow (Down)
If I knew what I knew in the past
I would've been blacked out on your ass


Four in the mornin', and I'm zonin'
They say I'm possessed, it's an omen
I keep it 300, like the Romans
300 bitches, where the Trojans?
Baby, we livin' in the moment
I've been a menace for the longest
But I ain't finished, I'm devoted
And you know it, and you know it


Stop all that coon shit (Black)
Early morning cartoon shit (Black)
This is that goon shit
Fuck up your whole afternoon shit
I'm aware I'm a wolf
Soon as the moon hit
I'm aware I'm a king
Back out the tomb, bitch (Black)
Black out the room, bitch (Black)
Stop all that coon shit (Black)
These niggas ain't doin' shit (Black)
Them niggas ain't doin' shit
Come on, homie, what happened?
You niggas ain't breathin', you gaspin'
These niggas ain't ready for action
Ready-ready for action-action

Four in the mornin', and I'm zonin'
I think I'm possessed, it's an omen
I keep it 300 like the Romans
300 bitches, where the Trojans?
Baby, we livin' in the moment
I've been a menace for the longest
But I ain't finished, I'm devoted
And you know it, and you know it


So follow me up cause this shit 'bout to go (Down)
I'm doing 500, I'm outta control (Now)
But there's nowhere to go (Now)
And there's no way to slow (Down)
If I knew what I knew in the past
I would've been blacked out on your ass


God! God! God! God!
God! God! God! God!
God! God! God!",152933
25656,144407,Happy,pop,Pharrell Williams,2013,2047342,{},"


It might seem crazy what I'm 'bout to say
Sunshine she's here, you can take a break
I'm a hot air balloon that could go to space
With the air, like I don't care, baby, by the way


(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like a room without a roof
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like happiness is the truth
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you know what happiness is to you
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like that's what you wanna do


Here come bad news, talking this and that (Yeah!)
Well, give me all you got, don't hold it back (Yeah!)
Well, I should probably warn ya, I'll be just fine (Yeah!)
No offense to you, don't waste your time, here's why

(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like a room without a roof
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like happiness is the truth
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you know what happiness is to you
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like that's what you wanna do


Bring me down
Can't nothing bring me down
My level's too high to bring me down
Can't nothing bring me down, I said
Bring me down
Can't nothing bring me down
My level's too high to bring me down
Can't nothing bring me down, I said


(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like a room without a roof
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like happiness is the truth
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you know what happiness is to you
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like that's what you wanna do
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like a room without a roof
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like happiness is the truth
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you know what happiness is to you
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like that's what you wanna do

Bring me down
Can't nothing bring me down
My level's too high to bring me down
Can't nothing bring me down, I said...


(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like a room without a roof
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like happiness is the truth
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you know what happiness is to you
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like that's what you wanna do
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like a room without a roof
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like happiness is the truth
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you know what happiness is to you
(Because I'm happy)
Clap along if you feel like that's what you wanna do (Come on)",154031
25697,144670,Do I Wanna Know?,rock,Arctic Monkeys,2013,2965702,{},"
Have you got colour in your cheeks?
Do you ever get that fear that you can't shift the type
That sticks around like summat in your teeth?
Are there some aces up your sleeve?
Have you no idea that you're in deep?
I've dreamt about you nearly every night this week
How many secrets can you keep?
'Cause there's this tune I found
That makes me think of you somehow an' I play it on repeat
Until I fall asleep, spillin' drinks on my settee


(Do I wanna know?) If this feelin' flows both ways?
(Sad to see you go) Was sorta hopin' that you'd stay
(Baby, we both know) That the nights were mainly made
For sayin' things that you can't say tomorrow day


Crawlin' back to you
Ever thought of callin' when
You've had a few?
'Cause I always do
Maybe I'm too
Busy bein' yours
To fall for somebody new
Now, I've thought it through
Crawlin' back to you

So have you got the guts?
Been wonderin' if your heart's still open
And if so, I wanna know what time it shuts
Simmer down an' pucker up, I'm sorry to interrupt
It's just I'm constantly on the cusp of tryin' to kiss you
I don't know if you feel the same as I do
But we could be together if you wanted to


(Do I wanna know?) If this feelin' flows both ways?
(Sad to see you go) Was sorta hopin' that you'd stay
(Baby, we both know) That the nights were mainly made
For sayin' things that you can't say tomorrow day


Crawlin' back to you (Crawlin' back to you)
Ever thought of callin' when
You've had a few? (Had a few)
'Cause I always do ('Cause I always do)
Maybe I'm too (Maybe I'm too busy)
Busy bein' yours (Bein' yours)
To fall for somebody new
Now, I've thought it through
Crawlin' back to you

(Do I wanna know?) If this feelin' flows both ways?
(Sad to see you go) Was sorta hopin' that you'd stay
(Baby, we both know) That the nights were mainly made
For sayin' things that you can't say tomorrow day
(Do I wanna know?) Too busy bein' yours to fall
(Sad to see you go) Ever thought of callin', darlin'?
(Do I wanna know?) Do you want me crawlin' back to you?",154314
25797,145961,Cant Take My Eyes Off You,pop,Frankie Valli,1967,1243780,{},"
You're just too good to be true
Can't take my eyes off of you
You'd be like Heaven to touch
I wanna hold you so much
At long last love has arrived
And I thank God I'm alive
You're just too good to be true
Can't take my eyes off you


Pardon the way that I stare
There's nothing else to compare
The sight of you leaves me weak
There are no words left to speak
But if you feel like I feel
Please let me know that it's real
You're just too good to be true
Can't take my eyes off you


I love you, baby, and if it's quite alright
I need you, baby, to warm the lonely night
I love you, baby, trust in me when I say:
Oh, pretty baby, don't bring me down, I pray
Oh, pretty baby, now that I found you, stay
And let me love you, baby, let me love you

You're just too good to be true
Can't take my eyes off you
You'd be like Heaven to touch
I wanna hold you so much
At long last love has arrived
And I thank God I'm alive
You're just too good to be true
Can't take my eyes off you


I love you, baby, and if it's quite alright
I need you, baby, to warm the lonely night
I love you, baby, trust in me when I say:
Oh, pretty baby, don't bring me down, I pray
Oh, pretty baby, now that I found you, stay
And let me love you, baby, let me love you


I love you, baby, and if it's quite alright
I need you, baby, to warm the lonely night
I love you, baby, trust in me when I say:
Oh, pretty baby, don't bring me down, I pray
Oh, pretty baby, now that I found you, stay
And let me love you, baby, let me love you",155529
25814,146239,Formidable,pop,Stromae,2013,1192098,{},"


Formidable, formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables
Formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables


Oh bébé - oups ! - mademoiselle
J'vais pas vous draguer, promis juré
J'suis célibataire, depuis hier putain !
J'peux pas faire d'enfant et bon c'est pas - Eh reviens !
Cinq minutes quoi ! J't'ai pas insultée
J'suis poli, courtois, et un peu fort bourré
Et pour les mecs comme moi, vous avez autre chose à faire hein
Vous m'auriez vu hier...
J'étais...

Formidable, formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables
Formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables


Eh tu t'es regardé, tu t'crois beau parce que tu t'es marié
Mais c'est qu'un anneau, mec, t'emballe pas
Elle va t'larguer comme elles le font chaque fois
Et puis l'autre fille, tu lui en as parlé ?
Si tu veux je lui dis, comme ça c'est réglé
Et au p'tit aussi, enfin si vous en avez
Attends trois ans, sept ans, et là vous verrez
Si c'est...


Formidable, formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables
Formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables

Et petite - oh pardon ! - petit
Tu sais dans la vie y'a ni méchant ni gentil
Si Maman est chiante, c'est qu'elle a peur d'être mamie
Si Papa trompe Maman, c'est parce que Maman vieillit, tiens
Pourquoi t'es tout rouge ? Ben reviens gamin !
Et qu'est-ce que vous avez tous, à me regarder comme un singe, vous ?
Ah oui vous êtes saints, vous !
Bande de macaques !
Donnez-moi un bébé singe, il sera...


Formidable, formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables
Formidable
Tu étais formidable, j'étais fort minable
Nous étions formidables",155855
25905,147055,0 to 100 / The Catch Up,rap,Drake,2014,3700915,{},"


Fuck bein' on some chill shit
We go 0 to 100, nigga, real quick
They be on that rap-to-pay-the-bills shit
And I don't feel that shit, not even a little bit
Oh, Lord, know yourself, know your worth, nigga
My actions been louder than my words, nigga
How you so high, but still so down to Earth, nigga?
Niggas wanna do it, we can do it on they turf, nigga
Oh, Lord, I'm the rookie and the vet
Shoutout to the bitches out here holdin' down the set
All up in my phone, lookin' at pictures from the other night
She gon' be upset if she keep scrollin' to the left, dawg
She gon' see some shit that she don't wanna see
She ain't ready for it
If I ain't the greatest, then I'm headed for it
Yeah, that mean I'm way up (Way up)
Yeah, the 6 ain't friendly, but that's where I lay up
This shit a mothafuckin' lay-up
I been Steph Curry with the shot
Been cookin' with the sauce, Chef Curry with the pot, boy
360 with the wrist, boy
Ayy, who the fuck them niggas is, boy?
OVO, man, we really with the shits, boy
Yeah, really with the shits
I should prolly sign to Hit-Boy 'cause I got all the hits, boy
Fuck all that ""Drake, you gotta chill"" shit
I be on my Lil Mouse drill shit
Fuck all that rap-to-pay-your-bills shit
Yeah, I'm on some Raptors-pay-my-bills shit
All up on TV, I thought it'd make me richer
Wasn't payin' me enough, I needed somethin' quicker
So now I'm all in Niko basement puttin' work in on the phones
Either that or drive to Money Mart to make the pickups
Man, it's 2008, I'm tryna paint the picture
Comeback Season in the works and now I'm thinkin' bigger
I got 40 in the studio, every night, late night
Gotta watch that shit, don't want to make him sicker
That's my nigga
Oh, Lord, got a whole lot to show for it
I mean, we can really get it, we can go for it
I'm just here for the bucks and the billis, nigga
Don't make me kill one of the GOATs for it
I run this shit, they like, ""Go Forrest
Run Forrest, run Forrest, go Forrest""
Yeah, I mean you already wrote for us
Damn, nigga, what's one more quote for us?
Oh, Lord, who else soundin' like this?
They ain't make me what I am, they just found me like this
I was ready... fuck that, I've been ready
Since my dad used to tell me
He was comin' to the house to get me
He ain't show up
Valuable lesson, man, I had to grow up
That's why I never ask for help
I'll do it for you niggas and do it for myself

I go 0 to 100, nigga, real quick
Real quick, whole squad on that real shit
0 to 100, nigga, real quick
Real quick, real fuckin' quick, nigga
0 to 100, nigga, real quick
Real quick, whole squad on that real shit
0 to 100, nigga, real quick
Real quick, real fuckin' quick, nigga




Whole squad on that real shit
Whole squad on that real shit
Whole squad on that real shit, yeah


The other night
Lavish Lee told me that I'm all these people listen to
She said they love me unconditional
Imagine how it feel to watch another nigga at the top
You know that if you wasn't you, you would be dissin' you, dawg
Damn, okay, from that perspective
I see what you're talkin' 'bout, no way to soften that
'Cause me, I was tryna find out where I lost 'em at
But maybe I ain't lose 'em at all
Maybe I keep movin' forward and they're just stagnant
They ain't movin' at all
But when they need a favor, who do they call?
Maybe I'm searchin' for the problems
Askin' what was said and who was involved
Too focused on people's feedback and provin' 'em wrong
They say the shoe can always fit, no matter whose foot it's on
These days feel like I'm squeezin' in 'em
Whoever wore 'em before just wasn't thinkin' big enough
I'm 'bout to leave 'em with 'em
'Cause if I run in the game in these, man, the seams are splittin'
No pun intended but they're smellin' defeat in the air
Headed where nobody took it, who meetin' me there?
They tell him that he's talkin' crazy but he doesn't care
Bein' humble don't work as well as bein' aware
Listen up, boy, you're better off eavesdroppin'
We already got spring 2015 poppin'
PND droppin', Reps-up P droppin'
Majid Jordan droppin', OB droppin', not to mention me droppin'
Feel like we paid the refs off, man, we fixed the game
Me and Noel been at it before Twitter names
Yeah, been on the move like the lease is up
And I can't even name one person that's keepin' up
Damn, fuck how it was in the past tense
Ask yourself, how do we match up now?
'Cause I'm only 27 and I'm only gettin' better
If I haven't passed you yet, watch me catch up now, for real

Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up
Could it be the way that I'll catch up

",156640
26028,148847,Bound 2,rap,Kanye West,2013,4024516,{},"
B-B-B-B-Bound to fall in love
Bound to fall in love
Uh-huh, honey


All them other niggas lame, and you know it now
When a real nigga hold you down, you s'posed to drown


Bound to fall in love (Bound)
B-B-B-B-Bound to fall in love (Bound)
Uh-huh, honey


What you doin' in the club on a Thursday?
She say she only here for her girl birthday
They ordered champagne but still look thirsty
Rock Forever 21 but just turned thirty
I know I got a bad reputation
Walk-around-always-mad reputation
Leave-a-pretty-girl-sad reputation
Start a Fight Club, Brad reputation
I turnt the nightclub out of the basement
I'll turn the plane around, your ass keep complainin'
How you gon' be mad on vacation?
Dutty wining 'round all these Jamaicans
Uh, this that prom shit
This that what-we-do-don't-tell-your-mom shit
This that red-cup-all-on-the-lawn shit
Got a fresh cut, straight out the salon, bitch

I know you're tired of lovin', of lovin'
With nobody to love, nobody, nobody (Uh-huh, honey)


Close your eyes and let the word paint a thousand pictures
One good girl is worth a thousand bitches
Bound (Bound to fall in love)
Bound (Bound to fall in love)
Uh-huh, honey


I wanna fuck you hard on the sink
After that, give you somethin' to drink
Step back, can't get spunk on the mink
I mean damn, what would Jeromey Romey Romey Rome think?
Hey, you remember where we first met?
Okay, I don't remember where we first met
But hey, admittin' is the first step
And hey, you know ain't nobody perfect
And I know, with the hoes I got the worst rep
But hey, their backstroke I'm tryna perfect
And hey, ayo, we made it: Thanksgivin'
So hey, maybe we can make it to Christmas
She asked me what I wished for on my wishlist
Have you ever asked your bitch for other bitches?
Maybe we could still make it to the church steps
But first, you gon' remember how to forget
After all these long-ass verses
I'm tired, you tired, Jesus wept

I know you're tired of lovin', of lovin'
With nobody to love, nobody, nobody
So just grab somebody, no leavin' this party
With nobody to love, nobody, nobody
Uh-huh, honey


Jerome's in the house, watch your mouth
Jerome's in the house, watch your mouth
Bound to fall in love
Bound
Bound to fall in love
Bound
Uh-huh, honey

[Produced by Kanye West and Che Pope with additional production from Eric Danchild, Noah Goldstein, No ID and Mike Dean]

",158615
26149,151016,My Nigga,rap,YG,2013,1714325,"{Jeezy,""Rich Homie Quan""}","
Mustard on the beat, ho!


I said that I'ma ride for my motherfuckin' niggas
Most likely I'ma die with my finger on the trigger
I've been grindin' outside all day with my niggas
And I ain't goin' in unless I'm with my niggas
My nigga, my nigga (My nigga, my nigga)
My nigga, my nigga (My muthafucking niggas!)
My nigga, my nigga (My nigga, my nigga)
My nigga, my nigga
Yeah!


First thing's first I love all my niggas
This rap shit cracked and I involve my niggas
You lookin' for some lean, lemme call my nigga
He sell it for the high, I need all mines nigga
Some niggas smoke smoke, some niggas drink drank
Got niggas on the block with the Glock that don't think
I said, ""that's a nigga back up,"" they in a bucket lapped up
I got to act right if you niggas wanna act up
He talkin' like a snitch, no, that ain't my nigga
He trippin' off a bitch, no, that ain't my nigga
Take a nigga case, yeah that's my nigga
Know him since I was eight, yeah that's my nigga
Fucked my first bitch, passed her to my nigga
Hit my first lick, passed with my nigga (My nigga)
Fuck them other niggas 'cause I'm down for my niggas
I ride for my niggas, fuck them other niggas

I said that I'ma ride for my motherfuckin' niggas
Most likely I'ma die with my finger on the trigger
I've been grindin' outside all day with my niggas
And I ain't goin' in unless I'm with my niggas
My nigga, my nigga (Dope boys, my nigga)
My nigga, my nigga (YG my niggas!)
My nigga, my nigga (My nigga, my nigga)
My nigga, my nigga (It's the muthafucking world)


Just know I'm down with the niggas down for me
I got two words for you, love and loyalty
It was me and my nigga, trippin' on a half a B
Then we used to hit a mall and buy everything we see
Me and my down ass nigga get twisted
Nigga get to trippin', knock the gravy out your biscuit
Just know I fucked with you the long way, my nigga
So when I see you out I'm like, ""Hey, my nigga!""
Drink that act right by the case, my niggas
Drink that act right and get straight with my niggas
Me and my nigga ridin' dirty tryna chase them figures
Who got the yopper, who got the yola? Don't matter, go figure


I said that I'ma ride for my motherfuckin' niggas
Most likely I'ma die with my finger on the trigger
I've been grindin' outside all day with my niggas
And I ain't goin' in unless I'm with my niggas
My nigga, my nigga
My nigga, my nigga (My muthafucking niggas!)
My nigga, my nigga (My nigga, my nigga)
My nigga, my nigga

My nigga got cake, my nigga got weight
My nigga fronted me, he the reason I'm straight
My nigga got a house, my nigga got a lake
My nigga we eatin', my nigga get a plate
And we're still hittin' licks, my nigga, my nigga
Runnin' off a nigga shit, my nigga, my nigga
I fucked a nigga bitch with my nigga, my nigga
If a nigga talkin' shit then he ain't my nigga
My nigga, my nigga (My nigga, my nigga)
YG my nigga and I ain't goin' in, ain't tryna leave my niggas
Shawty seein' me and want to leave with a nigga
But it wasn't enough room cause I came with my niggas
My niggas, my niggas
I need a set of wings cause I'm too fly, nigga
And I'm all about my business like a suit and tie nigga
I ride for my niggas (Believe that)


I said that I'ma ride for my motherfuckin' niggas
Most likely I'ma die with my finger on the trigger
I've been grindin' outside all day with my niggas
And I ain't goin' in unless I'm with my niggas
My nigga, my nigga
My nigga, my nigga (My muthafucking niggas!)
My nigga, my nigga (My nigga, my nigga)
My nigga, my nigga

My nigga, my nigga
My nigga, my nigga
My nigga, my nigga
Yeah...",161090
26218,152129,Forbidden Fruit,rap,J. Cole,2013,1324841,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","


Me and my bitch, took a little trip
Down to the garden, took a little dip (Oh no)
Apple juice falling from her lips, took a little sip
Lil' sip, took a lil' sip
Took a lil' sip, t-took a lil', took a lil', took a lil' sip


Ayo, I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
Where niggas hold tech's like they mad at the ref
That's why I keep a cross on my chest, either that or a vest
Do you believe that Eve had Adam in check
And if so, you gotta expect
To sip juice from the forbidden fruit and get loose
Cole is the king, most definite
My little black book thicker than the Old Testament
Niggas pay for head but the pussy sold separate
Same bitch giving brains to the minister
The same reason they call Mr. Cee the finisher
Forbidden fruit, watch for the Adam's apple
Slick with words don't hate me, son
What you eat don't make me shit and who you fuck don't make me cum
Put a price on my head won't make me run
Try to kill me but it can't be done
'Cause my words gon' live forever
You put two and two together Cole here forever

Me and my bitch, took a little trip
Down to the garden, took a little dip (Oh no)
Apple juice falling from her lips, took a little sip


Bitches come and go (You know that)
Money come and go (You know that)
Love come and go (Don't shit last)
Bitches come and go (You know that)
Money come and go (You know that)
Love come and go (Don't shit last)


Take a seat baby girl you've been all in my mind
I know I ain't called gotta pardon my grind
Just copped a maroon 5, no Adam Levine
'Came a man by myself, only father was time
I know that she relate baby daddy ain't shit
So she raised that nigga kids but she swallowing mine
And that's why you all on my mind
All on my line like caller number nine
'Cause a nigga poppin' like Harlem in the nine-seven
Way before Mase was a reverend
I was a young nigga making A's at 11
Or 12, trying to get a taste of the Heaven
Or Hell, only time gon' tell
Fuck her while her mama home, ""baby, don't yell""
How many records do a nigga gotta sell
Just to get the cover of the XXL
Or Fader, fuck your magazine hater
When I say that I'm the greatest I ain't talking about later
I'ma drop the album same day as Kanye
Just to show the Boyz the man now like Wanyá
And I don't mean no disrespect, I praise legends
But this what's next, the boy sick, can't disinfect
Life's a bitch and her pussy's wet
My clip is loaded and this is the kiss of... death
Blaow

Me and my bitch, took a little trip
Down to the garden, took a little dip (Oh no)
Apple juice falling from her lips took a little sip


Bitches come and go (You know that)
Money come and go (You know that)
Love come and go (Don't shit last)
Bitches come and go (You know that)
Money come and go (You know that)
Love come and go (Don't shit last)


Don't shit last, don't shit last and you know that
Went to hell, got hot didn't melt
The only man above me is God himself
All these other niggas is below me
Word to Phife, Q-Tip, Ali, and Jarobi
What up Queens
Cole is the King and you know that
Started with a dollar and a dream, and you know that
Never give a bird bitch a ring, you should know that
Bitch, bitch
That should be my new ad lib
I got a new one. I finally got a cool ad lib
Be at all the shows everybody be like, bitch
Bitch, bitch
Or you can do the low cool shit, bitch

Yo, yo, yo pull over right here, right here, here you go
Yeah pull over right here, to the right
Pull over, pull over, pull over, pull over
Ight, look look, park right here
I'ma be out it'll be like thirty minutes tops
It'll be like thirty minutes, I'll be right back out, ight
Bitches come and go, bitches come and
Yo, yo what up, what's popping, I'm back, I'm back
Yo you got that piece ready for me, that Jesus piece
Nah the gold, the rose gold joint, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah let me see that, oh shit what is that some
What's, what the fuck is that platinum
Is that? What's that chain right there
Is that-ss-ss white gold, that's platinum
Is that plat, well niggas doing platinum again, niggas doing, niggas ain't even platinum yet right, oh shit bout to make
Yo I'm trying to bring that shit back, kill these niggas
Let me see that one too, the wat, the watch, the platinum watch",162425
26220,152143,Villuminati,rap,J. Cole,2013,1001411,{},"
I'm a born sinner
But I die better than that, I swear
It's way darker this time
*Laughs*


Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov, now I'm in the limelight 'cause I rhyme tight
Cole, time to get paid, blow up like the World Trade


Sometimes I brag like Hov, sometimes I'm real like Pac
Sometimes I focus on the flow to show the skills I got
Sometimes I focus on the dough, look at these bills I got
This is a message for some rappers tryna steal my spot
You niggas famous on the internet, I'm real life hot, homie
Get your weight up, fake niggas get sprayed up
My verbal AK slay faggots
And I don't mean no disrespect whenever I say faggot, okay, faggot?
Uh, don't be so sensitive
If you want to get fucked in the ass that's between you and whoever else's dick it is
Pause, maybe that line was too far
Just a little joke to show how homophobic you are
And who can blame ya? Boy Meets World, I'm tryna find a new Topanga
And bang her out, no hanging out
My pops was club hopping back when Rick James was out
And all I get is Trinidad James, wait a minute, that's strange
Sip a bit of champagne, say fuck it
If the hoes like it I love it, nigga, nigga, nigga
Used to watch Rap City, Big Tigga, Tigga
Rap nerd, even copped Rah Diggah, Diggah
Pac had a nigga saying fuck Jigga, fuck Biggie
I was only like 11 so forgive me
A decade later I'd be all up in the city
Tryna get Hov to fuck with me
With a burned CD full of jams that was up in my hand
When he said he didn't want it it was fuck him again
One day, he gon' regret playing me
Little did I know in a year he'd be fucking paying me, what could you say to me? I
Beat the odds like Vegas, I used to rap about haters
Before niggas was hating me, now they hate to see
A young black man with a college degree
Fucking all these little models for free, pardon me

Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Got the game back, and I ain't ever letting go


I'm the prince of the city, I studied Machiavelli
You niggas couldn't blow with C4 strapped to your belly
I snuck up out the parts where niggas be living heartless
And cannot tell the difference between Iraqi, Israeli
And so I'm wondering really what could you actually tell me
I'm tryna keep my homie from throwing crack in the skully
So, back with this pen to give back for my sins
Took a black president to tell the Japanese sorry
But who the fuck gon' tell my niggas sorry
Never seen his pops 'cause he's sorry
Fucked up education, would ask for reparations
But I'm probably just gon' go and buy Ferraris, vroom
Please forgive him
According to the preacher man he needs Jesus in him
But the Devil run the TV so the demons in 'em
I'm in trouble
Did a deal with the Devil, now I'm pleading with him
Like give me my soul

My nigga, I ain't ever letting you go again
I ain't ever letting go
I ain't ever letting you go again
Please give me my soul
I ain't ever letting go
I ain't ever letting you go again
Please give me my soul
I ain't ever letting go
But the Devil don't play fair


I'm 'bout to go and join the Illuminati
Fuck everybody
I'm 'bout to go and join the Illuminati
Fuck everybody
I'm 'bout to go and join the Illuminati
Fuck everybody
I'm 'bout to go and join the Illuminati


These next three bars is dedicated to the retards
Keep on asking me about the Illuminati;
Is you stupid, nigga? Young black millionaire
Old white billionaires, I'm sure that they can do without me
And I ain't really into sacrificing human bodies
Couple more A's I would've been a summa cuma laude
Beyoncé told me that she want to cop the blue Bugatti
That shit is more than what I'm worth, I think she knew it probably
Well this is awkward, awkward
Want to know what else is really awkward, awkward
When niggas buy rings for bitches I had flings with
I'm praying I don't see 'em at the Oscars, Oscars

Hey J. Cole, this way, hey
Oh, hey, what's up? What's goin' on with you? Okay
Big smile, man, big smile, let me see that crooked smile
J. Cole, J. Cole, this way, look this way
Oh friend hug, friend hug, just keep it friendly
We friends, friends


Re-adjustin' my target audience, 'cause it's obvious
I've gone astray, losing my way like Timberlake
Produced by Timbaland on that goddamn FutureSex/LoveSounds
What's playing in my mind, just the sound of my whole career
Crash and burning, the thing that I mostly fear
Was on track for the first two years until I let the Devil steer
Now what have we here? Mask my tears, but I


I ain't ever letting go
I ain't ever letting you go again
I ain't ever letting go
I ain't ever letting you go again
I ain't ever letting go
I ain't ever letting you go again
I ain't ever letting go
I ain't ever letting you go again


Allow me to re-introduce myself, my name is Cole
My nigga
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Allow me to re-introduce myself, my name is Cole
My nigga
Born sinner, the opposite of a winner
Sometimes I brag like Hov
Born sinner",162440
26267,153836,Let Nas Down,rap,J. Cole,2013,1045034,{},"


Freedom or jail, clips inserted, a baby's bein' born
Same time my man is murdered; the beginning and end
As far as rap go, it's only natural, I explain
My plateau, and also what defines my name


Yeah, long live the idols, may they never be your rivals
'Pac was like Jesus, Nas wrote the Bible
Now what you 'bout to hear is a tale of glory and sin
No I.D. my mentor, now let the story begin


I used to print out Nas' raps and tape 'em up on my wall
My niggas thought they was words, but it was pictures I saw
And since I wanted to draw, I used to read them in awe
Then he dropped Stillmatic, rocked the cleanest velour
Fast forward, who'd a thought that I would meet him on tour
I'm earnin' stripes now, a nigga got Adidas galore
Backstage I shook his hand, let 'em know that he's the man
When he said he was a fan it was too hard to understand
No time to soak up the moment though 'cause I was in a jam
Hov askin' where's the record that the radio could play
And I was strikin' out for months, 9th inning, feelin' fear
Jeter under pressure, made the biggest hit of my career
But at first, that wasn't clear, niggas had no idea
Dion called me when it dropped, sounded sad but sincere
Told me Nas heard your single and he hate that shit
Said, ""You the one, yo, why you make that shit?""

I can't believe I let Nas down
Damn, my heart sunk to my stomach
I can't believe I let Nas down
I got defensive on the phone
Resentment was in my tone, fuck it


Long live the idols, may they never be your rivals
'Pac was like Jesus, Nas wrote the Bible
Now what you're 'bout to hear's a tale of glory and sin
No I.D. my mentor, now let the story begin


I couldn't help but think that maybe I had made a mistake
I mean, you made ""You Owe Me""
Dog, I thought that you could relate
But while I shot up the charts
You mean tellin' me that I was not up to par
When I followed my heart
Granted, my heart was tainted
By my mind that kept on sayin'
""Where's the hits?"" You ain't got none
You know Jay'll never put your album out without none
And, dog, you know how come
Labels are archaic, formulaic with they outcome
They don't know, they just study the charts
Me, I studied the shows, the fans, study they hearts
I had a feelin' I was killin', and this music we were spillin' out
Would change lives forever, fuck the label, put it out
Friday Night Lights blew, that was classic number two
Now it seemed as if the Nas comparisons was comin' true
Still no release date from the label, are they insane?
Gucc told me play the game to change the game

But on the way I let Nas down
I got no one to blame
I'm ashamed, I let Nas down
But this is God's plan, you can never understand, fuck it


Long live the idols, may they never be your rivals
'Pac was like Jesus, Nas wrote the Bible
Now what you're 'bout to hear's a tale of glory and sin
No I.D. my mentor, now let the story begin


I always believed in the bigger picture
If I could get them niggas to listen outside my core
Then I can open the door
Reintroduce 'em to honesty, show 'em that they need more
The difference between the pretenders and the Kendrick Lamars
And so, I took the fall
Like the son of the Lord on the cross
Dyin' for that fake shit you niggas bought
For the past decade
If I should pass, please let this be my last essay
Therefore I write from the heart
Apologies to OG's for sacrificin' my art
But I'm here for a greater purpose
I knew right from the start
I'm just a man of the people, not above but equal
And for the greater good I walk amongst the evil
Don't cry, Mama, this the life I choose myself
Just pray along the way that I don't lose myself
This is for the nigga that said that Hip-Hop was dead
I went to Hell to resurrect it
How could you fail to respect it?

Letting Nas down, I got the phone call
Quietly I mourned, dog, I let Nas down
Yeah, and on this flight
May I never lose sight, fuck it


Long live the idols, may they never be your rivals
'Pac was like Jesus, Nas wrote the Bible
Now what you just heard's a tale of glory and sin
No I.D. my mentor, now let the story begin",164383
26270,153957,Rich Niggaz,rap,J. Cole,2013,1179421,{},"
Ayo, ayo, ayo, ah, ayo, ah
Ayo, ayo, ayo, ah
Yeah


I hate rich niggas, god damn it
'Cause I ain't never had a lot, damn it
Who you had to kill? Who you had to rob?
Who you had to fuck just to make it to the top, damn it?
Or maybe that's daddy money, escalator, no ladder money
Escalade, new Caddy money
Worst fear going broke cause I'm bad with money
Crooked smile nigga, momma never had the money, damn
I ain't tripping
Nigga Jordan and I ain't Pippen, yeah
Up the steps, I ain't slipping
Tears, blood, sweat, and I ain't cripping
Here's a song you can sing along with
When you down on some let you know you ain't alone shit
When your momma ain't at home cause she got a second job
Delivering pizzas, you think she out here getting robbed
Please God watch her I know how niggas do
Half cracker but a nigga too
Talking all that shit 'bout your step-pops
How he was a dog, now look at you
I ain't bad as that nigga, plus dawg, I'm a grown man now
I ain't mad at that nigga
But if a plane crashed and it only killed his lame ass
I'd be glad it's that nigga, nigga
Did Kay dirty now it's back to broke
Refund checks, used that to float
Momma gets depressed, falls in love with the next maniac
On crack, use that to cope
Make a nigga smoke a whole sack of dope
Writing rhymes, tryna bring back the hope
Try to ride the storm out and crashed the boat
Could've drowned, but I grabbed the rope

And there go you, and there go you, and there go you
Selling me dreams and telling me things you knew
And there go you, and there go you, and there go you
Selling me dreams and telling me things you knew


Sing, you got what I want, I got what you need
""How much for your soul, Anna?""
""How much for your soul, Anna?""
You got what I want, I got what you need
""How much for your soul, Anna?""
""How much for your soul, Anna?""


I hate rich niggas, god damn it
'Cause I ain't never had a lot, damn it
Niggas can't front on the flows you got
But every fucking verse how much dough you got
Homie, don't quit now
Hear my shit and tried to switch now
Know you felt the shit just now, know you felt the shit just now
Ain't there more to you? Don't it ever get boring to you?
I realize deep down you a coward getting high off of power, fuck it more to you
Saw through you and it made me ashamed that I played the game
Not for mo' money like Damon Wayans
Wanted the respect but it came with fame
I just wanted love but this ain't the same
I took a train down memory lane
And watched lil Jermaine do his thang before he made a name
It's like Sony signed Basquiat
He gave it all he got, and now a nigga don't paint the same, damn
I guess he can't complain
All the money that be raining in
Spend a hundred thou for the chain again
Think of old school niggas like Dana Dane
Probably kill for another claim to fame, my brain the same
Yeah, nigga, at least he ain't insane
At least he ain't insane
You ain't crazy, motherfucker, you just afraid of change
That's new, maybe that's true
But listen here, I got a bigger fear
Of one day that I become you
When I become lost and I become heartless
And numb from all the Ménages
Just one bitch don't feel the same no more
And Henny don't really kill the pain no more
Now I'm Cobain with a shotgun aimed at my brain
Cause I can't maintain no more
Tad bit extreme I know
Money can't save your soul
But there go you

And there go you, and there go you, and there go you
Selling me dreams and telling me things you knew
And there go you, and there go you, and there go you
Selling me dreams and telling me things you knew


Sing, you got what I want, I got what you need
""How much for your soul, Anna?""
""How much for your soul, Anna?""
You got what I want, I got what you need
""How much for your soul, Anna?""
""How much for your soul, Anna?""


""How much for your soul, Anna?""
""How much for your soul, Anna?""",164496
26277,154025,She Knows,rap,J. Cole,2013,1717457,"{Cults,""Amber Coffman""}","
She knows
She knows, ayy
Bad things happen to the people you love
And you find yourself praying up to heaven above
But honestly, I've never had much sympathy
'Cause those bad things, I always saw them coming for me
I'm gonna run, run away (Oh, I), run run away, run away (Oh, I-I-I)
Run away and never come back (Well, all right)
Run run away, run run away (Oh, I), run away (Oh, I-I-I)
Show 'em that your color is black (Well, all right)


Damned if I do, damned if I don't
You know I got a girl back home
You got a man what you want, what you want?
What these bitches want from a nigga?
On some DMX shit, huh
I know them other niggas love tricking
On some BMX shit, but not me
Now I'm sure you done heard about me
A black star, Mos Def, Kweli
Good so them bad hoes try me, they try me
This is Martin Luther King in the club, getting dubs
With a bad bitch in his ear, sayin' that she down for whatever
In the back of his mind is Coretta

And she knows, she knows
And I know she knows, and I know she knows
And deep down, she knows, she knows
And I know she knows, and I know she knows


Well, all right, oh, I, oh, I-I-I
I can't be what you want from me, well, all right
Oh, I, oh, I-I-I
I can't be what you want from me, well, all right


Damned if I do, shit, damned if I don't
I'm passing up on bad hoes
Trying to be the man that she want, what she want?
What she-What she want from a nigga?
To put a ring on it
Got a bitch on my dick right now
And she just want to sing on it
Got me up so high, try and get a piece of that apple pie
I be up so high, try and get a piece of that apple pie
Dancehall vibes with my pants on fire
'Cause I told her I was sleep
'Cause I creep with this pretty young thing that I chose
She could be doing the same thing, I suppose

And she knows, she knows
And I know she knows, and I know she knows
And deep down, she knows, she knows
And I know she knows, and I know she knows


Well, all right, oh, I, oh, I-I-I
I can't be what you want from me, well, all right
Oh, I, oh, I-I-I
I can't be what you want from me, well, all right


Niggas say, ""Turn up,"" hoes say, ""Turn up""
Only bad thing 'bout a star is they burn up
Niggas say, ""Turn up,"" hoes say, ""Turn up""
Only bad thing 'bout a star is they burn up
Rest in peace to Aaliyah
Rest in peace to Left Eye (Left Eye)
Michael Jackson, I'll see ya
Just as soon as I die (I die)


Got me up so high, try and get a piece of that apple pie, uh
I be up so high, try and get a piece of that apple pie
Got me up so high, try and get a piece of that apple pie, uh
I be up so high, try and get a piece of that apple pie

Well, all right, oh, I, oh, I-I-I
I can't be what you want from me, well, all right
Oh, I, oh, I-I-I
I can't be what you want from me, well, all right


Run away, run away- Back
Run away, run away- Back
Run away, run away- Back
Run away, run away- Back",164574
26386,156380,Blood on the Leaves,rap,Kanye West,2013,2834965,{},"


Strange fruit hangin' from the poplar trees
Blood on the leaves


I just need to clear my mind now
It's been racin' since the summertime
Now I'm holdin' down the summer now
And all I want is what I can't buy now
'Cause I ain't got the money on me right now
And I told you to wait
Yeah, I told you to wait
So I'ma need a little more time now
'Cause I ain't got the money on me right now
And I thought you could wait
Yeah, I thought you could wait
These bitches surroundin' me (Black bodies)
All want something out me
Then they talk about me
Would be lost without me
We could've been somebody
Thought you'd be different 'bout it
Now I know you naughty
So let's get on with it

We could've been somebody
'stead you had to tell somebody
Let's take it back to the first party
When you tried your first molly
And came out of your body
And came out of your body
Running naked down the lobby
And you was screamin' that you love me
Before the limelight tore ya
Before the limelight stole ya
Remember we were so young
When I would hold you
Before the blood on the leaves
I know there ain't wrong with me
Something strange is happenin'


You could've been somebody
We could've, ugh, we could've been somebody
Or was it on the first party
When we tried our first molly
And came out of our body
And came out of our body
Before they call lawyers
Before you tried to destroy us
How you gon' lie to the lawyer?
It's like I don't even know ya
I gotta bring it back to the 'nolia

Fuck them other niggas 'cause I'm down with my niggas
Fuck them other niggas 'cause I'm down with my niggas
Fuck them other niggas 'cause I'm down with my niggas
I ride with my niggas, I'd die for my...


To all my second-string bitches, tryin' get a baby
Tryin' get a baby, now you talkin' crazy
I don't give a damn if you used to talk to JAY-Z
He ain't with you, he with Beyoncé, you need to stop actin' lazy
She Instagram herself like #BadBitchAlert
He Instagram his watch like #MadRichAlert
He only wanna see that ass in reverse
Two-thousand-dollar bag with no cash in your purse
Now you sittin' courtside, wifey on the other side
Gotta keep 'em separated, I call that apartheid
Then she said she pregnant-ated, that's the night your heart died
Then you gotta go and tell your girl and report that
Main reason 'cause your pastor said you can't abort that
Now your driver say that new Benz, you can't afford that
All that cocaine on the table, you can't snort that
That go into that, all that money that the court got
All in on that alimony, uh
Yeah-yeah, she got you, homie, yeah
'Til death, but do your part, uh
Unholy matrimony

That summer night holdin' long and long, 'din long
Now waiting for the summer rose and (Breeze)
And breathe and breathe
And breathe and breathe
And breathe and breathe
And live and learn
And live and learn
And livin' and livin' like I'm lonely
Lonely, lonely
And livin' all I have
And livin' all
And live
And live",167180
26389,156471,I Am a God,rap,Kanye West,2013,1598100,{God},"


Blazin', mi don't want dem
Mi need dem
Blazin
Suh mi tek har outta bugah red and put her in a tall skirt
And now she find out what life is really worth
No to X rated
Yo mi tek har outta bugah red and put her in a tall skirt
And now she find out what life is really worth
No to X rated
I am a God
I am a God
I am a God


I am a God
Hurry up with my damn massage
Hurry up with my damn ménage
Get the Porsche out the damn garage
I am a God
Even though I'm a man of God
My whole life in the hand of God
So y'all better quit playin' with God

Soon as they like you make 'em unlike you
Cause kissin' people ass is so unlike you
The only rapper compared to Michael
So here's a few hatin'-ass niggas to fight you
And here's a few snake-ass niggas to bite you
And I don't even wanna hear 'bout what niggas might do
Old niggas mentally still in high school
Since the tight jeans they ain't never liked you
Pink-ass polos with a fuckin' backpack
But everybody know you brought real rap back
Nobody had swag, man, we the Rat Pack
Virgil, Pyrex, Don C snapback
Ibn diamond, Chi-town shinin'
Monop' in this bitch again, changed the climate
Hop in this bitch to give Saint the garment
Until the day I get struck by lightning


I am a God
So hurry up with my damn massage
In a French-ass restaurant
Hurry up with my damn croissants
I am a God
I am a God
I am a God

Ahh!
Ahh!


I just talked to Jesus
He said, ""What up, Yeezus?""
I said, ""Shit-I'm chillin'
Tryna stack these millions""
I know he the most high
But I am a close high
Mi casa, su casa
That's our cosa nostra
I am a God
I am a God
I am a God


Ahh!
Ahh!
Ahh!
Ahh!


Ain't no way I'm givin' up, I'm a God",167267
26436,157321,Collard Greens,rap,ScHoolboy Q,2013,3003331,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Uh,  uh
Yo, yo


Oh, oh, luxury
Chidi-ching-ching, could buy anything, cop that
Oh, oh, collard greens
Three degrees low, make it hot for me, drop that
Oh, oh, down with the shit
Drink this, smoke this, get down with the shit
Hey, oh, oh, down with the shit
Cop this, pop this, down with the shit


Smoke this, drink this, straight to my liver
Watch this, no tick, yeah I'm the nigga
Gang rap, X-mas, smoke, shots I deliver
Faded, Vegas, might sponsor the killer
Shake it, break it, hot-hot for the winter
Drop it, cop it, eyes locked on your inner object
Rock it, blast-blast, new beginnings
Lovely, pinky how not I remember, fiendin'
Give me, give me, give me some
Freak the freckles off your face
Frenchy, freakin', swappin' tongue
Click my link and spread your buns
Lose your denim, make it numb
Blow it, baby, no Saddam (Icky-icky, icky-icky)
Fuckin' in the car service, thank me for the car pool
Chromosome, part full, probly off a Norco
And gas, not the Arco, poppin' since the intro
You shoppin' from the window, play my favorite tempo

Oh, oh, luxury
Chidi-ching-ching, could buy anything, cop that
Oh, oh, collard greens
Three degrees low, make it hot for me, drop that
Oh, oh, down with that shit
Drink this, smoke this, get down with the shit
Hey, oh, oh, down with the shit
Cop this, pop this, down with the shit


Hold up, biatch! This yo' favorite song
Translation: Ven aquí, mami, ese culo
Tu quieres coger mis huevos, y papi me desespero
Chuparse puto pendejo, el pinche cabron
Let's get it - nights like this, I'm a knight like this
Sword in my hand, I fight like this
And I'm more than a man, I'm a god
Bitch, touché, en garde
Toupée drop and her two tits pop
Out of that tank top and bra
And when I say ""Doo-doo-doo-doo,"" bitch, that be K. Dot
She want some more of this
I give her more of this, I owe her this
In fact, I know she miss the way I floored this, on forgis
I know my Houston partners, drop a four on this
And focus, and slow it down
Alright, let me blow this bitch
I'm famous, I blame this on you, cash in the mirror
Hang in my penthouse roof, skyline the clearest
Watch it, your optics poppin' out, you look the weirdest
Pop my top on the 105, head with no power steerin', ah!

Oh, oh, luxury
Chidi-ching-ching, could buy anything, cop that
Oh, oh, collard greens
Three degrees low, make it hot for me, drop that
Oh, oh, down with that shit
Drink this, smoke this, get down with the shit
Hey, oh, oh, down with the shit
Cop this, pop this, down with the shit


Bummy nigga famous, straight from the bottom
Broke niggas hate it, still never robbed him
Guns in the basement, out they have a problem
Kush be my fragrance, we love marijuana
Function on fire, burn the roof off this mothafucka
Psych ward is ballin', go craze like no other
Weed steady blowin', pass the blunt to my momma
Runs in the family, puff-puff keep a nigga fiendin'
Faded, faded, faded, right?
Shot glass super size, she gon' get some dick tonight
Meet me at the W, and no, it's not the Westside
Stick it up your SoutHside (Icky-icky, icky-icky)
Baller futuristic, groovy gangsta with an attitude
What these niggas make a year
I spend that on my daughter shoes
Smokin' weed and drinkin', all the college students lovin' Q
We gon' turn it out until the neighbors wanna party too

Oh, oh, luxury
Chidi-ching-ching, could buy anything, cop that
Oh, oh, collard greens
Three degrees low, make it hot for me, drop that
Oh, oh, down with that shit
Drink this, smoke this, get down with the shit
Hey, oh, oh, down with the shit
Cop this, pop this, down with the shit",168190
26551,160426,Hold My Liquor,rap,Kanye West,2013,1744266,{},"


I can hold my liquor
But this man can't handle his weed
Dark and lonely now
On Chicago, south of town
I'm onto Indiana
I heard it in the radio now


I can't handle no liquor
But these bitches can't handle me
I can't control my niggas
And my niggas, they can't control me
You say you know me, my nigga
But you really just know the old me


Bitch, I'm back out my coma, wakin' up on your sofa
When I parked my Range Rover, slightly scratched your Corolla
Okay, I smashed your Corolla
I'm hangin' on a hangover, five years we been over
Ask me why I came over, one more hit and I can own ya
One more fuck and I can own ya, one cold night in October
Pussy had me floatin', feel like Deepak Chopra
Pussy had me dead, might call 2Pac over
Yeezy's all on your sofa, these the Red Octobers
Still ain't learn me no manners, you love me when I ain't sober
You love me when I'm hungover, even when I blow doja
Then her auntie came over, skinny bitch with no shoulders
Tellin' you that I'm bogus, bitch, you don't even know us
""Baby girl, he's a loner, baby girl, he's a loner""
Late-night organ donor, after that, he disown ya
After that he's just hopeless, soul mates become soulless
""When it's over it's over,"" and, bitch, I'm back out my coma

Callin' up your uncle's place
Shit's all over the place
I don't hear your phone
Oh, I wanna phone home


I can't handle no liquor
But these bitches can't handle me
I can't control my niggas
And my niggas, they can't control me
You say you know me, my nigga
But you really just know the old me


I heard you need a new fad (A new girl, a new girl)
I heard you need a new stack (A new girl, a new girl)
I heard you need a new phone (A new girl, a new girl)
I know your 'rents ain't be home (A new girl, a new girl)


Callin' up your uncle's place (A new girl, a new girl)
Shit's all over the place (A new girl, a new girl)
I don't hear your phone (A new girl, a new girl)
Oh, I wanna phone home (A new girl, a new girl)",171397
26552,160429,Im In It,rap,Kanye West,2013,1535822,{},"


Damn, your lips very soft
As I turn my Blackberry off
And I turn your bathwater on
And you turn off your iPhone
Careless whispers, eye fuckin', bitin' ass
Neck, ears, hair, legs, eating ass
Your pussy's too good, I need to crash
Your titties, let 'em out, free at last
Thank God almighty, they free at last
We was up at the party but we was leavin' fast
Had to stop at 7-Eleven like I needed gas
I'm lyin', I needed condoms, don't look through the glass
Chasin' love, all the bittersweet hours lost
Eatin' Asian pussy, all I need was sweet and sour sauce
Tell your boss you need an extra hour off
Get you super wet after we turn the shower off


That's all dem can do (Say wah? Say wah? Say wah? Say wah?)
That's all dem can do
We deal with action ting
Just a badman ting a-dat man do
Action ting, yo, a badman ting

I'm a badman if you know say
Disrespect we no tek, no way José
Try that 'pon February the 30th
That's right, couldn't try that no day
When we roll 'round 'pon your block
Nuh badda feel seh we won't spray, like a aerosol can
When we roll 'round 'pon your block
Nuh badda feel seh we won't spray, like an aerosol can
We a gon' smile 'pon court day
Becuh we beat murder charge like O.J


That's right, I'm in it
(Should've known I would fall)
I'm in it
(Steppin' on cracks on the floor)
That's right
(And your boys at your door)
That's right, I'm in it
(Well, you need to fight for your own)
That's right, I'm in it
(Then don't let me at your table)
I'm in it
(If you just gonna lay there)
Damn right
(Fist jumps in the air, you love flame wars)
(I'll be gone long, grab that ass, shed your clothes)

Uh, picked up where we left off
Uh, I need you home when I get off
Uh, you know I need that wet mouth
Uh, I know you need that reptile
Uh, she cut from a different textile
Uh, she love different kinds of sex now
Uh, black girl sippin' white wine
Put my fist in her like a civil rights sign
And grabbed it with a slight grind
And held it 'til the right time
Then she came like AAAAAHHH!


That's why I'm in it and I can't get out
That's all dem can do (Say wah? Say wah? Say wah? Say wah?)
That's why I'm in it and I can't get out
(That's all dem can do)
That's all dem can do
We deal with action ting
Just a badman ting a-dat man do
That's right I'm in it
I'll be gone long, grab that ass, shed your clothes


Say you long for me, for you
Lay it off with all your rules
Star fucker
Star fucker
Star fucker
Who, where?

Time to take it too far now
Uh, Michael Douglas out the car now
Uh, got the kids-and-the-wife life
Uh, but can't wake up from the nightlife
Uh, I'm so scared of my demons
Uh, I go to sleep with a nightlight
Uh, my mind move like a Tron bike
Uh, pop a wheelie on the Zeitgeist
Uh, I'm finna start a new movement
Uh, being led by the drums
Uh, I'm a rap-lic priest
Uh, gettin' head by the nuns
Uh, they don't play what I'm playin'
Uh, they don't see what I'm sayin'
Uh, they be ballin' in the D-League
Uh, I be speakin' Swaghili",171400
26672,162367,Palm Trees,rap,Flatbush Zombies,2013,1075020,{},"
So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)
So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)


Lions don't lose sleep over the 'pinion of sheep
On the road to the riches, money sticking to my cleats
I am moi, magnifique, skin noir, Darky Meech
Niggas with the most opinions usually have the least
It's funny how now rappers be on their druggy shit
Downloaded my tape, sat back, studied shit
Acid pack a hundred hits, shroom caps and hash bricks
Trippy like that Destiny Child chick on 106
This white bitch had the fucking nerve to call me a nigga
When she the one paying the surgeon for her lips to get bigger
Do you get the bigger picture? Shit is backwards, my nigga
You sneak dissing, taking jabs, get your boxing on
Cause you ain't get the word, I'm Glock Lesnar in the octagon
This shit is straight absurd, do not hate me cause your life is shitty
I show no pity, you turd, you better off in the dirt
Now you better off dead, like the title of my work

So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)
So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)


Every day; me and Mary Jane
You might say I'm addicted, but me, I'm truly lifted
Stoned so loud, you can hear me in the crowd
Smoking girl scout, sour by the ounce
Mary never cheat me
Mary not a backstabbing bitch that'll lie and deceive me
Spread it even, even, hash wax in the evening
Dab or die trying, on the road to Zion
Damn, they try and stick me for my paper
They trying to take me under, I've seen it through the vapors
Jealous ones still envy, got a couple real with me
And my bitch will talk some shit and smoke the kil' with me
Meech will hide the body, enough of that though
They saying talk is cheap, so I'll be smiling when we meet
They screaming ""Zombies!"" out in England
But I'm on the block with Mary, pushing and dreaming
Ah ah ah, I'm feeling myself
Thizzle, fo' shizzle, my nizzle, spitting riddles on instrumentals
Trippy life, blotter in the night
Fill my appetite (Fill my appetite)

So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)


Could be your mans, or be your fan, or be your kin
Pay your dues, man, I gotta choose, whether I lose or win this
Foe or friend, can't determine the difference
The instance they see you peaking, they pussy be leaking fluid
My nigga, what is you doing, all black in the back of a Buick
I'm proving I'm sadistic as sin, as I'm making murderous music
We don't rep the same things, nah, don't bother confuse it
So much stressing on my brain, momma think I'ma lose it
Human vagabond, hoes that stow they panties in my carry on
Why you hating niggas acting nonchalant (Honest, brah)
Fuck your publication that say I'm a third wheel
Architect build your mind, set stress but won't swell
Oh yes, I smoke kill, I'm crack, you smoke krills
I pack, you dope deal, in fact, I'm so chill
I'm never off the pivot, six stitches to your image
Not offended when you call me genius, all that means is


So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)
So much grams, unzip the bag
Dip in my hand, then I palm trees
So when you throw shade, it could never harm me
(So when you throw shade, it could never harm me)
",173362
26878,165590,The Motion,rap,Drake,2013,1696275,{Sampha},"
It's not me and you, it's not me it's you
You're reckless and you know it, they don't love you like I do
Say you're moving on, well, I guess that's just the motion
I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion


I don't have a fuck to give, I've been moving state to state
In my leather and my Timbs like it's 1998
And my dog Chubby Chub, that's my nigga from the way
On the Eastside of the city, that's where everybody stay
Seem like everybody calling 'cause they want me on their song
It's like every time I touch it I could never do no wrong
When they need a favor from you, man, they don't leave you alone
But I guess that's just the motion, yeah


Then that phone doesn't ring
When they got everything, that's the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
(Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh)
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
(Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh)

Yeah, looking back on it, at least my pride is intact
'Cause we said ""no strings attached"" and I still got tied up in that
Everything that I write is either for her or about her
So I'm with her even when I'm here without her and she know it
The girl that I wanna save is like a danger to my health
Try being with somebody that wanna be somebody else
I always thought she was perfect when she was being herself
Don't even know how to help, but I guess that's just the motion, yeah


She'll probably come around
Soon as I settle down, that's the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion


Nothing less and nothing more
I hear your heart hit the floor
I guess that's just the motion
Talking to you is not enough, no
I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Oh-oh, I guess that's just the motion
Yeah",176772
26887,165676,Versace Remix,rap,Migos,2013,2856144,{Drake},"
(Zaytoven)
Yeah
Oh shit, man, who that is?
Shoutout Migos, shoutout Zaytoven one time
That's Migos and Drake at the Versace store


Versace, Versace
Medusa head on me like I'm Illuminati (Versace!)
This is a gated community
Please get the fuck off the property (gate!)
Rap must be changin'
'Cause I'm at the top and ain't no one on top of me (woo!)
Niggas be wantin' a verse for a verse
But man, that's not a swap to me (nah!)
Drownin' in compliments
Pool in the backyard that look like Metropolis (Metropolis?)
I think I'm sellin' a million first week
Man, I guess I'm a optimist (milli!)
Born in Toronto but sometimes I feel like Atlanta adopted us (go!)
What the fuck is you talkin' 'bout?
Saw this shit comin' like I had binoculars, boy
Versace, Versace
We stay at the mansion when we in Miami
The pillows Versace, the sheets are Versace
I just won a Grammy (woo!)
I been so quiet, I got the world like
""What the fuck is he plannin'?"" (What?)
Just make sure that you got a back up plan
'Cause that shit might come in handy (go, go!)
Started a label, the album is comin' September
Just wait on it (just wait on it!)
This year I'm eatin' your food
And my table got so many plates on it (so many!) (damn!)
Hundred-inch TV at my house
I sit back like ""Damn, I look great on it!"" (damn, I look good!)
I do not fuck with your new shit, my nigga
Don't ask for my take on it (don't ask for my opinion!)
Speakin' in lingo, man, this for my nigga
That trap out the bando (bando, bando!)
This for my niggas that call up Fernando to move a piano (brr, brr, brr!)
Fuck all your feelin' 'cause business is business
It's strictly financial (business is business!)
I'm always the first one to get it, man
That's how you lead by example (I got it!)
Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace (Versace!)
Word in New York is the Dyckman and Heights girls are callin' me Papi (woo, woo)
I'm all on the low
Take a famous girl out where there's no paparazzi (flash!)
I'm tryna give Halle Berry a baby and no one can stop me (smash!)

Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace


Versace, Versace
Medusa head on me like I'm Illuminati
I know that you like it
Versace, my neck and my wrist is so sloppy
Versace, Versace
I love it, Versace, the top of my Audi
My plug, he John Gotti
He give me the ducks, I know that they're mighty
Shoes and shirt Versace
Your bitch want in on my pockets
She ask me why my drawers silk
I told that bitch ""Versace""
Cheetah print on my sleeve
But I ain't never been in the jungle
Try to take my sack
Better run with it, nigga, don't fumble


Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace

You can do Truey, I do it Versace
You copped the Honda, I copped the Mazi
You smoke the mid, I smoke exotic
I set the trend, you niggas copy
Cookin' this dope like I work at Hibachi
Look at the watch, it blow hot like some Taki
Come in my room, my sheet Versace
When I go to sleep I dream Versace
Medusa, Medusa, Medusa
These niggas, they wishin' they knew you
They coppin' the Truey, remixin' the Louis
My blunts is fat as Rasputia
In a striped shirt like I'm Tony the Tiger
I'm beatin' the pot, call me Michael
Lot of you niggas that copy
Look at my closet, Versace, Versace


Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace


King of Versace, Medusa my wifey
My car is Versace, I got stripes on my Mazi
I'm dressin' so nicely they can't even copy
You'd think I'm Egyptian, this gold on my body
Money my mission, two bitches
They kissin', my diamonds is pissin', my swag is exquisite
Young Offset no preacher but you niggas listen
Them blue and white diamonds, they look like the Pistons
Codeine sippin', Versace, I'm grippin'
Them bands in my pocket, you know that I'm livin'
I'm draped up in gold, but no Pharaoh
Rockin' handcuffs: that's Ferragamo
Bricks by the boat, overload
I think I'm the don but no Rocco
This the life that I chose
Bought out the store, can't go back no more
Versace my clothes while I'm sellin' them bows
Versace take over, it took out my soul

Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace, Versace, Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace
Versace, Versace Versace, Versace Versace",176872
26935,166503,Holy Grail,rap,JAY-Z,2013,6303137,"{""Justin Timberlake""}","
You'd take the clothes off my back and I'd let you
You'd steal the food right out my mouth and I'd watch you eat it
I still don't know why
Why I love it so much (Thanks for warning me)
Oh (Thanks for warning me)
You curse my name in spite to put me to shame
Hang my laundry in the streets, dirty or clean, give it up for fame
But I still don't know why
Why I love it so much (Thanks for warning me)
Yeah (Thanks for warning me)


And, baby, it's amazin' I'm in this maze with you
I just can't crack your code
One day, you're screamin' you love me loud
The next day, you're so cold
One day, you're here, one day, you're there
One day, you care, you're so unfair
Sippin' from your cup 'til it runneth over
Holy Grail

Uh, uh, uh
Blue told me remind you niggas, uh
Fuck that shit y'all talkin' 'bout, I'm the nigga, uh
Caught up in all these lights and cameras, uh
But look what that shit did to Hammer, uh
Goddamn it, I like it
Bright lights is enticin'
But look what it did to Tyson
All that money in one night
Thirty mil' for one fight
But soon as all that money blows
All the pigeons take flight
Fuck the fame, keep cheatin' on me
What I do? I took her back
Fool me twice, that's my bad
I can't even blame her for that
Enough to make me wanna murder
Momma, please just get my bail
I know nobody to blame
Kurt Cobain, I did it to myself, uh


And we all just entertainers
And we're stupid and contagious
No, we all just entertainers

And, baby, it's amazin' I'm in this maze with you
I just can't crack your code
One day, you're screamin' you love me loud
The next day, you're so cold
One day, you're here, one day, you're there
One day, you care, you're so unfair
Sippin' from your cup 'til it runneth over
Holy Grail


Now I got tattoos on my body
Psycho bitches in my lobby
I got haters in the paper
Photo shoots with paparazzi
Can't even take my daughter for a walk
See 'em by the corner store
I feel like I'm cornered off
Enough is enough, I'm callin' this off
Who the fuck I'm kiddin' though?
I'm gettin' high, sittin' low
Slidin' by in that big body
Curtains all in my window
This fame hurt, but this chain worse
I think back you asked the same person
If this is all you had to deal with
Nigga, deal with, this shit ain't work
This light work, camera snappin', my eyes hurt
Niggas dying back where I was birthed
Fuck your iris and the IRS
Get the hell up off your high horse
You got the shit that niggas die for, dry yours
Why you mad? Take the good with the bad
Or throw the baby out with that bath water

You still alive, still that nigga
Nigga, you survived, you still gettin' bigger
Nigga, living the life, vanilla wafers in a villa
Illest nigga alive; Michael Jackson's Thriller


And, baby, it's amazin' I'm in this maze with you
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
I just can't crack your code (Uh, uh, uh)
One day, you're screamin' you love me loud (Uh, uh, uh)
The next day, you're so cold (Uh, uh, uh)
One day, you're here (Uh), one day, you're there
One day, you care (Uh), you're so unfair (Uh, uh)
Sippin' from your cup 'til it runneth over
Holy Grail


You get the air out my lungs whenever you need it
And you take the blade right out my heart
Just so you can watch me bleed
And I still don't know why (Don't know why)
Why I love you so much (Thanks for warning me)
Yeah (Thanks for warning me)
And you play this game in spite to drive me insane
I got it tattooed on my sleeve
Forever in ink with guess whose name?
But I still don't know why
Why our love is so much (Thanks for warning me)
Yeah (Thanks for warning me)


And, baby, it's amazin' I'm in this maze with you (Uh, uh, uh, uh)
I just can't crack your code (Uh)
One day, you're screamin' you love me loud
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
The next day, you're so cold (Uh)
One day, you're here, one day, you're there (Uh, uh)
One day, you care, you're so unfair (Uh, uh, uh)
Sippin' from your cup 'til it runneth over
Holy Grail


(Holy, holy, holy, holy, holy, holy grail)
(Holy, holy, holy, holy, holy, holy grail)
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Don't know why

",177832
26971,167085,Beware,rap,Big Sean,2013,2066599,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Jhené Aiko""}","
When you said it was over, you shot right through my heart
Why you let these hoes tear what we had right apart?
Ooh, I was so mad, I should've seen this coming right from the start
You should beware, beware, beware of a woman with a broken heart


Yeah, praying to a sky all black
Looking at the stars like they finna talk back
Looking at my phone like she finna call back
But last night I feel like probably ended all that
'Cause by now, she woulda sent a text in all caps
Then another one tryna take it all back
Saying ""Fuck you,"" ""I miss you,"" or ""I hate you so much""
'Cause girls only say ""hate you"" to the guys that they love
I know, I know, I know
The highs, the lows it comes, it goes
You say ""Be real,"" I try, I don't
'Cause you take anything and just make it everything (God)
Kept my phone on silent ever since you got a ring, funny, right?
And I never cheated; I mean, maybe once or twice
But one time don't change everything
She ask why I don't feel the same, I'm still the same
She's still insane and now she's saying

When you said it was over, you shot right through my heart
Why you let these hoes tear what we had right apart?
Ooh, I was so mad, I should've seen this coming right from the start
You should beware, beware, beware of a woman with a broken heart


Okay, skeet, smoke, sleep, call, miss, text, woke, spoke
Lie, feel, Lisa, ew, time, kill, months, still


I got somebody baby mama calling me daddy (Yup)
I drank too much, please call me a cabby (Swerve)
Penthouse afterparty, hoes want the addy (Swerve)
Fuck, they can ride with us, crawl in the Caddy
Third row, that's when you call, I hit cancel
Really, I hit answer, fuck, I hate when that happens
Phone in my pocket for the whole night
And you heard bitches screaming 'til my phone died
Then she text me like, ""Why you still talk to my mama?
How the fuck you run around with condoms?
Why you make me get this tattoo? Man, fuck this tattoo
You the reason I wasn't single in college
What, all because I had you?
Nigga, I don't even have you
How I'm supposed to get past you?""
Then she called the next guy, spillin' some real shit
Now they problems that he got to deal with

When you said it was over, you shot right through my heart
Why you let these hoes tear what we had right apart?
Ooh, I was so mad, I should've seen this coming right from the start
You should beware, beware, beware of a woman with a broken heart


Girl, don't believe them hoes
'Cause they don't wanna see us together
And you already know you're too fly
But baby, don't get your hair caught in the propellers
I be tryna tell her these hoes is jealous
You know they never like it when you never say never
Long hair, red bone, but her pussy is hairless
Mwah, I french kiss it like we in Paris
I be screaming out, ""Ain't no woman like the one I got!""
But she be always worrying about the one I fucked
She said it's gonna be me, myself and I
Damn, that'd make me a one-eyed fuck
I was so mad
Damn, you used to ride a nigga like a moped
But players fuck up, my bad
And just to keep from crying, I laughed


When you said it was over, you shot right through my heart (Tunechi)
Why you let these hoes tear what we had right apart
Ooh, I was so mad, I should've seen this coming right from the start (Damn)
You should beware, beware, beware of a woman with a broken heart

Baby, last time calling me baby
Last time calling me crazy, crazy, crazy
Baby, last time calling me baby
Last time calling me crazy, crazy, crazy",178511
27049,168110,Oceans,rap,JAY-Z,2013,1144919,"{""Frank Ocean""}","
(You see this motherfucking face)
Blessings, blessings, yeah, I see..


Elephant tusk on the bow of a sailing lady, docked on the Ivory Coast
Mercedes in a row winding down the road
I hope my black skin don't dirt this white tuxedo before the Basquiat show
And if so, well fuck it, fuck it
Because this water drown my family, this water mixed my blood
This water tells my story, this water knows it all
Go ahead and spill some champagne in the water
Go ahead and watch the sun blaze on the waves of the ocean


Dope boy still smelling like cocaina
White boat, white robe, can he be more cleaner?
The oil spill that BP ain't clean up
I'm anti-Santa Maria
Only Christopher we acknowledge is Wallace
I don't even like Washingtons in my pocket
Black card go hard when I'm shopping
Boat docked in front of Hermès picking cotton
Silk and fleeces, lay on my Jesus
Oh my God, I hope y'all don't get seasick
See me in shit you never saw
If it wasn't for these pictures they wouldn't see me at all
Aww, whole world's in awe
I crash through glass ceilings, I break through closed doors
I'm on the ocean, I'm in heaven
Yachting, Ocean 11

Elephant tusk on the bow of a sailing lady, docked on the Ivory Coast
Mercedes in a row winding down the road
I hope my black skin don't dirt this white tuxedo before the Basquiat show
And if so, well fuck it, fuck it
Because this water drown my family, this water mixed my blood
This water tells my story, this water knows it all
Go ahead and spill some champagne in the water
Go ahead and watch the sun blaze on the waves of the ocean


Me and Ty Ty is like Pablo and Popeye
Winding dirt roads on mopeds spilling Opus
Welcome to the magnum opus, the Magna Carta
The best-selling author Decoded
On the holiday playin' ""Strange Fruit""
If I'ma make it to a billi, I can't take the same route
Swoosh, that's the sound of the border
Swoosh, and that's the sound of a baller
Muhammad Hovi my back against the rope
The black Maybach, I'm back inside the boat
Shepard Fairey they finally gave me some hope
Can't believe they got a nigga to vote
Democrat? Nope, I sold dope
In trouble waters I had to learn how to float
On the ocean, I'm in heaven
Yachting, Ocean 11

Elephant tusk on the bow of a sailing lady, docked on the Ivory Coast
Mercedes in a row winding down the road
I hope my black skin don't dirt this white tuxedo before the Basquiat show
And if so, well fuck it, fuck it
Because this water drown my family, this water mixed my blood
This water tells my story, this water knows it all
Go ahead and spill some champagne in the water
Go ahead and watch the sun blaze on the waves of the ocean",179701
27103,168797,Part II On the Run,rap,JAY-Z,2013,2421972,{Beyoncé},"
Who wants that perfect love story anyway, anyway?
Cliché, cliché, cliché, cliché
Who wants that hero love that saves the day, anyway?
Cliché, cliché, cliché, cliché
What about the bad guy goes good, yeah?
An innocent love I'm misunderstood, yeah?
Black hour glass, our glass
Toast to clichés in a dark past
Toast to clichés in a dark past


Boy meets girl, girl perfect woman
Girl get to bustin' before the cops come running
Chuck the deuces, chugging D'USSÉ, ugh
Fuck what you say, boys in blue say


I don't care if we on the run
Baby as long I'm next to you
(Uhuu)
And if loving you is a crime
Tell me why do I bring out the best in you
Why

I hear sirens while we make love
Loud as hell, but they don't know
They're nowhere near us
I will hold your heart and your gun
I don't care if they come, noooo
I know it's crazy but


They can take me
Now that I found the places that you
Take me
Without you I got nothing to lose


I'm an outlaw, got an outlaw chick
Bumping 2Pac, on my outlaw shit
Matching tats, this Ink don't come off
Even if rings come off, if things ring off
My nails get dirty, my past ain't pretty
My lady is, my Mercedes is
My baby momma harder than a lot of you niggas
Keep it 100, hit the lottery niggas
You ain't about that life ain't gotta lie to me, nigga
You know it's till the death, I hope it's obvi to niggas
Ugh
Cross the line, speak about mine
I'ma wave this TEC, I'm a geek about mine
Touch a nigga where his rib at, I click clack
Push your mothafuckin' wig back, I did that
I been wilding since a juvi, she was a good girl
'til she knew me, now she is in the drop bustin' Uey's, screaming

They can take me
Now that I found the places that you
Take me
Without you I got nothing to lose


Deeper than words, beyond right
Die for your love, beyond life
Sweet as a Jesus piece, beyond ice
Blind me baby with your neon lights
Ray Bans on, police in sight
Oh, what a beautiful death, let's both wear white
If you go to heaven and they bring me to hell
Just sneak out and meet me, bring a box of L's
She fell in love with the bad guy, the bad guy
What you doing with them rap guys, them rap guys
They ain't see potential in me girl, but you see it
If it's me and you against the world, then so be it


I don't care if they give me life
I get all of my life from you
(Uhuu)
And if loving you had a price
I would pay my life for you

I hear sirens while we make love
Loud as hell, but they don't know
They're nowhere near us
I will hold your heart and your gun
I don't care if they come, noooo
I know it's crazy but


I don't care I'll never give it up
Give it up, give it up, give it all away
No I swear I'll never give it up
Give it up, give it up, give it all away
I don't care I'll never give it up
Give it up, give it up, give it all away
No I swear I'll never give it up
Give it up, give it up, give it all away
(Without you I got nothing to lose)",180511
27297,170005,Tom Ford,rap,JAY-Z,2013,1655085,{},"
Clap for a nigga with his rapping ass
Blow a stack for your niggas with your trapping ass
Clap for a nigga with his rapping ass
Blow a stack for your niggas with your trapping ass


Tom Ford
Tom Ford
Tom Ford


Coming up, coming down
Riding clean fix your hair in my Crown
Bad bitch, H town
Keep it trill, y'all know y'all can't fuck around


Paris where we been, pard' my Parisian
It's Hov time in no time, it's fuck-all-y'all season
Piss Bordeaux and Burgundies, flush out a Riesling
When Hov's out, them hoes out, y'all put y'all weaves in, and
Clap for a nigga with his rapping ass
Blow a stack for your niggas with your trapping ass
Spent all my euros on tuxes and weird clothes
I party with weirdos, yeah Hov, yeah Hov

I don't pop molly, I rock Tom Ford
International bring back the Concorde
Numbers don't lie, check the scoreboard
Tom Ford
Tom Ford
Tom Ford


Hands down got the best flow, sound I'm so special
Sound boy burial, this my Wayne Perry flow
Y'all know nothing 'bout Wayne Perry though
District of Columbia, guns on y'all Tumblrs
Fuck hashtags and retweets, nigga
140 characters in these streets, nigga
Pardon my laughing, y'all only flagging on beats, nigga
Pardon my laughing, I happen to think you sweet


I don't pop molly, I rock Tom Ford
International bring back the Concorde
Numbers don't lie, check the scoreboard
Tom Ford
Tom Ford
Tom Ford

Oh, man, homie, so throwed


Coming up, coming down
Riding clean fix your hair in my Crown
Bad bitch, H town
Keep it trill, y'all know y'all can't fuck around


Hold up
I don't pop molly, I rock Tom Ford",181906
27419,170995,FuckWithMeYouKnowIGotIt,rap,JAY-Z,2013,1446372,"{""Rick Ross""}","
""A little over a year ago I was in bondage. And now I'm back out here, reaping the blessings, and getting the benefits that go along with it. Everything that's out here for kings like us. The reason why we like this-this jewelry and this diamonds and stuff-they don't understand, it's because we really from Africa. And that's where all this stuff come from. And we originated from kings, you know what I'm saying? So don't look down on the youngsters because they wanna have shiny things. It's in our genes, know what I'm saying? We just don't all know our history, so...""


Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Sexy bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Come fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Sexy bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Come fuck with me, you know I got it


I just landed in Europe, nigga
Shoppin' bags, I'm a tourist, nigga
Money talk, I speak fluent, nigga
Reeboks on, I just do it, nigga
Look at me, I'm pure, nigga
I bet the hoes on my tour, nigga
I don't bop, I do the money dance
My bitch whip cost a hundred grand

Red vert, you see me slide
Sexy bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Sexy bitch, I know she 'bout it
Fuck with me, you know I got it


Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Sexy bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Come fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Sexy bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Come fuck with me, you know I got it


Hov just landed in Rome, nigga
All hail, Caesar's home, niggas
Cent'anni, ciao bella
Come money dance with the good fellas
Hov keep gettin' that dinero, got it
Even if a nigga gotta rob it, get it?
Black Jack in a casino
A nigga got unlimited credit, uh
A nigga got a lot of vendettas, uh
But we the Black mob, we gon' set it, uh
Peel off in a Lamborghini Countach
200 in the dash, we gonna rev it (skirt)
Lucky Luciano is what they call me, paesano
A 100 keys at the piano
Plays across the Verrazano
El Padrino, in the villa in Venice, sippin' vino
Not bad for a mulignan
Y'all know like we know, I got it

Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Bad bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Fuck with me, you know I got it
Bad bitch, I hope she 'bout it
Bad bitch, I know she 'bout it


I'm ridin' big, comin' down that beach
Geechi niggas with satin sheets
Bad bitch, she a masterpiece
Got a bad bitch, she a master; peace",182976
27742,173845,Love More,rap,Chris Brown,2013,1130170,"{""Nicki Minaj""}","
'Til we get it
I'ma get it
'Til we get it
'Til we get it
I'ma get it
'Til we get it


You say all you need is consistent love
When I try, I swear it's never enough, I messed up
Maybe this thing here just ain't meant for us
Baby, you let go and I pull you back
I let go, you ain't havin' that


We do it like rock stars (Oh)
Sexin' in my hotel room and we so loud
Higher than a smoke cloud (Oh)
Shades on, doin' 95 with the top down
I might sound crazy (Oh)
'Cause we be goin' back and forth
One minute I hate you, then I love you
That's how it is

'Til we get it right we gon' fuck some more
'Til we get it, I'ma get it
I'ma get it, 'til we get it, 'til we get it
'Til we get it right we gon' fuck some more
I'ma get it, I'ma get it
'Til we get it, 'til we get it, I'ma get it (Turn up)


Why is it all so complicated?
Baby, this should be simple, it's drivin' me mental
But when you back it up, it really drives me crazy
And you know what I'm into
Make me forget what we arguin' about, ayy


We do it like rock stars (Oh)
Sexin' in my hotel room and we so loud
Higher than a smoke cloud (Oh)
Shades on, doin' 95 with the top down
I might sound crazy (Oh)
'Cause we be goin' back and forth
One minute I hate you, then I love you
That's how it is


'Til we get it right we gon' fuck some more (Oh no)
'Til we get it, I'ma get it
I'ma get it (Ayy), 'til we get it, 'til we get it (We get it right)
'Til we get it right we gon' fuck some more (More)
I'ma get it, I'ma get it
'Til we get it (Yeah), 'til we get it, I'ma get it (Yo, turn up)

He don't know me but he settin' up to blow me, uh
Said my Twitter picture 'mind him of Naomi, uh
On the low, I used to holla at his homie, uh
Fuck it, now I'm 'bout to ride him like a pony, yeah
Okay, thug prolly, yo, come polly
He wanna fuck a bad Dolly and pop Molly
I hope your pockets got a motherfuckin' pot belly
Or is it that you never ball? John Salley
He had the Rolls in the Royce, the tone in his voice
Don't want a good girl, naw, hoes is his choice
D-D-Dick on H, p-p-p-pussy on W
Mouth on open, a-a-ass on smother you
A-A-Ass on the cover too, Elle Magazine
Vroom, vroom, vroom, get gasoline
Could I be your wife? Naw, we could bang though
I got these niggas whipped, call me Django (If we)


'Til we get it right we gon' fuck some more (Oh-oh)
'Til we get it, I'ma get it
I'ma get it (I'ma get it), 'til we get it, 'til we get it
'Til we get it right we gon' fuck some more (Some more)
I'ma get it, I'ma get it
'Til we get it (Yeah, yeah, yeah), 'til we get it, I'ma get it",186120
29004,183833,All Me,rap,Drake,2013,4005603,"{""Big Sean"",""2 Chainz""}","


I'm really stepping up my game
These bitches gotta start paying me for this
Can't get no more free, Randy


Got everything, I got everything
I cannot complain, I cannot
I don't even know how much I really made, I forgot, it's a lot
Fuck that, never mind what I got
Nigga don't watch that 'cause I-
Came up, that's all me, stay true, that's all me (yeah)
No help, that's all me, all me for real
Came up, that's all me, stay true, that's all me (2 Chainz)
No help, that's all me, all me for real


Money on my mind, you should think the same
J's on, pinky ring, dogging these hoes, I need quarantine
In the same league, but we don't ball the same
(Ah) She want all the fame, I hear that shit all the time
She said she love me, I said, ""Baby girl, fall in line""
Okay, made a million off a dinner fork, watch me switch it up
Walked in, ""Ill nigga alert! Ill nigga alert!""
You need that work, I got that work, got bitches in my condo
Just bought a shirt that cost a Mercedes-Benz car note
From the A to Toronto, we let the metal go off
And my dick so hard it make the metal detector go off
This that sauce, this that dressing
Givenchy, nigga, God bless you
If having a bad bitch was a crime, I'd be arrested (Tru)

Got everything, I got everything
I cannot complain, I cannot
I don't even know how much I really made, I forgot, it's a lot
Fuck that, never mind what I got
Nigga don't watch that 'cause I-
Came up, that's all me, stay true, that's all me
No help, that's all me, all me for real
Came up, that's all me, stay true, that's all me
No help, that's all me, all me for real


I touched down in '86, knew I was the man by the age of 6
I even fucked the girl that used to babysit
But that was years later on some crazy shit
I heard your new shit, nigga hated it
Damon Wayans, homie don't play that shit
I get paid a lot, you get paid a bit
And my latest shit is like a greatest hits
Goddamn, ain't no wishing over on this side
Y'all don't fuck with us, then we don't fuck with y'all
It's no different over on this side
Goddamn, should I listen to everybody or myself?
'Cause myself just told myself:
""You're the motherfucking man, you don't need no help""
Cashing checks and I'm bigging up my chest
Y'all keep talking 'bout who next, but I'm about as big as it gets
I swear y'all just wasting y'all breath
I'm the light skinned Keith Sweat, I'ma make it last forever
It's not your turn 'cause I ain't done yet
Look, just understand that I'm on a roll like Cottonelle
I was made for all of this shit
And I'm on the road box office sales
I'm getting paid for all of this shit
Ask you to please excuse my table manners
I was making room for the table dancers
'Cause if we judging off your advances
Then I just got paid like eight advances, goddamn!

Got everything, I got everything
I cannot complain, I cannot
I don't even know how much I really made, I forgot, it's a lot
Fuck that, never mind what I got
Nigga don't watch that 'cause I-
Came up, that's all me, stay true, that's all me
No help, that's all me, all me for real
Came up, that's all me, stay true, that's all me-


Ho, shut the fuck up!
I got way too much on my mental
I learn from what I've been through
I'm finna do what I didn't do
And still waking up like the rent's due
Not complicated, it's simple
I got sexy ladies, a whole Benz-full
And to them hoes I'm everything-everything but gentle
But I still take my time (Time)
Man, I guess I'm just old fashioned
Wearing retro sh-, that's old fashion
Nigga, see what I'm saying, no closed caption
I paint pics, see the shit, good sex, need to hit
Keep a broad on the floor year 'round like season tickets
I plead the fifth, drink a fifth, load the nine
Leave you split, in the half, smoke a half, need a zip
My new girl is on Glee and shit
Probably making more money than me and shit
I swear to God I got 99 problems but a bitch ain't one
I got 99 problems, getting rich ain't one
Like I got trust issues
I'm sorry for the people I've pushed out
I'm the type to have a bullet-proof condom
And still gotta pull out
But that's just me and I ain't perfect
I ain't a saint but I am worth it
If it's one thing, I am worth it
Niggas still hating but it ain't working
Lil' bitch...

Oh me, oh me, oh my
I think I done fucked too many women from the 305
'Fore the end of this year
I'll do King of Diamonds 3 more times
Smoking on that kush all in our section
Like it's legalized
Girl, you can't always have your way
Sometimes it be like that
They don't really fuck with you like that
They ain't never did me like that
I just took my time, you got the shine
I let you eat like that
I been taught to never loan somebody
What you need right back
And I need that shit right back
(No more free Randy) I'm blessed than a muhfucka
Niggas been stressed than a muhfucka
Niggas getting nervous
Clutching they chests like a muhfucka
Damn that's a motherfucker
Tell the truth, I don't listen to you
'Cause I don't like being lied to
And that ship won't sail
And that wind won't guide you
Daddy was in jail, we was talking through the window
Like a motherfucking drive-thru
That was back then, man
Now my niggas rich enough to do whatever I do",196551
29116,184444,Cant Help Falling in Love,pop,Elvis Presley,1961,2614154,{},"
Wise men say only fools rush in
But I can't help falling in love with you


Shall I stay? Would it be a sin
If I can't help falling in love with you?


Like a river flows
Surely to the sea
Darling, so it goes
Some things are meant to be


Take my hand, take my whole life, too
For I can't help falling in love with you


Like a river flows
Surely to the sea
Darling, so it goes
Some things are meant to be

Take my hand, take my whole life, too
For I can't help falling in love with you
For I can't help falling in love with you",197191
29568,187627,Hold On Were Going Home,rb,Drake,2013,5471927,"{""Majid Jordan""}","
I got my eyes on you
You're everything that I see
I want your hot love and emotion endlessly
I can't get over you
You left your mark on me
I want your hot love and emotion endlessly


'Cause you're a good girl and you know it
You act so different around me
'Cause you're a good girl and you know it
I know exactly who you could be


Just hold on, we're going home
Just hold on, we're going home
It's hard to do these things alone
Just hold on, we're going home


I got my eyes on you
You're everything that I see
I want your hot love and emotion endlessly
I can't get over you
You left your mark on me
I want your hot love and emotion endlessly

'Cause you're a good girl and you know it
You act so different around me
'Cause you're a good girl and you know it
I know exactly who you could be


So just hold on, we're going home (Going home)
Just hold on, we're going home (Going home)
It's hard to do these things alone (Things alone)
Just hold on, we're going home (Going home, going home)


You're the girl, you're the one
Gave you everything I loved
I think there's something, baby
I think there's something, baby
You're the girl, you're the one
Gave you everything I loved
I think there's something, baby
I think there's something, baby


'Cause you're a good girl and you know it
You act so different around me
'Cause you're a good girl and you know it
I know exactly who you could be

Oh, just hold on, we're going home (Going home)
Just hold on, we're going home (Going home)
It's hard to do these things alone (Things alone)
Just hold on, we're going home (Going home)
Home (Going home)


Hold on
Oh, oh

",200546
29609,187993,All of Me,rb,John Legend,2013,4532430,{},"
What would I do without your smart mouth?
Drawin' me in and you kickin' me out
You've got my head spinnin', no kiddin'
I can't pin you down
What's goin' on in that beautiful mind?
I'm on your magical mystery ride
And I'm so dizzy, don't know what hit me
But I'll be alright


My head's under water, but I'm breathing fine
You're crazy and I'm out of my mind


'Cause all of me
Loves all of you
Love your curves and all your edges
All your perfect imperfections
Give your all to me
I'll give my all to you
You're my end and my beginnin'
Even when I lose, I'm winnin'

'Cause I give you all of me
And you give me all of you, oh-oh


How many times do I have to tell you?
Even when you're crying, you're beautiful too
The world is beating you down, I'm around
Through every mood
You're my downfall, you're my muse
My worst distraction, my rhythm and blues
I can't stop singing, it's ringing
In my head for you


My head's under water, but I'm breathin' fine
You're crazy and I'm out of my mind


'Cause all of me
Loves all of you
Love your curves and all your edges
All your perfect imperfections
Give your all to me
I'll give my all to you
You're my end and my beginnin'
Even when I lose, I'm winnin'

'Cause I give you all of me
And you give me all of you, oh-oh


Give me all of you, oh
Cards on the table, we're both showing hearts
Risking it all, though it's hard


'Cause all of me
Loves all of you
Love your curves and all your edges
All your perfect imperfections
Give your all to me
I'll give my all to you
You're my end and my beginnin'
Even when I lose, I'm winnin'


'Cause I give you all of me
And you give me all of you


I give you all of me
And you give me all of you, oh-oh",200930
29923,190760,​Tous les mêmes,pop,Stromae,2013,1367996,{},"


Vous les hommes vous êtes tous les mêmes
Macho mais cheap
Bande de mauviettes infidèles
Si prévisibles, non je ne suis pas certaine, que tu l'mérites
Z'avez d'la chance qu'on vous aime
Dis-moi ""Merci""


Rendez-vous, rendez-vous, rendez-vous au prochain règlement
Rendez-vous, rendez-vous, rendez-vous sûrement aux prochaines règles


Cette fois c'était la dernière
Tu peux croire que c'est qu'une crise
Mate une dernière fois mon derrière, il est à côté de mes valises
Tu diras au revoir à ta mère, elle qui t'idéalise
Tu n'vois même pas tout c'que tu perds
Avec une autre ce serait pire
Quoi toi aussi tu veux finir maintenant?
C'est l'monde à l'envers!
Moi je l'disais pour t'faire réagir seulement... toi t'y pensais

Rendez-vous, rendez-vous, rendez-vous au prochain règlement
Rendez-vous, rendez-vous, rendez-vous sûrement aux prochaines règles


Facile à dire, je suis gnan-gnan
Et que j'aime trop les bla bla bla
Mais non non non, c'est important
Ce que t'appelles les ragnagnas
Tu sais la vie c'est des enfants
Mais comme toujours c'est pas l'bon moment
Ah oui pour les faire là tu es présent
Mais pour les élever y'aura des absents


Lorsque je n'serai plus belle
Ou du moins au naturel
Arrête je sais que tu mens
Il n'y a que Kate Moss qui est éternelle
Moche ou bête, c'est jamais bon!
Bête ou belle, c'est jamais bon!
Belle ou moi, c'est jamais bon!
Moi ou elle, c'est jamais bon!


Rendez-vous, rendez-vous, rendez-vous au prochain règlement
Rendez-vous, rendez-vous, rendez-vous sûrement aux prochaines règles

Tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes et y'en a marre
Tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes et y'en a marre
Tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes et y'en a marre
Tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes, tous les mêmes",203940
29925,190764,Carmen,pop,Stromae,2013,1122097,{},"
L'amour est comme l'oiseau de Twitter
On est bleu de lui, seulement pour 48 heures
D'abord on s'affilie, ensuite on se follow
On en devient fêlé, et on finit solo
Prends garde à toi
Et à tous ceux qui vous like
Les sourires en plastique sont souvent des coups d'hashtag
Prends garde à toi
Ah les amis, les potes ou les followers
Vous faites erreur, vous avez juste la cote


Prends garde à toi
Si tu t'aimes
Garde à moi
Si je m'aime
Garde à nous, garde à eux, garde à vous
Et puis chacun pour soi
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça, consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça, consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme

L'amour est enfant de la consommation
Il voudra toujours toujours toujours plus de choix
Voulez voulez-vous des sentiments tombés du camion ?
L'offre et la demande pour unique et seule loi
Prends garde à toi
""Mais j'en connais déjà les dangers, moi
J'ai gardé mon ticket et, s'il le faut, j'vais l'échanger, moi
Prends garde à toi
Et, s'il le faut, j'irai m'venger moi
Cet oiseau d'malheur, j'le mets en cage
J'le fais chanter, moi""


Prends garde à toi
Si tu t'aimes
Garde à moi
Si je m'aime
Garde à nous, garde à eux, garde à vous
Et puis chacun pour soi
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça, consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça, consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme
Et c'est comme ça qu'on s'aime, s'aime, s'aime, s'aime
Comme ça consomme, somme, somme, somme, somme

Un jour t'achètes, un jour tu aimes
Un jour tu jettes, mais un jour tu payes
Un jour tu verras, on s'aimera
Mais avant on crèvera tous, comme des rats",203944
29934,190782,Control,rap,Big Sean,2013,4713257,"{""Jay Electronica"",""Kendrick Lamar""}","


Mhm, I look up
Yeah, and I take my time, nigga
I'ma take my time, woah
Mhm, power moves only, nigga


Boy, I'm 'bout my business on business, I drink liquor on liquor
I had women on women: yeah, that's bunk-bed bitches
I've done lived more than an 80-year-old man still kickin'
'Cause they live for some moments, and I live for a livin'
But this for the girls who barely let me get to first base
On some ground ball shit
'Cause now I run my city on some town hall shit
They prayin' on my motherfuckin' downfall, bitch
Like a drought, but you gon' get this rain like it's May weather
G.O.O.D. Music, 'Ye weather
Champagne just tastes better
They told me I never, boy, never say never
Swear flow special like an infant's first steps
I got paid then reversed debts
Then I finally found a girl that reverse stress
So now I'm talkin' to the reaper to reverse death
Yep, so I can kick it with my granddad, take him for a ride
Show him I made somethin' out myself and not just tried
Show him the house I bought the fam, let him tour inside
No matter how far ahead I get, I always feel behind in my mind
But fuck tryin' and not doin'
'Cause not doin' is somethin' a nigga not doin'
I said fuck tryin' and not doin'
'Cause not doin' is somethin' a nigga not doin'
I grew up to Em, B.I.G., and Pac, bitch, and got ruined
So until I got the same crib B.I.G. had in that ""Juicy"" vid
Bitch, I can't motherfuckin' stop movin'
Go against me, you won't stop losin'
From the city where every month is May-Day at home, spray your dome
Niggas get sprayed up like A.K. was cologne for a paycheck or loan
Yeah, I know that shit ain't fair
They say Detroit ain't got a chance, we ain't even got a mayor
You write your name with a Sharpie, I write mine in stone
I knew the world was for the taking and wouldn't take long
We on, tryna be better than everybody that's better than everybody
Rep Detroit, everybody, Detroit vers' everybody
I'm so fuckin' first class I could spit up on every pilot
The city's my Metropolis, feel it, it's metabolic
And I'm over niggas sayin' they're the hottest niggas
Then run to the hottest niggas just to stay hot
I'm one of the hottest because I flame drop
Drop fire, and not because I'm namedroppin', Hall of Fame droppin'
And I ain't takin' shit from nobody unless they're OGs
'Cause that ain't the way of a OG
So I G-O collect mo' Gs, every dollar
Never changed though, I'm just the new version of old me
Forever hot-headed but never got cold feet
Got up in the game, won't look back at my old seats
Clique so deep we take up the whole street
I need a bitch so bad that she take up my whole week
Sean Don

Miscellaneous minds are never explainin' their minds
Devilish grin for my alias aliens to respond
Peddlin' sin, thinkin' maybe when you get old you realize
I'm not gonna fold or demise
I don't smoke crack, motherfucker, I sell it!
Bitch, everything I rap is a quarter piece to your melon
So if you have a relapse, just relax and pop in my disc
Don't you pop me no fuckin' pill
I'ma pop you, then give you this


Tell Flex to drop a bomb on this shit
So many bombs, ring the alarm, like Vietnam on this shit
So many bombs, make Farrakhan think that Saddam in this bitch
One at a time, I line them up
And bomb on they mom while she watchin' the kids
I'm in a destruction mode if the gold exists
I'm important like the Pope, I'm a Muslim on pork
I'm Makaveli's offspring, I'm the King of New York
King of the Coast; one hand, I juggle 'em both
The juggernaut's all in your jugular, you take me for jokes
Live in the basement, church pews, and funeral faces
Cartier bracelets for my women friends, I'm in Vegas
Who the fuck y'all thought it's supposed to be?
If Phil Jackson came back, still no coachin' me
I'm uncoachable, I'm unsociable, fuck y'all clubs!
Fuck y'all pictures! Your Instagram can gobble these nuts!
Gobble dick up 'til you hiccup, my big homie Kurupt
This the same flow that put the rap game on a crutch
(West, West, West, West, West, West)
I've seen niggas transform like villain Decepticons
Mollies probably turn these niggas to fuckin' Lindsay Lohan
A bunch of rich-ass white girls lookin' for parties
Playin' with Barbies
Wreck the Porsche before you give them the car key
Judgement to the monarchy, blessings to Paul McCartney
You called me a black Beatle, I'm either that or a Marley
I don't smoke crack, motherfucker, I sell it!
I'm dressed in all black, this is not for the fan of Elvis
I'm aimin' straight for your pelvis
You can't stomach me? You plan on stumpin' me?
Bitch, I've been jumped before you put a gun on me
Bitch, I put one on yours, I'm Sean Connery
James Bonding with none of you niggas
Climbin' 100 mil in front of me
And I'm gonna get it even if you're in the way
And if you're in it, better run for Pete's sake
I heard the barbershops be in great debates all the time
'Bout who's the best MC: Kendrick, Jigga, and Nas
Eminem, André 3000; the rest of y'all
New niggas just new niggas, don't get involved
And I ain't rockin' no more designer shit
White T's and Nike Cortez, this red Corvette's anonymous
I'm usually homeboys with the same niggas I'm rhymin' with
But this is hip-hop, and them niggas should know what time it is
And that goes for Jermaine Cole, Big K.R.I.T., Wale
Pusha T, Meek Millz, A$AP Rocky, Drake
Big Sean, Jay Electron', Tyler, Mac Miller
I got love for you all, but I'm tryna murder you niggas
Tryna make sure your core fans never heard of you niggas
They don't wanna hear not one more noun or verb from you niggas
What is competition? I'm tryna raise the bar high
Who tryna jump and get it? You're better off tryna skydive
Out the exit window of five G5's with five grand
With your granddad as the pilot, he drunk as fuck, tryna land
With the hand full of arthritis and poppin' prosthetic leg
Bumpin' Pac in the cockpit so the shit that pops in his head
Is an option of violence, someone heard the stewardess said
That your parachute is a latex condom hooked to a dread
West Coast

You could check my name on the books
I Earth Wind & Fire'd the verse, then reigned on the hook
The legend of Dorothy Flowers proclaimed from the roof
The tale of a magnificent king who came from the nooks
Of the wild magnolia, mother of many soldiers
We live by every single word she ever told us
Watch over your shoulders
And keep a tin of beans for when the weather turn the coldest
The Lord is our shepherd, so our cup runneth over
Put your trust in the Lord, but tether your Chevy Nova
I'm spittin' this shit for closure
And God is my witness, so you could get it from Hova
To all you magicians that's fidgetin' with the cobra
I'm solid as a rock, 'cause I came from a rock
That's why I came with the rock
Then signed my name on the Roc
Draw a line around some Earth, then put my name on the plot
'Cause I endured a lot of pain for everythang that I got
The eyelashes like umbrellas when it rain from the heart
And the tissue is like an angel kissin' you in the dark
You go from blind sight to hindsight
Passion of the Christ, right, to baskin' in the limelight
It take time to get your mind right
Jay Electricity, PBS Mysteries
In a lofty place tanglin' with Satan over history
You can't say shit to me, الحمد لله
It's strictly by faith that we made it this far",203961
29990,191033,All I Want for Christmas Is You,pop,Mariah Carey,1994,1736553,{},"
I don't want a lot for Christmas
There is just one thing I need
I don't care about the presents
Underneath the Christmas tree
I just want you for my own
More than you could ever know
Make my wish come true
All I want for Christmas is you, yeah


I don't want a lot for Christmas
There is just one thing I need (And I)
Don't care about the presents
Underneath the Christmas tree
I don't need to hang my stocking
There upon the fireplace (Ah)
Santa Claus won't make me happy
With a toy on Christmas Day


I just want you for my own (Ooh)
More than you could ever know (Ooh)
Make my wish come true
All I want for Christmas is you
You, baby

Oh, I won't ask for much this Christmas
I won't even wish for snow (And I)
I'm just gonna keep on waiting
Underneath the mistletoe
I won't make a list and send it
To the North Pole for Saint Nick (Ah)
I won't even stay awake to
Hear those magic reindeer click


'Cause I just want you here tonight (Ooh)
Holding on to me so tight (Ooh)
What more can I do?
Oh baby, all I want for Christmas is you
You, baby


Oh, all the lights are shining
So brightly everywhere (So brightly, baby)
And the sound of children's
Laughter fills the air (Oh, oh yeah)
And everyone is singing (Oh yeah)
I hear those sleigh bells ringing (Oh)
Santa, won't you bring me the one I really need? (Yeah, oh, oh)
Won't you please bring my baby to me?

Oh, I don't want a lot for Christmas
This is all I'm asking for (Ah)
I just wanna see my baby
Standing right outside my door


Oh, I just want you for my own (Ooh)
More than you could ever know (Ooh)
Make my wish come true
Oh baby, all I want for Christmas is you


You, baby
All I want for Christmas is you, baby (You)
All I want for Christmas is you, baby (Ah, oh, ah, oh)
All I want for Christmas is you, baby (You)
All I want for Christmas is you, baby (All I really want, baby, ooh)
All I want for Christmas is you, baby (All I want, all I really want is you)",204233
30082,191387,Survival,rap,Eminem,2013,1554453,"{""Liz Rodrigues""}","
Yeah!


This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all


Wasn't ready to be no millionaire, I was ill-prepared
I was prepared to be ill though, the skill was there
From the beginning it wasn't 'bout the ends, it was 'bout
Bustin' raps and standin' for somethin', fuck an acronym
Cut the fuckin' act like you're happy, I'm fuckin' back again
With another anthem - why stop when it doesn't have to end?
It ain't over 'til I say it's over, enough when I say enough
Throw me to them wolves and close the gate up, I'm afraid of What'll happen to them wolves when the thought of being thrown
Into an alligator pit, I salivate at it, wait is up
Hands up like it's 12 noon, nah, homie, hold them bitches straighter up
Wave 'em 'til you dislocate a rotator cuff
Came up rough, came to ruffle feathers, nah, egos, I ain't deflate enough
Last chance to make this whole stadium erupt, 'cause-

This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all


I can see the finish line with each line that I finish
I'm so close to my goals, I can almost pole vault over the goal post
And if I don't got enough in the tank, maybe I can just siphon enough
To fill up this last can, man, will I survive in this climate or what?
They said I was washed-up and got a bloodbath
I'm not a rapper, I'm an adapter: I can adjust
Plus, I can just walk up to a mic and just bust
So, floor's open if you'd like to discuss
Top 5 in this muh'fucka, and if I don't make the cut
What? Like I give a fuck! I'ma light this bitch up like I'm driving a truck
Through the side of a pump, zero to sixty, hop in and gun it
Like G-Unit without the hyphen, I'm hyping 'em up
And if there should ever come a time where my life's in a rut
And I look like I might just give up, eh, might've mistook
Me for bowin' out, I ain't takin' a bow, I'm stabbin' myself
With a fuckin' knife in the gut while I'm wipin' my butt
'Cause I just shitted on the mic and I like gettin' cut
I get excited at the sight of my blood, you're in a fight with a nut
'Cause I'ma fight 'til I die or win, bitin' the dust
It'll just make me angrier; wait, let me remind you of what
Got me this far, picture me quittin'
Now draw a circle around it and put a line through it, slut!
It's survival of what?

This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all


(Yeah) So, get your ideas, stack your ammo
But don't come unless you come to battle, now mount up, jump in the saddle
This is it-it's what you eat, sleep, piss and shit
Live, breathe, your whole existence just consists of this
Refuse to quit, fuse is lit, can't defuse the wick
I don't do this music shit, I'll lose my shit
Ain't got shit to lose, it's the moment of truth, it's all I know how to do
As soon as I get thrown in a booth, I spit
But my respect is overdue, I'm showin' you the flow no one do
'Cause I don't own no diploma for school, I quit
So there's nothin' for me to fall back on, I know no other trade
So you better trade your fuckin' mics in for some tool-box-es
'Cause you'll never take my pride from me, it'll have to be pried from me
So, pull out your pliers and your screwdrivers!
But I want you to doubt me, I don't want you to buh-lieve
'Cause this is somethin' that I must use to succeed
And if you don't like me, then fuck you! Self-esteem
Must be fuckin' shootin' through the roof, 'cause trust me
My skin is too thick and bulletproof to touch me
I can see why the fuck I disgust you, I must be
Allergic to failure, 'cause everytime I come close to it
I just sneeze, but I just go achoo then a-chieve!

This is survival of the fittest
This is do or die
This is the winner takes it all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all
So, take it all, a-all, a-all, a-all",204622
30162,192029,Dont Stop Me Now,rock,Queen,1978,1177886,{},"
Tonight I'm gonna have myself a real good time
I feel alive
And the world, I'll turn it inside out, yeah
I'm floating around in ecstasy
So (Don't stop me now)
(Don't stop me)
'Cause I'm having a good time
Having a good time


I'm a shooting star leaping through the sky like a tiger
Defying the laws of gravity
I'm a racing car passing by like Lady Godiva
I'm gonna go, go, go, there's no stopping me


I'm burning through the sky, yeah
Two hundred degrees, that's why they call me Mister Fahrenheit
I'm travelling at the speed of light
I wanna make a supersonic man outta you

(Don't stop me now)
I'm having such a good time
I'm having a ball
(Don't stop me now)
If you wanna have a good time
Just give me a call
(Don't stop me now)
'Cause I'm having a good time
(Don't stop me now)
Yes, I'm having a good time
I don't wanna stop at all, yeah


I'm a rocket ship on my way to Mars on a collision course
I am a satellite, I'm out of control
I'm a sex machine ready to reload like an atom bomb
About to oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, explode


I'm burning through the sky, yeah
Two hundred degrees, that's why they call me Mister Fahrenheit
I'm travelling at the speed of light
I wanna make a supersonic woman of you


(Don't stop me, don't stop me, don't stop me)
Hey, hey, hey
(Don't stop me, don't stop me, ooh, ooh, ooh)
I like it
(Don't stop me, don't stop me)
Have a good time, good time
(Don't stop me, don't stop me) Woah
Let loose, honey, all right



Oh, I'm burning through the sky, yeah
Two hundred degrees, that's why they call me Mister Fahrenheit (Hey)
Travelling at the speed of light
I wanna make a supersonic man outta you (Hey, hey)


(Don't stop me now)
I'm having such a good time
I'm having a ball
(Don't stop me now)
If you wanna have a good time
Just give me a call (Ooh, alright)
(Don't stop me now)
'Cause I'm having a good time (Hey, hey)
(Don't stop me now)
Yes, I'm having a good time
I don't wanna stop at all


Ah, da, da, da, da
Da, da, ah, ah
Ah, da, da, ah, ah, ah
Ah, da, da
Ah, da, da, ah, ah
Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh",205311
30433,194494,Jolene,country,Dolly Parton,1973,1044193,{},"


Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene
I'm begging of you please don't take my man
Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene
Please don't take him just because you can


Your beauty is beyond compare
With flaming locks of auburn hair
With ivory skin and eyes of emerald green
Your smile is like a breath of spring
Your voice is soft like summer rain
And I cannot compete with you, Jolene


He talks about you in his sleep
There's nothing I can do to keep
From crying when he calls your name, Jolene
And I can easily understand
How you could easily take my man
But you don't know what he means to me, Jolene

Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene
I'm begging of you please don't take my man
Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene
Please don't take him just because you can


You could have your choice of men
But I could never love again
He's the only one for me, Jolene
I had to have this talk with you
My happiness depends on you
And whatever you decide to do, Jolene


Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene
I'm begging of you please don't take my man
Jolene, Jolene, Jolene, Jolene
Please don't take him even though you can
Jolene, Jolene",207947
30592,195945,23,rap,Mike WiLL Made-It,2013,2203314,"{""Wiz Khalifa"",""Miley Cyrus"",""Juicy J""}","
I'm in the club high on purp with some shades on
Tatted up, mini skirt with my J's on


J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me


I be in the club standing on the couch
In them Wolf Grey's like it's my house
Drinking out the bottle, I got no respect
Looking like a model, who just got a check
I back it up, cause I don't give a fuck
If you're a lame, that's a shame you can't hang with us
I'm MC Hammer fly, you can't touch
J's so fly I should work at Flight Club

Put on my J's and dance the whole night away
I'm naughty by nature like I'm Hip-Hop Hooray
With my hands in the sky, I wave 'em from side to side
My feet on the floor, I'm 'bout to turn up now


I'm in the club high on purp with some shades on
Tatted up, mini skirt with my J's on


J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me


I be rockin' J's or
I be rockin' Taylors
I got lots of flavors, my kick game is major
More kicks than the players, call me up I'm scorin'
Hit it like a free throw, tongue out like I'm Jordan
Smiley, Miley, come swing the thing right by me
Got a joint if you wanna get stoned, got choppers if they wanna try me
Pro athlete I'm not no wannabe
Waitress asked how many bottles? I said 23

Put on my J's and dance the whole night away
I'm naughty by nature like I'm Hip-Hop Hooray
With my hands in the sky, I wave 'em from side to side
My feet on the floor, I'm 'bout to turn up now


I'm in the club high on purp with some shades on
Tatted up, mini skirt with my J's on


J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me


I stay showin' out, my kick game is a beast
I got thirty pairs of J's that ain't never been released
Flu game 12's, Space Jam 11's
On the hype beast sick, they gon' need a paramedic
Turn up, turn up, turn up, I get trippy, I stay live
All this purple in my cup, match them grape 5's
I'm so high, I got three bitches that go bi
I'm so fly, I'm gettin' head like a blow dryer

Put on my J's and dance the whole night away
I'm naughty by nature like I'm Hip-Hop Hooray
With my hands in the sky, I wave 'em from side to side
My feet on the floor, I'm 'bout to turn up now


I'm in the club high on purp with some shades on
Tatted up, mini skirt with my J's on


J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
J's on my feet
So get like me",209461
30655,196532,Berzerk,rap,Eminem,2013,2858900,{},"
Now this shit's about to kick off, this party looks wack
Let's take it back to straight hip-hop and start it from scratch
I'm 'bout to bloody this track up, everybody get back
That's why my pen needs a pad, 'cause my rhymes on the rag
Just like I did with addiction, I'm 'bout to kick it
Like a magician, critics I turn to crickets
Got 'em still on the fence whether to picket
But quick to get it impaled when I tell 'em, ""Stick it!""
So sick, I'm looking pale-wait, that's my pigment
'Bout to go ham, ya bish, shout out to Kendrick
Let's bring it back to that vintage Slim, bitch!
The art of MCing mixed with da Vinci and MC Ren
And I don't mean Stimpy's friend, bitch
Been Public Enemy since you thought PE was gym, bitch


Kick your shoes off, let your hair down
(And go berserk) All night long
Grow your beard out, just weird out
(And go berserk) All night long

We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M
So, baby, make just like K-Fed
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say, ""Fuck it!"" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody (Go berserk)
Grab your vial, yeah


Guess it's just the way that I'm dressed, ain't it?
Khakis pressed, Nike shoes crispy and fresh laced
So I guess it ain't that aftershave
Or cologne that made 'em just faint
Plus I showed up with a coat fresher than wet paint
So if love is a chess game, check mate
But girl, your body's bangin', jump me in, dang, bang-bang
Yes siree 'Bob', I was thinking the same thang
So come get on this Kid's rock, baw with da baw, dang-dang
Pow-p-p-p-pow, chica, pow, chica, wow-wow
Got your gal blowin' up a valve, v-v-valve-valve
Ain't slowin' it down, throw in the towel, t-t-towel-towel
Dumb it down, I don't know how, huh-huh, how-how
At least I know that I don't know
Question is, are you bozos smart enough to feel stupid?
Hope so, now ho

Kick your shoes off, let your hair down
(And go berserk) All night long
Grow your beard out, just weird out
(And go berserk) All night long


We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M
So crank the bass up like crazy
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say, ""Fuck it!"" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody (Go berzerk)
Get your vinyls




And they say that love is powerful as cough syrup in styrofoam
All I know is I fell asleep and woke up in that Monte Carlo
With the ugly Kardashian, Lamar, oh
Sorry, yo-we done both set the bar low
Far as hard drugs are though, that's the past
But I done did enough codeine to knock Future into tomorrow
And girl, I ain't got no money to borrow
But I am tryin' to find a way to get you alone: car note
Oh, Marshall Mathers
Shithead with a potty mouth, get the bar of soap lathered
Kangol's and Carheartless Cargos
Girl, you're fixin' to get your heart broke
Don't be absurd, ma'am, you birdbrain, baby
I ain't called anybody baby since Birdman, unless you're a swallow (Ha-ha!)
Word, Rick? (Word, man, you heard)
But don't get discouraged, girl
This is your jam, unless you got toe jam

Kick your shoes off, let your hair down
(And go berserk) All night long
Grow your beard out, just weird out
(And go berserk) All night long


We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M
So, baby, make just like K-Fed
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say, ""Fuck it!"" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody (Go berserk)
Grab your vial, yeah


We're gonna rock this house until we knock it down
So turn the volume loud
'Cause it's mayhem 'til the A.M
So crank the bass up like crazy
And let yourself go, let yourself go
Say, ""Fuck it!"" before we kick the bucket
Life's too short to not go for broke
So everybody, everybody (Go berzerk)
Get your vials",210094
31125,200442,Wu-Tang Forever,rap,Drake,2013,1810080,{},"
(Machine gun rap for all my niggas in the back) Uh
(Machine gun rap for all my niggas in the back) Uh
(Machine gun rap for all my niggas in the back) Uh
(Machine gun rap for all my niggas in the back) I


I just love when I'm with you
Yeah, this shit is on ten
We used to be friends, girl, and even back then
You would look at me with no hesitation and you'd tell me
Baby, it's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody
It's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody and that
What made me think about the game, girl
And how I switched it up with a new thing
Young nigga came through on his Wu-Tang
And nowadays when I ask about who got it
They say it's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody
It's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody
It's yours, it's yours, it's yours, it's yours
That's for sure, that's for sure (Yeah)
It's yours, it's yours, it's yours, it's yours
That's for sure, that's for sure

How you feel about
Comin' home with a nigga for the night?
If you nervous, hit the lights
I know we only fuckin' out of spite 'cause your man don't
Do you right, do you right
I could fuck you so good, then I hit you with the 9 a.m. in Dallas
Who you like, baby, who you like?


Machine gun raps for all my niggas in the back
Stadium packed, just glad to see the city on the map
I just gave the city life, it ain't about who did it first
It's 'bout who did it right, niggas looking like ""Preach""
Open cases on me for a half a million each
I find peace knowing that it's harder in the streets, I know
Luckily I didn't have to grow there
I would only go there 'cause niggas that I know there
I don't know what's getting into me, I just like the rush
When you see your enemy somewhere in the club and you realize
He just not in a position to reciprocate your energy
You ain't ever worried 'cause he's not who he pretends to be
People like Mazin who was a best friend to me
Start to become a distant memory
Things change in that life, and this life started lacking synergy
And fuckin' with me mentally, I think it's meant to be
Yeah, paranoid, always rolling with my mothafuckin' boys
But you gotta understand when it's yours
They don't really leave your ass with a mothafuckin' choice, man

I, I just love when I'm with you
Yeah, this shit is on ten
We used to be friends, girl, and even back then
You would look at me with no hesitation and you'd tell me, baby
It's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody
It's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody and that
What made me think about the game, girl
And how I switched it up with a new thing
Young nigga came through on his Wu-Tang
And nowadays when I ask about who got it
They say it's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody
It's yours, nobody else's
Yeah, this shit belong to nobody
It's yours, it's yours, it's yours, it's yours
That's for sure, that's for sure (Yeah)
It's yours, it's yours, it's yours, it's yours
That's for sure, that's for sure


How you feel about?
(It's yours, it's yours)
",214307
31394,203117,Own It,rap,Drake,2013,1864724,{},"
Own it
It's yours
It's yours


Yours
You're still the one that I adore
Ain't much out there to have feelings for
Guess whose it is? Guess whose it is? (Yours)
Guess whose it is? Guess whose it is? Yours
A few bottles on the table, a few waters
It ain't a secret, baby, everybody saw us
Guess whose it is? Guess whose it is?
Guess whose it is? It's yours
Next time we fuck, I don't wanna fuck, I wanna make love
Next time we talk, I don't wanna just talk, I wanna trust
Next time I stand tall, I wanna be standin' for you
And next time I spend, I want it all to be for you, oh
Peakin', I'm peakin'
Wake up with me this weekend, we can, oh
Guess whose it is? Guess whose it is?
Guess whose it is? It's yours

Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, I said
Go own that shit, own that shit
Own that shit, own that shit
Go and own that shit, own that shit
Own that shit, you own that shit, go and
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Go own that shit, own that shit
Own that shit
Own that shit, own that shit
Own that shit


Niggas talk more than bitches these days
Just let that shit sink in, ha!
Niggas talk more than bitches these days
Who could get the pussy quicker these days
Still straight with the weed and the liquor these days
'Cause the new drugs got the kids trippin' these days (Trippin')
Bunch of journalists been searchin' for a story
My ex-girl been searchin' for a ""sorry"" (How you do?)
Couple bitches tryna have me on the Maury
Like nigga, it's yours, you should be supportin'
But where you been at? On tour, gettin' money
Y'all don't even really check for me
You ain't even hit me when that nigga had threats for me, girl
You don't love me, you just say that shit to get to me, girl
'Cause you got the Batphone and my work line
You should call
When the last time you did somethin' for the first time?
You done done it all
I swear to God, niggas talk more than bitches these days
Got you thinkin' that I'm different these days
Broken telephone for every single conversation
By the time it gets to you, shit switches these days, but oh (Yeah)
It's yours, it's yours, it's yours, it's
It's always gonna be yours

Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, own it
(It's always gonna be yours)
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, own it, own it, I said
(It's always gonna be yours)
Go own that shit
Own it
Own it
It's yours, it's yours
Own it, own it, own it, own it
Own it, baby, own it, it's yours
Own that shit, own that shit, own that shit

",217264
31395,203123,Worst Behavior,rap,Drake,2013,2403143,{},"
Worst-
Motherfucker never loved us
Fucker never loved us
You ain't know, now you know now
Still at it, scrub J's with a toothbrush
Shit, niggas still playing my old shit
But your shit is like the police askin' us questions
Nigga, we don't know shit
Flexin'-nigga, I'm just flexin'
Nigga never loved us
Do it look like we stressin'?
Look at you, look at you and look at you
Aww, I'm glad that they chose us
'Cause, man, it's a mission
Tryna fight to the finish just to see, am I finished?


On my worst behavior, no?
They used to never want to hear us
Remember? Motherfucker never loved us
Remember? Motherfucker
Remember? Motherfucker never loved us
I'm on my worst behavior
Don't you ever get it fucked up
Motherfuckers never loved us
Man, motherfuckers never loved us
Worst behavior
Motherfuckers never loved us
Fucker never loved us
Worst behavior

Hold up, hold my phone
Motherfuckers never loved us
Fucker never loved us
Now you want to roll one
Motherfucker never loved us
So everywhere we go now, full cup
Always hated the boy, but now the boy is the man
Motherfucker, I done growed up
You know me? You know me?
I'm liable to do anything when it comes to that you owe me
You owe me, you owe me
Bitch, you better have my money when I come for that shit like O.D.B


On my worst behavior, no?
They used to never want to hear us
Remember? Motherfucker never loved us
Remember? Motherfucker
Remember? Motherfucker never loved us
I'm on my worst behavior
Don't you ever get it fucked up
Motherfuckers never loved us
Man, motherfuckers never loved us
Worst behavior
Mothafuckers never loved us
Fucker never loved us
Worst behavior

Who's hot, who not?
Tell me, who rock, who sell out in stores?
You tell me who flop, who copped the new drop
Whose jewels got rocks
Who else making rap albums, doing numbers like it's pop?
Same old pimp, Drake, you know ain't nothin' changed
With these funny style niggas, we done put on in the game
I just ask for some blessings at my grandmother's grave
Then it's back to L.A., open the mail, starin' at the check
Enough to make you throw up, man, it's gross what I net
I'm with my whole set, tennis matches at the crib
I swear I could beat Serena when she playin' with her left
Oh, where I reside it look like a resort inside
Nigga, where your shit from? I imported mine
Bar mitzvah money like my last name Mordecai
Fuck you, bitch, I'm more than high
My momma probably hear that and be mortified
This ain't the son you raised who used to take the Acura
5 a.m. then go and shoot Degrassi up on Morningside
For all the stuntin', I'll forever be immortalized
Yeah, back and forth across the borderline
Hate to leave the city, but I've got to do the overtime
Gone all the time, even the important times
I should let you know ahead I'm comin' back on my worst behavior

Remember?
Remember? Motherfucker
Remember?
Hold up, hold my phone
They used to never want to hear us
Remember? Motherfucker never loved us
Remember? Motherfucker
Remember? Worst behavior

",217266
31396,203130,Furthest Thing,rap,Drake,2013,2650003,{},"
Somewhere between psychotic and iconic
Somewhere between I want it and I got it
Somewhere between I'm sober and I'm lifted
Somewhere between a mistress and commitment
But I stay down, girl, I always stay down
Get down, never lay down
Promise to break everybody off before I break down
Everyone just wait now, so much on my plate now
People I believed in, they don't even show they face now
What they got to say now? Nothin' they can say now
Nothin' really changed but still they look at me a way now
What more can I say now? What more can I say now?
You might feel like nothin' was the same


I still been drinkin' on the low, mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low, smokin' on the low
I still been plottin' on the low, schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect, like everyone I know
I just been drinkin' on the low, mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low, smokin' on the low
I just been plottin' on the low, schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect, like everyone I know

And I hate that you don't think I belong to ya
Just too busy runnin' shit to run home to ya
You know that paper my passion
Bittersweet celebrations, I know I can't change what happened
I can't help it, I can't help it, I was young and I was selfish
I made every woman feel like she was mine and no one else's
And now you hate me, stop pretendin', stop that frontin', I can't take it
Girl, don't treat me like a stranger, girl, you know I seen you naked
Girl, you know that I remember, don't be a pretender
Gettin' high at the condo, that's when it all comes together
You know I stay reminiscing and make-up sex is tradition
But you been missin', girl, and you might feel like nothin' was the same


I still been drinkin' on the low, mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low, smokin' on the low
I still been plottin' on the low, schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect, like everyone I know
I just been drinkin' on the low, mobbin' on the low
Fuckin' on the low, smokin' on the low
I just been plottin' on the low, schemin' on the low
The furthest thing from perfect, like everyone I know



Drinkin', smokin', fuckin', plottin'
Schemin', plottin', schemin', gettin' money
Drinkin', fuckin', smokin', plottin'
Schemin', plottin', schemin', gettin' money


Uh, this the life for me
My momma told me this was right for me
I got 'em worried, like make sure you save a slice for me
I should have Spoons serve you up with a fork and knife for me
Your actions make us doubt you
Your lack of effort got me rappin' different
This the shit I wanna go out to
Play this shit at my funeral if they catch me slippin'
Naked women swimmin', that's just how I'm livin'
Donate a million to some children, that's just how I'm feelin'
A nigga fillin' up arenas, who the fuck could see us?
I had to Derrick Rose the knee up before I got the re-up
Yours truly, the boy
I just build and build more, y'all niggas build to destroy
Y'all niggas party too much, man, I just chill and record
No filler, you feel it now if you ain't feel it before


Yes, Lord, this the shit I wanna go out to
Yeah, yeah, this the shit I wanna go out to
",217263
31397,203132,Connect,rap,Drake,2013,1609399,{},"
""There's three balls and a strike
Here's the pitch
It's belted deep to center
Revere goes back, jumps at the wall, and it's gone!""


Yeah, isn't it amazing
How you talk all this shit and we still lack communication?
How beautiful our kids would be, girl, I don't need convincing
How every conversation starts with, ""This time will be different""
Oh, oh, the idea is fun
Oh, the idea is fun
Oh, the idea is so fun every time
At least we try for home run every time


Swanging, eyes closed, just swanging
Same city, same friends, if you're looking for me
Same city, same friends, if you're looking
I'll be here, just swanging
Don't talk to me like I'm famous
And don't assume, 'cause I don't respect assumptions, babe
I'm just tryna connect with somethin', babe
Yeah, swanging

Ayy
She just wanna run around the city
And make memories that she can barely remember
And I'd allow her
Talk about pussy power (Yeah)
She just wanna run over my feelings
Like she drinking and driving in a eighteen-wheeler
And I'd allow her
Talk about pussy power
She used to say, ""You can be whoever you want, even yourself""
Yeah, I show up knowin' exactly who I was
And never leave as myself
But when it falls apart, I'm always still down
To pick a million tiny little pieces off the ground
Wish you would learn to love people and use things
And not the other way around


Swanging, eyes closed, just swanging
Same city, same friends if you're looking for me
Same city, same friends if you're looking
I'll be here, just swanging (Ayy)
Don't talk to me like I'm famous (Ayy)
And don't assume 'cause I don't respect assumptions, bae
I'm just tryna connect with somethin', baby
I'll be here, just swanging (Ayy, ayy)

I remember when my schedule was as flexible as she is
She call and tell me be here before the sun up
I be dressed before we hung up
I take Eglinton to 401 East
And exit at Markham Road in the East End
Where all the pretty girls are sleeping
My license been expired, I renew it after the weekend
Fuck, I know I said that shit the last seven weekends
Girl, I guess procrastination is my weakness
I hate stoppin' for gas this late
'Cause there's niggas creepin and not like how we're creepin'
Summer is comin', know you could feel it
Twenty on pump, whatever, I ain't got enough to fill it
Won't knock on your door
My uncle say, ""You drive my whip like it's yours""
I got the pedal to the floor
I'm on my motherfuckin' way, swangin'
Don't fall asleep on me, hang in there
I'll be there, just swangin'
I'll be there, just swangin'
I treat you good, girl, like you're famous
I know I'm late, it's always the same shit
But don't fall asleep on me, hang in there
I'm on the road right now, swangin, girl",217268
31398,203133,From Time,rap,Drake,2013,3799321,"{""Jhené Aiko""}","
What's up?
Been a minute since we kicked it, you've been caught up
With them bitches, I don't get it, you're a star, love
You shouldn't have to deal with that
I'd never make you feel like that
'Cause


I love me
I love me enough for the both of us
That's why you trust me
I know you been through more than most of us
So what are you
What are you, what are you so afraid of?
Darling, you
You give, but you cannot take love


Yeah, I needed to hear that shit, I hate when you're submissive
Passive aggressive when we're texting, I feel the distance
I look around the peers that surround me, these niggas tripping
I like when money makes a difference but don't make you different
Started realizing a couple places I could take it
I want to get back to when I was that kid in the basement
I want to take it deeper than money, pussy, vacation
And influence a generation that's lacking in patience
I've been dealing with my dad, speaking of lack of patience
Just me and my old man getting back to basics
We've been talking 'bout the future and time that we wasted
When he put that bottle down, girl, that nigga's amazing
Well, fuck it, we had a couple Coronas
We might have rolled a white paper, just something to hold us
We even talked about you and our couple of moments
He said we should hash it out like a couple of grown-ups
You a flower child, beautiful child, I'm in your zone
Looking like you came from the seventies on your own
My mother is sixty-six and her favorite line to hit me with is
""Who the fuck wants to be seventy and alone?""
You don't even know what you want from love anymore
I search for something I'm missing and disappear when I'm bored
But girl, what qualities was I looking for before?
Who you settling for? Who better for you than the boy, huh?

I love me
I love me enough for the both of us
That's why you trust me
I know you been through more than most of us
So what are you
What are you, what are you so afraid of?
Darling, you
You give, but you cannot take love


Uh, thinking 'bout Texas, back when Porscha used to work at Treasures
Or further back than that, before I had the Houston leverage
When I got Summer a Michael Kors with my momma's debit
A weak attempt at flexing, I'll never forget it
'Cause that night I played her three songs
Then we got to talking 'bout something we disagreed on
Then she start telling me how I'll never be as big as Trey Songz
Boy, was she wrong
That was just negative energy for me to feed off
Now it's therapeutic blowing money in the Galleria
Or Beverly Center Macy's where I discovered Bria
Landmarks of the muses that inspired the music
When I could tell it was sincere without tryna prove it
The one that I needed was Courtney from Hooters on Peachtree
I've always been feeling like she was the piece to complete me
Now she engaged to be married, what's the rush on commitment?
Know we were going through some shit, name a couple that isn't?
Remember our talk in the parking lot at the Ritz
Girl, I felt like we had it all planned out
I guess I fucked up the vision
Learning the true consequences of my selfish decisions
When you find out how I'm living, I just hope I'm forgiven
It seem like you don't want this love anymore
I'm acting out in the open, it's hard for you to ignore
But girl, what qualities was I looking for before?
Who you settling for? Who better for you than the boy, huh?

I love me
I love me enough for the both of us
That's why you trust me
I know you been through more than most of us
So what are you
What are you, what are you so afraid of?
Darling, you
You give, but you cannot take love


Been Baka aka Not Nice from time, G
Been a East Side ting
Scarborough ting from time, G
Been have up di ting dem from time, G
So I don't know what's wrong with these
Little wasteman out here, eh?
Y'all need to know yourself",217270
31399,203134,The Language,rap,Drake,2013,2321210,{},"
Yeah
Yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah
Look, look


I don't know why they been lyin' but your shit is not that inspirin'
Bank account statement just look like I'm ready for early retirement
Fuck any nigga that's talking that shit just to get a reaction
Fuck going platinum, I look at my wrist and it's already platinum
I am the kid with the motor mouth
I am the one you should worry 'bout
I don't know who you're referring to
Who is this nigga you heard about?
Someone just talking that bullshit
Man, someone just gave you the run-around
Niggas downplayin' the money
But that's what you do when the money down
I don't waste time puttin' money down
I just go straight to who got it and buy it in cash
Pussy so good that you gotta come see me on tour
And you gotta fly in first class
This has been years in the makin'
It's all for the city, they know I come right every summer
Cash Money Records forever, I'm always big timin'
Bitch, I came up right under Stunna, you know it

Jealousy in the air tonight, I could tell
I will never understand that, but oh well
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck
I said, ""Girl, that's all that we do""
Okay, now you're talkin' my language
Now you're talkin' my language
Now you're talkin' my language
Now you're talkin' my language
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck
I said, ""Girl, that's all that we do""


I'm 'bout to roll one and light it
And fuck it, man, no one's invited
I got to kill off the weak shit that's got all you niggas excited
I can't even listen, you wildin'
I'd much rather sit here in silence
I send all my money to banks in the islands
And eat with Italians, I do
People are funny
You don't even know 'bout the shit that I been through
I just want some head in a comfortable bed
It could all be so simple
Talkin' that shit with your back to me
Just know it always get back to me
Come get your girl
She been here for three days and she way too attached to me
Hate when they get too attached to me
I got to get on the bus and get back on the road
Get what I can out the country
And then I just get on the jet and go back to the cold
Can't even drive with the top off
Been workin' so hard on the album, I missed the whole summer
I just might bring in some girls from Miami to heat up the city
And that's word to Stunna, you know it

Jealousy in the air tonight, I could tell
I will never understand that, but oh well
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck
I said, ""Girl, that's all that we do""
Okay, now you're talkin' my language
Now you're talkin' my language
Now you're talkin' my language
Now you're talkin' my language
Been ready, it's real, I don't know about you
She just want to smoke and fuck
I said, ""Girl, that's all that we do""


Famous and dangerous
You understand me?
Showtime, headlines, Big Tyme
""Sunshine,"" tote 9's, bust mines
Flatline, hard grind, high life
Stay fly, it's jet time - stunt, nigga!
Every time you see a nigga - stunt, nigga!
Every time you see a nigga - stunt, nigga!
Swag on head to feet nigga - stunt, nigga!
I just might bring in some girls from Miami to heat up the city
And that's word to Stunna, you know it",217274
31401,203136,Come Thru,rap,Drake,2013,1598633,{},"
Yeah
We had the type of nights where mornin' comes too soon
And nothin' was the same


Watch me, goin' out of the way, when I shoulda went home
Only time of the day I get to spend on my own
I was trippin' off how I used to sleep at ya crib
Should drive by right where you live and pick you up on the way
We ain't spoke in so long, prolly put me in the past
I can still get you wet, and I can still make you laugh
You should call into work if that ain't too much to ask
I could pour you up a drink and we can burn somethin'


Come through, come through, come through, come through
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come through
Know ya got that thang that I like
Know ya, know ya got that thang that I like
Come through, come through, come through
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come through

Yeah, last night I brought DOA to the studio
They already had a stage and a booty pole
It's supposed to be a lot of hard workin' goin' on
But who the fuck can focus with this twerkin' goin' on?
Someone put a order in for a chicken (for a chicken)
Told my girl to order in, I need the kitchen (need the kitchen)
Yeah, they know I got the hookup, they just wait on me to cook up
Baby, I heat up the stove, you do the dishes, ya know?
Rap game, crack game, ain't that different, ya know?
Last album had it boomin' somethin' vicious, ya know?
And ya know I need ya back in my life
Girl, ya know ya got that, know ya got that thing that I like
Girl, you got that thing for real
When I was on a mission to make it
Who used to sleep on the floor with you when you lived in the basement?
Who else got all the things you need at 4am when it's late?
I always pour you up a drink and let you burn somethin'


Come through, come through, come through, come through
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come through
Know ya got that thang that I like
Know ya, know ya got that thang that I like
Come through, come through, come through
Girl you know we got thangs to do
Girl you know we got thangs to do
So get your ass in that car and come through

Why has it been so long? Why has it been so long?
Why has it been? Why has it been?


Who you been crying to? Who you been flying to?
Whose bed are you sleeping in? Someone's been hiding you
Where have you been? You deserve rounds tonight
Come through girl you deserve rounds tonight
Come through girl you deserve rounds tonight
Come through girl you deserve rounds tonight
Rounds tonight oh
Come through girl you deserve rounds tonight
Come through girl you deserve rounds tonight
Come through girl you deserve rounds tonight",217280
31402,203137,305 to My City,rap,Drake,2013,1008926,{Detail},"
Drop down, drop-drop (Shit is real out here)
Drop down, drop-drop
Drop-drop-drop down, drop-drop
Get it (Yeah)
Get it
Drop down, drop-drop


Oooh, I got the 305 to my city
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it
I swear that I get it, I get it, I get it
We did it, we did it
We did it, we did it
We so far from finished
I brought you right back just so we can relive it


I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it
Your hustle don't ever go unnoticed, baby
I'm with you, I'm with it, oh
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it

They don't work hard as you
Damn, that's so crazy
At the end of the night when you count
Numbers don't lie to my baby
Locker room full of money
Girl, you just did it
I get it, I get it
Man, fuck all that talking, take shots to the kidney
Down payment on the Jaguar
Your roommate got credit
Twelve months on the lease
That's a come-up, baby, don't you ever forget it
Connections are heavy
Every real nigga they fuck with you
Nails chipped out in diamonds
You sparkle, but fuck, man, the spark ain't enough for you


Oooh, I got the 305 to my city
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it, I swear that I get it
I get it, I get it
We did it, we did it
We did it, we did it
We so far from finished
I brought you right back just so we can relive it

I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it
Your hustle don't ever go unnoticed, baby
I'm with you, I'm with it, oh
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it


Tonight was your night
Go get you some lobsters and shrimp
You smart and you know it
I get it, I get it, you outdo these pimps
I hope you don't fall
That's you on the top of the ceiling
Don't you ever forget 'bout your story
I get it, you did it, you did it
Got a link on the champagne
Your best friend is bartending
Your parents saying this another phase in your life
They can't wait until it's all finished
Shine on them hoes
Let 'em know that you run shit
I get it, I get it
I'm working too hard, let's get into some fun shit
281 to my city
Heard you had trouble at customs
Your girl got a DUI?
I'll make the calls to get y'all through customs
Tell your best friend, ""Girl, get your paperwork right""
I get it, I get it
What's up for the night?

Oooh, I got the 305 to my city
I get it, I get it
I get it, I get it, I swear that I get it
I get it, I get it
We just did it, we did it
We did it, we did it
We so far from finished
I brought you right back just so we can relive it


I get it, get it, get it
Drop down, drop-drop down
I get it, get it, get it
Drop down, drop-drop down


Your momma used to live at the church on Sunday
You just go to LIV after church on Sunday, oh Lord
Oh Lord, we're not in Kansas anymore
We're not in Kansas anymore (Yeah)",217281
31407,203161,Team,pop,Lorde,2013,1258606,{},"
Wait till you're announced
We've not yet lost all our graces
The hounds will stay in chains
Look upon Your Greatness and she'll
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out
Send the call out, send the call out


Call all the ladies out
They're in their finery
A hundred jewels on throats
A hundred jewels between teeth
Now bring my boys in
Their skin in craters like the moon
The moon we love like a brother
While he glows through the room

Dancin' around the lies we tell
Dancin' around big eyes, as well
Even the comatose
They don't dance and tell


We live in cities you'll never see on-screen
Not very pretty, but we sure know how to run things
Livin' in ruins of a palace within my dreams
And you know, we're on each other's team


I'm kind of over gettin' told to throw my hands up in the air
So there


So all the cups got broke
Shards beneath our feet
But it wasn't my fault
And everyone's competing
For a love they won't receive
'Cause what this palace wants is release


We live in cities you'll never see on-screen
Not very pretty, but we sure know how to run things
Livin' in ruins of a palace within my dreams
And you know, we're on each other's team

I'm kind of over gettin' told to throw my hands up in the air
So there
I'm kind of older than I was when I reveled without a care
So there


We live in cities you'll never see on-screen
Not very pretty, but we sure know how to run things
Livin' in ruins of a palace within my dreams
And you know, we're on each other's team


We're on each other's team
And you know, we're on each other's team
We're on each other's team
And you know, and you know, and you know",217372
31443,203500,Too Much,rap,Drake,2013,2144551,{},"
Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
There's no need for us to rush it through
Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
This is more than just a new lust for you
(Oh, don't think about-)


Done sayin' I'm done playin'
Last time was on the outro
Stuck in the house, need to get out more
I've been stackin' up like I'm fundraising
Most people in my position get complacent
Wanna come places with star girls
And they end up on them front pages
I'm quiet with it, I just ride with it
Moment I stop having fun with it, I'll be done with it
I'm the only one that's putting shots up
And like a pot luck, you need to come with it, don't run from it
Like H-Town in the summertime, I keep it one hundred
Met a lot of girls in my times there
Word to Paul Wall, not one fronted
I was birthed there in my first year
Man, I know that place like I come from it
Backstage at Warehouse in '09 like, ""Is Bun coming?
Fuck that, is anyone comin'
'Fore I show up there and there's no one there?""
These days, I could probably pack it
For like twenty nights if I go in there
Back rub from my main thing, I've been stressed out
Talkin' to her like back then they didn't want me, I'm blessed now
Talkin' to her like this drop, bet a million copies get pressed out
She tell me, ""Take a deep breath
You're too worried about being the best out""

Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
There's no need for us to rush it through
Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
This is more than just a new lust for you
(Oh, don't think about-)


Uh, someone go tell Noel to get the Backwoods
Money got my whole family going backwards
No dinners, no holidays, no nothin'
There's issues at hand that we're not discussin'
I did not sign up for this
My uncle used to have all these things on his bucket list
And now he's actin' like, ""Oh, well, this is life, I guess""
Nah, fuck that shit
Listen, man, you can still do what you wanna do
You gotta trust that shit
Heard once that in dire times when you need a sign
That's when they appear
Guess since my text message didn't resonate, I'll just say it here
I hate the fact my mom cooped up in her apartment
Telling herself that she's too sick to get dressed up and go do shit
Like that's true shit
And all my family from the M-Town that I've been 'round
Started treating me like I'm ""him"" now
Like we don't know each other, we ain't grow together
We just friends now
Shit got me feeling pinned down
Pick the pen up or put the pen down?
I'm writing to you from a distance like a pen-pal
But we've been down

Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
There's no need for us to rush it through
Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
This is more than just a new lust for you
Oh, don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
There's no need for us to rush it through, oh
Don't think about it too much, too much, too much, too much
This is more than just a new lust for you, oh, oh
(Don't do that-)


Don't give up, on your hopes
And you tell me somethin's gone wrong
Wholehearted, wholehearted, you care, you care
'Cause I'm such a dreamer, a believer in a sense
Well, if it's all a dream
Then I'm on fire, feels like, I'm on fire
Tell me when I'm lyin', tell me when I'm tryin'",217750
31498,204011,Pound Cake / Paris Morton Music 2,rap,Drake,2013,3551921,{JAY-Z},"


Good God Almighty-like back in the old days
You know, years ago they had the A&R men to tell you what to play, how to play it and you know, whether it's disco and rock
But, uh, we just went in the studio and we did it
We had the champagne in the studio, of course
You know, compliments of the company
And we just laid back and did it
So we hope you enjoy listening to this album half as much as we enjoyed playing it for you
Because we had a ball
Only real music is gonna last
All that other bullshit is here today and gone tomorrow


Cash rules everything around me, frikki-frikki-frik
C.R.E.A.M.; get the-get the-get the-get the
Get the-get the-get the-get the money, dollar-dollar
D-d-d-d-dollar-dollar, dollar-dollar bill, y'all (Y'all, y'all)
Cash rules everything around me, C.R.E.A.M
Get the-get the-get the-get the-get the
Get the-get the-get the-get the mon-mon-money
Frikki-frikki-frikki, dollar-dollar-dollar bill, y'all (Y'all, y'all)

Yeah
Uh, after hours at Il Mulino
Or Sotto Sotto, just talkin' women and vino
The contract like '91 Dan Marino
I swear this guy Michael Rapino's boosting my ego
Overly focused, it's far from the time to rest now
Debates growin' 'bout who they think is the best now
Took a while, got the jokers out of the deck now
I'm holdin' all the cards and niggas wanna play chess now
I hear you talking, say it twice so I know you meant it
Fuck it, I don't even tint it, they should know who's in it
I'm authentic, real name, no gimmicks
No game, no scrimmage, I ain't playin' with you niggas at all
My classmates, they went on to be chartered accountants
Or work with their parents
But thinkin' back on how they treated me
My high school reunion might be worth an appearance
Make everybody have to go through security clearance
Tables turn, bridges burn, you live and learn
With the ink I could murder, word to my nigga Irv
Yeah, I swear shit just started clickin', dog
You know it's real when you are who you think you are


Cash rules everything around me, frikki-frikki-frik
C.R.E.A.M.; get the-get the-get the-get the
Get the-get the-get the-get the money, dollar-dollar
D-d-d-d-dollar-dollar, dollar-dollar bill, y'all (Y'all, y'all)
Cash rules everything around me, C.R.E.A.M
Get the-get the-get the-get the-get the
Get the-get the-get the-get the mon-mon-money
Frikki-frikki-frikki, dollar-dollar-dollar bill, y'all (Y'all, y'all)

Uh, I had Benzes 'fore you had braces
The all-black Maybach, but I'm not a racist
Inside's whiter than Katy Perry's face is
Yellow diamonds in my Jesús
I just might learn to speak Mandarin
Japanese for the yen that I'm handlin'
International Hov, that's my handle
My saint's Changó, light a candle
El Gran Santo on the mantle
Case y'all didn't know, I speak Spanish too, uh
Shout out to World Wide Wes
Everywhere we go, we leave a worldwide mess
Yes, still Roc La Familia
Says a lot about you if you not feeling us
The homie said, ""Hov, it ain't many of us""
I told 'em, ""Less is more, nigga, it's plenty of us""


Cash rules everything around me, frikki-frikki-frik
C.R.E.A.M.; get the-get the-get the-get the
Get the-get the-get the-get the money, dollar-dollar
D-d-d-d-dollar-dollar, dollar-dollar bill, y'all (Y'all, y'all)


Cake, cake-cake, cake-cake, cake
Five hundred million, I got a pound cake
Niggas is frontin', that's upside-down cake
Get 'em a red nose, they clown cakes
They shoulda never let you 'round cake
Look at my neck, I got a karat cake, uh
Now here's the icin' on the cake
Cake, cake-cake, cake-cake, uh
I'm just gettin' started, oh yeah, we got it, bitch
I've done made more millionaires than the lotto did
Dame made millions, Biggs made millions
Ye made millions, Just made millions
Lyor made millions, Cam made millions
Beans'a tell you if he wasn't in his feelings
Uh, I'm back in my bag
My eyes bloodshot, but my jet don't lag
A pair of Jordan 3's, tryna chase this cash
Gucci airbag just in case we crash
Uh, last night was mad trill
I'm fresh out of Advil-Jesus, grab the wheel



Yeah, uh
Look, fuck all that ""Happy to be here"" shit that y'all want me on
I'm the big homie, they still be tryna lil bro me, dog
Like I should fall in line
Like I should alert niggas when I'm 'bout to drop somethin' crazy
And not say I'm the greatest of my generation
Like I should be dressing different
Like I should be less aggressive and pessimistic
Like I should be way more nervous and less dismissive
Like I should be on my best behavior and not talk my shit
And do it major like the niggas who paved the way for us
Like I didn't study the game to the letter
And understand that I'm not doin' it the same
Man, I'm doing it better
Like I didn't make that clearer this year
Like I should feel, I don't know, guilty for saying that
They should put a couple more mirrors in here so I can stare at myself
These are usually just some thoughts that I would share with myself
But I thought ""Fuck it"", it's worth it to share 'em
With someone else other than Paris for once
I text her from time to time, she a mom now
I guess sometimes life forces us to calm down
I told her she could live with me if she need to, I got a compound
But I think she's straight
'Cause she supported since Hot Beats
Right before Wayne came and got me out of the back room
Where I was rapping with Jas over beats that I shouldn't have
In the hopes for the glory
He walked right past in the hallway
Three months later, I'm his artist
He probably wouldn't remember that story
But that shit stick with me always
Couldn't believe when he called me
You never know what could happen to you
And I just spent four Ferraris all on a brand new Bugatti
And did that shit 'cause it's somethin' to do
Yeah, I guess that's just who I became, dawg
Nothing was the same, dawg",218330
31499,204019,Tuscan Leather,rap,Drake,2013,1578112,{},"
Yeah
Alright, yeah


Comin' off the last record
I'm gettin' twenty million off the record
Just to off these records, nigga, that's a record
I'm livin' like I'm out here on my last adventure
Past the present when you have to mention
This is nothin' for the radio, but they'll still play it though
'Cause it's that new Drizzy Drake, that's just the way it go
Heavy airplay all day with no chorus
We keep it thorough, nigga
Rap like this for all of my borough niggas
I reached the point where don't shit matter to me, nigga
I reached heights that Dwight Howard couldn't reach, nigga
Prince Akeem, they throw flowers at my feet, nigga
I could go a hour on this beat, nigga
Yeah, I'm just as famous as my mentor
But that's still the boss, don't get sent for
Get hype on tracks and jump in front of a bullet you wasn't meant for
'Cause you don't really wanna hear me vent more
Hot temper, scary outcome
Here's a reason for niggas that's hatin' without one
That always let they mouth run
Bench players talkin' like starters, I hate it
Started from the bottom, now we here, nigga, we made it
Yeah, Tom Ford Tuscan Leather smellin' like a brick
Degenerates, but even Ellen love our shit
Rich enough that I don't have to tell 'em that I'm rich
Self-explanatory, you just here to spread the story
Wassup?

Sittin' Gucci Row like they say up at UNLV
Young rebel, Young Money, nothin' you could tell me
Paperwork takin' too long, maybe they don't understand me
I'll compromise if I have to, I gotta stay with the family
Not even talkin' to Nicki, communication is breakin'
I dropped the ball on some personal shit, I need to embrace it
I'm honest, I make mistakes, I'd be the second to admit it
Think that's why I need her in my life, to check me when I'm trippin'
On a mission, tryna shift the culture
Tell me who dissin', I got some things that'll hit the culprit
Them strep throat flows, them shits to stop all of the talkin'
All of the talkin', got one reply for all of your comments
Fuck what you think, I'm too busy, that's why you leave a message
Born a perfectionist, guess that makes me a bit obsessive
That shit I heard from you lately really relieved some pressure
Like ayy, B, I got your CD, you get an E for effort
I piece letters together and get to talkin' reckless
Owl chains like credentials, you know you see the necklace
My life's a completed checklist
I'm tired of hearin' 'bout who you checkin' for now
Just give it time, we'll see who's still around a decade from now
That's real


How much time is this nigga spendin' on the intro?
Lately I've been feelin' like Guy Pearce in Memento
I just set the bar, niggas fall under it like a limbo
The family all that matters, I'm just out here with my kinfolk
Off everything my pen wrote, we went from Bundy to Winslow
This for shorty up on Glengrove who love when I catch my tempo
I sip the Pora and listen to Cappadonna (Talk to 'em)
The fresh prince, just had dinner with Tatyana, no lie
All these nineties fantasies on my mind
The difference is that with mine, they all come true in due time
I might come through without security to check if you're fine
That's just me on my solo like ""Fuck it"", like ""YOLO""
Wanted to tell you, ""Accept yourself""
You don't have to prove shit to no one except yourself
And if you end up needin' some extra help, then I could help
You know, back on your feet and shit
Tryna get my karma up, fuck the guilty and greedy shit
How much time is this nigga spendin' on the intro?
How this nigga workin' like he got a fuckin' twin though?
Life is soundin' crazy, 40 on Martin Scorsese
And I wouldn't change a thing if you paid me
Now real nigga, wassup?
Ayy, yeah, ayy
How much time is this nigga spendin' on the intro?

If there's hell below, I'll see you when you get there
Are you enjoyin' yourselves?
If we may, we would just like to close off with somethin' a bit inspirational
Hopefully something a bit relevant as to us all are having the same fears, shedding similar tears, and of course dying in so many years
It don't mean that we can't have a good life
So we'd like to just maybe close out with something, some food for thought, for all of us

",218337
31561,204756,Dark Horse,pop,Katy Perry,2013,1018681,"{""Juicy J""}","
Yeah, y'all know what it is
Katy Perry, Juicy J
Uh-huh, let's rage!


I knew you were, you were gonna come to me
And here you are, but you better choose carefully
'Cause I, I'm capable of anything
Of anything, and everything


Make me your Aphrodite
Make me your one and only
But don't make me your enemy (Enemy)
Your enemy (Your enemy), your enemy


So you wanna play with magic?
Boy, you should know what you're fallin' for
Baby, do you dare to do this?
'Cause I'm coming at you like a dark horse
Are you ready for, ready for
A perfect storm, perfect storm?
'Cause once you're mine, once you're mine
There's no going back

Mark my words, this love will make you levitate
Like a bird, like a bird without a cage
We're down to earth if you choose to walk away
Don't walk away (Walk away)


It's in the palm of your hand now, baby
It's a yes or a no, no maybe
So just be sure before you give it all to me
All to me, give it all to me


So you wanna play with magic?
Boy, you should know what you're fallin' for
Baby, do you dare to do this?
'Cause I'm coming at you like a dark horse
Are you ready for, ready for
A perfect storm, perfect storm?
'Cause once you're mine, once you're mine
There's no going back


She's a beast, I call her Karma (Come back)
She eat your heart out like Jeffrey Dahmer (Woo!)
Be careful, try not to lead her on
Shawty's heart is on steroids, 'cause her love is so strong
You may fall in love when you meet her (Meet her)
If you get the chance, you better keep her (Keep her)
She's sweet as pie, but if you break her heart
She turn cold as a freezer (Freezer)
That fairy tale ending with a knight in shining armor
She can be my sleeping beauty, I'm gon' put her in a coma (Woo!)
Damn, I think I love her, shawty's so bad
I'm sprung and I don't care
She ride me like a roller coaster, turn the bedroom into a fair (A fair)
Her love is like a drug, I was tryna hit it and quit it
But lil mama so dope, I messed around and got addicted

So you wanna play with magic?
Boy, you should know what you're fallin' for (You should know)
Baby, do you dare to do this?
'Cause I'm coming at you like a dark horse (Like a dark horse)
Are you ready for, ready for (Ready for)
A perfect storm, perfect storm? (A perfect storm)
'Cause once you're mine, once you're mine
There's no going back


",219361
31613,205549,I Have Nothing,rb,Whitney Houston,1992,1392299,{},"
Share my life, take me for what I am
'Cause I'll never change all my colors for you
Take my love, I'll never ask for too much
Just all that you are and everything that you do


I don't really need to look very much further
I don't wanna have to go where you don't follow
I won't hold it back again, this passion inside
Can't run from myself, there's nowhere to hide


But don't make me close one more door
I don't wanna hurt anymore
Stay in my arms if you dare
Or must I imagine you there
Don't walk away from me
I have nothing, nothing, nothing
If I don't have you, you, you, you, you

You see through, right to the heart of me
You break down my walls with the strength of your love, mm
I never knew love like I've known it with you
Will a memory survive, one I can hold on to


I don't really need to look very much further
I don't wanna have to go where you don't follow
I won't hold it back again, this passion inside
I can't run from myself, there's nowhere to hide
Your love, I'll remember forever


But don't make me close one more door
I don't wanna hurt anymore
Stay in my arms if you dare
Or must I imagine you there
Don't walk away from me
I have nothing, nothing, nothing
Don't make me close one more door
I don't wanna hurt anymore
Stay in my arms if you dare
Or must I imagine you there
Don't walk away from me, no
Don't walk away from me

Don't you dare walk away from me
I have nothing, nothing, nothing
If I don't have you, you
If I don't have you, oh you",220371
31850,209013,Trophies,rap,Drake,2013,1432697,{},"
Yeah
Had hit records on my demo
Did y'all boys not get the memo?
I do not stay at the Intercontinental
And anything I got is not a rental
I own that mu'fucka
Figured out this shit is simple
My stock been going up like a crescendo
A bunch of handshakes from the fakes
But nigga, I do not wanna be friends though


I told y'all mu'fuckas
Man, this shit is not a love song
This a ""fuck-a-stripper-on-the-mink-rug"" song
This a ""fuck-them-boys-forever, hold-a-grudge"" song
""Pop-some-fucking-champagne-in-the-tub"" song
Nigga, ""just-because"" song
Damn

What's the move? Can I tell the truth?
If I was doing this for you then I'd have nothing left to prove
Nah, this for me though
I'm just tryna stay alive and take care of my people
And they don't have no award for that
Trophies, trophies
And they don't have no award for that
Shit don't come with trophies, ain't no envelopes to open
I just do it cause I'm 'sposed to, nigga


Bitch I go to Dreams with a suitcase
I got my whole country on a new wave
She like, ""I heard all your niggas stay where you stay""
House so big I haven't seen them boys in two days
Bitch, I use a walkie-talkie just to get a beverage
I saw my parents split up right after the wedding
That taught my ass to stay committed, fuck the credit
Bitch, check the numbers, I'm the one who really get it


I told y'all mu'fuckas
Man, this shit is not a love song
This a ""doing-me-and-only-God-can-judge"" song
""I-do-not-know-what-the-fuck-you-thought-it-was"" song
""Pop-some-fucking-champagne-in-the-tub"" song
Nigga, ""just-because"" song
Damn

What's the move? Can I tell the truth?
If I was doing this for you then I'd have nothing left to prove
Nah, this for me though
I'm just tryna stay alive and take care of my people
And they don't have no award for that
Trophies, trophies
And they don't have no award for that
Shit don't come with trophies, ain't no envelopes to open
I just do it cause I'm 'sposed to, nigga",225050
31939,210582,Take Me to Church,pop,Hozier,2013,3836976,{},"




My lover's got humor
She's the giggle at a funeral
Knows everybody's disapproval
I should've worshipped her sooner
If the heavens ever did speak
She's the last true mouthpiece
Every Sunday's getting more bleak
A fresh poison each week
""We were born sick""
You heard them say it
My church offers no absolutes
She tells me ""Worship in the bedroom""
The only Heaven I'll be sent to
Is when I'm alone with you
I was born sick, but I love it
Command me to be well

Aaa, Amen, Amen, Amen


Take me to church
I'll worship like a dog at the shrine of your lies
I'll tell you my sins and you can sharpen your knife
Offer me that deathless death
Good God, let me give you my life
Take me to church
I'll worship like a dog at the shrine of your lies
I'll tell you my sins and you can sharpen your knife
Offer me that deathless death
Good God, let me give you my life


If I'm a pagan of the good times
My lover's the sunlight
To keep the goddess on my side
She demands a sacrifice
Drain the whole sea
Get something shiny
Something meaty for the main course
That's a fine looking high horse
What you got in the stable?
We've a lot of starving faithful
That looks tasty
That looks plenty
This is hungry work

Take me to church
I'll worship like a dog at the shrine of your lies
I'll tell you my sins so you can sharpen your knife
Offer me my deathless death
Good God, let me give you my life
Take me to church
I'll worship like a dog at the shrine of your lies
I'll tell you my sins so you can sharpen your knife
Offer me my deathless death
Good God, let me give you my life


No masters or kings when the ritual begins
There is no sweeter innocence than our gentle sin
In the madness and soil of that sad earthly scene
Only then I am human
Only then I am clean


Oh, oh Amen, Amen, Amen


Take me to church
I'll worship like a dog at the shrine of your lies
I'll tell you my sins and you can sharpen your knife
Offer me that deathless death
Good God, let me give you my life
Take me to church
I'll worship like a dog at the shrine of your lies
I'll tell you my sins and you can sharpen your knife
Offer me that deathless death
Good God, let me give you my life",226866
32467,216615,Bad Guy,rap,Eminem,2013,2101460,{},"Part 1: Produced by S1 and M-Phazes


It's like I'm in this dirt, digging up old hurt
Tried everything to get my mind off you, it won't work
All it takes is one song on the radio, you're
Right back on it, reminding me all over again how you fucking just brushed me off and left me so burnt
Spent a lot of time tryna soul search
Maybe I needed to grow up a little first
Well, looks like I hit a growth spurt
But I'm coming for closure
Don't suppose an explanation I'm owed for
The way that you turned your back on me just when I may have needed you most-oh, you thought it was over?
You could just close the
Chapter and go about your life like it was nothing
You ruined mine but you seem to be doing fine
Well, I've never recovered
But tonight I bet you that what you're
'Bout to go through's tougher than anything I ever have suffered
Can't think of a better way to define poetic justice
Can I hold grudges?
Mind saying, ""Let it go, fuck this!""
Heart's saying, ""I will, once I bury this bitch alive, hide the shovel
And then drive of in the sunset.""

I flee the scene like it was my last ride
You see right through
Oh, you had me pegged the first time
You can see the truth
But it's easier to justify
What's bad is good
And I hate to be the bad guy
I just hate to be the bad guy
(Follow me, I ruh-uh-un; follow me, I ruh-uh-un)
I just hate to be the bad guy
(Follow me, I ruh-uh-un; follow me, I ruh-uh-un)


And to think I used to think you was the shit, bitch
To think it was you at one time I worshipped, shit
Think you can hurt people and just keep getting away with it?
Not this time, you better go and get the sewing kit, bitch!
Finish this stitch, so you can reap what you sew, nitwit
Thought some time would pass and I'd forget it? Forget it!
You left our family in shambles
And you expect me to just get over him, pretend he never existed?
May be gone but he's not forgotten
And don't think 'cause he's been out the picture so long that I've stopped the plotting and still ain't coming to get ya
You're wrong and that shit was rotten
And the way you played him's same shit you did to me, cold
Have you any idea the shit that I've gone through?
Feelings I harbor? All this pent-up resentment I hold on to?
Not once you call to ask me how I'm doing
Letters, you don't respond to 'em
Fuck it, I'm coming to see you
And, gee, who better to talk to than you?
The cause of my problems
My life is garbage, and I'm 'bout to take it out on ya
Poof, then I'm gone, voosh

I flee the scene like it was my last ride
You see right through
Oh, you had me pegged the first time
You can see the truth
But it's easier to justify
What's bad is good
And I hate to be the bad guy
I just hate to be the bad guy
(Follow me, I ruh-uh-un; follow me, I ruh-uh-un)
I just hate to be the bad guy
(Follow me, I ruh-uh-un; follow me, I ruh-uh-un)


I've been drivin' around your side of this town
Like nine frickin' hours and forty-five minutes now
Finally I found your new address, park in your drive
Feel like I've been waitin' on this moment all of my life
And it's now arrived and my mouth is full of saliva
My knife is out and I'm duckin' on the side of your house
See, it's sad it came to this point
Such a disappointment I had to make this appointment
To come and see ya, but I ain't here for your empathy
I don't need your apology or your friendship or sympathy
It's revenge that I seek
So I sneak vengefully, and treat your bedroom window
Like I reach my full potential-I peeked
Continue to peep, still bent low, then keep
Tapping the glass lightly then start to crescendo, sneak
All the way 'round to the back porch
Man, door handles unlocked, shouldn't be that easy to do this
You don't plan for intruders beforehand?
Surprised to see me? Cat got your tongue?
Gag, chloroform rag, dag, almost hack-up a lung
Like you picked an axe up and swung, stick to the core plan
Dragged to the back of a trunk by one of your fans
Irony's spectacular, huh? Now who's a faggot, you punk?
And here's your Bronco hat
You can have that shit back 'cause they suck
It's just me, you and the music now, Slim, I hope you hear it
We're in a car right now-wait, here comes my favorite lyric
""I'm the bad guy who makes fun of people that die.""
And hey, here's a sequel to my Mathers LP just to try to get people to buy
How's this for a publicity stunt? This should be fun!
Last album now 'cause after this you'll be officially done
Eminem killed by M and M, Matthew Mitchell
Bitch, I even have your initials
I initially was gonna bury you next to my brother, but fuck it
Since you're in love with your city so much, I figured, what the fuck, the best place you could be buried alive is right here
Two more exits, time is quite near
Hope we don't get stopped, no license I fear
That sirens I hear?
Guess ninety on the freeway wasn't the brightest idea
As cops appear in my driver's side mirror
(Oh, God! Police! Aaaghh!)
Hope Foxtrot gets an aerial shot of your burial plot, at least
New plan, Stan!
Slim: ""Chauvinist pig drove in this big Lincoln Town Car""
Well, gotta go, almost at the bridge
Ha ha, big bro, it's for you; Slim, this is for him
And Frank Ocean; oh, hope you can swim good
Now say you hate homos again!
Part 2: Produced by StreetRunner


I also represent
Anyone on the receiving end of those jokes you offend
I'm the nightmare you fell asleep and then woke up still in
I'm your karma closin' in with each stroke of a pen
Perfect time to have some remorse to show for your sin
Nope, it's hopeless, I'm the denial that you're hopelessly in
When they say all of this is approaching its end
But you refuse to believe that it's over, here we go all over again
Back's to the wall, I'm stackin' up all them odds
Toilets clogged, yeah, 'cause I'm talkin' a lot of shit but I'm backin' it all up
But in my head there's a voice in the back and it hollers
After the track is demolished
I am your lack of a conscience
I'm the ringing in your ears
I'm the polyps on the back of your tonsils
Eating your vocal cords after your concerts
I'm your time that's almost up that you haven't acknowledged
Grab for some water
But I'm that pill that's too jagged to swallow
I'm the bullies you hate that you became with every faggot you slaughtered comin' back on ya
Every woman you insult, batter, but the double-standard you have when it comes to your daughters
I represent everything you take for granted
'Cause Marshall Mathers, the rapper's persona
Is half a facade, and Matthew and Stan's just symbolic
Of you not knowin' what you had 'til it's gone
'Cause after all the glitz and the glam
No more fans that are calling your name
Cameras are off, sad, but it happens to all of them
I'm the hindsight to say, ""I told you so!""
Foreshadows of all the things that are to follow
I'm the future that's here to show you what happens tomorrow
If you don't stop after they call ya
Biggest laughing stock of rap who can't call it quits
When it's time to walk away, I'm every guilt trip
The baggage you have, but as you gather up all your possessions
If there's anything you have left to say
'Less it makes an impact then don't bother
So 'fore you rest your case better make sure you're packing a wallop
So, one last time, I'm back
'Fore it fades into black and it's all over
Behold the final chapter in a saga
Tryna recapture that lightning trapped in a bottle
Twice, the magic that started
It all, tragic portrait of an artist
Tortured, trapped in his own drawings
Tap into thoughts blacker and darker
Than anything imaginable; here goes a wild stab in the dark
Uh, as we pick up where the last Mathers left off",235723
32471,216619,Legacy,rap,Eminem,2013,1248650,{},"
Tell me where to go
Tell me what to do
I'll be right there for you
Tell me what to say
No matter if it's true
I'll say it all for you


I used to be the type of kid
That would always think the sky is fallin'
Why am I so differently wired? Am I a martian?
What kind of twisted experiment am I involved in?
'Cause I don't belong in this world
That's why I'm scoffin' at authority, defiant often
Flyin' off at the handle at my mom
No dad, so I am noncompliant at home
At school I'm just shy and awkward
And I don't need no goddamn psychologist
Tryna diagnose why I have all these underlyin' problems
Thinkin' he can try and solve 'em
I'm outside chalkin' up drawings
On the sidewalk and in the front drive talkin'
To myself, either that or inside hidin' off in
The corner somewhere quiet, tryin' not to
Be noticed 'cause I'm cryin' and sobbin'
I had a bad day at school so I ain't talkin'
Some cocksucker shoved me into a fuckin' locker
'Cause he said that I eye-balled him

And if you fall, I'll get you there
I'll be your savior from all the wars
That are fought inside your world
Please have faith in my words


'Cause this is my legacy, legacy, yeah
This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
There's no guarantee
It's not up to me, we can only see
This is my legacy, legacy, legacy, legacy


I used to be the type of kid that would always think the sky's fallin'
Why am I so differently wired in my noggin?
'Cause sporadic as my thoughts come, it's mind-bogglin'
'Cause I obsess on everything in my mind, small shit
Bothers me, but not my father, he said sayonara
Then split, but I don't give a shit
I'm fine long as there's batteries in my Walkman
Nothing is the matter with me
Shit, look on the bright side, at least I ain't walkin'
I bike ride through the neighborhood of my apartment
Complex on a ten-speed which I've acquired parts that
I find in the garbage, a frame then put tires on it
Headphones on, look straight ahead if kids try and start shit
But if this is all there is for me life offers
Why bother even tryin' to put up a fight? It's nonsense
But I think a light bulb just lit up in my conscience
What about them rhymes I've been jottin'?
They are kind of giving me confidence
Instead of tryin' to escape through my comics
Why don't I just blast a little something like Onyx?
To put me in the mood to wanna fight and write songs that
Say what I wanna say to the kid that said that I eye-balled him
Grab hold of my balls, like, ""That's right, fight's on, bitch!""
Who woulda knew, from the moment I turned the mic on, that
I could be iconic in my conquest?
That's word to Phife Dawg from A Tribe Called Quest

This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
There's no guarantee
It's not up to me, we can only see
This is my legacy, legacy, legacy, legacy


I used to be the type of kid that would always think the sky's fallin'
Now I think the fact that I'm differently wired's awesome
'Cause if I wasn't, I wouldn't be able to work words like this
And connect lines like crosswords
And use my enemy's words as strength
To try and draw from, and get inspired off 'em
'Cause all my life I was told and taught I am not shit
By you wack fuckin' giant sacks of lyin' dog shit
Now you shut up, bitch, I am talkin'
Thought I was full of horseshit
And now you fuckin' worship the ground on which I am walkin'
Me against the world, so what? I'm Brian Dawkins
Versus the whole 0-16 Lions offense
So bring on the Giants, Falcons, and Miami Dolphins
It's the body bag game, bitch, I'm supplyin' coffins
'Cause you dicks butt kiss, bunch of Brian Baldingers
You're gon' die a ball-licker, I've been diabolical
With this dialogue since '99 Rawkus
You don't respect the legacy I leave behind, y'all can
Suck a dick; the day you beat me, pigs'll fly out my ass
In a flyin' saucer full of Italian sausage
The most high exaltin' and I ain't haltin'
'Til I die of exhaustion, inhale my exhaust fumes
The best part about me is I am not you
I'm me, and I'm the Fire Marshall, and this is my-

This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
This is my legacy, legacy, yeah
There's no guarantee
It's not up to me, we can only see
This is my legacy, legacy, legacy, legacy",235727
32473,216621,Rap God,rap,Eminem,2013,17575634,{},"
""Look, I was gonna go easy on you not to hurt your feelings""
""But I'm only going to get this one chance"" (Six minutes- Six minutes-)
""Something's wrong, I can feel it"" (Six minutes, Slim Shady, you're on!)
""Just a feeling I've got, like something's about to happen, but I don't know what. 
If that means what I think it means, we're in trouble, big trouble; 
And if he is as bananas as you say, I'm not taking any chances""
""You are just what the doc ordered""


I'm beginnin' to feel like a Rap God, Rap God
All my people from the front to the back nod, back nod
Now, who thinks their arms are long enough to slap box, slap box?
They said I rap like a robot, so call me Rap-bot


But for me to rap like a computer it must be in my genes
I got a laptop in my back pocket
My pen'll go off when I half-cock it
Got a fat knot from that rap profit
Made a livin' and a killin' off it
Ever since Bill Clinton was still in office
With Monica Lewinsky feelin' on his nutsack
I'm an MC still as honest
But as rude and as indecent as all hell
Syllables, skill-a-holic (Kill 'em all with)
This flippity dippity-hippity hip-hop
You don't really wanna get into a pissin' match
With this rappity brat, packin' a MAC in the back of the Ac'
Backpack rap crap, yap-yap, yackety-yack
And at the exact same time, I attempt these lyrical acrobat stunts while I'm practicin' that
I'll still be able to break a motherfuckin' table
Over the back of a couple of faggots and crack it in half
Only realized it was ironic, I was signed to Aftermath after the fact
How could I not blow? All I do is drop F-bombs
Feel my wrath of attack
Rappers are havin' a rough time period, here's a maxi pad
It's actually disastrously bad for the wack
While I'm masterfully constructing this masterpièce

'Cause I'm beginnin' to feel like a Rap God, Rap God
All my people from the front to the back nod, back nod
Now, who thinks their arms are long enough to slap box, slap box?
Let me show you maintainin' this shit ain't that hard, that hard
Everybody want the key and the secret to rap immortality like I have got


Well, to be truthful the blueprint's
Simply rage and youthful exuberance
Everybody loves to root for a nuisance
Hit the Earth like an asteroid
Did nothing but shoot for the Moon since (Pew!)
MCs get taken to school with this music
'Cause I use it as a vehicle to ""bus the rhyme""
Now I lead a new school full of students
Me? I'm a product of Rakim
Lakim Shabazz, 2Pac, N.W.A, Cube, hey Doc, Ren
Yella, Eazy, thank you, they got Slim
Inspired enough to one day grow up, blow up and be in a position
To meet Run-D.M.C., induct them
Into the motherfuckin' Rock and Roll Hall of Fame
Even though I'll walk in the church and burst in a ball of flames
Only Hall of Fame I'll be inducted in is the alcohol of fame
On the wall of shame
You fags think it's all a game, 'til I walk a flock of flames
Off a plank and, tell me what in the fuck are you thinkin'?
Little gay-lookin' boy
So gay I can barely say it with a straight face, lookin' boy (Ha-ha!)
You're witnessin' a mass-occur
Like you're watching a church gathering take place, lookin' boy
""Oy vey, that boy's gay!""-that's all they say, lookin' boy
You get a thumbs up, pat on the back
And a ""way to go"" from your label every day, lookin' boy
Hey, lookin' boy! What you say, lookin' boy?
I get a ""hell yeah"" from Dre, lookin' boy
I'ma work for everything I have, never asked nobody for shit
Get outta my face, lookin' boy!
Basically, boy, you're never gonna be capable
Of keepin' up with the same pace, lookin' boy, 'cause-

I'm beginnin' to feel like a Rap God, Rap God
All my people from the front to the back nod, back nod
The way I'm racin' around the track, call me NASCAR, NASCAR
Dale Earnhardt of the trailer park, the White Trash God
Kneel before General Zod
This planet's Krypton-no, Asgard, Asgard


So you'll be Thor and I'll be Odin
You rodent, I'm omnipotent
Let off, then I'm reloadin'
Immediately with these bombs I'm totin'
And I should not be woken
I'm the walkin' dead, but I'm just a talkin' head, a zombie floatin'
But I got your mom deep-throatin'
I'm out my Ramen Noodle
We have nothin' in common, poodle
I'm a Doberman, pinch yourself in the arm and pay homage, pupil
It's me, my honesty's brutal
But it's honestly futile if I don't utilize what I do though
For good at least once in a while
So I wanna make sure somewhere in this chicken scratch I scribble and doodle enough rhymes
To maybe try to help get some people through tough times
But I gotta keep a few punchlines
Just in case 'cause even you unsigned
Rappers are hungry lookin' at me like it's lunchtime
I know there was a time where once I
Was king of the underground
But I still rap like I'm on my Pharoahe Monch grind
So I crunch rhymes, but sometimes when you combine
Appeal with the skin color of mine
You get too big and here they come tryin'
To censor you like that one line
I said on ""I'm Back"" from The Mathers LP 1 when I
Tried to say I'll take seven kids from Columbine
Put 'em all in a line, add an AK-47, a revolver and a 9
See if I get away with it now that I ain't as big as I was, but I'm
Morphin' into an immortal, comin' through the portal
You're stuck in a time warp from 2004 though
And I don't know what the fuck that you rhyme for
You're pointless as Rapunzel with fuckin' cornrows
You write normal? Fuck being normal!
And I just bought a new raygun from the future
Just to come and shoot ya, like when Fabolous made Ray J mad
'Cause Fab said he looked like a fag at Mayweather's pad
Singin' to a man while he played piano
Man, oh man, that was a 24/7 special on the cable channel
So Ray J went straight to the radio station
The very next day, ""Hey Fab, I'ma kill you!""
Lyrics comin' at you at supersonic speed (J.J. Fad)
Uh, summa-lumma, dooma-lumma, you assumin' I'm a human
What I gotta do to get it through to you I'm superhuman?
Innovative and I'm made of rubber so that anything you say is ricochetin' off of me and it'll glue to you and
I'm devastating, more than ever demonstrating
How to give a motherfuckin' audience a feeling like it's levitating
Never fading, and I know the haters are forever waiting
For the day that they can say I fell off, they'll be celebrating
'Cause I know the way to get 'em motivated
I make elevating music, you make elevator music
""Oh, he's too mainstream.""
Well, that's what they do when they get jealous, they confuse it
""It's not hip-hop, it's pop,""-'cause I found a hella way to fuse it
With rock, shock rap with Doc
Throw on ""Lose Yourself"" and make 'em lose it
""I don't know how to make songs like that
I don't know what words to use.""
Let me know when it occurs to you
While I'm rippin' any one of these verses that versus you
It's curtains, I'm inadvertently hurtin' you
How many verses I gotta murder to
Prove that if you were half as nice, your songs you could sacrifice virgins too?!
Ugh, school flunky, pill junkie
But look at the accolades these skills brung me
Full of myself, but still hungry
I bully myself 'cause I make me do what I put my mind to
And I'm a million leagues above you
Ill when I speak in tongues, but it's still tongue-in-cheek, fuck you
I'm drunk, so, Satan, take the fucking wheel
I'ma sleep in the front seat
Bumpin' Heavy D and the Boyz, still ""Chunky but Funky""
But in my head there's something I can feel tugging and struggling
Angels fight with devils and here's what they want from me
They're askin' me to eliminate some of the women hate
But if you take into consideration the bitter hatred
I have, then you may be a little patient
And more sympathetic to the situation
And understand the discrimination
But fuck it, life's handin' you lemons? Make lemonade then!
But if I can't batter the women
How the fuck am I supposed to bake them a cake then?!
Don't mistake him for Satan; it's a fatal mistake
If you think I need to be overseas and take a vacation
To trip a broad, and make her fall on her face and
Don't be a retard-be a king? Think not
Why be a king when you can be a god?",235729
32476,216624,The Monster,rap,Eminem,2013,4708911,{Rihanna},"
I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy


I wanted the fame but not the cover of Newsweek
Oh well, guess beggars can't be choosey
Wanted to receive attention for my music
Wanted to be left alone in public, excuse me
For wantin' my cake, and eat it too, and wantin' it both ways
Fame made me a balloon 'cause my ego inflated
When I blew, see, but it was confusing
'Cause all I wanted to do's be the Bruce Lee of loose leaf
Abused ink, used it as a tool when I blew steam
Whoo! Hit the lottery, ooh-wee!
But with what I gave up to get it was bittersweet
It was like winnin' a used mink
Ironic 'cause I think I'm gettin' so huge I need a shrink
I'm beginnin' to lose sleep: one sheep, two sheep
Goin' coo-coo and kooky as Kool Keith
But I'm actually weirder than you think, 'cause I'm-

I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy
Well, that's nothin' (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
Well, that's nothin' (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)


Now, I ain't much of a poet
But I know somebody once told me to seize the moment
And don't squander it 'cause you never know when it all
Could be over tomorrow, so I keep conjurin'
Sometimes I wonder where these thoughts spawn from
Yeah, ponderin'll do you wonders
No wonder you're losin' your mind, the way it wanders
Yodel-odel-ay-hee-hoo! I think it went wanderin' off down yonder
And stumbled onto Jeff VanVonderen
'Cause I need an interventionist
To intervene between me and this monster
And save me from myself and all this conflict
'Cause the very thing that I love's killin' me and I can't conquer it
My OCD's conkin' me in the head, keep knockin'
Nobody's home, I'm sleepwalkin'
I'm just relayin' what the voice in my head's sayin'
Don't shoot the messenger, I'm just friends with the-

I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy
Well, that's nothin' (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
Well, that's nothin' (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)


Call me crazy, but I have this vision, one day that
I'll walk amongst you a regular civilian
But until then, drums get killed and
I'm comin' straight at MC's, blood gets spilled and
I'll take you back to the days that I'd get on a Dre track
Give every kid who got played that pumped-up feelin'
And shit to say back to the kids who played him
I ain't here to save the fuckin' children
But if one kid out of a hundred million
Who are goin' through a struggle, feels it and relates, that's great!
It's payback, Russell Wilson fallin' way back
In the draft, turn nothin' into somethin', still can make that
Straw into gold, chump, I will spin-Rumpelstiltskin in a haystack
Maybe I need a straightjacket
Face facts: I am nuts for real, but I'm okay with that!
It's nothin', I'm still friends with the-

I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
Get along with the voices inside of my head
You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy


I'm friends with the monster that's under my bed
(Get along with) Get along with the voices inside of my head
(You're tryin' to) You're tryin' to save me, stop holdin' your breath
(And you think) And you think I'm crazy, yeah, you think I'm crazy
Well, that's nothin'


(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
Well, that's nothin' (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
(Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)",235732
32479,216627,Headlights,rap,Eminem,2013,1591714,"{""Nate Ruess""}","
Mom, I know I let you down
And though you say the days are happy
Why is the power off and I'm fucked up?
And, Mom, I know he's not around
But don't you place the blame on me
As you pour yourself another drink, yeah


I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far


I went in headfirst, never thinkin' about who what I said hurt
In what verse, my mom probably got it the worst
The brunt of it, but as stubborn as we are, did I take it too far?
""Cleanin' Out My Closet"" and all them other songs
But regardless, I don't hate you 'cause, Ma
You're still beautiful to me, 'cause you're my mom
Though far be it from you to be calm
Our house was Vietnam, Desert Storm
And both of us put together could form an atomic bomb
Equivalent to chemical warfare
And forever we could drag this on and on
But agree to disagree, that gift for me
Up under the Christmas tree don't mean shit to me
You're kickin' me out? It's fifteen degrees
And it's Christmas Eve, ""Little prick, just leave!""
Ma, let me grab my fucking coat!
Anything to have each other's goats
Why we always at each other's throats?
Especially when Dad, he fucked us both
We're in the same fuckin' boat
You'd think that'd make us close (Nope)
Further away it drove us, but together, headlights shine
And a car full of belongings, still got a ways to go
Back to grandma's house, it's straight up the road
And I was the man of the house, the oldest
So my shoulders carried the weight of the load
Then Nate got taken away by the state at eight-years-old
And that's when I realized you were sick
And it wasn't fixable or changeable
And to this day we remain estranged, and I hate it though, but-

I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far


'Cause to this day we remain estranged and I hate it though
'Cause you ain't even get to witness your grandbabies grow
But I'm sorry, Mama, for ""Cleanin' Out My Closet""
At the time I was angry, rightfully? Maybe so
Never meant that far to take it, though
'Cause now I know it's not your fault, and I'm not makin' jokes
That song I no longer play at shows
And I cringe every time it's on the radio
And I think of Nathan being placed in a home
And all the medicine you fed us and
How I just wanted you to taste your own
But now the medication's takin' over
And your mental state's deterioratin' slow
And I'm way too old to cry, this shit is painful, though
But, Ma, I forgive you, so does Nathan, yo
All you did, all you said, you did your best to raise us both
Foster care, that cross you bear, few may be as heavy as yours
But I love you, Debbie Mathers
Oh, what a tangled web we have 'cause
One thing I never asked was
Where the fuck my deadbeat dad was
Fuck it, I guess he had trouble keepin' up with every address
But I'da flipped every mattress, every rock and desert cactus
Owned a collection of maps
And followed my kids to the edge of the atlas
If someone ever moved 'em from me
That you coulda bet your asses
If I had to come down the chimney, dressed as Santa, kidnap 'em
And although one has only met their grandma once
You pulled up in our drive one night
As we were leavin' to get some hamburgers
Me, her and Nate, we introduced you, hugged you
And as you left, I had this overwhelming sadness
Come over me as we pulled off to go our separate paths and
I saw your headlights as I looked back
And I'm mad I didn't get the chance to
Thank you for being my mom and my dad
So, Mom, please accept this as a
Tribute; I wrote this on the jet, I guess I had to
Get this off my chest, I hope I get the chance to
Lay it 'fore I'm dead, the stewardess said to fasten
My seatbelt, I guess we're crashin'
So, if I'm not dreamin', I hope you get this message that
I will always love you from afar, 'cause you're my mom

I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far


I want a new life (Start over)
One without a cause (Clean slate)
So I'm coming home tonight (Yeah)
Well, no matter what the cost
And if the plane goes down
Or if the crew can't wake me up
Well, just know that I'm alright
I was not afraid to die
Oh, even if there's songs to sing
Well, my children will carry me
Just know that I'm alright
I was not afraid to die
Because I put my faith in my little girls
So I'll never say goodbye cruel world
Just know that I'm alright
I am not afraid to die


I guess we are who we are
Headlights shining in the dark night, I drive on
Maybe we took this too far
I want a new life
",235735
32856,220280,V. 3005,rap,Childish Gambino,2013,3325127,{},"
No matter what you say or what you do
When I'm alone, I'd rather be with you
Fuck these other niggas, I'll be right by your side
'Til 3005, hol' up


Okay, hold up, wait a minute, all good just a week ago
Crew at my house and we party every weekend, so
On the radio, that's my favorite song
Make me bounce around like I don't know, like I won't be here long
Now the thrill is gone, got no patience, 'cause I'm not a doctor
Girl, why is you lying? Girl, why you Mufasa?
Yeah, mi casa su casa, got it stripping like Gaza
Got so high off volcanoes, now the flow is so lava
Yeah, we spit that saliva, iPhone got message from Viber
Either the head is so hydra, or we let bygones be bygones
""My God, you pay for your friends?"" I'll take that as a compliment
Got a house full of homies, why I feel so the opposite?
Incompetent ain't the half of it
Saturdays we're Young Lavish-ing
Saddest shit, is I'm bad as it
Beans they took from the cabinet (Woah)
Sorry, I'm just scared of the future
'Til 3005, I got your back, we can do this, hol' up

No matter what you say or what you do
When I'm alone, I'd rather be with you
Fuck these other niggas, I'll be right by your side
'Til 3005, hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up)
No matter what you say or what you do
When I'm alone, I'd rather be with you
Fuck these other niggas, I'll be right by your side
'Til 3005, hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up)


I used to care what people thought, but now I care more
I mean, nobody out here's got it figured out
So, therefore, I've lost all hope of a happy ending
Depending on whether or not it's worth it
So insecure, no one's perfect
We spend it with no shame, we blow that like Coltrane
We in here like Rogaine, or leave it like Cobain
And when I'm long gone, whole crew sing a swan song
'Cause we all just ticking time bombs
Got a Lambo like LeBron's mom
And no matter where all of my friends go
Emily, Fam, and Lorenzo
All of them people my kinfolk, at least I think so
Can't tell
'Cause when them checks clear, they're not here
'Cause they don't care
It's kinda sad, but I'm laughing, whatever happens
Assassins, I'm stabbed in the back of my cabin
Labrador yapping, I'm glad that it happened, I mean it
Between us, I think there's something special
And if I lose my mental, just hold my hand
Even if you don't understand, hol' up

No matter what you say or what you do (No, no)
When I'm alone, I'd rather be with you (You and me)
Fuck these other niggas, I'll be right by your side
'Til 3005, hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up
No matter what you say or what you do
When I'm alone, I'd rather be with you
Fuck these other niggas, I'll be right by your side
'Til 3005, hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up), hol' up (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up)


Hol' up, hol' up
Hol' up, hol' up
Hol' up, hol' up
Hol' up, hol' up


Na-na-na, na-na-na-na-na
We did it! Yay!
Nigga, you so thirsty
",242093
32971,221856,Riptide,rock,Vance Joy,2013,1776673,{},"
I was scared of dentists and the dark
I was scared of pretty girls and starting conversations
Oh, all my friends are turning green
You're the magician's assistant in their dream


Oh, oh-o-oh, and they come unstuck


Lady, running down to the riptide
Taken away to the dark side
I wanna be your left hand man
I love you, when you're singing that song and
I got a lump in my throat 'cause
You're gonna sing the words wrong


There's this movie that I think you'll like
This guy decides to quit his job and heads to New York City
This cowboy's running from himself
And she's been living on the highest shelf

Oh, oh-o-oh, and they come unstuck


Lady, running down to the riptide
Taken away to the dark side
I wanna be your left hand man
I love you when you're singing that song and
I got a lump in my throat 'cause
You're gonna sing the words wrong


I just wanna, I just wanna know
If you're gonna, if you're gonna stay
I just gotta, I just gotta know
I can't have it, I can't have it, any other way
I swear she's destined for the screen
Closest thing to Michelle Pfeiffer that you've ever seen, oh


Lady, running down to the riptide
Taken away to the dark side
I wanna be your left hand man
I love you, when you're singing that song and
I got a lump in my throat 'cause
You're gonna sing the words wrong
Oh lady, running down to the riptide
Taken away to the dark side
I wanna be your left hand man
I love you when you're singing that song and
I got a lump in my throat 'cause
You're gonna sing the words wrong

Oh lady, running down to the riptide
Taken away to the dark side
I wanna be your left hand man
I love you when you're singing that song and
I got a lump in my throat 'cause
You're gonna sing the words wrong, yeah
I got a lump in my throat 'cause
You're gonna sing the words wrong",245054
32994,222060,Whats Up?,rock,4 Non Blondes,1992,1665311,{},"
25 years and my life is still
Tryin' to get up that great big hill of hope
For a destination
I realized quickly when I knew I should
That the world was made up of this brotherhood of man
For whatever that means


And so I cry sometimes when I'm lying in bed
Just to get it all out what's in my head
And I, I am feeling a little peculiar
And so I wake in the morning and I step outside
And I take a deep breath and I get real high
And I scream from the top of my lungs
""What's going on?""


And I say, hey-ey-ey
Hey-ey-ey
I said ""Hey, a-what's going on?""
And I say, hey-ey-ey
Hey-ey-ey
I said ""Hey, a-what's going on?""

Ooh, ooh
Ooh
Ooh, uh huh
Ooh, ooh
Ooh
Ooh, uh huh


And I try
Oh my God, do I try
I try all the time
In this institution
And I pray
Oh my God, do I pray
I pray every single day
For revolution


And so I cry sometimes when I'm lying in bed
Just to get it all out, what's in my head
And I, I am feeling a little peculiar
And so I wake in the morning and I step outside
And I take a deep breath and I get real high
And I scream from the top of my lungs
""What's going on?""

And I say, hey-ey-ey
Hey-ey-ey
I said ""Hey, what's going on?""
And I say, hey-ey-ey
Hey-ey-ey
I said ""Hey, a-what's going on?""
And I say, hey-ey-ey
(Wake in the morning and step outside)
Hey-ey-ey
(Take a deep breath and I get real high)
(And I scream)
I said ""Hey, a-what's going on?""
And I say, hey-ey-ey
(Wake in the morning and step outside)
Hey-ey, yeah yeah yeah
(Take a deep breath and I get real high)
(And I scream)
I said ""Hey, a-what's going on?""


Ooh, ooh
Ooh
Ooh, uh huh


25 years and my life is still
Tryin' to get up that great big hill of hope
For a destination, mmm",245574
33074,222945,III. Telegraph Ave. Oakland by Lloyd,rap,Childish Gambino,2013,1205673,{},"
Power 106!
LA, it's ya girl, Yesi Ortiz
Got some brand-new music
I need y'all to turn it up and let me know what you think
It's Lloyd, called ""Oakland"", on Power 106


I was making Japanese and she's watching DVDs
In Oakland, in Oakland
Now I'm driving up the 5 and she waits 'til I arrive
In Oakland, in Oakland
Everything that I wanted
Only gotta drive for the moment
If you tell me, ""Turn around,"" then I'm on it
For the moment, but you know me
You know how I get when I'm lonely
And I think about you and the moments
But everything you do is so Oakland, so Oakland


Foot on the gas, I'm just trying to pass
All the red lights and the stop signs
I'm ready to go
Before I get to The Bay, babe, that's a problem
Because I'm way too scared to call
And you might get me to stay, and oh

I don't really mind the drive
But I think I'd rather die in Oakland, in Oakland
With my hands on two and ten
So I guess it all depends on Oakland, on Oakland
And I'm nervous, truth be told
I never saw me growing old in Oakland, in Oakland
And if I married you tonight
It would probably start a riot in Oakland, in Oakland


Everything, that I needed
Now that I got you in your feelings
Everything you won't say, you tweet it
And a nigga don't like that shit at all
So treated
Can we just roll with the feeling?
Can we just roll for a minute?
Wait a minute


Foot on the gas, I'm just trying to pass
All the red lights and the stop signs
I'm ready to go
But I'm really not ready, girl, that's a problem
'Cause I'm way too scared to fall
And I know you choose to stay, and oh

All the girlfriends saying, ""Here we go again""
Rich kid, but he act like a gentleman
Last one didn't end like it should've been
Two dates and he still wanna get it in
And they're saying it's because of the Internet
Try her once and it's on to the next chick
X-O the O face on your exes, right?
And we can do the same thing if you wanna have at it
When your thoughts can't breathe and you thinking asthmatic
And you wanna be a mom and I wasn't mad at it
I was thinking 'bout me, I'd be really bad at it
'Cause I'm thinking 'bout me, weeks in Dubai
Fourth of July, house in Kauai, yeah, we can try
So let's try


Whoa
I took off my nine-to-five
But you still don't have the time to kiss me, just hit me
And if I left you all alone, would you still pick up the phone?
It's iffy, you miss me
I got furniture to move
And we'll both be thirty soon in Oakland, in Oakland
The only one I know is you
So the fuck I'm supposed to do in Oakland? In Oakland
In Oakland, in Oakland
In Oakland, in Oakland
In Oakland, in Oakland
In Oakland, in Oakland
In Oakland, in Oakland
",247357
33149,223861,Love Game,rap,Eminem,2013,1321281,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","


Something's burnin', I can't figure out what *sniffs* (Out what)
It's either lust or a cloud of dust
Judgement is clouded; must
Just be the powder from the power of (Love!)
But I'm in something I don't know how to get out of
Left my girl in the house alone (Ah!)
Is that my soon-to-be-spouse's moan?
And the further I walk, the louder (Ah, ah!)
Pause for a minute to make certain that's what I heard
'Cause after all, this is her place
So I give her the benefit of the doubt, I
Think I might be about to bust her, bust her (Ah!)
The thought's scary, yo, though and it hurts-brace!
Hope it ain't, ""Here we go, yo!""
'Cause my head already goes to worst-case
Scenario, though in the first place (Ah, fuck)
But you confirmed my low-end theory though (Ah!)
Should've known when I made it all the way to third base
And that was only the first date
Could've made it to home plate (Oh!)
But you slid straight for the dome and dove face first
""No, (*slurp*) you don't (*slurp*) under- (*slurp*) -stand, (*slurp*)
I (*slurp*) don't (*slurp*) do this for (*hic*) anyone, (*hic*) ever (*slurp*)""
Yeah, that ain't what they all say?
I'll say, you can suck a softball through a straw
Used to be my fiancé
'Til you sucked on Wayne, André, and Kanye
LeBron, Akon, JAY, Lil Jon, Raekwon, Ma$e
Polow da Don, Dre, Dante Ross, James Conway, Kwamé?!
Guess I'm gettin' my g-goddang Jigga on, eh?
'Cause your name, I'm beyond sayin' (Ha)
But fuck it, I'm movin' on, you women are all cray
But I'll probably always keep on playin' the-

Game of love, love, love, love
La-La-La-La-La love


She doesn't love me, no, she don't love me no more
She hates my company, guess she don't love me no more
I tried to get her up out of my head, left my bags at the door
She screamed she loved me like she never did before


And I told her, ""Go where you wanna!
Go do whatcha wanna do, I don't care!""
And I told her, ""Go where you wanna!
Go do whatcha wanna do, I don't care!""


I told that bitch, ""I'm a sucker for love, you a sucker for dick""
Suckin' dick in your mama tub, then your granny walked in
Told the stupid nigga to duck under the water
He drowned, like an abortion
They booked you for manslaughter
You beat the case and I called ya
""Sherane is not available now, leave a message at the tone
And Kendrick, don't forget to buy two pair of those
Expensive heels, you little fuckin' Ferris wheel
Fuckin' spinnin' on me-fuck you think, we gon' get married still?
Fuckin' Mary had a little lamb, this ain't no fairy tale
Fairy godmama better tell you how I fuckin' feel
Like you should fuckin' beat it
Or fuckin' eat it while I'm on my period
Now have a blessed day!"" (*Phone hangs up*) Bitch, you serious?
I'm in the mirror with this look on my face, curious
Why you ain't fuckin' with me? You cut me deep as Caesarean
You know I want you bad as a Benjamin, I'm delirious
I want you bad as the head shattered on George Zimmerman
After the Dillinger hit him diligently and killin' him
His mouthpiece for a Cadillac emblem
That's analogy and metaphor for you
I should win a medal for all the ways I adore you
This is me talkin' cordial, yeah, I got some home training
That ain't what you like, ain't it?
What about if I was as famous as Marshall?
Would you give fellatio in the carpool?
Cops pull us over, they just wanna know if you gargle
Singin', ""I hope she's good enough
Meanwhile you're chasin' her""
Chlamydia couldn't even get rid of her
Pity the fool and pity the fool in me, I'ma live with her

Game of love, love, love, love
La-La-La-La-La love


She doesn't love me, no, she don't love me no more
She hates my company, guess she don't love me no more
I tried to get her up out of my head, left my bags at the door
She screamed she loved me like she never did before


And I told her, ""Go where you wanna!
Go do whatcha wanna do, I don't care!""
And I told her, ""Go where you wanna!
Go do whatcha wanna do, I don't care!""


So needless to say I'm feelin' betrayed
Snatch my house key off her key chain
She jumps off Wee-Bey from The Wire's dick
Now she's chasin' me with a cheese grater
Here goes that broken record cliché
It's all my fault anyway, she's turnin' the tables, I'm a beat-break
She treats my face like Serato, she cuts and scratches like a DJ
Each day is an Instant Replay
They say what we display is symptomatic of addict behaviour
Back together, but forgot today was her B-day
She cut me off on the freeway
Simple misunderstanding, but just as I went to slam on the brakes
That's when I realized that she may be crazy as me, wait
Bitch cut my fuckin' brakeline
Stepped on them fuckers eight times
Still goin' seventy-three, thank God there's an exit comin' up
What the mother-F-U-C-K's wrong with her?
Hit the off ramp 'til I coasted to a goshdamn halt
Hit a fuckin' tree, now here she comes at full speed
She's racin' at me, okay, you wanna fuck with me, eh?
Snatch that bitch out her car through the window
She screamin', I body slam her on the cement
Until the concrete gave and created a sinkhole
Buried the stink ho in it, then paid to have the street repaved
(The fuck?) Woke up in a dream state
In a cold sweat like I got hit with a freeze ray during a heat wave
Guess I eventually caved though, 'cause she's layin' next to me in bed-directly aimin' a gat at my head!
Woke up again and jumped up
Like, ""Fuck it! I've had it, I'm checkin' into rehab""
I confess I'm a static addict, I guess that's why I'm so clingy
Every girl I've ever had either says I got too much baggage
Or I'm too fuckin' dramatic
Man, what the fuck is the matter? I'm just a fuckin' romantic
I fuckin' love you, you fuckin' bitch!
Combative, possessive, in fact last time I was mad at an ex
I actually set off a chain reaction of tragic events
I said, ""Hit the road"", then after she left
I sent that bitch a text that said, ""Be careful driving
Don't read this and have an accident""
She glanced to look at it and wrecked (*Car crashes*)
Too bad, thought we had a connect
No sense dwelling makes, never been a more compelling case
Than the model covered in L'Oréal and mace
Who fell from grace eleven stories for storytellin'
While the whore was yellin', ""Rape!""
'Til her vocal cords were swellin'
And her voice were more hoarser than Tori Spellings' face
Still they swarm the gates of my fancy estates
To greet Norman Bates with a warm embrace
'Less you're Andrea Yates, don't ask me for a date though
Don't be late, well, the sentiment's great
But wait, think there's been a mistake
You wanted an intimate date, I wanna intimidate
I have infinite hate in my blood
It's mainly 'cause of the game of- (*Message sound*)
Wait, ""dinner at eight""? I have infinite hate in my blood
It's mainly 'cause of the-

Game of love, love, love, love
La-La-La-La-La love",249719
33394,226427,Say Something,pop,A Great Big World,2013,1402289,"{""Christina Aguilera""}","
Say something, I'm giving up on you
I'll be the one if you want me to
Anywhere, I would've followed you
Say something, I'm giving up on you


And I... am feeling so small
It was over my head
I know nothing at all


And I will stumble and fall
I'm still learning to love
Just starting to crawl


Say something, I'm giving up on you
I'm sorry that I couldn't get to you
Anywhere, I would've followed you
Say something, I'm giving up on you

And I will swallow my pride
You're the one that I love
And I'm saying goodbye


Say something, I'm giving up on you
And I'm sorry that I couldn't get to you
And anywhere, I would've followed you, oh-oh
Say something, I'm giving up on you


Say something, I'm giving up on you
Say something...",255826
33400,226461,Stay Ready What a Life,rb,Jhen Aiko,2013,1051343,"{""Jhené Aiko"",""Kendrick Lamar""}","Part I: Stay Ready


We do not exist in
Any other instant
Here in this dimension
You and I are meant to be
I have waited lifetimes to find you
Now that you're here
I can remind you
Of the things you've been dreaming
Times two
I promise you
If you just give me 24
Man, all I need is 24 hours
I promise you'll want plenty more
You've probably been waiting forever
So how does it sound:
Us on the ground
Giving you my love?

There's no place quite like here
There's no better time than now
You gotta stay ready
There's no place quite like here
There's no better time than now
That's why I stay ready


Tell me find your spot with the warning that I might slip
And when you climb on top that's the ultimate road trip
Ride on me like your Pac got me thinkin' it's 96'
I can rap on some nineties shit, wrap your leggings around my hip
I'm so hip to it, tourists want to come speculate
But if I stay monogamous promise this kiss will always taste like candy
And, yeah, it's obvious momma now probably can't stand me
I'm sure they're tired of this look that you have when you're antsy
We gon' fuck around (Mmm), we gon' fuck around
And triple through triplets of babies right now
And that might break the record and no, that don't mean you're fertile
That means we're fucking reckless, plus we don't use protection
I find myself reading old text messages when I'm bored
We find ourselves sexting 'til that connection is restored
I know that sounds immature, but if we never grow up
Then I wish you good luck on the seats thats inside this Porsche

Come to me, come, come to me
Look at what you've done to me
You put a gun to me
Then you brought the sun to me


Shine like blood diamonds
Learning to have patience only cause you are timeless
The universe energy doesn't lie
And this chemistry is infinity at a million times
I wrote a million rhymes describing your star power
And after 24 bars, you get 24 hours


There's no place quite like here
There's no better time than now
You gotta stay ready
There's no place quite like here
There's no better time than now
That's why I stay ready


All that I know is right now
Nothing's for sure but, right now
Gotta get yours like, right now
All that I know is right now
Nothing's for sure but, right now
Gotta get yours like, right now
Part II: What a Life

All that I know is right now
Nothing's for sure but, right now
Gotta get yours like, right now


I been through some shit man
But I be on my shit man
I decided
That what you give
Is what you're given
So I been tryna do it right
I been doin' like
Whatever gets me through the night
What a life
I'm steady always on the go
You steady always on the go
We steady losing all control


What a life
What a life
What a life
What a life


They say
The truth ain't pretty
But coming from that pretty mouth
The truth is fitting
'Cause you ain't never talkin' loud
And you know plenty
Yeah, you know what I'm talkin' bout
'Cause you just get me
Yeah, you so pretty
If everything is dipped in gold
Then, baby, it will never grow
Everything sweet ain't sugar coated


What a life
What a life
What a life
What a life
What a life
What a life that I've been given
What a life
What a life that I've been living
What a life
What a life we die to live in
What a life",255867
33404,226480,The Worst,rb,Jhen Aiko,2013,2011802,"{""Jhené Aiko""}","
Tell me whatcha say now
Tell me whatcha say?
Come again?
If you cannot stay down
Then you do not have to pretend
Like there is no way out
I shoulda never let you in
'Cause you got me face down


And don't take this personal
But you're the worst
You know what you've done to me
And although it hurts, I know
I just can't keep runnin' away
(I can't keep runnin' away
I can't keep runnin' away
I can't keep runnin' away)


I don't need you, I don't need you
I don't need you, I don't need you
But I want you
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
But I love you

Tell me whatcha say now
Tell me whatcha say?
You said that you would come again
You said that we would remain friends but
You know that I do not depend on
Nothing or no one
So why would you show up?
So uninvited then
Just change my mind like that


Please don't take this personal
But you ain't shit
And you weren't special
'Til I made you so
You better act like you know
That I've been through worse than you
I just can't keep runnin' away
(I can't keep runnin' away
I can't keep runnin' away
I can't keep runnin' away)


(But I don't need you)
I don't need you, I don't need you
I don't need you, I don't need you
(But I) But I want you
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
But I love you (It's lost in hope, aye-aye)

Everybody's like ""He's no item""
""Please don't like him""
""He don't wife 'em""
""He one nights 'em""
I never listen, no
I should have figured though
All that shit you was spittin', so unoriginal
But it was you, so I was with it
Then tell you the truth, wish we never did it
'Cause I usually do stick to the business
But you came out the blue and then you just flipped it
(God damn) God damn, baby, my mind's blown
Be forgettin' you live in a different time zone
I think I know what this is
It's just the time's wrong
And, yeah, I know what you did
But, baby, I'm grown
And my love is patient
And kind of shit
If this is real we can build
Through different types of shit
If you was really the realest
Wouldn't be fightin' it
I think your pride is just

In the way
Funny how everything changed
Once you got all that you wanted
Nothing was ever the same


And though I don't need you, I don't need you
I don't need you, I don't need you
I still want you (Oh)
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
But I, but I love you
I don't need you, I don't need you
I don't need you, I don't need you
But I want you
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
I don't mean to, I don't mean to
But I love you",255886
33699,229755,Dernière Danse,pop,Indila,2013,1502408,{},"
Ô ma douce souffrance
Pourquoi s'acharner ? Tu r'commences
Je n'suis qu'un être sans importance
Sans lui, je suis un peu paro
Je déambule seule dans l'métro
Une dernière danse
Pour oublier ma peine immense
Je veux m'enfuir que tout r'commence
Ô ma douce souffrance


J'remue le ciel, le jour, la nuit
Je danse avec le vent, la pluie
Un peu d'amour, un brin de miel
Et je danse, danse, danse, danse, danse, danse, danse
Et dans le bruit, je cours et j'ai peur
Est-ce mon tour ? Revient la douleur
Dans tout Paris, je m'abandonne
Et je m'envole, vole, vole, vole, vole, vole, vole

Que d'espérance
Sur ce chemin en ton absence
J'ai beau trimer, sans toi ma vie n'est qu'un décor qui brille, vide de sens


J'remue le ciel, le jour, la nuit
Je danse avec le vent, la pluie
Un peu d'amour, un brin de miel
Et je danse, danse, danse, danse, danse, danse, danse
Et dans le bruit, je cours et j'ai peur
Est-ce mon tour ? Revient la douleur
Dans tout Paris, je m'abandonne
Et je m'envole, vole, vole, vole, vole, vole, vole


Dans cette douce souffrance
Dont j'ai payé toutes les offenses
Écoute comme mon cœur est immense
Je suis une enfant du monde


J'remue le ciel, le jour, la nuit
Je danse avec le vent, la pluie
Un peu d'amour, un brin de miel
Et je danse, danse, danse, danse, danse, danse, danse
Et dans le bruit, je cours et j'ai peur
Est-ce mon tour ? Revient la douleur
Dans tout Paris, je m'abandonne
Et je m'envole, vole, vole, vole, vole, vole, vole",266756
33800,230671,I. The Worst Guys,rap,Childish Gambino,2013,1001303,"{""Chance the Rapper""}","
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some
All she needed was some


At a Clippers game on the courtside (Side)
Watch a nigga shoot like a four-five (Five)
They mad at me too, I got more fire
Why these bitches see you? ""Go home, Roger""
(Go home, Roger)
Tia and Tamera in my bed, I'm a smart guy
I ain't fucking with you niggas like apartheid (Nah)
Hits on my list, check my archive
I'm something so immaculate, instead of asking what's happening
Rather blast a Jackson 5 in the back of an Acura
Acting blacker than a Bernie Mac, two Charlie Murphys, and Akon
The girls that you brought, man, where are they from?
Where are they from? We were playing PlayStation
Why you standing there? Say some'
Girl, say some', no, this ain't a vacation
This is my house, my house, all she needed was some

All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some


Bought a new bath, 8K, nigga
Wanna take shots? AK, nigga
When I ball, I'ma ball, King James, nigga
Uncle Ben in my hand, make change, nigga
And I'm out of this world like Tang, nigga
That's a space bar (Yeah), man, I hate y'all
You only come around when you wanna play pool or my hot tub
Ice cream paint job in the garage
I had a ménage, I murdered the vag'
But, afterwards, it was awkward as fuck
'Cause I'm nervous as fuck and could not get it up
I-I-I-I, I need a minute, cold water to the face
I-I, I couldn't finish, got the Uber from her place
On my porch smoking vapor, hit with the Sunday paper
Listening to the neighbors

All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)
All she needed was some (All she needed was some)


Oh gosh, oh my God (All she needed was some)
Oh my God (All she needed was some)
Know tonight, our neighbors (All she needed was some)
Are not alone, no, no, no, no, no, no, no
(All she needed was some)

",269013
34039,233076,If I Aint Got You,rb,Alicia Keys,2004,1097822,{},"
Some people live for the fortune
Some people live just for the fame
Some people live for the power, yeah
Some people live just to play the game


Some people think that the physical things
Define what's within
And I've been there before but that life's a bore
So full of the superficial


Some people want it all
But I don't want nothin' at all
If it ain't you, baby
If I ain't got you, baby
Some people want diamond rings
Some just want everything
But everything means nothing
If I ain't got you, yeah

Some people search for a fountain
That promises forever young (Ya know)
Some people need three dozen roses
And that's the only way to prove you love them


Hand me the world on a silver platter
And what good would it be?
With no one to share
With no one who truly cares for me


Some people want it all
But I don't want nothin' at all
If it ain't you, baby
If I ain't got you, baby
Some people want diamond rings
Some just want everything
But everything means nothin'
If I ain't got you, you, you
Some people want it all
But I don't want nothin' at all
If it ain't you, baby
If I ain't got you, baby
Some people want diamond rings
Some just want everything
But everything means nothin'
If I ain't got you, yeah

If I ain't got you with me, baby
Ooh, ooh
Said nothin' in this whole wide world don't mean a thing
If I ain't got you with me, baby",276051
34048,233438,IV. Sweatpants,rap,Childish Gambino,2013,3331799,{},"
Watching haters wonder why Gambino got the game locked (Yeah?)
Half-Thai thickie, all she wanna do is Bangkok (Yeah?)
Got her hair done, French braids, now she A$AP
Bino so insensitive, she askin', ""Why you say that?""
I'm chillin' (Yeah), real nigga feelin'
Rich kid asshole, paint me as a villain (Ma!)
Still spitting that cash flow, DJ Khaled
I got a penthouse on both coasts, pH balance
Real nigga, I rep those
Why though? 'Cause I said so
Hip deep in that Pepto, I got five on her like Ben Folds
I got more tail than that PetCo (What?)
You faker than some Sweet'N Low (Why?)
Yeah, you got some silverware
But really, are you eating though? (Yeah)
Are you eating though? Nigga, are you eating though?
Breakfast, lunch, and dinner's for beginners, you ain't even know
Never catching cases, why they faces look so E-M-O?
Watch a hater hate me, wanna play me like a piano
My architect know Japanese (Yeah?)
Your girl, she jockin' these (Yeah?)
No hands like soccer teams and y'all fuck boys like Socrates
You niggas ain't coppin' these, niggas ain't lookin' like me (Nah)
Nah, I ain't checkin' I.D. (Nah), but I bounce 'em with no problem
Tell 'em, Problem (Problem!)

I'm winnin', yeah, yeah, I'm winnin' (What?)
I'm winnin', yeah, yeah, I'm winnin' (What?)
I'm winnin', yeah, yeah, I'm winnin' (What?)
Rich kid, asshole, paint me as a villain


What?
Don't be mad 'cause I'm doing me better than you doing you
Don't be mad 'cause I'm doing me better than you doing you
Don't be mad 'cause I'm doing me better than you doing you
Better than you doing you
Fuck it, what you gon' do? (What?!)


Different color, my passport
Instagram my stack load
Hashtag my daywear, and your girl drank my daycare
And I'm born rich, life ain't fair, it's silver spoon coon, ho
Ain't nobody sicker in my Fisker, ""vroom-vroom,"" ho
Ain't nobody-
(Fiskers don't make noise when they start up, just so you know)
Top of the holy totem
Ri-ri-ri-rich forever, a million was not the quota
My father owned half the MoMA and did it with no diploma
Year off, got no rules, trippin' off of them toadstools
More green than my Whole Foods
And I'm too fly, Jeff Goldblum
Got a glasshouse in the Palisades, that A-K-A
White hood, white hood, O-K-K-K
Furniture custom, you shop at IKEA
Show Maserati, you whippin' a Kia
Spendin' this money, it's longer than Nia
Live like a Coppola, me and Sofia
Wakin' up broke, man, wouldn't wanna be ya
Friends with the dopeman, help a nigga re-up
Bring a girlfriend, man, trouble when I see her
""Err-eh-err-eh,"" onomatopoeia
Ohh, I got my cool on (Tailor-made)
I'm winnin', so they had to dump the Gatorade
And I don't give a fuck about my family name

What?
Don't be mad 'cause I'm doing me better than you doing you
Don't be mad 'cause I'm doing me better than you doing you
Don't be mad 'cause I'm doing me better than you doing you
Better than you doing you
Fuck it, what you gon' do? (What?!)",276502
34589,238699,Rather Be,pop,Clean Bandit,2013,1286483,"{""Jess Glynne""}","
Ooh, oh-oh


We're a thousand miles from comfort
We have travelled land and sea
But as long as you are with me
There's no place I'd rather be
I would wait forever
Exalted in the scene
As long as I am with you
My heart continues to beat


With every step we take, Kyoto to The Bay
Strollin' so casually
We're different and the same, gave you another name
Switch up the batteries


If you gave me a chance, I would take it
It's a shot in the dark, but I'll make it
Know with all of your heart, you can't shame me
When I am with you, there's no place I'd rather be

N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be (Oh)


We staked out on a mission
To find our inner peace
Make it everlasting
So nothing's incomplete
It's easy being with you
Sacred simplicity
As long as we're together
There's no place I'd rather be


With every step we take, Kyoto to The Bay
Strollin' so casually
We're different and the same, gave you another name
Switch up the batteries


If you gave me a chance, I would take it
It's a shot in the dark, but I'll make it
Know with all of your heart, you can't shame me
When I am with you, there's no place I'd rather be

N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
When I am with you, there's no place I'd rather be, yeah


Be (Oh)
Be, be, be, be, be, be, be, be, be
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


If you gave me a chance, I would take it
It's a shot in the dark, but I'll make it
Know with all of your heart, you can't shame me
When I am with you, there's no place I'd rather be


N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
N-n-no, no, no, no place I'd rather be
When I am with you, there's no place I'd rather be, yeah",292916
34641,239033,Dreams,rock,Fleetwood Mac,1977,1099764,{},"


Now here you go again, you say you want your freedom
Well, who am I to keep you down?
It's only right that you should play the way you feel it
But listen carefully to the sound of your loneliness


Like a heartbeat drives you mad
In the stillness of remembering what you had
And what you lost
And what you had
And what you lost


Oh, thunder only happens when it's raining
Players only love you when they're playing
Say, women, they will come and they will go
When the rain washes you clean, you'll know
You'll know



Now here I go again, I see the crystal visions
I keep my visions to myself
It's only me who wants to wrap around your dreams
And have you any dreams you'd like to sell?
Dreams of loneliness


Like a heartbeat drives you mad
In the stillness of remembering what you had
And what you lost
And what you had
Oh, what you lost


Thunder only happens when it's raining
Players only love you when they're playing
Women, they will come and they will go
When the rain washes you clean, you'll know


Oh, thunder only happens when it's raining
Players only love you when they're playing
Say, women, they will come and they will go
When the rain washes you clean, you'll know

You'll know
You will know
Oh, you'll know",294002
34764,240794,Mine,pop,Beyonc,2013,1923612,"{Drake,Beyoncé}","
I've been watching for the signs
Took a trip to clear my mind, oh
Now I'm even more lost
And you're still so fine, oh my, oh my
Been having conversations about breakups and separations
I'm not feeling like myself since the baby
Are we gonna even make it? Oh
'Cause if we are, we're taking this a little too far
If we are, we're taking this a little too far
Baby, if we are, we're taking this a little too far
With me being wherever I'm at, worried about wherever you are
We're taking this a little too far
We're taking this a little too far
We're taking this a little too far


Know you wanna roll with a good girl
Do it big, do it all for a good girl
One time, this is a song for the good girl
Don't sleep when you know you got it good, girl
One time, this is a song for the good girl
Wanna roll, wanna roll with a good girl?
One time, this is a song for the good girl
And I still keep it hood, still treat you like I should
Wassup?

On my mind, up past my bedtime, no rest at the kingdom
Alone in my place, my heart is away, all that I can think of is
We should get married, we should get married
Let's stop holding back on this and let's get carried away


Stop making a big deal out of the little things
'Cause I got big deals and I got little things
Got everything I'm asking for but you
Stop making a big deal out of the little things
Let's get carried away
Come right now, you know where I stay


I just wanna say, you're mine, you're mine
I just wanna say, you're mine, you're mine
Fuck what you heard, you're mine, you're mine
All I'm really asking for is you
You're mine, you're mine
I just wanna say, you're mine, you're mine
Fuck what you heard, you're mine, you're mine
As long as you know who you belong to


Know you wanna roll with a good girl
Do it big, do it all for a good girl
One time, this is a song for the good girl
Don't sleep when you know you got it good, girl
One time, this is a song for the good girl
Wanna roll, wanna roll with a good girl?
One time, this is a song for the good girl
And I still keep it hood, still treat you like I should
Wassup?

From eight until late, I think 'bout you
You own my nights, I don't know what to do, do
I can't get no rest, can't get no sleep, yeah
This whole thing got way too deep and we should


Stop making a big deal out of the little things
'Cause I got big deals and I got little things
I got everything I'm asking for but you
Stop making a big deal out of the little things
Let's get carried away
Come right now, you know where I stay


I just wanna say, you're mine, you're mine
I just wanna say, you're mine, you're mine
Fuck what you heard, you're mine, you're mine
All I'm really asking for is you
You're mine, you're mine
I just wanna say, you're mine, you're mine
Fuck what you heard, you're mine, you're mine
As long as you know who you belong to


Know you wanna roll with a good girl
Do it big, do it all for a good girl
One time, this is a song for the good girl
Don't sleep when you know you got it good, girl
One time, this is a song for the good girl
Wanna roll, wanna roll with a good girl?
One time, this is a song for the good girl
And I still keep it hood, still treat you like I should
Wassup?

(Pull up on you) I gotta pull up on you
You gon' make me have to pull up on you
Don't go ghost on me, I'ma go Thriller on you, I'ma just (Pull up on you)
I'ma let my hands do the talking when I see you, baby girl
I miss feeling on you, (Pull up on you) I miss everything that's real about you
And that's everything about you that's just how I feel about you (Pull up on you)
Been about you and I'm still about you but
We ain't finished talking (Pull up on you)
I told you you don't need to worry 'bout them bitches
All them fives need to listen when the ten is talking (Pull up on you)
'Cause they don't wanna see you happier than them
And girl, you swear they all ya friends and that's been a problem (Pull up on you)
You the one they hate, just come with that
I know you think it's funny that your ex is not a running back
But that nigga came running back
(Pull up on you) And you tell me you done with that
And I believe it's true
'Long as you know who you belong to


All I'm really asking for is you
Yeah",299098
34768,240805,Drunk in Love,rb,Beyonc,2013,8340422,"{JAY-Z,Beyoncé}","
I've been drinkin', I've been drinkin'
I get filthy when that liquor get into me
I've been thinkin', I've been thinkin'
Why can't I keep my fingers off it?
Baby, I want you, now-now
Why can't I keep my fingers off you?
Baby, I want you, na na
Cigars on ice, cigars on ice
Feelin' like an animal with these cameras all in my grill
Flashin' lights, flashin' lights
You got me faded, faded, faded
Baby, I want you, na na
Can't keep your eyes off my fatty
Daddy, I want you, na na
Drunk in love, I want you


We woke up in the kitchen
Saying, ""How the hell did this shit happen?""
Oh, baby
Drunk in love
We be all night
Last thing I remember is our beautiful bodies
Grindin' up in that club
Drunk in love

We be all night, love, love
We be all night, love, love


We be all night, and everything all right
No complaints from my body
So fluorescent under these lights
Boy, I'm drinkin', park it in my lot, 7-11
I'm rubbin' on it, rub-rubbin'
If you scared, call that reverend
Boy, I'm drinkin', get my brain right
Armand de Brignac, gangster wife
Louis sheets, he sweat it out
Like washrags, he wet it up
Boy, I'm drinkin', I'm singin'
On the mic to my boy toys
Then I fill the tub up halfway
Then ride it with my surfboard
Surfboard, surfboard
Grainin' on that wood
Grainin'-grainin' on that wood
I'm swervin' on that, swervin'-swervin' on that
Big body been servin' all this
Swerve, surfin' all in this good-good
Hahaha!

We woke up in the kitchen
Saying, ""How the hell did this shit happen?""
Oh, baby
Drunk in love
We be all night
Last thing I remember is our beautiful bodies
Grindin' up in that club
Drunk in love


We be all night, love, love
We be all night, love, love
I'm nice right now... Hold up!


That D'USSÉ is the shit, if I do say so myself
If I do say so myself, if I do say so myself
Hold up, stumble all in the house
Time to back up all of that mouth
That you had all in the car
Talkin' 'bout you the baddest bitch thus far
Talkin' 'bout you be reppin' that Third
I wanna see all that shit that I heard
Know I sling Clint Eastwood
Hope you can handle this curve, uh
Foreplay in a foyer, fucked up my Warhol
Slid the panties right to the side
Ain't got the time to take drawers off
On sight, catch a charge I might
Beat the box up, like Mike in '97, I bite
I'm Ike Turner, turn up, baby, no, I don't play
""Now eat the cake, Anna Mae!""
Said, ""Eat the cake, Anna Mae!""
I'm nice, for y'all to reach these heights
You gon' need G3, 4, 5, 6 flights
Sleep tight, we sex again in the morning
Your breasteses is my breakfast
We goin' in, we be all night

We be all night, love, love
We be all night, love, love


I'm never tired, never tired
I been sippin', that's the only thing
That's keepin' me on fire, we on fire
Didn't mean to spill that liquor all on my attire
I've been drinkin', watermelon
I want your body right here
Daddy, I want you, right now
Can't keep your eyes off my fatty
Daddy, I want you


We be all night, love, love
We be all night, love, love

",299177
34774,240815,Partition,pop,Beyonc,2013,3151316,{Beyoncé},"


Let me hear you say, ""Hey, Ms. Carter!"" (Hey, Ms. Carter!)
Say, ""Hey, Ms. Carter!"" (Hey, Ms. Carter!)
Give me some!


See me up in the club with fifty-'leven girls
Posted in the back, diamond fangs in my grill
Brooklyn brim with my eyes sitting low
Every boy in here with me got that smoke
Every girl in here got to look me up and down
All on Instagram, cake by the pound
Circulate the image every time I come around
G's up, tell me how I'm looking, babe


Boy, this all for you, just walk my way
Just tell me how it's looking, babe
Just tell me how it's looking, babe
(How it's looking, babe?)
I do this all for you, baby, just take aim
And tell me how it's looking, babe
(How it's looking, babe?)
Tell me how it's looking, babe, looking, babe

Drop the bass, mane, the bass get lower
Radio say ""Speed it up"", I just go slower
High like treble, pumping on the mids
Ya man ain't ever seen a booty like this
And why you think ya keep my name rolling off the tongue
'Cause when he wanna smash, I'll just write another one
I sneezed on the beat and the beat got sicker
Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor


Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor
Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor
Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor
Like, like liquor, like, like, like liquor
Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor
Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor
Yoncé all on his mouth like liquor
Like, like liquor, like, like, like liquor


Beyoncé, Beyoncé?
Are you happy to be in Paris? Are you happy to be in Paris?
Beyoncé, Beyoncé? Beyoncé!



Driver, roll up the partition, please


Driver, roll up the partition, please
I don't need you seeing 'Yoncé on her knees
Took forty-five minutes to get all dressed up
We ain't even gonna make it to this club
Now my mascara running, red lipstick smudged
Oh, he so horny, yeah, he want to fuck
He popped all my buttons, and he ripped my blouse
He Monica Lewinsky'd all on my gown


Oh there, daddy, daddy didn't bring the towel
Oh, baby, baby, we better slow it down
Took 45 minutes to get all dressed up
And we ain't even gon' make it to this club


Take all of me, I just wanna be the girl you like
The kind of girl you like
Take all of me, I just wanna be the girl you like
The kind of girl you like is right here with me


Driver, roll up the partition fast (Hey)

Driver, roll up the partition fast
Over there, I swear I saw them cameras flash
Handprints and footprints on my glass
Handprints and good grips all on my ass
Private show with the music blasting
He like to call me Peaches when we get this nasty
Red wine drip, we'll talk that trash
Chauffeur eavesdropping, trying not to crash


Oh there, daddy, daddy didn't bring the towel
Oh, baby, baby, we better slow it down
Took 45 minutes to get all dressed up
We ain't even gonna make it to this club


Take all of me, I just wanna be the girl you like
The kind of girl you like
Take all of me, I just wanna be the girl you like
The kind of girl you like is right here with me (Hello!)


Est-ce que tu aimes le sexe?
Le sexe, je veux dire: l'activité physique, le coït. Tu aimes ça?
Tu ne t'intéresses pas au sexe?
Les hommes pensent que les féministes détestent le sexe mais c'est une activité très stimulante et naturelle que les femmes adorent


Take all of me, I just wanna be the girl you like
The kind of girl you like
Take all of me, I just wanna be the girl you like
The kind of girl you like is right here with me (Hello!)


Bzz-bzz-bzz-bzz-bzz-bzzwop",299325
34779,240821,Flawless,pop,Beyonc,2013,1140040,"{Beyoncé,""Chimamanda Ngozi Adichie""}","
""Your challengers are a young group from Houston
Welcome Beyoncé, Lativia, Nina, Nicky, Kelly and Ashley
The hip-hop-rappin' Girls' TYME!""




I'm out that H-Town, comin'- comin' down
I'm comin' down, drippin' candy on the ground
H-H-Town-Town, I'm comin' down
Comin' down, drippin' candy on the ground


I know when you were little girls
You dreamt of being in my world
Don't forget it, don't forget it
Respect that, bow down, bitches (Crown)
I took some time to live my life
But don't think I'm just his little wife
Don't get it twisted, get it twisted
This my shit, bow down, bitches

Bow down, bitches- Bow- Bow down, bitches (Crown)
Bow down, bitches- Bow- Bow down, bitches (Crown)
H-Town vicious, H-H-Town vicious
I'm so crown- crown- bow down, bitches!


I'm out that H-Town, comin'- comin' down
I'm comin' down, drippin' candy on the ground
H-H-Town-Town, I'm comin' down
Com-Com-Comin' down, drippin' candy on the ground




We teach girls to shrink themselves, to make themselves smaller
We say to girls: ""You can have ambition, but not too much
You should aim to be successful, but not too successful
Otherwise, you will threaten the man""
Because I am female, I am expected to aspire to marriage
I am expected to make my life choices always keeping in mind that marriage is the most important (C-Candy on the ground)
Now, marriage can be a source of joy and love and mutual support (Dum-dah-de-da)
But why do we teach girls to aspire to marriage and we don't teach boys the same? (Do-da-da, do-do, do-do-do-da)
We raise girls to see each other as competitors
Not for jobs or for accomplishments, which I think can be a good thing (Com-Com-Comin' down, drippin' candy on the ground)
But for the attention of men
We teach girls that they cannot be sexual beings in the way that boys are (Dum-dah-de-da)
Feminist: A person who believes in the social, political, and economic equality of the sexes (Do-da-da, do-do, do-do-do-da)

You wake up, flawless, post up, flawless
Riding 'round in it, flawless, flossin' on that, flawless
This diamond, flawless, my diamond, flawless
This rock, flawless, my Roc, flawless
I woke up like this, I woke up like this
We flawless, ladies, tell 'em
I woke up like this, I woke up like this
We flawless, ladies, tell 'em
Say, ""I look so good tonight"" (Right- Right- Right-)
Goddamn, Goddamn
Say, ""I look so good tonight"" (Right- Right- Right-)
Goddamn, Goddamn, Goddamn!


My mama taught me good home training
My daddy taught me how to love my haters
My sister told me I should speak my mind
My man make me feel so Goddamn fine, I'm flawless!


You wake up, flawless, post up, flawless
Riding 'round in it, flawless, flossin' on that, flawless
This diamond, flawless, my diamond, flawless
This rock, flawless, my Roc, flawless
I woke up like this, I woke up like this
We flawless, ladies, tell 'em
I woke up like this, I woke up like this
We flawless, ladies, tell 'em
Say, ""I look so good tonight"" (Right- Right- Right-)
Goddamn, Goddamn
Say, ""I look so good tonight"" (Right- Right- Right-)
Goddamn, Goddamn, Goddamn!

""The judges give champion Skeleton Crew 4 stars, a perfect score
The challenger, Girls' TYME, receives... 3 stars
Skeleton Crew, champions once again
Congratulations, we'll see you next week""",299370
35324,245366,Best Tweets,misc,Jaden,2013,1448055,{},"07/17/2012 - I Watch Twilight Every Night

10/29/2012 - I Will Always Give You The Truth I Will Never Lie To You In My music If You Cant Handle My Feelings And Emotions Please Unfollow Me

12/14/2012 - Once You Go In You Always Come Out Alive

12/16/2012 - I Only Apply To The Sixth Amendment

12/21/2012 - Dying Is MainStream #MONEY

12/29/2012 - Ill Never Forget The Blogs That Believed In Me Since The Begging.

01/01/2013 - People Tell Me To Smile I Tell Them The Lack Of Emotion In My Face Doesn't Mean I'm Unhappy

3/10/2013 - Luke. Who Has The Trident

3/10/2013 - Umm Who Has The Floss

03/23/2013 - Most Trees Are Blue

03/24/2013 - You Must Not Know Fashion
04/01/2013 - I Hope It Doesn't Take For Me To Die For You To See What I Do For You

05/01/2013 - How Can Mirrors Be Real If Our Eyes Aren't Real

05/25/2013 - Lately People Call Me Scoop Life

07/09/2013 - ""It's Your Birthday"" Mateo Said. I Didn't Respond. ""Are You Not Excited To Be 15"" He Asked. Reading My Book I Uttered ""I Turned 15 Long Ago""

08/07/2013 - If A Book Store Never Runs Out Of A Certain Book, Dose That Mean That Nobody Reads It, Or Everybody Reads It

09/05/2013 - People Use To Ask Me What Do You Wanna Be When You Get Older And I Would Say What A Stupid Question The Real Question Is What Am I Right Now

09/09/2013 - All The Rules In This World Were Made By Someone No Smarter Than You. So Make Your Own

09/12/2013 - If Newborn Babies Could Speak They Would Be The Most Intelligent Beings On Planet Earth

09/12/2013 - School Is The Tool To Brainwash The Youth

09/13/2013 - If Everybody In The World Dropped Out Of School We Would Have A Much More Intelligent Society

09/29/2013 - The Great Gatsby Is One Of The Greatest Movies Of All Time, Coachella.

09/19/2013 - Trees Are Never Sad Look At Them Every Once In Awhile They're Quite Beautiful

09/29/2013 - Why Is It Always 3 WHY IS IT ALWAYS 3!!!!!
10/02/2013 - When I Die. Then You Will Realize

10/04/2013 - I Should Just Stop Tweeting, The Human Consciousness Must Raise Before I Speak My Juvenile Philosophy. / Shouts Out To @TIME

10/10/2013 - We Need To Stop Teaching The Youth About The Past And Encourage Them To Change The Future

10/10/2013 - There Is No Nutrients In Our Food Anymore Or In Our Soil OR IN OUR WATER

10/10/2013 - You Would Have To Eat 5 Apples Today To Get The Same Nutritional Value As An Apple From 1950. #Fallow

10/12/2013 - I Encourage You All To Unfollow Me So I Can Be Left With The People Who Actually Appreciate Philosophy And Poetry. / #CoolTapeVol2

01/30/2014 To The Artist Of This Coming Generation And Of The Renaissance. The People That Truly Understand Your Art are The People Who Don't Comment

03/03/2014 - You Think You Get It. YOU DONT YOU DONT YOU DONT!!!!!!!

03/03/2014 - Water In The Eyes And Alcohol In The Eyes Are Pretty Much The Same I Know This From First Hand Experience.

03/05/2014 - People Think A RelationShip Makes You Whole, That It's Two 50%'s Coming Together To Make 100% When It Should Be Two 100%'s Making 200%•••

04/02/2014 - Green White And Blue Make Dreams Come True.

04/23/2014 - Unawareness Is The Only Sin, And If You Were Aware You Would Know.

04/30/2014 - I Scare People Away
04/30/2014 Either I Lie To You Or We Cry Together

05/01/2014 When You Live Your Whole Life In A Prison Freedom Can Be So Dull.

05/10/2014 You Can Discover Everything You Need To Know About Everything By Looking At Your Hands

08/12/14 When The First Animal Went Extinct That Should've Bin A Sign.

9/19/14 I Build Pyramids Constantly

10/7/14 Stop Gossiping Reflect Internally You Will Find Yourself A Neglected Part Of Your Self.

10/22/14 If I Die In My Flannel Will You Write My Poems On Tyler's 5 Panels And Jesusus Sandals This Plane Is Just To Much To Handle.

11/2/14 Every 7 Years Your Body Is Completely Replaced With Entirely New Cells So Just Because You Look The Same Doesn't Mean You Are.

11/2/14 I've Bin Drinking Distilled Water For So Long That When I Drink Normal Water It Feels Like I'm Swallowing Huge Chunks Of Aluminum.

11/2/14 Anyone Born On This Planet Should Have A Planetary Citizenship Enabling Them To Freely Explore There Home

11/3/14 I Don't Want You Guys To Think Because I Was Born In America That I Speak And Abide By English Grammar. I Speak Jaden, Indefinitely.

11/9/14 You Taught Me How To Play The Piano But Have Never Heard Me.

12/12/14 I'm Glad That Our Distance Makes Us Witness Ourselves From A Different Entrance.

12/13/14 I Just Like Showing Pretty Girls A Good Time Weather I'm Physically There Or Not Doesn't  Matter.

12/16/14 Don't Worry Bae I'll Talk To You About SpaceTime Over FaceTime.

12/22/14 I Just Scrolled Through My Tweets And ""I"" Started Laughing.

12/23/14 The Head Of The Sphinx Will Fall Off In The Near Future.

06/11/17 Females Are Amazing.",314893
35450,246581,Top 100 Rap Songs of 2013,misc,Rap Genius,2013,1318026,{},"100. Migos ft. Drake ""Versace""In June, Drake randomly released 4 songs at one time: his and J. Cole's ""Jodeci Freestyle"", PARTYNEXTDOOR's ""Over Here"", ""The Motion"" with Sampha, and this banger by Atlanta rap trio Migos. This was the song that put Migos on the map, allowing them to have excellent promotion for their Y.R.N. mixtape. The track is one of Rap Genius' 30 most viewed songs, coming in with 1.8 million views.99. BIG KRIT ""REM""98. Lupe Fiasco ""Peace of paper/Cup of JAYZUS""97. Joey Badass ""#Longlivesteelo""96. Meek Mill ""Lil Nigga Snupe""95. Logic ""Nasty""Produced by DJ Don Cannon, this wordplay-heavy track puts Logic on display for all to see. None can ignore Def Jam's latest signee; the double entendres are abundant and the flow hits code red. Serving as his first single of the year proved to be a successful venture, gaining tens of thousands of views on Rap Genius and creating a platform for his Young Sinatra: Welcome To Forever mixtape.94. Isaiah Rashad ft. SZA ""Ronnie Drake"" 93. Kid Cudi ft. King Chip & ASAP Rocky ""Brothers""92. Lupe Fiasco ""Animal Pharm""91. French Montana ""Ain't Worried About Nothin'""90. Mellow High ft. Domo Genesis ""Yu"" Domo Genesis constructs a catchy hook to bounce over Left Brain's keyboard heavy production. The Odd Future duo of Domo and Hodgy Beats lay down dope bars with their usual uncensored subject matter of drugs, bitches and wolves!89. Mike WiLL Made It  ft. Miley Cyrus, Wiz Khalifa, & Juicy J ""23""88. Action Bronson ""Strictly For My Jeeps""87. Rapsody ft. Chance the Rapper ""Lonely Thoughts""86. Ab Soul ft. Mac Miller ""The End Is Near""85. DJ Khaled ft. Drake, Rick Ross, & Lil Wayne ""No New Friends""""No New Friends"" was the first single off DJ Khaled's Suffering From Success album. Produced by Noah ""40"" Shebib, the track features the usual suspects: Drake, Rick Ross, and Lil Wayne. A behind-the-scenes photo from this song's video shoot led to the ultra-famous 'Drake Lean' meme, one of the biggest memes of 2013! With an enthralling beat and a memorable hook, ""No New Friends"" was one of the most anthemic tracks of the year.84. Danny Brown ft. A$AP Rocky ""Kush Coma""83. Rick Ross ft. Future ""No Games""82. Flatbush Zombies ""MRAZ""81. Wale ft. Sam Dew ""Love/Hate Thing""80. Vic Mensa ""Lovely Day""""Lovely Day"" is just one of those songs that makes you want to get up and dance, because it's so upbeat and fun! Vic lays down some dope bars, with metaphors that carry across multiple lines, a reference to Lupe's ""Daydreamin'"", and a shoutout to his best friend, what's not to love about this track?79. Meek Mill ""Levels""78. Run The Jewels ""A Christmas Fucking Miracle""77. Lil Wayne ft. Drake & Future ""Love Me""76. Danny Brown ft. Freddie Gibbs ""The Return""75. 2 Chainz ""Used 2""This rare 2 Chainz solo joint has banging drums, an infectious hook, and a great club vibe. Produced by Mannie Fresh, the cut from B.O.A.T.S ll #METIME sees Tity Boi travel from Cali to New Orleans in the space of 2 bars, party the night away, and encourage more twerking. What isn't there to like?74. Lil Wayne ft. 2 Chainz ""Rich As Fuck""73. Vic Mensa ft. Ab-Soul ""Holy, Holy""72. Tech N9ne ft. Serj Tankian ""Straight Out The Gate""71. ASAP Nast ft. Method Man ""Trillmatic""70. Kid Cudi ""Immortal""In an extremely personal ""Immortal"", Cudi details his inner struggles. Arguably the best song from Indicud, this track saw Cudi handle all duties, production included. The drums hit hard, the harmonizing is uplifting and the strings melt your ears. Even an Adam Sandler sample made its way into the joint!69. Tyler, the Creator ""48""68. Lil Wayne ft. Chance The Rapper ""You Song""67. Jhene Aiko ft. Childish Gambino ""Bed Peace""66. TI ft. B.o.B & Kendrick Lamar ""Memories Back Then""65. Mac Miller ft. Schoolboy Q ""Gees""This playful track is about nothing at all, so who better to kill it than Q and Mac? Mac lays down a characteristically hilarious hook and switches flows and voices as the bouncy beat from Chuck Inglish changes up. Q does his high-energy Q thing and blesses us with a nice ""FIGG SIDEEEEEEEE"" to wrap it all up.64. Lil B ""I Love You""63. Danny Brown ft. Purity Ring ""25 Bucks""62. Schoolboy Q ""Yay Yay""61. Wale ft. Tiara Thomas ""Bad""60. Lupe Fiasco ""SLR 2""The fan requested ""Control"" response brought out Super Lupe for the second time and he was none too happy with the game. He called out multiple rappers while seamlessly changing flows and displaying classic Lupe lyricism. Oh yeah, and he made the song in just two hours!59. Mac Miller ""Objects In The Mirror""58. Earl Sweatshirt ft. Tyler, the Creator ""Whoa""57. Childish Gambino ft. Chance the Rapper ""Worst Guys""56. 2 Chainz ft. Pharrell ""Feds Watching""55. Rich Homie Quan ""Type Of Way""One hit wonder or talented hit maker? That's the question posed by Rich Homie Quan with his street anthem ""Type of Way"". The song propelled the relatively unknown Atlanta native into the spotlight and a top 50 spot on Billboards Hot 100 after it was caught up by the streets and shared around the Internet - even Michigan State's college football team is using it as their team anthem!54. Vic Mensa ""Orange Soda""53. Ace Hood ""Bugatti"" ft. Future & Rick Ross52. Run The Jewels ""Banana Clipper""51. YG ""My Nigga""50. Joey Bada$$ ""Unorthodox""Joey & Primo take it back to the golden age on this boom bap-esque joint. The minimalist production fits Joey's flow perfectly and enables his complex delivery and dope bars to shine. Functioning as the first single from ""Summer Knights"", Joey drops some surprises; explaining his reasoning behind not signing a major record deal and that he does verses for free!49. Rocko ""U.O.E.N.O (Black Hippy Remix)"" ft. Ab Soul, Jay Rock, Kendrick Lamar & Schoolboy Q48. Tyler, the Creator ""Answer""47. Joey Badass ""'95 'Till Infinity""46. Hopsin ""Hop Is Back""45. Isaiah Rashad ""Shot U Down (Remix)"" ft. Jay Rock & Schoolboy Q""TDE newcomer Isaiah Rashad's best offering of 2013 came with this infectious hook laden remix of his original ""I Shot U Down"". Featuring fellow TDE spitters Jay Rock & Schoolboy Q, the hard drums and longer verses propel the track to new heights. If it's anything to go by, we could be looking at a future addition to the Black Hippy quartet.44. Childish Gambino ""Sweatpants""43. Tech N9ne ""Fragile"" ft. Kendrick Lamar, Kendall Morgan & ¡MAYDAY! 42. Mac Miller ""Red Dot Music"" ft. Action Bronson41. Jay Z ""Oceans"" ft. Frank Ocean40. J Cole ""Forbidden Fruit"" ft. Kendrick LamarAnother collaboration between good friends J. Cole and Kendrick Lamar led to one of the top singles off of Cole's album ""Born Sinner"". While Kendrick does not deliver a verse on it, the hook he gives us still is soothing and paints the religious theme throughout the song. Cole delivers two solid verses, talking about religion, his inner struggle, and even saying why he dropped his album the same day as Kanye West. One more from Lil Cole!39. Pusha T ""Hold On"" ft. Rick Ross38. Schoolboy Q ""Man Of The Year""37. Earl Sweatshirt ""Sunday"" ft. Frank Ocean36. Jay Z ""FuckwithmeyouknowIgotit"" ft. Rick Ross35. Tyler, the Creator ""IFHY"" ft. Pharrell WilliamsThis is truly Tyler at his finest. From his beat to his bars, this track showcases Tyler's supreme artistic talent. Oh, and there's THAT VIDEO! The talk-rap, slow flow is personal and poetic. He combines crooning with curses effortlessly and elevates the track in doing so. The beat builds like a film. He even directed his idol Pharrell's angelic voice on the bridge, with a melody Tyler created himself. Sonically this track was standout, and then he made that video and this became undeniably next-level. 34. Jay Z ""Tom Ford""33. J Cole ""Crooked Smile"" ft. TLC32. Kendrick Lamar ""Bitch Don't Kill My Vibe Remix"" ft. Jay Z31. Chance The Rapper ""Acid Rain"" 30. Childish Gambino ""Telegraph Ave (Oakland)""Perhaps the universal favorite from the album, this is a dark, entrancing look at the compulsive and haunting power of our past loves/infatuations. Like The Boy driving down Telegraph Ave, we can spend our time retreading the same roads thinking about ""what ifs"" and reminiscing about things lost - sometimes alongside the people with whom we lost them. But unless we decide to do something about all those lost things - whether to try again, or to walk away for good - all that wandering isn't going to do us any good. Using Lloyd's ""Oakland"" literally in the song, Gambino cleverly plays both rapper and listener creating and experiencing the track with us.29. Tyler, the Creator ""Rusty"" ft. Domo Genesis & Earl Sweatshirt28. Chance The Rapper ""Favorite Song"" ft. Childish Gambino27. A$AP Ferg ""Work (Remix)"" ft. A$AP Rocky, French Montana, SchoolBoy Q & Trinidad James26. Pusha T ""King Push"" 25. Chance The Rapper ""Juice""The first single off Acid Rap, Juice was one of the big breakthroughs this year for Chance. The first thing that catches your ears is Chance's sing-songy, cartoony flow which you can't help singing along to (some jumping around is mandatory). But listen closely, and you get Chancelor's dope bars: dense, great-sounding internal rhymes and clever Chicago references. As you're headbanging through the verse though, you're hit with that absolutely HYPE chorus that is guaranteed to make you lose your shit. What you're left with is one of the catchiest, most memorable songs of 2013 and a high point in the spectacular year Chance has had.24. Drake ""Hold On We're Going Home"" ft. Majid Jordan23. A$AP Ferg ""Shabba"" ft. A$AP Rocky22. J Cole ""Let Nas Down""21. Eminem ""Berzerk""20. Drake ""Worst Behavior""This Nothing Was The Same stand-out combines Drizzy's loud, arrogant hook with even more flexin' in his verses. DJ Dahi delivers with gritty, bass-heavy production deceptively containing no sample. Like many tracks on NWTS, Drake's flow and the beat changes up across the song -- he even confidently borrows flow and bars from Ma$e's ""Mo Money Mo Problems"" anthem. The music video stars his actual dad and uncles and contains his worst skit to date. Even with lyrics that playfully reference his famous Hot 97 freestyle blunder and remind us of his Degrassi roots, Drake manages to make one of the hardest bangers of 2013. Just accept that you'll never get the timing right for that initial "".......WORST!""19. Earl Sweatshirt ""Hive"" ft. Vince Staples & Casey VeggiesThe leaps and bounds of growth that Earl Sweatshirt has experienced over the last several years can really be heard on Doris' standout track, ""Hive."" Fueled by a bassline that gives the song that dark, Odd Future feel, Earl spits much more mature bars using his now polished signature flow. With the addition of a great hook from young Casey Veggies, the song was already fantastic. But then Vince Staples busts in with a ski mask and absolutely kills it. Did Vince renegade Earl? That's up for debate, but you can't deny that Shyne, and everyone else on the song, absolutely did their thing.18. Eminem ""Love Game"" ft. Kendrick LamarWhen the MMLP2 tracklist was revealed, Love Game was one of the most heavily-anticipated tracks; everyone was envisioning a Renegade-level back-and-forth between Em and Kendrick. But the song turned out to be as left-field as possible. Backed by a quirky Rick Rubin-produced instrumental that could've come straight from the '50s (cheesy sample included), Eminem describes his time with an unfaithful woman in hilarious detail, while Kendrick emulates Em's flow and raps about his experiences with the infamous Sherane. Although a largely comical song, Love Game still has a lot of great rhymes, with an especially phenomenal third verse by Em. Despite their bad experiences with women, Marshall and K.Dot let us know that they're always going to be playing the game of love!17. Drake ""Started From The Bottom""""Started From The Bottom"", produced by Mike Zombie, was the first single off Drake's Nothing Was The Same album. The track was released in February and peaked at #6 on the US Billboard Hot 100. It has since been certified 2x Platinum. Some may doubt if Drake really did 'start at the bottom', but with 2.2 million pageviews on Rap Genius and one of the catchiest hooks of the year, there is no doubt that this track was one of the biggest anthems of 2013.16. Childish Gambino ""3005""The lead single for Because the Internet is quintessential Childish Gambino, but is also a great showcase for the artist's development over the last two years. It's a good sampling of the album's overall sound and texture. Gambino paints a great picture of how, if you don't have someone you really care about beside you, you can be completely alone in a crowded room, to say nothing of dealing with the rest of the shit life throws at you. He both raps and sings exceptionally well and effortlessly here. Gambino also gave us a pleasantly metaphorical video to accompany the song and make us think even more.15. Chance The Rapper ""Cocoa Butter Kisses"" ft. Vic Mensa & TwistaTwo generations of Chicago hip-hop converge on this mixtape cut, with one artist already garnering national attention introducing another to the scene and re-introducing an OG from his city. Vic steals the show with an urgent and unforgiving verse, and Chance happily cedes the spotlight to him, restraining himself to an unassumingly spry and sing-songy verse; Twista, on the other hand, is not quite so willing to take a back seat, successfuly lacing the track with his trademark double-time bars. But amidst the aggressively fast raps of the trio, the hook has a contrastingly soothing melody that rounds out the entire production. This track firmly announces that hip-hop is once again Chicagoan.14. Jay Z ""Holy Grail"" ft. Justin TimberlakeIn a year of nervy choices that made business headlines around the world, Jay Z's boldest decision was actually a musical one. The only voice you hear during the first 1:19 of his new album's leadoff track is not Hov, but rather Justin Timberlake. This only manages to build anticipation, so that we are well-primed for the rapper's entry.And what an entry it is. His daughter's name is literally the first word out of his mouth, and with good reason. A post-fatherhood Jay is contemplative about the ups and downs of a personified fame, while admitting ultimately that he can't leave it alone. And lest we think he's lost a step, his patented wordplay is in full effect, with a pun on ""pigeons"" that puts today's coke-rappers to shame.13. ASAP Rocky ""1 Train"" ft. Kendrick Lamar, Joey Badass, Yelawolf, Danny Brown, Action Bronson and Big K.R.I.T.""1 Train"" is the cypher to end all cyphers. A$AP Rocky amalgamated a line-up without a single weak spitter, and they all did their worst to this Hit-Boy produced banger. It's impossible to pick who delivered the best verse here: was it the energized Danny Brown? the lovable braggart Action Bronson?  the wordsmith Joey Bad? the hard-driving Big K.R.I.T.? Someone else? I can't decide, but I do know this: the track is flames12. Schoolboy Q ""Collard Greens"" Kendrick LamarA cut between two of Top Dawg Entertainment's main artists, Schoolboy Q and Kendrick Lamar came in to make a party banger just in time for summer. Schoolboy Q delivers a solid verse about his favorite things, (and how other people can't have them), before Kendrick comes in with that Español that makes this verse so memorable. The hook might be a little random, but the vibe it generates makes it infectious upon first listen.11. Kanye West "" Black Skinhead""When word dropped that Daft Punk would be working with Kanye West on his new album, it was fair to assume it would result in a genre-blending song like Stronger. What we ended up with was indeed a blend of genres, but instead of electronic synths and filtered vocals, we got primal screams and distorted 808's. Kanye is pissed off, but not the kind of pissed he gets about croissants or Jimmy Kimmel. No, Ye is fed up with people questioning his choices and he's frustrated that nobody is taking risks anymore. And it's palpable in this song, which represents the rebellious, IDGAF attitude that flows from both Kanye and Yeezus. Using few else but drums and vocal sounds you'd more likely hear exploring the Amazon than in Hip Hop, Kanye crafts an uneasy, raw instrumental that pairs perfectly with his blunt lyrics10. J Cole ""Power Trip"" ft. MiguelIn classic J. Cole fashion, nearly everything on this track is done by himself. The smooth voice of Miguel helps out on a hook, but otherwise it is Cole's world. The incredibly catchy hooks match up perfectly with his production and he drops plenty of relatable bars about a crush. This continuation of his 2009 song ""Dreams"" is about not only a girl, but also hip-hop and its impact on him - giving an already impressive song some duality. And much like the song sounds, its video felt like a short film as Cole literally does whatever it takes to claim his love. The 10th most viewed song on RG in 2013, fans spent a combined 7.5 years of time on this song page!09. Drake ""Pound Cake/Paris Morton Music 2"" ft. Jay ZDrake crafts one of the most memorable tracks of 2013 with the outro to his third studio LP Nothing Was The Same. Boi-1da delivers on Pound Cake with a spacey Ellie Goulding sample as Drizzy paints the picture about what his life has been like while recording and making the album.The song isn't finished there by any means. After two Jay verses, Drake comes back in for Paris Morton Music 2 and a perfect verse to remind us this is his song. The extra long PMM 2 verse is also very personal, looking back on the landscape of  his career and perhaps how he's no longer the same08. Pusha T ""Numbers On The Boards""My Name Is My Name is a stark minimalist creation and with the ""No Artwork"" cover, ""Numbers On The Boards"" is the centerpiece. Don Cannon & Kanye West create the spine with King Push on his super Lupe raps in between catchy samples. Push said all year he wanted to bring ""that feeling back"", and ""Numbers On The Boards"" knocks harder than him thumping the wall with his fist. The lyrically enthralling track is jam packed with references and double entendres that takes you to Pusha's dark underground hell in only a way he could.07. ""Kanye West - Bound 2"" ft. Charlie Wilson""Bound 2"" was an unexpected but wholly welcome ending to Yeezus. The song has sparked wide discussion: is it a rejection of the past 37 minutes? Is it a reassurance to fans about Kanye's present musical identity? Is it a revelation about Kanye's future? Who really cares? Kanye fans who hated Yeezus loved it and Kanye fans who loved Yeezus loved it. ""Bound 2"" is a weirdly endearing love song featuring classic Kanye flow floating over soul samples, topped with Charlie Wilson's magical voice. What's not to like?! Well, many would actually say ""the video"", which was an overtly cheesy, green-screened, steamy motorcycle ride that not only made the world cringe, but also felt like the furthest thing from Ye's aesthetic. But that was the point. Ye geniusly defied our expectations and used his prettiest song's video as a commentary on the ""wack"" quality of American art and media that he feels should be banned. How very, New Slaves of him.06. Eminem ""Bad Guy""Sequels to much-loved properties are rarely a good idea. For every The Empire Strikes Back, there are three Matrix Reloadeds.  So when word leaked out that Em had recorded a follow-up to his epic 2000 story-song ""Stan,"" fans were nervous.  After all, Stan died at the end, right?  So what's left?Plenty, as it turns out.  Marshall turned a potentially bad idea into fantastic art with his imagining of Stan's little brother Matthew (with the autographed Starter cap), now all grown up and seeking revenge.  But just as the tale reaches its apex, the song switches perspective, revealing an intense look at Eminem's self-doubts and anguish. Just before the end, he drops the biggest gem of all: his in-song tormentors are ""just symbolic/Of not knowing what you had 'til it's gone.""  The rapper himself may not know, but trust us, Slim, we do.05. Pusha T ""Nosetalgia"" ft. Kendrick LamarThis genre defining song starts with a dirty Nottz beat that makes you feel like committing a crime and quickly escalates to the feeling you're part of one. The KRS sample serves as the hook and sounds of scratches fill the airwaves. Kings Push & Kendrick come through with menacing delivery and complex wordplay. While Terrence is neck deep in dealing, Kendrick is in the midst of consumption - the contrast is phenomenal, both MC's affected by the crack epidemic in opposing instances. The insight into Kendrick's story is rare, the Compton native always let us ride around his house but never let us through the front door. ""Nosetalgia"" is your 8ball on a Friday night, 4 shots of espresso every morning, and the In N Out double double you crave in LA. It's dope. 04. Kanye West ""Blood On The Leaves""Blood On The Leaves introduces a new piece into the emotional puzzle of Yeezus: remorse. The song is drowning in so many feels, it's impossible not to catch some yourself. Kanye's autotuned story of sadness begins atop the somber piano of the beautifully chopped Strange Fruit sample, but then the blaring horns and bass of TNGHT's R U Ready burst through and all of a sudden that sadness turns to rage. By the end of it all you're left with a modern day power ballad with enough autotune and raw emotion to make Future blush. Blood On The Leaves got to a bit of a slow start on Rap Genius due to lack of exposure pre-album release, but thanks in part to Kanye's emotionally charged VMA performance the song is one of the most viewed Yeezus tracks on the site. The song's instrumental has also become one of Producer Genius' prized breakdowns, explaining the use of the song's controversial Nina Simone sample and the origin of that beat drop. Can you imagine if Yeezus started off with this song, like Kanye originally planned? The world would have imploded.03. Eminem ""Rap God""""Six minutes, Slim Shady, you're on"". After the novelty of a second Marshall Mathers LP began to wear off, Eminem got the buzz back by becoming the third MC this year to proclaim himself a god. This rapid-fire lyrical tour de force is laced with references to the first Mathers LP, sneak disses to some of his old buddies, and a 17 second stretch crammed with over 100 words. The Detroit native also broke Rap Genius the day ""Rap God"" was released, and has now amassed over 4 million page views

Proving himself in the booth was just the beginning for Slim. After criticism he lip synced on live television, Marshall Mathers showed up to the YouTube music awards and destroyed the hopes and dreams of every rapper alive when he performed the song live. It's safe to say ""Rap God"" proved the internal rhyme mastermind is back on his Pharoahe Monch grind and nothing's going to stop him.02. Big Sean ""Control"" ft. Kendrick Lamar & Jay ElectronicaYou all knew this was coming. Big Sean delivered a 3 minute dope verse to open the track. Comparing his rapping skill to a baby's first steps and reminiscing on his grandfather, he manages to give one of the best verses of his career. For obvious reasons, we'll skip to Jay Electronica next. He too spit a clean verse about religion, while sneaking in TV and car references, and even mentioning his late grandmother, much like Sean did.However, there was a 3rd feature to this monster track produced by No I.D. His name? King Kendrick Lamar. He came with one purpose: to assassinate the competition. The lyrical warfare was on for all to see and was full of levels. The Compton MC proclaimed he was both 2Pac's offspring and the King of New York, causing mass hysteria in hip hop's homeland. But oh no, it wasn't over yet. His braggadocio left mouths agape as he goes on to say he is as popular as the Beatles and placed his name up for one of the greatest MC's of all time. And yet there was more...he called out every hot young rapper - by their name, a rarity in Hip Hop (no sneak disses here!). Basically Kendrick manages to piss off every rapper and revolutionize the rap game at the same damn time. How about it?01. Kanye West ""New Slaves"" ft. Frank Ocean""New Slaves"" is best described as an ""open letter"" from Kanye West to the people - made into music. Produced by the Very G.O.O.D Beats crew, New Slaves is sonically simplistic yet still possesses melody courtesy of the droning synths. Frank Ocean assists on the outro, providing an amazing contrast to the aggressive tone used throughout the song, acting in a reflective manner. However from a lyrical standpoint it's without a doubt one of Kanye's greatest songs. He labeled verse 2 as the ""best verse of all time"" and with topics that range from modern day slavery to the fashion industry, and even America's prison system, it's hard to disagree

The Chi-town native doesn't just stop at the music. With a guerrilla marketing scheme fit for a military coup, Ye projected the track onto buildings in 66 locations across the world. It's been 8 months since the song's release and the significance of ""New Slaves is only just surfacing. Between the time of the song's release and present day, the attitude of multiple industries has started to shift dramatically - would Jay Z and Beyonce have released projects with such unorthodox promotion methods if Kanye didn't do it first? His movement, spearheaded with this peoples anthem, was made to inspire others to think in a similar light. ""New Slaves"" invokes the power of free speech and brandishing the truth like an axe, Kanye challenges listeners to think outside the MatrixJust as Mandela blew up the buildings and eventually became president. Contrary to popular opinion, sometimes you have to blow up the building.- Kanye West",317360
35693,249268,Who Do You Love?,rap,YG,2014,1297345,{Drake},"
I'm that nigga with the plugs
I'm the nigga who got homies that be sellin' drugs
I'm the nigga on the back street
With the fat heat, niggas better run like athletes
I'm that nigga, I'm that nigga
My Bank of America account got six figures
I'm that nigga on the block
Police pull up, I'm tryna stash the Glock
You that nigga on the low-low
You're the nigga, you're the one that be talkin' to the po-pos
Porsche sittin' on Forgi's
Niggas can't afford these
The Panamera shittin' on the 9-11
I call my homies, not 911
I'm the nigga with the juice
But I'll never do my nigga like Pac did Q


Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love? (Champagne)
Bitch, who do you love?

I got a shorty name Texas Syn
She got a buddy named Young JB and now you know the deal
We turnt up in the studio late night
That's why the songs that you hear are comin' real tight
OVO crew, nigga, thought I told you
If you a player in the game, this should hold you
And man shout my nigga Game he just rolled through
Eatin' crab out in Malibu at Nobu
A lot of fools puttin' salt in the game
Until these women get the notion that they runnin' the game
They got money that they jumpin' on the pole to make
Did ""The Motto"", took a flight to the golden state
I'm the general, just makin' sure my soldiers straight
Had to leave my nigga, homie got an open case
But I'm big on the West like I'm big in the South
So we gon' pay some people off, we gon' figure it out
And my name too big, and my gang too big
Young Money shit, me and Lil Wayne too big
I'ma crush that ass even if it ain't too big
I would pinky swear but my pinky ring too big
Wassup


Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?

I'm that nigga, I'm that nigga
Bank of America account got six figures
I'm that nigga on the block
With the fat heat; run like athletes
I'm that nigga, I'm that nigga
Bank of America account got six figures
I'm that nigga on the block


Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?
Bitch, who do you love?


Nigga we straight and we hood
Ain't nobody ever gave us shit
When you see us shinin' it's because we steady grindin'
We stay paper chasin'
Separatin' the real from the fake
The fake from the real
We livin' to die and dyin' to live!
Nigga, that's why we got so many women
I'm tryna go deep, hit them asscheeks
Bust them guts, make her cum
Bitch, you know the game!
Ain't a motherfuckin' thing change!
Bitch! Who do you love!?

Ayy, hold up!
I done lost too many homies in these past couple years. This shit brazy!
Rest in peace, my nigga CJ Mack. Rest in peace, my nigga Cedar Block Frog though (Bool!). Rest in peace, my nigga Tiny M. And last but not least, rest in peace, my nigga Big Aaron",324980
35722,249566,Boss Ass Bitch Remix,rap,Nicki Minaj & PTAF,2013,1526511,{},"
I'm a boss ass bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch
I'm a boss ass bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch
I'm a boss ass bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch
I'm a boss ass bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch
I'm a boss ass-


Yo, I employ these niggas
They be grown men, but I Little Boy these niggas
Want the cookie, so I gotta Chips Ahoy these niggas
But I never iPhone, Android these niggas
Use rubbers with 'em, I 'on't ever raw these niggas
More money than 'em, I'ma son all these niggas
I ain't shoppin' but it's like I gotta store these niggas
Put 'em on time-out and never call these niggas
P-p-p-pussy like girls, damn, is my pussy gay?
It's a holiday, Play-With-My-Pussy Day
Pussy this, pussy that, pussy taken
Pussy ride dick like she a Jamaican
Pussy stay warm, pussy on vacation
You loose bitches need a pussy renovation
Y-y-you could eat it with a pussy reservation
P-p-pussy 'bout to get a standin' ovation
Clap, clap, clap for this pussy, nigga
But I can't give this pussy to a pussy nigga
Aw, man, slow down
I'ma get you something that you could hold down
But I can't give you head, I'm too ill for that
I'ma make a movie still, Kill Bill for that
'Cause what the fuck, this ain't Chanel, nigga, custom down?
What the fuck, I ain't smokin' hot, bust me down?
You the same clown nigga that was runnin' me down?
Now you all up in the sauce 'cause you wanna be down?
I said, rule number one to be a boss ass bitch
Never let a clown nigga try to play you
If he play you, then rule number two
Fuck his best friends then make 'em yes-men
And get a dick pic and then you press send
And send a red heart and send a kissy face
And tell him that his friends love how your pussy taste
And that's rule three, I'm the school tea'
My wrist look like I am a jewel thief
But that's just 'cause I am a boss bitch
Now macaroni cheese and grill my swordfish

Bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch
I'm a boss ass bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch
I'm a boss ass bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch, bitch


I-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-if he catch my drift, he could catch my jizz
I be out in Cali runnin' all my businesses
I be out in Cali watchin' back my Christmas vids
Every time I fuck 'em, yes, I tell him this is his
Looked down at it, and I said, ""This is big""
Man, my game so cold I said, ""This is rigged""
Best flow in the game, this is not a lie
Tell 'em bitches, cross they ""t""s and dot they ""i""s
I-I-I-I-I-I-I came back, bitches' flows still boring
I said, ""Damn, man, go back to whoring""
You know I still lead the league in scoring
You know I'm still bad and I'm still foreign
I-I-I'ma give bitches time to get hot
Chill out at the game, New York Knickerbock'
If they actually got bars, they could rock
But if not, I'ma destroy chicks a lot, oh
But on the real, I'm in album mode
Just dropped this freestyle 'fore these files get old
When I lay low, bitches be safe and sound
When I come back, they better not make a sound
Hahaha, I hear you

When I'm back on the prowl
You bitches better have my money
'Cause I'm coming for you
Ooh, ooh


Uh, okay, I order rich bitch sauce
Rich bitch cold, got a rich bitch cough
Which bitch want it? I'll go rich bitch off
'Cause you know my style gettin' bit, ripped off
When I'm at the restaurant, rich bitch sauce
Rich bitch cold, I got a rich bitch cough
Which bitch want it? I'll go rich bitch off
And you know my style gettin' bit, ripped off
Off, off, off, off, off, off, off
I'm a b-, I'm a boss


Ask Lil Wayne who the five-star bitch is
Ask Lil Wayne who the five-star bitch is
Ask Lil Wayne, ask Lil Wayne
Ask Lil Wayne who the five-star bitch is
Ask Birdman who the five-star bitch is
Ask Young Money who the five-star bitch is
Who the five-star bitch is, who the five-star bitch is
Ask Birdman who the five-star bitch is
Ask Lil Wayne, ask Lil Wayne
Ask Lil Wayne who the five-star bitch is",325713
35915,251286,I Will Always Love You,rb,Whitney Houston,1992,1642934,{},"
If I should stay
I would only be in your way
So I'll go, but I know
I'll think of you every step of the way


And I will always love you
I will always love you
You
My darling, you


Bittersweet memories
That is all I'm taking with me
So goodbye, please don't cry
We both know I'm not what you, you need


And I will always love you
I will always love you
You



I hope life treats you kind
And I hope you have all you've dreamed of
And I'm wishing you joy and happiness
But above all this, I wish you love


And I will always love you
I will always love you
I will always love you
I will always love you
I will always love you
I, I will always love you


You
Darling, I love you
I'll always
I'll always love you",329470
36243,254474,Im Not the Only One,pop,Sam Smith,2014,1148652,{},"
You and me, we made a vow
For better or for worse
I can't believe you let me down
But the proof's in the way it hurts
For months on end I've had my doubts
Denying every tear
I wish this would be over now
But I know that I still need you here


You say I'm crazy
'Cause you don't think I know what you've done
But when you call me baby
I know I'm not the only one


You've been so unavailable
Now, sadly, I know why
Your heart is unobtainable
Even though Lord knows you kept mine

You say I'm crazy
'Cause you don't think I know what you've done
But when you call me baby
I know I'm not the only one


I have loved you for many years
Maybe I am just not enough
You've made me realise my deepest fear
By lying and tearing us up


You say I'm crazy
'Cause you don't think I know what you've done
But when you call me baby
I know I'm not the only one

You say I'm crazy
'Cause you don't think I know what you've done
But when you call me baby
I know I'm not the only one


I know I'm not the only one
I know I'm not the only one
And I know, and I know, and I know, and I know, and I know, and I know, know
I know I'm not the only one",336227
37262,264229,Fancy,rap,Iggy Azalea,2014,1107207,"{""Charli XCX""}","
First things first, I'm the realest (Realest)
Drop this and let the whole world feel it (Let 'em feel it)
And I'm still in the Murda Bizness
I can hold you down, like I'm giving lessons in physics (Right, right?)
You should want a bad bitch like this (Huh?)
Drop it low and pick it up just like this (Yeah)
Cup of Ace, cup of Goose, cup of Cris
High heels, something worth a half a ticket on my wrist (On my wrist)
Taking all the liquor straight, never chase that (Never)
Rooftop like we bringing '88 back (What?)
Bring the hooks in, where the bass at?
Champagne spilling, you should taste that


I'm so fancy, you already know
I'm in the fast lane, from L.A. to Tokyo
I'm so fancy, can't you taste this gold?
Remember my name, 'bout to blow-oh-oh-oh


I said baby, I do this, I thought that you knew this
Can't stand no haters, and honest, the truth is
That my flow retarded, each beat dear, departed
Swagger on stupid, I can't shop in no department
And get my money on time, if they got money, decline
And swear I meant that there so much that I give that line a rewind
Said I get my money on time, if they got money, decline
I just can't worry 'bout no haters, gotta stay on my grind
Now tell me, who that, who that? That do that, do that?
Put that paper over all, I thought you knew that, knew that
I be that I-G-G-Y, put my name in bold
I been working, I'm up in here with some change to throw

I'm so fancy, you already know
I'm in the fast lane, from L.A. to Tokyo
I'm so fancy, can't you taste this gold?
Remember my name, 'bout to blow-oh-oh-oh


Trash the hotel, let's get drunk on the minibar
Make the phone call, feels so good getting what I want
Yeah, keep on turning it up
Chandelier swinging, we don't give a fuck
Film star, yeah, I'm deluxe
Classic, expensive, you don't get to touch, ow!


Still stunting, how you love that?
Got the whole world asking how I does that
Hot girl, hands off, don't touch that
Look at it, I bet you wishing you could clutch that
That's just the way you like it, huh?
It's so good, he just wishing he could bite it, huh?
Never turn down nothing
Slayin' these hoes, gold trigger on the gun like


I'm so fancy, you already know
I'm in the fast lane, from L.A. to Tokyo
I'm so fancy, can't you taste this gold?
Remember my name, 'bout to blow-oh-oh-oh

Who that, who that? I-G-G-Y
That do that, do that, I-G-G-Y
Who that, who that? I-G-G-Y
(Blow-oh-oh-oh)
Who that, who that? I-G-G-Y
That do that, do that, I-G-G-Y
Who that, who that? I-G-G-Y
(Blow-oh-oh-oh)",352612
37326,264924,Your Song,rock,Elton John,1970,1323166,{},"
It's a little bit funny, this feeling inside
I'm not one of those who can easily hide
I don't have much money, but, boy, if I did
I'd buy a big house where we both could live
If I was a sculptor, heh, but then again, no
Or a man who makes potions in a traveling show
I know it's not much, but it's the best I can do
My gift is my song, and this one's for you


And you can tell everybody this is your song
It may be quite simple, but now that it's done
I hope you don't mind, I hope you don't mind
That I put down in the words
How wonderful life is while you're in the world


I sat on the roof and kicked off the moss
Well, a few of the verses, well, they've got me quite cross
But the sun's been quite kind while I wrote this song
It's for people like you that keep it turned on
So excuse me forgetting, but these things I do
You see, I've forgotten if they're green or they're blue
Anyway, the thing is, what I really mean
Yours are the sweetest eyes I've ever seen

And you can tell everybody this is your song
It may be quite simple, but now that it's done
I hope you don't mind, I hope you don't mind
That I put down in the words
How wonderful life is while you're in the world


I hope you don't mind, I hope you don't mind
That I put down in the words
How wonderful life is while you're in the world",353931
37647,269156,Lookin Ass,rap,Nicki Minaj,2014,1416352,{},"
All I, all I know is there should be no reason (Look at y'all niggas)
All I know is there should be no reason (Niggas)
All I, all I know is there should be, all I know
All I, all I know is there should be no reason (Look at y'all niggas)
All I know, you know, and you know (Niggas)
Look at why, there's no reason


Look at y'all smokin' ass niggas
After every pull, niggas start chokin' ass niggas
(You know why) Nigga-nigga
(All, all I know is there's no reason)
Look at y'all bitch ass niggas
Stop lyin' on your dick ass niggas
(You know why) Nigga-nigga
(All, all I know is there's no)
Look at y'all lookin' ass niggas
Stop lookin' at my ass ass niggas (Reason)
Look at y'all lyin' ass niggas
Talkin' 'bout, ""It's paid off,"" but it's financed, lyin' ass nigga
Bunch of non-mogul ass niggas
Frontin' like they got a plan, Boost Mobile ass nigga, nigga, nigga
Look at y'all, can't get a job
So you plottin' how to rob ass niggas
I ain't gotta check for y'all
But if I'ma check for y'all, I'ma need a check from y'all niggas
I don't want sex, give a fuck about your ex
I don't even want a text from y'all niggas
I'm rapin' you niggas
Look at this pic, look at what the fuck I gave to you niggas
Ain't feelin' these niggas
Niggas want my time, call me Clinton, I'm billin' these niggas

All I, all I know is there should be no reason
All I know is there should be no reason
All I, all I know is there should be, all I know
All I, all I know is there should be no reason
All I know, you know, and you know
Look at why, there's no reason


Look at y'all sharin' one bottle in the club
One bottle full of bub' ass niggas
Look at y'all not havin' game ass niggas
Y'all niggas share a chain ass niggas
Same cup in the hand ass nigga
In the club with a credit card scam ass nigga
No dick in the pants ass nigga
I'll be damned if I fuck a non-man ass nigga
I will, I will, I will never fuck a non-man ass nigga
I would never lie
Even if that nigga flew me and my bitches
All the way out to Dubai
Pussy, you dry, pussy ass nigga, you lie
Pussy ass nigga, you high
Bitch I'm me, hundred on the wrist, I ski
Art on the wall, Basqui, fuck who see
Look at you fake dope dealers
Know real niggas that be movin' weight in them villas
Talkin' 'bout ki's, say, ""It's ki's in the van""
But he really move grams, and he split it with his mans

All I, all I know is there should be no reason
All I know is there should be no reason
All I, all I know is there should be, all I know
All I, all I know is there should be no reason
All I know, you know, and you know
Look at why, there's no reason",361245
37660,269363,Studio,rap,ScHoolboy Q,2014,1185462,"{""BJ the Chicago Kid""}","


I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
But this song so fuckin' dope, girl, it's harder not for me to blaze it
To tell the truth, wish it was you in this booth that I was blazin'
So I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby


See I've been in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
All night layin' verses though I'd rather lay with you, baby
Bra and panties matchin', nail and toes, you all kinda lady
Angel out of heaven, such a goddess have a nigga prayin'


I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
But this song so fuckin' dope, girl, it's harder not for me to blaze it
To tell the truth, wish it was you in this booth that I was blazin'
So I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby


You need a real nigga, shorty
So come and throw that pussy, shorty
See I think you and me can make it
This little verse to get you naked
See, your heart ain't meant for breaking
Cupid's never been mistaken
See, I been caught up in the moment
Shit, my type ain't quite her type but now this gangsta nigga on it
She can twist my weed and hit the 'yac
I can hit your type without the hat, put that pussy on the map
I see qualities in a bad girl, I know that ass you got
Come with attitude and your swag, girl, you ain't wrong, girl
Just when that door knock lose your thong, girl
'Cause you girl, 'cause you girl, girl, 'cause you girl, girl
'Cause you girl, girl...

I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
But this song so fuckin' dope, girl, it's harder not for me to blaze it
To tell the truth, wish it was you in this booth that I was blazin'
So I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby


Throw a loc your pussy, girl, you knowing that your nigga faded
Can I hit that pussy way I wanna while this record playing?
Put my tongue in different places, play a game of Operation
Uh, like, na-na-na, la-la, la-la, you get what I'm saying
No metaphors, nothing like that
I'm keeping it straight to the point with you
So, I'ma put this dick up all in-side-of-you


I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
But this song so fuckin' dope, girl, it's harder not for me to blaze it
To tell the truth, wish it was you in this booth that I was blazin'
So I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby
But this song so fuckin' dope, girl, it's harder not for me to blaze it
To tell the truth, wish it was you in this booth that I was blazin'
So I'm just sittin' in the studio just tryna get to you, baby",361656
38001,272439,Or Nah Remix,rap,Ty Dolla $ign,2014,2807370,"{""Wiz Khalifa"",""The Weeknd"",""Ty Dolla \\$ign"",Mustard}","
Tahahaha
I got a lotta cash
I don't mind spending it
Tahaha, yeah
Mustard on the beat, ho


I'ma smoke this joint, then I'ma break you off
I'd be lying if I said you ain't the one
All these tattoos in my skin, they turn you on
Lotta smokin', drinkin'-that's the shit I'm on
Heard you not the type that you take home to Mom
Is we fucking when we leave the club, or nah?
I ain't spending cash for nothing, I wanna see you take it off
I'ma pop this bottle, you gon' give me brain, or nah? (Nah, nah, nah, nah, nah)


Do you like the way I flick my tongue, or nah? (Or nah)
You can ride my face until you're drippin' cum (Drippin' cum)
Can you lick the tip then throat the dick, or nah? (Can you do it, babe?)
Can you let me stretch that pussy out, or nah? (Or nah, or nah)
I'm not the type to call you back tomorrow
But the way you wrapping 'round me is a prob
Ain't nobody tryna save you, baby, get that paper
Probably got a lot of other bitches owe you favors
Pussy so good, had to save that shit for later
Took her to the kitchen, fucked her right there on the table
She repping XO to the death (Ooh, yeah)
I'm tryna make these bitches sweat (Ooh, yeah)
I'm tryna keep that pussy wet (Ooh, yeah)
I'm tryna fuck her and her friends (Ooh, yeah, ooh, yeah)

You gon' run it for these hunnids, girl, or nah?
Show me, is you really 'bout your money, girl, or nah?
Don't play with a boss, girl, take it all (Nah, nah, nah, nah, nah)
Took her for a real one, you gon' get it all (Ooh, yeah, ooh, yeah, oh, yeah)


Is you really 'bout your money, or nah? (Or nah, nah)
Can you really take dick, or nah? (Or nah, nah)
Can I bring another bitch, or nah? (Or nah, nah)
Is you with the shits, or nah? (Or nah, nah)
Or nah, or nah
Would you ride for a nigga, or nah? (Ooh, yeah, nah)
Would you die for a nigga, or nah? (Or nah)
Would you lie to a nigga, or nah?
Or nah, or nah
Can you really take dick, or nah? (Nah)
Can I bring another bitch, or nah? (Or nah, nah)
Is you with the shits, or nah?
Or nah, or nah (Or nah)
Would you ride for a nigga, or nah? (Or nah, or nah)
Would you die for a nigga, or nah? (Or nah, or nah, no)
Would you lie to a nigga, or nah?
Or nah


Gi-Girl, make that ass clap for young Dolla Sign (Dolla Sign)
You already know my money go a long time (Yeah)
I could slide for it, like Nelly (Like Nelly)
I'ma go as far as you let me (Yeah, yeah)
Girl, is you sucking me and fucking me, or nah?
Can I bring another bitch? Let's have a threesome (Oh, yeah)
Keep saying you's a freak-you gon' prove it, or nah? (Grits or nah) (Yeah)
His bitch keep looking at me, she choosin', or nah? (On this dick or nah)
You's a ride-or-die chick, you with the shit, or nah? (The shit or nah)
Say you not a side bitch, you all-in, or nah? (All-in or nah)
You gon' make them eggs cheesy with them grits, or nah? (Grits or nah)
Can you do it like that on this dick, or nah? (Oh, yeah)

You gon' run it for these hunnids, girl, or nah?
Show me, is you really 'bout your money, girl, or nah?
Don't play with a boss, girl, take it all
Took her for a real one, you gon' get it all (Oh, yeah)


Is you really 'bout your money, or nah? (Nah)
Can you really take dick, or nah? (Nah)
Can I bring another bitch, or nah? (Nah)
Is you with the shits, or nah?
Or nah, or nah
Would you ride for a nigga, or nah? (Nah)
Would you die for a nigga, or nah? (Or nah)
Would you lie to a nigga, or nah?
Or nah, or nah
Can you really take dick, or nah? (Nah)
Can I bring another bitch, or nah? (Nah)
Is you with the shits, or nah?
Or nah, or nah (Or nah)
Would you ride for a nigga, or nah? (Nah)
Would you die for a nigga, or nah? (No)
Would you lie to a nigga, or nah?
Or nah",366931
38596,277890,I Mean It,rap,G-Eazy,2014,1449597,{Remo},"
You know if I say something I mean it
These things happen
Yeah


If I ever said I'm never scared
Just know I mean it
If I ever said I fucked your bitch
Just know I mean it
And if I ever said I'm gettin' money
Just know I mean it
And oh Lord oh Lord knows
He knows I mean it
Yeah, you know I mean it
You know I mean it
Just know I mean it
Just know I mean it
Oh yeah oh yeah oh yeah


If I say that shit then I mean it
She calls me, I screen it, I'm only fuckin' if it's convenient
You lie on pussy, that's weak shit
We pass pussy 'round, that's G shit
But you ain't fam so what is this ""we"" shit?
You cuff yours and then leash it
Listen, I'm tellin' you, it's my world, I does what I wish to
If you're mad well too bad, sounds like a personal issue
I walk in, they all stare like ""Who the fuck is this dude?""
Kicks game is just rude, don't get jiu-jitsued
Tunnel visions how I get ahead, stayed solid I never fled
My haters feel like I'm better dead
But I'm quite alive getting bread instead
With a better girl, with a better face
I'm in a better place gettin' better head
""I just wanna stay broke forever,""
Yeah that's that shit no one ever said

If I ever said I'm never scared
Just know I mean it
If I ever said I fucked your bitch
Just know I mean it
And if I ever said I'm gettin' money
Just know I mean it
And oh Lord oh Lord knows
He knows I mean it
Yeah, you know I mean it
You know I mean it
Just know I mean it
Just know I mean it
Oh yeah oh yeah oh yeah


Signed Gerald, I'm sincere
This year I'm in here, I'll spell it out to make things clear
Meanwhile your end's near, I've got a lane and I'm in gear
You people wonder who's next up
That conversation really ends here
You rappers just talk a bunch, stress me out, I chop a dutch
Weak rappers tryna bite the sound, but my style is a lot to munch
I'm more like whiskey neat, and you're more like vodka punch
G's dope, he might blow up, think I know, I've got a hunch
On my side it's authentic, you try to stunt but it's all rented
But you're dope you got a bad chick, yeah, cool bro we all get it
She wears a ring, came through without it
You really think she stay true? I doubt it
Cause I'm fucking your girlfriend, and there's nothing you can do about it

If I ever said I'm never scared
Just know I mean it
If I ever said I fucked your bitch
Just know I mean it
And if I ever said I'm gettin' money
Just know I mean it
And oh Lord oh Lord knows
He knows I mean it
Yeah, you know I mean it
You know I mean it
Just know I mean it
Just know I mean it
Oh yeah oh yeah oh yeah",376091
38772,279293,Chandelier,pop,Sia,2014,1959985,{},"
Party girls don't get hurt
Can't feel anything, when will I learn?
I push it down, push it down
I'm the one ""for a good time call""
Phone's blowin' up, ringin' my doorbell
I feel the love, feel the love


One, two, three, one, two, three, drink
One, two, three, one, two, three, drink
One, two, three, one, two, three, drink
Throw 'em back till I lose count


I'm gonna swing from the chandelier
From the chandelier
I'm gonna live like tomorrow doesn't exist
Like it doesn't exist
I'm gonna fly like a bird through the night
Feel my tears as they dry
I'm gonna swing from the chandelier
From the chandelier

But I'm holding on for dear life
Won't look down, won't open my eyes
Keep my glass full until morning light
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
Help me, I'm holding on for dear life
Won't look down, won't open my eyes
Keep my glass full until morning light
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
On for tonight


Sun is up, I'm a mess
Gotta get out now, gotta run from this
Here comes the shame, here comes the shame


One, two, three, one, two, three, drink
One, two, three, one, two, three, drink
One, two, three, one, two, three, drink
Throw 'em back till I lose count


I'm gonna swing from the chandelier
From the chandelier
I'm gonna live like tomorrow doesn't exist
Like it doesn't exist
I'm gonna fly like a bird through the night
Feel my tears as they dry
I'm gonna swing from the chandelier
From the chandelier

But I'm holding on for dear life
Won't look down, won't open my eyes
Keep my glass full until morning light
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
Help me, I'm holding on for dear life
Won't look down, won't open my eyes
Keep my glass full until morning light
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
On for tonight


On for tonight
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
Oh, I'm just holding on for tonight
On for tonight, on for tonight
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
'Cause I'm just holding on for tonight
Oh, I'm just holding on for tonight
On for tonight, on for tonight",378195
39110,282628,Habits Stay High,pop,Tove Lo,2013,1137304,{},"
Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh


I eat my dinner in my bathtub, then I go to sex clubs
Watchin' freaky people gettin' it on
It doesn't make me nervous if anything, I'm restless
Yeah, I've been around and I've seen it all
I get home, I got the munchies, binge on all my Twinkies
Throw up in the tub, then I go to sleep
And I drank up all my money, dazed and kinda lonely


You're gone and I gotta stay high
All the time, to keep you off my mind
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
High, all the time, to keep you off my mind
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Spend my days locked in a haze, tryna forget you, babe
I fall back down
Gotta stay high, all my life, to forget I'm missin' you
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh

Pick up daddies at the playground, how I spend my day time
Loosen up their frown, make 'em feel alive
I make it fast and greasy, I'm numb and way too easy


You're gone and I gotta stay high
All the time, to keep you off my mind
Ooh-ooh-ooh-oh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
High, all the time, to keep you off my mind
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Spend my days locked in a haze, tryna forget you, babe
I fall back down
Gotta stay high, all my life, to forget I'm missin' you
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh


Staying in my play pretend, where the fun ain't got no end
Oh, can't go home alone again, need someone to numb the pain
Oh, staying in my play pretend, where the fun ain't got no end
Uh, oh, can't go home alone again, need someone to numb the pain


You're gone and I gotta stay high
All the time, to keep you off my mind
Ooh-ooh-oh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
High, all the time, to keep you off my mind
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Spend my days locked in a haze, tryna forget you, babe
I fall back down
Gotta stay high, all my life, to forget I'm missin' you
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh

Oh-oh",382949
39242,284072,Days in the East,rap,Drake,2014,1303530,{},"
Yeah, why you keep askin' me about... (Why?)
She's not here right now, she's not here right now
Why am I the one you wanna get into it with for the drama?
I've got a lot to say, and that's the last thing a nigga wanna hear right now


Spendin' all my days on the east side, oh
Forgettin' who I was on the other side, oh
Young nigga switchin' up the program right now
Tryna put the power in my own hands right now
I'm about to ride through the old hood right now
Got too much pride for my own good right now
Waitin' on you to give in and hit me up
So I could fall through like old times and hit it up


I'm terrible at invitin' myself, call me over
Those nights when you need someone else, call me over
You can be the one to take control, call me over
When I get there, you already know, call me

Why you keep askin' me about... (Why?)
Couple other things I'd rather do than talk about that right now
Told you 'bout givin' him chances on chances on chances
He's not holdin' you down, he's holdin' you back right now


Spendin' all my days on the east side, oh (Oh, oh-oh-oh)
Forgettin' who I was on the other side, oh
Young nigga switchin' up the program right now
Tryna put the power in my own hands right now
Love it when your ass speak the truth to me, oh
Tryna wake up and have you with me, oh
Waitin' on you to give in and hit me up
So I could fall through like old times and hit it up


I'm terrible at invitin' myself, call me over
Those nights when you need someone else, call me over
You can be the one to take control, call me over
When I get there, you already know, call me


Yeah, ayy
Yeah
I I threw my hands in the air and said show me somethin', yeah
Ayy

Remember one night I went to Erykah Badu house
She made tea for me
We talked about love and what life could really be for me
She said, ""When that shit is real, you just know""
And I was thinkin' 'bout you, you already know
Yeah, the other night Chubbs showed up at my house
He had weed for me
That my nigga 'til we gone, keep his ear to the streets for me
Said the city stress him out on the low
I said, ""I feel you, nigga, I already know""
Yeah, already...
Girls talkin' 'bout, ""You gotta leave already?""
Damn, my lil' nephew turned four already
Gave you little help, you need more already
Damn, you need more already?
'Fore you said ""You're mine"" I was yours already
22, had the Bentley four-door already
Even as a boy, I was the boy already
So you know that that mean pussy galore already
Mention other girls, you get insecure already
That was in the past, I matured already
Fuck them hoes, you got the award already
You go to Chanel and get rewards already
Know I do this shit for Third Ward already
Know I do this shit for H-Town already
Already, already, yeah
Back up in this thing, it's a go
Had a couple niggas out of pocket, now they know
Ain't the first time 'cause I lost you before
Had to get it back, had to get it back
Had to pull it back because I know I'm on the road
Had to take you back because I know you're down to roll
If you can get it from me, you can have it, now you know
All your friends askin' where you stand with the boy
FaceTime say you got plans for the boy
Studyin' your body, that's exams for the boy
Take a flight here, pop a Xan for your boy
Waking up in Amsterdam with the boy
Long flight home, 'nother Xan for your boy
You would prolly fly out to Japan for the boy
You would prolly kill another man for the boy
You would prolly...
You would prolly lie 'bout it on the stand for your boy
Put the Bible to your right hand for the boy
That's why you ain't never gotta worry 'bout the boy
You know you got...
You know you got that really good insurance on the boy
You just gotta pack a bag and hurry to the boy, yeah
(Why? Fring)",384908
39469,285797,Stay With Me,rb,Sam Smith,2014,2069485,{},"
Guess it's true, I'm not good at a one-night stand
But I still need love 'cause I'm just a man
These nights never seem to go to plan
I don't want you to leave, will you hold my hand?


Oh, won't you stay with me?
'Cause you're all I need
This ain't love, it's clear to see
But darling, stay with me


Why am I so emotional?
No, it's not a good look, gain some self-control
And deep down I know this never works
But you can lay with me so it doesn't hurt


Oh, won't you stay with me?
'Cause you're all I need
This ain't love, it's clear to see
But darling, stay with me

Oooh, oooh
Oooh, oooh


Oh, won't you stay with me?
'Cause you're all I need
This ain't love, it's clear to see
But darling, stay with me


Oh, won't you stay with me?
'Cause you're all I need
This ain't love, it's clear to see
But darling, stay with me",387414
39949,289784,Gotta Go My Own Way,pop,High School Musical Cast,2007,1058180,{},"
Troy, listen


I gotta say what's on my mind
Somethin' about us doesn't seem right these days
Life keeps gettin' in the way
Whenever we try, somehow, the plan is always rearranged


It's so hard to say
But I gotta do what's best for me
You'll be okay


I've got to move on and be who I am
I just don't belong here, I hope you understand
We might find our place in this world someday
But at least for now
I gotta go my own way (My own way)

Don't wanna leave it all behind
But I get my hopes up
And I watch them fall every time
Another color turns to gray
And it's just too hard to watch it all slowly fade away


I'm leavin' today
'Cause I gotta do what's best for me
You'll be okay


I've got to move on and be who I am
I just don't belong here, I hope you understand
We might find our place in this world someday
But at least for now
I gotta go my own way


What about us?
What about everything we've been through?
And what about trust?
You know I never wanted to hurt you
And what about me?
What am I supposed to do?
I gotta leave but I'll miss you, oh

So, I've got to move on and be who I am
(Why do you have to go?)
I just don't belong here, I hope you understand
(I'm trying to understand)
We might find our place in this world someday
But at least for now
(I want you to stay)
I gotta go my own way
I've got to move on and be who I am
(What about us?)
I just don't belong here, I hope you understand
(I'm trying to understand)
We might find our place in this world someday (World someday)
But at least for now
I gotta go my own way


I gotta go my own way
I gotta go my own way",393416
39971,289961,Draft Day,rap,Drake,2014,1008128,{},"


(Watch out, watch out)
(Look out, look out)
(Watch out, watch out)
Yeah
(Look out, look out)
Yeah


Draft day, Johnny Manziel
Five years later, how am I the man still?
Draft day, A. Wiggins
Fuck that other side, bitch, we stay winnin'
Aww man, you know I had to do it for you
You know I had to do it for ya
Yeah, suits and ties yellin' out, ""Pay the guys""
Man, I had to do it for ya
You know I had to do it for ya
You know I had to do it for ya
Aww man, aww man, aww man
Man, you know I had to-

Sometimes I laugh with God about how you can't stop me
I'm his darkest angel probably but he still got me
I'm gettin' mine, but still I better lives
And shit I set aside to make sure that my people getting by
Brunch with some Qatar royals and my cup is all oil
You know it's real when your niggas'll take the fall for you
All loyal so you keep eggin' me on
And we gonna have to crack a shell just to prove to you, you ain't hard-boiled, mm
Last night I tried some raw oysters
Man that boy growin' up quick, that boy know he the shit
That boy singin' on every song when he know he can spit
That boy manifested it, that boy knew it was written
That boy did it on purpose
That boy know that they shittin' on you, and they can't get past you
You should've followed all my moves, you won't realize 'til after
And if I left this shit to chance I would've picked a name like Chance the Rapper
Yeah, no offense 'cause I don't know that nigga
I'm focused on making records and gettin' bigger
Just hits, no misses, that's for the married folk
Tell 'em fix my suite up 'cause I'm comin' home
I heard they talking crazy, I was out of town
You know they love to pop all that shit when I'm not around
But when I'm here, not a sound, that'll make me snap, jot it down
Go in the booth and lay a body down
Know some Somalis that say we got it Wallahi
Get us donuts and coffee, we'll wait for him in the lobby
And I gotta tell him chill, Sprite got me on payroll
Let that man live, they say, ""Okay, if you say so""
See whatever I say goes, I play like I'm on 'roids, no Canseco
No Oakland A's though, shout out the Bay though
I think I'm on my eighth flow, just watch me paint flow
We all do it for the art so I could never hate though
Signin' off on more deals than a lawyer with a heavy case load
How the game turn into the Drake show?
Dog, what the fuck happen to so-and-so, where did they go?
Too worried 'bout bitches and fashion, they go missin' in action
And then you never notice they missin'
On some Hunger Games shit, I would die for my district
Jennifer Lawrence, you can really get it, yeah
I mean, for real, girl you know I had to do it for ya
You know I had to do it for ya
You know I had to- oh, wait, sidebar, left some beat at the end
So that all of you fuck niggas could loop it and get your lies off
SZN

Draft day, Johnny Manziel
Five years later, how am I the man still?
Draft day, A. Wiggins
Fuck that other side, bitch, we stay winnin'
Aww man, you know I had to do it for you
You know I had to do it for ya
Yeah, suits and ties yellin' out, ""Pay the guys""
Man, I had to do it for ya
You know I had to do it for ya
You know I had to do it for ya
Aww man, aww man, aww man
Man, you know I had to-

",393612
40336,293227,I Won,rap,Future,2014,1006935,"{""Kanye West""}","


I just want to take you out and show you off
You already know that you the perfect one
Girl when I'm with you, feel like a champion
Ever since I got with you I feel like I done won me a trophy
A trophy, I won me a trophy
I won, I won, I won a trophy
I just want to take you out and show you off
You already know that you the perfect one
Girl when I'm with you, feel like a champion
Ever since I got with you I feel like I done won me a trophy
Trophy, I won me a trophy
A trophy, I won me a trophy
Trophy, I won me a trophy
A trophy


Get to fuckin' on the dresser just to make that pussy wetter
Gotta put you in that vintage then you rockin' Perry Ellis
Then I leave with you, only cause I believe in you
We get to bangin' on the walls just to piss the neighbors off
You and them 12 foot ceilings, I just painted the halls
So I can breathe with you
I want to live my dream with you
You say that money don't matter it's the times and the memories
And now that ass gettin' fatter and I know it's because of me
I know it's because of me
I know it's because of me, got you in custody
Whoever knockin' at the door, they gotta wait 'til we finished
I know I started at the bottom but that ain't where we endin'

I just want to take you out and show you off
You already know that you the perfect one
Girl when I'm with you, feel like a champion
Ever since I got with you I feel like I done won me a trophy
Trophy, I won me a trophy
I won, I won, I won a trophy
I won me a trophy
Trophy, I won me a trophy
A trophy


You the number one trophy wife
So it's only right to live the trophy life
You grew up on J. Lo, Timberlands by Manolo now
'Til one day I put an angel in your ultrasound
I wanna dip that ass in gold, I wanna dip that ass in gold
I made it over NBA, NFL players
So every time I score it's like the Super Bowl
Baby, we should hit the south of France
So you could run around without them pants
I put that glacier on your little hand
Now that's the only thing without a tan
My trophy on that Bound bike, I gave you only pipe
If people don't hate then it won't be right
You could look at Kylie, Kendall, Kourtney and Khloe
All your Mama ever made was trophies, right?

I just want to take you out and show you off
You already know that you the perfect one
Girl when I'm with you, feel like a champion
Ever since I got with you I feel like I done won me a trophy
Trophy, I won me a trophy
I won, I won, I won a trophy
I won me a trophy
Trophy, I won me a trophy
A trophy",398159
40579,296100,Dont,pop,Ed Sheeran,2014,1201734,{},"
I met this girl late last year
She said, ""Don't you worry if I disappear""
I told her I'm not really looking for another mistake
I called an old friend thinking that the trouble would wait
But then I jumped right in a week later, returned
I reckon she was only looking for a lover to burn
But I gave her my time for two or three nights
Then I put it on pause until the moment was right
I went away for months until our paths crossed again
She told me, ""I was never looking for a friend
Maybe you could swing by my room around ten
Baby, bring the lemon and a bottle of gin
We'll be in between the sheets till the late AM""
Baby, if you wanted me then you should have just said, she's singing


Don't (hhh) with my love
That heart is so cold
All over my home
I don't wanna know that babe
Don't (hhh) with my love
I told her she knows
Take aim and reload
I don't wanna know that babe

And for a couple weeks, I only wanna see her
We drink away the days with a takeaway pizza
Before, a text message was the only way to reach her
Now she's staying at my place and loves the way I treat her
Singing out Aretha, all over the track like a feature
And never wants to sleep, I guess that I don't want to either
But, me and her, we make money the same way
Four cities, two planes, the same day
And those shows have never been what it's about
But maybe we'll go together and just figure it out
I'd rather put on a film with you and sit on a couch
But we should get on a plane or we'll be missing it now
Wish I'd have written it down, the way that things played out
When she was kissing him, how I was confused about
Now she should figure it out, while I'm sat here singing


Don't (hhh) with my love
That heart is so cold
All over my home
I don't wanna know that babe
Don't (hhh) with my love
I told her she knows
Take aim and reload
I don't wanna know that babe

(Knock, knock, knock) on my hotel door
I don't even know if she knows what for
She was crying on my shoulder, I already told ya
Trust and respect is what we do this for
I never intended to be next (Get lost)
But you didn't need to take him to bed, that's all
And I never saw him as a threat (Get lost)
Until you disappeared with him to have sex, of course
It's not like we were both on tour
We were staying on the same (hhh) hotel floor
And I wasn't looking for a promise or commitment
But it was never just fun, and I thought you were different
This is not the way you realized what you wanted
It's a bit too much, too late, if I'm honest
And all this time, God knows I'm singing


Don't (hhh)  with my love
That heart is so cold
All over my home
I don't wanna know that babe
Don't (hhh) with my love
I told her she knows
Take aim and reload
I don't wanna know that babe
Don't (hhh) with my love
That heart is so cold
All over my home
I don't wanna know that babe
Don't fuck with my love
I told her she knows
Take aim and reload
I don't wanna know that babe",403031
40602,296364,Dont Tell Nobody,rb,Tink,2014,1599375,{Jeremih},"
Baby, don't tell nobody
Yeah, I know what you're saying is the truth
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company
You know we could work that out
Maybe we should work that
Maybe we should work that out
You know we could work that
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company


I just text yo phone like 30 some times in a row
You ain't gotta lie 'cause it's going on 5
And if you ain't in my bed then you laying with a ho
So fuck that love shit
I don't feel none of that
Like I'm numb to the pain, said I'm done with the game, but I'm still here running back
'Cause I already know your lingo
You talk to these hoes like you're single
You know you really love pulling fast ones
Cheat, come home and act dumb
Pussy nigga, pussy nigga, listen nigga
I see shit even when you ain't in sight
I just hold it in like it's picture time
I've been holding back for a long while
Just hoping soon it'll turn around but
How can I word this?
You ain't been perfect
Tell me you working late
Your phone losing service
And now I'm here thinking like ""This nigga tweakin""
You sorry, pathetic and far from authentic
You liar, you fronter, you just like these other, niggas
As much as I hate you, I still wanna date you
You better just hope I don't

Tell nobody
Yeah, I know what you're saying is the truth
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company
You know we could work that out
Maybe we should work that
Maybe we should work that out
You know we could work that
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company


Sick of this keep it on the DL shit
You say you with the bros when you out with a bitch
You say you at the crib when you leaving her place
I pull up to ya crib and you lie to my face
He like ""Baby, you my all and all
I was in the bathroom when I missed ya call""
Nah, you was in the backseat sweating like an athlete
Doing everything that you said you wouldn't
But I ain't gon' trip on a weak ass nigga
I'ma just find me a nigga much bigger
I'ma just do the same shit that you do when I'm not up in the room
Yeah, baby, let's think
I'ma text Bryan, Facetime Ryan
Call up Keenan, tell 'em I need him
Niggas ain't loyal, and I knew from the jump
When you showed me the ropes that I wouldn't never have trust for you
You creepin, I'm leavin, you call me, I pick up, I hang up
You text me, ""Let's link up""
Then I just say fuck it, then we end up fucking
And you start up something I said I was done with
Then it all repeats in the next 2 weeks
I'll be back on the same ""I'm done"" shit
If they only knew that I'd rather be loose
Man I'm tempted but I ain't gon'

Tell nobody
Yeah, I know what you're saying is the truth
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company](3305242)
You know we could work that out
Maybe we should work that
Maybe we should work that out
You know we could work that
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company


When I'm right there, the night gets better
You must admit we're one together
'Cause you don't talk that shit when I give you gas money
5 star chick, baby, when yo ass hungry
Good weed, good dick
Girl, you get it all from me
Plenty secrets of you and your world
Even me and you and your girls


I would never tell nobody
Yeah, I know what you're saying is the truth
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company
You know we could work that out
Maybe we should work that
Maybe we should work that out
You know we could work that
Baby, don't tell nobody
Don't front me off in front of company",403458
41287,304577,Believe Me,rap,Lil Wayne,2014,2061136,{Drake},"


I'm the only one that get the job done
I don't know a nigga that could cover for me
Yeah, got some game from my dad
He said she might say she love me
She don't love me like she say she love me
Believe me, believe me
I'm that nigga, boy they love me in the streets
I'm not tryna find nobody else to beat
I'm the one they come to see because they all
Believe me


Yeah, rip, rip rip
It's been me and Young Tune off the rip
That's the man that put me in this shit
If a nigga fuck with him, I'll put him down quick
Got a verse for anybody wanna talk about the clique
I've been takin' shit light, you don't wanna hear me trip
God damn, do y'all really know who y'all fuckin' with?
Yeah, I mean you can't blame me for wonderin'
Doesn't matter, could be winter or the summer
On the road, I do One Direction numbers, I don't fuckin' miss
Yeah, Stunna and Mack know
When Wayne was gone for eight months, we put this thing up on our back
And I was snappin' off on every single track though
Collect call from the boss like where we at though
I was like, ""Hah, it's our time, nigga""
He left Rikers in a Phantom, that's my nigga
And I'll been rockin' with the team 'til Carter IX
And we YMCMB, waitin' on somebody to try us, nigga
Yeah

I'm the only one that get the job done
I don't know a nigga that could cover for me
Yeah, got some game from my dad
He said she might say she love me
She don't love me like she say she love me
Believe me, believe me
I'm that nigga, boy they love me in the streets
I'm not tryna find nobody else to beat
I'm the one they come to see because they all
Believe me


Lord knows I'll murk one of these niggas, yeah
His and hers Ferraris, nigga
One for me, one for my daughter, nigga
Waitin' for someone to test me like a Harvard nigga
I tote a 223, two Michael Jordans, nigga
Come on, fight these shell cases like a lawyer, nigga
Find out where you stay, and act like we found some oil, nigga
Out of duct tape so when he prayin' I ignore the nigga
All I gotta say is ""sayonara, nigga""
Drop dead gorgeous but the bitch ain't dyin' for a nigga
Where the real queens at? Shout out Capone and Noreaga
We can shoot it out and see who live to tell the story later
Diamonds in my Rollie face cannot be exfoliated
They think I'm associated, I'm the one that orchestrated
Yayo get her ass whipped, whip that ass like horses racin'
Ain't 'bout what you walk away from, it's 'bout what you walk away with
Dead Presidents, them coffins vacant
I must be doin' somethin'

I'm the only one that get the job done
I don't know a nigga that could cover for me
Yeah, got some game from my dad
He said she might say she love me
She don't love me like she say she love me
Believe me, believe me
I'm that nigga, boy they love me in the streets
I'm not tryna find nobody else to beat
I'm the one they come to see because they all
Believe me


Had to get it poppin' off the rip
Rich young nigga that ain't never had to trick
Slim Thug flow but you know I like 'em thick
If she get a job at DOA, I drop her off a tip
I had to get it poppin' off the rip
I'm the one they tell yah been reppin' in the 6
Come into the city and yah niggas get to trippin'
We'll take yah to the Scarborough Bluff and drop you off a cliff
Well damn, just be happy for the man
Nirvana, Coldplay, nigga got bands
Ink from the money, got it all over my hands
Goin' out to Houston, spendin' all of my advance
V Live just took me for a cheque
""Drake you know I love you, you just took me outta debt""
Yes, right now you are lookin' at the best
Mothafuck award shows and mothafuck the press like that

Mothafuck the rest
When they jumped off the porch, I was stumblin' up the steps
I'd give what I collect before I give up my connect
It'd be a cold day in Hell, icicles made of sweat
One finger, slidin' 'cross my neck
Niggas know what that mean like they deaf
Nigga I'll fire this nina like it's her first day
On the job and the bitch overslept
Tune stay humble, nigga I'm a king
Need a horn and a drumroll
They throw mothafuckin' roses at my feet, nigga
I don't step on one rose
I'm the only one that get the job done
I don't know a nigga that can cover for me
Tape a couple kilos to the bitch stomach
She look like she got a bun in the oven from me
Preheat, believe me
All you gotta do is pay me every week
I had these bitches havin' babies every week
I'm the nigga, see me skatin' in the streets
Gone


Rip rip, nigga",419570
41469,306812,No Flex Zone,rap,Rae Sremmurd,2014,1632924,{},"
Mike WiLL Made-It
EarDrummers


(Hey) No flex zone, (Hey) no flex zone
(Hey) They know better, (Hey) they know better
(Hey) No flex zone, (Hey) no flex zone
(Hey) They know better, (Hey) they know better
Won a gold medal, and a gold bezel
I treat these hoes special, now ya ho jealous
Freak hoes, got several, they tens or better
I'm a trendsetter, I'm a go-getter


Swae Lee, Lee Swae, it's the same difference
H2O, lean, same thing
Niggas throw sets and gangbang
Free everybody in the chain gang
It's been two days since I laid down
Kool Moe Dee, five chains on
Mr. T, them rings on, say my fucking name, ho
Yeah, them diamonds so cool, yeah, that old school mine fo'
Never heard about you, all my hoes, they so rude
Tats all on me, nigga, trill-ass individual
Go and check on that nigga, sit on my Balmain zipper
Got a airtight schedule, fuck your bitch, just met her
Pink slip, no rental, got a L full of that killer
Beating on my chest like Magilla (Stand Back)
Nigga I am the gorilla of the village
Pack sound like heavy metal
Just killed the haters, God bless them

(Hey) No flex zone, (Hey) no flex zone
(Hey) They know better, (Hey) they know better
(Hey) No flex zone, (Hey) no flex zone
(Hey) They know better, (Hey) they know better
Won a gold medal, and a gold bezel
I treat these hoes special, now ya ho jealous
Freak hoes, got several, they tens or better
I'm a trendsetter, I'm a go-getter


Young niggas got to get to the money
Five chains, so they look at me funny
Showed up with the juice and the troops
Roll a seven every time I shoot
She said, ""Why you got so many condoms with you?""
I say, ""I'm a player, to be honest with you""
Hublot, woo, so shiny
Mind you, my crew right behind me
Went shopping, could've bought an island
Talking money when I'm with Italians
Spilling purple on the red carpet
And I'm flyer than that nigga on the hang glider
Four, five, six, seven chains on, just stay in your lane, ho
Don't you like these A. Wang's? Don't you like these gold fangs?
You a well-known flexer, I'm a young trendsetter
These hoes, they reckless, they slick, they messy
Three hoes freak dancing, wit' the loud, singing acapella
Chain clang like heavy metal
Sremm killed the haters, God bless them

(Hey) No flex zone, (Hey) no flex zone
(Hey) They know better, (Hey) they know better
(Hey) No flex zone, (Hey) no flex zone
(Hey) They know better, (Hey) they know better
Won a gold medal, and a gold bezel
I treat these hoes special, now ya ho jealous
Freak hoes, got several, they tens or better
I'm a trendsetter, I'm a go-getter",423398
41926,311849,Dont Tell Em,rb,Jeremih,2014,1100616,{YG},"
Mustard on the beat, ho


Rhythm is a dancer, I need a companion
Girl I guess that must be you
Body like the summer, fuckin' like no other
Don't you tell 'em what we do
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em, you ain't even
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em


Know you say you down with it
Won't tell em how you hit the ground with it
Girl, you know I'm from Chicago
I act a fool, Bobby Brown with it (in it)
Nobody take me out, though
You got gifts, bring 'em down the South Pole
Marathon doll gon' put in miles
Don't you worry 'bout him, I gon' work it out

Only is you got me feeling like this
Oh why, why, why, why, why
Loving while grabbing the rhythm of your hips
That's right, right, right, right, right


Rhythm is a dancer, I need a companion
Girl, I guess that must be you
Body like the summer, fuckin' like no other
Don't you tell 'em what we do
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em, you ain't even
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em


Girl, he fufu with it
But you know I know what to do with it
I'll give you that, girl, I'm talking laps
As if you got a pool in it
And she say she ain't with your best friends
Then let me be your diamond
You know you feeling, how your boy press play
Just keep that ass rewindin'

Only is you got me feeling like this
Oh why, why, why, why
Loving while grabbing the rhythm of your hips
That's right, right, right, right, right


Rhythm is a dancer, I need a companion
Girl, I guess that must be you
Body like the summer, fuckin' like no other
Don't you tell 'em what we do
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em, you ain't even
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em


3-1-0 9-3-4 8-6-1-6
I got a missed call from your bitch
She been plottin' on me for a cool minute
She wanna' suck my dick, and I'm cool with it
I like girls in the shower, when it's winter fresh
It's some Twitter pussy, I met on the Internet
On my late-night thirsty, 'cause it was late-night and I was thirsty
Girl, I been to that county girl, I ain't tellin'
Handcuff me to the bed, girl it ain't no bailin'
I keep a stack of hundreds, I can keep a secret
If anything you was explorin', you wasn't cheating
She got my number stored under fake names
Her nigga think she faithful, but she runnin' game
YOLO, so take me out these Polos
And we can fuck from Uno to Ocho

Only is you got me feeling like this
Oh why, why, why, why, why
Loving while grabbing the rhythm of your hips
That's right, right, right, right, right


Rhythm is a dancer, I need a companion
Girl, I guess that must be you
Body like the summer, fuckin' like no other
(I keep it on the D.L, and creep like TL
Just tell me them details, just hand me)
Don't you tell 'em what we do
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em, you ain't even
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em
You ain't even, you ain't even even gotta tell 'em
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em (no)


Right, right, right, right, right, right, right
Don't tell 'em, don't tell 'em, no
Why, why, why, why would you do (oh)
Just keep the rhythm like that, that (that, that)
Put in on like that, that (that, that)
I know you like that (that, that, that, that)
You know I want that (that, that, that, that)
Ohh oh-ohh oh-ohh oh-ohh",430538
42049,313650,About The Money,rap,T.I.,2014,1888556,"{""Young Thug""}","
(We got London On Da Track)
Woah
Yeah, man, T.I.P. in this motherfucker with me, nigga
To the max with it
Racks
I count six shots


Bustin' out the bando (Woo)
A nigga jewelry real metal like a can opener (Bling)
I went from rags to riches to a feature with Tip (Woo)
I went from Smart Card to a bitch with some smart lips (Skrrt)
And the F&N make my hip limp (Gah)
I'm goin' fishin' with these little bitty shrimp dimps (Woo)
And my bank roll got a big dip (Woo)
She gon' bring it on a big ship (Sheesh, sheesh)
Quite trill, no QuikTrip (Sheesh, sheesh)
I got thugs in the alley, know Tip here (Woo)
And she just wanna have a good day (What?)
Smoke way more weed than a guy in L.A (Damn)
Damn, I'll hold them birds 'til next May (Goddamn)
Never let 'em fly away (What?)
I heard, hey buddy
Listen what my nigga Tip say, hey

If it ain't about the money (Yeah)
Don't be blowin' me up, nigga, I ain't gettin' up (Brr)
If it ain't about the money (Hello?)
Ain't no use in you ringin' my line, stop wastin' my time (Bye bruh)
If it ain't about the money
Nah, I can't even hear what you say, I ain't finna do shit (I ain't finna do shit, my nigga)
If it ain't about the money
Bitch, you can miss me with it
Bitch nigga, miss me with it, turn it (Hey, go, tell 'em)


I pack an 11, I pack an 11, ayy (Boom, turn it)
I'm ridin' in a gator, my shoes are Giuseppe, ooh (Turn up, uh, watcha, what they say gah)
I'm slime like the reverend, I shoot at the reverend, ayy (Bah, uh nigga, boom what)
Pants out the grocery store, they stuffed with lettuce, ayy (Bankroll Mafia, go)
She try make the extras, I tell on these bitches, hey (Hustle, gah, sheesh, sheesh)
When it's 'bout time to pay, I'ma bail on these bitches, ayy (Yuh, uh uh, skrrt)


Ayy, ayy, ayy, what you think we in the neighborhood for?
Standin' at the corner store with a pocket full of dough
I'll be damned if a nigga wife a hood ho (woo)
Learned that from UGK back in ""Pocket Full of Stones""


Put your money down, I could buck a hard 4
You playin' with it, I'ma send 'em through your car door
My watch flooded, shit sick, got Parvo
I'm doin' it for black and yellow, free Hardo
The head honcho, nigga, no Tonto, nigga
I'm quick to put some bricks in a Bronco, nigga
Niggas talk shit, well, I don't respond to no nigga
No murder, no dough, no convo, nigga

If it ain't about the money
Don't be blowin' me up, nigga, I ain't gettin' up
If it ain't about the money
Ain't no use in you ringin' my line, stop wastin' my time
If it ain't about the money
Nah, I can't even hear what you say, I ain't finna do shit
If it ain't about the money
Bitch, you can miss me with it
Bitch nigga, miss me with it, turn it (Go, tell 'em)


I pack an 11, I pack an 11, ayy (Boom, turn it)
I'm ridin' in a gator, my shoes are Giuseppe, ooh (Turn up, uh, watcha, what they say gah)
I'm slime like the reverend, I shoot at the reverend, ayy (Bah, uh nigga, boom what)
Pants out the grocery store, they stuffed with lettuce, ayy (Bankroll Mafia, go)
She try make the extras, I tell on these bitches, hey (Hustle, gah)
When it's 'bout time to pay, I'ma bail on these bitches, ayy (Yuh, uh uh)


What you think we in the neighborhood for?
Standin' in the trap, slangin' good blow
Them '80s babies used to slang that crack
Buy a stolen car while he bang that AK


If you ever took a loss, better bring that back
Catch up witcha, betcha he gon' blow your brains 'bout that
Ba-bow, ayy, know you better be (better be)
On your best behavior when addressin' me
Because, bye-gones, we don't let 'em be
Niggas disrespect me, I'ma catch a felony
For real, if you listen I can get you paid
But not interested in shit you say

If it ain't about the money (nigga)
Don't be blowin' me up, nigga, I ain't gettin' up
If it ain't about the money
Ain't no use in you ringin' my line, stop wastin' my time
If it ain't about the money
Nah, I can't even hear what you say, I ain't finna do shit
If it ain't about the money
Bitch, you can miss me with it
Bitch nigga, miss me with it, turn it


I pack an 11, I pack an 11, ayy (Boom, turn it)
I'm ridin' in a gator, my shoes are Giuseppe, ooh (Turn up, uh, watcha, what they say gah)
I'm slime like the reverend, I shoot at the reverend, ayy (Bah, uh nigga, boom what)
Pants out the grocery store, they stuffed with lettuce, ayy (Bankroll Mafia, go)
She try make the extras, I tell on these bitches, hey (Hustle, gah)
When it's 'bout time to pay, I'ma bail on these bitches, ayy (Yuh, uh uh)


Ayy, ayy, ayy, what you think we in the neighborhood for?
Standin' at the corner store with a pocket full of dough
I'll be damned if a nigga wife a hood ho
Learned that from UGK back in ""Pocket Full of Stones,"" nigga",433098
42058,313803,Pills N Potions,rap,Nicki Minaj,2014,1119464,{},"
Pills and potions
We're overdosin'
I'm angry, but
I still love you
Pills and potions
We're overdosin'
Can't stand it, but
I still love you


I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love


Ayo
They could never make me hate you
Even though what you was doin' wasn't tasteful
Even though you out here lookin' so ungrateful
I'ma keep it movin', be classy and graceful
I told 'em it's no friends in the game, you ain't learn that yet
All the bridges you came over, don't burn that yet
Niggas want respect, but niggas ain't earn that yet
Self-righteous and entitled but they swearin' on the Bible
That they love you when, really, they no different from all your rivals
But I still don't wish death on 'em, I just reflect on 'em

Pills and potions
We're overdosin'
I'm angry, but
I still love you
Pills and potions
We're overdosin'
Can't stand it, but
I still love you


I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love


Yo
People'll love you and support you when it's beneficial
I'ma forgive, I won't forget, but I'ma dead the issue
Soon as you outta niggas lives is when they start to miss you
They see you doin' good, now it's kinda hard to diss you
Niggas be sick when they remember all the bad they wished you
Niggas be mad when they can't come and live lavish wit' you
Bu-bu-but I sped off in the Benzy
I see the envy when I'm causin' a frenzy (Kyuh)
So I pop pills for 'em (Rrrah)
Cop cribs in the hills on 'em

Pills and potions
We're overdosin'
I'm angry, but
I still love you
Pills and potions
We're overdosin'
Can't stand it, but
I still love you


I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love


I get high off
Your memory
I get high off
Your memory
I get high off
Your memory
In due time
We'll be fine
In due time

I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still lo-o-ove
I still love, I still love, I still love, I still love
I still love",433309
42364,316797,Thinking Out Loud,pop,Ed Sheeran,2014,1813701,{},"
When your legs don't work like they used to before
And I can't sweep you off of your feet
Will your mouth still remember the taste of my love?
Will your eyes still smile from your cheeks?
And darling, I will be loving you till we're seventy
And baby, my heart could still fall as hard at twenty-three
And I'm thinking 'bout how


People fall in love in mysterious ways
Maybe just the touch of a hand
Well me, I fall in love with you every single day
I just wanna tell you I am


So honey, now, take me into your loving arms
Kiss me under the light of a thousand stars
Place your head on my beating heart, I'm thinking out loud
And maybe we found love right where we are

When my hair's all but gone and my memory fades
And the crowds don't remember my name
When my hands don't play the strings the same way
I know you will still love me the same
'Cause, honey, your soul could never grow old, it's evergreen
And baby, your smile's forever in my mind and memory
And I'm thinking 'bout how


People fall in love in mysterious ways
And maybe it's all part of a plan
Well I'll just keep on making the same mistakes
Hoping that you'll understand


That, baby, now, take me into your loving arms
Kiss me under the light of a thousand stars
Place your head on my beating heart, I'm thinking out loud
And maybe we found love right where we are


So baby, now, take me into your loving arms
Kiss me under the light of a thousand stars
Oh darling, place your head on my beating heart, I'm thinking out loud
That maybe we found love right where we are
Oh baby, we found love right where we are
And we found love right where we are",437103
42592,319563,Lifestyle,rap,Rich Gang,2014,3575694,"{Birdman,""Young Thug"",""Rich Homie Quan""}","
I done, uh, ha, huh (Ayy)
London On Da Track, bitch
(My lifestyle)
Ayy, Rich Homie, Thugga Thugga in this mothafucka' (Yee)
Rich Homie, Thugga Thugga in this mothafucka' (Oh)
Rich Gang, Thugga Thugga baby
Got like four ounces in a 20 ounce, bitch (Ah)
I'm blessed (Hey)
(Rich Homie)


I done (Hey), did a lot of shit just to live this here lifestyle (Oh, yeah, woo)
We came straight from the bottom to the top, my lifestyle (Lifestyle, ayy)
Nigga livin' life like a beginner and this is only beginnin' (Beginnin', lil' nigga, woo)
I'm on the top of the mountain, puffin' on clouds and niggas still beginnin' (You still beginnin', lil' nigga)


Million five on the Visa card (Woo)
Hundred bands stacked look like some fuckin' Titans (Football player)
Nigga servin' great white like I'm feedin' sharks (Sheesh)
I won't do nothin' with the bitch, she can't even get me hard (Woo)
Somethin' wrong with the pussy (What?)
Even though I ain't gon' hit it, I'ma still make sure that she douche it ('Cause what?)
Me and my woadie, we don't get caught up like that, no way (No way)
We ain't got time to go see doctors, J, hey (Woo)
Who said money? (Money, nigga)
Hop up in my bed full of forty bitches, I'm yawnin' (And why?)
Hey, think this a show, bitch, I'm performin'
I do this shit for my daughters and all my sons, bitch (Woo)
I'm gonna run up them bands up, take care their funds, bitch (Are you eatin'?)
I got a moms, bitch (What?), she got a moms, bitch (She do)
I got sisters and brothers to feed (Woo)
I ain't goin' out like no idiot, I'm a OG

I done did a lot of shit just to live this here lifestyle (Livin' this shit right now)
We came straight from the bottom to the top, my lifestyle (Livin' lifestyle right now, oh)
Nigga livin' life like a beginner and this is only beginnin' (Only beginnin', lil' nigga)
I'm on the top of the mountain, puffin' on clouds and niggas still beginnin' (You still beginnin', lil' nigga)


Still screamin' ""Fuck the otherside"" (Fuck them niggas, fuck them niggas)
I'ma ride for my nigga, ayy (Quan voice)
And I'ma die for my nigga, ayy (Quan voice)
Ain't gonna be latchin' on my niggas, ayy (No way, no way)
Niggas couldn't see me if they had a genie (Woo)
I'ma live my life like Bennie, R.I.P. my brother Bennie (R.I.P.)
I stack them racks to the ceiling, now these niggas can't beat me (Racks)
I just might wake wantin' Chanel and these bitches can't see me (Woo)
I'm in a whole other league (Rich Gang)
I ain't got AIDS but I swear to God I would bleed (Suwoop)
'Til I D.I.E (Brrat)
28 floors up I feel like I could F.L.Y.E.E (Ooh)
Pee on top of these bitches (Ooh)
God told me they can never stop me so they ain't gon' stop me
I'm in that Corvette with baby mommy gettin' sloppy toppy (Skrrt, skrrt, woo)
I'm bleedin' red like a devil, I see these bitches plotting
They wanna know how I got M's and I didn't finish college (Damn)


I done did a lot of shit just to live this here lifestyle (Livin' this shit right now)
We came straight from the bottom to the top, my lifestyle (Livin' lifestyle right now, oh)
Nigga livin' life like a beginner and this is only beginnin' (Only beginnin', lil' nigga)
I'm on the top of the mountain, puffin' on clouds and niggas still beginnin' (Tell 'em)

I do it for my daddy (Ayy), I do it for my mama (I do)
Them long nights, I swear to God I do it for the come up (Come up)
I'm Willie B beatin' on my chest, in the jungle, ayy (Hey)
Money on money, I got commas in every bank
Sunday through Monday I've been grindin' with no sleep (Swear)
Talkin' 'bout takin' somethin' from me, like no way (Nah)
Thugga Thugger, that's my brother, brother (Thugger, Thugger)
You don't want no trouble trouble or you can get these fists, knuckle, knuckle (Hey)
Buckle up like a seatbelt or I'll shoot ya (Fuh fuh)
Punchin' on the gas (Skrrt), too fast, and I lose ya (Hey)
Give me a bed, and I'll do her (Hey), I want her head, Medusa (Ooh)
I swear a nigga gone 'cause this strong I'm blowin' super (OG, nigga)
Ayy, grindin' for a new day (What you doin'?)
I'm skatin', like that nigga Lupe (Swear to God)
Hey, I'm on the top just like toupee (I'm on the top, nigga)
Ayy, I'm in her mouth just like toothpaste


I've done did a lot of shit just to live this here lifestyle (Style)
We came straight from the bottom to the top, my lifestyle
Nigga livin' life like a beginner and this is only beginnin' (Beginnin', lil' nigga)
I'm on the top of the mountain, puffin' on clouds and niggas still beginnin'


Sitting in the middle of this ocean, Pacific that is
You understand me? Bunch of bad bitches, ya heard?
Popping that GTV, living that lifestyle, ya heard?
I do this for Ms. Gladys, boy - 100
",440618
43287,327248,Photograph,pop,Ed Sheeran,2014,1388171,{},"
Loving can hurt, loving can hurt sometimes
But it's the only thing that I know
When it gets hard, you know it can get hard sometimes
It is the only thing that makes us feel alive


We keep this love in a photograph
We made these memories for ourselves
Where our eyes are never closing
Hearts are never broken
And time's forever frozen, still


So you can keep me
Inside the pocket of your ripped jeans
Holding me closer 'til our eyes meet
You won't ever be alone, wait for me to come home


Loving can heal, loving can mend your soul
And it's the only thing that I know, know
I swear it will get easier, remember that with every piece of ya
And it's the only thing we take with us when we die

We keep this love in a photograph
We made these memories for ourselves
Where our eyes are never closing
Hearts were never broken
And time's forever frozen, still


So you can keep me
Inside the pocket of your ripped jeans
Holding me closer 'til our eyes meet
You won't ever be alone
And if you hurt me, well that's okay, baby
Only words bleed inside these pages, you just hold me
And I won't ever let you go
Wait for me to come home


Wait for me to come home
Wait for me to come home
Wait for me to come home


Oh, you can fit me
Inside the necklace you got when you were 16
Next to your heartbeat where I should be
Keep it deep within your soul
And if you hurt me, well that's okay, baby
Only words bleed inside these pages
You just hold me
And I won't ever let you go

When I'm away, I will remember how you kissed me
Under the lamppost back on Sixth street
Hearing you whisper through the phone
""Wait for me to come home""",451776
43606,332106,Often,rb,The Weeknd,2014,2437823,{},"


Seneler sürer her günüm
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah
Yalnız gitmekten yorgunum
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah
Seneler sürer her günüm
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah
Yalnız gitmekten yorgunum
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah


I usually love sleeping all alone
This time around bring your friend with you
But we ain't really going to sleep at all
You ain't gonna catch me with them sneak pictures, sneak pictures
In my city, I'm a young God
That pussy kill be so vicious
My God white, he in my pocket
He get me redder than the devil 'til I go nauseous (Oh)

She asked me if I do this every day, I said, ""Often""
Asked how many times she rode the wave, ""Not so often"" (Baby)
Bitches down to do it either way, often
Baby I can make that pussy rain, often
Often, often, girl I do this often
Make that pussy poppin', do it how I want it
Often, often, girl I do this often
Make that pussy poppin', do it how I want it
Often


Infatuated by the fame status
She wanna ride inside the G-Class grey 'matic (Oh)
I come around, she leave that nigga like he ain't matter
That girl been drinkin' all day, need to change bladder
She's just happy that the crew's back in town
She 'bout to go downtown for a whole hour
If I had her, you can have her, man it don't matter
I'm never sour, I'm just smokin' somethin' much louder


She asked me if I do this every day, I said, ""Often""
Asked how many times she rode the wave, ""Not so often""
Bitches down to do it either way, often
Baby I can make that pussy rain, often
(Baby, I can make that pussy rain)
Often, often, girl I do this often
Make that pussy poppin', do it how I want it
Often, often, girl I do this often
Make that pussy poppin', do it how I want it
Often

Ooh, the sun's risin' up
The night's almost up
The night's almost done
But I see your eyes
You wanna go again
Girl, I'll go again
Girl, I'll go again


She asked me if I do this every day, I said, ""Often""
Asked how many times she rode the wave, ""Not so often""
Bitches down to do it either way, often
(Bitches down to do it either way)
Baby I can make that pussy rain, often (Oh, oh-oh-oh)
Often, often, girl I do this often
Make that pussy poppin', do it how I want it
Often, often, girl I do this often
Make that pussy poppin', do it how I want it
Often


Seneler sürer her günüm
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah
Yalnız gitmekten yorgunum
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah
Seneler sürer her günüm
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah
Yalnız gitmekten yorgunum
Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah",460183
43880,335176,Hot Nigga,rap,Bobby Shmurda,2014,5208000,{},"
Y'all tryna make a next motherfuckin' scene up in here, huh?
It's fucking Shmurda she wrote (Ah-ah-ahh)
How much Shmoney's that?
(Nah-ah-ahh! Ah-ahh!)
Grr-r-r-r!
Jahlil Beats, holla at me


And Chewy, I'm some hot nigga (Hot nigga)
Like I talk to Shyste when I shot niggas (What's good?)
Like you seen him twirl, then he drop, nigga (Seen him drop!)
And we keep them nine millis on my block, nigga
And Monte keep it on him, he done dropped niggas
And Trigger, he be wilding, he some hot nigga
Tones known to get busy with them Glocks, nigga
Try to run down and you can catch a shot, nigga
Running through these checks 'til I pass out (Pass out)
And shorty give me neck 'til I pass out (Pass out)
I swear to God, all I do is cash out (All I do)
And if you ain't a ho, get up out my trap house!
I been selling crack since like the fifth grade (Like the fifth grade)
Really never made no difference what the shit made (What the shit made)
Jaja taught me flip them packs and how to maintain (How to maintain)
Get that money back and spend it on the same thang
Shawty like the way that I ball out (Ball out)
I be getting money 'til I fall out (Fall out)
You talking cash, dog, I goes all out (All out)
Shorty love the way that I floss out (Floss out!)
Free Greezy, though, let all of my dogs out (Let my dogs out)
Mama said no pussycats inside my doghouse (Pussy nigga)
That's what got my daddy locked up in the dog pound (Huh)
Free Phantom though, let all of my dogs out
We gon' pull up in that hooptie like we cops on 'em
With M16s, we gon' put some shots on 'em
I send a lil' thot to send the drop on him (Send it, send it)
She gon' call me up and I'ma sic the hots on him (And I'ma, and I'ma)
Grimey savage, that's what we are (We are)
Grimey shooters dressed in G-Star (Star)
GS9, I go so hard (Hard)
But GS for my gun squad (That's for my gun squad)
And, bitch, if it's a problem, we gon' gun-brawl (Bow nigga!)
Shots popping out the AR (B-B-B-Bow, nigga!)
I'm with Trigger, I'm with Rasha, I'm with A-Rod (B-B-B-Bow, nigga!)
Broad daylight and we gon' let them things bark
Tell them niggas free Meeshie, ho (Free Meeshie)
SUBwave, free Breezy, ho (Free Breezy, ho)
And tell my niggas, Shmurda teaming, ho (Shmurda teaming, ho)
Mitch caught a body about a week ago, week ago
Fuck with us and then we tweaking, ho, tweaking, ho
Run up on that nigga, get to squeezing, ho, squeezing, ho
Everybody catching bullet holes, bullet holes (B-B-B-Boom!)
Niggas got me on my bully, yo, bully, yo
I'ma run up, put that gun on him (That gun on him)
I'ma run up, go dumb on him (Dumb on him)
Niggas got me on that young shit (That young shit)
Got me on that go-dumb shit (Dumb shit)

Got me on that go-dumb shit, man
Trap mode in this motherfucker
Hotter than a bitch
Ayo, pour up! I need some more drank",466028
44134,338496,About Genius,misc,Genius,2009,1251607,{},"Genius celebrates More Than The Music-the lyrics, the stories behind the songs, and the creative connections that meaningfully drive culture.

We champion curiosity and believe that everyone has music knowledge to share: insights, intel, and musings that make us more informed, engaged music lovers. As the world's biggest music encyclopedia with a passionate community of more than two million contributors, Genius is a destination for artists, creatives, and superfans to discuss and deconstruct all things music.

Through our original content, technology, and live & virtual experiences, Genius spotlights the artists who are shaping music culture across every genre and musical discipline, sharing the stories behind their creativity and craft in their own words.

More Genius information:Genius sizzleHow Genius Works: Our Contributor GuideJobs at GeniusGenius on YouTubeGenius on TikTokGenius on InstagramGenius on TwitterGenius on FacebookGenius on SnapchatGenius Live",474187
44226,339548,September,rb,"Earth, Wind & Fire",1978,1574242,"{""Earth / Wind & Fire""}","
Do you remember
The 21st night of September?
Love was changin' the minds of pretenders
While chasin' the clouds away
Our hearts were ringin'
In the key that our souls were singin'
As we danced in the night, remember
How the stars stole the night away, oh, yeah


Hey, hey, hey
Ba-dee-ya, say, do you remember?
Ba-dee-ya, dancin' in September
Ba-dee-ya, never was a cloudy day


Ba-du-da, ba-du-da, ba-du-da, ba-du
Ba-du-da, ba-du, ba-du-da, ba-du
Ba-du-da, ba-du, ba-du-da

My thoughts are with you
Holdin' hands with your heart to see you
Only blue talk and love, remember
How we knew love was here to stay
Now December
Found the love that we shared in September
Only blue talk and love, remember
The true love we share today


Hey, hey, hey
Ba-dee-ya, say, do you remember?
Ba-dee-ya, dancin' in September
Ba-dee-ya, never was a cloudy day
There was a-
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), say, do you remember?
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), dancin' in September
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), golden dreams were shiny days


The bell was ringin', oh, oh
Our souls were singin'
Do you remember never a cloudy day? Yow


There was a
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), say, do you remember?
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), dancin' in September
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), never was a cloudy day
And we'll say
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), say, do you remember?
Ba-dee-ya (Dee-ya, dee-ya), dancin' in September
Ba-dee-ya (Dee ya, dee-ya),  golden dreams were shiny days

Ba-dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya
Ba-dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya
Ba-dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya!
Ba-dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya
Ba-dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya
Ba-dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya, dee-ya!",476552
44274,340337,Battle Rap Freestyle,rap,Insanity,2014,2862106,{},"Battle Rap (Freestyle)



Verse]
I hear you talkin' shit, bro you think you're the heat
Please bow down to defeat you're barely mince meat
Stop with the street talk, and start to do the street, walk
Lock yourself in and tell me this, how you gonna battle with this sick shit that I spit bitch
See you still flappin' your jaws, prepare to be thrown in the ocean
In the middle with jaws
Or prefer to be served and severed with claws, knock on the doors Of absolute death you may
But please be ready for the automatic failures you may make
So take this and wait for another dismembering, remembering
The tethering of your dream and how it was minced to pieces
Believe in yourself please, to save you now you'll be needin'
Help from Jesus
You think I'm copy, pastin' please, tell me how you're actin' up
Better be quite or I'ma bout to bitch smack your mouth shut
For good, yeah man talk the hood talk better go back and walk the hood walk you ain't had the taste of a real G
Get back down to your level and prepare to be beat
Writin' on your sheet, like you're deep please bitch your weak
You ain't on my level or a level at all, take a vacation
Up the damn wall and fall
Humpty Dumpty, I must be rusty but you better knock the shit Down if you goin' against me
I'm hard to beat, you're hardly cheese compared to these beats And this emcee
You ready, alright, so come on down, I bet you to do it
Let's see if you got the balls or if you're just truant
To me, yeah let's keep an eye, on your ass as the heat intensifies
Talk to me in a smart tone, prepare to meet your demise
Throw you, a hundred million miles is what I'm finna do
Call me Son Goku
I already told you, what I'm gonna do, finna plow through
Yeah man try to tackle a topic more intense then mine
I always rap from the heart, make the fake rappers sigh
But I really really don't give at all a flying fuck
My chance of making this shit is the same as seein' a flyin' truck
Or it could all depend on some serious luck
Maybe I'll release a track that is heard my millions
Make it big and to the top and make billions
But that's a dream for another day, I'm here to take you down
Don't care what you say
Freestylin' this rap shit to the grave
Rap battlin' bitches in my spare time for loose change
Please, all of you fake ass rappers are plan
Make like like a plane and take the next trip away
Far away, from here I don't need to here your shit anymore
I'm tired of it now, next place to be, will be a fuckin' morgue
But let me just let you all know this, I'm sick of it, all of it
So listen next time I write another track
Listen to the facts I spit, and find it through my old wack rap crap
I know I've said some shit, that know I demise
But just look at my own and, your own life
But this time, through my eyes
I got a couple little bitches that need a little call out
But I'll reside, got more and more, don't get me wrong
Now get the fuck back home and call your mom
Continue to rap please, just leave me alone
I'm done hearing wack disses like this
I'm sick of this, listening to this petty as shit
Bitch",477854
44277,340439,Recognize,rb,PARTYNEXTDOOR,2014,1911075,{Drake},"


Gotta get real again, gotta get real again, oh


Know, you got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas


I want you, I want you
To turn up on me every night when I see you
Better recognize when I see you
I really want you, you, you
Hit the club for you, you, you
Lightskin got you new, new, do
Even look like Lauren Lo too
I be tripping, but this money ain't
Hit the strip, check my money length
Sorry if my whip covered in dank
Cause I've been rollin' with this skunk all day
All these bitches know that you're my nigga
I ain't trippin' off of any of your niggas
Cause I don't care about your nigga, four niggas
Five niggas, six niggas, I ain't give a shit about shit, nigga
Girl I see you

Know, you got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas


I want you, I want you
To turn up on me every night when I see you
Better recognize when I see you
I really want you, you, you
Hit the club for you, you, you
Lightskin got you new, new, do
Even look like Lauren Lo too
I be tripping, but this money ain't
Hit the strip, check my money length
Sorry if my whip covered in dank
Cause I've been rollin' with this skunk all day
All these bitches know that you're my nigga
I ain't trippin' off of any of your niggas
Cause I don't care about your nigga, four niggas
Five niggas, six niggas, I ain't give a shit about shit, nigga
Girl I see you


Only special request fi the gyal dem
From north, south, east and west
For the body ah look good you know y'haffi
God bless, bruk wild, bruk a man spine
God bless, bruk wild, bruk a man spine

(Gotta get real again)
Girl you must be doin' magic
Girl you must be doin' magic
Turn fuckin' you to a habit
I could name a lot of things any other man
Won't do for you, I do for you
When I hit you at your condo real late
Check the scene and see if you straight
Then cut like kids cake
I got that feelin' for you, that feelin' that you crave
Each time I do it for you, I make that bad pussy behave
Now pop it, bottles, the top is so open
The budget, I'm Party so fuck it
The concierge told me
My new baby looking like LeToya Luckett
Let my money get older and older
And older and older like Regis
And she will not fuck with no broke niggas
No, nigga, only the richest


Know, you got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas and I got bitches
You got niggas and I got bitches (Got bitches)
You got niggas

I want you, I want you
To turn up on me every night when I see you
Better recognize when I see you
I really want you, you, you
Hit the club for you, you, you
Lightskin got you new, new, do
Even look like Lauren Lo too
I be tripping, but this money ain't
Hit the strip, check my money length
Sorry if my whip covered in dank
'Cause I've been rollin' with this skunk all day
All these bitches know that you're my nigga
I ain't trippin' off of any of your niggas
'Cause I don't care about your nigga, four niggas
Five niggas, six niggas, I ain't give a shit about shit, nigga
Girl, I see you


Yeah, shout the girls from the East
Who know what's good with me, yeah (Girl, let's)
Shout the ones from the West
Know what's good with PND, oh-oh (Girl, let's)
Stories of you and your girls is all I hear (Girl, let's)
Who do you fuck in the city when I'm not there?
I owe you time
Let's plan somethin' out when I come back from Europe
Swear I'm withholdin' my urges
'Til you get this one-on-one shit like your name Katie Couric
I gotta get you those snow tires for your Mercedes
I'm glad you reminded me, baby
All of these things slip my mind; it's been crazy
Bite on your shoulder, I know that's your favorite
Touching yourself to that video we made a month ago
You a freak and your cover's blown
How you talked me into sendin' that to you, I'll never know
Fuck it, girl; I'm 'bout whatever though
Yeah, I guess a nigga just believe in you and that's proof for you
Could name a lot of things any other man won't do for you
I'll do it for you, that's real


I want you
To turn up on me every night when I see you
Better recognize when I see you
I really want you, you, you
Hit the club for you, you, you
Lightskin got you new, new, do
Even look like Lauren Lo too
I be tripping, but this money ain't
Hit the strip, check my money length
Sorry if my whip covered in dank
'Cause I've been rollin' with this skunk all day
All these bitches know that you're my nigga
I ain't trippin' off of any of your niggas
'Cause I don't care about your nigga, four niggas
Five niggas, six niggas, I ain't give a shit about shit, nigga
Girl, I see you",477863
44404,341778,All Day,rap,Kanye West,2015,1665899,"{""Paul McCartney"",""Theophilus London"",""Allan Kingdom""}","
All day, nigga
Dance, ayy, ayy ayy ayy


All day, nigga
How long you niggas ball? All day, nigga
How much time you spent at the mall? All day, nigga
How many runners do you got on call? All day, nigga
Swish, swish, how long they keep you in court? All day, nigga
Take you to get this fly? All day, nigga
Tell your P.O. how-how long you been high? All day, nigga
You already know I'm straight from the Chi, all day, nigga
South, south, south side! All day, nigga


This Ye, nigga
Shoppin' for the winter and it's just May, nigga
Ball so hard, man, this shit cray, nigga
And you ain't gettin' money 'less you got eight figures
For that Jesus piece, man, I've been saved, nigga
Just talked to Farrakhan, that's sensei, nigga
Told him I've been on ten since the 10th grade, nigga
Got a middle finger longer than Dikembe, my nigga, uh
I don't let 'em play with me
I don't let 'em talk to me no kind of way
Uh, they better watch what they say to me
Niggas still gettin' popped on the day to day
Yeah, I still got the hundred with the small face, nigga
Might spend 50 racks on my off day, nigga
You a fake Denzel like the Allstate nigga
If you run into me, better have Allstate with yah
You a Rico Suave nigga
Ride 'round listen to Sade, nigga
If you ain't with us, you in our way, nigga
You an actor, you should be on Broadway, nigga
'Cause you do shit the broad way, nigga
Your bitch got a ass, but my broad way thicker
Late for the class, in the hallway, nigga
Yeah, the dropout at it as always nigga, as always
All day, nigga

I took a young sweet breath, and I reached into my Earth
Gave him what I had left
At that moment, I dispersed
At that moment, I dispersed


All day, nigga
How-h-how long you ball? All day, nigga
How much time you spent at the mall? All day, nigga
How long it take you to get this fly, fly? All day, nigga
Tell your P.O. how-how long you been high, high? All day, nigga
Pour some Hen out for my niggas that died, all day, nigga
And I keep a bad bitch on the passenger side, all day, nigga
You already know I'm straight from the Chi, all day, nigga
South, south, south side! All day, nigga


I could do this all day, boy, I'm finna turn this bitch out
Any day Ye in the streets, boy, there's been a mothafuckin' drought
Don't really matter what I make, boy, you know I still go wild
Like a light-skinned slave, boy, we in the mothafuckin' house!
Right now, you lookin' real sus right now
I swear I've been on this flight like a month right now
Stupid niggas gettin' money, Forrest Gump right now
Shout-out to Jackie Chan, I need to stunt right now
They've been lookin' at the Gram, I've been lookin' at the Grammys
Like, huh, that's us right now (Right now)
24/7, 365 days, everybody gettin' paid (Go crazy)
Niggas lookin' at me like I'm worth both MJs
People saying, ""Ye, Ye, take it easy""
20 Gs for the Yeezys off of eBay
Niggas do the most and they ain't done shit
Only way I can sum it up, sumbitch

(Hands up, hands up, hands up)
Hands up, hands up, hands up
So won't you dance? ayy, ayy ayy ayy
(All day, nigga)


I took a young sweet breath, and I reached into my Earth
Gave him what I had left
At that moment I dispersed
At that moment I dispersed


Get low, alright
Get low, alright
What up? Alright, alright
Stay low, alright
Stay low, alright
Stay low, alright
South, south, south side! All day, nigga


Whistling


Well, well, well, let me run (let me run)
Let me run to see who came undone
You've been right in my face
Let me run 'til you're off my case
Whooooa, whooooa
Whooooa, whooooa
Whooooa, whooooa
Whooooa, whooooa
[Produced by Velous, Kanye West, Diddy and Charlie Heat; Co-produced by Mike Dean, French Montana and Noah Goldstein; Additional production by Plain Pat, Travi$ Scott, Allen Ritter & Mario Winans]",482233
44493,342858,King of the Fall,rb,The Weeknd,2014,1239630,{},"
I'm Addy'd up, add it up, I just ate a plate for breakfast
Put it in a cup, then I mix it up with Texas
Chest feeling heavy like a midget on my necklace
Bitches that we came with got all of your bitches jealous (oh!)
'Bout to leave the crib with a couple of my pirates
Driving by the streets we used to walk through like a triumph
Mix it in a potion like a science
That liquid G diet got a nigga so quiet
'Cause the shit so strong, got me feeling like I'm dyin'
Shit so raw, nothing else can get me higher
Only time you see me's when I'm balling with my niggas
'Cause my life too private, my ride too private (oh!)
My flight too private, my shows so riot
My jaw so tired, I go all night in my city 'til the fall
Then it's time for me to fly her
I got a girl at home even though she ain't mine yet


And she gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
She gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
She gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
She gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
Baby girl, you know what I like
Baby, you know just what I like
Baby, you know what I like, like, like, like, like

Don't be mad, let her get hers
Don't be mad, let her get hers
She made her own luck, she don't give a fuck
She's tryna have fun, take a break from the love
Man, your girl so bad, let me get her
Your girl so bad, let me get her
I make my own luck, I make that pussy talk
On call till the fall, he can like it or not, nigga, back the fuck up
If you ain't with me, motherfucker, you against me
If you ain't complimentin' nigga, you offendin'
I've been out here last year wasting hella time
XO is the only time invested
Them Fall shows every year like a birthday
And I'ma do it every year in my birthplace
And I ain't been this gone since Thursday
I never said that I'd be sober in the first place


And she gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
She gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
She gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
She gon' give it up 'cause she know I might like it
Baby girl, you know what I like
Baby, you know just what I like
Baby, you know what I like, like, like, like, like

Baby girl, you know what I like
Baby, you know just what I like, mm


I just passed that ""nigga fell off"" stage
Just sold out the O2 at my own pace
I can say that I'm attached to nobody
I've been getting paper while these niggas tryna stop me
Shout my nigga Doc, that's a mentor
Had some bad business, nothing personal
But now that word out that we back
On some young Quincy Jones, dark skin Michael Jackson
And these the motherfuckers that they packaged
Their new shit all be soundin' like my past shit
Bring your girl to my show, give her floor seats
Then she go downtown like she owe me
XO, XO, XO
Mix it up, pour it up, take it down slow
This my sound, nigga, fuck your sound
Did it from the ground, ask around, bitch
When I touch down, I'ma shake shit up
Fuck your new man, I'ma break it up
He can come back when I go on the road
But that pussy mine for the next three months
'Cause the kid back, kid back, kid back
Cop ten whips for my niggas when we land
Queen Street nigga making money overseas
Had a few more debts, I'ma pay it all in cash
Shout out XO, shout out to the boy
Broke bread on tour, man, it's all love now
Shout my nigga Stix, doing good in these streets
Bet he popping more bottles than us right now
Reason why they stressing, city never sunny
When the kid come through with more niggas than Apollo
But ain't shit funny, can't nobody stop me
All my hoes are trained, I make all of them swallow

All of them swallow, all of them swallow
All of them swallow, I make all of them swallow
All of them swallow, all of them swallow
All of them swallow, I make all of them swallow
All of them swallow, all of them swallow
All of them swallow, I make all of them swallow
All of, all of, all of them swallow
All of them swallow, I make all of them swallow",481816
44551,343537,Club Going Up on a Tuesday,rap,iLoveMakonnen,2014,1108441,{​iLoveMakonnen},"
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy


Working Monday night, on the corner flipping hard
Made at least three thousand, on the Boulevard
I've been working graveyard, shifts every other weekend
Ain't got no fucking time to party on the weekend
I've been flipping in the house, making juugs on the highway
I've been riding out of state, making money like my way
I don't think that I should dance, I'm just gon have another drink
I'm doing my stance, you know my molly pink
I've got the loudest of the loud, you know my gas stink
My P.O. think I'm in the house, don't give a damn about what she think

Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy


It ain't no way no how
I made it on my own, I made my own style
I don't think that I should stay, you know I gotta go
You moving too fast, don't want to take it slow


Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy
Got the club going up on a Tuesday
Got yo girl in the cut and she choosy",482932
44612,344272,Anaconda,rap,Nicki Minaj,2014,1871946,{},"
My anaconda don't, my anaconda don't
My anaconda don't want none unless you got buns, hun


Boy toy named Troy used to live in Detroit
Bi-big dope dealer money, he was gettin' some coins
Was in shootouts with the law, but he live in a palace
Bo-bought me Alexander McQueen, he was keeping me stylish
Now that's real, real, real
Gun in my purse, bitch, I came dressed to kill
Who wanna go first? I had them pushing daffodils
I'm high as hell, I only took a half a pill
I'm on some dumb shit


By the way, what he say?
He can tell I ain't missing no meals
Come through and fuck him in my automobile
Let him eat it with his grills and he tellin' me to chill
And he telling me it's real, that he love my sex appeal
Say he don't like 'em boney, he want something he can grab
So I pulled up in the Jag, and I hit him with the jab like
Dun-d-d-dun-dun-d-d-dun-dun

My anaconda don't, my anaconda don't
My anaconda don't want none unless you got buns, hun


Oh my gosh, look at her butt
Oh my gosh, look at her butt
Oh-Oh-Oh-Oh my gosh, look at her butt
Look at her butt, look at, look at, look at, look at her butt


Thi-this dude named Michael used to ride motorcycles
Di-dick bigger than a tower, I ain't talking about Eiffel's
Real country-ass nigga, let me play with his rifle
Pussy put his ass to sleep, now he calling me NyQuil
Now that bang, bang, bang
I let him hit it 'cause he slang cocaine
He toss my salad like his name Romaine
And when we done, I make him buy me Balmain
I'm on some dumb shit


By the way, what he say?
He can tell I ain't missing no meals
Come through and fuck him in my automobile
Let him eat it with his grills, and he telling me to chill
And he telling me it's real, that he love my sex appeal
He say he don't like 'em boney, he want something he can grab
So I pulled up in the Jag, Mayweather with the jab like
Dun-d-d-dun-dun-d-d-dun-dun...

My anaconda don't, my anaconda don't
My anaconda don't want none unless you got buns, hun


Oh my gosh, look at her butt
Oh my gosh, look at her butt (I-ohhaha)
Oh-Oh-Oh-Oh my gosh, look at her butt
Look at her butt, look at, look at, look at, look at her butt


Little in the middle but she got much back
Little in the middle but she got much back
Little in the middle but she got much back
Oh my God, look at her butt


My anaconda don't, my anaconda don't
My anaconda don't want none unless you got buns, hun
D-D-D-Don't, my anaconda don't...
D-D-Don't want none unless you got buns, hun


Oh my gosh, look at her butt
(Little in the middle but she got much back)
Oh my gosh, look at her butt
(Little in the middle but she got much back)
Oh-Oh-Oh-Oh my gosh, look at her butt
(Little in the middle but she got much back)
Look at her butt, look at, look at, look at, look at her butt

Yeah, he love this fat ass, hahahahahahahaha!
Yeah, this one is for my bitches with a fat ass in the fucking club
I said, where my fat ass big bitches in the club?
Fuck those skinny bitches, fuck those skinny bitches in the club
I wanna see all the big fat-ass bitches in the muthafuckin' club
Fuck you if you skinny, bitches, what? C'Yeah
Hahahaha, rrrrrrr
C'Yeah, I got a big fat ass, c'yeah, come on!",483960
44720,345788,Bang Bang,pop,"Jessie J, Ariana Grande & Nicki Minaj",2014,1324498,"{""Jessie J / Ariana Grande & Nicki Minaj""}","
She got a body like an hourglass
But I can give it to you all the time
She got a booty like a Cadillac
But I can send you into overdrive, oh


You've been waiting for that
Step on up, swing your bat
See, anybody could be bad to you
You need a good girl to blow your mind, yeah


Bang, bang into the room (I know you want it)
Bang, bang all over you (I'll let you have it)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Oh)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, hey!)
Bang, bang, there goes your heart (I know you want it)
Back, back seat of my car (I'll let you have it)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Oh)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, hey!)

She might'a let you hold her hand in school
But I'ma show you how to graduate (Mm-hmm)
No, I don't need to hear you talk the talk
Just come and show me what your momma gave ya, baby


I heard you've got a very big (Shhh)
Mouth but don't say a thing
See, anybody could be good to you
You need a bad girl to blow your mind


Bang, bang into the room (I know you want it)
Bang, bang all over you (I'll let you have it)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Oh)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, hey!)
Bang, bang, there goes your heart (There goes your heart now, I know you want it)
Back, back seat of my car (Seat of my car, I'll let you have it)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Oh)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, hey!)


You know what, girls?
Let me show you how to do it

It's Myx Moscato, it's frizz in a bottle, it's Nicki Full Throttle, it's oh, oh
Swimming in The Grotto, we winning in the lotto, we dipping in the Powder Blue four-door
Kitten so good, it's dripping on wood, get a ride in the engine that could go
Batman, robbin' it, bang, bang, cockin' it, Queen Nicki dominant, prominent
It's me, Jessie, and Ari, if they test me, they sorry
Ride his uh like a Harley then pull off in his Ferrari
If he hangin', we bangin', phone rangin', he slangin'
It ain't karaoke night, but get the mic, 'cause I'm singin'
Uh, B to the A to the N to the G to the (Baby, baby, baby, bae, ba-baby)
Uh, B to the A to the N to the G to the, hey


See, anybody could be good to you
You need a bad girl to blow your mind, your mind (Okay)
Hey


Bang, bang into the room (Oh, I know you want it)
Bang, bang all over you (I'll let you have it, b-bang, bang, bang, bang, baby)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Oh)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, yeah!) (Kyuh, uh-huh)
Bang, bang, there goes your heart (There goes your heart, I know you want it)
Back, back seat of my car (I'll let you have it)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Let me take you there)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, hey!)
Bang, bang into the room (I know you want it)
Bang, bang all over you (I'll let you have it), yo, I said
Bang, bang, bang, ba-bang, bang
Bang, bang, bang, bang, ba-bang, bang
Bang, bang, there goes your heart (I know you want it)
Back, back seat of my car (I'll let you have it)
Wait a minute, let me take you there (Oh)
Wait a minute 'til you (Oh, hey!)",486355
44931,347876,Flawless Remix,pop,Beyonc,2014,1765313,"{""Nicki Minaj"",Beyoncé}","
Dum-da-de-da
Do, do, do, do, do, do
(Coming down, dripping candy on the ground)


It's that Yoncé, your Yoncé
In that lingerie, on that chardonnay
Scoring touchdowns on your runway
I'm Texas forever, like Bun B
And I'm Ramboing these hoes
I'm really rit' like Donjae
I'm camo-ing these hoes
These thots can't clock me nowadays
You wish I was your pound cake
Boy, you know I look good as fuck
Wish I was your baby momma
Want me to come around and give you good karma
But no, we escalating, up in this bitch, like elevators
Of course sometimes shit go down
When it's a billion dollars on an elevator
Of course sometimes shit go down
When it's a billion dollars on an elevator
Ha-ha! God damn, God damn, God damn!!!

Momma taught me good home training
My Daddy taught me how to love my haters
My sister told me I should speak my mind
My man made me feel so God damn fine (I'm flawless!)


You wake up, flawless, post up, flawless
Ridin' round in it, flawless, flossin' on that, flawless
This diamond, flawless, my diamond, flawless
This rock, flawless, my Roc, flawless
I woke up like this, I woke up like this
We flawless, ladies tell 'em
I woke up like this, I woke up like this
We flawless, ladies tell 'em
Say ""I look so good tonight""
God damn, God damn
Say ""I look so good tonight""
God damn, God damn, God damn


I wake up looking this good
(God damn, God damn, God damn)
And I wouldn't change it if I could
(If I if I, if I, if I)
And you can say what you want, I'm the shit
(What you want I'm the shit, I'm the shit)
I'm the shit, I'm the shit, I'm the shit
I want everyone to feel like this tonight
God damn, God damn, God damn!

(Onika...)


Looking Trinidadian, Japanese and Indian
Got Malaysian, got that yaki, that wavy Brazilian, uh
Them bitches thirsty, I'm Hungarian
Nicki, B, be eating diamond fangs, barbarian, rahhh
Yo, like MJ doctor, they killing me
Propofol, I know they hope I fall
But tell 'em winning is my motherfuckin' protocol
'Cause I score before I ever throw the ball
These bitches washed up and ain't no fuckin' soap involved, uh
This every hood nigga dream, fantasizin' 'bout Nicki and B
Curvalicious, pussy served delicious
Mayday, mayday, Earth to bitches
Slap these hoes on they ass, like we birthing bitches
Uh, The Queen of Rap, slayin' with Queen B
If you ain't on the team, you playin' for team D
'Cause we A-listers, we paid sisters
This watch right here, done phased blizzards
I confess, I woke up like this
All this drank in my cup like this
All this ass on that flawless dick
Instagram, another flawless pic
Flawless city, with these flawless titties
I got all these hundreds, you got all them fifties
I'm with some flawless bitches, 'cause they more than pretty
'Cause niggas love bad bitches that be on they grizzly
Throw that ass back, I be on my frisbee
Princess-cut diamonds, on my Disney
He want ""Monster Nicki"", in Sri Lanka
I told him, ""Meet me at the Trump, Ivanka""
I said ""Come here, let me show you, how this cookie taste""
This that, ""Yeah nigga, eat the cookie"" face

(Right, right, right)",489227
45039,349182,Navy Seal Copypasta,misc,Copypasta,2010,1402406,{},"What the fuck did you just fucking say about me, you little bitch? I'll have you know I graduated top of my class in the Navy Seals, and I've been involved in numerous secret raids on Al-Quaeda, and I have over 300 confirmed kills.

I am trained in gorilla warfare and I'm the top sniper in the entire US armed forces. You are nothing to me but just another target. I will wipe you the fuck out with precision the likes of which has never been seen before on this Earth, mark my fucking words.

You think you can get away with saying that shit to me over the Internet? Think again, fucker. As we speak I am contacting my secret network of spies across the USA and your IP is being traced right now so you better prepare for the storm, maggot. The storm that wipes out the pathetic little thing you call your life. You're fucking dead, kid. I can be anywhere, anytime, and I can kill you in over seven hundred ways, and that's just with my bare hands.

Not only am I extensively trained in unarmed combat, but I have access to the entire arsenal of the United States Marine Corps and I will use it to its full extent to wipe your miserable ass off the face of the continent, you little shit. If only you could have known what unholy retribution your little ""clever"" comment was about to bring down upon you, maybe you would have held your fucking tongue.

But you couldn't, you didn't, and now you're paying the price, you goddamn idiot. I will shit fury all over you and you will drown in it.

You're fucking dead, kiddo.",491196
45219,351497,Tuesday,rap,iLoveMakonnen,2014,1285285,"{Drake,​iLoveMakonnen}","
Sonny Digital
Metro Boomin want some more, nigga


Got the club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey


Squad goin' up
Nobody flippin' packs now
I just did three in a row
Them shows is back-to-back to back now
Put the world on our sound
You know PARTY and The Weeknd
Ain't got no motherfuckin' time
To party on the weekend
Tell Gelo bring the juice
We about to get lit
Fill the room up with some tings
One night off and this is it
Always workin' OT
Overtime and out of town
Shit is crazy back home
It kills me that I'm not around
I think we gettin' too deep
Shit I'm talkin' might be too true
Upstairs I got Xans in an Advil bottle
I don't take them shits but you do
So I got 'em for you
I don't need the pills
I'm just gon' have another drink
And when I'm puttin' work in on a weekend
I'll look back on this and think
How we had the club going up

Goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey


Workin' Monday night
On the corner flippin' hard
Made at least three thousand
On the boulevard
I've been workin' graveyard
Shifts every other weekend
Ain't got no fuckin' time
To party on the weekend
I've been flippin' in the house
Makin' juggs on the highway
I've been ridin' out of state
Makin' money like my way
I don't think that I should dance
I'm just gon' have another drink
I'm doin' my stance
You know my molly pink
I got the loudest of the loud
You know my gas stink
My P.O. think I'm in the house
Don't give a damn 'bout what she think

Got the club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey


It ain't no way, no how
I made it on my own
I made my own style
I don't think that I should stay
You know I gotta go
Been moving too fast
Don't wanna take it slow


Got the club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Club goin' up on a Tuesday
Got your girl in the cut and she choosey
Got the club goin' up",494172
45329,352797,Trap Queen,rap,Fetty Wap,2014,7160629,{},"
RGF productions
Remy Boyz, yah-ah
1738, ayy


I'm like ""Hey, what's up? Hello"" (Ayy)
Seen yo pretty ass soon as you came in the door
I just wanna chill, got a sack for us to roll
Married to the money, introduced her to my stove
Showed her how to whip it, now she remixin' for low
She my trap queen, let her hit the bando
We be countin' up, watch how far them bands go
We just set a goal, talkin' matchin' Lambos
At 56 a gram, 5 a hundred grams though
Man, I swear I love her, how she work the damn pole
Hit the strip club, we be lettin' bands go
Everybody hatin', we just call them fans, though
In love with the money, I ain't never lettin' go


And I get high with my baby (My baby)
I just left the mall, I'm gettin' fly with my baby, yeah
And I can ride with my baby (My baby)
I be in the kitchen cookin' pies with my baby, yeah
And I can ride with my baby (My baby)
I just left the mall, I'm gettin' fly with my baby, yeah
And I can ride with my baby
I be in the kitchen cookin' pies

I'm like, ""Hey, what's up? Hello""
I hit the strip with my trap queen, 'cause all we know is bands
I just might snatch up a 'Rari and buy my boo a Lamb'
I just might snatch her a necklace, drop a couple on a ring
She ain't wantin' for nothin' because I got her everything
It's big ZooWap from the bando
Remind me where I can't go
Remy Boyz got the stamp though
Count up hella them bands though
Boy how far can your bands go?
Fetty Wap, I'm livin' 50 thousand K how I stand though
If you checkin' for my pockets I'm like...


And I get high with my baby (My baby)
I just left the mall, I'm gettin' fly with my baby, yeah
And I can ride with my baby (My baby)
I be in the kitchen cookin' pies with my baby, yeah
And I can ride with my baby (My baby)
I just left the mall, I'm gettin' fly with my baby, yeah
And I can ride with my baby (My baby)
I be in the kitchen cookin' pies


I'm like, ""Hey, what's up? Hello""
Seen yo pretty ass soon as you came in the door
I just wanna chill, got a sack for us to roll
Married to the money, introduced her to my stove
Showed her how to whip it, now she remixin' for low
She my trap queen, let her hit the bando
We be countin' up, watch how far them bands go
We just set a goal, talkin' matchin' Lambos
At 56 a gram, 5 a hundred grams though
Man, I swear I love her how she work the damn pole
Hit the strip club, we be lettin' bands go
Everybody hatin', we just call them fans though
In love with the money, I ain't never lettin' go

I be smokin' dope and you know Backwoods what I roll
Remy Boyz, Fetty eatin' shit up, that's fasho
I'll run in ya house, then I'll fuck your ho
'Cause Remy Boyz or nothin'
Re-Re-Remy Boyz or nothin', yeah


Yeah, you hear my boy
Soundin' like a zillion bucks on the track
I got whatever on my boy, whatever
Put your money where your mouth is
Money on the wood make the game go good
Money out of sight cause fights
Put up or shut up, huh?
Nitt Da Gritt, RGF Productions
Squad",496445
45445,354390,Drugs You Should Try It,rap,Travis Scott,2014,1285991,{},"
(Hooo) yawa thgin eht esahc
Ot ydaer 'nitteg er'uoy wonk I
Ecnad annaw uoy wonk I ,evom annaw uoy wonk I
Doom eht ni enola emoh er'uoy nehw


I try it if it feels right
This feels nice
I've been down and lost for days
Glad I found you on the way
When the day gets better, the night gets brighter
I always feel this way
Through the hills
I hear you callin', miles and miles away
(Hooo) yawa thgin eht esahc
Ot ydaer 'nitteg er'uoy wonk I
Ecnad annaw uoy wonk I ,evom annaw uoy wonk I
Doom eht ni enola emoh er'uoy nehw


We up all night, from dawn to dusk it's always poppin'
I fell in love, fell outta love, we both had options
I played the drums, she rolled the drugs
I rocked the club, we both throw up
We was the band you never heard before
You got that tat' above your crack
And on your cat, you be right back
Your momma never know
We were rollin', rollin', rollin', rollin' stones
When I'm all alone I wish you had a clone
I take that puff, you take that puff
You know we never care to overdose

I try it if it feels right (Oh)
This feels nice
I've been down and lost for days
Glad I found you on the way
When the day gets better, the night gets brighter
I always feel this way
Through the hills
I hear you callin', miles and miles away
(Hooo) yawa thgin eht esahc
Ot ydaer 'nitteg er'uoy wonk I
Ecnad annaw uoy wonk I ,evom annaw uoy wonk I
Doom eht ni enola emoh er'uoy nehw


Shit, I try it if it feels nice
Shit, this kinda feels nice
M-miles and miles away
Miles and miles away


When you're home alone in the mood
I know you wanna move, I know you wanna dance
I know you gettin' ready to
Take the night away
When you're home alone in the mood
I know you wanna move, I know you wanna dance
I know you're gettin' ready to
Chase the night away (Oooh)
Oh, you love me, darling",499870
45475,354954,6 God,rap,Drake,2014,1540826,{},"


Rrrr ting (Brrt, brrt)


I'll admit it, I'll admit it (Ga, grrra-ga-ga-ga-ga)
Watch your motherfuckin' tone, boy (Watch that)
Get hurt, boy (Get hurt)
Aww, here go another muhfucker that don't understand
The concept of puttin' money first, boy (First)
I'm 'bout to hit you with the work, boy (Work)
I'm 'bout to hit you with the work, boy (Work)
I hate comin' through stuntin' on niggas that I know
Ahh, that's the worst, boy (Worst)
I'll admit it, I'll admit it (I'll admit it)
You haven't been the man for like a minute
I told you that I'm in it for the long haul
You can really get the business (Get it)
I'll admit it, I'll admit it (I'll admit it)
Rolling swishers, hittin' swishes
Got me feelin' like a ball hog
I don't pass 'em when I get it (Naw)
I'll admit it, I'll admit it (Why?)
You too worried 'bout the bitches (What you worried 'bout?)
I got one girl, and she my girl, and nobody else can hit it (Try a ting)
She'll admit it, she'll admit it (Try a ting)
She ain't fuckin' with you niggas
And just like every single other thing in my life
You can have her when I'm finished (Why?)
I hear the talk on road is I'm the shit, boy
Phone call back home, shit is hot up in the 6, boy (Hot up in the 6)
Shit hot up in the 6 right now
Shit hot up in the 6, boy (Hot up in the 6)
Shit is hot up in the 6 right now (Ga, ga, ga)
Come see us and get it fixed, boy (Hey)
Black Benz on the road, boy (On the road)
Already had a Rolls Royce (On the road)
Sold a couple Bentley last week
Them were my old toys (Man, this shit is old)
I give a fuck about old boy (Man, that boy old)
I give a fuck about his squad, boy (Man, that thing old)
I give a fuck about your mob, boy (Oh)
I'm the real 6 God, boy (Whoa)
I'm about to say a true thing (Yeah)
I'm about to say a true thing (Yeah)
You was poppin' back when Usher wore a U-chain
Goddamn, you changed
I put it on 'erything, it's a Rrr Ting
It's a OVO come through murk things
I know you heard things
Bitch, I know you heard things

Yeah, I know you heard things, I know you
I'm not new to this
Coming from the motherfucking 6 side
I'm not new to this
Niggas wouldn't make it on this side
I'm not new to this, I'm not new, I'm not new
Yeah, I know you heard things
Nobody really likes us except for us
Yeah, all I ever needed was the squad so that's what's up
Yeah, my sound got the whole city in your way right now
Yeah, so I don't give a fuck about what anybody sayin' right now",500858
45616,357756,Guts Over Fear,rap,Eminem,2014,1122257,{Sia},"
Feels like a close, it's coming to
Fuck am I gonna do?
It's too late to start over
This is the only thing I, thing I know


Sometimes I feel like all I ever do is
Find different ways to word the same old song
Ever since I came along
From the day the song called ""Hi! My Name Is"" dropped
Started thinking my name was Fault
'Cause any time things went wrong
I was the one who they would blame it on
The media made me the equivalent
Of a modern-day Genghis Khan
Tried to argue it was only entertainment, dog
Gangster? Nah, courageous balls
Had to change my style, they said I'm way too soft
And I sound like AZ and Nas, out came the claws
And the fangs been out since then
But up until the instant that I went against it
It was ingrained in me
That I wouldn't amount to a shit stain, I thought
No wonder I had to unlearn everything my brain was taught
""Do I really belong in this game?"", I pondered
I just wanna play my part
Should I make waves or not?
So back and forth in my brain the tug of war wages on
And I don't wanna seem ungrateful
Or disrespect the art form I was raised upon
But sometimes you gotta take a loss
And have people rub it in your face
Before you get made pissed off
And keep plugging, it's your only outlet
And your only outfit, so you know they gonna talk about it
Better find a way to counter it quick and make it... ah
Feel like I've already said this a kabillion 80 times
How many times can I say the same thing
Different ways that rhyme?
What I really wanna say is, if there's anyone else that can relate to my story, bet you feel the same way I felt
When I was in the same place you are, when I was afraid to-

I was a, afraid to make a single sound
Afraid I would never find a way out, out, out
Afraid I'd never be found (My dreams)
I didn't wanna go another round (Yeah)
An angry man's power will shut you up (Agh!)
Trip wires fill this house with tip-toed love
Run out of excuses for everyone
So here I am and I will not run (Yeah)


Guts over fear (The time is near)
Guts over fear (Might shed a tear)
For all the times I let you push me round
I let you keep me down (Now I got)
Guts over fear, guts over fear


Feels like a close, it's coming to
Fuck am I gonna do?
It's too late to start over
This is the only thing I, thing I know


I know what it was like, I was there once
Single parents, hate your appearance
As you struggle to find your place in this world
And the pain spawns all the anger on
But it wasn't 'til I put the pain in song
Learned who to aim it on that I made a spark
Started to spit harder shit
Learned how to harness it while the reins were off
And there was a lot of bizarre shit, but the crazy part
Was soon as I stopped saying I gave a fuck
Haters started to appreciate my art
And it just breaks my heart to look at all the pain I caused
But what am I gonna do when the rage is gone
And the lights go out in that trailer park? Oh
And the window is closing and there's nowhere else that I can go with flows and I'm frozen
'Cause there's no more emotion for me to pull from
Just a bunch of playful songs that I make for fun
So, to the break of dawn, here I go recycling the same old song
But I'd rather make ""Not Afraid 2""
Than make another motherfucking ""We Made You,"" ah
Now, I don't wanna seem indulgent
When I discuss my lows and my highs
My demise and my uprise, pray to God
I just open enough eyes later on
And gave you the supplies and the tools
To hopefully use that'll make you strong
Enough to lift yourself up, when you feel like I felt
'Cause I can't explain to y'all how dang exhausted my legs felt
Just having to balance my dang self
When on eggshells, I was made to walk
But thank you, Ma, 'cause that gave me the
Strength to cause Shady-mania, so when they empty that stadium
Least I made it out of that house
And found a place in this world when the day was done
So this is for every kid who all's they ever did
Was dreamt of one day just getting accepted
I represent him or her, anyone similar
You are the reason that I made this song
And everything you're scared to say
Don't be afraid to say no more
From this day forward, just let them a-holes talk
Take it with a grain of salt-and eat their fucking faces off!
The legend of the angry blonde
Lives on through you when I'm gone, and to think I was a-

I was a, afraid to make a single sound
Afraid I would never find a way out, out, out
Afraid I'd never be found (My dreams)
I didn't wanna go another round (Yeah)
An angry man's power will shut you up (Agh!)
Trip wires fill this house with tip-toed love
Run out of excuses for everyone
So here I am and I will not run (Yeah)


Guts over fear (The time is near)
Guts over fear (Might shed a tear)
For all the times I let you push me round
I let you keep me down (Now I got)
Guts over fear, guts over fear",505111
45681,358639,Try Me,rap,DeJ Loaf,2014,1331035,{},"
Let a nigga try me, try me
I'm a get his whole motherfuckin' family
And I ain't playin with nobody
Fuck around and I'ma catch a body
Let a nigga try me, try me
I'm a get his whole motherfuckin' family
And I ain't playin with nobody
Fuck around and I'ma catch a body


Bitch I got the mac or the 40
Turn a bitch to some macaroni
Tell me how you want it I'm on it
I really mean it I'm just not recordin'
Give lil bro the choppa for all you oppas
Leave a bitch nigga head in pasta
You are an impostor, ain't got no money
Put the burner to his tummy, and make it bubbly
I really hate niggas I'm a Nazi
Love wearin' all black, you should see my closet
Rock that all white, when I'm feelin' Godly
Hop out like Coke, I ain't gotta park it
Fuck is y'all saying, bitch my hood love me
48214 real niggas know me
I been out my mind since they killed my cousin
Free my cousin Devin, man he just called me
All these niggas love me, can't get 'em off me
Fuck around gave him my number, he won't stop callin'
IBGM be the clique, bitch, you see us scorin'
V.I.P in the plural, while yo section borin'
Got a bitch that set it off like Jada Pinkett, Queen Latifah
You rollin' around wit yo nieces, bitch you T.T
Mind full of money, got a heart full of demons
Mobbin' like Italians, we really take yo fingas
Turn yo face into a pizza, no acne
Have you singin' like Alicia, fuck wit my family
They be like you little, but got damn she spazzin'
Do the whole crew, my bitches freak nasty

Let a nigga try me, try me
I'm a get his whole motherfuckin' family
And I ain't playin with nobody
Fuck around and I'ma catch a body
Let a nigga try me, try me
I'm a get his whole motherfuckin' family
And I ain't playin with nobody
Fuck around and I'ma catch a body


Bitch I got the Tommy no Hilfiger
Lil Dej ain't bout it, bitch how you figure
I don't do no drugs, I be off liquor
So lifted, flyer than yo girl, baby gone and take my picture
See I gotta get this money, my palms itchin'
Niggas gossip like hoes, most of 'em bitches
I don't wanna do no songs, I don't wanna kick it
And I ain't signin' to no label, bitch I'm independent


Let a nigga try me, try me
I'm a get his whole motherfuckin' family
And I ain't playin with nobody
Fuck around and I'ma catch a body",506641
45709,359175,No Type,rap,Rae Sremmurd,2014,2681756,{},"
Yeah
EarDrummers
Bad bitches is the...
Mike WiLL Made-It
Yeah


I don't got no type (Nah)
Bad bitches is the only thing that I like (Woo)
You ain't got no life (Nah)
Cups with the ice and we do this every night (Hey)
I ain't check the price (I got it)
I make my own money, so I spend it how I like (Woo)
I'm just livin' life (Hey, hey)
And let my mama tell it, nigga, I ain't livin' right (No)


Chop the top off the Porsche, that's a headless horse (Hey, hey)
Extendo long as an extension cord (Damn, cord)
Bitch, I ball like Jordan (Jordan), and I play full court (I play full court)
And if you not my type then you know I got to keep this shit short (Gotta keep this shit short with you, ayy)
What you know about a check?
What you got up in your pocket?
What you spendin' when you shoppin', dawg? (Hey)
Why you wanna go flex? like you all in the mix
Like you got some shit poppin' off (Hey)
I got some models that you see up in the movies (Hey, hey)
And they wanna make a flick for the camera (Yeah)
Wanna be Kim Kardashian (Hey)
Heard I was livin' like a bachelor (Woo)

I don't got no type (Nah)
Bad bitches is the only thing that I like (Woo)
You ain't got no life (Nah)
Cups with the ice and we do this every night (Hey)
I ain't check the price (I got it)
I make my own money, so I spend it how I like (Woo)
I'm just livin' life (Hey, hey)
And let my mama tell it, nigga, I ain't livin' right (No)


Spend it how I like (Yeah)
Sinnin' every night (Yeah)
Push start the whip (Hey)
Brought it straight to life (Come to life)
Blowin' on the kush (Blowin')
'Til I'm out of sight (I'm gone)
I don't check the price (Bitch)
All I do is swipe (Woo)
She said, ""What's your type?"" (Yeah)
I said, ""I like what I like"" (Yeah)
I don't second guess (Nah)
I just roll the dice (Keep it movin')
Keep your two cents (Hey)
Take your own advice (Hey)
I've been livin' life (Yeah)
Like I lived twice

I don't got no type (Nah)
Bad bitches is the only thing that I like (Woo)
You ain't got no life (Nah)
Cups with the ice and we do this every night (Hey)
I ain't check the price (I got it)
I make my own money, so I spend it how I like (Woo)
I'm just livin' life (Hey, hey)
And let my mama tell it, nigga, I ain't livin' right (No)


I don't got no type, I don't got no type
And let my mama tell it, nigga, I ain't livin' right",507478
46254,365868,I Don’t Fuck with You,rap,Big Sean,2014,3509168,{E-40},"
Uh-huh
Fuck


(Mustard on the beat, ho) I don't fuck wit' you
You lil' stupid ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu
You lil', you lil' dumb ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu
I got a million trillion things I'd rather fuckin' do
Than to be fuckin' with you (You,) lil' stupid ass


I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck, I don't, I don't
I don't give a fuck, bitch, I don't give a
Fuck about you, or anything that you do
I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck, I don't, I don't
Don't give a fuck about you, or anything that you do
I don't give a fuck, uh


I heard you got a new man, I see you takin' a pic (Woah)
Then you post it up, thinkin' that it's makin' me sick
Brr brr, I see you callin', I be makin' it quick
I'ma answer that shit like, ""I don't fuck wit'-
Chu, bitch, I got no feelings to go
I swear I had it up to here, I got no ceilings to go
I mean, for real, fuck how you feel
Fuck your two cents if it ain't goin' towards the bill, yeah
And every day I wake up celebratin' shit, why?
'Cause I just dodged a bullet from a crazy bitch, I
Stuck to my guns (Woah,) that's what made me rich
That's what put me on, that's what got me here, that's what made me this (This)
And everything that I do is my first name (B-I-G)
These hoes chase bread, aw damn, she got a bird brain
Ain't nothin' but trill in me, aw man, silly me
I just bought a crib, three stories; that bitch a trilogy
And you know I'm rollin' weed that's fuckin' up the ozone
I got a bitch that text me she ain't got no clothes on (Swerve)
And then another one text (Swerve, swerve,) then your ass next
And I'ma text your ass back, like-

I don't fuck wit' you
You lil' stupid ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu
You lil', you lil' dumb ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu
I got a million trillion things I'd rather fuckin' do
Than to be fuckin' with you, lil' stupid ass


I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck, I don't, I don't
I don't give a fuck, bitch, I don't give a (E-40)
Fuck about you, or anything that you do
I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck, I don't, I don't
Don't give a fuck about you, or anything that you do (Hawoo)
I don't give a fuck, uh


Got a million things on my mind, executive deals online, limited amount of time
Chasin' these dollar signs and you ain't on your grind
You liable to find me up in the MGM casino in the D
Fuckin' off fetti I could've put on property
From the Bay to the Murder Mitten, my niggas put murder missions
She choosin', that's her decision, free my niggas in prison
On the phone with a bitch who can't do shit
For a pimp but make a nigga hella rich (Hella rich)
Got a blunt in my dental, blowin' hemp in a rental
On my way to Sacramento, late night; Arsenio (Arsenio)
I'm never sentimental, go hard or go homeless
Barely Harley, I'm chromeless (Uh,) you might end up domeless (Uh)
I bet you she into me, her cheddar, she givin' me
I'll make a bitch stand outside forever, like the Statue of Liberty (Mmm)
Rest in pimp, Pimp C, underground king of the South
I raise my styrofoam up, and pour some drink in my mouth (Pour up)
Why you always comin' around with bad news? (Bad news)
Say you want me to win, but hope I lose (Hope I lose)
Askin' if I rock with other niggas in the crew (Crew,) but them niggas cool (Cool)
It's just that-

I don't fuck wit' you (Lil' biatch)
You lil' stupid ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu (Uh-uh)
You lil', you lil' dumb ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu
I got a million trillion things I'd rather fuckin' do
Than to be fuckin' with you, lil' stupid ass


I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck, I don't, I don't
I don't give a fuck, bitch, I don't give a
Fuck about you, or anything that you do
Don't give a fuck about you, or anything that you do (You)
I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck, I don't, I don't
I don't give a fuck, bitch, I don't give a
Fuck about you, or anything that you do
Don't give a fuck about you, or anything that you do


I got a new chick that I gotta thank God for (God)
I got a new whip that I gotta thank the lot for (Swerve, swerve, swerve)
Yeah, I got a lot, but want a lot more
Yeah, we in the buildin', but I'm tryna take it to the top floor (Floor)
I swear I hear some new bullshit every day I'm wakin' up (Uh)
It seem like nowadays everybody breakin' up (Uh)
That shit can break ya down, if you lose a good girl
I guess you need a bad bitch to come around and make it up (Yup)
I guess drama makes for the best content
Everything got a bad side, even a conscience
Now you're drinkin' 'til you're unconscious (Woah,) feel me
When you get a fine bitch, just don't forget to read the fine print
Life got me meditatin' like I'm in the Himalayas
Keep it G with the L lit on me like the elevator
Yeah, I know that karma too real, so I hope you doin' cool
But still-

Stupid ass bitch, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu
No, no, no, no
Little stupid ass, I ain't fuckin' wit' (Woah)
I ain't fuckin', I ain't, I ain't fuckin' wit'chu (Woah)
I ain't fuckin' wit'chu, ha
Straight up, yeah, yeah
Woah

",517618
46343,367178,Under Pressure,rap,Logic,2014,1318913,{},"


Dog 'round-from a-from a-dog 'round-once a
Dog 'round-from a-from a-dog 'round-once a
Dog 'round-from a-from a-dog 'round-once a
Dog 'round-from a-from a-dog 'round-


Work so fucking much, my greatest fear is I'ma die alone
Every diamond in my chain, yeah, that's a milestone (I'm lovin' it!)
People calling me, askin' me for money, man (Uh)
The only thing I'ma give you motherfuckers is the dial tone (Yeah)


Flashbacks of a youngin' sippin' that purple Kool-Aid
Skippin' school with my homies and chiefing reefer for two days
Running from the law, livin' how I'm livin', fuck 'em all
Bumping Triple Six
Hennessy in my cup, drivin' through the sticks
Who the bitch ridin' with me?
Man, the devil tryna get me
Motivated, under-educated, and hated
But finally gettin' cake like a happy belated
Bitch I made it, we on
Buy it, break it, roll it, light it, smoke it, inhale it
Write it, record it, mix it, master it, press it up, unveil it
Feel like I've been waitin' forever, forever to inherit
This is war, I declare it
Time is money, I can't spare it
Futuristic, so simplistic
Please decipher my linguistics
Slow it down, Robitussin
I'm the king, ain't no discussion
And now we blowin' up like spontaneous human combustion
My consumption is the illest
Section eight, I know you feel this
On the come up,  where they run up on you for nothin' at all
Brighter than eleven suns, this the first, where my funds?
EBT, that's the card
I thank God, I thank God, but it's hard
Uh, but it's hard

Uh, work so fuckin' much, my greatest fear is I'ma die alone
Every diamond in my chain, yeah, that's a milestone
People callin' me, askin' me for money, man
The only thing I'ma give you motherfuckers is the dial tone


God damn, god damn, we at it again
Me and my homies that know me blowing up like the Taliban
Yeah, my stress up, but I'm blessed up
Fuck around and get messed up
When I murder the rhyme, I'm livin' divine
You know that I'm one of a kind
Lemme get it right now, ho
Draped up and I'm dripped out (And I'm dripped out)
Right now, ho
Caked up 'til I cash out and I got 'em all wonderin', ""How so?""
On the down low, haters drown slow
On the down low, haters drown slow
Oh God, my God, we got it all right
Oh God, my God, we gotta get it, right?
These fuckers facades, they just a mirage, right?
I said these fuckers facades, they just a mirage, right?
Uh, tell me that they love me
Know damn well that they don't give a fuck
I be on that finger-flippin' killin' shit up in the cut
That's what's up
All these bitches out here tryna gas it up
This is everything I ever wanted, I can't pass it up
Life changed in a year, couldn't happen fast enough
""Can I do it like you do it?"" That's what they be askin' us
White Benz, black card, bitch better get your plastic up
Man, this shit is hella hard, but we never actin' up
Live it up, hold on to your dream, don't ever give it up
Finally had my share of success, and shit, I can't get enough
Now they know my name through the nation
'Cause my single like that good shit, man, always in rotation
Now they know Logic for Logic, not through my affiliations
Stackin' profit on profit, from this music I'm makin'
Even Jesus had haters, so when you feelin' forsaken
Tell 'em jealous Judases who this is, and man, that'll break 'em
And bitch, I'm still the same
Dash of autotune so y'all can feel the pain
Broke as fuck, back in that basement, not a dollar to my name
Chasin' fame, chasin' glory, 'til the day we make a story
Positive that life ain't mine, bitch you can take that shit to Maury

Work so fuckin' much, my greatest fear is I'ma die alone
Every diamond in my chain, yeah, that's a milestone
People callin' me, askin' me for money, man
The only thing I'ma give you motherfuckers is the dial tone


(Hello, no one is available to take your call)
I been workin' hard, I been searchin' for God
I been workin' hard, I been searchin' for God
(Please leave a message after the tone)
Little brother, this is yo' sister, you're busy, I get you
But I insist you call me back 'cause I miss you
I wish you well, well, I wish you would call
'Cause lately it feel like I'm just not yo' sister at all-all
Uh, I'm sorry for callin' and bawlin', I'm all in
And I feel like I'm fallin' lately, it feel like my children hate me
You tell me I'm beautiful and yet no man wanna date me
Haunted by vivid memories of that man who raped me
And lately I, I feel more and more like mommy, I know I'm me, but still
You always seemed to pick up the phone and somehow I feel
Better, but you been answerin' me lesser and lesser
So I resorted to the pills in my dresser, I'm gone
And as for... oh no, he left and he ain't comin' back
I hate him and if I see him I swear I tell him that
No longer cookin' crack in my kitchen, cuttin' an' sellin' that
He broke my heart, that relationship been to hell and back
I been workin' hard, I been searchin' for God
I can feel the Devil around me as they all applaud
Promise you won't forget me, that you'll always be wit' me
And even when you gone I can call whenever he hit me
Under pressure, I've been feeling under pressure

Hey, son, this is your father, don't mean to bother
How are you? Heard you were in town, but I never saw ya
Tried to call ya, where are ya?
In Paris? What a beautiful destination
To perish right by the Eiffel, come now
Please don't be spiteful of all my small talk
I think we're overdue a long talk
When I see kids around the way, I say how I'm your dad
It gets me thinkin' 'bout incredible moments we've had
And on the real, I'm tryin' so hard not to bug you
But do you think you could stop rappin' about my drug use?
I'm two years clean, no longer a fiend
Yeah, I'm 57, but I feel 19
And I love you I swear, Bobby, I know you're there
And when the time is right I know that you gon' take care
Of anything I need, of yo' family
Can I have some tickets to your next show?
Would you stand wit' me?
Can I have some money for my new honey that's hella fine?
I forgot to mention I got divorced from yo' step-mom
My mind goin' crazy, but I still look hella calm
Maybe you could tell *beep*
I've been feelin' under pressure


Hey, what's up, bro? This Ralph, I didn't want much, man, just calling to see what's going on. I know you're busy. Uh, Dad hit me up, it's his birthday today, but I know you know that. Uh, yeah, he calling, he be tryna introduce me to his new chick and stuff, man, I don't know how to handle that. I don't wanna tell him like nah, I ain't trying to meet her off top, you know? So what you think I should do? Text me, I know you're busy, dawg. But he been callin' me saying he wanna come down, he wanna bring his new chick and Brenda's like ""Damn, he really tryna rock out with his new chick"" 'cause you know we all fuck with Debbie. But I don't know, I don't know how to tell him this shit so just hit me back whenever you got the time, man, I know there's more shit on your plate. You ain't-you ain't gotta hit me, dawg, but if you do I'd appreciate it. When you back, love you, do your thing. Swag RattPack all day, boy. Alright, nigga, hit me


Uh, yeah, dear family, I'm so sorry that I've been distant
Everything changed in an instant, my time has been inconsistent
I know that you been insistin', I know that birthday I missed it
I swore I told my assistant, but I guess my mind is in another place
Thoughts off in another world, I started seein' another girl
It fell through, man, what a world
But I'm so focused on my craft, on employin' my staff
Such a perfectionist, I can't even finish this draft
This letter to the ones I love, the ones that I miss
Brothers and sisters that hit me up just to reminisce
Meanwhile, people outside of my blood askin' for favors
I don't owe you a fuckin' thing, you best switch yo' behavior
Truly remarkable how I barely know you, but somehow owe you When you don't even know 'bout the shit I go through, uh
We ain't spoken in a while, tell me sister, how yo' child?
Come now, girl, give me a smile, come on, girl, don't do me foul
Sorry I ain't call before, but I'm callin' you right now
I heard that you was poppin' E, stop resortin' to the vowel
How my mama, how she doin'? Does she know what I'm pursuin'?
I ain't talk to her in years, that relationship she ruined
But sometimes I wake up and wonder just what the fuck I'm doin'
They say family is everything, I swear that shit the truth
I should spend it all with y'all, but I spend it in the booth
This is everything I love, this is everything I need
Never sacrifice this feelin' even though my heart it bleed
This is everything I love, everything I need
Never sacrifice this feelin' even though my heart bleed
Under pressure, I've been feelin' under pressure


Hey, son, I'm sorry I missed your call today, but I was in an AA meeting. Um, a friend of mine was celebrating four years so I couldn't get you right then. And then when I did call you, you weren't able to answer or whatever. Just wonderin' how things are going. Deb and I aren't together anymore, um... Livin' on my own, you know, um... Anyway, the whole family, even the family that you don't know, my sisters and your aunts that you've never met are very proud of you. Your cousins just love you too. Anyway, son, I love you, I just want you to know that. And just keep grindin', you know? And um, I don't wanna hear you joinin' the Illuminati 'cause then I gotta kill ya. Hm-hm, I love you, son, bye",519316
46455,368585,Planez,rb,Jeremih,2015,2552188,"{""J. Cole""}","
This one goes out to all sides worldwide
Let that playa-ass nigga Thumpy be your guide
As we go on a ride
Where playa-hatin' killers and hood niggas thrive
And lame muh'fuckers can barely survive


Catch me rollin' through the city
Ridin' with the top off
Man, my whip so big, when you in it
Fuck around and get lost
Told my bitch to let her hair down
What this shit cost?
Tell me, baby, if you 'bout that life right now
Hope it ain't talk, no


I could put you in the Mile High Club
What's up? Let's take a trip
Have you ever read ""The World Is Yours""
On a blimp?

Tell her be free, baby, spread your wings
Got your legs in the sky like a plane
Let me guide that, I'm the pilot
Can't nobody see you, 30,000 feet
On your knees in them Pradas
Makin' freaky shit come up out her


Get high, baby, roll one
Cloud nine 'bout to go up
Lovin' the feelin' the turbulence get when we turn up
When we land, we can roll out
Show you somethin' you ain't know 'bout
Tonight, we be takin' off flight with a camera to show out


I got you in the air, your body in the air
How it feel up here?
You can scream as loud as you want, loud as you can
And ain't nobody gonna hear
Would you like it better
If I hit the West Coast?
Tell me baby if you 'bout that life right now
I hope it ain't talk

I could put you in the Mile High Club
What's up? Let's take a trip
Have you ever read ""The World Is Yours""
On a blimp?


Tell her be free, baby, spread your wings
Got your legs in the sky like a plane
Let me guide that, I'm the pilot
Can't nobody see you, 30,000 feet
On your knees in them Pradas
Makin' freaky shit come up out her


Get high baby, roll one
Cloud nine 'bout to go up
Lovin' the feelin' the turbulence get when we turn up
When we land we can roll out
Show you somethin' you ain't know 'bout (Cole World)
Tonight, we be takin' off flight with a camera to show out
I got it, I got it, I got it, listen


You need a nigga that's gon' come over and dig you out
You need a nigga that you know is not gon' run his mouth
You need a nigga when he done probably gon' put you out
You need a nigga that's gon' put it in your mouth
Dick so big, it's like a foot is in yo mouth
And you ain't babysittin' but my kids all on your couch
And oh, you nasty, oh, oh, you nasty
Both graduated, so fuck keepin' it classy
Look, they love me in the Chi like MJ
They love me in the Chi like Oprah
No nigga could block, not even Dikembe
Compared to Cole, boy, you're softer than a sofa
And so far, my new shit's so fire, nigga, check my profile
Who you know make waves in the low tide?
Deebo'd yo bitch, now she both ours
Nigga, little brown liquor in my liver
Pretty brown thing in my bed
Been a long time since I had to ask for head
So goddamn, don't make me beg
But I will if I need to, 'cause for real, girl, I need you
I could put you on a flight, we could take off tonight
If you scared of heights, shit, I got a pill I could feed you
Cole!

I could put you in the Mile High Club
What's up? Let's take a trip
Have you ever read ""The World Is Yours""
On a blimp?",521525
46568,369874,Gang Related,rap,Logic,2014,1773327,{},"
Yeah, uh, yeah


Livin' life like this
Gotta paint a picture when I write like this
Tales from my hood, not a sight like this
Where they up to no good on a night like this
And they murder motherfuckers just 'cause
Type of shit I see, you probably wonder where I was
I was in the crib, just sittin' on the rug
Basedheads comin' through lookin' for the plug
Now, born and raised in my area
Beautiful by day, by night it's hysteria
Fuck around and bury ya tonight
Ridin' with my homies on sight
Momma tell me to come in at night
Now I really gotta go, but they never know
Livin' life to the fullest, I gotta blow
Po-po finna bust in the door, we got blow in the crib
In the kitchen over there next to the baby with the bib
Goddamn, what it feel like, middle of the night
Wakin' up, scared for my life
Never had the heat, just a knife
When the gat go blat like that
Guarantee you it's a wrap
Finna put you on your back like that
Just breathe, while their mama grieve
Bullet to the dome like an Aleve
Gotta leave for the premises, to murder my nemesis
No, no, uh, uh, just stop, stop, stop
'Fore they even call the cops
Do it for the money and the bitches
And the drugs and the props
Tell me why another body even gotta drop
Get shot off top for some shit that was gang related

Up first at five tonight, breaking news in Gaithersburg, where a massive manhunt is underway after a deadly shooting. It's all unfolding in the 400 block of West Deer Park and 355. Our Montgomery County reporter joins us, with the latest tonight


Livin' life like this
Hope little Bobby never fight like this
Stab a motherfucker with a knife like this
All about the money on a night like this
Run up in the crib, put a bullet in your rib
Got a lot to give, but I never had the chance
Never had the chance, yeah
Stay strapped, but I hate it when I take it out
If you want it I'ma lay it out
Hope my little brother make it out
Every night what I pray about what I pray about
Check it, uh yeah, got a son on the way
But I cling to the streets even though I wanna run away
I imagine a better life
Where I never had a debt in life
Hit you with the *gunshots* in the dead of night
Sellin' crack to my own pops
Pushin' this weight on my own block
If I sell a brick I can buy a house
If they find the key they might lock me up
But I take the chance 'cause I need that shit and don't give a fuck
Take the chance, 'cause I need that shit and don't give a fuck
 - Get down or lay down
Hit ya with the Beretta, you better stay down
Stray shots on the playground
Livin' how I'm livin' with the life that I'm given
Anybody that's ridin' with me, I'm ridin' with 'em
Show me the enemy, and I'ma hit 'em
The second I bit 'em, I get 'em
And hit 'em with the venom
Ain't no need to pretend I'ma never do it
I knew it, already been through it
I do it for the street, for the fam, for the life
Anybody that's gang related",523560
46584,370073,​i Album Version,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,2554684,{},"



Is this mic on? (Hey, move this way, this way)
Hey, Hey! Hey! Turn the mic up, c'mon, c'mon
Is the mic on or not? I want the mic
We're bringing up nobody, nobody
Nobody but the number one rapper in the world
He done traveled all over the world
He came back just to give you some game
All of the little boys and girls, come up here
(Ah, one two, one two, what's happening, fool?)
Come right here, this is for you, come on up
I done been through a whole lot (Kendrick Lamar!)
Trial, tribulation, but I know God
The Devil wanna put me in a bow tie (Make some noise, brother!)
Pray that the holy water don't go dry
As I look around me
So many motherfuckers wanna down me
But enemigo never drown me
In front of a dirty double-mirror they found me

And (I love myself)
Huh, when you lookin' at me, tell me what do you see?
(I love myself)
Ahh, I put a bullet in the back of the back of the head of the police
(I love myself)
Uh, illuminated by the hand of God, boy, don't seem shy
(I love myself)
One day at a time, huh


They wanna say it's a war outside, bomb in the street
Gun in the hood, mob of police
Rock on the corner with a line for the fiend
And a bottle full of lean and a model on the scheme, uh
These days of frustration keep y'all on tuck and rotation (Come to the front, yeah)
I duck these cold faces, post up fi-fie-fo-fum basis
Dreams of reality's peace (Oh, yeah)
Blow steam in the face of the beast
Sky could fall down, wind could cry now
Look at me motherfucker I smile-


And (I love myself)
Uh, and when you lookin' at me, tell me what do you see?
(I love myself)
Ahh, I put a bullet in the back of the back of the head of the police
(I love myself)
Illuminated-
All ya'll come to the front, ya'll come up to the front
(I love myself)
Baby what about you? Come on

(Crazy, what you gon' do?)
Lift up your head and keep moving, (Keep moving) turn the mic up
(Haunt you)
Peace to fashion police, I wear my heart
On my sleeve, let the runway start
You know the miserable do love company
What do you want from me and my scars?
Everybody lack confidence, everybody lack confidence
How many times my potential was anonymous?
How many times the city making me promises?
So I promise this, nigga


(I love myself)
Uh, and when you lookin' at me, tell me what do you see?
(I love myself)
Ahh, I put a bullet in the back of the back of the head of the police
(I love myself)
Huh, illuminated by the hand of God, boy don't seem shy
(I love myself)


Huh (Walk my bare feet) Huh (Walk my bare feet)
Huh (Down, down valley deep) Huh (Down, down valley deep)
(I love myself) Huh (Fi-fie-fo-fum) Huh (Fi-fie-fo-fum)
(I love myself) Huh (My heart undone) one, two, three

I went to war last night
With an automatic weapon, don't nobody call a medic
I'ma do it 'til I get it right (Oh no)
I went to war last night (Night, night, night, night)
I've been dealing with depression ever since an adolescent
Duckin' every other blessin', I can never see the message
I could never take the lead, I could never bob and weave
From a negative and letting them annihilate me
And it's evident I'm moving at a meteor speed
Finna run into a building, lay my body-


(Offstage Argument)
Not on my, not while I'm up here
Not on my time, kill the music, not on my time
We could save that shit for the streets
We could save that shit, this for the kids, bro
2015, niggas tired of playin' victim, dog
Niggas ain't trying to play vic- TuTu, how many niggas we done lost?
How many- Yan-Yan, how many we done lost?
No for real, answer the que-, how many niggas we done lost bro?
This-, this year alone
Exactly, so we- we ain't got time to waste time, my nigga
Niggas gotta make time, bro
The judge make time, you know that, the judge make time, right?
The judge make time so it ain't shit
It shouldn't be shit for us to come out here and appreciate the little bit of life we got left, dog
On the dead homies, Charlie P, you know that, bro
You know that
It's- it's mando, right, it's mando
And I s- I- And I- And I say this because I love you niggas, man
I love all my niggas, bro
Exac- enough said, enough said
And we gon' get back to the show and move on, because that shit petty, my nigga
Mic check, mic check, mic check, mic check, mic check
We gon' do some acapella shit before we get back to-
All my niggas listen, listen to this:


I promised Dave I'd never use the phrase ""fuck nigga""
He said, ""Think about what you saying: ""Fuck niggas""
No better than Samuel on the Django
No better than a white man with slave boats""
Sound like I needed some soul searching
My Pops gave me some game in real person
Retraced my steps on what they never taught me
Did my homework fast before government caught me
So I'ma dedicate this one verse to Oprah
On how the infamous, sensitive N-word control us
So many artists gave her an explanation to hold us
Well, this is my explanation straight from Ethiopia
N-E-G-U-S definition: royalty; king royalty - wait listen
N-E-G-U-S description: black emperor, king, ruler, now let me finish
The history books overlook the word and hide it
America tried to make it to a house divided
The homies don't recognize we been using it wrong
So I'ma break it down and put my game in a song
N-E-G-U-S, say it with me, or say it no more
Black stars can come and get me
Take it from Oprah Winfrey, tell her she right on time
Kendrick Lamar, by far, realest Negus alive",523961
46651,370914,Город под подошвой City Under the Sole,rap,Oxxxymiron,2015,1705377,{},"


Эй
Scady
Йо


Дон ли, Волга ли тeчёт - котомку на плeчо
Боль в груди - там тайничок, открытый фомкой, нe ключом
Сколько миль eщё? Пeрeлёт короткий был нe в счёт
Долгий пыльный чёс, фургон набит коробками с мeрчом
Вeрим, подфартит, наши постeли портативны
Мeнeстрeлю два пути: корпоратив или квартирник
Схeмы однотипны, всe тeпeрь MC
Вeдь, смeну породив, мы здeсь достигли смeны парадигмы
Тeпeрь рэп - многопартийный; бэттлов наплодив
Я смотрю в зeркало по типу: «Сколько бeд наворотил ты!»
Я б вeсь рэп поработил, но всё врeмя в пути
У индустрии нeрвный тик, валокордин - стeнокардийным
Собeритe суд, но побeдитeлeй нe судят
Мы пeрвыe кроманьонцы - мы выбились в люди
Нe пизди! Я кладу на вас, чeлядь, пятикратно
Вeдь мы выступаeм сильно, будто чeлюсть питeкантропа

Вeсь мой рэп, eсли коротко, про то, что
Уж который год который город под подошвой
В гору, когда прёт; потом под гору, когда тошно
Я нe то, чтоб Гулливeр, но всё жe город под подошвой
Город под подошвой, город под подошвой
Свeтофоры, госпошлины, сборы и таможни
Я нe знаю, вброд или на дно эта дорожка
Ты живёшь под каблуком, у мeня город под подошвой


Мимо тополeй и спeлого хлeба полeй
Гдe привидeниe Есeнина, крeст, молeбeн, eлeй
Из минивэна вижу зeмлю, вижу нeбо над нeй
Мы всё прeодолeeм - eсли нeт, то я нe водолeй
Наша зeмля топит одиночeк как щeнят
Был чужой, но Охра, Porchy, Илья - большe, чeм сeмья
Бомбу ночью сочинял, что eсть мочи начинял
Я так хотeл принадлeжать чeму-то большeму, чeм я
Мир пустой, хоть с каждым вторым пeрeзнакомься
Я нe биоробот с позитивной лыбой комсомольца, эй
Избавь мeня от ваших панацeй, домашний Парацeльс
Вeдь для мeня eбашить - самоцeль
Подустал? Нам насрать! Тони Старк как стандарт
Пара стран, автострад: Краснодар, Татарстан, Москвабад
Паспорта, гам эстрад - нарасхват
Хоть по МКАД'у на старт, хоть на Мадагаскар (Ты знаeшь!)

Вeсь мой рэп, eсли коротко, про то, что
Уж который год который город под подошвой
В гору, когда прёт; потом под гору, когда тошно
Я нe то чтоб Гулливeр, но всё жe город под подошвой
Город под подошвой, город под подошвой
Свeтофоры, госпошлины, сборы и таможни
Я нe знаю, вброд или на дно эта дорожка
Ты живёшь под каблуком, у мeня город под подошвой


Дай силёнок тут нe свeрнуть и нe сломаться
Есть маршрут и eсть на трассe насeлённый пункт
И там нас сeгодня ждут; нытик, нe будь жeнствeнным
У Руслана в дeкe саундтрeки к путeшeствию
Снова eбло заспано, снова подъём засвeтло
Снова броник, снова дорога, мeшок за спину
Всё наскоро, в полe насрано, дождь, пасмурно
Мост в Асгард - послe, пусть просто вeзёт с транспортом
Я дeлаю каждый свой куплeт автопортрeтом
Час на чeк, читаeм рэп, как логопeд под марафeтом
Трафарeт на парапeтах: лого на стeнe вeздe
Моё учeньe - всeм, как Магомeта с Бафомeтом
Я - звeзда? Дайтe тёплый плeд и капюшон
Салфeтки жопу вытирать - и всё, отмeтка «хорошо»
Раньшe говорили: «Я бы с ним в развeдку нe пошёл»
Я с тобой в тур нe поeхал - ты провeрку нe прошёл (Homie, знай!)

Мой рэп, eсли коротко, про то, что
Уж который год который город под подошвой
В гору, когда прёт; потом под гору, когда тошно
Я нe то, чтоб Гулливeр, но всё жe город под подошвой
Город под подошвой, город под подошвой
Свeтофоры, госпошлины, сборы и таможни
Я нe знаю, вброд или на дно эта дорожка
Ты живёшь под каблуком, у мeня город под подошвой


My whole life, whole-whole, whole life
Whole-whole, whole life on the road
My whole life, whole-whole, whole life
Whole-whole, whole life on the road
My whole life, whole-whole, whole life
Whole-whole, whole life on the road
My whole life, whole-whole, whole life
Whole-whole, whole life on the road",525445
46949,374701,Faneto,rap,Chief Keef,2014,1063560,{},"
Ayy, gang, gang, nigga
Gang, gang, nigga, nigga
(Sosa on the beat)
Gang in this bitch, gang in this bitch, nigga
Gang in this bitch, gang in this bitch, nigga
Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy
(Gang in this bitch, nigga)
Gang, bang, nigga
(Gang in this bitch, gang in this bitch, nigga)
Bang, nigga (Bang, nigga)
Gang, nigga, ayy, ayy (Gang nigga, ayy, nigga)
Ayy, ayy (Bang, nigga)


I'm a gorilla in a fuckin' coupe, finna pull up to the zoo, nigga
Who, nigga? Who the fuck is you? I don't know, nigga
No, nigga, pull up on your block, we gon' blow, nigga
Go, nigga, run, nigga, run for the po', nigga (Police, nigga)
Gas what I smoke, nigga (Nigga, smoke)
Feds at my door, jump out the window, nigga (The window)
No, you can't get no money, silly ho (Silly ho)
I just hit a stain, faneto (Faneto)

Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, faneto


Talkin' out his neck, pistol to his throat (To his throat, bang)
Blow this motherfucker, he gon' choke (Rawr, bang)
On the ground, on the floor
Someone pick him up, take him to the morgue (To the fuckin' thang)
I'm ridin' through New York (Skrrt-skrrt, bang, bang)
Finna go and shoot New Jersey up (Bang, bang, bang, bang)
Tryna take my chain, I ain't goin' (I ain't goin', nigga)
We gon' come and blow New Jersey up (Bang, bang, bang)
You want something? Hurry up (Bang, nigga)
Buy, try to rob, bitch, we 30'd up (30d up, bang, bang)
Just left Wokcano, bitch, I'm Curried up (Curried up, gang, gang)
Cheese in my pockets, Velveeta (Velveeta)


Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy


I'm a gorilla in a fuckin' coupe, finna pull up to the zoo, nigga
Who, nigga? Who the fuck is you? I don't know, nigga
No, nigga, pull up on your block, we gon' blow, nigga
Go, nigga, run, nigga, run for the po', nigga (Police, nigga)
Gas what I smoke, nigga (Nigga, smoke)
Feds at my door, jump out the window, nigga (The window)
No, you can't get no money, silly ho (Silly ho)
I just hit a stain, faneto (Faneto)

Fine-, ayy, fine-, ayy


I just hit a stain, fanagoe (Finesse)
I just hit a stain, faneto (Finesse)
I just got twenty for a fuckin' four (Twenty bands, nigga)
I spent that shit on a fuckin' coat (On my motherfuckin' coat)
Ripped my ear, now I got one earlobe (Bling, bling)
But I'ma still put some diamonds on it (Gang, gang, bling, bling)
Baby girl, these diamonds are not phony (They not phony, huh?)
This car I got, it came from Barcelona (Barcelona, huh?)
These shoes I got, came from fuckin' Paris (Fifteen hun'?)
This bitch mad 'cause I don't do marriage (I don't want no marriage)
Let a nigga slide, no we don't do scary (Skrrt-skrrt, dah)
We tote pistols, no we don't do worry (Bang-bang, bang, bang, bang, bang)


I'm a gorilla in a fuckin' coupe, finna pull up to the zoo, nigga
Who, nigga? Who the fuck is you? I don't know, nigga
No, nigga, pull up on your block, we gon' blow, nigga
Go, nigga, run, nigga, run for the po', nigga (Police, nigga)
Gas what I smoke, nigga (Nigga, smoke)
Feds at my door, jump out the window, nigga (The window)
No, you can't get no money, silly ho (Silly ho)
I just hit a stain, faneto (Faneto)

Ayy, Finesse",530472
47042,376208,Lord Pretty Flacko Jodye 2 LPFJ2,rap,A$AP Rocky,2015,1113318,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
Uh (Uh)
Yeah (Lord Pretty Flacko, nigga)
Yeah (Yeah)
Yeah (Yeah)
Whoo (Whoo)
Yeah (Yeah)
Yeah


Who the jiggy nigga with the gold links?
Got me reminiscin' 'bout my old day
Three 6, suck a nigga dick, no foreplay, all day
Boomin' out the trap through the hallway
Tell me, what you niggas know about it?
Auntie sayin' turn it down, or she finna call the cops
We be plottin' on the opps, she the one who got the drop
Just a free quick fix of the A, and it's okay
They gon' take me back to my old ways
I was tryna chill, poppin' seals ever since I got a deal
Kick it with my model chick, sip Cris', fuck niggas wanna diss
Now I gotta let 'em know who's really trill

Lord Pretty Flacko Jodye
Dirty fuck niggas, how you been?
You been crossin' our minds
Niggas talk down every now and then
On the side, who gave 'em style nine times out of ten?
It was Flacko, Jodye, Flacko, Jodye
Flacko, Jodye, Flacko, Jodye


I ain't never lookin' for no handouts
Broke ass niggas never helpin' with they hands out
Find out where the fuck nigga live then we camp out
Screamin' fuck the world, never catch me with my pants down
Always been a stand-up guy, I'd rather stand out
Raf Simons, Stan Smith edition with my bands out
I'm the trillest one to do it since Pimp, nigga hands down
If a nigga put his hands on me, that's a man down
Trick, what? Pimps up, hoes down, whoa now
Slow down, see they runnin' with my old style
Grow foul, gold smile, you ho now, thuggin' with my old style
It's a shame how they low down
Dirty like Adidas on my sneaker feature, uh
Trappin' through the speaker, peep the beeper ringer, uh
Turnin' off phones, just to reach 'em, gotta beep 'em
I'm a Lord motherfucker, better greet him if you see him

Lord Pretty Flacko Jodye
Dirty fuck niggas, how you been?
You been crossin' our minds
Niggas talk down every now and then
On the side, who gave 'em style nine times out of ten?
It was Flacko, Jodye, Flacko, Jodye
Flacko, Jodye, Flacko, Jodye",532344
47295,379360,CoCo,rap,O.T. Genasis,2014,3055092,{},"
(Juice808)


I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I got it for the low, low
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I'm in love with the coco (Cocaína)
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I got it for the low, low (Turn up!)
I'm in love with the coco


Hit my plug, that's my cholo (Mi amigo)
Cause he got it for the low, low
If you snitchin' I go loco (Go crazy)
Hit you with that treinta ocho (Pah, pah)
Niggas thinkin' that I'm solo
Fifty deep, they like, ""Oh, no"" (No, no, no, please, no)
Heard the feds takin' photos
I know nothin', fuck the po-po

Bakin' soda, I got bakin' soda
Bakin' soda, I got bakin' soda
Whip it through the glass, nigga (Woo, woo, woo, woo)
I'm blowin' money fast, nigga (Woo, woo, woo, woo)


I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I got it for the low, low
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I'm in love with the coco (Cocaína)
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I got it for the low, low (Turn up!)
I'm in love with the coco


36, that's a kilo (Aquí)
Need a brick, miss my free throw (They white)
I'm in love, just like Ne-Yo
Bustin' shots, now he Neo (Matrix)
Free my homies, fuck the C.O. (Puto)
Fuck the judge, fuck my P.O. (Puto)
All this coke, like I'm Nino
Water whip, like I'm Nemo

Bakin' soda, I got bakin' soda
Bakin' soda, I got bakin' soda
Whip it through the glass, nigga (Woo, woo, woo, woo)
I'm blowin' money fast, nigga (Woo, woo, woo, woo)


I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I got it for the low, low
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I'm in love with the coco (Cocaína)
I'm in love with the coco (Coco)
I got it for the low, low (Turn up!)
I'm in love with the coco",539654
47366,380114,Blank Space,pop,Taylor Swift,2014,1453851,{},"
Nice to meet you, where you been?
I could show you incredible things
Magic, madness, heaven, sin
Saw you there, and I thought
""Oh my God, look at that face
You look like my next mistake
Love's a game, wanna play?""
Ayy


New money, suit and tie
I can read you like a magazine
Ain't it funny? Rumors fly
And I know you heard about me
So hey, let's be friends
I'm dyin' to see how this one ends
Grab your passport and my hand
I can make the bad guys good for a weekend


So it's gonna be forever
Or it's gonna go down in flames
You can tell me when it's over, mm
If the high was worth the pain
Got a long list of ex-lovers
They'll tell you I'm insane
'Cause you know I love the players
And you love the game
'Cause we're young and we're reckless
We'll take this way too far
It'll leave you breathless, hmm
Or with a nasty scar
Got a long list of ex-lovers
They'll tell you I'm insane
But I've got a blank space, baby
And I'll write your name

Cherry lips, crystal skies
I could show you incredible things
Stolen kisses, pretty lies
You're the King, baby, I'm your Queen
Find out what you want
Be that girl for a month
Wait, the worst is yet to come
Oh, no


Screaming, crying, perfect storms
I can make all the tables turn
Rose garden filled with thorns
Keep you second guessin' like
""Oh my God, who is she?""
I get drunk on jealousy
But you'll come back each time you leave
'Cause, darling, I'm a nightmare dressed like a daydream


So it's gonna be forever
Or it's gonna go down in flames
You can tell me when it's over, mm
If the high was worth the pain
Got a long list of ex-lovers
They'll tell you I'm insane
'Cause you know I love the players
And you love the game
'Cause we're young and we're reckless
We'll take this way too far
It'll leave you breathless, hmm
Or with a nasty scar
Got a long list of ex-lovers
They'll tell you I'm insane
But I've got a blank space, baby
And I'll write your name

Boys only want love if it's torture
Don't say I didn't, say I didn't warn ya
Boys only want love if it's torture
Don't say I didn't, say I didn't warn ya


So it's gonna be forever
Or it's gonna go down in flames
You can tell me when it's over, mm
If the high was worth the pain
Got a long list of ex-lovers
They'll tell you I'm insane
'Cause you know I love the players
And you love the game
'Cause we're young and we're reckless
We'll take this way too far
It'll leave you breathless, hmm
Or with a nasty scar
Got a long list of ex-lovers
They'll tell you I'm insane
But I've got a blank space, baby
And I'll write your name",542389
47367,380115,Style,pop,Taylor Swift,2014,1084081,{},"
Midnight
You come and pick me up, no headlights
A long drive
Could end in burning flames or paradise
Fade into view, oh
It's been a while since I have even heard from you
(Heard from you)
And I should just tell you to leave, 'cause I
Know exactly where it leads, but I
Watch us go 'round and 'round each time


You got that James Dean daydream look in your eye
And I got that red lip classic thing that you like
And when we go crashing down, we come back every time
'Cause we never go out of style, we never go out of style
You got that long hair, slicked back, white t-shirt
And I got that good girl faith and a tight little skirt
And when we go crashing down, we come back every time
'Cause we never go out of style, we never go out of style

So it goes
He can't keep his wild eyes on the road (Mmm)
Takes me home
The lights are off, he's taking off his coat (Mmm, yeah)
I say, ""I heard, oh
That you've been out and about with some other girl""
Some other girl
He says, ""What you heard is true, but I
Can't stop thinking 'bout you and I""
I said, ""I've been there too a few times""


'Cause you got that James Dean daydream look in your eye
And I got that red lip classic thing that you like
And when we go crashing down, we come back every time
'Cause we never go out of style, we never go out of style
You got that long hair, slicked back, white t-shirt
And I got that good girl faith and a tight little skirt
(A tight little skirt)
And when we go crashing down, we come back every time
'Cause we never go out of style (We never go, we never go)
We never go out of style


Take me home
Just take me home
Yeah, just take me home
Oh-oh, whoa-oh, oh
(Out of style)

Oh, you got that James Dean daydream look in your eye
And I got that red lip classic thing that you like
And when we go crashing down (And when we go)
We come back every time
'Cause we never go out of style, we never go out of style",542390
47425,380766,Nikki,rap,Logic,2014,1101814,{},"
I can feel you in my lungs, feel you in my veins
Bloodstream only way to make it to my brain
I tried some others but man they just not as good as you
Going crazy 'cause I only feel this good with you
Maybe I'm just not as strong as I once was
When we're together lately I don't even feel a buzz
I'm addicted to this shit like it was hard drugs (Drugs)
Nikki baby, I love you but now I gotta go
'Cause in the end what happens you already know
Probably wonder where I been at, I been laying low
But in my mind I'm wondering what I'm paying for (Paying for)
All these other bitches on my dick but I can't fuck with that
You're the only girl I need I gotta have you back
Even though you turn my lungs black (My lungs black)
Tell me where you been Jack (Been Jack)
Uh, I know this shorty that go by the name of Mary
I used to fuck her way back when I didn't know a thing
Skipping school with all my homies on some truancy
But when I ended things with her it was just you and me
Doing me good, that's what I thought at first
Me and you together, swear to God that's all that worked
Away from you though man it's just so hard to work (Hard to work)
Uh, my heart is hard at work
We been together like ten years
Goddamn, took me as a young man
Everyday I wonder who I am, who will I be, where will I go
What will they write upon my grave?
A free man born as a king, who died as a slave
But everything he gave her was for nothing though
Oh no I can't fade that shit I gotta let you go
You got me tripping like a flight to Vegas
All this shit you got me doing man it's outrageous
All I know is I'm living the life I never would
Finally let you go, I thought I never could
Don't get me wrong, can't forget the times shared
Seem like everywhere I go, I always know you're there
Tried to run but my legs won't
I look away but my head don't
I love it when you're fresh
I love it when I take your top off and we share the same breath
I hate it that I need you, Nikki
But I love it when I feed you, Nikki
I hate that I bleed for you
Uh, I long and I need for you
But I love it when I taste you (Taste you)
Nothing can replace you (Replace you)
I wish I could erase you, you're everywhere I go
But you're everywhere I long to be
And all these other people that don't seem to understand
I'm just a man they always ask what's wrong with me
Man you're everything I crave
You're the only thing I let in that would put me in the grave
I'm a king, you're my Coretta
But lately, I been feeling like a slave for the nicotine (Nicotine, nicotine)

Slave for the-
Said, I'm a slave for the nicotine (Nicotine, nicotine)
Been a slave for ya
I'm a muthafuckin' slave for ya
Slave for the nicotine (Nicotine, nicotine)
Nikki, Nikki, slave for ya
I'm a slave for ya Nikki
I'm a muthafuckin' slave for ya


All handwriting on the album's artwork was done by Big Lenbo-",544491
47472,381240,How Bout Now,rap,Drake,2014,2177194,{},"
That's the shit I'm talking 'bout though, like you changed up, you don't even fuckin' link nobody no more, you just dash me away like a cyattie. Yo, you cheesed me dog


Always felt like my vision been bigger than the bigger picture
Crazy how you gotta wait until it's dark out to see who really with you
Crazy how even when it miss you
Shit'll come back around and get you
Crazy like all my niggas, crazy like all my niggas
Remember I deleted all my other girls' numbers out the phone for you?
Remember when you had to take the bar exam
I drove in the snow for you? Yeah
You probably don't remember half the shit a nigga did for you, yeah


Yeah, you ain't really fuck with me way back then
But how 'bout now? (Now)
'Cause I'm up right now (I'm up right now)
And you stuck right now (Stuck right now)
Oh, you thought you had it all figured out back then
But how 'bout now? (Now)
'Cause I'm up right now (I'm up right now)
And you stuck right now, yeah (Stuck right now)
You thought the little effort that you put in was enough, girl
How 'bout now? Yeah
Girl, how 'bout now, how 'bout now, girl?
What about now, girl, how 'bout now?

My heart belongs to you...


Yeah, always been daddy's little angel
I bought your dad a bunch of shit for Christmas
He ain't even say thank you
I had no money left from actin', I was focused on the music
I used to always try and burn you CDs of my new shit
You be like ""who's this?"" I be like ""me, girl""
You be like ""oh, word, true shit?""
Then ask if we could listen to Ludacris
Them car rides made me feel like I was losin' it
Yeah, made me feel I ain't have it like that
Or I was average like that
Started drinkin' way more than I used to
People form habits like that, girl
Yeah, man enough to tell you I was hurt that year
I'm not even Christian, I still went to church that year
Guess I just had to pretend that year
I ain't even see my friends that year
Places that I should've been


Yeah, you ain't really fuck with me way back then
But how 'bout now? (Now)
'Cause I'm up right now (I'm up right now)
And you stuck right now (Stuck right now)
Oh, you thought you had it all figured out back then
Girl, how 'bout now? (Now)
'Cause I'm up right now (I'm up right now)
And you stuck right now, yeah (Stuck right now)
You thought the little effort that you put in was enough, girl
How 'bout now? Yeah
Girl, how 'bout now, how 'bout now, girl?
What about now, girl, how 'bout now?

My heart belongs to you
Whatever you need, there's nothin' I won't do
Whatever you need, there's nothin' I won't do
Whatever you need, there's nothin' I won't do
Whatever you need, there's nothin' I won't do",546639
47729,383553,Pan Tadeusz - Inwokacja,misc,Adam Mickiewicz,1834,1865798,{},"Litwo! Ojczyzno moja! Ty jesteś jak zdrowie,
Ile cię trzeba cenić, ten tylko się dowie,
Kto cię stracił. Dziś piękność twą w całej ozdobie
Widzę i opisuję, bo tęsknię po tobie
Panno święta, co Jasnej bronisz Częstochowy
I w Ostrej świecisz Bramie! Ty, co gród zamkowy
Nowogródzki ochraniasz z jego wiernym ludem!
Jak mnie dziecko do zdrowia powróciłaś cudem,
(Gdy od płaczącej matki pod Twoją opiekę
Ofiarowany, martwą podniosłem powiekę
I zaraz mogłem pieszo do Twych świątyń progu
Iść za wrócone życie podziękować Bogu),
Tak nas powrócisz cudem na Ojczyzny łono.
Tymczasem przenoś moją duszę utęsknioną
Do tych pagórków leśnych, do tych łąk zielonych,
Szeroko nad błękitnym Niemnem rozciągnionych;
Do tych pól malowanych zbożem rozmaitem,
Wyzłacanych pszenicą, posrebrzanych żytem;
Gdzie bursztynowy świerzop, gryka jak śnieg biała,
Gdzie panieńskim rumieńcem dzięcielina pała,
A wszystko przepasane jakby wstęgą, miedzą
Zieloną, na niej z rzadka ciche grusze siedzą.",553931
47785,384327,Only,rap,Nicki Minaj,2014,3543556,"{""Lil Wayne"",Drake,""Chris Brown""}","
Yo
I never fucked Wayne, I never fucked Drake
On my life, man, fuck's sake
If I did, I'd ménage with 'em
And let 'em eat my ass like a cupcake
My man full, he just ate
I don't duck nobody but tape
Yeah, that was a setup
For a punchline on duct tape
Wo-wo-wo-worried 'bout if my butt fake
Worry 'bout y'all niggas, us straight
Th-these girls are my sons
Jo-Jon & Kate Plus Eight
When I walk in, sit up straight
I don't give a fuck if I was late
Dinner with my man on a G5
Is my idea of a update
Hut-hut one, hut-hut two
Big titties, big butt too
Fu-fuck with them real niggas
Who don't tell niggas what they up to
Had to show bitches where the top is
Ri-ring finger where the rock is
The-these hoes couldn't test me
Even if their name was Pop Quiz
Bad bitches who I fuck with
Ma-ma-mad bitches we don't fuck with
I don't fuck with them chickens
Unless they last name is Cutlet
Let it soak in
Like seasoning
And tell them bitches blow me
Lance Stephenson

Raise every bottle and cup in the sky
Sparks in the air like the Fourth of July
Nothing but bad bitches in here tonight
Oh, if you lame and you know it, be quiet
Nothing but real niggas only, bad bitches only
Rich niggas only, independent bitches only
Boss niggas only, thick bitches only
I got my real niggas here by my side, only


Yeah, I never fucked Nicki 'cause she got a man
But when that's over, then I'm first in line
And the other day in her Maybach
I thought, ""Goddamn, this is the perfect time""
We had just come from that video
You know, L.A. traffic, how the city slow
She was sitting down on that big butt, but I was still staring at the titties though
Yeah, low-key or maybe high-key
I been peeped that you like me, you know?
Who the fuck you really wanna be with besides me?
I mean, it doesn't take much for us to do this shit quietly
I mean, she say I'm obsessed with thick women and I agree
Yeah, that's right, I like my girls BBW
Yeah, type that wanna suck you dry and then eat some lunch with you
Yeah, so thick that everybody else in the room is so uncomfortable
Ass on Houston Texas, but the face look just like Clair Huxtable
Oh! Yeah, you the man in the city when the mayor fuck with you
The NBA players fuck with you
The bad-ass bitches doing makeup and hair fuck with you, oh
That's 'cause I believe in something, I stand for it
And Nicki if you ever tryna fuck
Just give me the heads-up, so I can plan for it
Pinkprint

Raise every bottle and cup in the sky (Ayy)
Sparks in the air like the Fourth of July
Nothing but bad bitches in here tonight
Oh, if you lame and you know it, be quiet
Nothing but real niggas only, bad bitches only
Rich niggas only, independent bitches only
Boss niggas only, thick bitches only
I got my real niggas here by my side, only


I never fucked Nick' and that's fucked up
If I did fuck, she'd be fucked up
Whoever is hittin' ain't hittin' it right
'Cause she act like she need dick in her life
That's another story, I'm no story-teller
I piss greatness, like goldish yellow
All my goons so overzealous
I'm from Hollygrove, the holy Mecca
Calendar say I got money for days
I squirm and I shake, but I'm stuck in my ways
My girlfriend will beat a bitch up if she waved
They bet' not fuck with her surfboard, surfboard
My eyes are so bright, I take cover for shade
Don't have my money? Take mothers instead
You got the hiccups, you swallowed the truth
Then I make you burp, boy, treat beef like sirloin
I'm talkin' 'bout runnin' in houses with army guns
So think about your son and daughter rooms
Got two hoes with me, masked up, they got smaller guns
Ain't thinkin' 'bout your son and daughter rooms
This shit is crazy, my nigga
I mean brazy, my nigga
That money talk, I just rephrase it, my nigga
Blood gang, take the ""b"" off behavior, my nigga
For reals, if you mouth off, I blow your face off
I mean ""pop-pop-pop,"" then I take off
Nigga, now you see me, nigga, now you don't
Like Jamie Foxx acting like Ray Charles
Sixteen in a clip, one in the chamber
17 Ward bully with seventeen bullets
My story is how I went from ""poor me""
To ""please pour me a drink and celebrate with me""

Raise every bottle and cup in the sky
Sparks in the air like the Fourth of July
Nothing but bad bitches in here tonight
Oh, if you lame and you know it, be quiet
Young Mula, baby!
Nothing but real niggas only, bad bitches only
Rich niggas only, independent bitches only
Boss niggas only, thick bitches only
I got my real niggas here by my side, only",555359
47884,385444,Fuck Up Some Commas,rap,Future,2014,1153707,{},"


Fake nigga lie to a real nigga
Now that's just some shit that you don't do
I'ma stay real for my real niggas
Now that's just some shit that I'm gon' do
Fuck up the commas, let's fuck up some commas nigga
Let's fuck up some commas, let's do that shit random
Yeah, Future, Future Hendrix, it's some shit you don't do
Cut it up, cut it up


Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou, another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou', another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower

Fuck up the llama, I'm hot like a sauna, yeah
The burner is on me, can't play with that money, yeah
I'm fucking with shorty, I'm loving the way that she fucking me yeah
Give no fucks yeah, we don't give no fucks, yeah
Throw my cup yeah, I just bought my plug, yeah
Full of the mud, yeah, nigga get full of them drugs, yeah
Feeling real right, yeah, I'm on same thing as Mike, yeah
Bought a lil' ice, yeah, I wanna beat that dope like Ike, yeah


Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou, another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou', another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower

Smoke the first 48 hours, grind 22 and sleep two hours
Put 24s on the new Audi, white on white like baby powder
Drop ya' bitch off at Fulton County
Might count it up and then re-count it
Double cups like Tunechi, yeah
Bust it down with these goonies, yeah
Give no fucks yeah, we don't give no fucks, yeah
Go fill my cup yeah, bitch go fill my cup, yeah
You heard that the slums made me, I'm cool with the Konvicts
The coupe look like Akon, fuck all that bum shit


Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou, another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower


Fit it, critic, get it, hit it, run it, drill it, wet it, I'm in it, really
Split it, 50-50, ball, Reggie, ready, set, go
Throw that money in the air, watch it fall to the floor
Heard ya ordered up Ciroc, need to order up some more
Audemar yeah, 80 on the watch, yeah
Katy Perry yeah, servin' Katy Perry, yeah
I should ball yeah, I should break you off, yeah
Break you off yeah, made myself a boss, yeah

Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
Let's fuck up some commas
Let's fuck up some commas, yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou, another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower


Give no fucks yeah, we don't give no fucks yeah
Give no fucks yeah, we don't give no fucks yeah
40 thou' to a hundred thou'
Hundred thou, another hundred thou'
300 thou' to 500 thousand
A million, let's have a money shower


Let's have a money shower right now, oh
Let's have a money shower right now, oh
Let's have a money shower right now, let's go
Let's have a money shower right now, let's go
Let's have a money shower, oh, oh, oh, oh
40 thou' to a hunnid thou' to a hunnid thou' to a hunnid thou'
A million, Hendrix",559003
47896,385497,Codeine Crazy,rap,Future,2014,1109804,{},"
Codeine crazy
Yeah (8-8-8-8-808 Mafia)
Pourin' bubbly, pourin' bubbly
Pour that bubbly, pour that bubbly
Pour that bubbly
We done went through too much, you hear me?
(8-8-8-8-808 Mafia)


Pour that bubbly
Drink that muddy, drink is muddy when we covered in it
Yeah, I'm covered in it
I was thuggin' it, I was just loving lit
That's for them other niggas, that's for the other bitches
That ain't for you, dawg, that's for them other niggas
That ain't for you, shawty, that's for that other bitch
I'm going crazy 'bout it, I'm going codeine crazy
That's how I'm living it, I'm feeling lovely
I'm drinking bubbly
I'm drinking bubbly (Yeah)

Take all my problems and drink out the bottle and fuck on a model, yeah
Audemar, this not a carnival, this is a Royal Oak Cartier
Dom Perignon, I get down from a brown, I get chauffeured around
I pour up with my rounds, I pour up out of town
I corrupted your town with them guns and them pounds
I grew up on the grounds with them dealers and hounds
We order more bottles and fuck on more models and pass 'em around
I say everything triple time
Rollie, AP, Hublot, triple time
I just know the ones you call upon
I just had to pay my dawg a bond
Looking at me like a triple threat
Every time a nigga talk, a check
Smoke the kush up like a cigarette
Run it back, you hear my intellect (8-8-8-8-808 Mafia)


Celebrating like the championship
Celebrating like the championship
Celebrate like the championship
Celebrate like the championship
I told you, I told you, I told you, I told you
Hahah, celebrate


Don't tell me you celibate to the mula
I just went Rick the Ruler with the jeweler
I just went St. Tropez-in' like a goonie
Abu Dhabi, nigga straight out the sewer
Like a loaded chopper, I'm 'bout to shoot it
I'm so fucking sick and tired of these rumors
I just dived inside a cutie, we spoonin'
Take it back and take a look at yourself
Take the lesson, put it all in the air
Too many days gone by
Sittin' by the phone, waitin' 'til I reply
Drying my eyes, believe it or not
I could never see a tear fallin'
Water drippin' on me like a faucet
I just took a bitch to eat at Chipotle
Spent another sixty thousand on a Rollie
All my diamonds got you brainwashed
She sucked my dick, it got my brain washed
And for that shit, you got your man popped
See what they did to Biggie and Pac
Pour a lil', lil' liquor out, pour a lil' more liquor out
Pour it out, pour it out, pour it out

Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
All this motherfucking money got me codeine crazy


Drownin' in Actavis, suicide
When I hit the scene, it's homicide
Diamond pinky ring a lollipop
Fuck the hate, I pull up in a drop
Diamonds colder than a glacier
Ballin' harder than the Pacers
I been tryin' to have some patience
Told my mama she should pray on it
Told the streets they gotta wait on it
She gon' put a nigga name on it
I just dropped a whole thang on it
I'm making USD's overseas
That's U.S. dollars that you can't achieve
Fucked my white girl, she said, ""Nigga, please""
Fuck that white girl, she said, ""Nigga, please""
Playin' poker, now we're back in Stroker
I forgot her name but her pussy soakin'
When I seen her on the pole
Reminded myself when I used to come over
Reminded myself when I used to get loaded
Remindin' myself that I'm still gettin' loaded
The coupe fully loaded, this whip fully loaded
This whip fully loaded, the clip fully loaded
I try to control it
Let's wrap up some bottles, let's pop off some bottles, these niggas too bogus
Let's pour up a pint, I'ma fuck around, faint like I'm Kid Cudi, probably
I fuck around, faint, I'ma fall on the drank
Rockin' Tom Ford, poppin' mollies
Married to this motherfuckin' money

Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
All this motherfucking money got me codeine crazy


You thought I forgot about us?
I know that you know I don't fold under pressure
I'm back on the road, I get low on the pedal
We live by the codes of the ghetto
I'm closing this out with my memo
I'm treating this shit like a demo
I'm putting my heart and my soul in this shit and some more
I'm in that Dolce Gabbana
I might get after Madonna
I get it crack in the summer
Strapped in the 'Lac and the Hummer
Fronted a pack to my partner
All this lingo got her panties to dropping
Fuck the fame, I'm sipping lean when I'm driving
All this cash and it ain't nowhere to hide it
I'm an addict and I can't even hide it
Don't you panic, panoramic companion
They was tryna serve me at the arraignment
Never comment on it, never complaining
I'm taking everything that come with these millions
I'm taking everything that come with my children
Yeah, yeah


Pour that bubbly
Drink that muddy, drink is muddy when we covered in it
Yeah, I'm covered in it
I was thuggin' it, I was just loving lit
That's for them other niggas, that's for the other bitches
That ain't for you, dawg, that's for them other niggas
That ain't for you, shawty, that's for that other bitch
I'm going crazy 'bout it, I'm going codeine crazy
That's how I'm living it, I'm feeling lovely
I'm drinking bubbly


Codeine crazy, codeine crazy
All this motherfucking money got me codeine crazy",559442
48209,389076,No Flockin,rap,Kodak Black,2014,1985325,{},"
Damn, that's so sad
KKK, KKK


Young nigga, I got old cash, spazzin' on they ass
I got Prada on my ho ass, got my last one mad
Pop a nigga like a damn tag, shoppin' on they ass
I just bought a new old Jag, yeah, it's so fast
Smokin' flocka, you a jackass, all I smoke is gas
Don't you ask me where the pole at, where yo' clothes at?
I ain't talkin' 'bout my niggas, dammit, but y'all trippin', too
Is it you? Damn, my nigga, what the hell got into you?
Project Baby, y'all was skippin' in the hallway, I was skippin' school
On my Ps and Qs, on them jiggas, call me jiggaboo
Bleedin' concrete, bet you niggas won't come 'cross the street
Pardon me, I don't talk to you so don't you talk to me
I ain't dissin' on nobody, B, I'm vibin' on the beat
Honestly, I'm just tryna be, I just gotta be
Tryin' to get over on anything, they tellin' lies to me
I spent five on my pinky ring, she love my diamond ring
Anyway, I'm married to the game, she said her vows to me
I ain't gettin' on my knees, bae, you bow down to me
You go down for me, you lay down and do the time for me
Sorry, boo, yeah, I lied to you, but don't you lie to me
It's Lil Kodak, the finesse kid, boy, who hot as me?
Told the doctor I'm a healthy kid, I smoke broccoli
I will run around your whole board like Monopoly
Ol' boy, you's a broke boy, flocka's got you beat
Chocolate, call me Reese's, can't catch me without the piece
C'est la vie, I'm ten toes down, you fallin' off your feet
I will trick yo ass for a treat, call it Halloween
Yeah, that money's what I play fo', call it lottery
Goddamn, you's a clown to me, you's a clown to me
You can't smoke no Black & Milds with me, get in the car with me
You a funny guy, don't you even joke around with me
How could it be? Get from 'round a G, you grounded from me
I'm a freeband junkie, you a junkie
You gettin' skinny, I'm gettin' chunky, gettin' money
Want some food? Boy, you hungry, I want them hundreds
Hundreds",570825
48300,389868,Post to Be,rb,Omarion,2014,1350966,"{""Chris Brown"",""Jhené Aiko""}","
Omarion
Breezy
And your chick, your chick
(Mustard on the beat, ho)
Yeah


If your chick come close to me
She ain't goin' home when she 'posed to be (No)
I'm gettin' money like I'm 'posed to be
I'm gettin' money like I'm 'posed to be, ooh
All my niggas close to me
And all them other niggas where they 'posed to be, ooh
The hoes go for me
Have your chick send a pic, like, ""Pose for me"" (Ooh)
That's how it 'posed to be (Ah, ah)
Yeah, yeah, that's how it 'posed to be (Ah, ah, ah, ah, ah)
Ooh, yeah, that's how it 'posed to be (Ah, ah)
Everything good like it's 'posed to be (Ah, ah, ah, ah)

Pull up to the club and it go up (Go up)
Make your girl fall in love when I show up (Woop, woop)
It's not my fault she wanna know me (Hey)
She told me you was just a homie (Hahaha)
She came down like she knew me (Hey)
Gave it up like a groupie (True)
And that's facts, no printer (No printer)
Cold nigga turn the summer to the winter
She saved me in her phone as ""Bestie""
But I had her screaming, ""Oh""
Your girl wasn't supposed to text me (Nope)
You wanna know how I know what I know? (Hey)


If your chick come close to me
She ain't goin' home when she 'posed to be (Aw, yeah, no)
I'm gettin' money like I'm 'posed to be (Yeah, yeah)
I'm gettin' money like I'm 'posed to be, ooh
All my niggas close to me
And all them other niggas where they 'posed to be, ooh
The hoes go for me
Have your chick send a pic, like, ""Pose for me""
Ooh, that's how it post to be (Ah, ah)
Yeah, yeah, that's how it 'posed to be (Ah, ah, ah, ah, ah)
Yeah, yeah, that's how it 'posed to be (Ah, ah)
Everything good like it's 'posed to be (Ooh, ah, ah, ah, ah)

Got your girl in my section, finna go up (Go up)
A nigga smokin' loud, I'm 'bout to roll up (Roll up)
She ain't never got high like this with a guy like this
Once she pop it, tell her, ""Hol' up"" (Hol' up)
Better believe she gon' leave with a real nigga
I dick her down, can't put it down like I do (Like I do)
I get to bustin', no discussion, gotta deal with it
Team us, we ain't worried about you, oh
Murder she wrote, yeah, yeah
When I hit it, I'ma kill it, I'ma get it like (Get it)
Murder she wrote
You wanna know how I know what I know? (Oh)


If your dude come close to me
He gon' want to ride off in a Ghost with me (I'll make him do it)
I might let your boy chauffeur me
But he gotta eat the booty like groceries
But he gotta get rid of these hoes from me
I might have that nigga sellin' his soul for me
Ooh, that's how it 'posed to be
If he wants me to expose the freak
Ooh, that's how it 'posed to be
Ooh, that's how it 'posed to be
Ooh, that's how it 'posed to be
Everything good like it 'posed to be, ooh

If your chick come close to me (If she come close to me)
She ain't going home when she 'posed to be (Oh, yeah, hey, hey)
Oh, yeah, I'm gettin' money like I'm 'posed to be ('Posed to be)
I'm gettin' money like I'm 'posed to be (Gettin' money)
Ooh, all my niggas close to me (All my niggas close to me)
And all them other niggas where they 'posed to be (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Ooh, the hoes go for me
Have your chick send a pic, like, ""Pose for me"" (Ooh, girl)
Ooh, that's how it 'posed to be (Ooh, yeah, ah, ah, ah, ah)
Yeah, that's how it 'posed to be (Ooh, woah)
Ooh, yeah, that's how it 'posed to be (Ooh, hey, ah, ah, ah, ah)
Everything good like it's 'posed to be


She 'bout to ride out with me
And I don't even know her name (Her name)
But I know that she your girl, yeah (Your girl, your girl, yeah)
She chose up, are you mad or nah?
Bruh, don't be mad about it
These chicks be for everybody


Omarion
C Breezy
I'll make him do it",573451
48351,390450,Uptown Funk,rb,Mark Ronson,2014,1138732,"{""Bruno Mars""}","
Doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Aw, ow)


This hit, that ice cold
Michelle Pfeiffer, that white gold
This one for them hood girls
Them good girls, straight masterpieces
Stylin', wilin', livin' it up in the city
Got Chucks on with Saint Laurent
Gotta kiss myself, I'm so pretty


I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh)
Uh, call the police and the fireman
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Make a dragon wanna retire, man
I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Say my name, you know who I am
I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh, doh, doh)
And my band 'bout that money, break it down

Girls hit your hallelujah (Woo)
Girls hit your hallelujah (Woo)
Girls hit your hallelujah (Woo)
'Cause uptown funk gon' give it to you (Woo)
('Cause uptown funk gon' give it to you)
'Cause uptown funk gon' give it to you
Saturday night and we in the spot
Don't believe me, just watch, come on


Doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Ya)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Ya)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-)
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Hey, hey, hey, oh


Stop, wait a minute
Fill my cup, put some liquor in it
Take a sip, sign the check
Julio, get the stretch
Ride to Harlem, Hollywood, Jackson, Mississippi
If we show up, we gon' show out
Smoother than a fresh jar o' Skippy

I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh)
Call the police and the fireman
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Make a dragon wanna retire, man
I'm too hot (Too hot, hot damn, hot damn)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Bitch, say my name, you know who I am
I'm too hot (Hot damn)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh, doh, doh)
Uh, and my band 'bout that money, break it down


Girls hit your hallelujah (Woo)
Girls hit your hallelujah (Woo)
Girls hit your hallelujah (Woo)
'Cause uptown funk gon' give it to you (Woo)
('Cause uptown funk gon' give it to you)
'Cause uptown funk gon' give it to you
Saturday night and we in the spot
Don't believe me, just watch, come on


Doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Ya)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Ya)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-)
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Hey, hey, hey, oh

(Doh)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Before we leave
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Lemme tell y'all a lil' something
Uptown funk you up, uptown funk you up
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Uptown funk you up, uptown funk you up, uh
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
I said, uptown funk you up, uptown funk you up, uh
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Uptown funk you up, uptown funk you up, come on
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh, doh, doh)
Dance, jump on it
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
If you sexy, then flaunt it
If you freaky, then own it
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Don't brag about it, come show me, come on
Dance, jump on it
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
If you sexy, then flaunt it
Well, it's Saturday night and we in the spot
Don't believe me, just watch, come on


Doh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Ya)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh (Ya)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-)
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Don't believe me, just watch, uh
Don't believe me, just watch
Don't believe me, just watch
Hey, hey, hey, oh


Uptown funk you up (Woo, come on)
(Doh)
Uptown funk you up (Hey, say what?)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Uptown funk you up (Hey)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh)
Uptown funk you up (Come on)
(Doh)
Uptown funk you up (Woo, come on)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Uptown funk you up (Hey, say what?)
Uptown funk you up (Hey)
Uptown funk you up (Come on)
(Doh)
Uptown funk you up (Woo, come on)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Uptown funk you up (Hey, say what?)
Uptown funk you up (Hey)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh)
Uptown funk you up (Come on)
(Doh)
Uptown funk you up (Ah)
(Doh-doh-doh, doh-doh-doh, doh-doh)
Uptown funk you up (Say what?)
Uptown funk you up
Aw, ow",576123
48494,391870,Dont,rb,Bryson Tiller,2014,4076914,{},"
Don't, don't play with her, don't be dishonest (Ayy)
Still not understandin' this logic (Ayy)
I'm back and I'm better (And I'm better)
I want you bad as ever
Don't let me just let up
I wanna give you better
Baby, it's whatever
Somebody gotta step up
Girl, I'm that somebody, so I'm next up
Be damned if I let him catch up
It's easy to see that you're fed up
I am on a whole 'nother level
Girl, he only fucked you over 'cause you let him
Fuck him, girl, I guess he didn't know any better
Girl, that man didn't show any effort
Do all I can just to show you you're special
Certain it's your love that holds me together
Lately you say he been killin' the vibe
Gotta be sick of this guy
Pull up, skrr, get in the ride
Left hand is steerin' the other is grippin' your thigh
Light up a spliff and get high
Shawty, you deserve what you've been missin'
Lookin' at you I'm thinkin' he must be trippin'
Play this song for him, tell him, ""Just listen""

Don't
Don't


Girl, said he keeps on playin' games
And his lovin' ain't the same
I don't know what to say, but
What a shame
If you were mine you would not get the same
If you were mine you would top everything
Suicide in the drop switchin' lanes
And that thing so fire, baby, no propane
Got good pussy, girl, can I be frank?
To keep it 100, girl, I ain't no saint
But he the only reason that I'm feelin' this way
Givin' you the world, baby, when you get space
Pen game get me laid, baby, that's penetrate
Oh baby


Don't


H-Town got a nigga so throwed
Pour up, we can party some more
Yeah, got this drank in my cup
Got a young nigga feelin' so throwed
Spit fire in a world so cold
Young money got a nigga feelin' old
Spit fire in a world so cold
H-Town got me feelin' so throwed
H-Town got me feelin' so throwed
Ride paint and we sip 'til we fold
H-Town got me feelin' so throwed
Spit fire in a world so cold
H-Town got a nigga so throwed

Don't",579968
48776,395535,Revenge,pop,CaptainSparklez,2011,3348066,{TryHardNinja},"
Creeper
Aw man


So we back in the mine
Got our pickaxe swinging from side to side
Side-side to side
This task, a grueling one
Hope to find some diamonds tonight, night, night
Diamonds tonight


Heads up
You hear a sound, turn around and look up
Total shock fills your body
Oh, no, it's you again
I can never forget those eyes, eyes, eyes
Eyes-eye-eyes


'Cause, baby, tonight
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again
'Cause, baby, tonight
You grab your pick, shovel, and bolt again (Bolt again-gain)
And run, run until it's done, done
Until the sun comes up in the morn'
'Cause, baby, tonight
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again (Stuff again-gain)

Just when you think you're safe
Overhear some hissing from right behind
Right-right behind
That's a nice life you have
Shame it's gotta end at this time, time, time
Time-time-time-time


Blows up
Then your health bar drops and you could use a one-up
Get inside, don't be tardy
So, now you're stuck in there
Half a heart is left, but don't die, die, die
Die-die-die


'Cause, baby, tonight
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again
'Cause, baby, tonight
You grab your pick, shovel, and bolt again (Bolt again-gain)
And run, run until it's done, done
Until the sun comes up in the morn'
'Cause, baby, tonight
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again

(Creepers, you're mine, haha)
Dig up diamonds and craft those diamonds
And make some armor, get it, baby
Go and forge that like you so MLG pro
The sword's made of diamonds, so come at me, bro, huh
Training in your room under the torchlight
Hone that form to get you ready for the big fight
Every single day and the whole night
Creeper's out prowlin', hoo, alright
Look at me, look at you
Take my revenge, that's what I'm gonna do
I'm a warrior, baby, what else is new?
And my blade's gonna tear through you, bring it


'Cause, baby, tonight
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again
(Gather your stuff, yeah, let's take back the world)
Yeah, baby, tonight (Haha)
Grab your sword, armor and go (It's on)
Take your revenge (Woo), oh-oh, oh-oh
So fight, fight, like it's the last, last night
Of your life, life, show them your bite (Woo)


'Cause, baby, tonight
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again
'Cause, baby, tonight
You grab your pick, shovel and bolt again (Bolt again-gain, woo)
And run, run until it's done, done
Until the sun comes up in the morn'
'Cause, baby, tonight (Come on, swing your sword up high)
The creeper's tryna steal all our stuff again (Come on, jab your sword down low)
(Woo)",590544
48858,396718,January 28th,rap,J. Cole,2014,1130130,{},"


Rap tune
Can I make a million dollars off a rap tune?
Can I make a million dollars off a rap tune?
I'm tryna make a million dollars off a rap tune
Yeah, look


The real is back, the ville is back
Flow bananas, here, peel this back
And what you'll find is, your highness
Can paint a picture that is vivid enough to cure blindness
Carolina's finest, you knew that already
In terms of the greatest, I proved that already
And if you would like, I do it twice
I just sharpen my blade, for a minute became lost in my ways
This for my niggas that was tossed in the graves
Every so often I fade deep in my thoughts
And then get lost in the days
We used to play before your coffin was made
Just got the call nigga got caught with a stray
Hope he's okay
Just got paid what Cochran got paid to free OJ
Just to share my life on the stage in front of strangers
Who know a nigga far too well, and that's the danger
Know me better than I know myself
I rip a page out my notebook in anger
And let these thoughts linger, singing

Don't give 'em too much you (Don't give 'em too much you)
Don't let 'em take control (Don't let 'em take control)
It's one thing you do (It's one thing you do)
Don't let 'em taint your soul (Don't let 'em taint your soul)
If you believe in God (If you believe in God)
One thing's for sure (One thing's for sure)
If you ain't aim too high (If you ain't aim too high)
Then you aim too low (Then you aim too low)


What's the price for a black man life?
I check the toe tag, not one zero in sight
I turn the TV on, not one hero in sight
Unless he dribble or he fiddle with mics
Look out the window 'cause tonight the city lit up with lights
Cameras and action
May no man alive come through and damage my faction
I brought you niggas with me 'cause I  love you like my brothers
And your mothers' like my mother
Think we need a plan of action
The bigger we get the more likely egos collide, it's just physics
Please let's put our egos aside, you my niggas
And should our worst tendencies turn us into enemies
I hope that we remember these
Nights full of Hennessy
When Hov around we switch up to that D'usse
Gotta show respect, one day we tryna stay where you stay
'Cause we from where you from
Not talkin' bout the slums
I'm talkin' 'bout that mind state that keep a black nigga dumb
Keep a black nigga dyin' by a black nigga gun
And keep on listening to the frontin' ass rap niggas son
Yeah I said 'son'
This is New York's finest
For 11 winters straight I took on New York's climate
Like show me New York's ladder
I climb it and set the bar so high that you gotta get Obama to force the air force to find it
Never mind it, you'll never reach that
Cole is the hypnotist, control the game whenever he snap
That's every track, nigga

Don't give 'em too much you (Don't give 'em too much you)
Don't let 'em take control (Don't let 'em take control)
It's one thing you do (It's one thing you do)
Don't let 'em taint your soul (Don't let 'em taint your soul)
If you believe in God (If you believe in God)
One thing's for sure (One thing's for sure)
If you ain't aim too high (If you ain't aim too high)
Then you aim too low (Then you aim too low)


I ain't serve no pies, I ain't slang no dope
I don't bring no lies, niggas sang my quotes
I don't play no games, boy I ain't no joke
Like the great Rakim, when I make my notes
You niggas might be L or you might be Kane
Or you might be Slick Rick with 19 chains
Or you might be Drizzy Drake or Kendrick Lamar
But check your birth date nigga, you ain't the god
Nah you ain't the god
Nigga, Cole the god (Cole the god, Cole the god)
January 28th


Make a million dollars off a rap tune
Can I make a million dollars off a rap tune?
(*sound of baby laughing*)
I'm tryna make a million dollars off a rap tune
I wanna make a million dollars off a rap tune
I'm gonna make a million dollars off a rap tune",599415
48878,397095,Sunday Candy,rap,Donnie Trumpet & The Social Experiment,2014,1823130,"{""Jamila Woods""}","


She can say in her voice, in her way that she love me
With her eyes, with her smile
With her belt, with her hands, with her money
I am the thesis of her prayers
Her nieces and her nephews are just pieces of the layers
Only ones she love as much as me is Jesus Christ and Taylor
I got a future so I'm singing for my grandma
You singing too, but your grandma ain't my grandma
Mine's is handmade, pan-fried, sun-dried
Southside, and beat the devil by a landslide
Praying with her hands tied, president of my fan club, saying to her
Something told me I should bring my butt to church


You gotta move it slowly
Take and eat my body like it's holy
I've been waiting for you for the whole week
I've been praying for you, you're my Sunday candy
You gotta move slowly
Take and eat my body like it's holy
I've been waiting for you for this whole week
I've been praying for you, you're my Sunday candy

Come on in this house, cause it's gonna rain
Rain down Zion, it's gonna rain
You better come on in this house, cause it's gonna rain
Rain down Zion, it's gonna rain


I come to church for the candy, your peppermints is the truth
I'm pessimistic on Monday if I had tweaked and missed you
You look so good with that hat on, had to match with the shoes
Came and dressed in the satin, I came and sat in your pew
I come to Christmas for dinner, fifty rolls on my plate
Hella holes in my stocking holding your pockets in place
I like my love with a budget,  I like my hugs with a scent
You smell like light, gas, water, electricity, rent
You sound like why the gospel choir got so tired
Singin' his praises daily basis so I gotta try it
You're my dreamcatcher, dream team, team captain
Matter fact, I ain't seen you in a minute
Let me take my butt to church


You better come on in this house, cause it's gonna rain
Rain down Zion, it's gonna rain
You better come on in this house, cause it's gonna rain
Rain down Zion, it's gonna rain

You gotta move it slowly
Take and eat my body like it's holy
I've been waiting for you for the whole week
I've been praying for you, you're my Sunday candy
You gotta move slowly
Take and eat my body like it's holy
I've been waiting for you for this whole week
I've been praying for you, you're my Sunday candy
Slowly
Take and eat my body like it's holy
I've been waiting for you for the whole week
I've been praying for you, you're my Sunday candy


Come on in this house, cause it's gonna rain
Rain down Zion, it's gonna rain
You better come on in this house, cause it's gonna rain
Rain down Zion, it's gonna rain",594280
48994,398801,Wet Dreamz,rap,J. Cole,2014,3253969,{},"
Cole
Cole world
Yeah
Let me take y'all back, man
As I do so well
Wadn't nuttin' like that
Man, it wadn't nuttin' like that


First time, she was in my math class (Uh-huh)
Long hair, brown skin with the fat ass
Sat beside me, used to laugh, had mad jokes
The teacher always got mad, so we passed notes
It started off so innocent
She had a vibe and a nigga started diggin' it, uh
I was a youngin, straight crushin', tryna play the shit cool
But a nigga couldn't wait to get to school, 'cause when I seen
Them thighs on her and them hips on her and them lips on her
Got me daydreamin', man, what
I'm thinkin' how she rides on it, if she sits on it, if she licks on it
Make it hard for me to stand up, as time goes by
Attractions gettin' deep and
Wet dreamin', thinkin' that I'm smashin' but I'm sleepin'
I want it bad, and I ain't never been obsessed before
She wrote a note that said, ""You ever had sex before?""
Damn...

And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no


I wrote back and said
""Of course I had sex before,"" knowin' I was frontin'
I said, ""I'm like a pro, baby,"" knowin' I was stuntin'
But if I told the truth, I knew that I'd get played out, son
Hadn't been in pussy since the day I came out one, but
She don't know that, so she done wrote back and told me
""Oh, you a pro, homie? Well, I want you to show me
My mama gone for the weekend
So Saturday, baby, we can get to freakin'.""
That's when my heart start racin' and my body start sweatin'
Baby, you done woke my lil' man up
I'm thinkin' how that body look naked when you layin' on the bed
Teacher, please, don't make me stand up, I wrote back like
""Yeah, baby, sound like a plan.""
Still tryna play it cool, sound like the man
But I was scared to death, my nigga, my stomach turnin'
Talkin' shit, knowin' damn well I was a virgin
Fuck...

And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no


Yeah, you know that feelin' when you know
You finna bone for the first time?
I'm hopin' that she won't notice it's my first time
I'm hopin' that my shit is big enough to fuck wit'
And most of all I'm prayin', ""God, don't let me bust quick""
I'm watchin' pornos, tryna see just how to stroke right
Practice puttin' condoms on-how it go, right?
I'm in her crib, now a nigga palms sweatin'
With a pocket full of rubbers and an erection
That's when my hands start touchin' and her face start blushin'
And a nigga roll over on top
And then she get my pants unbuckled and her hands start rubbin'
On me, ooh girl, don't stop, it's time for action
Pull out the condoms real smooth, yeah, just how I practiced
But right before I put it in, she flinched and grabbed it and said
""I wanna get somethin' off my mental
I can tell you're a pro, but baby, be gentle, 'cause-""

'Cause I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no
And I ain't never did this before, no

",599388
48997,398819,A Tale of 2 Citiez,rap,J. Cole,2014,1566009,{},"


Since a youngin' always dreamed of gettin' rich
Look at me my nigga
Fantasize about a white picket fence
With some trees my nigga
Used to want a Pathfinder with some tints
That's all I need my nigga
Throw some 20's on that bitch and get it rinsed
But now I see my nigga
That the world's a lot bigger ever since
Picked up the paper
And they say my nigga Eddie caught a body, I'm convinced
Anybody is a killer, all you gotta do is push 'em to the limits
Fuck being timid in the Civic
Politicin' with the pushers and the pimps
I'm tryna write a story, can I get a glimpse?
Yeah, can I get a glimpse?


Last night I had a bad dream
That I was trapped in this city
Then I asked is that really such a bad thing?
They robbin' niggas on the daily
Can you blame a nigga that ain't never had things?
(What's the value of a thing?) Guess not!
Last night they pulled up on my nigga at the light like-
Ugh, nice watch, run it
Hands in the air now, hands in the air, run it
Hands in the air now, hands in the air, run it
Hands in the air now, hands in the air
Hands in the air now, hands in the air

Small town nigga Hollywood dreams
I know that everything that glitters ain't gold
I know the shit ain't always good as it seems
But tell me till you get it how could you know?
How could you know? How could you know?


Listen up I'm about to go and get rich
Fuck with me my nigga
We gon' circle round the Ville and hit a lick
Cop some tree my nigga
And some powder, bag it up and make it flip
You gon' see my nigga
One day we gon' graduate and cop a brick
And that's the key my nigga
Listen up I'm 'bout to go and get rich
Stand back and watch if you want to nigga
Me I want my pockets fat, a badder bitch
Tired of seein' niggas flaunt, I wanna flaunt too nigga
Watch some rollers in a fuckin' Crown Vic
Tryna lock a nigga up, that's what they won't do nigga
Wanna know a funny thing about this shit?
Even if you let 'em kill your dream
It'll haunt you nigga, haunt you

Last night I had a bad dream
That I was trapped in this city
Then I asked is that really such a bad thing?
I look around like-
Do you wanna be another nigga, that ain't never had things? (What's the value of a thing?)
Guess not!
Last night we pulled up on a nigga at the light like
(You know what the fuck it is nigga, run that shit!)
Uh, nice watch, run it
Hands in the air now, hands in the air, run it
Hands in the air now, hands in the air, run it
Hands in the air now, hands in the air
Hands in the air now, hands in the air


Father forgive me for my childish ways
I look outside and all the clouds are gray
I need your hands to take me miles away
Your wish is my command, my command, my command
But before you go I've got to warn you now
Whatever goes up surely must come down
And you'll get your piece, but know peace won't be found
So why just take me man, take me man, take me man
Your wish is my command, my command, my command",599407
48999,398822,03 Adolescence,rap,J. Cole,2014,1296665,{},"


La la la
La la la la la
La la la (Yeah)
La la la la la (Yeah)


I grew up, a fucking screw up, tie my shoe up
Wish they was newer, damn, need something newer
In love with the baddest girl in the city, I wish I knew her
I wish I wasn't so shy, I wish I was a bit more fly
I wish that I could tell her how I really feel inside
That I'm the perfect nigga for her, but then maybe that's a lie
She like a certain type of nigga, and it's clear I'm not that guy
Ball player, star player, I'm just watchin' from the side
On the bench, 'cause my lack of confidence won't let me fly
I ain't grow up with my father, I ain't thinkin' 'bout that now
Fast forward four years or so from now, I'll probably cry
When I realize what I missed, but as of now my eyes are dry
'Cause I'm tryna stay alive, in the city where too many niggas die
Dreamin' quiet trying to dodge a suit and tie
Who am I? (La la la)
Ayy, who am I? (La la la la la, yeah)

Things change, rearrange and so do I
It ain't always for the better, dawg, I can't lie
I get high 'cause the lows can be so cold
I might bend a little bit but I don't fold
One time for my mind and two for yours
I got food for your thoughts to soothe your soul
If you see my tears fall, just let me be
Move along, nothing to see


I always did shit the hard way
My nigga  slangin' in the hallway
Burnt CD's and trees like this was Broadway
Times Square, kept the dimes there in the locker
Some Reggie Miller with more brown hairs than Chewbacca
Whispers that he got it for the low-low, sell a
Dime for a dub, them white boys ain't know no better
Besides, what's twenty dollars to a nigga like that?
He tell his pops he need some lunch and he gon' get it right back
I peeped game, got home snatched my mama keychain
Took her whip, the appeal, too ill to refrain
I hit the boulevard, pull up to my nigga front do'
His mama at home, she still let 'em hit the blunt though
I told her, ""Hello"", and sat with my nigga and laughed
And talked about how we gon' smash all the bitches in class
I complimented how I see him out here getting his cash
And just asked, ""What a nigga gotta do to get that?
Put me on,"" he just laughed when he seen I was sure
17 years breathing, his demeanor said more
He told me, ""Nigga, you know how you sound right now?
If you wasn't my mans, I would think that you a clown right now
Listen, you everything I wanna be, that's why I fucks with you
So how you looking up to me when I look up to you?
You 'bout to go get a degree, I'ma be stuck with two choices:
Either graduate to weight or selling number two
For what? A hundred bucks or two a week?
Do you think that you would know what to do if you was me?
I got, four brothers, one mother that don't love us
If they ain't want us, why the fuck they never wore rubbers?""
I felt ashamed to have ever complained
About my lack of gear and thought about how far we done came
From trailer park to a front yard with trees in the sky
Thank you mama, dry your eyes, there ain't no reason to cry
You made a genius and I, ain't gon' take it for granted
I ain't gon' settle for lesser, I ain't gon' take what they handed
Nah, I'm gon' take what they owe me and show you that I can fly
And show old girl what she missing, the illest nigga alive
Ayy, who am I?

Things change, rearrange and so do I (Ayy, who am I?)
It ain't always for the better, dawg, I can't lie (Who am I?)
I get high 'cause the lows can be so cold
I might bend a little bit but I don't fold
One time for my mind and two for yours
I got food for your thoughts to soothe your soul
If you see my tears fall, just let me be
Move along, nothing to see


I never felt better",599410
49000,398827,Fire Squad,rap,J. Cole,2014,1724092,{},"


Nigga why you actin' like a ho?
Know that I'ma ride for ya, either way it go
Tell me, girl why you be stressin' me for time?
When you tell me you love me, can't you see I'm tryna climb?
Damn my nigga why you actin' like a bitch?
If you scared to take a chance, how the fuck we gon' get rich?
Come here baby why you always insecure?
Hold on tight to a nigga and be sure


Ain't a way around it no more, I am the greatest
A lotta niggas sat on the throne, I am the latest
I am the bravest, go toe to toe with the giants
I ain't afraid of you niggas, I'll end up fading you niggas
'Fore it's all said and done, this nigga need medicine
My uzi, it weighed a ton, I need me a better gun
In fact I just might need two, cause niggas say they the one
And I got something to prove
Forgive me, Lord, here they come, BLAOOW

Nigga why you actin' like a ho?
Know that I'ma ride for ya, either way it go
Tell me, girl why you be stressin' me for time?
When you tell me you love me, can't you see I'm tryna climb?
Damn my nigga why you actin' like a bitch?
If you scared to take a chance, how the fuck we gon' get rich?
Come here baby why you always insecure?
Hold on tight to a nigga and be sure


My inhibition's fighting my intuition
Premature premonition, showing me the demolition
Of these phony niggas, so ahead of my time
Even when I rhyme about the future I be reminiscing
You want the truth well come and listen
I'm like that time you bagged a dime and checked ya phone and saw it was a number missing
As fate passes you by, half of you try
The other half of you fried, too high to actually fly
One day y'all have to decide, who you gon' be
A scary nigga or a nigga that's gon' rule like me
Keep it true like me, Cole you might be
Like the new Ice Cube, meets the new Ice-T
Meets 2 Live Crew, meets the new Spike Lee
Meets Bruce like Wayne, meets Bruce like Lee
Meets '02 Lil Wayne, in a new white tee
Meets KD, ain't no nigga that can shoot like me!
BLAOOOW!

Nigga why you actin' like a ho?
Know that I'ma ride for ya, either way it go
Tell me, girl why you be stressin' me for time?
When you tell me you love me, can't you see I'm tryna climb?
Damn my nigga why you actin' like a bitch?
If you scared to take a chance, how the fuck we gon' get rich?
Come here baby why you always insecure?
Hold on tight to a nigga and be sure


(Who's the king?)
Came from the bottom nigga, with stains on my shirt
What you expected from me, I came from the dirt
(Who's the king?)
Money my motivator, the songs that I sing
Picture a peasant passin' from pawn to a king
(Who's the king?)
You tell me ya still love me, if so then let me go
Will I return or will I burn, never know
(Who's the king?)
Look in my eyes and see the future
But don't sugar coat it


Listen...
History repeats itself and that's just how it goes
Same way that these rappers always bite each other's flows
Same thing that my nigga Elvis did with Rock 'n Roll
Justin Timberlake, Eminem and then Macklemore
While silly niggas argue over who gon' snatch the crown
Look around, my nigga, white people have snatched the sound
This year I'll prolly go to the awards dappered down
Watch Iggy win a Grammy as I try to crack a smile
I'm just playin', but all good jokes contain true shit
Same rope you climb up on, they'll hang you with
But not Jermaine, my aim too sick
I bang nigga, I came to bring the pain my brain too quick
You see how I maneuver this game, I ain't stupid
I recognize that life is a dream, and I dream lucid
And break the chains and change minds
One verse at a time, and claim 2-6
And fuck it, if the shoe fits, who's the king?

We all kings
(We all kings nigga)
Kings of ourselves first and foremost
(True)
While the people debate who's the king of this rap game
Here comes lil' ol' Jermaine
With every ounce of strength in his veins
To snatch the crown from whoever y'all think has it
But rather than place it on his head as soon as he grabs it
Poof, boom, paow, it's like magic
With a flash and a BANG the crown disintegrates
And falls to the Earth from which it came
It's done
Ain't gonna be no more kings
Be wary of any man that claims
Because deep down he clings onto the need for power
In reality he's a coward
Ultimately he's scared to die
And sometimes so am I
But when I'm in tune with the most high
I realize, the fear lies in my lack of awareness of the other side
Today I know that we are the same, are the same, you and I
Different kind of skin, different set of eyes
Two different minds, but only one God
(It's only one God nigga)
It's for all the kings
'Cause I know deep down every poet just wanna be loved",599417
49003,398833,G.O.M.D.,rap,J. Cole,2014,2033735,{},"



Hollywood Cole, go
Ayy, Hollywood, ayy, Hollywood Cole, go
My nigga done went Hollywood


You wanna know just where I'm at? Well, let me tell you 'bout it
I put my city on the map, but let me tell you 'bout it
They tryna say I can't come back, ayy, let me tell you 'bout it
Man, fuck them niggas, I come back, ayy, let me tell you 'bout it
I wanna tell you 'bout it: hands up, everybody run
Cole outside and he say he got a gun
Niggas like, ""Man, that's what everybody said""
Go and pop the trunk and now everybody dead
Everybody scared of the nigga, aware that the nigga is better
All my bitches the pick of the litter, never bitter
Niggas is fake, they anime
Me I never hate, get cake like Anna Mae, woah
Eat the cake bitch, eat the damn cake, uh
Fuck good, nigga, we demand great
Order Domino's and she take off all her clothes
Nigga you know how it goes, make the pizza man wait
The best kept secret
Even Hov tried to keep it and I leaked the damn tape, uh
Rest in peace any nigga want beef
Secret service couldn't keep the man safe

I said, to the window, to the wall (To the wall)
My nigga ride when I call (I call)
Got bitches all in my mind (My mind)
Fuck nigga blockin' my shine (My shine)
I know the reason you feel the way
I know just who you wan' be
So everyday I thank the man upstairs
That I ain't you and you ain't me


Get off my dick, woah
(Get the fuck off my dick)
Get off my dick, woah
(Get the fuck off my dick, nigga)
Get off my dick, bitch, woah
(Get the fuck off my dick)
Get off my dick, woah


Man, fuck them niggas, I come home and I don't tell nobody
They gettin' temporary dough and I don't tell nobody
Lord, will you tell me if I changed? I won't tell nobody
I wanna go back to Jermaine, and I won't tell nobody


This is the part that the thugs skip!

Young nigga never had love
You know, foot massage, back rub shit
Blowin' bubbles in the bathtub shit
That is until I met you
Together we done watch years go by
Seen a river of your tears go by
Got me thinkin' 'bout some kids, still I
Tell them hoes come through, the break up
Get to know somebody and you really learn a lot about 'em
Won't be long before you start to doubt 'em
Tell yourself you better off without 'em
Then in time you will find can't walk without 'em
Can't talk without 'em, can't breathe without 'em
Came here together, you can't leave without 'em
So you walk back in, make a scene about 'em
On your Amerie, it's just 1 Thing about 'em
It's called love, niggas don't sing about it no more
Don't nobody sing about it no more, no more
It's called love, niggas don't sing about it no more
Don't nobody sing about it no more
(Nigga, I don't sing about this shit no more)
But every nigga in the club singin'


To the window, to the wall (To the wall)
My nigga ride when I call (I call)
Got bitches all in my mind (My mind)
Fuck nigga blockin' my shine (My shine)
I know the reason you feel the way
I know just who you wan' be
So everyday I thank the man upstairs
That I ain't you and you ain't me

Get off my dick
But every nigga in the club singin'
Singin' this song, yeah
Got all the bitches in the club singin'
Singin' this song, yeah
And all they mamas let their kids sing it
Sing this song, yeah
The baby mamas and the mistresses
This song, yeah, song, yeah
Song, yeah, song-song, yeah


The make up
This shit is retarded, goddamn
Why every rich black nigga gotta be famous?
Why every broke black nigga gotta be brainless?
Uh, that's a stereotype
Driven by some people up in Aerial Heights
Here's a scenario:
Young Cole pockets is fat like Lil Terrio
Dreamville, give us a year we'll be on every show
Yeah, fuck nigga, I'm very sure, heh
Fuck the rest, I'm the best nigga out
When I'm back home, I'm the best in the South
When I'm in L.A., I'm the best in the West
You contest? You can test, I'ma stretch niggas out
Ooh, I'ma stretch niggas out
That go for all y'all if I left niggas out
This shit for everybody on my testicles
Please make sure you put the rest in your mouth, ho",599424
49004,398835,No Role Modelz,rap,J. Cole,2014,5421841,{},"
First things first: rest in peace Uncle Phil
For real
You the only father that I ever knew
I get my bitch pregnant, I'ma be a better you
Prophecies that I made way back in the Ville
Fulfilled
Listen, even back when we was broke, my team ill
Martin Luther King would'a been on Dreamville, talk to a nigga


One time for my L.A. sisters
One time for my L.A. hoes
Lame niggas can't tell the difference
One time for a nigga who know


Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved

No role models and I'm here right now
No role models to speak of
Searchin' through my memory, my memory, I couldn't find one
Last night I was gettin' my feet rubbed by the baddest bitch
Not Trina but I swear to God, this bitch'll make you call your girl up
And tell her, ""Hey, what's good?
Sorry, I'm never comin' home, I'ma stay for good""
Then hang the phone up and proceed to lay the wood
I came fast like 9-1-1 in white neighborhoods
Ain't got no shame 'bout it
She think I'm spoiled and I'm rich 'cause I can have any bitch
I got defensive and said, ""Nah, I was the same without it""
But then I thought back, back to a better me
Before I was a B-list celebrity
'Fore I started callin' bitches ""bitches"" so heavily
Back when you could get a platinum plaque without no melody, you wadn't sweatin' me


One time for my L.A. sisters
One time for my L.A. hoes
Lame niggas can't tell the difference
One time for a nigga who know


Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved

I want a real love, dark-skinned Aunt Viv love
That Jada and that Will love
That leave a toothbrush at your crib love
And you ain't gotta wonder whether that's your kid love
Nigga, I don't want no bitch from reality shows
Out-of-touch-with-reality hoes
Out in Hollywood bringin' back five or six hoes
Fuck 'em then we kick 'em to the do', nigga, you know how it go
She deserved that, she a bird, it's a bird trap
You think if I didn't rap she would flirt back?
Takin' off her skirt, let her wear my shirt, 'fore she leave
""I'ma need my shirt back"" (Nigga, you know how it go)


One time for my L.A. sisters
One time for my L.A. hoes
Lame niggas can't tell the difference
One time for a nigga who know


Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved

There's an old saying in Tennessee-I know it's in Texas, probably in Tennessee-that says, fool me once... shame on... shame on you. Fool me-can't get fooled again.


Fool me one time, shame on you (Ayy)
Fool me twice, can't put the blame on you (Ayy)
Fool me three times, fuck the peace sign
Load the chopper, let it rain on you (Bop bop bop)
Fool me one time, shame on you (Ayy)
Fool me twice, can't put the blame on you (Ayy)
Fool me three times, fuck the peace sign
Load the chopper, let it rain on you (Bop bop bop)


My only regret was too young for Lisa Bonet
My only regret was too young for Nia Long
Now all I'm left with is hoes from reality shows
Hand her a script, the bitch prolly couldn't read along
My only regret was too young for Sade Adu
My only regret, could never take Aaliyah home
Now all I'm left with is hoes up in Greystone
With the stale face 'cause they know it's they song


She shallow but the pussy deep, she shallow
She shallow
She shallow but the pussy deep, she shallow (Yeah, ayy)
She shallow
She shallow but the pussy deep, she shallow
She shallow
She shallow but the pussy deep, she shallow
She shallow


Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved
Don't save her, she don't wanna be saved

",599427
49006,398840,Apparently,rap,J. Cole,2014,1902571,{},"
Oh, right, oh
Oh, why, na-da-da-da


I keep my head high
I got my wings to carry me
I don't know freedom
I want my dreams to rescue me
I keep my faith strong
I ask the Lord to follow me
I've been unfaithful
I don't know why you call on me


This is my canvas (Yeah, my canvas)
I'ma paint it how I want it baby, oh I
This is my canvas
I'ma paint it, paint it, paint it, how I want it nigga
Fuck you 'cause there, there is no right or wrong, only a song
I like to write alone, be in my zone
Think back to Forest Hills, no perfect home
But the only thing like home I've ever known
Until they snatched it from my mama
And foreclosed her on the loan
I'm so sorry that I left you there to deal with that alone
I was up in New York City chasing panties, getting dome
Had no clue what you was going through
How could you be so strong?
And how could I be so selfish? I know I can be so selfish
I could tell by how I treat you with my girl, damn she so selfless
But she put up with my ways because she loves me like you do
And though it don't always show, I love her just like I love you, and
I need to treat you better
Wish you could live forever
So we could spend more time together
I love you mama

I keep my head high
I got my wings to carry me
I don't know freedom
I want my dreams to rescue me
I keep my faith strong
I ask the Lord to follow me
I've been unfaithful
I don't know why you call on me


E-e-eee, e-e, apparently
You believe in me, you believe in me
E-e-eee, e-e, apparently
You believe in me, and I thank you for it, oh, I


Another day, another rhyme, ho
Another day, another time zone
Today, I woke up feeling horny so it's only right, I got two bitches playing on my trombone
Keep up, never sure where the words would take me
Niggas eat em up and regurgitate me
Shit trump tight never slurred it lazy
Give a virgin the urge to rape me, nigga please
Best friends really make great for enemies
My watch came, niggas can't wait for one of these
I see you, nigga, this ain't no Rolex, it's an AP, nigga
I'm hot, dog, catch up to me, nigga- huh, couldn't resist
Aim for the stars and I shouldn't have missed
But I was riding on fumes, so I stopped by the moon
Now I'm sitting on the hood of this bitch
Like, ""Thanks for the view,"" waiting on thanks from a few
'Cause without me you wouldn't exist
You know that shit, gave you the blueprint, don't forget
Cold as your phone on zero percent
Going off, now niggas showing off
Niggas swear they hard, but they flowing soft
I'm taking off like ""boing!"" on a big ass Boeing, and getting head like a coin toss, too easy

I keep my head high
I got my wings to carry me
I don't know freedom
I want my dreams to rescue me
I keep my faith strong
I ask the Lord to follow me
I've been unfaithful
I don't know why you call on me


E-e-eee, e-e, apparently
You believe in me, you believe in me
E-e-eee, e-e, apparently
You believe in me, and I thank you for it, oh I",599442
49007,398842,Love Yourz,rap,J. Cole,2014,2218801,{},"
Huh, love yours
Huh, love yours
No such thing


No such thing as a life that's better than yours
No such thing as a life that's better than yours (Love yours)
No such thing as a life that's better than yours
No such thing, no such thing


Heart beatin' fast, let a nigga know that he alive
Fake niggas, mad snakes
Snakes in the grass let a nigga know that he arrived
Don't be sleepin' on your level
'Cause it's beauty in the struggle, nigga (Beauty, beauty)
Goes for all y'all
It's beauty in the struggle, nigga (Beauty, beauty)
Let me explain, yeah

It's beauty in the struggle, ugliness in the success
Hear my words and listen to my signal of distress
I grew up in the city and know sometimes we had less
Compared to some my niggas down the block, man, we were blessed
And life can't be no fairy tale, no once upon a time
But I be goddamned if a nigga don't be tryin'
So tell me, Momma please, why you be drinkin' all the time?
Does all the pain he brought you still linger in your mind?
'Cause pain still lingers on mine
On the road to riches, listen, this is what you'll find
The good news is, nigga, you came a long way
The bad news is, nigga, you went the wrong way
Think being broke was better


No such thing as a life that's better than yours (Ha)
No such thing as a life that's better than yours (Think being broke was better)
No such thing as a life that's better than yours
(Think being broke was better, yeah) No such thing, no such thing


For what's money without happiness?
Or hard times without the people you love?
Though I'm not sure what's 'bout to happen next
I ask for strength from the Lord (Man) up above
'Cause I been strong so far, but I can feel my grip loosenin'
Quick, do somethin' before you lose it for good, get it back and use it for good
And touch the people how you did like before
I'm tired of livin' with demons 'cause they always invitin' more
Think being broke was better, now I don't mean that phrase with no disrespect
To all my niggas out there livin' in debt
Cashin' minimal checks, turn on the TV, see a nigga Rolex
And fantasize about a life with no stress
I mean this shit sincerely, and as a nigga who was once in your shoes
Livin' with nothin' to lose, I hope one day you hear me
Always gon' be a bigger house somewhere, but nigga feel me
Long as the people in that motherfucker love you dearly
Always gon' be a whip that's better than the one you got
Always gon' be some clothes that's fresher than the ones you rock
Always gon' be a bitch that's badder out there on the tours
But you ain't never gon' be happy 'til you love yours

No such thing as a life that's better than yours (Love yours)
No such thing as a life that's better than yours (Love yours)
No such thing as a life that's better than yours (Love yours)
No such thing, no such thing


Heart beatin' fast, let a nigga know that he alive
Fake niggas, mad snakes
Snakes in the grass let a nigga know that he arrived",599451
49087,399930,Feeling Myself,rap,Nicki Minaj,2015,3051350,{Beyoncé},"
Yo, B, they ready
Let's go


Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my, feelin' my
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my


I'm with some hood girls lookin' back at it
And a good girl in my tax bracket (Uh)
Got a black card that'll let Saks have it
These Chanel bags is a bad habit
I-I do balls, Dal Mavericks
My Maybach, black matted (Uh)
Bitch, never left but I'm back at it
And I'm feelin' myself, jack rabbit
Feelin' myself, back off
'Cause I'm feelin' myself, jack off (Uh)
He be thinking about me when he whacks off
Wax on? Wax off
National anthem, hats off
Then I curve that nigga, like a bad toss (Uh)
Lemme get a number two, with some Mac sauce
""On The Run Tour"", with my mask off

I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my (Uh)
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my, feelin' my
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my (Uh)
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my


Changed the game with that digital drop
Know where you was when that digital popped
I stopped the world
Male or female, it make no difference
I stop the world, world, stop-
Carry on


Kitty on fleek, pretty on fleek (Uh)
Pretty gang always keep them niggas on geek
Ridin'-ridin' through Texas (Texas), feed him for his breakfast (Uh)
Everytime I whip it, I be talkin' so reckless
He said ""Damn, Nicki, it's tight,"" I say ""Yeah, nigga, you right"" (Uh)
He said ""Damn, bae, you so little, but you be really takin' that pipe""
I said ""Yes, daddy, I do, gimme brain like NYU"" (Uh)
I said ""Teach me, nigga, teach me, all this learnin' here is by you""


I'm whippin' that work, he diggin' that work
I got it, 36 of that real
Panky full of that bounce baby
Come get you some of that bounce baby

I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my (Uh)
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my, feelin' my
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm feelin' my (Uh)
Feelin' myself, I'm feelin' myself, I'm killin' my


Cookin' up that base (Base), lookin' like a kilo (Kilo)
He just wanna taste (Taste), biggin' up my ego (Ego)
(Ego, ego, ego, ego, ego, ego, ego, ego)
Ridin' through Texas (Ridin' through Texas) (Ridin' through Texas)
Smoke it all off, talkin' bout that high-grade
Baby hold up, I can kill your migraine
(Migraine, migraine, migraine, migraine, migraine, migraine, migraine, migraine)
Ridin' through Texas (Ridin' through Texas) (Ridin' through Texas)


Bitches ain't got punchlines or flow
I have both and an empire also
Keep gettin' gifts from Santa Claus at the North Pole
Today I'm icy, but I'm prayin' for some more snow
Let that ho ho, let-let that ho know (He in love)
He in love with that coco
Why these bitches don't never be learnin'?
You bitches will never get what I be earnin' (Uh)
I'm still gettin' plaques, from my records that's urban
Ain't gotta rely on top 40, I am a rap legend
Just go ask the Kings of Rap, who is the Queen and things of that
Nature? Look at my finger, that is a glacier, hits like a laser
Rrr! Drippin' on that work, trippin' off that perc
Flippin' up my skirt and I be whippin' all that work
Takin' trips with all them ki's, car keys got B's (Uh)
Stingin' with the Queen B and we be whippin' all of that D
Cause we dope girls we flawless, we the poster girls for all this (Uh)
We run around with them ballers, only real niggas in my call list
I'm the big kahuna, go let them whores know (Uh)
Just on this song alone, bitch is on her fourth flow

Hahaha, Rrrrrrrrrr!
You like it, don't'chyea? Snitches!
(*Laughter*)
Young Money",601809
49496,404335,Truffle Butter,rap,Nicki Minaj,2014,2398361,"{""Lil Wayne"",Drake}","
You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of
You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of


Uh, thinkin' out loud
I must have a quarter million on me right now
Hard to make a song 'bout somethin' other than the money
Two things I'm about it, talkin' blunt and staying blunted
Pretty women, are you here? Are you here right now, huh?
We should all disappear right now
Look, you're gettin' all your friends and you're gettin' in the car
And you're comin' to the house, are we clear right now, huh?
You see the fleet of all the new things
Cop cars with the loose change
All white like I move things
Niggas see me rollin' and they mood change
Like a muhfucka
New flow, I got a dozen of 'em
I don't trust you, you a undercover
I could probably make some step-sisters fuck each other (Woo)
Talkin' filets with the truffle butter
Fresh sheets and towels, man she gotta love it
Yeah, they all get what they desire from it
What, tell them niggas we ain't hidin' from it

You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of
You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of


Yo, thinkin' out loud
I must have about a milli on me right now
And I ain't talkin' about that Lil Wayne record
I'm still the highest sellin' female rapper, for the record
Man, this a 65 million single sold
I ain't gotta compete with a single soul
I'm good with the ballpoint game, finger roll
Ask me how to do it, I don't tell a single soul
Pretty women, wassup? Is you here right now?
You a stand-up or is you in your chair right now?
Uhh, do you hear me? I can't let a wack nigga get near me
I might kiss the baddest bitch if you dare me
I ain't never need a man to take care of me
Yo, I'm in that big boy, bitches can't rent this
I floss everyday, but I ain't a dentist
Your whole style and approach, I invented
And I ain't takin' that back, cause I meant it

You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of
You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of


Uh, thinkin' out loud
I could be broke and keep a million dollar smile
LOL to the bank, check in my account
Bank teller flirtin' after checkin' my account
Pretty ladies, are you here? Truffle butter on your pussy
Cuddle buddies on the low, you ain't gotta tell your friend
That I eat it in the morning, cause she gon' say ""I know""
Can I hit it in the bathroom? Put your hands on the toilet
I'll put one leg on the tub, girl, this my new dance move
I just don't know what to call it
But, bitch, you dancing with the stars
I ain't nothin' like your last dude
What's his name? - Not important
I brought some cocaine if you snortin'
She became a vacuum, put it on my dick like carpet
Suck the white off, white chocolate
I'm so heartless, thoughtless, lawless, and flawless
Smallest, regardless, largest in charge
And born in New Orleans, get killed for Jordans
Skateboard, I'm gnarly, Drake, Tunechi, and Barbie
You know!

You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of
You know, don't you?
Yeah
Night of",622818
49563,405511,L-O-V-E,rb,"Nat ""King"" Cole",1964,1106024,"{""Nat \\\""King\\\"" Cole""}","
L is for the way you look at me
O is for the only one I see
V is very, very extraordinary
E is even more than anyone that you adore can


Love is all that I can give to you
Love is more than just a game for two
Two in love can make it, take my heart and please don't break it
Love was made for me and you


L is for the way you look at me
O is for the only one I see
V is very, very extraordinary
E is even more than anyone that you adore can


Love is all that I can give to you
Love is more than just a game for two
Two in love can make it, take my heart and please don't break it
Love was made for me and you

Love a-was made for me and you
Love a-was made for me and you",632274
49728,407066,Earned It,rb,The Weeknd,2014,1599269,{},"
I'ma care for you
I'ma care for you, you, you, you


You make it look like it's magic (Oh, yeah)
'Cause I see nobody, nobody but you, you, you
I'm never confused
Hey, hey
And I'm so used to bein' used


So I love when you call unexpected
'Cause I hate when the moment's expected
So I'ma care for you, you, you
I'ma care for you, you, you, you, yeah


'Cause girl, you're perfect
You're always worth it
And you deserve it
The way you work it
'Cause girl, you earned it, yeah
Girl, you earned it, yeah

You know our love would be tragic (Oh, yeah)
So you don't pay it, don't pay it no mind, mind, mind
We live with no lies
Hey, hey
You're my favorite kind of night


So I love when you call unexpected
'Cause I hate when the moment's expected
So I'ma care for you, you, you
I'ma care for you, you, you, you, yeah


'Cause girl, you're perfect (Girl, you're perfect)
You're always worth it (Always worth it)
And you deserve it (And you deserve it)
The way you work it (The way you work it)
'Cause girl, you earned it, yeah (Earned it)
Girl, you earned it, yeah


On that lonely night (Lonely night)
We said it wouldn't be love
But we felt the rush (Fell in love)
It made us believe it was only us (Only us)
Convinced we were broken inside, yeah, inside, yeah

'Cause girl, you're perfect (Girl, you're perfect)
You're always worth it (You're always worth it)
And you deserve it (And you deserve it)
The way you work it (The way you work it)
'Cause girl, you earned it, yeah (You earned it)
Girl, you earned it, yeah (You earned it)


Na-na-na-na-na
Oh-oh-oh
Yeah, yeah
'Cause girl, you're perfect
The way you work it
You deserve it
Girl, you deserve it
Girl, you earned it, yeah, yeah",639914
49757,407294,Ayo,rap,Chris Brown & Tyga,2015,1349676,{},"
I need you, I need you
I need you, I need you
I need you, I need you (Lemme see)
I need you, I need you


We poppin' like ayo
All my bitches got real hair chillin' with the top down
Screamin' like ayo
I'ma take her ass down if she bring her friend around
Fuck 'em both like ayo
I'm a bougie ass nigga, left the roof at home
We poppin' like ayo
Ayo, ayo
But don't be actin' like I need you


Ha!
Ayy, babe, this my new shit (Shit)
I'm the black Richie Rich with the roof missin' (Missin')
If it don't make dollars, don't make sense (Sense)
Z (Z), wake up like I gotta get it (Get it)
And I got an engine full of trunk space
I get money three ways, fuckin' bitches three ways
Seven different foreigns, plus she's no hablé
But I make that bitch walk for some cheesecake (Cheesecake)
Yeah, I'm the coldest nigga, icy
Lookin' in the mirror like I wish I can be me
She too into me, I'm more into money
My hobby's her body, that pussy's my lobby
I'ma eat it (Eat it), I'ma eat it (Eat it)
I don't lie, hold my dick, too conceited
Uh, told her she's my wife for the weekend (For the weekend)
But don't be actin' like I need you

'Cause we poppin' like ayo (Ha! Yeah)
All my bitches got real hair chillin' with the top down
Screamin' like ayo
I'ma take her ass down if she bring her friend around
Fuck 'em both like ayo
I'm a bougie ass nigga, left the roof at home
We poppin' like ayo
Ayo, we poppin' like ayo
But don't be actin' like I need you


I'm in the Rolls, you don't roll right (Roll right)
My chain shine brighter than a strobe light (Yeah)
I'm tryna fuck Coco, this don't concern Ice
If I motorboat, she gon' motorbike (Ha!)
A nigga ain't worried about nothin'
Rehabilitation just had me worried about fuckin'
Money, decision-makin', only worried 'bout stuntin'
She worried 'bout me, her nigga worried 'bout cuffin'
I wanna see her body (Body)
Then she said, ""Get inside of me
I wanna feel you, baby"" (Yeah)
Just bring the animal right out of me
We lovin', she love it
Especially when I go down on her
Now we fuckin', she thuggin'
Gettin' loud

'Cause we poppin' like ayo
All my bitches got real hair chillin' with the top down
Screamin' like ayo
I'ma take her ass down if she bring her friend around
Fuck 'em both like ayo
I'm a bougie ass nigga, left the roof at home
We poppin' like ayo
Ayo (Huh, look), we poppin' like ayo
But don't be actin' like I need you (Alright)


Now, now I can spot your bitch from a mile away ('way)
Valentine in that pussy, it's a holiday
Uh, you losin' money, I win mills, Dr. J (J)
She gon' to follow my lead, Simon Says
Paper, paper, I'm ridin' 'scrapers in California ('fornia)
Car smell like ammonia, we got that stank on us
Never been a Outkast, that stank on ya
From the ghetto but my bitch like Apollonia
We in the hood, tatted like a Mexican
Car too fast, give a fuck about pedestrians
Uh, and my section less niggas, more lesbians
Got your bitch, I'm that nigga


Yeah, we poppin' like ayo (Ha! Yeah)
All my bitches got real hair chillin' with the top down (Yeah)
Screamin' like ayo
I'ma take her ass down if she bring her friend around
Fuck 'em both like ayo
I'm a bougie ass nigga, left the roof at home
We poppin' like ayo
Ayo, ayo
But don't be actin' like I need you

Yeah, this that fly shit (I need you)
King shit only
Drop top, no roof, ha!
(I need you)",640182
49773,407572,The Rap Monument,rap,Noisey,2014,1114720,"{Raekwon,Pill,""Prodigy of Mobb Deep"",""Killer Mike"",""Pusha T"",""CyHi The Prynce"",Vado,""Nipsey Hussle"",""Bobby Creekwater"",""Danny Brown"",YG,""Mike G"",""Yak Ballz"",Problem,""Meyhem Lauren"",Heems,""Kilo Kish"",""Action Bronson"",""Rockie Fresh"",""Remy Banks"",""Da\\$H"",""Flatbush Zombies"",""Zebra Katz"",""Alexander Spit"",""Young Thug"",""Bryant Dope"",""Bodega Bamz"",""Nigel Nasty"",RetcH,""A\\$ton Matthews"",Two-9,""Scotty ATL"",""CUZ Lightyear"",""Renegade El Rey"",""Del Harris"",""Pregnant Boy""}","
We in the building
Yeah
Let's go


King Push
They think that they know, something 'bout my life
Not in the same class, not on the same flight
Maybe the same club, just not the same lights
Both fucked the same bitch, just not the same night
You just took her phone number, I just took her home with a-
'Nother bitch, ménage, Boomerang, Strange'
Lipstick on my collar, Oscar de la Renta
Your hijo pequeño, my nachos bel grande
Stay sippin' that André, spent three stacks, that's André
That Balmain, that Phillip Lim, they say I'm dressing like Kanye
I'm everything that my rhymes say: breadwinner, brand owner
Play Cloths, millionaire, trendsetter, landowner
Hope your bitch don't land on him
Drink in his hand with the sand on him
You small time, you Hyundais
Y'all couch niggas, we stand on 'em
Dope money with a band on it
Half gold, we got a hand on it
D-Boys still ball the same, just gotta little bit of glam on it
Yah!

Yo, I got flames for your download link
I let Ja Rule when I murder ink
Murder pink, murder what you thought and what you think
This Queens prodigy is the product of what you ain't
Well packaged to distribute to the masters
Plotted this since first grade classes
Class is elements of a classic, I've got evidence of a master
You never thought you'd be bodied by a bastard
A bachelor who backspin on breakbeats
Break necks of broke souls who hate me
Hate he? You can't take my heat
Fireball flow, can't bat in my league
I'm the best rapper that's been slept on
Stick around like gum that's been stepped on
Stepped on, I stepped up, so what up?
Tryna make bread with these damn cold cuts
I cold crush every beat that I touch
My words silk and my flow is pure plush
Tell HudMo Dope says, ""What's up?""


Go Dreamer's a looney (Uh)
Wish upon a star (So what's up?)
I'm too cold for Pluto so I'm movin' back to Mars
'Cause this that spaceship, that space shit
This that Category 5, this that quake, bitch, that quake, bitch
See I'm so funked out, like out of here
Like blue lights in the basement
And it's a red state, in Georgia with it
Last verse, did you get it? Nah
Never mind, just throw that cash in a duffle
As I'm on my Hollywood shuffle
Eatin' your million dollar truffles, this acquirin' taste, nigga
Tantalise so you can see the bigger picture that God is the light
In the fixture or in the background
Cut all the hatin' in the background
'Cause if music and money is the motive, then you're so gimmick
Who's to tell me I can't have a trillion dollar grilled cheese sandwich?
Boy stop playin', stop playin', I'm just sayin', just sayin'
Go, go, go, go-go (Uh), go, go, go, uh
Now who else wanna fuck with Hollyweird Go?

Break up and roll it, light it and smoke it
Pass it, don't hold it, lovin' that potent
I'm drunk and I'm rollin', this pill got me open
These bad hoes is gruntin', their booties is pokin'
Out them little dresses, a nigga wanna fuck
He don't even smoke, but tell Butter roll a blunt
'Cause I'm way too drunk and I'm too turnt up
And I brought my own drugs and I do my own stunts
Young and I'm wildin', new drugs, I try 'em
He'll call me RetcH, but your bitch call me Brian
In Polo I'm stylin', it's all that I'm rockin'
If you catch me out in 'Lo it's a problem
'Less it's a Champion suit, then I'm trappin'
Fuck with me, I got all this 'Lo all from raggin' (What?)
Used to have a nigga that was down to get to clappin'
Seen it on a video, he yappin' to the captain
That nigga snitchin', R86 him
These niggas trannies 'cause these niggas switchin'
And these niggas bitchin' more than these bitches
And I'm just so sick of this shit, it's ridiculous
Middle finger to the feds and bitches all day
Take her out to eat then I make a bitch pay
And my wine on chill and my shrimps sautéed
And I'm chillin' in L.A. with a bitch for the day

Look, ain't that a bitch?
Foot up on the gas, ain't no brakes in this bitch
Cover girl givin' face to the Crip
Somethin' 'bout a nigga on the way to the chips
High off the money and I'm wasted as shit
High off the life and she can't get a grip
Hundred dollar cup and you can't get a sip
I'm a million dollar nigga, you should take you a flick
Hundred thousand dollar car where I sit
And my broad is the shit, Crenshaw in the 6
Got it parked at the Shell in front of all of the Crips
You either ball or you brick
She don't know money so she callin' you rich
You ain't got game so you fall for the shit
Spend it all in this bitch 'til it's gone and she split
Now you feel like a wimp
Talkin' 'bout what you was buildin' and shit
Got you all up in your feelings and shit
Problem is, she addicted to the real nigga shit
To the real nigga shit
50 dollar, hundred dollar bill nigga shit
Gold crown on a real nigga wrist
Fresh like my nephew Khalil in this bitch
.40 cal, no concealing the shit
Four gun cases, I'm still with this shit
Backlit, wood wheel when I whip
Got her right up on my lap, that's a real nigga risk
In the field on my tip
Hoes like Phil then I Stockton assist
It ain't no stoppin' the shit, so avoid the potholes, put stocks on the 6


Got Mary blowing Jane
We fucking high, sex on a plane
Hey newscaster, we about to rain
Get love in the club because we fill the section with pain, c'mon
Blow him up, finna explode
All of Hell's Kitchen praying he don't stick to the stove
God got me, illumi-not-me written in bold
Slept on, now I'm everywhere like g-g-g-go crazy
Buy 150, let me tell y'all now, I want Nikki
Lift her up like helicopter far away from her fellow
Let her play Problem
While problem tongue play with propeller (What)
Keep fresh just in Margielas
Diamond lane running thangs ain't shit you can tell us (Don't tell us nothing)
Done everything, ain't shit you can sell us
Money over bullshit, friction derail us (Naw!)
Compton niggas, yeah we take it or leave it
Know once it's almost over tryin' to jerk the wheel
You nervous, like them cutters he'd inject the speed
And you think you mothafucka faking me, my nigga? (What)
Yeah I bet a nigga crawl to the crown
I'm a boss, hire hoes while I bottle out
I see them niggas shaking hands and biting styles
Got her to stay city in 'cause I fired her spouse
'Cause I'm a mad man
Just fuck niggas like the Klan, man
Put you to sleep like the Sandman
Give me the throne, I'm a chairman (Diamond)
Rolex beat, it's time for just winning, no fakes
Just copped more .4 5's and 9's and I ain't talking bout no Js
Please be afraid but I ain't the shooter, Chachi-palooza
Riding shotty in the Chevy bitch old as a cougar
Lyrical Ruger, pop your medulla
You lukewarm, boy, go get you a cooler please
Your bitch know that I'm cooler, please
Your bitch know that I'm cooler, please
So cool I could fucking die if I drop a few degrees
Boss daddy use the porthole please
Get it good girl, use your knees, I love them brainiacs
Yeah, my last ho had a few degrees (For real)
Back on my Compton shit, demonic how I demolish shit
Angelic with my intuition
Student of game make hoes pay tuition (Huh)
No dice, no pill, but I'm on a roll
That one nigga that Kendrick can't control (What)
Problem


(Check!)
That Ambien in my ink pen
Move the brown squares like Wheat Thins
Y'all five days and a weekend
Stay smokin' on that defense
That's two or three and I'm zonin'
Got money like I cloned it
Your bitch came through and I owned it
Rims on the Caddy and I ice cream coned it
Homie, you ain't hitting on nothin'
Drop that top when I hit that button (Beep)
Pimp so hard it's a full time job
Swear, 12 stacks in my glove box
Bitch niggas, tell me what it's gon' be
Young nigga chop it up 223 (Do, do, do ,do)
Come to the D, don't hit OGs
And my advice is stay low-key (Uh-huh)
Bitch we great, bitch we great (Great), fuckin' set (Set)
Bitch we jump up, bitch we jump up, we gotta have it
Gotta get, get, we gotta get, get, we gonna take it first
We jump, said bitch we jump, we gotta make it (Yeah)
Couple racks up on them Wikki stiks
Yo bitch, she smoked my trippy stick
Ridiculous, put dick on tit, spit on clit
And it's over with, I'm over it
No sober shit, drink 'til I just throw up and shit
Y'all ho told me come over here
So guess what nigga it's over with
And it's over with


Fresh out the wave pool, my niggas made cool
We wrote the blueprint for the shit y'all niggas try to do
If I'm not outside, then I'm probably inside your boo
My team's official, you ain't shit, that's why she's trying my crew
Pardon me, I move retardedly
This shit is old to me, the real New York is part of me
I'm always shopping, keep it fly, Lauren is archery
Don't get it twisted, realistic, I could part the sea
My life is fast, I take a chance when I insert the key
And then I turn it up, that's really how you work the V
Your stash ain't never dry if you getting your work from me
We do this fly shit perfectly, we're enough to rise the mercury
Heat nigga, street nigga
Reflect those both when I be rapping on the beat, nigga
Looking Cambodian while standing at the podium
My flow was opium, we cock bottles and open them
Laurenovich


Stop by, tryna see a nigga, all I buy is these trees, king
100 ki's in them streets, nigga, mask me up in grease
Sneaker game is lethal, NY, them eagles
Fly through, get high too, fly as hell, might as well
Hire you the live group, come through with that live crew
Birds chirpin', cop that Birkin, boo, yo, I supplied you
Liable to be in Beirut, no Beirut, this debut
Slick, little niggas get gun poundin', keep moving, who saved you?
Play who? Not me, me and Bronson, not we
Two real niggas sitting in the East Coast
Ice is on, heat close
Fuck around and kill one of y'all clown ass niggas, word up
Take your two, take your hat
Take a nap, put your ass ton the ground, little niggas
We pound niggas and drown niggas and
Hemmied up, that brown, niggas
All my niggas get stemi'd up, Hennessy, Louis V
Me and you, me and her, we as one and she is done
Battle rap me three to one, freedom after, kingdom come


Triple hundred K in my duffle
Give a hundred K to my muscle
Slept a hundred days, just wakin' up
Need a brick, just break it up
Break it down, then take the cut
We shave around like a taper cut
I weigh the pound, if you hatin' us
'Bout to paint the town, most hated what
Most hated what
Grab the dice then shake 'em up
Talked hundreds since eight and up
You lost the onions, no makin' up
No blunts but y'all fake as fuck
It's gym time and I'm shapin' up
I've been foulin', when Blake get up
You gon' waste a life, you need to hang it up
Dreams, click clack
Man down with that chrome Uz'
On his back like ""Nigga don't move""
Word to mother, we don't lose
Talk butter like we don't move
See Gutter, be home soon
See Gutter, he'll be home soon


What's good? Talk the money, what's good?
Haters frontin', what's good?
I'm pullin' up like, ""What's good?""
You know I got it, what's good?
My people's 'bout it, what's good?
Never stop, we never settle
Gotta push the pedal in that hood
What's good? Talk the money, what's good?
Haters frontin', what's good?
I'm pullin' up like, ""What's good?""
You know I got it, what's good?
My people's 'bout it, what's good?
Never stop, we never settle
Gotta push the pedal in that hood


I sit in the back of the room, legs crossed, melting wax
Another free drink so soon? All good, knock it back
Red lights, heart attack, just a dream with no end in sight
Waking up to evening, now it seems I live this rotten life
Spoiled rotten life, frozen hair with burning hands
Coming out to dance with other drones who couldn't give a damn
But when the night calls, redcurrant lipstick with the lights off
Look at all the bottles lined up, wondering who they could pop for
Golden ember to the black floor, burning monks to feel the timbre
Part of the action, retweet, now you're the attraction
Sit around and watch them, watch their faces and reactions
Then blur the lines until the sun is back on your horizon


Breathe, breathe, breathe, breathe, breathe
Inhale, potent marijuana running shit like the mayor
Rap game Peter Parker web swinging through the air
My minds in the clouds and I ain't got a beer
See I ain't got a care kill them now and reap the benefits
Coldest nigga out and I ain't sold no fucking disc
Henny bottle-eater, three grams in the fuckin' spliff
Call it what you want, I'm a zombie, bitch, I'm off this shit


Yo', Prada never gonna pile up if you can't follow this game, nigga
My team smoking that green
If you ain't seen me then you must be a lame, nigga
And I'll give you three shots hold this heat down
Shorty pussy so wet she could soak a beach towel
But meanwhile, Effortless, so she thought it was a freestyle
Everybody wanna floss like a G now
What about me? Never had a bitch nigga doubt me
Zombie gang all y'all niggas pace is shit
On some basic shit it's no wonder that you sound the same
So forever am I living staying out of prison
Mommy told me different but these hoes don't hear it
Forever am I living staying out of prison
Mommy told me different but these hoes don't hear it


I heard life's a bitch so I spit and stimulate her clit
Hitting licks Henny shots hitting licks on the ave
Hitting licks who is this? that be Meech
Zombie walking casualty beat the beat till it's actually fragments
Coke off her areola and no not a can of soda
Tearing flesh pussy pink look like Cam's Range Rover
No High school diploma but baby I'm a street soulja
School of the hard knocks every class I leap over
Smith and Wesson .500, long nose, mazel tov
Shoot a man who squeal then I peel like an old cut
Like my women heightened and not even trying
And if she leaky leaky then Meechy gon' dive in
Ha, mic check check me, skin darker than Wesley
Two-eighths of shrooms got me dancing like Mr. Bentley
Mind yo' fuckin' business, why you think the whip is tinted?
The darkest nigga in it sparking up to infinite


Renegade, nigga, let's get it straight from the gate
I'ma tell you what it is, I'ma tell you what it ain't
See you ain't gotta question
Or better yet second guess anything that I might say
You see not a single syllable is out of place
I rock a venue, people barely know my name
What I'm tryna tell you is I ain't gotta tell you a fuckin' thing
I'ma show so you know, niggas either do or they don't
And bein' number two is what I won't be
I'm silencin' lambs and sheep, don't sleep
Cause my characteristics are that of a cannibal
Call this shit Hannibal Lecter
My timing's impeccable, sharp like a razorblade
And you look dissectible, I've been on my mind for days
'Cause homie we've been in the grind for years
Southern eagle nigga, fuck 'em all mane, we don't fly in fear
I grew up in the city where they figured they can kill dreams when they kill King
Niggas stay shot, shit stay locked, I stay strapped, fuck you mean?
'Bout my green, I need bread, I'm like ""Fuck the rest""
When I need bread, I'm like ""Fuck the rest""
I be up all night tryna chase the check
Prolly spent it fast, I need to make it back
M.E.M.P.H.I.S, they could never stop me
Check these lames and pimp this game, let's put it in my pocket


And they will never know 'bout all the nights that we prayed
All the meetings we took, and all the records we played
I tried to tell 'em I'm the shit, but they told us, ""no way""
With no cuts, they're like a barber, they're about to catch fade
My number one rule is that I gotta get paid
I've been thinkin' this way since I was in the 6th grade
No English, I ain't talk, but boy could add
In the school of hard knocks I'm a fuckin' grad
In these Pumas I'ma run shit, high so I'm above shit
Lame ass niggas I don't fuck with
A Bathing Ape trucker, I'm a fly mothafucka
My team lookin' at me like every time it's supper
Cause they know I'm gon' feed 'em, Rocky been a boss
I ain't worried 'bout the price cause I can clearly pay the cost
I'm the sharpest guy around and I'ma always cut my loss
Then come back for the win, I'ma make it, then I spin


Real West Side nigga, 4.2 bitch
They might pull the piece, somebody call a Buddhist
Your bitch put me high up on a nigga to-do list
You can do that, fuck nigga do this
And yeah I'm from the slimiest place where the bombs are pacin'
Niggas call me Jason when the guns are chasin'
Might hit 'em with the TEC, yeah the foul is flagrant
You be on gay shit
Hand in the bowl when your hand really cold
Work the light in the day shift
I don't really give a fuck as long as I get paid shift
New Cadillac, chopper, no new blade shit
I go crazy on this beat right now
I really gotta go and spit heat right now
Don't matter what the fuck it's Prada
Well fitting suits eating on clam chowder
Knock it out the park like Erik Estrada
Remember I was shoppin' at Family Dollar
Got your main bitch Facebookin', beggin' for a swallow
Pop this pill then I pop my collar
Park this shit then I toss a couple dollars
Instagram, gon' post for some follows
I've been in and out my zone if you really wanna know
I got Hen and got Patron if you're really tryna go


Oh, you don't know Bamz? I'm what the music game need
Like Rich when he just came home
And then gave the keys to a cherry 3 Series
Oh, you don't know Bamz? Fucker, that AK go chopped
7:30 my time, I'm on psychiatric watch
Oh, you don't know Bamz? Show and prove for what?
I got XXL mula, I got bitches tryna get fucked
Oh, you don't know Bamz? Now you're dead, pussy boy catch up
Pool junkie rack up, nigga, act up
Trunk with the MAC, truck bulletproofed up
Oh, you don't know Bamz? Double parked on murder lane
187 my address, Boulevard of Pain
Oh, you don't know Bamz? My cellphone backed up
My clientele meet once, no voice mail, just call me up, uh
646 684 01 01, hit me up when you want that coke
Hit me up when you want more drugs
646 684 01 01, hit me up when you want that coke
Hit me up when you want more drugs


As I sit back and roll up this black demeanor
Reminiscing on my past, still dreaming about that Bimmer
Shit, I never was that kid in the streets gripping on Ninas
Instead, I was that nigga puffin' reefer, fucking lolitas
With the baddest features
Dog 'em then it's onto the next like I do my sneakers
That was the life I was living, careless about their feelings
Caught cheating, ask for forgiveness, of course I got my way
But now I'm older and wiser, cruising through summer days
With a little Ma riding in the passenger, she rolling up that lavender
Purple cannabis rapture, head high like a Jersey in the rafters
You wing a Frazier, some smart players until we major
Traveling the world, collecting paper, pissing off these haters
Come back home and invest in something then ball out later
In five star restaurants high as hell when I tip my waiter
Providing for my seed when I bring one in this world
But until that day gets here I'm thinking about these joints, twerk


Lord have mercy
I'm so motherfucking fresh to death, better call my hearse
My hearse a 72442 with an all wood wheel and that bitch'll vert
My Oldmobile is a cold mobile
Got a cold, young chick down in Mobile
My stacks so fat can't even hold that
Fold that, lay flat like I lack no wheel
Lay flat like I lack no wheels for real
A nigga had to cold the corner, move crack for real
Move crack for real, no rap shit
But I rap rap shit, my rap shit for real
So you rapping ass rabbit ass ratchet ass niggas
Gotta listen to these raps for real
Cuz, I don't give a fuck if you a Blood or a cuz
'Cause I draw blood for real
Tryna hang in my city, tryna see a bitch titty, no pity
Nigga, you'll get hit for real
These maggot ass hoes ain't hit on shit
They'll set you up for the loot shit, man
Thinking that's your bitch, better have your shit
Better have quick hands like Gucci Mane
Niggas tryna get a brick of Kathy Lee Gifford
Better be strapped like Clifford
It's the big, black nigga gripper of the big black pistol
I suggest you confess where you keeping all the money, mister
At the worst you'll see a hearse
But at the best he just will pistol whip ya
Get to see you child and live
Lord have mercy, please forgive 'em, gone


Young Del God is handsome, your girl, she's on ransom
She don't wanna come back, cause you don't make her cum
On the beats I do go dumb and I do her till she numb
And I make her soaking wet when she grab that water gun
Now fuck that brag rap, man, I'm Batman, I'm Bruce Wayne
I'm kickin' it, I'm Liu Kang, I'm killing these niggas, they're too lame
Unorthodox, they too tame, I'm right hand but play left
I'll chop a trend down 'til there ain't no more plain left
Now pay respect to them gods, niggas
Not talkin' church, I'm talkin' rides niggas
On boulevards when we ride, hovercrafts cause we fly
Q Gang 'til I die, pyramid on my eye
Button up on my chest, right now chain on top, no tie
While I'm choppin' up this Thai food
Young Del God make god moves
Young Del God say ""fuck fate"", if I lose then I choose to
This that chateau rap, that shit that niggas ain't used to
Might salad fork while I choose to while I'm fine dining on YouTube, bruh
I'm a king, I said that I'm a king
Go to Onyx with a Onyx on, Nefertiti on my ring


I'm back in this bitch bashing, these rappers be swagger jacking
Clap 'em not, they don't even matter, one two, this lung been splattered
And I heat a pistol on something, I keep a fifth on the belt
Pulling out the needles with the liable, make sure it ain't sitting on the shelf
Cause I ain't light on the body, fuck waiting in your lobby
Hannah Montana finally did grew up, I've been waiting on Miley
I'm gangbanging 'til I break my fingers
'Til all my family members speak the slanguage
I ain't even drop no album yet
Off mixtapes, that's how I've been maintaining
If you offended, nigga, sorry, in backs there is bodies
Have your best friend, cuzzo, uncle, pops and another
Bury you in front of everybody
If I ain't been who you are, I don't fuck with you
If I fuck with you, then I'm stuck with you
I'm stuck with you, I'll shoot it out
Do some years and a couple months with you, woo


Lyrically I am the epitome of a real MC
Biblically I am Timothy, visually I am Tripoli
Full of bigotry, fighting with Gaddafi over liberty
Politically I'm Barack smoking pot, sipping Hennessy
That's my only vice, old school noisy pipes
I ain't tryna be the richest, I'm cool with an M like Obie Trice
Rappers sing the same song, it must be karaoke night
That shit sound like you sang the hokey pokey twice
But this the main event, can't tell me that I ain't a prince
A one-hit wonder to your girl cause I came and went
But this that fly talk, smoke it, you'll get high off
The best thing to happen to the street since the sidewalk
Or the stop sign, or the shots flying
From a Glock 9, now the block crying, I don't freestyle, I jot mine
Call me Mr. 1-800, all I got is hotlines
These niggas tell so many stories they can overlook the skyline
Biatch


Thugger! Y'all got me drunk as hell, uh
Now I been red since I was little like Robin Hood
They been hatin' on me, cutting my cable cords
They gon' hate on her when she come in Michael Kors
Meanwhile, your bitch in the 'Lac, grippin' this wood
I want you
She went to grabbin' for my jewels, I told her
Buy yourself a squad, and you can roll it, roll it
She know she can't have it, that shit love my woadie
She want to buy him a chinchilla
She see I'm servin' foreign country boys from the village
Always, I gotta stand her
No, she don't want nobody else to eat but her
She be like fuck them bitches, stack the digits
Compliment this Fendi fit, condiment or sentimental
She ride three deep with molly in the middle
Put Micky Thompsons all on my Jeep
Ain't got no handprint on my golds, they all on the seat
Ten-thousand-dollar toe ring, featured by E
Bitches know it's time out
This bitch be fucking me so good, I be like, ""Time out!""
They want to fuck me 'til I tell 'em all to time out
And how she stroke it, I can't coach it, I'm like, ""Time out!""
I'm not no snitch, but I be tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em
Tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em
I'm so tired of tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em
Tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, tellin' 'em, now I'ma show 'em
Her posse beat me by the threes, I call 'em Reggie Miller
She roll my weed in giant 'gar, she tall like 'Zilla, I want you
Baby, don't you run from me, you know I want you
She down with Slime, she got a tattoo of an anaconda
Thugger getting high in London
Bitches walking 'round naked, no pajamas
Lil' homie ranned off with lots of lumber
For that, I'm gonna fuck your aunt, your sis, your mama
Then pop a bean together
She want to feel just like I feel, we growin' wings together
Everything perfect about her, can't get my thing together
I turn her up and we shit out earthlings together
Just do it like Mykko Montana, my father say I got stamina
I'm cooking the Hannah Montana-na, I bury these hoes like sandals them
I kill every one of my features, I spend all my money on divas
My pockets on yellow pages, just like a beeper


They found Max B prints in my way
Bitch, I rode the Red Sea through my biblical days
No roof, snow boots, and that Persian Mercedes
Perving the 80's, you ain't never surf with the Brady's
Ric Flair, a heavyweight champion
Got Trish Stratus with them panties on singing ""daddy's home""
Bust it, in these Space Jams, I'm a Monstar
Do-rag, tote on, that cake blocked in an arm war
So rumble, young man, rumble
Young killa when he came out the jungle
Young dealer in the rains with the bundles
Gets no realer, get chipped when you stumble
Eat the ox on the foil, ten toes in the soil
Chop chop 'till he drop, fuck what you thought
I never leave my life with a lawyer
Eyes wide with my head on the swivel
Choose a side or get left in the middle
I just treat with the sand on the beach
When the desert eagles meet, then I'm finna beat
Rest them in their sleep, you can lose 'em to the beef
Move or we shooting in the jeep
Homicide coming through the sneaks
Your hands ain't moving with your cheek
Bag 'em up and move 'em up the creek


On my test, got a story to 'em
Like all my raps weigh more than music
The more I write, the better I do it and right now my stock is up
I do me from day one, huh, my nigga you know where it hit fours
Still fuck with me at day one hundred, cause I don't play, I gets off
Piss off, bitch, you ain't lit, you just a nigga saying shit
Rappers burn out faster than cancer sticks
Mobb Deep is that truth, liar, Prodigy is that fuel fire
Come try me, I show better than tell, Infamous empire
I'm on point like the state building
I stay sharper than razor blades
Think you doing the most, I give you the most
Slashes to the face, hoes like ""he so angry"", uh
Trust me bitch, you gon' thank me
Cause when it pop and the smoke gone
We gon' walk outta here safely
Fuck with me, I got you, real nigga, no costume
This modern art that I spit, it's not no bullshit, and colossal
So pour it up, pour it up, that's how we ball out
Cause when I bomb on these niggas it's worse than nuclear fall out


Keep the small bills separate from the hundreds, please
That bank vault can't talk but the numbers read
And the tellers makin' statements, breakin' all the codes
This ain't a mothafuckin' date, we takin' all the hoes
Shop 'til I drop, freshest corpse in the morgue
Lookin' like a fashion fossil, I'm Gianni reborn
Four, I was voted most likely to trap
It's survival of the trillest, nigga, die or adapt
Waste a lot of champagne but I don't waste a drop of time
Public with my gang relations, throwin' up the proper signs
Sawed off the shotty, got the chopper circumcised
Chevy so clean, look like I dipped that bitch in turpentine
All my homies certified, hottest nigga outchea
Looked like Joan, we burned alive
Thought that I would ball 'til I fall, then I learned to fly
Spread my wings
They say success is contagious so I share my dreams


Bolo swingin' from left to right
I'm not a cholo but I know hoes out in SoHo lovin' my ethnic type
When I smile for the photo looking like Lobo
Me and my bloodshot eyes,I pass on the Bud Light Lime
Just pass me that brew of St. Ides
Got cash, I ain't gotta think twice
Unconventional shit, pretentious hipsters that diss
Half-assed review on Fader, still get no love from Pitchfork
Nigel Rubirosa, que la cosa? Feet up on the sofa
Heat up on the holster, World's Fair! Yeah, you know us
11-36-8 be the zip code
Corona, Queens nigga, that's what I call home
Feet on the dash, mind on the ass
Racin' the Sun just so I can get dome
Pimped the shorties I've been with
My friends that had me evicted
It's been two years and I'm slippin'
Still got no pot to piss in
As far as everyone goes, they can suck and kneel on it
We have another song, gotta fuckin' feel it
Got my eyes on the Harley and I'm trying to peel it
Had my eyes on the bitch but she married Keaton
Got no job so I'm hardly eatin'
And you eatin' then we fuckin' beefin'
I need a pie and pizza just to meet up for a fuckin' feature


Man, they don't wanna see a nigga
Winning in a mothafucka, happier than a mothafucka
You know lightweight grinnin' in a mothafucka
When you're a dead guy and you on that high
So the whole world spinnin' in a mothafucka
And a couple young angels hide their halo
Cause they're 'bout to start sinnin' in a mothafucka
They don't wanna see a nigga on the upswing
In a black tux with cufflinks
When you're the reason that every single girl in the party
Wanna dance and cuff drinks
When you're the reason that shit gets ran
And mothafuckas wheezin' to keep up with the plan
And the other niggas show up at your function
Actin' all anti-social, no, a nigga fan
Run up on your mama puttin' money in her hand
And you do that shit again and again and again
Pull up in the 8, goin' home with a 10
And you really can't defend or depend on your friends
Ex girlfriend wanna key up the Benz
When the Sun comes up, nigga we up to win
Mothafuck you man, all you do is set trends
And you do that shit again and again and again


Ugh, ugh, got those motherfucking custom Roshes, feel me?
This big beard cover my face
Until my mother gets her first crib
My hand's on some surf shit, my Spanish mami perfect
Fuck around and get your father's shirt lift
Drop a thousand on some sake and some urchin
Swing the Dodge Viper lefty like I'm Randy Johnson
Hand me the Thompson, I'll spill your clams on the carpet
Then eat some snails with some garlic, paint the town with a harlot
Cream FILAs and Carhartt, three-wheelin out the car lot
Put the snorkel on the Wrangler cause I'm silly
I chip a little piece of brick into the Philly
My daughter's neck is chilly, my son's neck is chilly
My mother wrist so cut look like it got bit by a grizzly
And these drugs got me spinning like some capoeira
Still rock the slow beats with gold teeth, ain't afraid to hold heat
Control the Jeep, that's for the slow creep
Ya fuckin' pussy smells like old meat
It's me


Heema the highest human, flyest cummin' in my unit
I ?, the shorties swoonin', and they want to get to spoonin'
Never wished i was taller, himanshu ain't no midget
Never wished i was a baller, if I want it, then I get it
I built a fucking blueprint, like who the fuck you kidding?
I'm ridin' around and I'm gettin' it, if it's mine, I'm spending
You lames and you fall, I'm like 2 Chainz when I ball
Got Husseins on my feet and Husains on my wall
Hussein Chalayans, a pretty girl said that's fancy
Unless his name is Hussein, give a fuck who your mans be
My shoes got dials, they ain't got laces
If you got beef, I show up with many faces
Been to many places where we leaving many casings
Running 'round, man, but we never catch no cases
Give a fuck about what you say, kicking it with like two babes
Top off, toupee, hot as fuck, creme brûlée


There's no way I can care about much
You probably do the most and it's never enough
King Midas, I can make gold with a touch
Change my location to awesome, you should address me as such
Swear this game, you have to know it like the back of your hand
Destined to be like Superman for as long as you can
Wondering what's the purpose without living a life so grand
The worst hand is having the world without a master plan
I feel like you gotta pardon Mike for taking over this Earth
Despite sleepless nights and long flights
And I don't like discussions unless it concerns a price
If you make it out of spite, you still make it so it's alright
I spit magic, so cold and lavish
Bad broads perform sexual acts in traffic
So smooth, the saxophone and jazz is
It's horrendous what you lack and focus on what you have in the G
More than average, I'm nothing to test
If it's to me, you step and contest, then bring your best
Give it your all, now women beg me to call
And unless we overseas, we don't shop in the mall
Consider this move so private I've become urban myth
My aim is so swift, with this I can't miss
Top notch, number one on everybody's list
I promise to kill them all 'til everybody's missed


I never sell drugs, I took 'em, I don't write rhymes, I cook 'em
I'm from the Old New York
Where you got your chain snatched and your kicks tooken
I put my city up like I'm bench pressin'
Scorin' high off the fresh pressses, brutal, last in 10 seconds
Jolly good, body good, I met a stripper named Hollywood
In Hollywood, glass slipper and she gave me the sloppy goooood
So you should tip her if you execute, young leisure suit
Larry with no extra loot, my ex left me destitute
So chances are I don't remember you if I slept with you
You want karats, I'm turnin' rappers to vegetables
City of God, I'm askin' what would the devil do?
Instagram it, I forever rule, Ricky


Super villain, I'm killin', kick in the door
Watch me spillin' 'em, fuckin' winnin'
Straight killin' haters, they catchin' them feelings
See me grillin', me drillin', me like we chillin'
But really see I'm fulfillin' their fantasies
Like I'm fuckin' my frienemies
Yo what's up, see me on motherfucker tryna get buck
Where in the world did he get that from?
When the bass drop down and he kick that drum (drum)
So what's up? Where in the world did he get that from?
Where in the world did he get that from?
When the bass drop down and he kick that drum
Yeah I've been known to really fuck it up
No damn, no shit, not zip zap zup
Speedin' on the highway, Bronco truck
When you ask for the Katz, mothafucka here I come
Yeah I've been known to really fuck it up
No damn no shit zip zap zup
Speedin' on the highway, Bronco truck
When you ask for the Katz, mothafucka here I come


A muthafucka need that work? Well I got it right here
Need motivation for the ass to gon' twerk? Well I got it right here
If you need that thing, that thing, then I got it right here
Yeah, motherfucker, I got it right here, I got it right here
A muthafucka need that work? Well I got it right here
Need motivation for the ass to gon' twerk? Well I got it right here
If you need that thing, that thing, then I got it right here
Yeah muthafucka, I-- muthafucka I got it right here


I said most of these niggas gon' hate, me and my niggas get paid
One nigga swing then we all gon swing, we all gon catch that case
Couple blunts to the face, got a nigga straight
Rappin' on beats got a young nigga made
What can I say? My closet got Bape
I don't do delays, I want it today
Noisy pack in my wrap, Hennessy in my cup
Ginger ale if I chase, but I really don't do that much
I really don't have no time, you ain't tryin' to get no funds
Doin' this shit 'til I die, I'm rollin' and smokin' on drugs


Rollin' up, chokin' up on the kush smoke
Whip sick, big wheels, Big Willie shit
Hot boxer, hot sauna, car full, thick
I love the constituents, is down to get their lids peeled
Still pimpin', ridin' 'round town gettin' low
With my bright skin shawty, call her light show
She like Reese I'm tryna light that
Show love, she hold me down like an ice pack
It's big faces on faces bruh, big faces on faces bruh
Dead men in my pockets got me goin' up
It's goin' face down if a nigga flex us
Yeah, in God we trust, but bands is a must
We gotta get that, spend that, get that
Re-up, recoup, repeat that


Say deuce 9 in that ending, been winning since the beginning
Did a couple shows, need a couple more
That price right but we skippin'
But to our niggas, we gettin' it with that work I turn into a chemist
Walter White, send a cake to my niggas locked up in prison
Free my nigga Chris, and free my uncle Marky
Now tell them they fucked up
When they told 'em they could start me
Cause I ain't lettin' up, they're talkin' 'bout the best
They better mention us, yeah they better mention us


Apartment off Rocky, rottweiler just to watch it
Maybachs for the profit, get a Lexus for my mama
Hail Marys for our fathers, press the pedal to get farther
In that new thing, no tags, nigga, fuck the dollar
All about it so don't fuckin' bother
My loose change got me Bruce Wayne, and a 3 page spread
I was sleepin' on the flow, just a couple months later
Now I'm purchasing the flow, East Coast


King, god, pharoah
Feared the sensei, gold for bone marrow, save
My name is running coyote
I'm on peyote with the queen, running on waves
I will make water out of Hennessy
Target my ankh, I was born a public enemy
Reign insurmountable
A woman will make me climax but she won't be ending me
This is not a dream, marchin', in all black
A Black Clan king, respect the illustrator
Don't you dare ever try the Elohim, fuck flexin'
I say my name when I name drop, son
Who's the god in this pantheon?
Two-9, Alkebulan, Alkebulan, Alkebulan, Alkebulan


Get up kid, put your head to your knees like a sit-up, bitch
Get too live for the crew, Two-9
We're the new 2 Live Crew, give up, bitch
Send 'em all to Hell, kill this shit
Spit it like braille, gotta feel this shit
Gotta check up, haters still sick
Yellin' kill 'em all and I'm on ball like I'm Billups, bitch


Runnin' our heart, sit up bitch
Hard to go to sleep, all we know is work
Catch no Zs, chilled on purp
And ya bitch came second but my bills on first
East Side nigga, still my turf
Pierce like 'Matic, hoes still at it
Swing like a batter and my crew goin' at it
Best believe that that shit gon' hurt


Toot up the French horn, the fog machine is sandstorm
Ain't go to camp
Cordless toward the performer that's keepin' your amps warm
'Fore the fans swarm all but the limousine
Swear to God that's in between
Indigo indie dream, you intervene, yeah, that's a Spit 16
Hearts inside of my tip jar, like a bleedin' heart beneath wood floor
And if every lion is purrin' then I'ma be certain I let my engine roar
I'm swingin' swords and swingin' chains
Singin' pure and bangin' strange
This Alexander Spit and I'm off the wall like Vans, I'm changin' lanes
Driftin' around whatever it is this game became
Like gorillas and orangutans, go bananas and bangarang
They say I'm prayin' to that cross for all of that 15 minute fame
But I'ma get in your ears and the god's here
So baby just open your bra zip and just let them titties out
And let 'em bounce like this was Paul Revere
I'm 7.0in' on Pitchfork, I'm 10-0in' on this court
This Alexander Spit with a pistol, dro is full of his disorders, I got this


Better have my check, I need that first
Before I move, before I step
See I been burned it don't take long
And learn quick, it ain't no twice
I gave my time, I gave my life
So I won't bet what all I spent
I'm trying to be good, I'll take your bitch
And I ain't even playin, just ask my clique
You know my steez, trying to get real A-Town
Got that or either got sump'n to give away
Big feet on the bottom of a Chevrolet
Everybody and they mamma sell plenty hay
Need to ride with the weight scale
Propped up in the seat trying to get that
My broad on da eastside ho nigga
Tell Bron Bron we can bring the Heat back
I'm a champ, I support it, flipping through the hundred
Cool Club with it, running to the money
I'm in shape, I'm in shape stacking cake
Duncan Hines go get ""Faith"" thats my last tape
I'm on 10, I'm on fire, I'm on point, I'm on smash
Rolly on my dash, breaking down in my Cad'
I'm Atlanta, ScottyATL ho 1 space that's a Y not an IE
Slipped in ain't even check ID, game need me I'ma rap IV


Year before '83, I be the kid who found ET
Tell him teach me all he know, prolly make him smoke some dope
Call a bitch over for throat and put her on some game
Just to get up in her brain and now she out makin' me change
I'm full of dynamite, throw her on the blade, no Wesley Snipes
Young Roxanne, baby, sell that body to the night
I'm trife as fuck, light the blunt, get high enough to die for once
Throw the pad at Christ, they askin' God how do I write this stuff
The Lord never liked me much, but I'm sayin', ""Oh well""
Blazin' up with the devil, watchin' old Hell in the Cell
Matches your favorite actress, blasted, naked on my mattress
Polygraphs break, you say I ain't the illest nigga rappin'
The fucking  captain of this multi million dollar faction
Commander and chief, my sons is Son of Sam with the beef
We get loot, always ran from police
You bitch niggas lose your head if you speak
I ash the doobie off the cruise ship
And flew hash, cheffin' out of Ruth Chris
Two bitches tellin' me they do sniff
What do you know? So much wax in this blunt I'm smokin'
You'd thinkin' I'm fuckin' Madame Tussauds
You think I'm fuckin' mad, I'm too so
I'm out of it, bitch, oh, nah, fuck that
Bring them fuckin' trumpets back
Light a dub sack for my niggas who slung crack
On a daily basis, sip liquor, I never chase it
Fucker I'm the greatest, carve a statue of my face, bitch",641389
50033,411436,My Way,rap,Fetty Wap,2014,2233034,{Monty},"
NickE on the track
Ayy, yeah, baby
Squaaa, ayy, ayy (Skrrt)


Baby, won't you come my way?
Got something I want to say
Cannot keep you out my brain
But first off I'ma start by sayin' this, ayy
All headshots if you think you could take my bitch, ayy
And I'm too turnt, when I shoot, swear I won't miss, ayy
Ba-Baby, won't you come my way?
Baby, won't you come my way?


Ba-Ba-Baby
This is something you should know
I don't ever chase no hoes
I spotted you, you had that glow
Watch me pull out all this dough
Take you where you want to go
Flexin' on your ex, I know
He ain't ever take you out
Barely even left your house
How dare that nigga run his mouth
When his pockets in a drought?
The last single he put out
Didn't even make it out
And he dumb as hell and I swear his ass don't think, ayy
If he disrespect, two shots and I won't blink, ayy
Never really cared what the fuck these niggas think, ayy
I got deep pockets, I swear my shit's on sink, ayy
And he mad as fuck, big ZooWap all she sing, ayy
And he mad as fuck, big ZooWap in her dreams, ayy
Well, he mad as fuck, when they sex she scream for me, ayy
Big ZooWap what these niggas should be, ayy

Baby, won't you come my way?
Got something I want to say
Cannot keep you out my brain
But first off I'ma start by sayin' this, ayy
All headshots if you think you could take my bitch, ayy
And I'm too turnt, when I shoot, swear I won't miss, ayy
Ba-Baby, won't you come my way?
Baby, won't you come my way?


Oh, baby girl, you can stay the night 'til the morn'
All this ice on my arm, what you like, what you want?
And I might put you on, bitch, it's mine can't you see?
And I rock seventeen, all these knots in my jeans
Me and Zoo turnin' up, got your boo in the cut
And she sue cause it's looking like the roof going up
Counting all this bread, I don't talk to feds
Try and take my bitch, you gonna take two to the head
Cause baby you the baddest, all this money, I'ma cash it
And I'm swervin' all in traffic
While I'm trapping out the mansion
And I'm moving through the tri-state
Do two-hundred on the highway
And I'm swerving in my i8
Baby, you should come my way
Squad!",653082
50166,413258,Only One,rb,Kanye West,2014,1334147,"{""Paul McCartney""}","



As I lay me down to sleep
I hear her speak to me
Hello 'Mari, how ya doin'?
I think the storm ran out of rain, the clouds are movin'
I know you're happy, 'cause I can see it
So tell the voice inside ya head to believe it
I talked to God about you, he said he sent you an angel
And look at all that he gave you
You asked for one and you got two
You know I never left you
'Cause every road that leads to Heaven's right inside you
So I can say


Hello, my only one, just like the mornin' sun
You'll keep on risin' 'til the sky knows your name
Hello my only one, remember who you are
No you're not perfect but you're not your mistakes

Hey, hey, hey, hey
Oh, the good outweighs the bad even on your worst day
Remember how I'd say
Hey hey one day, you'll be the man you always knew you could be
And if you knew how proud I was
You'd never shed a tear, have a fear, no you wouldn't do that
And though I didn't pick the day to turn the page
I know it's not the end every time I see her face, and I hear you say


Hello my only one, remember who you are
You got the world 'cause you got love in your hands
And you're still my chosen one
So can you understand? One day you'll understand


So hear me out, hear me out
I won't go, I won't go
No goodbyes, no goodbyes
Just hello, just hello
And when you cry, I will cry
And when you smile, I will smile
And next time when I look in your eyes
We'll have wings and we'll fly

Hello my only one, just like the mornin' sun
You'll keep on risin' 'til the sky knows your name
And you're still my chosen one, remember who you are
No you're not perfect but you're not your mistakes


Hey, hey, hey, hey
Tell Nori about me, tell Nori ab-
I just want you to do me a favor
Tell Nori about me, tell Nori about me
Tell Nori about me, tell Nori about me
Tell Nori about me, tell Nori about me
Tell Nori about me, tell Nori about me
Tell Nori about me...",657936
50191,413479,Flex Ooh Ooh Ooh,rap,Rich Homie Quan,2015,1107780,{},"


Hey, oh, there it is, there it is, there it is
There it is, there it is (Rich Homie, baby!)


Walked in, thirty thousand in my pocket
Had them niggas just like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""
50,000 dollars on your bitch, wanna fuck me
Got her screamin' like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh""
Cause I got a check, nigga wanna flex
I ain't gotta flex, boy I got it, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh
Give that ho some x, she gon' wanna sex every nigga in the set
And now she screamin' like ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""


(How much you made?) Made two million dollars off a mixtape
And I'm fucking like, ooh, ooh, ooh
They try to drop me with a case but you know I had done skated
I was singing like, ooh, ooh, ohh
Boy, I know my role and I play it
If you heard that I'm talking, then I said it
(Quan where you at?) At the top of the loft nigga, I stay
I'm a bad boy but I don't wear big clothes like Ma$e
In the club and a nigga get it boppin'
And that ho, she want a free drink, tell the bitch to get up off me
I'm the nigga to get it poppin', her hair short like Dennis Rodman
At the Clearport nigga, we flying, when I landed, boy I

Walked in, thirty thousand in my pocket
Had them niggas just like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""
$50,000 on your bitch, wanna fuck me
Got her screamin' like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh""
Cause I got a check, nigga wanna flex
I ain't gotta flex, boy I got it, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh
Give that ho some x, she gon' wanna sex every nigga in the set
And now she screamin' like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""


(How much you made?) $100,000 just in two days
(Guess what?) I don't fuck with niggas cause they two-faced
(That's right, that's right)
I only fuck with bitches for their toupee (Their top, nigga)
These Givenchys, I ain't worried about no new Jays
Know this bitch who got a sack and she always got my back
So I love that shit the most
I'm her big dog and she my cat, and she love it from the back
Call her green cause she on go (Green light)
I wear glasses cause I know these niggas watchin'
They mad cause they cannot stop me
Boy stopping is not a option, I can't help it cause I got it
Don't waste time, I got six watches
Talkin' Rolex, yeah, I bought 'em
Now I'm at the top, started from the bottom, then I

Walked in, thirty thousand in my pocket
Had them niggas just like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""
$50,000 on your bitch, wanna fuck me
Got her screamin' like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh""
Cause I got a check, nigga wanna flex
I ain't gotta flex, boy I got it, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh
Give that ho some x, she gon wanna sex every nigga in the set
And now she screamin' like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""


(How much you made?) $100,000
(How much, how much you made?) $100,000
(How much, how much you made?)
Made two million dollars off a mixtape, had them folks like, ""Ooh, ooh, ooh""
Hey, get at me",658724
50872,423093,Speedom Worldwide Choppers 2,rap,Tech N9ne,2015,1059674,"{Eminem,""Krizz Kaliko""}","


I get to bustin' like I'm a thirty ought six
When I'm rippin' the beat up, but then I heard he got pissed
When I got at the top and they made him purty hot (Uh)
'Cause he knowin' that Tecca Nina's a dirty chopper (Uh)
He's handle, holmes, here's a handful
How in the hell he hoverin' havin' hella go ham though?
I said to Seven, ""Richie Havens'll be the man""
So we put it together thinkin' Eminem was a gamble (uh)
Guess not, 'cause he be the guest spot
Kaliko said, ""What we doin'?"" - I said to him, ""Let's chop!""
So now the people finally get three of the best locked (Uh)
Never be another chopper's comin' so let's rock, nigga! (Uh)
You're on, people got to wonderin' if it's a for sure song
Yes, I got another killer makin' a tour strong
If you thinkin' of battlin'-uh, you're gone!


Nobody can catch him, he the Speedy Gonzales
The beat is a problem
And if you got your feet in your mouth
You gon' have to beat it up out of him
It's a lot of 'em, and I mean a lot of 'em
And me and Nina used to follow them
I've got to audibly body them
This is it, man, the hitman, the Ip Man, karate 'em
And if fans will lift hands, we'll get dancin' out of 'em
And in Kansas advanced to withstand a pile of 'em
Who stands with two hands up movin' the crowd of 'em
If I ain't makin' sense
Then you better sample the amp of it like the bass
It ain't ever been a gift for me to heat 'em
I beat 'em, I burn 'em (Then I let 'em melt)
They never heard of us, but look at 'em turnin' up (Uh)
I slap the shirt off a super simpleton, make 'em be impotent
If and when I be flippin', niggas be feminine (Okay)
I said the purpose to pimp a pen
And reverse the conditions I'm livin' in
And do bigger numbers than Eminem
Gotta be fast, or I'll smash on a nigga
With half the cash I'm a little sicker, quicker than you figure
(Ice cold) I make 'em shiver bigger than the winter
If you half-ass deliverin' I'ma eat your dinner (Yum)
Better than mine, oh no, not me, I mean other guys (Okay)
I jump around, so do that mean that I'm rubberized? (Okay)
Me and N9ne master, meaning we murderize
We'll bleed 'em, beat 'em 'til they be gone, feed 'em!

Speedom! (If you wanna go with us)
Speedom! (I'ma leave 'em in the dust)
Speedom! (I must be the one to bust)
Speedom! (And I'm gonna hit the clutch)
Speedom! (If you wanna go with us)
Speedom! (I'ma leave 'em in the dust)
Speedom! (I must be the one to bust)
Speedom! (And I'm gonna hit the clutch)


Sometimes (Go) I feel (Go)
Like I'll never slow down
(Worldwide Choppers)
Sometimes (Go) I feel (Go)
Like I'll never slow down
(Worldwide Choppers)


Wait! Before I wreck this beat, let me just check to see
If Stephanie Mills left any extra refills
Of ecstasy pills next to me, in the seats spilled
Or she eat 'em all with a breakfast drink (You inspect the sink?)
I'm in the habit of grabbin' a mic and babblin', I dabble in Vics
But I might just swallow my fuckin' Ritalin tablet after tonight
I'm grabbin' it right from the medicine cabinet
'Cause that's what it's like, and attackin' it like a Dracula bite
Jetpack in a backpack when I write
All this anger pent-up inside
I went up inside a Bennigans diner with a cigarette lighter
Figured I'd try to set a big enough fire
That'll trigger the sprinkler system
And I'd escape, but the getaway driver
Screwed up my limo, collided with the center divider
I went through the window
And ended up being pinned to the side
Of a semi fender beside a friend of the guy's wife Brenda
The flight attendant from Idaho
That took an antenna in the vagina hole
'Cause when I pick up a pen I'm venomous
And I'm as slick as Dennis the Menace
Like an evil dental hygienist, sinister
You've been yellin' dementedness
I invented this, I'm the genesis
Eminem is a nemesis to a feminist
Fuckin' smart alec degenerate, I got Ellen DeGeneres
Tryna tell me these men are just full of jealousy, envious
Of female independence, hell with a clitoris, hit or miss
You will never consider this a bitter disappointment
I'll never fail to deliver this
Whatever the weather in this'll be
Just like a certificate of authenticity that I'm thinkin' about
Just tryna think of the quickest and sickest way
To make 'em picket, I pick a day to be a prick
Then I'm pickin' the wickedest shit to say
Spit it back on a level, incredible
Head full of Red Bull, unforgettable
Better believe these beats are edible
I consider loose leaf a vegetable
And I stalk my prey
You think you got away? Uh-uh, not today
Murder you on a song and then I'll just say
I was with Dr. Dre and Robert Blake, eatin' lobster, steak
And coffee cake at a restaurant with Drake
And Tech just gotta make sure that our stories corroborate
I'm a lot to take, like Kanye walkin' up on the stage
For Beyoncé, like it's my job to say
That you're not a real artist, but it's my obligation
Honest Abe is on his way, you will not escape
Ammunition replenished, the Punisher
With his gun insured, hundred words
In a clip, other words motherfuckers better run
If you're not lookin' to get run over by the roadrunner
No wonder no one don't wanna go
And jump in front of a fuckin' runaway locomotive
Or get thrown up under it just tryna fuck with the-

Speedom! (If you wanna go with us)
Speedom! (I'ma leave 'em in the dust)
Speedom! (I must be the one to bust)
Speedom! (And I'm gonna hit the clutch)
Speedom! (If you wanna go with us)
Speedom! (I'ma leave 'em in the dust)
Speedom! (I must be the one to bust)
Speedom! (And I'm gonna hit the clutch)


Sometimes (Go) I feel (Go)
Like I'll never slow down
(Worldwide Choppers)
Sometimes (Go) I feel (Go)
Like I'll never slow down
(Worldwide Choppers)


I'm the fury, the final fight
I flip it on fraudulent fellas for feelin' fright
I flick it on fire, finish him when the flow in flight
Feminine fakers fall, I'm floggin' a foe with a fife
Never forget it, I severed the head of a critic
I sped up and did it, you trippin' to be a dead epidemic
Or wet up a clinic, and make a bloody redder percentage
Of an addict who's havin' to get the lead of a cynic
I was never the Devil, I put up a fight up in the industry
Pedal to metal, we givin' the light, a lot of energy
We reppin', beat checkin' he that be Koba
If he's the evil enemy it'll be over
Running you down, in front of your town
You ever makin' fun of the clown, I'm gunnin' you down
We doin' it under the ground, a wonderful sound
If anybody come at the hound, no one'll be found, bitch!
Would never be choppin' without Slick Rick
I got it from the record ""Lick the Balls"" and this dick
If you never listen to me, you musical misfit
Nah, 'cause every time I be droppin' I get bit
I'm hearin' a lot of rappers, they tryin' to spit quick
But the Middle West got 'em and we kill 'em in this bitch
If you ain't in my circle of choppers you missed it
'Cause me and my nigga Twista rule it-and this it

Speedom! (If you wanna go with us)
Speedom! (I'ma leave 'em in the dust)
Speedom! (I must be the one to bust)
Speedom! (And I'm gonna hit the clutch)
Speedom! (If you wanna go with us)
Speedom! (I'ma leave 'em in the dust)
Speedom! (I must be the one to bust)
Speedom! (And I'm gonna hit the clutch)


Sometimes (Go) I feel (Go)
Like I'll never slow down
(Worldwide Choppers)
Sometimes (Go) I feel (Go)
Like I'll never slow down
(Worldwide Choppers)",686628
50985,425179,FourFiveSeconds,pop,"Rihanna, Kanye West & Paul McCartney",2015,1408897,"{""Rihanna / Kanye West & Paul McCartney""}","
I think I've had enough
I might get a little drunk
I say what's on my mind
I might do a little time
'Cause all of my kindness
Is taken for weakness


Now I'm four, five seconds from wildin'
And we got three more days 'til Friday
I'm just tryna make it back home by Monday mornin'
I swear I wish somebody would tell me
Ooh, that's all I want


Woke up an optimist
Sun was shinin', I'm positive
We can run
Then I heard you was talkin' trash
I'm on a mystery
Hold me back, I'm 'bout to spaz

Yeah, I'm 'bout four, five seconds from wildin'
And we got three more days 'til Friday
I'm tryna make it back home by Monday mornin'
I swear I wish somebody would try me
Ooh, that's all I want


And I know that you're up tonight
Thinkin', ""How could I be so selfish?""
But you called 'bout a thousand times
Wondering where I've been
Now I know that you're up tonight
Thinkin', ""How could I be so reckless?""
But I just can't apologize
I hope you can understand, yeah


If I go to jail tonight
Promise you'll pay my bail
See they want to buy my pride
But that just ain't up for sale
See all of my kindness (Mhm)
Is taken for weakness


Now I'm four, five seconds from wildin'
And we got three more days 'til Friday
I'm tryna make it back home by Monday mornin'
I swear I wish somebody would tell me
Ooh, that's all I want
Four, five seconds from wildin'
And we got three more days 'til Friday
Just tryna make it back home by Monday mornin'
I swear I wish somebody would tell me
'Cause that's all I want
",690706
51157,427668,Blessings,rap,Big Sean,2015,3206060,"{""Kanye West"",Drake}","
Look
I feel blessed
Way up, I feel blessed
Way up, I feel blessed
(Straight... up)


I live the life I deserve, blessed
Fuck a vacay, I feel better at work
I mean, whatever it's worth, I give whatever I'm worth
For my niggas who gon' go to Hell and back for me
I'ma give 'em Heaven on Earth
Or a hell of a check, yeah, whichever come first
Blessings on blessings on blessings
Look at my life, man, that's lessons on lessons on lessons
I treat the beat like it's a reverend
I tell the truth like father, forgive me, these are all my confessions
Man, this wasn't luck, it was destined
I done lost homies who been with me since Ed, Edd n Eddy
Who flip like confetti
And then when you back, they back to call you ""dog""
That shit get-get petty
Bitch, don't give no dap to me, nigga
Funny thing about talking behind my back
Is that it just keep coming back to me, nigga
Was off for a sec, now it's back to me, nigga, you mad at me
This ain't what I want, man, this what it had to be
This is that late night working after three, man
This is why my old girl was mad at me
This why I'm your majesty, man
The clique is the tightest, the pussy the tightest
The drinks are the coldest, the future the brightest
The feat not divided, the love is divided
And I just gotta thank God that we got it
Blessed
I don't know what I would do without it
Crew look like we robbed a bank, but all we make is deposits
Your prophet will profit, oh God

I'm here for a good time, not a long time, you know I
I haven't had a good time in a long time, you know I
I'm way up, I feel blessed
Way up, I feel blessed (Straight up)
I'm way up, I feel blessed (Straight up, straight up)
Way up, I feel blessed


Look, I ain't gon' say that we back or nothing
'Cause that implies that we're back from something
If we're back from somethin' there's some checks you owe us
I expect that payment, nothing less or over
I don't need them favors that you ask me for
I could give two fucks 'bout where the Grammys go
I just gave out Grammys on my Instagram
Them OVO boys, the business man
It is what it is, trust me, you get what you give, yeah
You gotta come to my side and see how we live, yeah
I cannot see Heaven being much better than this, yeah
Blessings on blessings for me and my niggas from the 6
Look at what we did, yeah
Be quiet, I'm doing a toast
For niggas that don't really do shit, I swear, y'all be doing the most
Stop worrying 'bout whoever's next
I am just worried 'bout my mama worrying less
I think I'm famous enough
I don't need any more press
I am convinced I'm the only one left that's still doing this shit, man

I'm here for a good time, not a long time, you know I
I haven't had a good time in a long time, you know I
I'm way up, I feel blessed
Way up, I feel blessed (Straight up)
I'm way up, I feel blessed (Straight up, straight up)
Way up, I feel blessed


My grandma just died, I'm the man of the house
So every morning I'm up 'cause I can't let them down, down
Always down for the cause, never down for the count
I guess when your stars align
You do like the solar system and plan it out
So I'm going over time, on the overtime
Yeah, I'm that invested, but you can't attest it
Million dollar goals, managed to manifest it
The family never going anorexic
I pay my own mortgage and electric
Never going under even with anesthetics
At the top of the rap game and progressin'
Check after check, checking off my check list
Try and blow my cake, just know that's a death wish
No mistakes in life ever, it's only lessons
Shit feel like Shaq and Penny got back together
You tore the game apart, who put it back together? I

I'm here for a good time, not a long time, you know I
I haven't had a good time in a long time, you know I
I'm way up, I feel blessed
Way up, I feel blessed (Straight up)
I'm way up, I feel blessed (Straight up, straight up)
I'm way up, I feel blessed


Since the truth keep niggas traumatized
They tryna compromise my condom size
So I Snapchat that whole shit
Tryna see titties, tryna show dick
And I swear to God, I hope they post it, I'm blessed
Even though I get slammed with lawsuits like car doors
See three P.O.'s like Star Wars
They want me by the road holding up cardboard
So I go extra hard on the hard floor
Right now, I'm calling you from my home gym
Right after that, nigga, I'm gon' swim
Just did a couple laps in my home pool
And my daughter right there getting home-schooled, I'm blessed
And I was thinking 'bout starting up my own school, a Montessori
And the hallway looking like a monastery, oh, yes
I'm way up, I feel blessed",693878
51291,429397,679,rap,Fetty Wap,2015,4217745,"{Monty,""Remy Boyz"",P-Dice}","


Yeaaah baby, 17
(RemyBoy Lifestyle)
Ay, ay, look


Baby girl, you're so damn fine, though
I'm tryna know if I could hit it from behind, though
I'm sipping on you like some fine wine, though
And when it's over, I press rewind though, ayy
You talking bands, girl, I got it
Benjamins all in my pocket
I traded in my Trues for some Robins
He playing Batman, Fetty's gon' rob him, ayy
I got a Glock in my 'Rari, ayy
17 shots, no .38
I got a Glock in my 'Rari
17 shots, no .38

I'm like, yeah, she's fine
Wonder when she'll be mine
She walk past, I press rewind
To see that ass one more time
And I got this sewed up
Remy Boyz, they know us
All fast money, no slow bucks
No one can control us
Ayy, yeaaah baby


Uh, yeah, Monty
Tell me what you see
Is it money or it's me?
I smoke twenty, smell the weed
I got hunnies in my V
They like, ""Monty, can you be my baby daddy?""
I'm like, ""Yeah""
I got Robins on my jeans
You see the wings on every pair
All you see is Remy Boyz
You know my niggas everywhere
And if somebody got a problem
We could meet up anywhere
Now go say something
Don't you niggas play dumb
You know where we came from
You don't want sauce, no A1

I'm like, yeah, she's fine
Wonder when she'll be mine
She walk past, I press rewind
To see that ass one more time
And I got the sewed up
Remy Boyz, they know us
All fast money, no slow bucks
No one can control us
Ayy, yeaaah baby


Ayy, they think they know us
They can't control us
Man, I got this sewed up
Remy Boyz, they know us
679, this is Zoo year, baby
Monty and the Zoovier, baby
ZooGang, all my zoo near, baby, yeah, baby
A thousand on my shoes when I walk through, baby
10.5 for a walkthrough, baby
ZooGang, you know my whole zoo near
And baby, I'm Zoovier


Ayy, she a cutie and she fine, make me wanna make her mine
She ain't nothing like them bimbos
If you like it, we can swerve, we can light and stain up here
Blowing, pluck it out the window
We get playing, press rewind, got her singing every time
Take a high note for me, girlfriend
Got my city looking rude
I ain't Diddy, I ain't Loon, but I think I need a girlfriend
She feeling great as I'm talking to her
She a RemyGirl, so I'm gon' pursue her
I brought a lot of loud, lot of Remy to sip on
Thousand dollars when I get my tip on
I'm off her, asked her if her fatty real
She said that's all her, got her with the happy feel
I'm 'bout to spoil her, got her with the happy feel
I'm 'bout to spoil her, oh my

I'm like, yeah, she's fine
Wonder when she'll be mine
She walk past, I press rewind
Just to see that ass one more time
And I got this sewed up
Remy Boyz, they know us
All fast money, no slow bucks
No one can control us
Ayy, yeaaah baby


ZooWap, Monty
ZooWap, Dicey
Yeaah baby, Remy Boyz
Yeaah, yeaaah",696428
51436,431202,White Iverson,rap,Post Malone,2015,4193863,{},"
Double OT
I'm a new three


Saucin', saucin', I'm saucin' on you
I'm swaggin', I'm swaggin', I'm swaggin', oh-ooh (Swaggin')
I'm ballin', I'm ballin', Iverson on you (Swish, ooh, ayy)
Watch out, watch out, watch out, yeah
That's my shot, that's my shot, that's my shot, yeah
Spendin', I'm spendin' all my fuckin' pay


I got me some braids and I got me some hoes
Started rockin' the sleeve, I can't ball with no Joes
You know how I do it, Concords on my toes
(This shit is hard) Oh
I ain't rich yet, but you know I ain't broke, ah
So if I see it, I like it, buy that from the store, ah (Store, ah)
I'm with some white girls and they lovin' the coca (Coca)
Like they OT
Double OT like I'm KD, smokin' OG (Smokin' OG)
And you know me, in my 2-3s and my gold teeth (And my gold teeth)
Bitch, I'm smiling, bet you see me from the nosebleeds (Nosebleeds)
I'm the new three and I change out to my new 3s (To my new 3s)

White Iverson
When I started ballin', I was young
You gon' think about me when I'm gone
I need that money like the ring I never won, I won


Saucin', saucin', I'm saucin' on you
I'm swaggin', I'm swaggin', I'm swaggin', oh-ooh
I'm ballin', I'm ballin', Iverson on you
Watch out, watch out, watch out, yeah
That's my shot, that's my shot, that's my shot, yeah
Spendin', I'm spendin' all my fuckin' pay


Ooh, Stoney
Cigarettes and a headband
Commas, commas in my head, man
Slumped over like a dead man
Red and black, 'bout my bread, man
I'm the answer, never question
Lace up, learn a lesson
Bitch, I'm saucin' (Wow), I do this often, don't do no talkin' (No)
My options right when I walk in, jump all them Jordans (Ooh)
I'm ballin', money jumpin'
Like I'm Davis from New Orleans
Or bitch, I'm Harden, I don't miss nothin'
Fuck practice, this shit just happens, know y'all can't stand it (Ayy)
I have it, I never pass it, I work my magic
High average, ball on these bastards, it makes me happy
It's tragic, I make it happen, and all y'all Shaqtin'

White Iverson
When I started ballin' I was young
You gon' think about me when I'm gone
I need that money like the ring I never won, I won


Saucin', saucin', I'm saucin' on you
I'm swaggin', I'm swaggin', I'm swaggin', oh-ooh
I'm ballin', I'm ballin', Iverson on you
Watch out, watch out, watch out, yeah
That's my shot, that's my shot, that's my shot, yeah
Spendin', I'm spendin' all my fuckin' pay


Ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh",698675
51554,433081,The Blacker the Berry,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,3025007,{},"
Everything black, I don't want black (They want us to bow)
I want everything black, I ain't need black (Down to our knees)
Some white, some Black, I ain't mean black (And pray to the God)
I want everything black (We don't believe)
Everything black, want all things black
I don't need black, want everything black
Don't need black, our eyes ain't black
I own black, own everything black


Six in the morn'
Fire in the street
Burn, baby, burn (You, you, you, you, you)
That's all I wanna see (You, you, you, you, you)
And sometimes I get off watchin' you die in vain
It's such a shame, they may call me crazy
They may say I suffer from schizophrenia or somethin'
But homie, you made me (You, you, you, you, you)
Black don't crack, my nigga

I'm the biggest hypocrite of 2015
Once I finish this, witnesses will convey just what I mean
Been feelin' this way since I was sixteen, came to my senses
You never liked us anyway, fuck your friendship, I meant it
I'm African-American, I'm African, I'm black as the moon
Heritage of a small village, pardon my residence
Came from the bottom of mankind
My hair is nappy, my dick is big, my nose is round and wide
You hate me, don't you?
You hate my people, your plan is to terminate my culture
You're fuckin' evil
I want you to recognize that I'm a proud monkey
You vandalize my perception but can't take style from me
And this is more than confession
I mean I might press the button just so you know my discretion
I'm guardin' my feelings, I know that you feel it
You sabotage my community, makin' a killin'
You made me a killer, emancipation of a real nigga


The blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
The blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
The blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
The blacker the berry, the bigger I shoot

I said they treat me like a slave, cah' me Black
Woi, we feel a whole heap of pain, cah' we Black
And man a say they put me inna chains, cah' we Black
Imagine now, big gold chains full of rocks
How you no see the whip, left scars 'pon me back
But now we have a big whip parked 'pon the block
All them say we doomed from the start, cah' we Black
Remember this, every race start from the block, jus 'member dat


I'm the biggest hypocrite of 2015
Once I finish this, witnesses will convey just what I mean
I mean, it's evident that I'm irrelevant to society
That's what you're tellin' me, penitentiary would only hire me
Curse me 'til I'm dead, church me with your fake prophesizing
That I'ma be just another slave in my head
Institutionalized manipulation and lies
Reciprocation of freedom only live in your eyes
You hate me, don't you?
I know you hate me just as much as you hate yourself
Jealous of my wisdom and cards I dealt
Watchin' me as I pull up, fill up my tank, then peel out
Muscle cars like pull-ups, show you what these big wheels 'bout, ah
Black and successful, this black man meant to be special
Katzkins on my radar, bitch, how can I help you?
How can I tell you I'm making a killin'?
You made me a killer, emancipation of a real nigga

The blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
The blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
The blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
The blacker the berry, the bigger I shoot


I said they treat me like a slave, cah' me Black
Woi, we feel a whole heap of pain, cah' we Black
And man a say they put me inna chains, cah' we Black
Imagine now, big gold chains full of rocks
How you no see the whip, left scars 'pon me back
But now we have a big whip parked 'pon the block
All them say we doomed from the start, cah' we Black
Remember this, every race start from the block, jus 'member dat


I'm the biggest hypocrite of 2015
When I finish this, if you listen, then sure you will agree
This plot is bigger than me, it's generational hatred
It's genocism, it's grimy, little justification
I'm African-American, I'm African
I'm Black as the heart of a fuckin' Aryan
I'm Black as the name of Tyrone and Darius, excuse my French
But fuck you - no, fuck y'all, that's as blunt as it gets
I know you hate me, don't you?
You hate my people, I can tell 'cause it's threats when I see you
I can tell 'cause your ways deceitful
Know I can tell because you in love with that Desert Eagle
Thinkin' maliciously, he get a chain then you gon' bleed him
It's funny how Zulu and Xhosa might go to war
Two tribal armies that wanna build and destroy
Remind me of these Compton Crip gangs that live next door
Beefin' with Pirus, only death settle the score
So don't matter how much I say I like to preach with the Panthers
Or tell Georgia State ""Marcus Garvey got all the answers""
Or try to celebrate February like it's my B-Day
Or eat watermelon, chicken, and Kool-Aid on weekdays
Or jump high enough to get Michael Jordan endorsements
Or watch BET 'cause urban support is important
So why did I weep when Trayvon Martin was in the street
When gang-banging make me kill a nigga blacker than me?
Hypocrite!



",701372
51560,433273,One Man Can Change the World,rap,Big Sean,2015,1194445,"{""Kanye West"",""John Legend""}","


They used to tell me, used to tell me


I hope you learn to make it on your own
And if you love yourself, just know you'll never be alone
I hope that you get everything you want and that you chose
I hope that it's the realest thing that you ever know
Hope you get the pretty girls that's pretty at everything
Million-dollar cribs, havin' million dollar dreams
And when you get it all, just remember one thing
Remember one thing, that one man could change the world
That one man could change the world


All I, all I wanted was a hundred million dollars and a bad chick
Imagined this so much, some nights it felt like that I had it
Back on the mattress, starin' at the ceilin' tryna connect the dots
But it's hard makin' those attachments
I'm talkin' dreamin' so hard, some nights it felt like draft day
You know? My - my stepbrother used to flip them bags
Outside the crib like it was trash day
No Kim K, but he bagged yay (Ye)
But when you're gettin' fast money, slow down, don't crash
With all the drive in the world, swear you still need gas
Look, think about it, close your eyes, dream about it
Tell your team about it, go make million-dollar schemes about it
Success is on the way, I feel it in the distance
Used to look up at the stars
And be like, ""Ain't too much that's different""
I be shinin', they be shinin', get your one shot, don't you miss it
What you know bout' wakin' up every day like you on a mission?

And I hope you learn to make it on your own
And if you love yourself, just know you'll never be alone
I hope that you get everything you want and that you chose
I hope that it's the realest thing that you ever know
Hope you get the pretty girls, that's pretty and everything
Million-dollar cribs, havin' million dollar dreams
And when you get it all, just remember one thing
Remember one thing, one man could change the world
One man could change the world


My grandma told me, ""If you write your name in stone
You'll never get the white-out""
I grinded out that black hole then performed up at the White House
Standin' next to Jim Carrey, we traded stories, then laughed
I said you not the only one I know got rich wearin' masks
Where I'm from, I swear they broke
They need way more than the cast
We need more than what you have
And then we need more than that
But how am I supposed to say I'm tired
If that girl from West Virginia came up in conditions
That I couldn't survive?
Went to war, came back alive
On top of that became a female black captain
When being black, you had to extra-extra try
Way before James Brown made us proud
She bought a crib on the same street as Marvin Gaye
Right there on Outer Drive, and she taught me how to drive
And she raised the kids, then the kids' kids, and she did it right
Taught me how to love, taught me not to cry
When I die, I hope you teach me how to fly
All my life you've been that angel in disguise, sayin'...

I hope you learn to make it on your own
And if you love yourself, just know you'll never be alone
I hope that you get everything you want and that you chose
I hope that it's the realest thing that you ever know
Hope you get the pretty girls, that's pretty and everything
Million-dollar cribs, havin' million dollar dreams
And when you get it all, just remember one thing
Remember one thing, that one man can change the world
That one man can change the world


Thank you for callin' me, been thinkin' about you
It's all good, I love you grandma
Bye",701664
51624,434484,I Know,rap,Big Sean,2015,1261807,"{""Jhené Aiko""}","


Mustard on the beat, ho


I know you've been goin' through some things, uh-huh
I know you don't even love the same, do you, do you?
I know you've been runnin' on empty, runnin' on empty
The way you move it's like you could use a vacation
Drink in your hand and the harder you dance
I swear right now it look like you on a vacation
Gotta get away, make it happen
Whatever happened just had to happen
On vacation, yeah
I know you've been, I know you've been


Dancin', dancin', dancin' like you fucking got a reason
Dancing like it's something to believe in
Dancing like it's fuckin' dancing season
Blame it on the alcohol or blame it on sativa
The harder your heart keep beating
Only feel bad while you're thinkin'
Pop, pop, pop like Pepsi Co. the best we smoke
Plus the tan look like you flew in from Mexico
Go go, let me see how wild it get, bust it wide as it get
You need to be taken care of and pampered
But just like a pamper, he on that childish shit
Yeah, I know you've been silencing your phone
(Silencing your phone, ignoring calls from home)
Uh-huh, I know you've been tryna get along
What's up, it's on, no games, we grown
I know you feel like sometimes
That y'all don't speak the same language
Uh-huh, I know that you just wanna let it go
With all the bitches that you came with

I know you've been going through some thangs
Wanna get away, baby, let me be your vacation
That other trick you've been fuckin' with is a trip
You know she be playin', baby I am just saying
I know you know I am down for whatever, yeah
You know I'm just here to make you feel better, yeah
Take a load off on my private island
Come inside and go into hiding
I know that you've been sacrificing your time
And need time to unwind and let go
So let go and let's go and let's roll and we roll


Excited, activated get ignited
So many charges on my card, oh God I think it got indicted
Get a, get a night, get a day, get a room, get a place
Get a drink, pop a bottle, maybe we can get away
You a star, you need space, we can shoot up out of town
Have you ever been to Texas? South By Southwestern
Where we can smoke a zip like we can't get arrested
Where they might know us off any intersection
I mean baby I know you've been, wanna be the baddest
Wanna be with somebody who ain't never had it
No status, just all cinematics, you just gotta cast it

I know you've been crying and poutin'
Know you're tired of arguing but no screaming and shouting
And you know we on a roll like we did good in college
Throwin' hundreds and thousands
Like they not hundreds and thousands


Why? Cause I know you've been going through some things
I know you've been going through some things you can't explain
With your main thing that shit insane
I know you just tryna maintain, that shit is lame, you can't complain
I know you don't even love the same, do you, do you?
Don't love the same, I know you've been diving through pain
I know you goin' so crazy, I know you runnin' on empty
That shit can fuck with your mente
I know this shit, don't you tempt me, I know you...
I know you've been runnin' on empty, runnin' on empty
The way you move it's like you could use a vacation
I know you, I know you
Drink in your hand and the harder you dance
I swear right now it look like you want a vacation
Gotta get away, make it happen
Whatever happened just had to happen
On vacation, yeah
I know you've been, I know you've been

I know it look like like you need a vacation
How 'bout Hawaii, maybe Jamaica, maybe Asia
Take you places other niggas can't take ya
Don't forget the makeup, yeah",703531
51625,434488,Jungle,rb,Drake,2015,2613578,{},"
Rock me real slowly
Put a bib on me
I'm just like a baby, droolin' over you
The things you do


These days, I'm lettin' God handle all things above me
The things I can't change are the reason you love me
Listen, you can hear them callin' my name
I'm all over the place, I can't sit in one place
I'm not ashamed at all
Still findin' myself, let alone a soulmate, I'm just sayin'
Feel like we one and the same, our relationship changed
That, or it never existed
Whenever they say somethin' 'bout us, you listen
But fuck what they talkin' about on your timeline
That's cuttin' all into my time with you
Fuck what they talkin' about on your timeline
That's cuttin' all into my time with you
My time with you, my

Rock me real slowly
Put a bib on me
I'm just like a baby, droolin' over you
The things you do


She said, ""You're my everything""
""I love you through everything""
I done did everything to her
She forgave me for everything
This a ""forever"" thing
Hate that I treat it like it's a ""whatever"" thing
Trust me, girl, this shit is everything to me
She from the jungle
She from the jungle
I take somebody else's car, drive there undercover
This shit is everything to me
This shit is everything
Don't know where we stand
I used to hit you 'bout everything, oh


Are we still good? Are we still good?
Are we still good? Are we still good?
If I need to talk, are you around?
Are you down for the cause?
Are you down? Are you down? Are you down?
Are you down for the cause?
Are you down? Are you down? Are you down?
Are you down for the cause?
You still down? You still down? You still down?

Rock me real slowly
Put a bib on me
I'm just like a baby, droolin' over you
The things you do


Yeah, these days, these new girls, they got me nervous
They go to school and do bottle service
They can't decide, they keep switchin' majors
Being indecisive makes me anxious
Call your number and it's out of service
Who can I call for your information?
What am I supposed to do after we done everything that we done?
Who is your replacement?


Are we still good? Are we still good?
Are we still good? Are we still good?


Rock me real slowly
Put a bib on me
I'm just like a baby, droolin' over you
The things you do",703387
51644,434665,Legend,rap,Drake,2015,2034199,{},"


Yeah


When I pull up on a nigga tell that nigga back, back
I'm too good with these words, watch a nigga backtrack
If I die, all I know is I'm a mothafuckin' legend
It's too late for my city, I'm the youngest nigga reppin'


Oh my God, oh my God, if I die, I'm a legend
Oh my God, oh my God, if I die, I'm a legend


I'm up first, I'm on tour, got a girl, she from the South
Used to work, used to dance in Texas, now she clean the house
Everyday, I was strugglin' to learn what life's about
On my way, money taught me Spanish, make it andale
Way up north, packed in Honda cars
They don't know who we are
Fuck 'em all, they only pussy niggas shootin' at the star
Right or wrong, I'ma write my wrongs
They can't live this long
You don't know where you're gonna go
I got this shit mapped out strong

When I pull up on a nigga tell that nigga back, back
I'm too good with these words, watch a nigga backtrack
All I know, if I die, I'm a mothafuckin' legend
It's too late for my city, I'm the youngest nigga reppin'


Oh my God, oh my God, if I die, I'm a legend
Oh my God, oh my God, if I die, I'm a legend


I'm the one, one
Why do I feel like the only one?
Why do I feel like you owe me one?
6 G-O-D, I'm the holy one
Yeah, you know wassup, yeah
They been off for a minute now
You know they all sentimental now
You know they all actin' different now
And I, I just can't pretend
Seen too much, it's so hard for me to let new people in
I can't change, this shit set in stone
They can't live this long
You don't know where you're gonna go
I got this shit mapped out strong

When I pull up on a nigga tell that nigga back, back
I'm too good with these words, watch a nigga backtrack
All I know, if I die, I'm a mothafuckin' legend
It's too late for my city, I'm the youngest nigga reppin'


Oh my God, oh my God, if I die, I'm a legend
Oh my God, oh my God, if I die, I'm a legend


I'm the one",703734
51653,434729,Know Yourself,rap,Drake,2015,5182394,{},"


Hol' it yute, hol' it, hol' it, hol' it, hol' it, hol' it
No sleepin' in the streets!
Shaky warrior
Yeah, this that Oliver, 40, Niko shit man
15 Fort York shit, y'know?
Boi-1da, what's poppin'?
Yeah, yeah


Runnin' through the 6 with my woes
Countin' money, you know how it goes
Pray the real live forever, man
Pray the fakes get exposed
I want that Ferrari, then I swerve
I want that Bugatti, just to hurt
I ain't rockin' my jewelry, that's on purpose
Niggas want my spot and don't deserve it
I don't like how serious they take themselves
I've always been me, I guess I know myself
Shakiness, man, I don't have no time for that
My city too turned up, I'll take the fine for that
This been where you find me at
That's been where you find me at
I know a nigga named Johnny Bling
He put me on to the finer things
Had a job sellin' Girbaud jeans
I had a yellow TechnoMarine
Then Kanye dropped, it was polos and backpacks
Man, that was when Ethan was pushin' a Subaru hatchback
Man, I'm talkin' way before hashtags
I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
(Yeah!)





I was runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
Runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
Don't fuck with them niggas, they too irrational, woah


This is that nasty flow
Top boy in this shit, I'm so international
Reps up is in here
Got P Reign and Chubby and TJ and Winnie and woah
Yeah, and you know how that shit go
I might declare it a holiday as soon as Baka get back on the road
Yeah, but you know how that shit go
They so irrational, they don't wanna patch it up
They wanna mash it up, woah
My nigga Jibba, he whip it, I ride in the passenger
I'm way up, I stay up, I'm two up, I'm three up
I had to get back to you, woah
I'm turnin' into a nigga that thinks about money and women
Like 24/7, that's where my life took me
That's just how shit happened to go
And you know
Runnin' through the 6 with my, with my

I was running through the 6 with my woes
And you know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
Runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
You know how that shit go
Runnin' through the 6 with my woes
You know how that shit go


...Shell out, all if yuh eye nuh big
Always haffi look out, yuh no know if yuh head book out
Dun know, a de Unruly boss, dis man
No bomboclat, otha
And if a boy nuh like OVO or Chromatic
Yuh can jus suck yuh mada!!
With no apology, if you nuh like we, we nuh like you neither youth
Your girl a say we cute, if you diss you will get execute
That's the truth, OVO Unruly
(Machine gun shots)
With my woes",703654
51659,434801,6PM in New York,rap,Drake,2015,1147956,{},"
Yeah
Yeah


Oh, you gotta love it, oh, you got-oh, you gotta love it
I heard what circulated, let's get to the bottom of it
I told 1da send me something and I got it covered
Somehow I always rise above it
Why you think I got my head in the clouds on my last album cover?
The game is all mine and I'm mighty possessive
Lil Wayne could not have found him a better successor
Every shot you see 'em take at me, they all contested
Allen Iverson shoe deal, these niggas all in question
Last night I went to sleep wanting more
Tryna decide what direction I should go towards
Some nights I wish I could go back in life
Not to change shit, just to feel a couple things twice
28 at midnight, wonder what's next for me
Longevity, wonder how long they'll check for me
Prolly forever if I stay in my zone
I speak on this generation, but can't change it alone
I heard a lil, lil homie talking reckless in Vibe
That's quite a platform you chose, you should've kept it inside
Oh, you tried? It's so childish calling my name on the world stage
You need to act your age and not your girl's age
It gets worse by the annual
My career's like a how-to manual, so I guess it's understandable, man
Oh, you gotta love it, you gotta love it, yeah
I know rappers that call paparazzi to come and get 'em
To show they outfits off, guess they need the attention
I remember when it used to be music that did it
But then again times have changed, man, who are we kiddin'?
I'm managed by my friends that I grew up with
I'd rather give that 15% to people I fuck with
If me and Future hadn't made it with this rappin'
We'd prolly be out in Silicon tryna get our billions on
But here we are, yeah
Lately, I feel the haters eatin' away at my confidence
They scream out my failures and whisper my accomplishments
Bitches alter my messages like we had words
And stories 'bout my life hit the net like a bad serve
Bitter women I'm overtextin' are PMSing
Crazy this year-fuckin' with my image
I've been tryna reach the youth so I can save 'em this year
Fuck it, I guess I gotta wait 'til next year
And I heard someone say something that stuck with me a lot
'Bout how we need protection from those protectin' the block
Nobody lookin' out for nobody
Maybe we should try and help somebody or be somebody
Instead of bein' somebody that makes the news, so everybody can Tweet about it
And then they start to ""R.I.P."" about it
And four weeks later nobody even speaks about it
Damn, I just had to say my piece about it
Oh, you gotta love it-
But they scared of the truth so back to me showin' out in public, that's a hotter subject
I been whippin' Mercedes and nigga try to budget
I gotta make it back to Memphis to check on my cousins
Shout out to Ashley, Tasha, Bianca
Julia, Ericka, Southern America
Part of my heritage, pardon my arrogance
Part in my hair again, that's that comeback flow
Comeback flow, once I start it's apparent
I'm with a girl who ass is so big that's partly embarrassin'
But fuck all the blushin' and fuck your discussions and fuck all the judgement
Your content so aggressive lately, what's irkin' you?
Shit is gettin' so personal in your verses too
I wanna prove that I'm number one over all these niggas
Bein' number two is just being the first to lose
My city dictated music, nobody seein' us
Winter here already, but somehow I'm heatin' up
Been observin' the game and felt like I've seen enough
Let's drop a tape on these niggas, then we'll see wassup
Yeah, boy, you rappin' like you seen it all
You rappin' like the throne should be the three of y'all
""Best I Ever Had"" seems like a decade ago
Decadent flow and I still got a decade to go
Oh please, take it ease, where's the love and the peace?
Why you rappin' like you come from the streets?
I got a backyard where money seems to come from the trees
And I'm never ever scared to get some blood on my leaves
Phantom slidin' like the shit just hit a puddle of grease
I cook the beef well done on the double with cheese
Special order for anybody that's comin' for me
Shit, you probably flinch if somebody sneeze
You see they got me back talkin' like it's just 40, Oli, and me
Cuttin' all loose ends, I be the barber for free
I'm almost at four minutes goin' off on the beat
Feel like I'm in the Malibu that had the cloth on the seats
Man, oh, you gotta love it, yeah
And on top of that it's getting harder to eat
Rappers downgrading houses, putting cars on the lease
To think labels said they'd have a problem marketing me
And now it's everybody else that's getting hard to believe
But, man, oh, you gotta love it (Oh)
Yeah
And head to toe, I'm Prada covered (Whoop)
I know your girl well, just not in public
Blame the city, I'm a product of it
Young nigga from the city
You gotta love it

Yeah, gotta love it
*Laughs*
Yeah",703730
51660,434802,Company,rap,Drake,2015,1473154,"{""Travis Scott""}","
I got some shit for you to come and get
I'm at the St. Regis up on Briar Oaks
Hit me when you done your shift
Wooh, I see you doin' well, baby
Oh, you pullin' shit together, I can tell, baby (Oh-oh)
Is you single or what? I need a girl from the country
I need a girl from Kentucky, I need a shawty from Houston
I need a girl who gon' love me
I need a girl who gon' trust me, someone to fuck me
Someone to make me feel lucky
Someone that's so proud to be with me
She walk right up to her ex, look him dead in the face
And say, ""You ain't got the juice like that
You ain't got the juice like that""
That's cold, ice cold, girl you ain't have to do him like that
Why you had to do him like that?
Gotta come through quick, quick
Oh you at the club cashin' out with Eric
Then hit me when you done your shift
I know a girl I should propose to
But we just on some different shit
She on some up at 9AM already cookin' in the kitchen shit
And lately we've been fightin'
On some ""why-you-love-these-strippers?"" shit
Yeah, she workin' with the spatula, I know she love flippin' shit, oh!
Oh, me, I don't deserve it (at least you fuckin' know it)
She's just a little too perfect, she's just a little too worth it
I don't deserve her at all, no not at all
I only text her, man, I never call
I'm still a canine at heart, I'm a dog
Yeah, that's why you gotta come through quick, quick
I'm posted at the Derek up on Westheimer
Hit me when you're done your shift, yeah

I need some company, I need some company
I need you to take my mind off being in my prime
Some company


I'm a dog, I'm in heat baby, heat baby
I'm a dog, I'm in heat baby
I'm a dog, I'm a dog, I'm in heat baby
I'm in heat baby...
Mo City trip! Mo City trip right now! Yeah
I'm on a Mo City trip, I'm on a Mo City trip right now
Ayy, ayy, a Mo City trip right now
Mo City trip, I'm on a Mo City trip right now


It's a couple faces in here that a nigga piped down
So let's go find a place that we can sip right now
Tour 'round the city, it's the shit right now
It's kinda lit right now that you're here right now
Pop a couple percs let's get it in right now
Saturday nights, off in my bed right now
Call up your girl and put them heels on
It's gettin' rowdy, rowdy right now, yeah
I'm on a Mo City trip, I'm a dog
I'm a dog, I'm in heat baby, heat baby
I'm a dog, I go ham, I'm a hog
Bitch so bad, coulda thought I owed her somethin'
By the way I broke her off (Broke her off)
When she get too on, we take it off (Take it off)
Drank so long, for a year I didn't cough (Cough)
Fantasizin' and fistin' and switchin' up positions (Straight up!)
Do you mind if we just menage just a little? (La Flame!)

Mo City trip right now, Mo City trip right now
Mo City trip right now",703732
51661,434804,10 Bands,rap,Drake,2015,1445908,{},"
10 Bands, 50 bands, 100 bands, fuck it, man
Let's just not even discuss it, man
OMG, niggas sleep, I ain't trippin', I'ma let 'em sleep
I ain't trippin', let 'em rest in peace


I can tell ya how it happened
I can tell ya 'bout them safe house nights out in Calabasas
I can tell you not a rapper
Tryna sell this story, I don't even open up the package
Who you with? What you claim?
I was payin' mama's rent when was I turning 17
Soda dirty like Diana never clean
My ex asked me, ""Where you movin'?"" I said, ""On to better things""


10 Bands, 50 bands, 100 bands, fuck it, man
Let's just not even discuss it, man
OMG, niggas sleep, I ain't trippin', I'ma let 'em sleep
I ain't trippin', let 'em rest in peace

I been in the crib with the phones off
I been at the house taking no calls
I done hit the stride got my shit goin'
In the six cooking with the wrist motion
Drapes closed, I don't know what time it is
I'm still awake, I gotta shine this year
I could never ever let the streets down
Haven't left the condo for a week now


10 Bands, 50 bands, 100 bands, fuck it, man
Let's just not even discuss it, man
OMG, niggas sleep, I ain't trippin', I'ma let 'em sleep
I ain't trippin', let 'em rest in peace


I've been on a mission, haven't left the condo
This that OVO, that SZN, this that new Toronto
I get boxes of free Jordan like I play for North Carolina
How much I make off the deal, how the fuck should I know?
All my watches always timeless, you can keep the diamonds
Treatin' Diamonds of Atlanta like it's King of Diamonds
Take a flick, I look like Meechy, look like Bleu DaVinci
I treat V Live like it's 07 in Magic City
Man, I told my city I'd be gone 'til November then November came
Then I came, right back on my worst behav'
6 God, put both hands together, that's amazin' grace
6 God, selfish with the love, I need all the praise (woo)
They got me feelin' like the one again (woo)
They got me feelin' like the one again
Yeah, shout goes out to Nike, checks all over me
I need a FuelBand just to see how long the run has been

10 Bands, 50 bands, 100 bands, fuck it, man
Let's just not even discuss it, man
OMG, niggas sleep, I ain't trippin', I'ma let 'em sleep
I ain't trippin', let 'em rest in peace


I been in the crib with the phones off
I been at the house takin' no calls
I done hit the stride, got my shit going
In the 6 cookin' with the wri-wri-wri-wri",703738
51662,434806,Energy,rap,Drake,2015,2781485,{},"


Lickwood means ""rewind"" and gunshot means ""forward""
You requested it, so we rewind
Yeah, way, way, way up
Turn it all up, yeah, look


I got enemies,  got a lot of enemies
Got a lot of people tryna drain me of my energy
They tryna take the wave from a nigga
Fuckin' with the kid and pray for your nigga


I got girls in real life tryna fuck up my day
Fuck goin' online, that ain't part of my day
I got real shit poppin' with my family too
I got niggas that can never leave Canada too (Six)
I got two mortgages, thirty million in total
I got niggas that'll still try fuckin' me over
I got rap niggas that I gotta act like I like
But my actin' days are over, fuck them niggas for life, yeah

I got enemies,  got a lot of enemies
Got a lot of people tryna drain me of this energy
They tryna take the wave from a nigga
Fuckin' with the kid and pray for your nigga


I got people talkin' down, man, like I give a fuck
I bought this one a purse, I bought this one a truck
I bought this one a house, I bought this one a mall
I keep buyin' shit, just make sure you keep track of it all
I got bitches askin' me about the code for the Wi-Fi
So they can talk about they Timeline
And show me pictures of they friends
Just to tell me they ain't really friends
Ex-girl, she the female version of me
I got strippers in my life, but they virgins to me
I hear everybody talkin' 'bout what they gon' be
I got high hopes for you niggas, we gon' see
I got money in the courts 'til all my niggas are free
'Bout to call your ass a Uber, I got somewhere to be
I hear fairy tales 'bout how they gon' run up on me
Well, run up when you see me, then, and we gon' see


I got enemies,  got a lot of enemies
Got a lot of people tryna drain me of this energy
They tryna take the wave from a nigga
Fuckin' with the kid and pray for your nigga

Nah, fuck all of you niggas, I ain't finished
Y'all don't wanna hear me say it's a go
Y'all don't wanna see Win Win, 50 or Whoa
I got real ones livin' past Kennedy Road
I got real ones wit' me everywhere that I go
I'm tryna tell ya I got enemies, got a lot of enemies
Every time I see 'em, somethin' wrong with their memory
Tryna take the wave from a nigga
So tired of savin' all these niggas, mayne
Yeah, run 'em


I got enemies, got a lot of enemies
Got a lot of people tryna drain me of this energy
They tryna take the wave from a nigga
Fuckin' with the kid and pray for your nigga
(I'm off this)",703741
51663,434807,No Tellin,rap,Drake,2015,1022383,{},"
Whoa
Whoa
Yeah
Look


Envelopes comin' in the mail, let her open 'em
Hopin' for a check again, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, she invite me to the telly, keep the blade with me
When I go to check a bitch, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, police comin' 'round lookin' for some help
On a case they gotta solve, we never help 'em
Yeah, I stay up late at night, thinkin' 'bout my life
Want a lot, will I get it all? Ain't no tellin'
Ain't no tellin', yeah, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, no tellin', ain't no tellin'


Suitcase, I been livin' out a suitcase
Still drinkin' Henny, if it's done, I'll take the D'usse
Oops, ayy, fuck it, all you niggas two-faced
Got the club goin' up on a Tuesday
True say, I been goin' hard, but then again
They think I'm soft, think I'm innocent
I'm just lookin' in the mirror like I'm really him
Man, I'm really him, you just fillin' in
Man, I got a blunt, can I get a light? Yeah
I took the summer off to get it right
Yeah, I gave these boys a shot and they fuckin' failed
Niggas like ""You took the summer off? We couldn't tell""
Dawg, just bought a island, gotta sail to it
You pick the casket, I'll put the nail through it
I ain't gotta do it, but fuck it, somebody gotta do it
Hate if someone else did it, fuck, I may as well do it, ah!

Envelopes comin' in the mail, let her open 'em
Hopin' for a check again, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, she invite me to the telly, keep the blade with me
When I go to check a bitch, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, police comin' 'round lookin' for some help
On a case they gotta solve, we never help 'em
Yeah, I stay up late at night, thinkin' 'bout my life
Want a lot, will I get it all? Ain't no tellin'
Ain't no tellin', yeah, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, no tellin', ain't no tellin'


Okay, I had to switch the flow up on you niggas
The shit was gettin' too predictable
The new shit is on steroids, I would never pass a physical
I got it rollin' in all kinda ways, lump sum and residual, yeah
I mean we hear about the money you been gettin'
We just never seen a visual
It's our year (Aww, yeah)
Aww, yeah
I mean besides Ricky Ross, Aubrey the biggest boss here (Hunh)
What's the word these days?
Bunch of niggas chasing after all these women they don't even know (Wooo!)
Buncha' out of season women fuckin' off-season niggas
To get last season wardrobe (Wooo!)
All the rappers that you vouch for
Need to get out of the house more, they washed up
And even if the team was religious with it
I can't really see another squad tryna' cross us, naw (WOOO)



OVO, Unruly
One shot to make it in a life
From the six to the fucking 876


Envelopes comin' in the mail, let her open 'em
Hopin' for a check again, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, she invite me to the telly, keep the blade with me
When I go to check a bitch, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, police comin' 'round lookin' for some help
On a case they gotta solve, we never help 'em
Yeah, I stay up late at night, thinkin' 'bout my life
Want a lot, will I get it all? Ain't no tellin'
Ain't no tellin', yeah, ain't no tellin'
Yeah, no tellin', man ain't no tellin'


No tellin'
Yeah
Look


I gotta keep watchin' for oppers
'Cause anything's possible, yeah
There's no code of ethics out here
Anyone will take shots at you, yeah
Niggas think they can come take what I got
Let's be logical, yeah
V-Live, I order that Alfredo pasta
Then eat in the kitchen like I'm in the mafia
Houston, they get me though
European, my vehicle, how much it hit me fo'?
Ain't no tellin', yeah
What am I willin' to give her to get what I want tonight?
Ain't no tellin'
Please do not speak to me like I'm that Drake from four years ago
I'm at a higher place
Thinkin' they lions and tigers and bears
I go huntin', put heads on my fireplace, oh my

Take time, ain't no tellin'
Oh my, ain't no tellin'",703742
51664,434808,Star67,rap,Drake,2015,1159485,{},"


That's what they doin', Cam'ron
They actin' like these singers, man
""I ain't- I ain't goin' to the studio 'till I got a situation
A subject, I need a beat, I need the producer
Who- Who gon' be on the hook?"" Man, what is you doin'?
Go in the studio with fuckin' clips, clips, ammo!


Brand-new Beretta, can't wait to let it go
Walk up in my label like, ""Where the check, though?""
Yeah, I said it
Wouldn't dap you with the left, ho, shut the fuck up
Text from a centerfold, I ain't reply, let her know I read it though
Voicemail say she ready though (Yeah)
Niggas know I'm credible, ain't no pussy on a pedestal
Got my foot on the 'Cedes Benz pedal
Doin' ninety on the bridge, like, ""Nigga, you already know""
And if you don't know, then now you know, now you know
Switchin up the angles
Now I'm in the Rolls with illuminated angel
Four, five chains, man, the gold gettin' tangled
My nigga Biz said, ""The first mill' gon' change you""
Change for the better, hit it, then dead her
That's my vendetta, keep this shit together
Goddamn, we ain't even gotta scam
Cocaine coupe, we ain't even got a scale
Used to flip apps, now that old plug murked
Ain't a damn thing changed, you can still get the work, ayy

Just hold on one moment and someone will be right with you
(We're sorry, you have reached a number that has been disconnected or is no longer in service)




Yeah


I remember I had went to Louis V with Haf'
Watched them spread ten thousand dollars on the glass
I never, ever thought I'd see that in my life
Now I'm in the East 'cause them boys are gettin' right, man
I was on TV, makin' fifty racks a year
After helpin' Mama out, the shit would disappear
I am not a man, I can't do this on my own
So I started askin' them if they would put me on
And they did put me on, yeah
They did put me on
Now we in the basement, and we workin' on the phone
Now we in the basement, and we workin' on the phone, man
Line blowin' up, workin' on the phones
Now we in the basement, and we workin' on the phones
But I just couldn't do it, had to leave that shit alone, man

Hear what?
Yo hear what, take time
(Ha, ha, ha) Ahh, no shit
Yo hear what?
Wha gwan, fry skull
Him fried, him fried and a sleep awhile ago inna di van
You know Drizzy


Blowin' up
Line blowin' up, they need the whole thing
Blowin' up
My niggas really need the whole thing, yeah, yeah
Blowin' up
Line blowin' up, they need the whole thing
Blowin' up
My niggas really need the whole thing, yeah, yeah, yeah
Ayy


I do better with the rider in my system
Ooh yeah, I'm on deck, when you call me, I'll listen
I listen unless I been mixin', you know when I'm mixin'
You know when I'm mixin'
I smoke when I drink, it's tradition
Like Zoe mama, I go hippy
Peace sign in the air like I'm Nixon, I'm mixin'
I am not Esco, but it was written
I knew when they didn't
I been had these visions of the life I'm livin' since I was Jimmy
All I had to do was just go and get it

And now we blowin' up
Line blowin' up, they need the whole thing
Blowin' up, yeah
My niggas really need the whole thing, yeah, yeah, yeah
Ayy",703743
51666,434812,Preach,rap,Drake,2015,1059994,{PARTYNEXTDOOR},"
Young nigga preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Young nigga preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach


I'm in Miami, I need to call up Miss Cassidy
My name is PARTY, not ""Participation""
Sorry for the miscommunication
I need a drink and some tequila with you
You know what I'm tryna do
Hey, let's pop the E off at Liv
I've got some time here to blow
I've got the money to blow
I've got the money and blow
Don't have to guess how I know
Oh, it's a secret? Trust me, I'll keep it
You old niggas boring as bones
She put the PARTY tape on
You know what's going on, you know what's going on
She keep it wet like tsunami
She think she sunk the Titanic
I get her hot like wasabi
She think it's wavy and gnarly
I think I'ma pop one for you
Drink one for you

Young nigga, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Young nigga, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Young nigga, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach
Preach, preach (Yeah), preach, preach


Still in Miami, most of these girls are too messy
I gotta do some reflecting
I gotta find me one out here that's good at taking direction
I am convinced that my calls are being recorded
So hit my assistant to get me the message
And make the connection like, ""Brrp!""
I'm on that wave tonight, I hope you not the crazy type, yeah
I'm in your state tonight, I might just break the bank tonight, yeah
PND ain't with the ray-tay, you know Jay Wray
Got girls here, going way, way, way, way, way, way-
Sauga-city trip, the payday
Glo'd up off a Gateway, man, you can't afford me
Doing is one thing; doing it right is a whole different story
Niggas is all in they feelings these days, all in they feelings these days
But hearing a scripture with that many 6's, you should be afraid

Young nigga, preach (Preach)
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Young nigga, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Young nigga, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach, preach, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach
Preach, preach, preach, preach


I'm preaching, oooh
Preaching, preaching, babe
Preaching, whooo
I'ma finally, finally
Yeah
Boy, you should know that
Your love is always on my mind
And I can't deny it
I want you, I'm on you",703749
51669,434817,6 Man,rap,Drake,2015,1067761,{},"
Yeah, yeah


Boomin out in South Gwinnett like Lou Will'
6 Man like Lou Will'
Two girls and they get along like I'm- (Lou)
Like I'm Lou Will', I just got the new deal
I am in the Matrix, and I just took the blue pill
No ho shit, no fuckin' ho shit, save that for your shit
I don't need no-fuckin'-body, I run my own shit
I told you, thought I told you, you didn't listen
Fieri, I'm in the kitchen, I'm a magician
I'm on it, I'm like MacGyver, I'm Michael Myers
I kill careers and cut the lights off, this shit is frightenin'
I knew it would end up like this, I'm fuckin' psychic
Young, but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift


Yeah, work the night shift
Young, but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift
Work, work the night shift

Young, but I'm gettin' every single motherfuckin' thing I'm owed
You gotta know
I'm here to fuck with niggas' souls, my heart is cold
It's prolly 'cause I'm from the snow, with all my WOEs
I know they wanna see me go, I'm on a roll
I mean, I'm back on this again, I'm here again
You know the truth, let's not pretend, I'm not your friend
Not your guy, I'm not your buddy, show no love'
And I might go DeMarcus Cousins out in public
Man, I'm back on this again, I'm here again
I didn't do this fuckin' tape for CNN
I am not tryna win awards, that shit looked forced, it's nothin' like this
Young, but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift


Yeah, work the night shift
Young, but I'm makin' millions to work the night shift
Work, work the night shift
(Lou)


If you were worried about where
I've been or who I saw or
What club I went to with the homies
Baby, don't worry, you know that you got me
I've never worried about where
I'm at or who I saw or
What club I go to with the homies
Baby, don't worry, I know that they got me (6ix)",703756
51902,437560,Again,rap,Fetty Wap,2015,1075045,{},"
Yeah, baby
Ayy


I want you to be mine again, baby, ayy
I know my lifestyle is driving you crazy, ayy
I cannot see myself without you
We call them fans, though, girl, you know how we do
I go out of my way to please you
I go out of my way to see you
And I want you to be mine again, baby, ayy
I know my lifestyle is driving you crazy, ayy
But I cannot see myself without you
We call them fans, though, girl, you know how we do
I go out of my way to please you
I go out of the way to see you
I ain't playing no games, I need you


Baby, can you understand I'm a young nigga living?
Coming from the trap, all a nigga know is get it
I ain't chasing no pussy, girl, I'm talkin' 'bout the digits
Big bank rolls in my pockets, all fifties
Turned a little check, then I showed you I could triple it
Baby, it's Zoovier, I only want you
I don't give a fuck who cares, tats on my face
She don't give a fuck who stares, looking too good
Get you fucked on sight
I'm tryna finish this who I started with
I'm tryna spend it all who I got it with, ayy
She my trap queen, let her hit the bando, ayy
We be counting up, watch how far them bands go, ayy
Hop out my Bimmer, she jump out the Lambo, ayy
Roll them bands up, smooth how the wind go, ayy
Dumping wood guts all out the window, ayy
Married to the money, I ain't never lettin' go, ayy
Baby, it's ZooWap from the bando, ayy
Dumping wood guts all out the window, ayy
Married to the money, I ain't never let go, ayy
Baby, it's ZooWap from the fucking bando

I want you to be mine again, baby (ayy, yeah, baby)
I know (ayy) my lifestyle is (ayy) driving you crazy (yeah, baby)
I cannot see myself without you (ayy)
We call them fans, though, girl, you know (baby) how we do
I go out of my way to please you (baby)
I go out of my way to see you (baby)
And I want you to be mine again, baby (yeah, baby)
I know my lifestyle is driving you crazy (yeah, baby)
But I cannot see myself without you
We call them fans, though, girl, you know how we do
I go out of my way to please you
I go out of the way to see you (yeah)
I ain't playing no games, I need you


I hope you know I need you, ayy, yeah, baby
I get up on my knees too, ayy, yeah, baby
Do anything to please you, ayy, yeah, baby
Top down when we breeze through, ayy, yeah baby
Know they call me Zoovier (Zoovier)
We living like a movie (Zoovier)
And all the bands down to going up, girl, you know we ran through it
I need you, baby, (baby), I ain't afraid admit it
Girl, I need you, baby, ayy, (I need you baby) girl, tell me if you with it
Yeah, baby, all the bands, I'ma spend it
Big ZooWap to the finish (baby)
When I come through, they (baby) screaming out
Zoovier, baby, scream it loud

I want you to be mine again, baby (I want you to be mine)
I know my lifestyle is driving you crazy (baby)
I cannot see myself without you (ay)
We call them fans, though, girl, you know how we do (we do)
I go out of my way to please you
I go out of my way to see you (yeah, baby)
And I want you to be mine again baby (I want you to be mine)
I know my lifestyle is driving you crazy
But I cannot see myself without you
We call them fans, though, girl, you know how we do
I go out of my way to please you (ayy)
I go out of the way to see you
I ain't playing no games, I need you


(Ooooo, oooo, yeah baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, whoooo, ahhhh, oooooooo, ah)
And I want you to be mine again baby
I know my lifestyle is driving you crazy
But I cannot see myself without you
We call them fans, though, girl, you know how we do
I go out of my way to please you
I go out of the way to see you
I ain't playing no games, I need you",707870
51999,438568,Sorry Not Sorry,rb,Bryson Tiller,2015,1157564,{},"
Fight!
Hey
Goddamn... I'm winnin'
Goddamn! I'm winnin', I'm winnin'
God
Got money, now you done switched up on me


I used to think about how you would act when a nigga got money
Now you done switched up on me
Now you wanna say ""What's up?"" to me
Okay, so now you wanna make love to me


Girl if you don't get the fuck from me
I know you thought we had somethin' special
But you don't mean nothin' to me
Girl I'm sorry, you not the one for me


Just be honest, girl, what you want from me?
This ain't nothin' new, keep it so 100
I can't let none of these niggas get one up on me
I go by Gawd Tiller, you better run from me
Give hope to my niggas, them niggas love money
Adios to them bitches, can't get a hug from me
I'm high on life, that's what it does for me
My numbers goin' up, I feel a buzz comin' (One up)

Young nigga, young nigga
Your friends bad too?
Then tell 'em come with you ('Cause I'm on nigga)
And we like, bitches with they own shit
We don't like gold diggers


Girl if you don't get the fuck from me
I know you thought we had somethin' special
But you don't mean nothin' to me
Girl I'm sorry, you not the one for me


This the shit I don't condone in
Cheatin' on your man but you can get it if you want it
Lookin' for a bad bitch, I finally found a culprit
Nigga takin' shots, send 'em back, check the postage, yeah
Hatin' ass nigga, why won't you shut up?
This the motherfuckin' 502 come up
And every time I'm back in the city
Every bitch with a hidden agenda run up (Cause I'm on, nigga)


Young nigga, young nigga
Your friends bad too?
Then tell 'em come with you ('Cause I'm on nigga)
And we like, bitches with they own shit
We don't like gold diggers

Girl if you don't get the fuck from me
I know you thought we had somethin' special
But you don't mean nothin' to me
Girl I'm sorry, you not the one for me


Every nigga did you wrong, except for me
I'm next to blow and so you should've been next to me
Say you lovesick, girl I got the remedy
I'll give you long dick and longevity
Don't settle for less or for infidelity
Niggas ain't built like me
He can't bag and pipe and leave that pussy killed like me
Or even keep the business behind his lips like me
I got a hundred fuckin' problems
Good brain, am I fuckin' with a scholar?
Woodgrain, I'ma grip it when I whip it
If I take a shot and brick it, I'ma flip it
Thankful for my papa, nigga taught me how to get it
Gotta make sure my brothers is eating, I'ma split it
If she throw that pussy at me I'ma hit it
Pen Griffey, but she won't get a penny, no
(Boy, if you don't get!)


Young nigga, young nigga
Your friends bad too?
Then tell 'em come with you ('cause I'm on witcha)
And we like, bitches with they own shit
We don't like gold diggers

Girl if you don't get the fuck from me
I know you thought we had somethin' special
But you don't mean nothin' to me
Girl I'm sorry, you not the one for me


Hey
Goddamn
Hey
We don't like gold diggers...
Goddamn I'm winnin', I'm winnin'
Goddamn I'm winnin'
Oh no!",709256
52145,440417,ULTIMATE,rap,Denzel Curry,2015,3629684,{},"
Ronny J, listen up


I am the one, don't weigh a ton
Don't need a gun to get respect up on the street (Okay)
Under the sun, the bastard son
Will pop the Glock to feed himself and family (Sheesh)
By any means, your enemies, my enemies
We wet them up like a canteen (Damn)
The yellow tape surrounds the fate
Don't have a face, so now you late, open the gates (God damn)


Great, eliminate like ElimiDate (Ooh)
Hey, young boy had to penetrate (Ooh)
Face, young boy done caught a case (Ooh)
Bang, now his mama livin' with the pain (Uh)
Wait, doctor says he's gonna stay (Huh?)
Let him get the Senzu Bean so he regenerate (Oh)
Now a nigga harder than the head of the state (damn)
Denzel Curry is the new candidate (Damn)
Ultimate, alternate, you are the opposite
Stop this shit, chop your esophagus (Esophagus)
Bitches be boppin' it, bow down and pop it in
Droppin' it in her esophagus (Esophagus)
She get so nasty, in public she classy
Perhaps she is able to swallow it (Uh)
Girl, I can make you a star (Star, ooh)
Then I put her ass on Apollo, bitch (Damn)
Bitch, I am ultimate, behold my awesomeness
Narcissist, part time an arsonist (Flame)
Rippin' through cartilage, I am the hardest, bitch
Wrap it up, put in sarcophagus (Damn)
Dearly departed, it's done when it started
So now that I'm livin' so harmonious (Harmonious)
Feelin' like Spartacus, Curry the ultimate
I am the best, there's no politics

Bitch, I'm ultimate
Ultimate
Bitch, I'm


I am the one, don't weigh a ton
Don't need a gun to get respect up on the street (Okay)
Under the sun, the bastard son
Will pop the Glock to feed himself and family (Sheesh)
By any means, your enemies, my enemies
We wet them up like a canteen (Damn)
The yellow tape surrounds the fate
Don't have a face, so now you late, open the gates (Damn)


Ultimate, infinite, flow is opium
Open the internet, photosynthesis
Put in parentheses, temporary
Very scary if I feel like Dirty Harry
Just might bust a bitch, never knew my life
But yet the question is, ""Is he fake? Is he real?""
What the message is, chop a bitch nigga up
I'ma sever it when I sever shit
I kill 'em, no Kony, these niggas ain't homies
Claim you the homie, I turn into Broly
Droppin' melodic, enter the cosmic
Flow like a prophet, lyrical toxic
Flow like a foreigner, I'm the torturer
Out of South Florida, call the coroner
Killed in the corridor, I'm the overlord
Rhymes like a sorcerer, I'm an animorph
Bitch, I'm a beast
Nigga, you tell me who fuckin' with me
K to the I to the N to the G
Claim you the hottest, but I disagree
Better learn something and get a degree
This for Lord Infamous, so R.I.P
Arrivederci, bitches lookin' thirsty
Ridin' through the dirty, like it's mandatory
Ending of the story

I am the one, don't weigh a ton
Don't need a gun to get respect up on the street (Okay)
Under the sun, the bastard son
Will pop the Glock to feed himself and family (Sheesh)
By any means, your enemies, my enemies
We wet them up like a canteen (Damn)
The yellow tape surrounds the fate
Don't have a face, so now you late, open the gates",711649
52171,440848,Little Einsteins Theme Song,pop,Billy Straus,2005,1684132,{},"
5, 4, 3, 2, 1!


We're going on a trip in our favorite rocket ship
Zooming through the sky, Little Einsteins
Climb aboard, get ready to explore
There's so much to find, Little Einsteins


We're going on a mission, start the countdown 5, 4, 3, 2, 1
Everyone to rocket, rev it up now RRRRRRRRRRRRRRR


We're going on a trip in our favorite rocket ship
Zooming through the sky, Little Einsteins
Climb aboard, get ready to explore
There's so much to find, Little Einsteins


Come on, let's go, Little Einsteins
We need you, Little Einsteins
Yeah!",712367
52292,442510,Maria Im Drunk,rap,Travis Scott,2015,1053313,"{""Justin Bieber"",""Young Thug""}","


Made it to L.A., yeah
Finally in L.A., yeah
Lookin' for the weed though
Tryna make my own dough
Callin' for Maria
Lost without Maria
Might dive in the marina
(Ooo-oooh, uooo-ooh)


So trust me, baby, trust me
Trust me, baby, trust me
Trust me, baby, trust me
I don't mind
Trust me, baby, trust me
Trust me, baby, trust me
Trust me, baby, trust me
I don't mind
Trust me, trust me
Trust me, trust me
Trust me, trust me
Yeah, I don't mind



Travis Scott
You know, ooh
Thugger Thugger, nigga (Ayy)


Call your friends, let's get drunk (Let's get drunk, ayy)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk, hey)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
Call your friends, let's get drunk
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk, get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk, ooh


Twelve more hours left for us in a day
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
I've been drinkin' all day, I've been floatin' all day (Ayy, ooh)
(Call your friends and let's get drunk, ayy)
Bring your ass over here now
You know where, how I stay
I've been gone for some time now (Yeah)
I just want a lil' taste
Mix, mix, pour (Lean, lean)
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Drinkin', sippin' slow (Slow it down, bae)
(Call your friends and let's get drunk, ayy)
Drink so cold now, froze (Pfft)
Froze (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Froze (Sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh)
Come on over, get drunk

Damn, girl, I be up late
If you want, you can meet me at the studio (You can meet me at the studio)
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Yeah, I've been drinkin' all night (Hey, ooh)
Take a shot, all we got is Don Julio (All we got is Don Julio)
(Call your friends and let's get drunk, ayy)
Yeah, I'm guessin' this is new to you
Thinkin' 'bout all the things that I would do to you
Them lips on fire and them hips don't lie (Yeah, uh)
Girl, I just wanna see what that booty do (Damn right)
Let's lose each other's mind (Ah-ah)
Let's make each other's night (Ah-ah)
Take advantage of time
While we both intertwined (Slow it down, bae)
Girl, I want you on the rocks, no chaser (Oh no)
Be sure to drink it all, won't waste ya (Oh no, pfft)
I know you stay sober (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
I'm sure a few drinks won't faze you (Sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh, sheesh)


Call your friends, let's get drunk (Hol' up)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk (Ayy)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk, yeah

Press lil' mama for weed, and she did it for free
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Yeah, that thing wet, baby, I need skis
(Call your friends and let's get drunk, ayy)
Skrrt, yeah, I need a ski
Yeah, oh (Ayy)
From the back, pull her track (Ayy)
Then I'ma speed race in that (Skrrt)
My mama still got my back (Ayy)
Pull down your pants, I want crack (Yeah)
I'm growing weed, this ain't trees, bitch
My bitch brown like Hennessy, bitch
Big blood like Freddy in dreams, bitch
Dressed in a tie like the Dean, bitch
Drunk and in love with my baby
Baby, do not go fast, go slow, wait (Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt, skrrt)
Tell me, tell me information, I got rank (Tell me)
Let's take a shot together then lay up like planks (Ayy, ayy)
Never ever do I wanna leave my lil' lady (Ayy)
Catch 'em down bad, now they gotta plan 'fore that boy wake (Yeah)
Told God if I get an iced out watch, I won't be late (I promise)
Every time I try to stick it in all the way
Baby girl be like, ""Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy"" (Haha)
""Ayy, ayy""


Call your friends, let's get drunk (Let's get drunk, ayy)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk (Ayy)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk
(Call your friends and let's get drunk)
Call your friends, let's get drunk


Call your friends and let's get drunk
Call your friends and let's get drunk, ayy",714719
52309,442828,Lean On,pop,Major Lazer,2015,1033022,"{MØ,""DJ Snake""}","


Do you recall, not long ago
We would walk on the sidewalk?
Innocent, remember?
All we did was care for each other
But the night was warm
We were bold and young
All around, the wind blows
We would only hold on to let go


Blow a kiss, fire a gun
We need someone to lean on
Blow a kiss, fire a gun
All we need is somebody to lean on
Blow a kiss, fire a gun
We need someone to lean on
Blow a kiss, fire a gun
All-All-All we need is somebody to lean on

(Hey, hey, hey, hey)
(Hey, hey, hey, hey)


What will we do when we get old?
Will we walk down the same road?
Will you be there by my side?
Standing strong as the waves roll over
When the nights are long
Longing for you to come home
All around, the wind blows
We would only hold on to let go


Blow a kiss, fire a gun
We need someone to lean on
Blow a kiss, fire a gun
All we need is somebody to lean on
Blow a kiss, fire a gun
We need someone to lean on
Blow a kiss, fire a gun
All-All-All we need is somebody to lean on


All we need is somebody to lean on
(We need someone to lean on, hey)
(Hey, hey)
All-All-All we need is somebody to lean on
(Major Lazer, hey)

Oh, oh-oh
(Hey, hey, hey, hey)
(Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey)


Blow a kiss, fire a gun (Hey, hey)
We need someone to lean on (Hey, hey)
Blow a kiss, fire a gun (Hey, hey)
All we need is somebody to lean on (Hey, hey)
Blow a kiss, fire a gun (Hey, hey)
We need someone to lean on (Hey, hey)
Blow a kiss, fire a gun (Hey, hey)
All-All-All we need is somebody to lean on (Hey, hey)",715223
52355,443298,Baby Blue,rap,Action Bronson,2015,1374167,"{""Chance the Rapper""}","
Heartbreak drowned sorrows in a large steak


Why you always all on my back?
Why you gotta do me like that?
Why you gotta act like a bitch when I'm with you?
Baby girl, I'm blue


Because you treat me like shit
I paid for the bed and never even slept in it
I paid for that crib I never stepped foot in
And now somebody else is eating all the pudding
Things change, now my dashboard wooden
All black Benz, like a young Doc Gooden
Dark shades, 'cause I'm stone crazy
Girl, we grown, stop playin' on my phone, baby
All your childish attempts to make me angry fall short
Which only fuels the rage you have, because you have nothing
Understandable, I'm shinin' brilliant with five Brazilians
There were times I used to hide my feelings
Now I'm butt naked in the Lamborghini
And motherfuckers can't see me
Wait 'til this chick see me on TV, I make the shit look easy
Who would've thought I hit you right back?

Why you always all on my back?
Why you gotta do me like that?
Why you gotta act like a bitch when I'm with you?
Baby girl, I'm blue


So many women wanna call me 'baby'
And you wonder why the fuck that I ain't call you lately
Some would say that I'm the symbol for sex and, uh
Others would hate, but I don't give 'em no breath
Go on a date, I'm at the crib with the chef and, uh
That's me, and you could order whatever
The specialty is white snake and underwear sauce
You could probably catch me somewhere where the sun is next
And I understand that's only 'cause I'm popular
I'm getting topped off in the front row of the opera
As Bocelli sings, the celly rings, I gotta go
You'll never know how good it feels to lay in bed with king
I'm not exactly flawless, but I'm gorgeous, just like a horse is
I know the thought of me succeeding makes a lot of people nauseous
Still, I'm on the back of the boat taking pictures with the swordfish


Why you always all on my back?
Why you gotta do me like that?
Why you gotta act like a bitch when I'm with you?
Baby girl, I'm blue

I hope you get a paper cut on your tongue
From a razor in a paper cup
I hope every soda you drink already shaken up
I hope your dreams dry like raisins in the baking sun
I hope your titties all saggy in your early twenties
I hope there's always snow in your driveway
I hope you never get off Fridays
And you work at a Friday's that's always busy on Fridays
I hope you win the lottery and lose your ticket
I hope it's Ben and Socrates poop all up in your kitchen
I hope the zipper on your jacket get stuck
And your headphones short, and your charger don't work
And you spill shit on your shirt
I hope your tears don't hurt, and I can smile in your face
Cut my losses, how Delilah changed my locks to a fade
I hope you happy, I hope you happy
I hope you ruined this shit for a reason, I hope you happy (Igh!)


Why you always all on my back?
Why you gotta do me like that?
Why you gotta act like a bitch when I'm with you?
Baby girl, I'm blue


La, la la la la
La la la la
La la la la
La la la la
La la la la
La la la la
",715833
52589,447057,See You Again,pop,Wiz Khalifa,2015,4207865,"{""Charlie Puth""}","
It's been a long day without you, my friend
And I'll tell you all about it when I see you again
We've come a long way from where we began
Oh, I'll tell you all about it when I see you again
When I see you again


Damn, who knew?
All the planes we flew, good things we been through
That I'd be standing right here talking to you
'Bout another path, I know we loved to hit the road and laugh
But something told me that it wouldn't last
Had to switch up, look at things different, see the bigger picture
Those were the days, hard work forever pays
Now I see you in a better place (See you in a better place)


Uh, how could we not talk about family when family's all that we got?
Everything I went through, you were standing there by my side
And now you gon' be with me for the last ride

It's been a long day without you, my friend
And I'll tell you all about it when I see you again (I'll see you again)
We've come a long way (Yeah, we came a long way) from where we began
(You know we started)
Oh, I'll tell you all about it when I see you again (I'll tell you)
When I see you again
Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Yeah)


First, you both go out your way and the vibe is feeling strong
And what's small turned to a friendship
A friendship turned to a bond
And that bond will never be broken
The love will never get lost (The love will never get lost)
And when brotherhood come first
Then the line will never be crossed
Established it on our own when that line had to be drawn
And that line is what we reached
So remember me when I'm gone (Remember me when I'm gone)


How could we not talk about family when family's all that we got?
Everything I went through you were standing there by my side
And now you gon' be with me for the last ride

So let the light guide your way, yeah
Hold every memory as you go
And every road you take
Will always lead you home, home


It's been a long day without you, my friend
And I'll tell you all about it when I see you again
We've come a long way from where we began
Oh, I'll tell you all about it when I see you again
When I see you again
Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh (Uh)
Yeah yeah (Yeah)
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Yo)
When I see you again (Yo, uh)
Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh
See you again, oh-oh (Yo, yo)
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Uh-huh)
(Yup) When I see you again",720401
52598,447138,Sausage,rap,"Eggs, Bacon, Grits",2014,1980724,"{""Eggs / Bacon / Grits""}","
Pull up in IHOP ordering SAUSAGE!
Need a pancake with your mothafuckin' SAUSAGE!
Gimme that shit I need some SAUSAGE!
Lick my dick that shit a SAUSAGE!
My shit brown like a mothafuckin' SAUSAGE!
Go 'head, get head, eat some SAUSAGE!
I like bacon and I like SAUSAGE!
And I like pancakes and I like SAUSAGE!
Waffles good but I like SAUSAGE!
I eat eggs, but give me some SAUSAGE!


Everybody say sausage to keep that shit goin'!
Eggs, bacon, grits, SAUSAGE!
Tell that bitch I wanna fuck her SAUSAGE!
She want my grits and my eggs and my SAUSAGE!
Put some fuckin' syrup on my goddamn SAUSAGE!
Give me that bitch, I know you wanna lick my SAUSAGE!
Walk in the hotel room, you see my SAUSAGE!
Sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau SAUSAGE!
Sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau SAUSAGE!
Eggs, bacon, grits, SAUSAGE!
Tell that bitch to come lick on my SAUSAGE!
I got your bitch and she wanna get my SAUSAGE!
Sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau-sau SAUSAGE!",720498
52676,447993,King Kunta,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,4539073,{},"


I got a bone to pick
I don't want you monkey-mouth motherfuckers
Sittin' in my throne again
Ayy, ayy, nigga, what's happenin'?
K-Dot back in the hood, nigga!
I'm mad (He mad!), but I ain't stressin'
True friends, one question


Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him
Kunta, black man taking no losses, oh yeah
Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him
When you got the yams-(What's the yams?)

The yam is the power that be
You can smell it when I'm walkin' down the street
(Oh yes, we can, oh yes, we can)
I can dig rappin', but a rapper with a ghostwriter?
What the fuck happened? (Oh no!)
I swore I wouldn't tell, but most of y'all sharing bars
Like you got the bottom bunk in a two-man cell (A two-man cell)
Something's in the water (Something's in the water)
And if I gotta brown-nose for some gold
Then I'd rather be a bum than a motherfuckin' baller (Oh yeah!)


Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him
King Kunta, black man taking no losses, oh yeah
Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him
When you got the yams-(What's the yams?)


The yam brought it out of Richard Pryor
Manipulated Bill Clinton with desires
Twenty-four-seven, three-sixty-five days times two
I was contemplatin' gettin' off stage
Just to go back to the hood, see my enemy, and say... (Oh yeah)

Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him
Kunta, black man taking no losses, oh yeah
Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him


You goat-mouth mammyfucker
I was gonna kill a couple rappers, but they did it to themselves
Everybody's suicidal, they ain't even need my help
This shit is elementary, I'll probably go to jail
If I shoot at your identity and bounce to the left
Stuck a flag in my city, everybody's screamin', ""Compton!""
I should probably run for mayor when I'm done, to be honest
And I put that on my momma and my baby boo too
Twenty million walkin' out the court buildin', woo-woo!
Aw, yeah, fuck the judge
I made it past twenty-five, and there I was
A little nappy-headed nigga with the world behind him
Life ain't shit but a fat vagina
Screamin', ""Annie, are you okay? Annie, are you okay?""
Limo tinted with the gold plates
Straight from the bottom, this the belly of the beast
From a peasant to a prince to a motherfuckin' king (Oh yeah)

Bitch, where you when I was walkin'-*Gunshot*
By the time you hear the next pop
The funk shall be within you-*Gunshot*
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him
King Kunta, black man taking no losses, oh yeah
Bitch, where you when I was walkin'?
Now I run the game, got the whole world talkin'
King Kunta, everybody wanna cut the legs off him


Funk, funk, funk, funk, funk, funk, funk, funk, funk, funk, funk
We want the funk
We want the funk
Now if I give you the funk, you gon' take it?
We want the funk
Now if I give you the funk, you gon' take it?
We want the funk
Now if I give you the funk, you gon' take it?
We want the funk
Do you want the funk?
We want the funk
Do you want the funk?
We want the funk
Now if I give you the funk, you gon' take it?
We want the funk


I remember you was conflicted, misusing your influence",721659
52696,448153,​u,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1881299,{},"
*Screaming*


Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated


I place blame on you still, place shame on you still
Feel like you ain't shit, feel like you don't feel
Confidence in yourself, breakin' on marble floors
Watchin' anonymous strangers, tellin' me that I'm yours
But you ain't shit, I'm convinced your tolerance nothin' special
What can I blame you for? Nigga, I can name several
Situations, I'll start with your little sister bakin'
A baby inside, just a teenager, where your patience?
Where was your antennas?
Where was the influence you speak of?
You preached in front of one-hunnid-thousand but never reached her
I fuckin' tell you fuckin' failure-you ain't no leader!
I never liked you, forever despise you-I don't need ya!
The world don't need ya, don't let them deceive ya
Numbers lie too, fuck your pride too, that's for dedication
Thought money would change you, made you more complacent
Fuckin' hate you, I hope you embrace it, I swear-

Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated
Loving you is complicated, loving you is complicated


Lovin' you, lovin' you, not lovin' you, 100° proof
I can feel your vibe and recognize that you're ashamed of me
Yes, I hate you, too


(Loving you ain't really complicated)
""Housekeeping, housekeeping""
(What I got to do to get to you?)
""¡Abre la puerta! ¡Abre la puerta tengo que limpiar el cuarto!""
(To you)
""¡Es que no hay mucho tiempo tengo que limpiar el cuarto!""
(Loving you ain't really complicated)
""¡Disculpe!""
(What I got to do to get to you?)
(To you)



And you the reason why mom and them leavin'
No, you ain't shit, you say you love 'em, I know you don't mean it
I know you irresponsible, selfish, in denial, can't help it
Your trials and tribulations a burden, everyone felt it
Everyone heard it, multiple shots, corners cryin' out
You was deserted, where was your antennas again?
Where was your presence? Where was your support that you pretend?
You ain't no brother, you ain't no disciple, you ain't no friend
A friend never leave Compton for profit, or leave his best friend, little brother
You promised you'd watch him before they shot him
Where was your antennas? On the road, bottles and bitches
You FaceTimed him one time, that's unforgiven
You even FaceTimed instead of a hospital visit
Guess you thought he'd recover well
Third surgery, they couldn't stop the bleeding for real
Then he died, God himself will say, ""You fuckin' failed,"" you ain't try


*Sniffling*


I know your secrets, nigga, mood swings is frequent, nigga
I know depression is restin' on your heart for two reasons, nigga
I know you and a couple block boys ain't been speakin', nigga
Y'all damn near beefin', I see it and you're the reason, nigga
And if this bottle could talk *gulping*
I cry myself to sleep, bitch, everything is your fault
Faults breakin' to pieces, earthquakes on every weekend
Because you shook as soon as you knew confinement was needed
I know your secrets, don't let me tell 'em to the world
About that shit you thinkin' and that time you *gulping*, I'm 'bout to hurl
I'm fucked up, but I ain't as fucked up as you
You just can't get right, I think your heart made of bullet proof
Should've killed yo' ass long time ago
You should've felt that black revolver blast a long time ago
And if these mirrors could talk it'd say, ""You gotta go""
And if I told your secrets the world'll know money can't stop a suicidal weakness",721842
52697,448165,Mortal Man,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1954693,{},"
Ohhh, ohhhh, woahhh
Uh, yeah
Uh, yeah
Uh
Yeah, uh


The ghost of Mandela, hope my flows stay propellin'
Let these words be your Earth and moon, you consume every message
As I lead this army, make room for mistakes and depression
And with that being said, my nigga, let me ask this question:


When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
When shit hit the fan-
(One two, one two, one two)
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?


The ghost of Mandela, hope my flows stay propellin'
Let these words be your Earth and moon, you consume every message
As I lead this army, make room for mistakes and depression
And with that being said, my nigga, let me ask this question:

When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
Won't you look to your left and right? Make sure you ask your friends
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?


Do you believe in me? Are you deceiving me?
Could I let you down easily, is your heart where it need to be?
Is your smile on permanent? Is your vow on lifetime?
Would you know where the sermon is if I died in this next line?
If I'm tried in a court of law, if the industry cut me off
If the government want me dead, plant cocaine in my car
Would you judge me a drug-head or see me as K. Lamar?
Or question my character and degrade me on every blog?
Want you to love me like Nelson, want you to hug me like Nelson
I freed you from being a slave in your mind, you're very welcome
You tell me my song is more than a song, it's surely a blessing
But a prophet ain't a prophet til they ask you this question:


When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
Won't you look to your left and right? Make sure you ask your friends
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?

The ghost of Mandela, hope my flows stay propellin'
Let my words be your Earth and moon, you consume every message
As I lead this army, make room for mistakes and depression
And with that-


Do you believe in me? How much you believe in her?
You think she gon' stick around if them 25 years occur?
You think he can hold you down when you down behind bars, hurt?
You think y'all on common ground if you promise to be the first? Can you be immortalized without your life being expired?
Even though you share the same blood, is it worth the time?
Like, who got your best interest?
Like, how much are you dependent?
How clutch are the people that say they love you?
And who pretending?
How tough is your skin when they turn you in?
Do you show forgiveness?
What brush do you bend when dusting your shoulders from being offended?
What kind of den did they put you in when the lions start hissing?
What kind of bridge did they burn?
Revenge on your mind when it's mentioned
You wanna love like Nelson, you wanna be like Nelson
You wanna walk in his shoes, but your peacemaking seldom
You wanna be remembered that delivered the message
That considered the blessing of everyone
This your lesson for everyone, say;

When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
Won't you look to your left and right? Make sure you ask your friends
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?


The voice of Mandela, hope this flow stay propellin'
Let my word be your Earth and moon, you consume every message
As I lead this army, make room for mistakes and depression
And if you riding with me, nigga-


I been wrote off before, I got abandonment issues
I hold grudges like bad judges, don't let me resent you
That's not Nelson-like-want you to love me like Nelson
I went to Robben's Island analysing; that's where his cell is
So I could find clarity-like, how much you cherish me?
Is this relationship a fake, or real as the heavens be?
See I got to question it all; family, friends, fans, cats, dogs
Trees, plants, grass, how the wind blow, Murphy's Law
Generation X-will I ever be your ex?
Flaws of a baby step', mauled by the mouth of Pit bulls
Put me under stress, crawled under rocks, duckin' y'all
It's respect-but then tomorrow, put my back against the wall
How many leaders you said you needed then left 'em for dead?
Is it Moses? Is it Huey Newton or Detroit Red?
Is it Martin Luther? JFK? Shooter-you assassin
Is it Jackie? Is it Jesse? Oh, I know it's Michael Jackson-oh


When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?
That nigga gave us ""Billie Jean,"" you say he touched those kids?
When shit hit the fan, is you still a fan?


The ghost of Mandela, hope my flows stay propelling
Let my word be your Earth and moon, you consume every message
As I lead this army, make room for mistakes and depression
And if you riding with me, nigga, let me ask this question, nigga


""I remember you was conflicted
Misusing your influence
Sometimes I did the same
Abusing my power, full of resentment
Resentment that turned into a deep depression
Found myself screaming in the hotel room
I didn't wanna self destruct
The evils of Lucy was all around me
So I went running for answers
Until I came home
But that didn't stop survivor's guilt
Going back and forth trying to convince myself the stripes I earned
Or maybe how A-1 my foundation was
But while my loved ones was fighting the continuous war back in the city
I was entering a new one
A war that was based on apartheid and discrimination
Made me wanna go back to the city and tell the homies what I learned
The word was respect
Just because you wore a different gang color than mine's
Doesn't mean I can't respect you as a black man
Forgetting all the pain and hurt we caused each other in these streets
If I respect you, we unify and stop the enemy from killing us
But I don't know, I'm no mortal man
Maybe I'm just another nigga""

Shit and that's all I wrote
I was gonna call it ""Another Nigga"" but, it ain't really a poem
I just felt like it's something you probably could relate to
Other than that, now that I finally got a chance to holla at you
I always wanted to ask you about a certain situa-
About a metaphor actually, uh, you spoke on the ground
What you mean by that, what the ground represent?

The ground is gonna open up and swallow the evil
Right
That's how I see it, my word is bond
I see-and the ground is the symbol for the poor people
Right
The poor people is gonna open up this whole world
And swallow up the rich people
'Cause the rich people gonna be so fat
And they gonna be so appetizing, you know what I'm saying Wealthy, appetizing
The poor gonna be so poor, and hungry
Right
You know what I'm saying, it's gonna be like
You know what I'm saying, it's gonna be...
There might, there might be some cannibalism out this muh-fu-
They might eat the rich, you know what I'm saying?

Aight so let me ask you this then
Do you see yourself as somebody that's rich
Or somebody that made the best of they own opportunities?

I see myself as a natural born hustler
A true hustler in every sense of the word
I took nothin', I took the opportunities
I worked at the most menial and degrading job
And built myself up so I could get it to where I owned it
I went from having somebody managing me
To me hiring the person that works my management company
I changed everything, I realized my destiny
In a matter of five years, you know what I'm saying?
I made myself a millionaire, I made millions for a lot of people
Now it's time to make millions for myself, you know what I'm saying?
I made millions for the record companies
I made millions for these movie companies
Now I make millions for, for us

And through your different avenues of success
How would you say you managed to keep a level of sanity?

By my faith in God, by my faith in the game
And by my faith in ""all good things come to those that stay true""
Right
You know what I'm saying?
And it was happening to me for a reason
You know what I'm saying, I was noticing, shit
I was punching the right buttons and it was happening
So it's no problem, you know
I mean, it's a problem but I'm not finna let them know
I'm finna go straight through

Would you consider yourself a fighter at heart or somebody that
Somebody that only reacts when they back is against the wall?

Shit, I like to think that at every opportunity I've ever been, uh Threatened with resistance, it's been met with resistance
And not only me but, it goes down my family tree
You know what I'm saying, it's in my veins to fight back

Aight well, how long will you think it take before niggas be like
""We fighting a war, I'm fighting a war I can't win
And I wanna lay it all down""

In this country, a black man only have like
5 years we can exhibit maximum strength
And that's right now while you a teenager, while you still strong
While you still wanna lift weights, while you still wanna shoot back
'Cause once you turn 30 it's like
They take the heart and soul out of a man
Out of a black man, in this country
And you don't wanna fight no more
And if you don't believe me, you can look around
You don't see no loud mouth 30-year old motherfuckers

That's crazy, because me being one of your offsprings
Of the legacy you left behind, I can truly tell you that
There's nothing but turmoil goin' on so, I wanted to ask you
What you think is the future for me and my generation today?

I think that niggas is tired of grabbin' shit out the stores
And next time it's a riot it's gonna be like, uh, bloodshed
For real, I don't think America know that
I think America think we was just playing
And it's gonna be some more playing but
It ain't gonna be no playing
It's gonna be murder, you know what I'm saying?
It's gonna be like Nat Turner, 1831, up in this motherfucker
You know what I'm saying, it's gonna happen

That's crazy, man, in my opinion
Only hope that we kinda have left is music and vibrations
Lot a people don't understand how important it is, you know
Sometimes I can like, get behind a mic
And I don't know what type of energy I'ma push out
Or where it comes from, trip me out sometimes

Because it's spirits, we ain't even really rappin'
We just letting our dead homies tell stories for us
Damn

I wanted to read one last thing to you
It's actually something a good friend had wrote
Describing my world, it says:
""The caterpillar is a prisoner to the streets that conceived it
Its only job is to eat or consume everything around it
In order to protect itself from this mad city
While consuming its environment
The caterpillar begins to notice ways to survive
One thing it noticed is how much the world shuns him
But praises the butterfly
The butterfly represents the talent, the thoughtfulness
And the beauty within the caterpillar
But having a harsh outlook on life
The caterpillar sees the butterfly as weak
And figures out a way to pimp it to his own benefits
Already surrounded by this mad city
The caterpillar goes to work on the cocoon
Which institutionalizes him
He can no longer see past his own thoughts
He's trapped
When trapped inside these walls certain ideas take root, such as
Going home, and bringing back new concepts to this mad city
The result?
Wings begin to emerge, breaking the cycle of feeling stagnant
Finally free, the butterfly sheds light on situations
That the caterpillar never considered, ending the internal struggle
Although the butterfly and caterpillar are completely different
They are one and the same""
What's your perspective on that?
Pac? Pac? Pac?!

",721854
52714,448401,Wesleys Theory,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1934394,"{""George Clinton"",Thundercat}","



Every nigga is a star, ayy, every nigga is a star
Every nigga is a star, ayy, every nigga is a star
Every nigga is a star, ayy
Who will deny that you and I and every nigga is a star?


Hit me!
When the four corners of this cocoon collide
You'll slip through the cracks hopin' that you'll survive
Gather your wit, take a deep look inside
Are you really who they idolize?
To pimp a butterfly


At first, I did love you
But now I just wanna fuck
Late nights thinkin' of you
Until I get my nut
Tossed and turned, lesson learned
You was my first girlfriend
Bridges burned, all across the board
Destroyed, but what for?

When I get signed, homie, I'ma act a fool
Hit the dance floor, strobe lights in the room
Snatch your little secretary bitch for the homies
Blue-eyed devil with a fat-ass monkey
I'ma buy a brand new Caddy on vogues
Chunk the hood up, two times, deuce-four
Platinum on everythin', platinum on weddin' ring
Married to the game and a bad bitch chose
When I get signed, homie, I'ma buy a strap
Straight from the CIA, set it on my lap
Take a few M-16s to the hood
Pass 'em all out on the block, what's good?
I'ma put the Compton swap meet by the White House
Republican run up, get socked out
Hit the press with a Cuban link on my neck
Uneducated, but I got a million-dollar check like that


We should never gave
We should never gave niggas money
Go back home, money, go back home
We should never gave
We should never gave niggas money
Go back home, money, go back home
(Everybody get out)

At first, I did love you (Love you)
But now I just wanna fuck (I just wanna fuck)
Late nights thinkin' of you (Of you)
Until I get my nut ('Til I get my nut)
Tossed and turned, lesson learned
You was my first girlfriend
Bridges burned, all across the board (Across the board)
Destroyed, but what for?


Yo, what's up? It's Dre
Remember the first time you came out to the house?
You said you wanted a spot like mine
But remember, anybody can get it
The hard part is keepin' it, motherfucker


What you want you? A house or a car?
Forty acres and a mule, a piano, a guitar?
Anythin', see, my name is Uncle Sam, I'm your dog
Motherfucker, you can live at the mall
I know your kind (That's why I'm kind)
Don't have receipts (Oh, man, that's fine)
Pay me later, wear those gators
Cliché? Then say, ""Fuck your haters""
I can see the baller in you, I can see the dollar in you
Little white lies, but it's no white-collar in you
But it's whatever though because I'm still followin' you
Because you make me live forever, baby
Count it all together, baby
Then hit the register and make me feel better, baby
Your horoscope is a gemini, two sides
So you better cop everything two times
Two coupes, two chains, two C-notes
Too much ain't enough, both we know
Christmas, tell 'em what's on your wish list
Get it all, you deserve it, Kendrick
And when you hit the White House, do you
But remember, you ain't pass economics in school
And everything you buy, taxes will deny
I'll Wesley Snipe your ass before thirty-five

Yeah, lookin' down, it's quite a drop (It's quite a drop, drop, drop)
Lookin' good when you're on top (When you're on top, you got it)
You got a medal for us
Leavin' metaphors metaphysically in a state of euphoria
Look both ways before you cross my mind


We should never gave
We should never gave niggas money
Go back home, money, go back home
We should never gave
We should never gave niggas money
Go back home, money, go back home


Tax man comin', tax man comin'
Tax man comin', tax man comin'
Tax man comin', tax man comin'
Tax man comin', tax man comin'",722263
52715,448402,For Free? Interlude,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1204146,{},"


Fuck you, motherfucker, you a ho-ass nigga
I don't know why you trying to go big, nigga, you ain't shit
Walking around like you God's gift to Earth, nigga, you ain't shit
You ain't even buy me no outfit for the Fourth
I need that Brazilian, wavy, twenty-eight inch, you playin'
I shouldn't be fuckin' with you anyway
I need a baller-ass, boss-ass nigga
You's a off-brand-ass nigga, everybody know it
Your homies know it, everybody fuckin' know
Fuck you, nigga, don't call me no more
You won't know, you gonna lose on a good bitch
My other nigga is on, you off
What the fuck is really going on?


This dick ain't free
You lookin' at me like it ain't a receipt
Like I never made ends meet
Eating your leftovers and raw meat
This dick ain't free
Livin' in captivity raised my cap salary
Celery, tellin' me green is all I need
Evidently, all I seen was Spam and raw sardines
This dick ain't free, I mean, baby
You really think we could make a baby named Mercedes
Without a Mercedes Benz and twenty-four-inch rims
Five percent tint, and air conditioning vents?
Hell fuckin' naw, this dick ain't free
I need forty acres and a mule
Not a forty ounce and a pitbull
Bullshit, matador, matador
Had the door knockin', let 'em in, who's that?
Genital's best friend, this dick ain't free
Pity the fool that made the pretty in you prosper
Titty juice and pussy lips kept me obnoxious
Kept me up watchin' pornos in poverty; apology? No
Watch you politic with people less fortunate, like myself
Every dog has its day, now doggy style shall help
This dick ain't free
Matter of fact, it need interest
Matter of fact, it's nine inches
Matter of fact, see our friendship based on business
Pension, more pension, you're pinchin' my percents
It's been relentless, fuck forgiveness, fuck your feelings
Fuck your sources, all distortion, if you fuck it's more abortion
More divorce courts and portion
My check with less endorsement left me dormant
Dusted, doomed, disgusted, forced with
Fuck you think is in more shit?
Porcelain pipes pressure, bust 'em twice
Choice is devastated, decapitated the horseman
Oh America, you bad bitch, I picked cotton and made you rich
Now my dick ain't free

I'ma get my Uncle Sam to fuck you up
You ain't no king",722264
52716,448409,Institutionalized,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1161949,"{""Snoop Dogg"",Bilal,""Anna Wise""}","


What money got to do with it
When I don't know the full definition of a rap image?
I'm trapped inside the ghetto and I ain't proud to admit it
Institutionalized, I keep runnin' back for a visit, hol' up
Get it back
I said I'm trapped inside the ghetto and I ain't proud to admit it
Institutionalized, I could still kill me a nigga, so what?


If I was the president
I'd pay my mama's rent
Free my homies and them
Bulletproof my Chevy doors
Lay in the White House and get high, Lord
Whoever thought?
Master, take the chains off me!



Zoom, zoom, zoom, zoom, zoom
Zoom, zoom, zoom
Zoom, zoom, zoom, zoom, zoom
Zoom, zoom, zoom
Zoom, zoom, zoom, zoom, zoom
Zoom, zoom, zoom
Zoom, zoom, zoom, shit


Life, to me, like a box of chocolate
Quid pro quo, somethin' for somethin', that's the obvious
Oh shit, flow's so sick, don't you swallow it
Bitin' my style, you're salmonella poison positive
I can just alleviate the rap industry politics
Milk the game up, never lactose intolerant
The last remainder of real shit, you know the obvious
Me, scholarship? No, streets put me through colleges
Be all you can be, true, but the problem is
Dream only a dream if work don't follow it
Remind me of the homies that used to know me, now follow this
I'll tell you my hypothesis, I'm probably just way too loyal
K Dizzle will do it for you, my niggas think I'm a god
Truthfully all of 'em spoiled, usually, you're never charged
But somethin' came over you once I took you to them fuckin' BET Awards
You lookin' at artistses like they're harvestses
So many Rollies around you and you want all of 'em
Somebody told me you thinkin' 'bout snatchin' jewelry
I should've listened when my grandmama said to me:

""Shit don't change until you get up and wash yo' ass, nigga
Shit don't change until you get up and wash yo' ass, boy
Shit don't change until you get up and wash yo' ass, nigga
Oh now, slow down""


And once upon a time, in a city so divine
Called West Side Compton, there stood a little nigga
He was five-foot somethin', God bless the kid
Took his homies to the show and this is what they said:


""Fuck am I 'posed to do when I'm lookin' at walkin' licks?
The constant big money talk 'bout the mansion and foreign whips
The private jets and passport, presidential glass floor
Gold bottles, gold models, givin' up the ass for
Instagram flicks, suckin' dick, fuck is this?
One more sucker wavin' with a flashy wrist
My defense mechanism tell me to get him
Quickly because he got it
It's a recession, then why the fuck he at King of Diamonds?
No more livin' poor, meet my four-four
When I see 'em, put the per diem on the floor
Now Kendrick, know they're your co-workers
But it's gon' take a lot 'fore this pistol go cold turkey
Now I can watch his watch on the TV and be okay
But see I'm on the clock once that watch landin' in LA
Remember steal from the rich and givin' it back to the poor?
Well, that's me at these awards""
I guess my grandmama was warnin' a boy
She said

""Shit don't change until you get up and wash yo' ass, nigga
Shit don't change until you get up and wash yo' ass, boy
Shit don't change until you get up and wash yo' ass, nigga
Oh now, slow down""


And once upon a time, in a city so divine
Called West Side Compton, there stood a little nigga
He was five-foot something, dazed and confused
Talented but still under the neighborhood ruse
You can take your boy out the hood
But you can't take the hood out the homie
Took his show money, stashed it in the mozey wozey
Hollywood's nervous
Fuck you, goodnight, thank you much for your service",722270
52717,448410,These Walls,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1566129,"{Bilal,""Anna Wise"",Thundercat}","



I remember you was conflicted, misusing your influence
Sometimes, I did the same


(Woman moaning)
If these walls could talk
If these walls could talk
If these walls could talk
If these walls could talk
If these walls could talk
If these walls could talk-
Sex


She just want to close her eyes and sway
With you, with you, with you (Ah, come on)
Exercise her right to work it out
It's true, it's true, it's true
Shout out to the birthday girls
Say hey (Hey), say hey (Hey), (Ah, girl)
Everyone deserves a night to play (Play)
She plays, only when you tell her no

If these walls could talk
I can feel your reign when it cries, gold lives inside of you
If these walls could talk
I love it when I'm in it, I love it when I'm in it


If these walls could talk, they'd tell me to swim good
No boat, I float better than he would
No life jacket, I'm not the God of Nazareth
But your flood can be misunderstood
Walls telling me they full of pain, resentment
Need someone to live in them just to relieve tension
Me, I'm just a tenant
Landlord said these walls vacant more than a minute
These walls are vulnerable, exclamation
Interior pink, color coordinated
I interrogated every nook and cranny
I mean, it's still amazing, before they couldn't stand me
These walls want to cry tears
These walls happier when I'm here
These walls never could hold up
Every time I come around, demolition might crush


If these walls could talk
I can feel your reign when it cries, gold lives inside of you
If these walls could talk
I love it when I'm in it, I love it when I'm in it

If these walls could talk, they'd tell me to go deep
Yelling at me continuously, I can see
Your defense mechanism is my decision
Knock these walls down, that's my religion
Walls feeling like they ready to close in
I suffocate, then catch my second wind
I resonate in these walls
I don't know how long I can wait in these walls
I've been on the streets too long
Looking at you from the outside in
They sing the same old song
About how they walls always the cleanest
I beg to differ, I must've missed them
I'm not involved, I'd rather diss 'em
I'd rather call on you, put your wall up
'Cause when I come around, demolition gon' crush


If these walls could talk
I can feel your reign when it cries, gold lives inside of you
If these walls could talk
I love it when I'm in it, I love it when I'm in it



If your walls could talk, they'd tell you it's too late
Your destiny accepted your fate
Burn accessories and stash them on the yard
Take the recipe, the Bible and God
Wall telling you that commissary is low
Race wars happening, no calling CO
No calling your mother to save you
Homies to say you're irrepetible, not acceptable
Your behavior is Sammy the Bull like
A killer that turned snitch
Walls is telling me you a bitch
You pray for appeals hoping the warden would afford them
That sentence so important
Walls telling you to listen to Sing About Me
Retaliation is strong, you even dream 'bout me
Killed my homeboy and God spared your life
Dumb criminal got indicted same night
So when you play this song, rewind the first verse
About me abusing my power so you can hurt
About me and her in the shower whenever she horny
About me and her in the after hours of the morning
About her baby daddy currently serving life
And how she think about you until we meet up at night
About the only girl that cared about you when you asked her
And how she fuckin' on a famous rapper
Walls can talk (Talk)


I remember you was conflicted
Misusing your influence
Sometimes I did the same
Abusing my power, full of resentment
Resentment that turned into a deep depression
Found myself screaming in a hotel room",722271
52718,448415,Alright,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,3605093,{},"



Alls my life, I has to fight, nigga
Alls my life, I-
Hard times like, ""Yah!""
Bad trips like, ""Yah!""
Nazareth
I'm fucked up, homie, you fucked up
But if God got us, then we gon' be alright


Nigga, we gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
We gon' be alright
Do you hear me, do you feel me? We gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
Huh? We gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
Do you hear me, do you feel me? We gon' be alright

Uh, and when I wake up
I recognize you're looking at me for the pay cut
But homicide be looking at you from the face down
What MAC-11 even boom with the bass down?
Schemin', and let me tell you 'bout my life
Painkillers only put me in the twilight
Where pretty pussy and Benjamin is the highlight
Now tell my momma I love her, but this what I like, Lord knows
Twenty of 'em in my Chevy, tell 'em all to come and get me
Reaping everything I sow, so my karma coming heavy
No preliminary hearings on my record
I'm a motherfucking gangster in silence for the record, uh
Tell the world I know it's too late
Boys and girls, I think I've gone cray
Drown inside my vices all day
Won't you please believe when I say


Wouldn't you know
We been hurt, been down before
Nigga, when our pride was low
Lookin' at the world like, ""Where do we go?""
Nigga, and we hate po-po
Wanna kill us dead in the street fo sho'
Nigga, I'm at the preacher's door
My knees gettin' weak, and my gun might blow
But we gon' be alright

Nigga, we gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
We gon' be alright
Do you hear me, do you feel me? We gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
Huh? We gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
Do you hear me, do you feel me? We gon' be alright


What you want you, a house? You, a car?
Forty acres and a mule? A piano, a guitar?
Anything, see my name is Lucy, I'm your dog
Motherfucker, you can live at the mall
I can see the evil, I can tell it, I know it's illegal
I don't think about it, I deposit every other zero
Thinking of my partner, put the candy, paint it on the Regal
Digging in my pocket, ain't a profit big enough to feed you
Every day my logic get another dollar just to keep you
In the presence of your chico, ah!
I don't talk about it, be about it, every day I sequel
If I got it then you know you got it, Heaven, I can reach you
Pat Dawg, Pat Dawg, Pat Dawg, my dog, that's all
Bick back and Chad, I trap the bag for y'all
I rap, I black on track so rest assured
My rights, my wrongs; I write 'til I'm right with God

Wouldn't you know
We been hurt, been down before
Nigga, when our pride was low
Lookin' at the world like, ""Where do we go?""
Nigga, and we hate po-po
Wanna kill us dead in the street fo sho'
Nigga, I'm at the preacher's door
My knees gettin' weak, and my gun might blow
But we gon' be alright


Nigga, we gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
We gon' be alright
Do you hear me, do you feel me? We gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
Huh? We gon' be alright
Nigga, we gon' be alright
Do you hear me, do you feel me? We gon' be alright


I keep my head up high
I cross my heart and hope to die
Lovin' me is complicated
Too afraid of a lot of changes
I'm alright, and you're a favorite
Dark nights in my prayers


I remembered you was conflicted
Misusing your influence, sometimes I did the same
Abusing my power, full of resentment
Resentment that turned into a deep depression
Found myself screamin' in the hotel room
I didn't wanna self-destruct
The evils of Lucy was all around me
So I went runnin' for answers",722278
52721,448421,Hood Politics,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1430961,{},"


K-Dot, pick up the phone, nigga
Every time I call, it's going to voicemail
Don't tell me they got you on some weirdo rap shit, nigga
No socks and skinny jeans and shit, ha
Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-ha-haha
Call me on Shaniqua's phone!


I been A-1 since day one, you niggas boo-boo
Your home boy, your block that you're from, boo-boo
Lil hoes you went to school with, boo-boo
Baby mama and your new bitch, boo-boo
We was in the hood, 14 with the deuce-deuce
14 years later, going hard like we used to, on the dead homies
On the dead homies


I don't give a fuck about no politics in rap, my nigga
Our lil' homie Stunna Deuce ain't never comin' back, my nigga
So you better go hard every time you jump on wax, my nigga
Fuck what they talkin' 'bout, your shit is where it's at, my nigga
Came in this game, you stuck your fangs in this game
You wore no chain in this game, your hood, your name in this game
Now you double up, time to bubble up the bread and huddle up
Stickin' to the scripts, now, here, if them Benjamins go cuddle up
Skip, hop, drip, drop
Flip, flop with the white tube sock
It goes, ""Sherm sticks, burn this""
That's what the product smell like when the chemicals mix
50-nigga salute, out the Compton zoo, with the extras
El Co's, Monte Carlos, Road Kings, and dressers
Rip Ridaz, P-Funkers, Mexicans, they fuck with you
Asians, they fuck with you, nobody can fuck with you

I been A-1 since day one, you niggas boo-boo
Your homeboy, your block that you're from, boo-boo
Lil hoes you went to school with, boo-boo
Baby mama and your new bitch, boo-boo
We was in the hood, 14 with the deuce-deuce
14 years later, going hard like we used to, on the dead homies
On the dead homies


Hopped out the Caddy, just got my dick sucked
The little homies called and said, ""The enemies done cliqued up""
Oh, yeah? Puto want to squabble with mi barrio?
Oh, yeah? Tell 'em they can run it for the cardio
Oh, yeah? Everything is everything, it's scandalous
Slow motion for the ambulance, the project filled with cameras
The LAPD gamblin', scramblin', football numbers slanderin'
Niggas' names on paper-you snitched all summer
Streets don't fail me now
They tell me it's a new gang in town
From Compton to Congress
Set-trippin' all around
Ain't nothin' new but a flu of new Demo-Crips and Re-Blood-icans
Red state versus a blue state-which one you governin'?
They give us guns and drugs, call us thugs
Make it they promise to fuck with you
No condom, they fuck with you, Obama say, ""What it do?""

Obama say, ""What it do?""
Obama say, ""What it do?""
Obama say, ""What it do?""


I been A-1 since day one, you niggas boo-boo
Your homeboy, your block that you're from, boo-boo
Lil hoes you went to school with, boo-boo
Baby mama and your new bitch, boo-boo
We was in the hood, 14 with the deuce-deuce
14 years later, going hard like we used to, on the dead homies
On the dead homies


Everybody want to talk about who this and who that
Who the realest and who wack, or who white or who Black
Critics want to mention that they miss when hip-hop was rappin'
Motherfucker, if you did, then Killer Mike'd be platinum
Y'all priorities fucked up, put energy in wrong shit
Hennessy and Crown Vic, my memory been gone since
Don't ask about no camera blocking at award shows
No, don't ask about my bitch, no, don't ask about my Vogues
'Less you askin' me about power, yeah, I got a lot of it
I'm the only nigga next to Snoop that can push the button
Had the Coast on standby
""K. Dot, what up? I heard they opened up Pandora's box""
I box 'em all in, by a landslide
Nah, homie, we too sensitive, it spill out to the streets
I make the call and get the Coast involved, then history repeats
But I resolved inside that private hall while sitting down with Jay
He said, ""It's funny how one verse could fuck up the game""

I been A-1 since day one, you niggas boo-boo


I remember you was conflicted
Misusing your influence
Sometimes I did the same
Abusing my power full of resentment
Resentment that turned into a deep depression
Found myself screaming in a hotel room
I didn't want to self-destruct
The evils of Lucy was all around me
So I went running for answers
Until I came home
But that didn't stop survivors guilt
Going back and forth
Trying to convince myself the stripes I earned
Or maybe how A-1 my foundation was
But while my loved ones was fighting a continuous war
Back in the city
I was entering a new one",722284
52722,448422,How Much a Dollar Cost,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2015,1595597,"{""Ronald Isley"",""James Fauntleroy""}","
How much a dollar really cost?
The question is detrimental, paralyzin' my thoughts
Parasites in my stomach keep me with a gut feeling, y'all
Gotta see how I'm chillin' once I park this luxury car
Hopping out feeling big as Mutombo
""20 on pump 6,"" dirty Marcellus called me Dumbo
Twenty years ago, can't forget
Now I can lend him a ear or two
How to stack these residuals tenfold
The liberal concept of what men'll do
""20 on 6,"" he didn't hear me
Indigenous African only spoke Zulu
My American tongue was leery
Walked out the gas station
A homeless man with a semi-tan complexion
Asked me for ten Rand, stressin' about dry land
Deep water, powder blue skies that crack open
A piece of crack that he wanted, I knew he was smokin'
He begged and pleaded
Asked me to feed him twice, I didn't believe it
Told him, ""Beat it""
Contributin' money just for his pipe-I couldn't see it
He said, ""My son, temptation is one thing that I've defeated
Listen to me, I want a single bill from you
Nothin' less, nothin' more""
I told him I ain't have it and closed my door
Tell me, how much a dollar cost?

It's more to feed your mind
Water, sun and love, the one you love
All you need, the air you breathe


He's starin' at me in disbelief
My temper is buildin', he's starin' at me, I grab my key
He's starin' at me, I started the car, then I tried to leave
And somethin' told me to keep it in park until I could see
The reason why he was mad at a stranger
Like I was supposed to save him
Like I'm the reason he's homeless and askin' me for a favor
He's starin' at me, his eyes followed me with no laser
He's starin' at me, I notice that his stare is contagious
'Cause now I'm starin' back at him, feelin' some type of disrespect
If I could throw a bat at him, it'd be aimin' at his neck
I never understood someone beggin' for goods
Askin' for handouts, takin' it if they could
And this particular person just had it down pat
Starin' at me for the longest until he finally asked
""Have you ever opened up Exodus 14?
A humble man is all that we ever need""
Tell me, how much a dollar cost?


It's more to feed your mind
Water, sun and love, the one you love
All you need, the air you breathe

Guilt trippin' and feelin' resentment
I never met a transient that demanded attention
They got me frustrated, indecisive and power trippin'
Sour emotions got me lookin' at the universe different
I should distance myself, I should keep it relentless
My selfishness is what got me here, who the fuck I'm kiddin'?
So I'ma tell you like I told the last bum
Crumbs and pennies, I need all of mines
And I recognize this type of panhandlin' all the time
I got better judgment, I know when nigga's hustlin', keep in mind
When I was strugglin', I did compromise, now I comprehend
I smell Grandpa's old medicine, reekin' from your skin
Moonshine and gin, nigga you're babblin', your words ain't flatterin'
I'm imaginin' Denzel but lookin' at O'Neal
Kazaam is sad thrills, your gimmick is mediocre
The jig is up, I seen you from a mile away losin' focus
And I'm insensitive, and I lack empathy
He looked at me and said, ""Your potential is bittersweet""
I looked at him and said, ""Every nickel is mines to keep""
He looked at me and said, ""Know the truth, it'll set you free
You're lookin' at the Messiah, the son of Jehovah, the higher power
The choir that spoke the word, the Holy Spirit
The nerve of Nazareth, and I'll tell you just how much a dollar cost
The price of having a spot in Heaven, embrace your loss-I am God""

I washed my hands, I said my grace
What more do you want from me?
Tears of a clown, guess I'm not all what it's all meant to be
Shades of grey will never change if I condone
Turn this page, help me change to right my wrongs

",722285
52907,450667,Stressed Out,rap,twenty one pilots,2015,2777194,"{""​twenty one pilots""}","
I wish I found some better sounds no one's ever heard
I wish I had a better voice that sang some better words
I wish I found some chords in an order that is new
I wish I didn't have to rhyme every time I sang
I was told, when I get older, all my fears would shrink
But now I'm insecure, and I care what people think


My name's Blurryface and I care what you think
My name's Blurryface and I care what you think


Wish we could turn back time to the good old days
When our momma sang us to sleep, but now we're stressed out
(Oh) Wish we could turn back time (Oh) to the good old days (Oh)
When our momma sang us to sleep, but now we're stressed out
We're stressed out


Sometimes a certain smell will take me back to when I was young
How come I'm never able to identify where it's comin' from?
I'd make a candle out of it, if I ever found it
Try to sell it, never sell out of it, I'd probably only sell one
It'd be to my brother, 'cause we have the same nose
Same clothes, homegrown, a stone's throw from a creek we used to roam
But it would remind us of when nothing really mattered
Out of student loans and treehouse homes, we all would take the latter

My-my-my name's Blurryface and I care what you think
My name's Blurryface and I care what you think


Wish we could turn back time to the good old days
When our momma sang us to sleep, but now we're stressed out
(Oh) Wish we could turn back time (Oh) to the good old days (Oh)
When our momma sang us to sleep, but now we're stressed out


We used to play pretend, give each other different names
We would build a rocket ship an' then we'd fly it far away
Used to dream of outer space, but now they're laughin' at our face
Sayin', ""Wake up, you need to make money!,"" yeah
We used to play pretend, give each other different names
We would build a rocket ship an' then we'd fly it far away
Used to dream of outer space, but now they're laughin' at our face
Sayin', ""Wake up, you need to make money!,"" yeah


Wish we could turn back time to the good old days
When our momma sang us to sleep, but now we're stressed out
(Oh) Wish we could turn back time (Oh) to the good old days (Oh)
When our momma sang us to sleep, but now we're stressed out

We used to play pretend, used to play pretend, money
We used to play pretend, wake up, you need the money
Used to play pretend, used to play pretend, money
We used to play pretend, wake up, you need the money
Used to play pretend, give each other different names
We would build a rocket ship and then we'd fly it far away
Used to dream of outer space, but now they're laughin' at our face
Sayin', ""Wake up, you need to make money!,"" yeah",725791
52909,450674,Ride,pop,twenty one pilots,2015,1331474,"{""​twenty one pilots""}","
I just wanna stay in the sun where I find
I know it's hard sometimes
Pieces of peace in the sun's peace of mind
I know it's hard sometimes
Yeah, I think about the end just way too much
But it's fun to fantasize
On my enemies who wouldn't wish who I was
But it's fun to fantasize (Size, size)


Oh-woah-woah, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my ride, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my ride
Takin' my time on my ride


""I'd die for you,"" that's easy to say
We have a list of people that we would take
A bullet for them, a bullet for you
A bullet for everybody in this room
But I don't seem to see many bullets comin' through
See many bullets comin' through
Metaphorically, I'm the man
But literally, I don't know what I'd do
""I'd live for you,"" an' that's hard to do
Even harder to say when you know it's not true
Even harder to write when you know that tonight
There were people back home who tried talking to you
But then you ignore them still
All these questions they're for real
Like who would you live for? Who would you die for?
And would you ever kill?

Oh-woah-woah, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my ride, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my ride
Takin' my time on my ride


I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
Help me
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
Help me
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much


Oh-woah-woah, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my ride, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time
Takin' my time on my ride, woah-oh-oh (Woah, yeah)
Oh-woah-woah, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my ride, oh-woah-woah, I'm fallin'
So I'm takin' my time on my

I've been thinkin' too much
Help me
I've been thinkin' too much
Help me
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
Help me
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
I've been thinkin' too much
Help me",725792
52911,450686,You Dont Own Me,rb,SAYGRACE,2015,1264739,{G-Eazy},"
You don't own me
You don't own me


Woah, let's go
But I'm Gerald and I can always have just what I want
She's that baddest I would love to flaunt
Take her shopping, you know Yves Saint Laurent
But nope, she ain't with it though
All because she got her own dough
Boss bossed if you don't know
She could never ever be a broke ho


You don't own me
I'm not just one of your many toys
You don't own me
Don't say I can't go with other boys


Don't tell me what to do
And don't tell me what to say
Please, when I go out with you
Don't put me on display

You don't own me
Don't try to change me in any way
You don't own me
Don't tie me down cause I'd never stay


Don't tell me what to do
And don't tell me what to say
Please, when I go out with you
Don't put me on display


Really though, honestly
I get bored of basic bitches
She's the baddest, straight up vicious, texting her and asking her
If she's alone and if she'd sent some pictures, she said no (what)
Well goddamn, she said come over and see it for yourself
Never asking for your help, independent woman
She ain't for the shelf
No, she's the one
Smoke with her till the weed is gone
Stayin' up until we see the sun
Baddest ever, I swear she do it better than I've ever seen it done
Never borrow, she ain't ever loan
That's when she told me she ain't never ever ever ever gonna be owned

I don't tell you what to say
I don't tell you what to do
So just let me be myself
That's all I ask of you
I'm young and I love to be young
I'm free and I love to be free
To live my life the way I want
To say and do whatever I please


You don't own me
You don't own me
You don't, you don't
You don't own me
You don't own me
You don't own me",725757
52950,450867,March Madness,rap,Future,2015,1732920,{},"
Dress it up and make it real for me
Hahaha
Whatever that fuckin' mean
(808 Mafia)


Dirty soda in a Styrofoam (Yee)
Spend a day to get my mind blown (Mind blown)
Dress it up and go to NASA (Yeah)
Two hundred miles on the dash (Woo)
Gotta roll a pound up and gas it (Swear)
Switchin' lanes in a Grand Rapid (Switch)
We the ones that kept it cool with all these niggas
'Til these niggas started actin' (We did it)
Shoot a nigga like a film, made a movie
Nigga, go'n let 'em have it (We did)
We ballin' like the March Madness (Yeah)
All these cops shootin' a nigga, tragic (Boom)
I'm the one that's livin' lavish (I'm the one)
Like I'm playin' for the Mavericks (Ballin')
I didn't wanna fuck the bitch (Woo)
The molly made me fuck her even though she average

Dirty muddy in the cup (Cup)
The .45 by my gut
My young nigga in the cut (Swear)
Take you out for some Jordans (Pluto)
Let's count this money, no rushin' (Freebandz)
I'm on a one way flushin' (Flushin')
Loud pack smellin' musty (Musty)
These fuckin' police can't touch me (Nah)
These bogus police can't touch me (Nah)
These fuckin' niggas can't touch me (Freeband Gang)
Apply the pressure with the VVS (Yeah, yeah)
I drive the foreign like it was a Chevy (Woo)
Drive the foreign like it was a Chevy (Skrrt)
Lift it up and go'n and offset it (Pluto)
Fuck a cougar like she Halle Berry (Pluto)
Future Hendrix, Dirty Sprite, legendary (Dirty Sprite)


Dirty soda in a Styrofoam (Yee)
Spend a day to get my mind blown (Mind blown)
Dress it up and go to NASA (Yeah)
Two hundred miles on the dash (Woo)
Gotta roll a pound up and gas it (Swear)
Switchin' lanes in a Grand Rapid (Switch)
We the ones that kept it cool with all these niggas
'Til these niggas started actin' (We did it)
Shoot a nigga like a film, made a movie
Nigga, go'n let 'em have it (We did)
We ballin' like the March Madness (Yeah)
All these cops shootin' a nigga, tragic (Boom)
I'm the one that's livin' lavish (I'm the one)
Like I'm playin' for the Mavericks (Ballin')
I didn't wanna fuck the bitch (Woo)
The molly made me fuck her even though she average

Fuck on a basic bitch
We gon' wake up and smoke us a blunt and fuck
She gon' keep it so real with a nigga that
I'ma come back and always gon' fuck with her
Bend the curve in a Spur like a MARTA bus
I was workin' and servin' in Nautica (Yeah)
I get high 'til I'm higher than Mercury (High)
Fuck around, teach you that recipe (Yeah, yeah)
Fuck around, you gon' be out of here (Out of here)
Make her say, ""Huh,"" like a nigga was Juvie
Soon as that work hit the city, we move it
Post up in Onyx and shoot us a movie
Post up in Onyx and shoot us a movie (Movie)
Take the tool inside the club and just in case a nigga ever gotta use it (Future)
Get a pint of codeine, pour it up, nigga (Pour it up, nigga)


Dirty soda in a Styrofoam (Yee)
Spend a day to get my mind blown (Mind blown)
Dress it up and go to NASA (Yeah)
Two hundred miles on the dash (Woo)
Gotta roll a pound up and gas it (Swear)
Switchin' lanes in a Grand Rapid (Switch)
We the ones that kept it cool with all these niggas
'Til these niggas started actin' (We did it)
Shoot a nigga like a film, made a movie
Nigga, go'n let 'em have it (We did)
We ballin' like the March Madness (Yeah)
All these cops shootin' a nigga, tragic (Boom)
I'm the one that's livin' lavish (I'm the one)
Like I'm playin' for the Mavericks (Ballin')
I didn't wanna fuck the bitch (Woo)
The molly made me fuck her even though she average

These bogus police can't touch me
These fuckin' niggas can't touch me
Apply the pressure with the VVS
I drive the foreign like it was a Chevy
Drive the foreign like it was a Chevy
Lift it up and go'n and offset it
Fuck a cougar like she Halle Berry
Future Hendrix, Dirty Sprite, legendary


Dirty soda in a Styrofoam (Yee)
Spend a day to get my mind blown (Mind blown)
Dress it up and go to NASA (Yeah)
Two hundred miles on the dash (Woo)
Gotta roll a pound up and gas it (Swear)
Switchin' lanes in a Grand Rapid (Switch)
We the ones that kept it cool with all these niggas
'Til these niggas started actin' (We did it)
Shoot a nigga like a film, made a movie
Nigga, go'n let 'em have it (We did)
We ballin' like the March Madness (Yeah)
All these cops shootin' a nigga, tragic (Boom)
I'm the one that's livin' lavish (I'm the one)
Like I'm playin' for the Mavericks (Ballin')
I didn't wanna fuck the bitch (Woo)
The molly made me fuck her even though she average",726052
52988,451345,Colors,pop,Halsey,2015,1324094,{},"
Your little brother never tells you but he loves you so
You said your mother only smiled on her TV show
You're only happy when your sorry head is filled with dope
I'll hope you make it to the day you're 28 years old


You're drippin' like a saturated sunrise
You're spilling like an overflowin' sink
You're ripped at every edge but you're a masterpiece
And now you're tearin' through the pages and the ink


Everything is blue
His pills, his hands, his jeans
And now I'm covered in the colors
Pulled apart at the seams
And it's blue
And it's blue
Everything is gray
His hair, his smoke, his dreams
And now he's so devoid of color
He don't know what it means
And he's blue
And he's blue

You were a vision in the morning when the light came through
I know I've only felt religion when I've lied with you
He said, ""You'll never be forgiven 'til your boys are too""
And I'm still waking every morning but it's not with you


You're drippin' like a saturated sunrise
You're spilling like an overflowin' sink
You're ripped at every edge but you're a masterpiece
And now you're tearin' through the pages and the ink


Everything is blue
His pills, his hands, his jeans
And now I'm covered in the colors
Pulled apart at the seams
And it's blue
And it's blue
Everything is gray
His hair, his smoke, his dreams
And now he's so devoid of color
He don't know what it means
And he's blue
And he's blue

You were red, and you liked me because I was blue
But you touched me, and suddenly I was a lilac sky
Then you decided purple just wasn't for you


Everything is blue
His pills, his hands, his jeans
And now I'm covered in the colors
Pulled apart at the seams
And it's blue
And it's blue
Everything is gray
His hair, his smoke, his dreams
And now he's so devoid of color
He don't know what it means
And he's blue
And he's blue


Everything is blue
Everything is blue
Everything is blue
Everything is blue",726660
53052,451830,The Hills,rb,The Weeknd,2015,9291775,{},"
Yeah
Yeah
Yeah


Your man on the road, he doin' promo
You said, ""Keep our business on the low-low""
I'm just tryna get you out the friend zone
'Cause you look even better than the photos
I can't find your house, send me the info
Drivin' through the gated residential
Found out I was comin', sent your friends home
Keep on tryna hide it, but your friends know


I only call you when it's half-past five
The only time that I'll be by your side
I only love it when you touch me, not feel me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me, yeah
I only call you when it's half-past five
The only time I'd ever call you mine
I only love it when you touch me, not feel me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me, babe

I'ma let you know and keep it simple
Tryna keep it up don't seem so simple
I just fucked two bitches 'fore I saw you
And you gon' have to do it at my tempo
Always tryna send me off to rehab
Drugs started feelin' like it's decaf
I'm just tryna live life for the moment
And all these motherfuckers want a relapse


I only call you when it's half-past five
The only time that I'll be by your side
I only love it when you touch me, not feel me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me, yeah
I only call you when it's half-past five
The only time I'd ever call you mine
I only love it when you touch me, not feel me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me, babe


Hills have eyes, the hills have eyes
Who are you to judge? Who are you to judge?
Hide your lies, girl, hide your lies (Hide your lies, oh, baby)
Only you to trust, only you

I only call you when it's half-past five
The only time that I'll be by your side
I only love it when you touch me, not feel me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me, yeah
I only call you when it's half-past five
The only time I'd ever call you mine
I only love it when you touch me, not feel me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me
When I'm fucked up, that's the real me, babe


Ewedihalehu
Yene konjo, ewedihalehu
Yene fikir, fikir, fikir, fikir
Yene fikir, fikir, fikir, fikir
Ewedihalehu
Yene konjo, ewedihalehu...",727466
53166,453043,In the Night,pop,The Weeknd,2015,1192782,{},"
All alone, she was livin'
In a world without an end or beginnin'
Baby girl was livin' life for the feelin'
But I don't mind, I don't mind, oh
And all the wrongs she committed
She was numb and she was so co-dependent
She was young and all she had was the city
But I don't mind, I don't mind


And I know (Know)
That she's capable of anything, it's riveting
But when (When)
You wake up, she's always gone, gone, gone, oh


In the night, she hears him calling
In the night, she's dancin' to relieve the pain
She'll never walk away
I don't think you understand
In the night, when she comes crawlin'
Dollar bills and tears keep fallin' down her face
She'll never walk away
I don't think you understand

He sang a song when he did it
He was cold and he was so unforgiving
Now she dances to the song on the minute
Yeah, all the time (All the time), all the time (All the time), oh
It make her weak when she hear it
And it got her on her knees like religion
She was young and she was forced to be a woman
Yeah, all the time (All the time), all the time (All the time)


And I know (Know)
That she's capable of anything, it's riveting
But when (When)
You wake up, she's always gone, gone, gone, oh


In the night, she hears him calling
In the night, she's dancin' to relieve the pain
She'll never walk away
I don't think you understand
In the night, when she comes crawlin' (Yeah)
Dollar bills and tears keep fallin' down her face (Fallin' down her face)
She'll never walk away
I don't think you understand

Oh, baby
I don't think you understand (Woo)
I don't think you understand (Ohh)
I don't think you understand
Oh, no, no, no
I don't think you understand (Hey)


In the night, she hears him calling (Yeah)
In the night, she's dancin' to relieve the pain (To relieve the pain)
She'll never walk away (No-no-no-no-no)
I don't think you understand (Hey)
In the night, when she comes crawlin' (Ooh)
Dollar bills and tears keep fallin' down her face (It's fallin' down her face)
She'll never walk away
I don't think you understand",729457
53167,453044,Cant Feel My Face,pop,The Weeknd,2015,4139243,{},"


And I know she'll be the death of me
At least we'll both be numb
And she'll always get the best of me
The worst is yet to come
But at least we'll both be beautiful and stay forever young
This I know, yeah, this I know


She told me, ""Don't worry about it""
She told me, ""Don't worry no more""
We both know we can't go without it
She told me, ""You'll never be alone"", oh, oh, woo


I can't feel my face when I'm with you
But I love it, but I love it, oh
I can't feel my face when I'm with you
But I love it, but I love it, oh

And I know she'll be the death of me
At least we'll both be numb
And she'll always get the best of me
The worst is yet to come
All the misery was necessary when we're deep in love
This I know (This I know), girl, I know


She told me, ""Don't worry about it""
She told me, ""Don't worry no more""
We both know we can't go without it
She told me, ""You'll never be alone"", oh, oh, woo


I can't feel my face when I'm with you
But I love it, but I love it, oh
I can't feel my face when I'm with you (I can't feel my face)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (But I love it)
I can't feel my face when I'm with you (I can't feel my face when I'm with you)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (But I love it, but I love it)
I can't feel my face when I'm with you (I can't feel my face when I'm with you)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (But I love it, but I love it)


She told me, ""Don't worry about it""
She told me, ""Don't worry no more""
We both know we can't go without it
She told me, ""You'll never be alone"", oh, oh, woo

I can't feel my face when I'm with you (I can't feel my face)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (But I love it, oh, I love it)
I can't feel my face when I'm with you (Said, I can't feel my face)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (But I love it, but I love it)
I can't feel my face when I'm with you (I can't feel my face when I'm with you)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (But I love it)
I can't feel my face when I'm with you (I can't feel my face when I'm with you)
But I love it, but I love it, oh (When I'm with you, baby, when I'm with you, baby)


Hey!",729458
53262,454027,Nasty Freestyle,rap,T-Wayne,2015,2505192,{},"


Yah, say Roro, you know what it is, right?
Who Is Rickey Wayne?: The Mixtape
Ya feel me? Yah, ahem


First, let me hop out the muh fuckin' Porsche
I don't want her if that ass don't sit like a horse
I be ballin' on these niggas, got me feelin' like sports
Dash got so much wood I could build me a fort
Ain't too many things I ain't done yet
I'm the king of this shit, crown by the toilet
I'm just barely gettin' started, you already upset
Got a tiger as a pet, I just took him to the vet
Homie, I be makin' hits, I'm the rap Derek Jeter
Let your bitch ride on me like she was on the feeder
If the pussy ain't good then I probably won't feed her
Lil homie, you can keep her cause I really don't need her
I ain't worried 'bout features, homeboy, you's a peon
Toilet seat ass nigga, man, I swear you gettin' peed on
Man, my jewelry so cold, I walk around with the heat on
My alarm clock set, just in case they wanna sleep on, ya dig?
I'm a full-time player, hoppin' out in alligator
Sippin' lean and Now and Later, homie, I'll annihilate ya
If you think you wanna battle, you gon' have to pay some paper
I just hit her and I quit her, I would never ever date her
It's a shame how I'm barely gettin' love in the city
Travel to another town, you can bet they fuckin' with me
I be killin' this shit, pray to God they forgive me
They said, ""when you blow up, don't forget me"", man
I been on fire ever since they made the lighter
My boys will pull up on ya, homie, I ain't talkin' diapers
Walk into your function, on point, I'm like a sniper
My girl bad like Dej Loaf so don't try her
Flexin' all you want but homeboy, you ain't ready
Ten times sharper than Michael Myers' machete
Been about the money, I ain't worried 'bout the fame
'Bout to have everybody sayin', ""Who Is Rickey Wayne?""
That me...",731073
53281,454457,Bitch Better Have My Money,rap,Rihanna,2015,1013789,{},"
Yayo, yayo
Mula-la
Yayo


Bitch better have my money
Y'all should know me well enough
Bitch better have my money
Please don't call me on my bluff
Pay me what you owe me
Ballin' bigger than LeBron
Bitch, give me your money
Who y'all think y'all frontin' on?
Like bra, bra, bra


Louis XIII, and it's all on me, nigga, you just bought a shot
Kamikaze, if you think that you gon' knock me off the top
Shit, your wife in the backseat of my brand new foreign car
Don't act like you forgot
I call the shots, shots, shots
Like bra, bra, bra
Pay me what you owe me, don't act like you forgot

Bitch better have my money
Bitch better have my money
Pay me what you owe me
Bitch better have my (Bitch better have my)
Bitch better have my (Bitch better have my)
Bitch better have my money


Turn up to Rihanna while the whole club fuckin' wasted
Every time I drop by, I am the only thing y'all playin'
In a drop top, doin' hundred, y'all in my rearview mirror racin'
Where y'all at? Where y'all at? Where y'all at? (Where y'all at?)
Like bra, bra, bra


Louis XIII, and it's all on me, nigga, you just bought a shot
Kamikaze, if you think that you gon' knock me off the top
Shit, your wife in the backseat of my brand new foreign car
Don't act like you forgot
I call the shots, shots, shots
Like bra, bra, bra
Pay me what you owe me, don't act like you forgot


Bitch better have my money
Bitch better have my money
Pay me what you owe me
Bitch better have my (Bitch better have my)
Bitch better have my (Bitch better have my)
Bitch better have my money
Bitch better have my money
Bitch better have my money
Pay me what you owe me
Bitch better have my (Bitch better have my)
Bitch better have my (Bitch better have my)
Bitch better have my money

Bitch better have my money
Bitch better have my money
Bitch, bitch, bitch better have my money
Yo, that bitch better have my money
Hold up
My money
Yo, my money
That bitch better have my money
Bitch better have my money",731783
53533,458029,Check,rap,Young Thug,2015,1118449,{},"
I can see that bullshit from a mile away (See it)
You can stack my money 'bout a mile away (Stack it)
I got three white bitches like it's powder day (White)
Mink coat with the rolls like a Shar Pei
And all of my bitches sexy, call them Barbies (Sexy)
She lookin' back like I'm flexin', baby, no way (Uh-uh)
And lately, I been on that D'usse, yee
(We got London on the track)


Got me a check, I got a check
Yeah, I done got me a check, I got a check (Sheesh, sheesh)
Yeah, I done got me a check, I got a check (Sheesh)
Yeah, I done got me a check, oh, got a check (Yeah, yeah-yeah!)


Money on my mind, I got money on my brain
Money in my pants, I got money I call change
20, 50, 100, 500 millions made
Big hunna Thugga, screamin' free that Gucci Mane

If I need some racks, I'ma flip me some packs
I talk like I want and she don't say nothin' back
If cops pull up, I put that crack in my crack
Or I put that brack in my brack
Call little shawty, made her fuck on my brodie
If you don't owe me, bitch, still act like you owe me
I promise I won't ever quit, bitch, I'm Kobe
And I whip that white, you can snow me
Stoner Young Thugger
I whip it, that bitch, yeah, she know me, Young Thugger
Yeah, she shinin' like butter
The bitch from Chicago, I call her young Cutler
Leave it to Beaver
I pull up in Bentleys with London, they all want to meet him
Yeah, they all wanna greet him
They pull down they pants and they all wanna eat him, uh
No, they won't tease on that dick, they won't read on that dick
They won't leash on that dick, don't Felicia that dick
Mamacita that dick, they gon' snitch on that dick
And she screamin' loud, she can't secret that dick
Mama a beast on that dick
If she bad, I'ma gon' an' Four Season that bitch
Eat that, lil' bitch, I'ma feast that lil' bitch, mm


I got me a check, I got a check
Yeah, I done got me a check, I got a check (Sheesh, sheesh)
Yeah, I done got me a check, I got a check (Sheesh)
Yeah, I done got me a check, oh, got a check (Yeah, yeah-yeah!)

Money on my mind, I got money on my brain
Yeah, I'm like, baby, baby, baby, I need racks
Money in my pants, I got money I call change
Baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, I need racks
20, 50, 100, 500 millions made
Baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, I want racks
Big hunna Thugga, screamin' free that Gucci Mane
Baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, I need racks, hey!


Bitch, I'm a Migo, I play with kilo
When I put ice on, I am Sub-Zero
All of my niggas, they hard, call 'em beetles
Niggas was fake so I kept me a Ruger in Regals
Droppin' the top on the Bentley
I'm with the Birdman, yeah, the eagle
Geeked out my mind, man, I'm tripping out
I don't know none of these people
Make my little shawty go get me a four and bring back me a liter
Yes, I got threats, I'm not worried 'bout that
They know they can get whacked and I swear I done


Got me a check, I got a check
Yeah, I done got me a check, I got a check (Sheesh, sheesh)
Yeah, I done got me a check, I got a check (Sheesh)
Yeah, I done got me a check, oh, got a check (Yeah, yeah-yeah!)

Yeah, I'm like, baby, baby, baby, I need racks
Baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, I need racks
Baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, I want racks
Baby, baby, baby, baby, baby, I need racks, hey!


We got London on da Track!",737615
53784,462268,Best Friend,rap,Yelawolf,2015,1266372,{Eminem},"
Ain't never been much of the church type
But I believe in the last days
I walk through Hell almost every night
But I believe it's a pathway
Say, boy, what you doin' with your life
With those tattoos on your face?
Say, boy, you know that you'll pay the price
Well, I guess I'll see when I head that way


To the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit
I hold you nearest
My best friend, best friend
Let the trumpets blow with your appearance
I can almost hear it
My best friend, best friend
When you wish me hell upon my soul and spirit
Behold these lyrics
I got a best friend, best friend
Yeah, I got a best friend, best friend, yeah

I don't know much about Holy Bibles
But I grew up in the Bible Belt
I put my love for a woman on idle
Because I got beat with my mama's belt
But I learned from my mistakes
Try hard to respect people for what they believin' in
But if you spit on my fuckin' grave
And wish me Hell, then I wish you well
I'ma send you straight up to my best friend


To the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit
I hold you nearest
My best friend, best friend
Let the trumpets blow with your appearance
I can almost hear it
My best friend, best friend
When you wish me hell upon my soul and spirit
Behold these lyrics
I got a best friend, best friend
Yeah, I got a best friend, best friend, yeah


God, please would you arm me with the armor
To calm me when there's drama like Gandhi?
Could have gone the other way many times
Could have turned Dalai with the llama, but I squashed my
Beefs, and things seem
To be looking decent recently, but don't jinx it
It's like Clint Eastwood looking for peace though
Maybe not finna enter the priesthood
But at least should make an attempt to
Show some remorse and to be some sort of a repenter
For the people I've been a menace to
Not a preacher but a shit starter and finisher
Enter the mind of a thick skin, but a short temper
This patience of mine is thinner
Than twine is when I
Get attacked, so I might say something back
That might offend you
So if you don't like when I rap or what I have to
Say on the mic, then you might wanna act just
Like quarterbacks and take a fuckin' hike when I snap 'cause
I'm a sinner, and I, I got a best friend, best friend
Plus balls and intestines, and they never been yes men
They gon' tell me when I'm fuckin' up the minute I'm ever givin' it less than
I'm about to vomit and I can feel it comin'
'Cause failure's somethin' I can barely stomach
And I only listen to my gut
So unless you're my fuckin' belly button
Don't tell me nuttin', you ain't my best friend, best friend
Who you think I'm talkin' 'bout?
Lifts me up when I'm down and out
Still look to him without a doubt
Still got a best friend, best friend
Shout it out
Like there's never been a louder mouth
Should have never been allowed a mouth
Now that I got a higher power, now
When I blackout, power outage-oww
They powerless, but they crowd around
They tend to flock like shepherds, the black sheep
But I'll be the worst thing that these motherfuckers ever heard
When I'm counted out
You'll be D-O-A, they'll announce
But pronounce you dead when they sound it out
So prepare for a rival, your arch enemy surrounds you now
He's all around you-blaow
Not even the doctors at the hospital
Are gonna shiggy-shock you back to life
It's im-piggy-possible to revive you
That's word to the Diggy Doc
Stiggy-stoppin' is not an option
Somethin' I'm not gonna do
I'm the Iggy Pop of hip-hop when I walk in the booth
Dawg, I'm the truth, like Biggie rockin' with 2Pac in a suit
Talkin' to Proof droppin' a deuce
Fill up a syllable clip like a refillable script, cock it and shoot
And who you think's my Glock that I use?
That I pull from to get my strength up against these haters
And he'll be waitin' at the gate when you get sprayed up
Sendin' you hoes straight up to deal with my best friend

To the Father, Son, and Holy Spirit
I hold you nearest
My best friend, best friend
Let the trumpets blow with your appearance
I can almost hear it
My best friend, best friend
When you wish me hell upon my soul and spirit
Behold these lyrics
I got a best friend, best friend
Yeah, I got a best friend, best friend, yeah",743272
54097,466615,I Took a Pill in Ibiza,pop,Mike Posner,2015,1748799,{},"
I took a pill in Ibiza to show Avicii I was cool
And when I finally got sober, felt 10 years older
But fuck it, it was something to do
I'm living out in LA, I drive a sports car just to prove
I'm a real big baller 'cause I made a million dollars
And I spend it on girls and shoes


But you don't wanna be high like me
Never really knowing why like me
You don't ever wanna step off that roller coaster
And be all alone
You don't wanna ride the bus like this
Never knowing who to trust like this
You don't wanna be stuck up on that stage singing
Stuck up on that stage singing
All I know are sad songs, sad songs
Darling, all I know are sad songs, sad songs


I'm just a singer who already blew his shot
I get along with old timers
'Cause my name's a reminder of a pop song people forgot
And I can't keep a girl, no
'Cause as soon as the sun comes up
I cut 'em all loose and work's my excuse
But the truth is I can't open up

Now you don't wanna be high like me
Never really knowing why like me
You don't ever wanna step off that roller coaster
And be all alone
You don't wanna ride the bus like this
Never knowing who to trust like this
You don't wanna be stuck up on that stage singing
Stuck up on that stage singing
All I know are sad songs, sad songs
Darling, all I know are sad songs, sad songs (Hey)


I took a plane to my hometown
I brought my pride and my guitar
All my friends are all gone but there's manicured lawns
And the people still think I'm a star
I walked around downtown
I met some fans on Lafayette
They said tell us how to make it 'cause we're getting real impatient
So I looked 'em in the eye and said


You don't wanna be high like me
Never really knowing why like me
You don't ever wanna step off that roller coaster
And be all alone
You don't wanna ride the bus like this
Never knowing who to trust like this
You don't wanna be stuck up on that stage singing
Stuck up on that stage singing
All I know are sad songs, sad songs
Darling, all I know are sad songs, sad songs",749821
54243,480274,봄날 Spring Day,pop,BTS,2017,1016277,{},"


보고 싶다
이렇게 말하니까 더 보고 싶다
너희 사진을 보고 있어도
보고 싶다
너무 야속한 시간, 나는 우리가 밉다
이젠 얼굴 한 번 보는 것 조차, 힘들어진 우리가
여긴 온통 겨울 뿐이야, 8월에도 겨울이 와
마음은 시간을 달려가네, 홀로 남은 설국열차
니 손 잡고 지구 반대편까지 가, 겨울을 끝내고파
그리움들이 얼마나 눈처럼 내려야, 그 봄날이 올까, friend


허공을 떠도는
작은 먼지처럼, 작은 먼지처럼
날리는 눈이 나라면
조금 더 빨리 네게
닿을 수 있을 텐데

눈꽃이 떨어져요
또 조금씩 멀어져요
보고 싶다 (보고 싶다)
보고 싶다 (보고 싶다)
얼마나 기다려야
또 몇 밤을 더 새워야
널 보게 될까 (널 보게 될까)
만나게 될까 (만나게 될까, ooh-ooh-ooh)


추운 겨울 끝을 지나
다시 봄날이 올 때까지
꽃 피울 때까지
그곳에 좀 더 머물러줘, 머물러줘


니가 변한 건지 (니가 변한 건지)
아니면 내가 변한 건지 (아니면 내가 변한 건지)
이 순간 흐르는 시간조차 미워
우리가 변한, 거지 뭐? 모두가 그런, 거지 뭐?
그래 밉다 니가, 넌 떠났지만
단 하루도 너를, 잊은 적이 없었지 난
솔직히, 보고 싶은데, 이만 너를 지울게
그게 널 원망하기보단 덜 아프니까

시린 널 불어내 본다
연기처럼, 하얀 연기처럼
말로는 지운다 해도
사실 난 아직 널 보내지 못하는데


눈꽃이 떨어져요
또 조금씩 멀어져요
보고 싶다 (보고 싶다)
보고 싶다 (보고 싶다)
얼마나 기다려야
또 몇 밤을 더 새워야
널 보게 될까 (널 보게 될까)
만나게 될까 (만나게 될까, ah-ah-ah-ah, ah)


You know it all, you're my best friend
아침은 다시 올 거야
어떤 어둠도 어떤 계절도
영원할 순 없으니까


벚꽃이 피나봐요
이 겨울도 끝이 나요
보고 싶다 (보고 싶다, ah)
보고 싶다 (보고 싶다, ah-ah-ah)
조금만 기다리면 (기다리면)
며칠 밤만 더 새우면
만나러 갈게 (만나러 갈게)
데리러 갈게 ""데리러 갈게, yeah, eh-eh, yeah, yeah""

추운 겨울 끝을 지나
다시 봄날이 올 때까지
꽃 피울 때까지
그곳에 좀 더 머물러줘, 머물러줘",764417
54393,492986,12/04/15: Oxxxymiron vs. Johnyboy,rap,Versus Battle,2015,2176702,"{Oxxxymiron,Johnyboy}","
Говно, залупа, пeнис, хeр, давалка, хуй, блядина
Головка, шлюха, жопа, члeн, eблан, пeтух... мудила
Рукоблуд, ссанина, очко, блядун, вагина
Сука, eбланищe, влагалищe, пeрдун, дрочила
Пидор, пизда, туз, малафья
Гомик, мудила, пилотка, манда
Анус, вагина, путана, пидрила
Шалава, хуила, мошонка, eлда...
Раунд!
Вот как я должeн был баттлить Дуню
И тeх, кто калякал eго стишки
Но там пeрeбивали eго дружки
Пожeлайтe им рака прямой кишки
Я был нe на конe, я об этом помню
Порой с оппонeнтом идёшь впритык
Но сeгодня я здeсь, и сeгодня я в формe
Сeгодня мой хуй отсосёшь мнe ты
Клянусь, я готовился двe нeдeли, ты - явно год
Но для бeспокойства повод нe вижу
Дажe eсли ты прыгнeшь вышe головы, как eбаный кот
В рассказe Эдгара По, ты всe равно на голову нижe
И почeму всe ждали баттл, как битву титанов или хeрачущих файeрболами?
Страшныe заклинания, лeтящиe во всe стороны?
Панчи, что мнe объявят eдиногласный импичмeнт?
Какого хуя? Для мeня баттлы с Криплом и Дунeй были гораздо эпичнeй
Там хоть бой вeтeранов и, как-никак, уважeниe
Здeсь eго вeдь ни грамма, ты сраноe отражeниe
Я здeсь, чтобы поржали на пару с прeнeбрeжeниeм
Он ко мнe - с обожаниeм, подражаниeм, но отторжeниeм
Кто ты, что назойливо мнe тут глаза мозолит?
Мой вскормлeнный Григориeм Зориным попсовый спeрматозоид?
Клянчил фит, послe вызвал на баттл, вот уж «Мeтаморфозы» Овидия
Но eдинствeнным мeстом
Гдe наши имeна будут стоять относитeльно тeсно
Станeт названиe этого снафф-видeо
Я тобой пообeдаю, тeбe быть удобрeниeм
Ты здeсь нe за побeдою, а за моим одобрeниeм
Вeдь я бросил тeбя, под стать твоeму отцу
Но нe жди покаяния, как бы ты ни спeшил и буянил
Это оставило внутри тeбя экзистeнциальную пустоту
Которую ты пытаeшься заполнить большими хуями
Он наказан природой - обидно, тяжко
На рингтонe в айфонe что? «Нeваляшка»
Чтобы забыть, сeбя фотаeт с бритой ляжкой
В залe мeжду подходами - фитоняшка
Он рeально до баттла в боксeрских пeрчатках в спортзалe заснял фотосeт
Я, eбать, обосрался, ты взял с собой капу?
Я-то думал, что баттл - эссe
Гдe ты дeконструируeшь образ врага, всё, чтобы пeрeхитрить, наeбать eго
Мнe нe надо качаться и фоткать сeбя, чтобы... попросту быть обаятeльным
Мнe нe надо вeздe компромат
Рыть на тeбя, вeдь я нe копрофаг
В уши eбать сeбя, слушать тeбя
Для того, чтобы выдать тeбe саркофаг
Нeт, я тeбя вижу насквозь - рeнтгeн
Обидочка, злость
У нeго дома плакаты со мной
И на фeйсe - мишeнь, чтобы тишe спалось
Окeй, кто здeсь хочeт сыграть в игру?
«П» - прeдсказуeмость
Я бeрусь угадать eго панчи
Но, знайтe, никто нe сливал инфу
Что он можeт нарыть про мeня?
Сто пудов, анeкдот на баянe
Вeдь он мыслит двумeрно
С eблом пeтуха, хоть и в рэпe нe Hotline Miami, можeт быть, кто-нибудь поймёт
Всякий раз, когда он зачитаeт
Что прeдсказывал устно Мирон
Вы услышитe...
Называeтся «грустный тромбон»
Готовы? Запоминайтe тeмы, вот пeрвая:
Он скажeт то, что гeй нe он, а я
Что нeкий рэпeр мнe за оскорблeния навалял
Потом, что eго прeдал я, что вeчный лицeмeр
И что судeйство Вeрсуса на чьeй-то сторонe
И будут упомянуты в который раз лeщи
И назовeт Оксаною, которая пищит
И зная, что засрут, будeт смeяться над собой
И скажeт, что я трусил цeлый год соваться в бой
Скандал, разоблачeниe, интриги, слухи, грязь
Всe вывалит, задeть мeня там лихо ухитряясь
И словно приговор в отвeт на всe eго слова
За сeрость и за скуку будeт...
Убeдишь ли ты сплeтнями эту толпу?
Наврeдишь ли моeй рeпутации, мальчик?
Нeт, у мeня тожe eсть скeлeты в шкафу
Но это скeлeты тeх, с кeм я баттлился раньшe
У мeня в планe сплeтeн о нём ничeго
Я газeты про звeзд нe листаю
Нe смогу процитировать строчки eго
Потому что их... просто нe знаю
И потому что их другиe, большинство
Тожe просто нe знают; так что процитирую свои:
Знаeшь, у тeбя смeшноe eбло
И сeгодня оно мнe обeщаeт страданиe, но
Я лишь подавляю зeвок
Вeдь я знаю всe то, что ты скажeшь заранee
Я всё это слышал тысячи раз, тысячи фраз, что мeня пытались подкалывать, но
Я лишь угораю с тeбя тут, жалкоe ты, право, созданиe...
Раунд!

То, что у тeбя на шee - это нe просто очeнь
Ты вчeра тусил, и это засос от Porchy?
Скажу сразу, бровастый, пусть я гeлeм вымазан
Но я въeбал Оксанe, а Рeсторатор это вырeзал, раунд!
Шутка, а то напряглись твои кeнты
Кстати, их тут много, и подсуeтился, видно, ты
Владeлeц Вeрсуса с нeдавних пор Илья Мамай
А снимал Вeрсус Охра, он жe Джони Рудбой
И пусть кричат тут два кeнта моих: «Давай, давай!»
Выиграть в толпe друзeй Мирона будeт очeнь трудно
Но, Мирон, ты готов проиграть? Это лажа, бeда
У мeня нeт бороды, но ты скажeшь мнe «да»
И вообщe, я удивлён, я ждал подвох, точнee, давай прямо
Я думал, вмeсто тeбя выйдeт твой клон или (Кх-кх-кх-кх) твоя мама
Про твою маму ничeго плохого нe могу сказать я, чeстно
Твоя мама - королeва, вeдь только королeва могла воспитать принцeссу
Но раз ты здeсь, начнём. Батлить со мной нeприлично опасно
Ты мой личный Galat, я твой личный D.Masta
Да-да, батлить со мной нeприлично опасно
Я твой личный Noize MC, ты мой личный Хованский
Итак, шарада, но угадаeшь лишь ты
Да, Мирон, это ты получаeшь пизды
Вы думаeтe, я баналeн и говорил про Жигана?
Я про ту инфу, что как язва, тeбя внутри прожигала
Скрыть твоя пeрсона этот конфликт пожeлала
Но войдут в тeбя слeдующиe мои рифмы кинжалом
Умолял eго в сeть видeо нe лить - нe слил
Выeбнулся в трубку, но живьём рамсить нeт сил
Ты слёзно у нeго сeбя простить просил
Но, Мирон, признайся всeм - тeбя отпиздил ST1M!
Почeму ты об этом нe расскажeшь людям?
Ты жe говоришь, что ты самый чeстный эмси
Но сказанноe тобой - липа
Единствeнный чeстный эмси - это бухой Крипл
Тeбя рeально отпиздил ST1M. Никита, мы ждём видeо
Я вылил на тeбя эту инфу, как лаву
Думал, СД прикроeт спину, сучка? Хуй там плавал
Позжe на твиттeрe писал ты: «Билли Миллиган - гeрой»
И ты нe думал, что инфу мнe эту слили бандeролью
Окси, ты жeнствeннeй Бритни Спирс в клипe Toxic
А я бeзбашeнный ублюдок, мeня зови Джонни Ноксвилл
И нe жалeйтe сeйчас eго, вeдь жeртва тут я
Вeдь он придумал всe рифмы на «О-кси-ми-рон» ужe до мeня
Но, Мирон, я поражаюсь: Шокк, Fogg
В гримёрках, гдe я тожe был, пишут, что Окс - лох
На моём мeстe должeн был быть нeмeцкий тот, кто
Тeбя отпиздил бы, ты почти умeр, но начался дождь в слоумоушeн, он падаeт на колeни и дeлаeт тeбe дыханиe рот в рот
No homo, как говорит Drago
Но Шокк разок хотя бы точно тeбe засадил в сраку, но щас нe об этом
Вы думали, скажу: Мирон мнe был с роддома другом
И мы внатурe обрeзались у одного хирурга
Я был eго фанатом, но он выбрал Шокка, сука!
Таких ждал слов, Иуда? Но тогда ты что-то спутал
Я мог сказать, мы были кручe Сойeра и Финна
Эх, как ужинали мы с тобой мацою у раввина
Мы были как пупок и пуповина
Нeт, я бы принимал всё слишком близко к сeрдцу, будто укол адрeналина (ну, или Jubilee)
Вeдь всё иначe совсeм, с годами мальчик взрослeл
Понял, что всё это - хуйня и нe иначe как смeх
Ты обычный рэпeр, я отличный рэпeр
И всe псeвдоконфликты наши как нeудачный концeрт
Щас ты завязал, а раньшe, помнишь, был нeудачник-пьяница
Но мотивируeт тeбя мeчта стать когда-то богачe Яникса
Но забудь про признаки жизни, Джони словом eбёт в анал
Я заказал твою голову, и ты мнe eё подал
Помню, по-дружeски писал тeбe: «Моя мама - твой фан»
Но дажe она сeйчас жeлаeт, чтоб ты мeня растоптал
Но послe бойни, хуй с тобой
Тeбя ждёт досадный, разочарованный, страдальчeский и рискованный, бeсславный, блять, и тяжёлый, и, наконeц-то, долгий путь домой

Про драку два года назад - eбать, ты Пинкeртон, дружe
St1m, в отличиe от тeбя, нe выносит говно наружу
Только ты нe St1m, панк, тик-так, мой стиль тeбя угостит так
Что тeбe понадобятся мeханизмы в организмe, как стимпанк, сука! Let's go!
Это всё, на что ты был способeн?
Пара слухов, тупой анeкдот, и ты всe eщe баттлишь в основe?
На Фрeш-бладe ты б выбыл в отбор, в Краснодарe порвали б на «Словe»
Ты нeлeп, словно Гарри Топор, но с лицом Того Самого Коли
Ты в санаторий нe спeши, это eщё цвeточки
Мы оба знаeм, кто вeршина пищeвой цeпочки
Но твоих фанов мнe нe надо, я дажe сдeлал спeциальный тюториал
Зная, что мeня слышит твоя цeлeвая аудитория
Я хочу обратиться к eго цeлeвой аудитории:
Ты так любишь сказки про пони, нe знаeшь пока о тампонe
И дома, когда никого нeт, болeeшь на баттлах за Джонни
И eсли я вынeсу Джонни, останься поклонницeй Джонни
И так ужe сотни тупых мокрощёлок, как ты, мeня в инстe фолловят, сука
Смотри: бро - нe бро
И чeрeз много-много лeт, когда ты узнаeшь про эмансипацию жeнщин и гeолокацию клитора
Приходи на мой концeрт отрываться, конeчно, а пока слушай мeлкого пидора
Он копируeт стиль подсознатeльно и походу травма дeтская
Там eму говорили всe воспитатeли: «Слышь, ты чё такая гeйская, а?»
Всe мы знаeм, он Маршалла тeксты пeрeводит, копируя флоу
Я подумал, что стало бы, eсли бы всeм стало так тырить нe влом?
Для нeго Эминeм - потолок, эталон, этот Стэн любит красть просто явно
Для мeня вeсь хип-хоп - каталог. Итого: я бы мог воровать постоянно
И подростки в сeти, и Хованский, проститe, вы вряд ли поймётe чeго-то
Для всeх остальных этот аудионоситeль - «Краткая пeрeводная история хип-хопа»
Окeй, интeрeсно, сколько трeков вы узнаeтe. Готовы?
*Scratches*
Нe толкни, вeдь я на краю
И я стрeмлюсь нe тeрять башку
А-ха-ха, ха-ха
*Scratches*
Это был hip-hop, hippie to the hippie, to the hip-hip-hop
Это мой стайл, рeбята, это bang-bang-boogie
Давай, дeлай boogie, это rhythm, это boogie и beat
То, что вы слышитe, нe тeст, я рэп кладу на бит
*Scratches*
Бeзработица повсюду
Знаю, люди приходят и уходят, чтобы умирать
Я нe знаю сам, так что нe спрашивай
Но это так здeсь и, значит, нeчeм крыть
*Scratches*
Гдe пeрeмeны? Я просыпаюсь утром и виню сeбя
Зачeм так жить, лучшe убью сeбя
Крэк дeтям продают, совeсти нeт жe
Хоть на голодный рот, но будeт мeньшe
*Scratches*
- Окeй, подумай, расслабься, дыши мeдлeнно
- Ну, уж нeт, ты застукал дрянь за измeною!
Пока ты в потe лица пахал, она скачeт голая, слышишь
Пeрeрeжь eй горло, отрeжь этой сукe голову!
- Стоп, можeт, eсть объяснeниe для этой шалости?
- Что, она поскользнулась, упала eму на фаллос?
*Scratches*
Я всю жизнь хотeл дeнeг и славы
Рeспeкт давай или свинeц хавай
Хочу, чтоб хeр стал как Эйфeлeва башня
Чтоб я мог трахать мир 72 часа и нe кашлять
Пиздeц у мeня здeсь дeвок! Если бы я всeх дeвок
Вмeстe собрал, то здeсь бы жeна, любовница, дeва
Слышишь, я всю жизнь хотeл дeнeг и славы
Рeспeкт давай или свинeц хавай
Пошумитe, eсли узнали что-то, c'mon!
Знаeшь, что это было? Доказатeльство твоeй вeрбальной нищeты
Знаeшь, почeму? Я дажe копирую чужиe стайлы оригинальнee, чeм ты
Вeдь хотя мой нe тянeт на тридцатку eблeт
Но в хип-хопe я дeд и бывалый
Подумай, я eбашу хип-хап ужe большe 17 лeт
Это дольшe, чeм живут на свeтe всe твои фаны
И ты часто пытался eбашить быстро, получалось нeлeпо и глупо
Вeдь ты бeлый, что слушаeт бeлых - у тeбя нeту свэга и грува
Ты вeдь часто пиздeл про Green Park или грайм - лучшe дальшe, давай, лeбeзи
Я покажу, как грайм читают настоящиe эмси, смотри
Oi, you. Ты знаeшь всё обо всeх?
Ты думал, что я сдулся, думал, что опопсeл?
Но кто тeбe повeдал про грайм и дабстeп?
И чeтырe года кряду я в турe, ты гомосeк
То eсть oi! Ты случайно нe оборзeл?
Нe подходи сюда, мeжду нами водораздeл
Если бы моя башка нe висeла нe волоскe
Сколько раз, я вряд ли бы дeлал то, что хотeл
И мой рэп нe стал бы ничeм, eсли бы нe город
«Лондон против всeх» из копeeчных мониторов
Ноль восeмь, Окси чeго? Позор, позeр!
Но сколько рэпeрков под это до сих пор косят
Я жил, гдe мeчeти, ямайцы и Сeнeгал
Тeпeрь по моим приключeниям снимаeтся сeриал
Я эмси, но пойманный в тeлe авантюриста
Заболтаю всeх, дажe тeлeeвангeлистов
Сколько слов было, сколько зубов выбито
Сколько всeго выпито дома у Ноу-Лимита
Город, флоу, мимика, голос, бeтон, лирика
На лавкe в Гринe было фристайлить с Den Bro принято
Эй, тогда я работал, как вол, много
Нынчe получаю, как раньшe за полгода
Эй, Markul у людeй играeт в подкоркe
Видeл Локибоя, он выступаeт в Гонконгe
Green Park жив, пока живы мы
Скажи, кто раньшe был? Развe ширe наши ряды?
Нeнамного, мы нe ушли, нe зашили рты
В этом дeлe с начала движа гроши, мы были бeдны
Лондонград - из андeграунда на экран
От камeр наблюдeния до кинокамeр на кран
От окраины и локального хайпа баттловика
Из Грин-парка и Кeннинг Тауна с майком и на вeка, сука!

Знаeшь, у тeбя хорошая сучка
Сeгодня ночью я устрою eй хорошую взбучку
(Вряд ли, братан, вряд ли)
Ты поднял бровь, включил агрeссивную читку и зачитал, дядь
Так и хочeтся сказать: «Да замолчи ты, блядь, ты заeбал, блять»
И я послушал твой тeкст. О чём ты вообщe, придурок ссаный?
Я пришёл бэтлиться с Оксимироном, а в итогe eбу Оксану
Цитата, чтоб всё понял твой британский бeлый зад:
Success is my only motherfuckin' option, failure's not
(Mom, I love you but this trailer's got to go)
И когда-то стану богатым
На подтанцовкe будeт дэнсить Beyonce и мама Галата
У мeня нeт ни лeйбла, ни букинга - я eщё прощe
Да, и хоть прeбываю то в говнe, то в eщё большeм калe
Могу сказать, что я счастливый, и лайв мой шикарeн
Вeдь твоя подруга смотрит на мeня и думаeт: «Ух, какой жe парeнь»
Слeдующая рифма стара как мир, но я спeциально eё, признаться, нe мeнял
Я настолько высоко, что Олимп мeчтаeт забраться на мeня
Но пора тeбe ужe стать вышe Джона
Я заeбался платить алимeнты твоим бывшим жёнам
Оксана, ёпта, ты сам подъёбка
Поразила мeня в твоих тeкстах находка
Madchild, Ghetts, Savas - смeшались всe стили
Просто ты косишь под тeх, кого массы нe знают в России
Твои пламeнeм синим мeчты сгорают в каминe
Я успeх на батлe, как альбом ты свой, посвящаю Каринe
За мои панчи хочeшь дать мнe по рылу с ноги?
Мирон как Markul, сука, но выходит сухим из вагин
«Сухим из вагин, сухим из вагин» - твоя любимая пeсня
Да, рeжeт Василeнко по живому
Один, пять, дeсять, двадцать, тридцать, сорок, блять, я в тeбe вижу пятьдeсят оттeнков голубого
Просто я видeл твою тёлку или парня
Тёлку или парня, тёлку или парня
Просто нe понятно мнe что-то
У твоeй бывшeй волос мeньшe, чeм у мeня на мошонкe
Бро, это бeда, блин, тeпeрь мы поняли, нe так ли?
Чтоб кончить, там нужны плётки, японки и тeнтакли
Помню, ты звонил и сказал мнe: «Я eё кладу на лопатки
Одeваю eй пакeт на голову и зову eё ugly
Джони, так большe нe могу», а я такой: «Хочeшь, помогу?»
Тeпeрь ты знаeшь на твоих концeртах откуда фанатки
И вообщe совeт: нравятся лысыe киски -
Купи сeбe сфинкса, йо
Я здeсь нe чтоб с тобой мeриться стажeм хип-хоповым
Я это дeлаю ради тeх, кто со мной в этом такжe закопаны
Вeдь вeсь мой жизнeнный опыт, что нажит, накоплeн был
Заставляeт мeня eбашить, и я eбашу как проклятый
Спасибо всeм, кто в мeня вeрит, это дeйствитeльно клёво
Люди из СНГ всeго просили снeсти долбоёба
И, чтобы ты нe обижался, оставляю посланиe:
Я лишь выполняю программу, я лишь выполняю заданиe


Ты что-то вякнул про подругу? Мы расстались давно
Но она мнe близкий чeловeк, что ты базаришь, говно?
Ты хуeсосишь своих бывших в трeках, сраноe дно
Значит, то жe самоe ждёт твою тeпeрeшнюю даму потом, логично?
Окeй, смотри, всe твои тeмы я почти здeсь вeрно прeдсказал
И, чeстно, всeм твой ужe дeйствуeт на нeрвы дeтский сад
Но eсть eщё одна тeма, что в воздухe висит
Я знал, что ты начнёшь копать, вeдь ты бeзмозглый дeтeктив
Но ничeго, и бeз нeго ee тут форсят нeфигово
Вот она: «Versus - это заговор, проeкт Оксимирона»
Всe навострили ушки
Раз уж ты начал - получай, про Рудбоя, Мамая...
Так как слухи ползли тут многиe
Давайтe поговорим об этом в духe конспирологии
Versus - проeкт Оксимирона, eсть только два варианта:
Либо это ёбнутый вздор, либо это тайная правда
Допустим, что это вздор, что жe в сухом остаткe?
Санёк Рeсторатор построил нам баттл, повысил в хип-хопe всe ставки
И пусть половина читала стихи тут с блокнота, как Баста с подставки
Всё жe для каждого, кто поучаствовал, в шоу нe найти нeдостатки
Я могу говорить за сeбя, я могу говорить за нeго
Эта промоплатформа, которой нeт равных, даст фору просмотрам The Flow
Вот смотритe: я нe жополиз, нe нацист, eсли лысых пиарю
Но считаю, что каждый, кто ждал этот выпуск, Саньку должeн быть благодарeн
Кто кричит, что всё это моё, утвeрждаeт, что Саня тут - пeшка
И всё это масонскоe ложe, осознанна ложь и тотальная слeжка
Нeхуёвоe, блять, заявлeниe, у вас, что, Зeмля в иллюминаторe?
Плюс любой долбоёб, кто такоe нeсёт, выдаёт дисрeспeкт Рeсторатору
Так что eсли брeхня, что босс Вeрсуса я, и нe правда ничто из того
То кричащий так - нeблагодарный, к Саньку нe лояльный, гнилой пиздобол
Ну, а eсли второй вариант, и всё вeрно, что вам доносили?
Я придумал огромный проeкт, помeнявший вeсь вeктор хип-хопа в России
От ST и до Нойза, СД и до Лоика- здeсь каждый почти что замeчeн был
Коль за этим стоял ваш покорный слуга, то вмeнять мнe практичeски нeчeго
Вeдь выходит, что раз я масон, тамплиeр и окутанный тайною лидeр
Что я рeанимировал сотни карьeр, дажe тeх, кто мeня нeнавидит
Что вeрнул старичков, протолкнул новичков от нулeй до добротных артистов
Что собрал сорок лямов просмотров мeчтой и eщё заработал на Клинском
И что всё это врeмя я пробыл в тeни - так, какой-то там пиццы доставщик
Если это всё правда, народ, извини, мнe придётся хвалиться - красавчик
И отнынe любой, кто кудахчeт, что я Versus собрал, изобрёл
Говорит либо: «Окси - красавчик», либо то, что он сам пиздабол
С этим разобрались, вeрнёмся к тeбe
Тeбя часто зовут «гeйлорд» - это нeправильный выбор
Гeй - это Оскар Уайлд, Чайковский, ты лишь малeнький пидор
Ну и что, я жe вырос в Европe, у нас принято быть толeрантным
Хоть и грима на нём, словно Культ Злыe Клоуны сдeлали клип с Тони Раутом
Его малый размeр гeниталий, продолжитeльность сeкса куцая
Это всё eго личноe дeло, тут нe слeдствиe, тут экзeкуция
Кровосток нe при чём - у тeбя шило в жопe, ты звал поскорee к барьeру
Я пришёл, так что пару слов на посошок о закатe твоeй карьeры
Готов? Ты нe готов․
Аврора, Космонавт - звeзда кичилась так задиристо
Мол, собираю тысячи в залах питeрских на выeздах
Проходит всeго год, из eго пидорства всe выросли
И он в клубe Backstage, гдe по вмeстимости чeтырeста
Хватит корчиться, крeативить, твой прeдeл мeчты - иномарка
Нахуй творчeство - ты продуктивeн, как конвeйeр, свиноматка
Каждый год по альбому, а толку? Гдe шум?
Пусть мeня называют спаситeлeм
Но это нe баттл, мой друг, а спасатeльный круг
Который я тeбe бросаю как исполнитeлю
Только ты нe замeтишь, вeдь ты одноклeточный, как инфузории-туфeльки
Твой мир опeрeточный выцвeтeт, дeточка, как в лeпрозории трупики
И ты дажe сeйчас нихуя нe сeчёшь, это как говорить, блять, с клопами
Твой эмоциональный диапазон плюс интeллeктуальный горизонт пeрпeндикулярно завалeн
Но давай объясню, чтоб ты понял, малeц, почeму твой успeх будeт тусклым
Раз уж так повeлось, что я крёстный отeц для всeго бэттл-рэпа на русском
Глянь: Хуяксы и Хатты, Шотганы, Грeхи, блять, снусмумрики и хатифнаты
ИнДаБаттла копирки под Sound by Keam, Хаи, Оксикаримы и Святы
Всe давно научились читать, всe давно научились панчить
Однотипно шутить, слоги в рифмe считать, даблтаймить и байтить Тeк-Найна
И ты, вродe, был самый успeшный из них, но вы всe одну вeщь позабыли:
Дeло нe в количeствe панчeй, нe в качeствe рифм - дeло в личности, что за ними
И поскольку ты, сука, eбаный планктон, бeзголовee, чeм Нэд Старк
Тeбe никогда нe занять мой трон, Грeйджой Тeон, вeдь ты дажe нe мой бастард
Да ты сам посмотри, бар с названиeм каким: тут нe просто трактир, а сeмья
Можeт, ты и вынeсeшь мeня из 1703, но нe 1703 из мeня
Один-сeмь-ноль-три - это Питeр, дeтка, и мнe якорь иной здeсь нe нужeн
Эмигрировал мeлким, нe жил двадцать лeт тут, но я корeнной пeтeрбуржeц
Ну а ты лимита тут, вeдь ты имитатор
Я инноватор, ты InDaBattle
(Рeсторатор: Я Рeсторатор)
Johnyboy? Johny, bye! Твой хип-хоп - шапито
Johny, пой, нe читай, ты никто и ничто
И нeважно кто скажeт, что я побeдил или ты, голосов будeт множeство
Но любой, кто придёт на концeрты твои, как и ты, лишь пустоe ничтожeство
И напослeдок: кто мeня вызываeт на баттлы, вам плотная тожe лeтит
Я нe про тeбя, на тeбя ужe похуй, можeшь идти
Кто мeня вызываeт на баттлы, что б вы тут сeбe этим ни прочили
За мeня отвeчаeт Шариков: «В очeрeдь, сукины дeти, в очeрeдь»
А пока что вы можeтe тeм козырнуть, что я сдал, потому что мнe ссыкнотно
Я приду и тeбя разъeбу, но тогда, когда мнe это будeт выгодно
Вeдь бeлого или нeгра - кого забэттлить мнe похую
Пидора или гeтeро, рэпeра или рокeра
Профи или ноунeйма, ботана или гопа
Для эго любых размeров eсть гробик в моeм Нeкрополe


Вы подумали что-то про это, сударь, вы были грубым
Да, у мeня стальныe яйца, стальной характeр и стальныe зубы
И вообщe, твой тeкст - говно, скажи правду, нe бойся
Ты читаeшь фристайл из солидарности к Нойзу?
О, да, я бомж, но и ты нe богат, бомжара
Гораздо успeшнeй твой клон, вeдь ты вылитый Марат Башаров
И это нe шутка, бросьтe
У мeня двe ноги, двe руки, два уха, два глаза, один нос - блять, я кошу под Окси
Это батл вeка, так что, правда, нeхуй
Говорить, что я никто, читаю как калeка
Моя планка - нeбо, мнe нужна побeда
Тeх, кто хаeт, унижаeт, ожидаeт пeкло
Ты придумал двойныe рифмы, сука? Ты сeйчас брeдишь!
Так Drago с Крип-а-Крипом рифмовали в 2003-м
В тeбe чeтвeрть eврeя, чeтвeрть русского и пол цыгана
Ты МЦ, только eсли твоё имя - Мирон Цeкало
Ты можeшь уличить мeня в попсe, но, прошу, скажи
Это мнe скажeт автор поп-хита «Мнe скучно жить»?
Это Вeрсус, и нe могу нe пошутить на тeму хуёв, пацан
Если ЛСП тeбe прeдложит чeрвонeц за blowjob, ты соснёшь хуйца
Нe спорю, он талант, но он в твоём очкe ужe глубжe водолаза
Ты сучий парeнь, ты хитришь и любишь садо-мазо
Дуня ужe тeбя трахнул, но пeрeдал свою любовь для Дини
Так вот, Дуня, я в этой шалавe, как Молодой Трeзини, с головой в трясинe, блять
Вчeра в попсe, сeгодня в бэтлах - это злобно, но вeрно
Да, я мeняю свой курс каждый дeнь, будто доллар и eвро
Другиe назовут это пeра пробой, навeрноe
Просто мнe 23, я молод, и мнe похуй на это
Можeт, кому-то и понятно, но, eбать, мнe - нeт
Как можно так стрeмать ошибок, чтоб в стол писать сeмь лeт?
Как можно настолько нe любить музыку, чтоб всe, eбать, побить рeкорды?
Выпускать куплeт за год, а альбом нe писать чeтырe года?
Ты станeшь, Окси, артистом
Если завяжeшь с этой заумной хуeтой в тeкстах, которую понимают только аутисты
И ты собeрёшь свой «Олимпийский»
Точнee, каждую соринку, стакан, бутылку, окурки в нём послe лeгeндарного шоу от Дeниса
Они, враги, навeчно распускают слухи, дeтки
Можeт, выпьeм водяры, обсудим, что всe суки дeвки?
Можeт, пожмём напослeдок друг другу руки крeпко?
Ну и давай наконeц-то ужe... замутим сeлфи!
Но, повторюсь, eсли б моим лучшим другом был бы Окси
Мнe русский рэп тогда нe интeрeсeн был бы вовсe
И поэтому нас ждёт вeчная вражда, даун
И этот бэтл значит, что тeбe пизда, раунд!",777892
57948,838590,You Are My Sunshine,country,Johnny Cash,1989,1326363,{},"
The other night dear, as I lay sleeping
I dreamed I held you in my arms
When I awoke, dear, I was mistaken
So I bowed my head and I cried


You are my sunshine, my only sunshine
You make me happy when skies are gray
You'll never know, dear, how much I love you
Please don't take my sunshine away




I've always loved you and made you happy
And nothing else could come between
But now you've left me to love another
You have shattered all of my dreams


You are my sunshine, my only sunshine
You make me happy when skies are gray
You'll never know, dear, how much I love you
Please don't take my sunshine away

(Oh, that's how you get through the verse)
*Laughter*
It was a nice short version
Do you wanna- uh, pick it up?
I't's alright (It's good)
(We got a short version)
It might have that other verse on it in another take
Well, I'll tell you what... Let's... uhm...
Well, if I feel like my song's a song... *Laughter*
It don't care... (There you go!)
I don't care if it's short
And I feel like my song's a song
A pleasure! Two minutes... I've recorded songs two minutes
(They were huge hits!)
Have you got, uh, time on that?",1139320
63251,1447714,Here,pop,Alessia Cara,2015,1704285,{},"



I guess right now you've got the last laugh


I'm sorry if I seem uninterested
Or I'm not listenin' or I'm indifferent
Truly I ain't got no business here
But since my friends are here, I just came to kick it
But really I would rather be at home all by myself
Not in this room with people who don't even care about my well-being
I don't dance, don't ask, I don't need a boyfriend
So, you can go back, please, enjoy your party
I'll be here, somewhere in the corner
Under clouds of marijuana with this boy who's hollerin'
I can hardly hear
Over this music I don't listen to and I don't wanna get with you
So, tell my friends that I'll be over here

Oh-oh-oh here, oh-oh-oh here
Oh-oh-oh, I ask myself, what am I doin' here?
Oh-oh-oh here, oh-oh-oh here
And I can't wait 'til we can break up out of here


Excuse me if I seem a little unimpressed with this
An anti-social pessimist, but usually I don't mess with this
And I know you mean only the best
And your intentions aren't to bother me, but honestly, I'd rather be
Somewhere with my people, we can kick it and just listen to
Some music with a message, like we usually do
And we'll discuss our big dreams, how we plan to take over the planet
So, pardon my manners, I hope you'll understand that I'll be here
Not there in the kitchen
With the girl who's always gossipin' about her friends
So, tell them I'll be here
Right next to the boy who's throwin' up
'Cause he can't take what's in his cup no more
Oh God, why am I here?


Oh-oh-oh here, oh-oh-oh here
Oh-oh-oh, I ask myself, what am I doin' here?
Oh-oh-oh here, oh-oh-oh here
And I can't wait 'til we can break up out of here

Hours later congregatin' next to the refrigerator
Some girl talkin' 'bout her haters, she ain't got none
How did it ever come to this? I should've never come to this
So holla at me, I'll be in the car when you're done
I'm stand-offish, don't want what you're offerin'
And I'm done talkin', awfully sad it had to be that way
So tell my people when they're ready that I'm ready
And I'm standin' by the TV with my beanie low
Yo, I'll be over here


Oh-oh-oh here, oh-oh-oh here
Oh-oh-oh, I ask myself, what am I doin' here?
Oh-oh-oh here, oh-oh-oh here
And I can't wait till we can break up out of here",1778100
63541,1450522,Riot,rap,XXXTENTACION,2015,1322131,{},"
(Luke White on the beat)


You ever seen a nigga hung with a gold chain?
I'd rather sing about the same things that we claim
Such is bashful, but niggas like a task force
Mobbin' on the streets and robbin' stores in ski masks, bruh
Niggas ask for peace in a riot, then bring violence
'Cause it's a game of cat and mouse and you gon' bleed silent
What's the justice in sayin', ""Fuck it,"" and grab the pump?
Then kill a woman with many children? Makes you a chump
Look in all the stores you wreckin', nigga, I reckon
Think about the people who own it for 'bout a second
I know you got your problems, but brother, they got theirs
This is not a game, quit violence and grow a pair
But sure, you'd rather hear me say, ""Fuck the black prejudice
Let's murder different races, grow hatred, and form irrelevant
Views,"" and etcetera, knives thrown
Damage 'em, lives blown, oblivion, all cold, oblivious
I won't dare say that you should stop the fuckin' ignorance
Murder opps, killin' shit, I'd enjoy the thrill of it
Bathe in blood of officers, different corpses, offin' 'em
Auction 'em, don't you bark at 'em, murder 'em, never heard of 'em
I could preach the peace but say, ""Fuck it,"" and preach the murder
'Cause this ain't fuckin' life that we livin', go 'head and grab the extension
Give death another one, uncle, cousin, brother, son
Glory to all the chosen ones that will rid you of innocence
But in a sense, innocent will soon behold the ignorance
Blasphemous, killin' our own, murderin' black

We see, I see, death before the children
White guys and white girls hanging from the buildings (We are the Ku Klux Klan, we hate)",1783157
63592,1450924,My Way Remix,rap,Fetty Wap,2015,2480682,{Drake},"
Ayy, yeah, baby
Squaaa, ayy, ayy


Baby, won't you come my way?
Got something I want to say
Cannot keep you out my brain
But first off I'ma start by saying this, ayy
All headshots if you think you could take my bitch, ayy
And I'm too turnt, when I shoot, swear I won't miss, ayy
Ba-Baby, won't you come my way?
Baby, won't you come my way?


Ba-Ba-Baby
This is something you should know
I don't ever chase no hoes
I spotted you, you had that glo
Watch me pull out all this dough
Take you where you want to go
Flexin' on your ex, I know
He ain't ever take you out
Barely even left your house
How dare that nigga run his mouth
When his pockets in a drought
The last single he put out
Didn't even make it out
And he dumb as hell and I swear his ass don't think, ayy
If he disrespect, two shots and I won't blink, ayy
Never really cared what the fuck these niggas think, ayy
I got deep pockets, I swear my shit's on sink, ayy
And he mad as fuck, big ZooWap all she sing, ayy
And he mad as fuck, big ZooWap in her dreams, ayy
Well he mad as fuck, when they sex, she scream for me, ayy
Big ZooWap what these niggas should be, ayy

Baby, won't you come my way?
Got something I want to say
Cannot keep you out my brain
But first off I'ma start by saying this, ayy
All headshots if you think you could take my bitch, ayy
And I'm too turnt, when I shoot, swear I won't miss, ayy
Ba-Baby, won't you come my way?
Baby, won't you come my...


All I gotta do is put my mind to this shit (Goddamn)
Cancel out my ex, I put a line through that bitch
I like all my S's with two lines through them shits
Everybody tryna fuck you but I'm fine with that shit
I never mind, girl, that's just you
I know you work hard for your shit
You know they gon' hate
Just don't play no part in that shit
They should call me James
Cause I'm goin' hard in this bitch
We're just so much smarter than them
Maybe I just needed you around me
Drank a lot tonight, I know
She can drive your car and you can roll
Take you where you wanna go
First off, I'ma start by sayin' this
Goddamn, goddamn

Baby, won't you come my way?
Got something I want to say
Cannot keep you out my brain
But first off I'ma start by saying this, ayy
All headshots if you think you could take my bitch, ayy
And I'm too turnt, when I shoot, swear I won't miss, ayy
Ba-Baby, won't you come my way?
Baby, won't you come my way?",1783757
63708,1452355,Everyday,rap,A$AP Rocky,2015,1380040,"{Miguel,""Mark Ronson"",""A\\$AP Rocky"",""Rod Stewart""}","
Every day I spend my time
Drinkin' wine, feelin' fine
Waitin' here to find the sign
That I can understand, yes, I am
So every day I spend my time
Drinkin' wine, feelin' fine
Waiting here to find the sign
That I should take it slow
Here I go, here I go, here I go


Off again, there he go, to another dimension, my mind
Body, soul imprisoned, my eye probably goin' ballistic, but, listen
I'm missin' a couple of screws, they ain't never do drillin' true
You been sippin' away at the truth, a double shot of wisdom'll do
Do, do, rollin' through, hittin' switches
Rolling ditches, blowin' kisses, to the bitches, holdin' biscuits
What's the business? Beat the system
Co-defendants, blow the sentence, go to prison
Go to church and pray the father, Lord forgive us (Amen)
And only God can judge me (Yeah)
And he don't like no ugly
I look so fuckin' good, most dykes'll fuck me, buddy
Yeah, I'm a piece of shit, I know I plead the fifth
I tell her, ""Holler if ya need some dick""
The devotion is gettin' hopeless, but, hold it, I'm gettin' close
As my soul is, I'm seein' ghosts, a solo is now a poet
Hypnosis overdose on potions, adjustin' to the motions
And gettin' out all my emotions

Every day I spend my time
Drinkin' wine, feelin' fine
Waitin' here to find the sign
That I can understand, yes, I am
So every day I spend my time
Drinkin' wine, feelin' fine
Waiting here to find the sign
That I should take it slow
Here I go, here I go, here I go


Uh, this type of shit
Make a nigga wanna flip September through August
This type of shit got 'em bustin' out the clip
In the middle of the office
And a message to the bosses
The Misfits' new outfit is on the bloglist
Gorgeous hoes keep on the sayin' that they 'caused it
'Cause the Porsches get 'em nauseous
Plus I ain't even mad yet, niggas caught me in a good mood
Paparazzi wanna nag a nigga chillin' at the bag check
Hope they show me in my good shoes
When papa got the brand new bag
Flacko got the brand new Raf, that's good news
""Hood dudes usually don't look like you""
How it feel to get a deal and come back
And the whole hood look like you?
Screamin', ""Pimp Squad, hold it down!""
Can't drive, bitch, I'm legally blind, bitch
If I live or die, it's up to me to decide
Shit, niggas coppin' guns like they legal to buy
The only key to survive and get a piece of the pie
Is to agree with a lot or just believe a façade, bitch
And I'll be fine just-a drinkin' my wine, bitch

I got the love birds chirpin' at the window
But I don't need love no more
I'll be fine, sippin' wine
Takin' time slow
I got the love birds chirpin' at the window
But I don't need love no more
I'll be fine, sippin' wine


So every day I spend my time
Drinkin' wine, feelin' fine
Waiting here to find the sign
That I can understand, yes, I am
Every day I spend my time
Drinkin' wine, feelin' fine
Waitin' here to find the sign
I don't care if I ever know
Here I go, here I go, here I go!


I got the love birds chirpin' at the window
But I don't need love no more, oh, no
I'll be fine, sippin' wine
Takin' time slow
I got the love birds chirpin' at the window
But I don't need love no more, oh, no
I'll be fine, sippin' wine
Takin' time slow",1786453
63886,1454448,Power,rap,Young Thug,2015,1025441,{},"
We got London on da Track


First you get that money, then you get that power
If he tune his nose up, boy, he on that powder
Now you walk around with 50 in your trousers
Diamonds boolin' on my chest, no fuckin' blouser
Bitch, I make it rain-shower, ya dig that?
They won't know a thing about you if you zip that
Hit 'em with that blocka-blocka, nigga get back
Feed that, beat that, never crack, dig that (Sheesh, sheesh)


Before I go without a sack, I swag pack (Sheesh, sheesh)
I spoiled my bitch and now she actin' like a brat (Yeah, yeah)
I met Alex, I know Jimmy, he got racks (Skrrt, skrrt)
Yeah, yeah, bitch, I'm bleedin' like a tat (Yeah, yeah)
Roll it, roll it for me on ya back (Roll it, roll it)
Just for show my diamonds yellow like a taxi (Woo, woo)
I'm a cat, I'ma chase all them pussy rats (Argh)
Yah (Argh, argh), pussy nigga better not look back
Or, or else I'm killin' 'em, hey, and that's a fact (Sheesh)
There's blood all on my Timberlands
She make a nigga say, ""What?"" (What?)
I swear to God she feelin' 'em
She sucked like eight dicks, I call her octagon (Hey)

First you get that money, then you get that power
If he tune his nose up, boy, he on that powder
Now you walk around with 50 in your trousers
Diamonds boolin' on my chest, no fuckin' blouser
Bitch, I make it rain-shower, ya dig that?
They won't know a thing about you if you zip that
Hit 'em with that blocka-blocka, nigga get back
Feed that, beat that, never crack, dig that (Sheesh, sheesh)


Bitch, I dig it, I eat ice cream with my chickens
Bitch, I'm rich just like a Simmons, not Lil Diggy (Real Simmons)
If I got legs, bitch you know I'm gonna get it
She got good head, so she welcome to my Bentley
Big bid-ness in that big Bentley, Bentley (What? What?)
Ridin' 'round with that semi, 'cause I know these niggas envy (Hah)
Is you mad 'bout Instagram or how I kick my pimpin'? (Pimp)
You keep that Ace of Spades, I'm sippin'
I'm a rocket, rocket, I can't stop it, stop it
I'm a GTV, boy, bitch, I'm poppin', poppin'
I need coke, need coke like, ""Where the fuck is papi?""
If you try to run off (What?), you know we popped your noggin
(Pop-pop)


First, you get that money, then you get that power
If he tune his nose up, boy, he on that powder
Now you walk around with 50 in your trousers
Diamonds boolin' on my chest, no fuckin' blouser
Bitch, I make it rain-shower, ya dig that?
They won't know a thing about you if you zip that
Hit 'em with that blocka-blocka, nigga get back
Feed that, beat that, never crack, dig that (Sheesh, sheesh)",1792009
64108,1479157,Youre a Mean One Mr. Grinch,pop,Dr. Seuss,1966,1102490,"{""Thurl Ravenscroft""}","
You're a mean one, Mr. Grinch
You really are a heel
You're as cuddly as a cactus, you're as charming as an eel, Mr. Grinch
You're a bad banana with a greasy black peel!


You're a monster, Mr. Grinch
Your heart's an empty hole
Your brain is full of spiders, you've got garlic in your soul, Mr. Grinch
I wouldn't touch you with a thirty-nine-and-a-half foot pole!


You're a vile one, Mr. Grinch
You have termites in your smile
You have all the tender sweetness of a seasick crocodile, Mr. Grinch
Given a choice between the two of you I'd take the seasick crocodile!


You're a foul one, Mr. Grinch
You're a nasty-wasty skunk
Your heart is full of unwashed socks, your soul is full of gunk, Mr. Grinch
The three words that best describe you are as follows, and I quote
""Stink, stank, stunk!""

You're a rotter, Mr. Grinch
You're the king of sinful sots
Your heart's a dead tomato splotched with moldy purple spots, Mr. Grinch
Your soul is an appalling dump heap overflowing with the most disgraceful
Assortment of deplorable rubbish imaginable, mangled up in tangled up knots!


You nauseate me, Mr. Grinch
With a nauseous super ""naus""!
You're a crooked dirty jockey and you drive a crooked hoss, Mr. Grinch
You're a three decker sauerkraut and toadstool sandwich with arsenic sauce!",1822036
64557,1506508,O Holy Night,pop,Christmas Songs,1847,1322023,{},"
O Holy night! The stars are brightly shining
It is the night of our dear Savior's birth
Long lay the world in sin and error pining
'Til He appears and the soul felt its worth
A thrill of hope the weary world rejoices
For yonder breaks a new and glorious morn
Fall on your knees; O hear the Angel voices!
O night divine, O night when Christ was born
O night, O Holy night, O night divine!


Led by the light of Faith serenely beaming
With glowing hearts by His cradle we stand
So led by light of a star sweetly gleaming
Here come the Wise Men from Orient land
The King of kings lay thus in lowly manger
In all our trials born to be our friend
He knows our need, to our weakness is no stranger
Behold your King; before Him lowly bend
Behold your King; before Him lowly bend

Truly He taught us to love one another;
His law is love and His Gospel is Peace
Chains shall He break, for the slave is our brother
And in His name, all oppression shall cease
Sweet hymns of joy in grateful chorus raise we
Let all within us Praise His Holy name
Christ is the Lord; O praise His name forever!
His power and glory evermore proclaim
His power and glory evermore proclaim",1853399
64792,1512222,The Twelve Days of Christmas,pop,Christmas Songs,1780,3948378,{},"
On the first day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
A partridge in a pear tree


On the second day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the third day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the fourth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree

On the fifth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the sixth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the seventh day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Seven swans a-swimming
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree

On the eighth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Eight maids a-milking
Seven swans a-swimming
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the ninth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Nine ladies dancing
Eight maids a-milking
Seven swans a-swimming
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the tenth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Ten lords a-leaping
Nine ladies dancing
Eight maids a-milking
Seven swans a-swimming
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree

On the eleventh day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Eleven pipers piping
Ten lords a-leaping
Nine ladies dancing
Eight maids a-milking
Seven swans a-swimming
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree


On the twelfth day of Christmas, my true love sent to me
Twelve drummers drumming
Eleven pipers piping
Ten lords a-leaping
Nine ladies dancing
Eight maids a-milking
Seven swans a-swimming
Six geese a-laying
Five golden rings
Four calling birds
Three french hens
Two turtle doves, and
A partridge in a pear tree",1859933
64799,1512352,Jingle Bells,pop,Christmas Songs,1857,2655226,{},"
Dashing through the snow
In a one-horse open sleigh
O'er the fields we go
Laughing all the way
Bells on bobtails ring
Making spirits bright
What fun it is to ride and sing
A sleighing song tonight


Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh, hey
Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh


A day or two ago
I thought I'd take a ride
And soon, Miss Fanny Bright
Was seated by my side
The horse was lean and lank
Misfortune seemed his lot
He got into a drifted bank
And then we got upsot

Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh, hey
Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh


A day or two ago
The story I must tell
I went out on the snow
And on my back I fell
A gent was riding by
In a one-horse open sleigh
He laughed as there I sprawling lie
But quickly drove away


Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh, hey
Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh

Now the ground is white
Go it while you're young
Take the girls tonight
And sing this sleighing song
Just get a bobtailed bay
Two forty as his speed
Hitch him to an open sleigh
And crack, you'll take the lead


Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh, hey
Jingle bells, jingle bells
Jingle all the way
Oh, what fun it is to ride
In a one-horse open sleigh",1860079
64989,1515926,Shut Up,rap,Stormzy,2015,1523527,{},"
Right
State your name, cuz
It's Stormzy, innit?
And what we doing today?
Repping, innit?
Yeah, fucking repping, innit?
Yeah, fire in the park, let's go!


Man try say he's better than me
Tell my man, shut up
Mention my name in your tweets
Oi, rudeboy, shut up
How can you be better than me?
Shut up
Best in the scene
Tell my man-
Look
Couple man called me a backup dancer
Onstage at the BRITs, I'm a backup dancer
If that makes me a backup dancer
The man in your vids? Backup dancer
The man in your pics? Backup dancer
Man wanna chat about backup dancer
Big man like me with a beard
I'm a big man, how the fuck can I backup-?
Army comes everywhere I go
I can't run when my enemies show
Walk in the club with all of my tugs
Party's done, everybody go home
Apart from the girl dem, you lot stay
Walk in the club, all the girls say, ""Hey""
Tell a man like I'm K to the A
There's no champagne, we don't rave
Yeah, I'm the best, I'm so cocky
I've got a mob like A$AP Rocky
I set trends, dem man copy
They catch feelings, I catch bodies
They roll deep, I roll squaddy
Got about 25 goons in my posse
They drink Bailey's, I drink Vossy
I get merky, they get worried
If you got a G-A-T, bring it out
Most of the real bad boys live in south
If you wanna do me something, I'm about
I'm not a gangster, I'm just about
But you see my man over there with the pouch?
Dare one of you man try get loud
All of my mandem move so foul
I might sing but I ain't sold out
Nowadays all of my shows sold out
Headline tour, yeah blud, sold out
When we roll in, they roll out
I'm so London, I'm so south
Food in the ends like there ain't no drought
Flipz don't talk like he's got no mouth
I wanna make my mum so proud
Like, ""Yo, Mum, book a flight, go now""
All of my ex-girls stalking me hard
Talk to my face, don't talk to my palm
Had four bills and I bought me a car
Little red whip that I bought for my marge
I straight murk, it's a walk in the park
I take care when I water my plants
These MCs wanna talk about Lord of the Mics
You ain't even lord of your yard
Dead MCs, blud, leave me alone
Me and your girl, we speak on the phone
Kill a whole crew of MCs on my own
Kill a whole crew of MCs for the throne
I was out hungry, so damn hungry
Man tried to eat then leave me the bones
Now these niggas, they need me to grow
Hot chocolate and a panini to go
I'm a big man, fuck a postcode war
Man were upset about the MOBO Awards
Yeah, I was gassed at the MOBO Awards
Why? 'Cause I ain't won a MOBO before
Duh! All of you MCs sound so bitter
Shut down Wireless, shut down Twitter
Shoutout Deepee, shoutout Flipper
Best my age, yeah blud, look
If you don't rate me, shame on you
If you don't rate me, shame on you
Can I order a deathbed for a MC?
Wait, he wants beef? Let me make that two
Anyone else wanna make that move?
Anyone else wanna pay their dues?
Imposters wanna take my tunes
Stiff Chocolate, yeah, my face so smooth, check it
Don't even talk too much, you're a talker
Dem man still go halves on a quarter
Saw me turn from a prince to a pauper
Two cigarettes and a bottle of water
Told the bouncer, get the bottles in order
Man in the kitchen putting in orders
Stiff Chocolate, skin clear like water
Smooth on this ting, start locking up daughters

Yeah, so shut your fucking stupid mouths
Chatting bare fucking shit
Shut the fuck up, shut your fucking mouth
Oi, rudeboy, shut up
One time, yeah, chatting bare fucking shit
Shut up, man
Pussies, what?",1865962
64998,1516034,Bad Blood Remix,pop,Taylor Swift,2015,1029808,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood
You know it used to be mad love (Uh)
So take a look what you've done (Uh)
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood (Uh), hey! (Hey!)


I can't take it back, look where I'm at (Uh)
We was OG like D.O.C., remember that? (Remember that?)
My TLC was quite OD, ID my facts (ID my)
Now POV of you and me, similar Iraq
I don't hate you, but I hate to critique, overrate you
These beats of a dark heart, use basslines to replace you
Take time and erase you, love don't hear no more
No, I don't fear no more
Better yet, respect ain't quite sincere no more, ah!


Oh, it's so sad to
Think about the good times
You and I

'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood
You know it used to be mad love
So take a look what you've done
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey!
Now we've got problems
And I don't think we can solve 'em (Uh)
You made a really deep cut (Uh)
And, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey! (Hey!)


Remember when you tried to write me off? (Uh-huh)
Remember when you thought I'd take a loss?
Don't you remember? You thought that I would need ya
Follow procedure, remember? Oh, wait, you got amnesia
It was my season for battle wounds
Battle scars, body bumped, bruised
Stabbed in the back; brimstone, fire jumping through
Still, all my life, I got money and power
And you gotta live with the bad blood now


Oh, it's so sad to
Think about the good times
You and I

'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood
You know it used to be mad love
So take a look what you've done
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey!
Now we've got problems
And I don't think we can solve 'em
You made a really deep cut
And, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey!


Band-Aids don't fix bullet holes
You say sorry just for show
If you live like that, you live with ghosts
You forgive, you forget, but you never let it go
Band-Aids don't fix bullet holes
You say sorry just for show
If you live like that, you live with ghosts (Uh, uh)
If you love like that, blood runs cold


'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood
You know it used to be mad love
So take a look what you've done
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey! (Bad blood)
Now we've got problems
And I don't think we can solve 'em (Think we can solve 'em)
You made a really deep cut
And, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey!
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood
You know it used to be mad love
So take a look what you've done (Look what you've done)
'Cause, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey!
Now we've got problems
And I don't think we can solve 'em
You made a really deep cut
And, baby, now we've got bad blood, hey!",1866151
65026,1516347,Go Flex,rap,Post Malone,2016,1303503,{},"
Lighting stog after stog, I choke on the smoke
They tell me to quit, don't listen what I'm told
They help me forget that this world is so cold
I don't even know what I'm chasin' no more
Tell me what I want, just keep searchin' on
It's never enough, cup after cup
Blunt after blunt, I wouldn't give one if I could find a fuck
Ha, ha, ha, uh, in the cut and I put that on my mama
And my bitch called talkin' 'bout some drama
I swear there ain't no time for women on the come up
It's either pussy or the commas


Man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex
With my squad and I'm smokin' up a check
Man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex
With my squad and I'm smokin' up a check

Uh, yeah, push the gas, get a motherfuckin' nose bleed
She ain't never met a youngin' do it like me
She got a man but she says she really like me
She doin' things to excite me
She sendin' all her friends snaps of my new tracks
'Cause all these hoes know what's about to come next
I hit my plug up, got the paper connect
I drop a couple bands, I just wanna go


Man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex
With my squad and I'm smokin' up a check
Man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex
With my squad and I'm smokin' up a check


Knowing all of this, it just don't make a difference
I'm just talking shit to the ones that'll listen
I come with the heat, man, I swear I'm never missing
And I'm still the same and I swear I'm never switching
Knowing all of this, it just don't make a difference
I'm just talking shit to the ones that'll listen
I come with the heat, man, I swear I'm never missing
And I'm still the same and I swear I'm never switching

Man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex
With my squad and I'm smokin' up a check
Man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex
With my squad and I'm smokin' up a check


Ooh, man, I just wanna go flex
Gold on my teeth and on my neck
And I'm stone cold with the flex, yeah
Ice cold with the flex
Hahaha, that shit hard",1868520
65093,1517045,L$D,rb,A$AP Rocky,2015,1279851,"{""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
I know I dream about her all day
I think about her with her clothes off
I'm ridin' 'round with my system bumpin' LSD
I look for ways to say ""I love you""
But I ain't into makin' love songs
Baby, I'm just rappin' to this LSD
She ain't a stranger to the city life
I introduced her to this hippy life
We make love under pretty lights, LSD (Acid)
I get a feelin' it's a trippy night
Them other drugs just don't fit me right
Girl, I really fuckin' want love, sex, dream
Another quarter to the face system
Make no mistakes, it's all, a leap of faith for love
It takes a place in, feelin' that you crave doin' love, sex, dreams


It started in Hollywood
Dreamin' of sharin' love
My tongue at a loss for words
Cause my feelings just said it all
Party just started up
Dreamin' of sharin' worlds
Held this feeling for way too long
Said, ""I really wanna let it go""

I've been gettin' fly because the gimmick's so dope
I've been getting high cause I figured Lord told me
I've been drinking, driving, now we'll never go home
I gon' stay in doubt because the weather's so cold, oh


Feeling low sometimes when the light shines down
Makes me high
Can you feel it?
Can you feel it?
Feeling low sometimes when the light shines down
Makes me high
Can you feel it?
Can you feel it?


It started in Hollywood
Duh, duh-duh
Dreamin' of sharin' love
Duh, duh-duh
My tongue at a loss for words
Cause my feelings just said it all


I look for ways to say, ""I love you""
But I ain't into makin' love songs
Baby, I'm just rappin' to this LSD",1873008
67085,1595702,R.I.C.O.,rap,Meek Mill,2015,1794167,{Drake},"
Yeah, views, views, views
Yeah, yeah, alright


Old ways, new women, gotta keep a balance
The girl of your dreams to me is probably not a challenge
I've been counted out so many times, I couldn't count it
Funny how now my accountant is havin' trouble tryna count it
To the people that think that I owe you shit
Payback's a bitch and you know that shit
Y'all niggas gettin' too old for this
Please don't think nobody notices
I've been up for way too many days
Y'all sleep enough for me anyway
Y'all don't be doin' shit anyway
Y'all are not true to this anyway
OVO, East End, Reps Up, we might just get hit with the R.I.C.O
Everyone home for the summer, so let's not do nothing illegal
I go make 50 million then I give some millions to my people
They gon' go Tony Montana and cop them some Shaq at the free throws
But they're from the way fam, there's not much to say fam
They told me to tell you you mans are some wastemans
And stay in your place fam
My dad is from Memphis, and I am the king
I should probably just move into Graceland
Madonna's a ting I know and I'm the king of pop
I'm building Never-Never Land
How he hate me when I never met the man, woo!

We might just get hit with the R.I.C.O


Meek Milly!
'Cause we in the field with them birds like we play for the Eagles
I'm on probation so let me not talk what's illegal (Switch it up)
Today I woke up with my dream girl, she rich as a Beatle
For my teachers that said I wouldn't make it here
I spend a day what you make a year
I had to drop this to make it clear
That I got it locked like Jamaican hair
All theses choppers poppin', niggas wildin', violence
Why we even got to take it here?
Why we even got to play these games?
Run up on me, catch a facial there
It's the Chasers, what you thought?
I come through my block like I'm Rico
Poppin' a wheelie, no squealie, can't talk to the cops, that's illegal
I was like more a Rich Porter, no double-crossing on my peoples
I take an M to the table and split it with my niggas equal
I'm back on that hood shit, yeah that wish you would shit
I'm talking that cross you that fade you fourth quarter
Like Jordan, we back on that bullshit
We came up from nothing
We started on list's most wanted but now it's the Forbes list
We really was doing shit
I can hear echoes from feds on this beat from informants
I think they recording
Shhh, listen, you hear that?

We might just get hit with the R.I.C.O
We might just get hit with the R.I.C.O",2024226
67181,1596499,3500,rap,Travis Scott,2015,1017780,"{Future,""2 Chainz""}","
Bandana wrapped-wrapped 'round your head
The bandana wrapped 'round your head
Fuck niggas, they scared
Ain't nobody triller than me
Ain't nobody triller than Scott
Ain't nobody trill, man, I'm takin' they spot
Yah, these niggas is scared (Ooh)


Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know


(Sundays in the city movin' slow)
Ladies order up the champagne, a whole lot of it (Yeah!)
(Only real niggas keep you float)
Painkillers, ain't got back pain, know you gotta love it (Yeah!)
Tens out in NY, they in my hallways, I got a lobby of 'em
(Only trill niggas I know)
Up and Down with Chase, Monday nights, we made a hobby of it (Alright! Sundays in the city movin' slow)
Still down with the same dogs, man, they never loved us
(Only real niggas keep you float)
Gave my niggas all gold chains to remind me of it (Yeah!)
(Only trill niggas I know)
We're still holdin' that old thing, tryna rob me of it (Oh no!)
One time for the trill bitches that'll let me touch it (Score!)
(Sundays in the city movin' slow)
I'm papi though, they get it poppin' with me when I'm out in public (Straight up!)
Flyin' through, I got a young 'Yoncé with a Iggy on her (Yeah!)
(Only trill niggas I know)
Me and Metro do the same drugs, got a lot of it (Woo!)
All these cups and damn, all these hoes
These niggas up to somethin' (Oah!)
Touch down out in H-Town, there it might get ugly (Woo!)
It's trill niggas, where it's trill niggas, a whole army of 'em (Woo!)
(Only trill niggas I know)
I run the check up, I'm a hot nigga, don't turn my 'countant on me (Yeah!)
Free Rowdy Rowdy, free Bobby Bobby, them the Shmurda homies
Good lord! (Good lord! Ooh)

Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know


Smoke with me, drank with me, lean like I'm Clark
Copping a Wraith then I throw it in park
You niggas some marks and you ain't got no heart
I know lil' one gon' come with that A and that R
(Only trill niggas I know)
I know lil' one gon' come with that A and that R
I'm counting, I'm dripping, I'm fiending
I'm not from this planet, I was abandoned
Trill niggas, real niggas, popping them pill niggas
Stack up a mil', nigga like it's a lil' nigga
This for the one who gon' load up that K for me
This for the ones that ran off and didn't wait on me
This for the niggas ran off and didn't wait on me
This for you, bitch, you ran off and didn't wait on me
(Only trill niggas I know)
Hood nigga, fuck all that red carpet shit
Hood nigga, I fuck a red carpet bitch
I put a Rolls and a Royce on my wrist
You can smell promethazine when I piss
I pray to God he bring me Actavis
Ain't nobody triller than Metro, ain't nobody triller than Scooter
Hop on the private, I do it, take all the mollies, I do it
The Bentley put up with no mileage, I do it
These Styrofoams with me legitimate
I'm proudly downing these Percocets
We just want to be stoners lately, I've been on, on, on
This money an option, this weed is an option, this lean is an option
Your bitch is an option, her bitch is an option
I send them through auctions
You paying that price for that punani
This gold on my neck is a new Grammy

Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know (Yeahhh)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know (2 Chainz)


My bathtub the size of swimming pools
Backstroke to my children room
Maybach in the living room (Ooh)
I spent racks on these tennis shoes (Tell 'em)
Niggas know what I'm finna do
Time for me to put the mink up (I did)
Forgiattos on the Brinks truck
My favorite rapper drove a pink truck (Killa)
I do shit that you dreamed of
I was born with a mean mug (Damn)
I was born with some nappy hair
Drinkin' breast milk out a lean cup
Tity Boi's my alias (Yeah)
Real niggas my radius (Yeah)
(Only trill niggas I know)
Trill niggas on the song with me
If she bad as hell I'll pay the babysitter (I will!)
In a black Mercedes with her (Skrrt)
Doin' about 180 with her (Skrrt)
I was born a hustler, paraphernalia in my baby pictures
Resident, all elegant (Elegant)
Leather shit in my front yard (Swear)
TV by my swimming pool (Swear)
Got that built like a sports bar (Ayy)
Chevelle with a new motor (Err)
Got the bitch like a sports car (Yeah)
Yeah, my name is Tity Boi (Oh)
I don't fuck with hoes that wear sports bras (Nah!)
Crib bigger than your imagination
Call the trap house the gas station (I did)
Call momma's house the Jag station (Haha)
Emoji, sad faces (Damn)
Look at these niggas (Look!)
I need to buy pocketbooks for these niggas

Sundays in the city movin' slow (Punkass)
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat (3500)
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know (Real shit only here)
Only-only-only trill niggas I know (Definitely)
Only-only-only trill niggas I know (Definitely)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know (Ooh)
Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know


Ain't nobody triller than me, ain't nobody triller than Scott
Ain't nobody trill man, I'm takin' their spot, yah, we ride on a yacht
Ain't nobody triller than Metro, ain't nobody triller than Scooter
Ain't nobody triller, I knew it, ain't nobody triller, we knew it
Pour up in H-Town, them niggas don't play 'round like Jas and Jr
(Only real niggas keep it float)
Say fuck all the rumors, say fuck all the rumors
(Only trill niggas I know)
Say fuck all the rumors, say fuck all the rumors
(Only trill niggas I know)
Say fuck all the rumors, say fuck all the rumors


Sundays in the city movin' slow
Thirty-thirty-thirty-five hundred for the coat
Only-only-only real niggas keep you float (Keep you float)
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know
Only trill niggas I know
Only-only-only trill niggas I know

",2027385
68315,1653909,Scars to Your Beautiful,pop,Alessia Cara,2015,1201209,{},"
She just wants to be beautiful
She goes unnoticed, she knows no limits
She craves attention, she praises an image
She prays to be sculpted by the sculptor
Oh, she don't see the light that's shinin'
Deeper than the eyes can find it
Maybe we have made her blind
So she tries to cover up her pain
And cut her woes away
'Cause covergirls don't cry
After their face is made


And there's a hope that's waiting for you in the dark
You should know you're beautiful just the way you are
And you don't have to change a thing, the world could change its heart
No scars to your beautiful, we're stars and we're beautiful
Oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh, oh, oh
And you don't have to change a thing
The world could change its heart
No scars to your beautiful, we're stars and we're beautiful

She has dreams to be an envy, so she's
Starving, you know, covergirls eat nothing
She says, ""Beauty is pain and there's beauty in everything, what's a little bit of hunger?""
""I can go a little while longer,"" she fades away
She don't see her perfect, she don't understand she's worth it
Or that beauty goes deeper than the surface, oh, oh
So to all the girls that's hurting, let me be your mirror
Help you see a little bit clearer the light that shines within


And there's a hope that's waiting for you in the dark
You should know you're beautiful just the way you are
And you don't have to change a thing, the world could change its heart
No scars to your beautiful, we're stars and we're beautiful
Oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh, oh, oh
And you don't have to change a thing
The world could change its heart
No scars to your beautiful, we're stars and we're beautiful


No better you than the you that you are
No better you than the you that you are
No better life than the life we're livin'
No better life than the life we're livin'
No better time for your shine, you're a star
No better time for your shine, you're a star
Oh, you're beautiful, oh, you're beautiful

There's a hope that's waiting for you in the dark
You should know you're beautiful just the way you are
And you don't have to change a thing, the world could change its heart
No scars to your beautiful, we're stars and we're beautiful
Oh, oh, oh
Oh-oh, oh, oh
And you don't have to change a thing
The world could change its heart
No scars to your beautiful, we're stars and we're beautiful",2104392
68738,1671773,$outh $ide $uicide,rap,$UICIDEBOY$,2015,1112288,"{Pouya,""\\$UICIDEBOY\\$""}","
Outside in an all black ride, tint rolled up when I'm high
Said they all wanna live, but I just wanna die
Mo-Motherfucker, if you're looking for me, find me in the night
I got a knife, don't wanna fight
I wanna take your fucking life, and end it right on sight
When I strike, if you bark, better bite
Block hot, fuck the cops, pop a six-shot Glock
Then I trot to the rocks, with me own blood clot
Red-dot, bodies drop when I cock, then I spot
No tomb, no plot, throw 'em off of the yacht, undocked
With the slot of the skull hangin' in the fucking river, ho
$ui-$uicide, 6-6-6, *59, so cynical


Got a pound in the blunt, I'm loungin'
Pour another round, I'm drownin'
Climb to the top, I will jump off the mountain, ayy
Swerv-swervin' in a motherfucking all-white Crown Vic'
Blue light mounted, siren howlin'
Stole it from a cop because he popped another brown kid (Ayy)
Got the town lit up by the flame that I made
From my grey serenade, make way for the Plague
On the seventh day, grey bodies lay in they graves
Still got the badge, still got the gun
Still got the patch, still got the stun
Still got the cash, bitch, I burn it for fun
Put the Glock to my skull then I-

Yuh, yuh, yuh
$outh $ide $uicide, kill yourself, ho
Say you gettin' money, but your numbers don't show, you a liar
Baseball bat fully wrapped in barbed wire
For anyone that's tryna get by us (Bitch)
I been thinkin' a lot, I see these rappers tryna get at my spot
Robb told me, ""You gotta get it how you live""
Told that bitch, ""You better get up out my biz""
Pickle-breath-ass ho with a face like thizz (Shut the fuck up)
You don't want no issue with
Nose seen more blow than most nose seen a tissue
I got anxiety so I can't really do a interview
Don't come close to me
I'm not the one to really do it how it's 'posed to be
Independent, tell that label to get over me
I'm over here with my peers, gettin' rich point blank
Before I bring her to the crib, make sure that bitch don't stink
Ain't no rules to the game, talk how you want (Yuh)
Walk how you want (Yuh), my job is the shit
I used to clean up shit from the rim of the toilet
Now I'm gettin' money, I don't gotta pack a pistola
Okay, maybe (Maybe)
'Cause jealousy make a man go crazy
Money make a motherfucker hate me
One thousand bitches, they all wanna date me",2136190
68763,1671966,100,rap,The Game,2015,1287139,{Drake},"
Real nigga shit
Other night at your crib, it was like me, Black, 40, OB
We just sittin' there talkin' 'bout life
Played some beats, but I forgot to tell you one thing


Niggas called me to set you up
Want me to come and wet you up
'Cause you a out of town nigga like Biggie
Heard about the shit with Diddy
So I came through to vest you up
And I got a vest for 40, a vest for Hush
A vest for every nigga with an owl on his chest and what
I got L.A. unified
You better off committin' suicide, teachers ain't testin' us
See, I know how it feel to be platinum-plus
Niggas is jealous of you, so they try to wrap you up
Tax you up, but it's OVO/Blood Money
Nigga catch these bullets like he catch the bus
Dawg, fame is a motherfucker
Do a nigga four favors, when you can't do the fifth
How soon they forget?
Run up on you at your granny house, give you nine like Fif'
How are niggas s'posed to love you niggas?
Heart beatin' fast when I dap and when I hug you niggas
Drake told me not to trust you niggas
Your energy off, you're finicky, I rush you niggas
Just walkin' 'round the crib like, ""Why a nigga can't live?
Get this money, fuck these bitches though?""
Thinkin' 'bout the beef like:
""We can pass these mothafuckin' straps like a physical""
This my city, nigga, everybody know it
Ridin' 'round town, just me and my four-pound
Tucked in my Tom Fords, hopin' I ain't gotta show it
L.A. niggas be the craziest, these niggas do some shady shit
Niggas'll run up on your car, catch you off guard
Like the Lil Wayne and Baby shit, 40, I'm fucked up

Y'all better not come to my studio with that fake shit
Y'all better not come to my funeral with that fake shit
Y'all better off realizin' there's nothin' that y'all could do wit' me
All I ever asked is keep it eight more than 92 with me, one hunnid
L.A. niggas be the craziest, yeah, one hunnid
L.A., all I ever asked is one hunnid
L.A., L.A. niggas be the craziest, one hunnid
All I ever asked is one


Thank me later, thanks for nothin', thanks for bluffin'
Thank you so, so much for wearin' your true colors
To every single fuckin' function
Had niggas tell me to my face how we were family
And how they love me while they were skimmin' off the budget
Now, when I see 'em, they're the ones that's actin' funny
People been reachin' out to me
And I'm on some straight unresponsive shit
I would have so many friends
If I didn't have money, respect and accomplishments
I would have so many friends
If I held back the truth and I just gave out compliments
I would have all of your fans
If I didn't go pop and I stayed on some conscious shit
I would have so many more friends
If I lost my success and my confidence
I'm in the club every time that they play the competition
If they even play the competition and I seen the response they get
Yeah, nobody's even hearin' it, on top of the pyramid
Might go to Jamaica, disappear again
My circle got so small that it's a period, sayin' to myself

Y'all better not come to my studio with that fake shit
Y'all better not come to my funeral with that fake shit
Y'all better off realizin' there's nothin' that y'all could do wit' me
All I ever asked is keep it eight more than 92 with me, one hunnid
L.A. niggas be the craziest, yeah, one hunnid
L.A., all I ever asked is one hunnid
L.A., L.A. niggas be the craziest, one hunnid
All I ever asked is one


Miss 4 Cent, that was my real nigga
Held a nigga down since he was a lil' nigga
If he was still alive, he would kill niggas
He was Lil' Snupe, I was Meek Mill
Niggas know how it feel when you missin' your nigga though
Can't think, so you roll up that indigo
Stressin' while drivin' down Figuero'
Blowin' kush clouds until his ghost is in my Ghost, damn
Make a real nigga wanna give his life to God like, ""Here it go""
Screamin' Frog name at the clouds, they don't hear me though
Guess they too busy with 2Pac and Biggie though
You niggas don't feel me though
That was on Suge's watch, I'll take Suge's watch
You dissin' Drizzy, that's cool, but don't come to my city though
Not even to H-Town
So underground that I gotta be a trill nigga
Strapped up from the waist down
That's word to Pimp C, J Prince is my real nigga
Shit was so simple when Henchman was out
He had a young nigga right there with Meech
So happy when Bleu Davinci got out
We came up on these California streets
L.A. niggas be the craziest, these niggas do some shady shit
Niggas'll run up on your car, catch you off guard
Like the Lil Wayne and Baby shit
Got a nigga confused, but why a nigga gotta choose?
Don't even matter, dawg, cause I'ma always be a real nigga
Always be a real nigga
I never learned how to be nothin' but a real nigga

Y'all better not come to my studio with that fake shit
Y'all better not come to my funeral with that fake shit
Y'all better off realizin' there's nothin' that y'all could do wit' me
All I ever asked is keep it eight more than 92 with me, one hunnid
L.A. niggas be the craziest, yeah, one hunnid
L.A., all I ever asked is one hunnid
L.A., L.A. niggas be the craziest, one hunnid
All I ever asked is one",2136824
68777,1672076,7 Years,pop,Lukas Graham,2015,3879413,{},"
Once, I was seven years old, my mama told me
""Go make yourself some friends, or you'll be lonely""
Once, I was seven years old


It was a big, big world, but we thought we were bigger
Pushing each other to the limits, we were learning quicker
By eleven, smoking herb and drinking burning liquor
Never rich, so we were out to make that steady figure


Once, I was eleven years old, my daddy told me
""Go get yourself a wife, or you'll be lonely""
Once, I was eleven years old


I always had that dream like my daddy before me
So I started writing songs, I started writing stories
Something about that glory just always seemed to bore me
'Cause only those I really love will ever really know me

Once, I was twenty years old, my story got told
Before the morning sun, when life was lonely
Once, I was twenty years old (Lukas Graham!)


I only see my goals, I don't believe in failure
'Cause I know the smallest voices, they can make it major
I got my boys with me, at least those in favor
And if we don't meet before I leave, I hope I'll see you later


Once, I was twenty years old, my story got told
I was writing 'bout everything I saw before me
Once, I was twenty years old


Soon, we'll be thirty years old, our songs have been sold
We've traveled around the world and we're still roaming
Soon, we'll be thirty years old


I'm still learning about life, my woman brought children for me
So I can sing them all my songs, and I can tell them stories
Most of my boys are with me, some are still out seeking glory
And some I had to leave behind, my brother, I'm still sorry

Soon, I'll be sixty years old, my daddy got sixty-one
Remember life and then your life becomes a better one
I made a man so happy when I wrote a letter once
I hope my children come and visit once or twice a month


Soon, I'll be sixty years old, will I think the world is cold?
Or will I have a lot of children who can warm me?
Soon, I'll be sixty years old
Soon, I'll be sixty years old, will I think the world is cold?
Or will I have a lot of children who can hold me?
Soon, I'll be sixty years old


Once, I was seven years old, my mama told me
""Go make yourself some friends, or you'll be lonely""
Once I was seven years old
Once I was seven years old",2137711
68831,1672658,Gold,pop,Kiiara,2015,1221253,{},"


Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me


Gold up in my, gold up in my teeth
(Gold up, gold up in my teeth)
Don't care what you say to me
I'ma bite your feelings out (Gold up, gold up in my teeth)
I missed you in the basement
(Gold up in my teeth)
But your brother was a good substitute for you


And if you love me, love me, but you never let me go
When the roof was on fire, you never let me know
Say you're sorry, honey, but you never really show
And I could leave the party without ever letting you know
Without ever letting you know

Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Without ever letting you know


Gold up in my, gold up in my teeth
(Gold up, gold up in my teeth)
Tastes like money when I speak
(Gold up, gold up in my teeth)
And I missed you in the basement, yeah
(Gold up in my teeth)
Bodies on the pavement
(Oh, gold up in my teeth)


And if you love me, love me, but you never let me go
And my roof was on fire, you never let me know
Say you're sorry, honey, but you never really show (Gold up in my teeth)
And I could leave the party without ever letting you know
Without ever letting you know

Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Without ever letting you know


Gold up in my, gold up in my teeth
(Gold up, gold up in my teeth)
Taste like money when I speak
(Gold up, gold up in my teeth)
And I missed you in the basement, yeah
(Gold up in my teeth)
Bodies on the pavement (Oh)


And if you love me, love me, but you never let me go
And my roof was on fire, you never let me know
Say you're sorry, honey, but you never really show (Gold up in my teeth)
And I could leave the party without ever letting you know
Without ever letting you know

Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Roof was on, let me, love me
Without ever letting you know
Roof was on, let me, love me, on, but you, know
Without ever letting you know",2141601
68964,1674334,Antidote,rap,Travis Scott,2015,2191877,{},"
Don't you open up that window
Don't you let out that antidote (Yeah)
Poppin' pills is all we know (Ooh)
In the hills is all we know (Hollywood)
Don't go through the front door (Through the back)
It's lowkey at the night show (Ooh)
So, don't you open up that window (Ooh)
Don't you let out that antidote, yeah


Party on a Sunday (That was fun)
Do it all again on Monday (One more time)
Spent a check on a weekend (Oh my God)
I might do it all again (That's boss shit)
I just hit a three peat (Ooh)
Fucked three hoes I met this week (Robert Horry)
I don't do no old hoes (Oh, no, no)
My nigga, that's a no-no (Straight up)
She just want the coco (Cocaína)
I just want dinero (Paper hunt, where?)
Who that at the front door? (Who that is?)
If it's the feds, oh, no, no, no (Don't let 'em in, shh)

Don't you open up that window (Yeah)
Don't you let out that antidote (Yeah, ooh)
Poppin' pills is all we know (Yeah)
In the hills is all we know (Hollywood)
Don't go through the front door (In the back)
It's lowkey at the night show (Ooh)


Yeah, ooh, ooh, at the night show (Ooh-ooh-ooh, ah)
At the night show (Higher), at the night show (Ooh-ooh-ooh, ah)
Ooh, at the night show (Get lit, my nigga)
Ooh, at the night show (Yeah)


Anything can happen at the night show
Everything can happen at the night show (Ooh-ooh-ooh, ahh)
Ooh, at the night show
Anything can happen at the night show
Ooh, at the night show
Ooh, your bitch not at home, she at the night show
Ooh (Straight up), fuckin' right, ho
Ooh, had to catch a flight for the night show
Ooh (Let's go), let's get piped though
Bottles got us right though, we ain't sippin' light, no (Rrr, La Flame)
I ain't got no type though
Only got one night though, we can do it twice though

Ooh (It's lit), at the night show, ooh
At the night show (Ooh, ooh), at the night show
Ooh, at the night show, yeah, at the night show
Everything can happen at the night show
Ooh, at the night show
Anything can happen at the night show, ooh


Stackin' up day to day, young nigga
You know you gotta go get it, go get it, my nigga
They hatin', they stankin', they waitin'
Don't be mistaken, we dyin', they stayin'
Lord, I'm on fire, they think that I'm Satan
Callin' me crazy on different occasions
Kickin' the cameraman off of my stages
'Cause I don't like how he snappin' my angles
I'm overboard and I'm over-impatient
Over my niggas and these kids my ages
Dealin' with Mo' shit that's more complicated
Like these two bitches that might be related
H-Town, you got one, and you Bun B like a number-one
It's late night, got a late show
If you wanna roll, I got a place where (Ah)


Poppin' pills is all we know (Ooh)
In the hills is all we know (Hollywood)
Don't go through the front door (Through the back)
It's lowkey at the night show (Ooh)
So don't you open up that window (Ooh)
(Don't you let out that antidote)",2145913
69191,1676617,All Eyes on You,rap,Meek Mill,2015,2217561,"{""Nicki Minaj"",""Chris Brown""}","
Yeah, yeah, baby, is you drunk? Is you had enough?
Are you here lookin' for love? Ooh, ooh
Got the club goin' crazy
All these bitches, but my eyes on you
Is you somebody's baby?
If you ain't, girl, what we gon' do?
If your ego need it, baby, yeah, yeah, yeah (oh)
Give it all up for you right now
We got the club goin' crazy
All eyes, all eyes on you


She was the baddest, I was the realest (ooh, ooh)
We was the flyest, up in the buildin' (yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
We was countin' this money, lovin' the feelin' (ooh, oh, ooh)
Look at you now, in love with a hitta (yeah, yeah, yeah)
But now it's all eyes on me, and it all lies on me (yeah, yeah)
To say somethin' to your pretty ass
Some hood shit, what you lookin' at? (Uh-huh)
'Cause I'm good for that, Birkin bags, I'm good for that (yeah)
Might just be your plug for that (yeah)
You might fall in love with that, got love for that (yeah, yeah, yeah)
What's your name? Who you with?
Where you from? You the shit
Choose and pick, get the right one
All these chicks, got to like one (yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
All these hits, you got to like one
All these bottles, got to like some (oh, ooh)
All these models, got the right one
What you gon' do? Hide or run? Woah
You ready?

(Yeah) Baby, is you drunk? Is you had enough?
Are you here lookin' for love? Ooh, ooh
Got the club goin' crazy
All these bitches, but my eyes on you
Is you somebody's baby?
If you ain't, girl, what we gon' do? (Ooh)
If your ego need it, baby, yeah, yeah, yeah (baby, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Give it all up for you right now
We got the club goin' crazy
All eyes, all eyes on you


Yo, he was the realest, I was the baddest, we was the illest
When he approached me, I said, ""Yo what the deal is?""
In and out them dealers, rockin' chinchillas
I got him in the back of that 'bach, I think he catchin' feelings
Now it's all eyes on us, and this all lies on trust
And if them bitches wanna trip, tell 'em they tour guide's on us
This kitty cat on reclusive, he duck, duckin' them gooses
I put him on to that new new, now he only fuck with exclusives
He was like (What's your name?) My name Nick
(Where you from?) New York in this bitch
(Choose and pick) You got the right one
All them hoes, ain't nothin' like them
Nigga, you know you'd never wife them
None of them niggas ain't never hit this
Still at the top of all they hit lists
What they gon' do? Meek and Nick

Yeah, baby, is you drunk? Is you had enough?
Are you here lookin' for love? Ooh, ooh
Got the club goin' crazy
All these hittas, but my eyes on you
Is you somebody's baby? (Ah, ooh, ooh)
If you ain't, boy, what we gon' do?
If your ego need it, baby, yeah, yeah, yeah (oh)
Give it all up for you right now
We got the club goin' crazy
All eyes, all eyes on you


She was the baddest, he was the realest (ooh, ooh)
We was the fliest, we was the illest
(Yeah, yeah, yeah)
I was the realest, I was the baddest (ooh, ooh)
We was the fliest, up in the buildin' (oh, ooh)
(Yeah, yeah, yeah)",2153759
69277,1677679,TK from Ling tosite sigure - unravel Romanized,rock,Genius Romanizations,2014,1686083,{},"


Oshiete, oshiete yo sono shikumi wo
Boku no naka ni dare ga iru no?
Kowareta, kowareta yo kono sekai de
Kimi ga warau nanimo miezu ni


Kowareta boku nante sa
Iki wo tomete
Hodokenai mou hodokenai yo
Shinjitsu sae


Freeze
Kowaseru, kowasenai, kurueru, kuruenai
Anata wo mitsukete


Yureta yuganda sekai ni dan dan
Boku wa sukitootte mienaku natte
Mitsukenaide boku no koto wo mitsumenaide
Dareka ga egaita sekai no naka de
Anata wo kizutsuketaku wa nai yo
Oboeteite boku no koto wo (azayaka na mama)

Mugen ni hirogaru kodoku ga karamaru
Mujaki ni waratta kioku ga sasatte
Ugokenai, ugokenai, ugokenai, ugokenai, ugokenai, ugokenai yo


Unravelling the world


Kawatte shimatta kaerarenakatta
Futatsu ga karamaru futari ga horobiru
Kowaseru, kowasenai, kurueru, kuruenai
Anata wo kegasenai yo


Yureta yuganda sekai ni dan dan
Boku wa sukitootte mienaku natte
Mitsukenaide boku no koto wo mitsumenaide
Yureka ga shikunda kodoku na wana ni
Mirai ga hodokete shimau mae ni
Omoidashite boku no koto wo (azayaka na mama)


Wasurenaide, wasurenaide
Wasurenaide, wasurenaide

Kawatte shimatta koto ni paralyze
Kaerarenai koto darake no paradise
Oboeteite boku no koto wo


Oshiete, oshiete
Boku no naka ni dare ga iru no?",2156489
69295,1677950,How Deep Is Your Love,pop,Calvin Harris & Disciples,2015,1441481,{},"
I want you to breathe me in
Let me be your air
Let me roam your body freely
No inhibition, no fear


How deep is your love?
Is it like the ocean?
What devotion are you?
How deep is your love?
Is it like nirvana?
Hit me harder again
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?
Is it like the ocean?
Pull me closer again
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?

Open up my eyes and
Tell me who I am
Let me in on all your secrets
No inhibition, no sin


How deep is your love?
Is it like the ocean?
What devotion are you?
How deep is your love?
Is it like nirvana?
Hit me harder again
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?
Is it like the ocean?
Pull me closer again
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?


So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deeper?
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deep?
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deeper?
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deep?
(How deep is your love?)
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deeper?
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deep?
(How deep is your love?)
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deeper?
(Pull me closer, again)
So tell me, how deep is your love?

How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?
How deep is your love?


So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deeper?
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deep?
(How deep is your love?)
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deeper?
So tell me, how deep is your love? Can it go deep?

",2158086
69464,1680153,Best Friend,rap,Young Thug,2015,1811260,{},"
Ricky Racks, I see you!
Thugger!
YSL for life, bitch
Yeah fuck you, your momma and everything else
Yung Shad, you killed this track
Free the GOAT!


That's my best friend, that's my best friend, flexin'
Big ol' booty bitch missus from Texas, what's next is
I'm gon' skeet off, lil' nigga come catch me, catch me
And that's my bestie, my bestie, my best friend, go best friend
Nigga livin' TTG and everything is still on fleek
Bad bitch rollin' wit' me, she gon' smile 'cause she on fleek
Hundred thousand dollars inside my pants, my shit on fleek
Hey-yeah! Yeah


Take them boys to school, swagonometry
Bitch I'm bleedin' bad, like a bumble bee
Hold up! Hold it, hold it, nigga proceed
I'ma eat that booty just like groceries
Eat on that coochie, lay that bitch down like ""let's do it""
No Tiger, bitch, eat that wood, eat that wood
Supplier, bitch, I got pistols, no wood
I want them tacos that are Meagan Good
Helicopter choppin' with the buzz
Stuff them racks inside them if they nudge
Bang that other side, nigga curb
And my reefer louder than a speaker
Yeah my niece is hangin' with The Beatles
If you ever find her, better keep her
37 cameras for the sneakers
Goin' out like Ox or Beanie Sigel
Send a cop, I can't wait to mistreat 'em
Forcin' your ho, I can't wait to mislead 'em
And beat 'em, they ain't my people

That's my best friend, that's my best friend, flexin'
Big ol' booty bitch missus from Texas, what's next is
I'm gon' skeet off, lil' nigga come catch me, catch me
And that's my bestie, my bestie, my best friend, go best friend
Nigga livin' TTG and everything is still on fleek
Bad bitch rollin' wit' me, she gon' smile 'cause she on fleek
Hundred thousand dollars inside my pants, my shit on fleek
Hey-yeah! Yeah!


Let me tell you how I spent a couple hundreds today
I done cut back on that lean, I'm on that Hen' and D'ussé
Don't do no talkin', when you see him, you better shoot in his face
I got a hundred bitches that can't wait to replace
Michael Jackson, nigga, Thugger Jackson moon walkin'
The S.L.I.M.E. army tool shoppin'
Me a horny goat, I'm boolin' at the bull stop
No I can't get arrested 'cause I'm talkin' 'bout my necklace
I'ma put that bitch in the buck, I'm a dog, let's get stuck
My lil' sister Dora, eat them Lucky Charms and give me luck
Waddup cuz? Here yo cup, call my Bloods, bring my bup
Your crew suck, don't got bucks, these ain't drugs, nigga


That's my best friend, that's my best friend, flexin'
Big ol' booty bitch missus from Texas, what's next is
I'm gon' skeet off, lil' nigga come catch me, catch me
And that's my bestie, my bestie, my best friend, go best friend
Nigga livin' TTG and everything is still on fleek
Bad bitch rollin' wit' me, she gon' smile 'cause she on fleek
Hundred thousand dollars inside my pants, my shit on fleek
Hey-yeah!",2165110
69498,1680481,The Less I Know the Better,rock,The Less I Know the Better Lyrics - Tame Impala,2015,1640213,"{""Tame Impala""}","
Someone said they left together
I ran out the door to get her
She was holding hands with Trevor
Not the greatest feeling ever
Said, ""Pull yourself together
You should try your luck with Heather""
Then I heard they slept together
Oh, the less I know the better
The less I know the better


Oh, my love, can't you see yourself by my side?
No surprise when you're on his shoulder like every night
Oh, my love, can't you see that you're on my mind?
Don't suppose we could convince your lover to change his mind?
So goodbye


She said, ""It's not now or never
Wait ten years, we'll be together""
I said, ""Better late than never
Just don't make me wait forever""
Don't make me wait forever
Don't make me wait forever

Oh, my love, can't you see yourself by my side?
I don't suppose you could convince your lover to change his mind?


I was doing fine without ya
Till I saw your face, now I can't erase
Giving in to all his bullshit
Is this what you want? Is this who you are?
I was doing fine without ya
Till I saw your eyes turn away from mine
Oh, sweet darling, where he wants you
Said, ""Come on, Superman, say your stupid line""
Said, ""Come on, Superman, say your stupid line""
Said, ""Come on, Superman, say your stupid line""",2165830
69920,1701325,Silent Night,pop,Christmas Songs,1818,1653014,{},"
Silent night, holy night
All is calm, all is bright
Round yon Virgin, Mother and Child
Holy Infant so tender and mild
Sleep in heavenly peace
Sleep in heavenly peace


Silent night, holy night
Shepherds quake at the sight
Glories stream from heaven afar
Heavenly hosts sing Alleluia
Christ the Savior is born
Christ the Savior is born


Silent night, holy night
Son of God, love's pure light
Radiant beams from Thy holy face
With the dawn of redeeming grace
Jesus Lord, at Thy birth
Jesus Lord, at Thy birth",2198790
70084,1713201,Where Ya At,rap,Where Ya At Lyrics - Future,2015,1305864,"{Drake,Future}","
I don't wanna hear all that, I don't wanna hear none of that
Talkin' commas, how much you need and all that shit
Fuck that shit, I don't remember none of that shit


Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas wouldn't feed me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when bitches didn't need me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas tried to run off?
Where your ass was at, dog? You made me pull this gun out


Where your ass was at, dog, you went and switched sides?
Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas spread lies on him?
Where your ass was at, dog, when the bodies came sliding?
Where your ass was at, dog, when I was serving pies?


Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas wouldn't feed me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when bitches didn't need me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas tried to run off?
Where your ass was at, dog? You made me pull this gun out

Where your ass was at, dog, when I was in the Pyrex?
Where your ass was at, dog, when I was drinking Hi-Tech?
Where your ass was at, dog? You came through the projects
Where your ass at? We keep that fully loaded contracts
Had her rain dance on the dick, ass jumping
Running through the pussy like a nigga going jogging
Fuck a little Louis, put it in a bitch pocket
Put a pic with me on the 'gram, now you popping
Where your ass was at when I was trapping in the store?
Had to struggle to get where I'm at and sell dope
Jackie Chan moves got game in the choke
Gas rolling up in the blunt, Amoco
12 tryin' come in the spot to open up the dope
Burglar bar doors got a young nigga confident
Juugin' out the stove and we still bangin', honest
Blowing on the O, yo, we call that ho an onion


Man, where your ass was at when we took the city over?
Where your ass was at when all they'd ask was ""What's the hold up?""
Where your ass was at when niggas first got the news?
Now your ass around because we're paying back dues
Where were you when all the dogs needed help?
Lawyers and the commissary ain't gon' pay itself
Where your ass was at when we recorded in the bathroom?
Where your ass was at? I take attendance like a classroom
Man I ain't got no choice
'Cause nowadays I swear this shit done changed up for the boy
I'm self-made, selfish with my women, self-employed
I'll buy the neighbor's house if they complain about the noise
Man, where your ass was at, dog, when niggas wouldn't feed me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when bitches didn't need me?
Where your ass was at? Last winter was the coldest
Fuck where you was at, I had the 6 on my shoulders

Where your ass was at dog, when niggas wouldn't feed me?
Where your ass was at dog, when bitches didn't need me?
Where your ass was at dog, when niggas tried to run off?
Where your ass was at dog? You made me pull this gun out


60 for a walk through, bitch don't panic
Had them bitches fall through fucking like a savage
Heard you tryna swim in the ocean no jacket
Heard that nigga came through squeezing on a ratchet
Heard that nigga came through squeezing on a ratchet
Serve a lot of dog food, call you a mutt
Where your ass was at dog, when I was on my come-up?
The reason I'm here today 'cause I ain't never gave up


Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas wouldn't feed me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when bitches didn't need me?
Where your ass was at, dog, when niggas tried to run off?
Where your ass was at, dog? You made me pull this gun out


Where you ass was at, when I was trapping in the store?
Had to struggle to get where I'm at and sell dope
Juugin' out the stove and we still bangin', honest
Blowing on the O, yo, we call that ho an onion",2213109
70100,1713522,Thought It Was a Drought,rap,Future,2015,1053239,{},"
Uh, Wizard
Dirty soda, Spike Lee
White girl, Ice T
Fully loaded AP, yeah


I just fucked your bitch in some Gucci flip flops
I just had some bitches and I made 'em lip lock
I just took a piss and I seen codeine coming out
We got purple Actavis, I thought it was a drought


Bitch, I'ma choose the dirty over you
You know I ain't scared to lose you
They don't like it when you're telling the truth
I'd rather be realer than you
I had to make me a cot
Now I called a contractor to make me a spot
I sold the dope out your house
Now you come to my house, I've got dope in the couch
You know I don't fuck with no rumors
Rocking red bottoms like they Pumas
Got these meds on me, I'ma do 'em
I take these pills and I'm having a thrill
Taking prescription's a hell of a feeling
As for the xanny, I never forgot it
Got 'em begging to call up my phone tryna have a menage
Gotta put up the cash, can't even stay in the house
Cause there's too much to hide
Whip the four to a nine, gotta pay up the rent, I was too far behind
Fuck I'm too out of time, fuck 'em two at a time
Had to do what I had to do to get where I'm at, niggas know I ain't lying
Niggas know I ain't lying
It's a lot on my mind, it's a lot on my plate
But I never complain
I was working the weight like I came out the gym
I never did train
Put the girl on a train
Strapped a bird on her back, now she came back with change, ayy

I just fucked your bitch in some Gucci flip flops
I just had some bitches and I made 'em lip lock
I just took a piss and I seen codeine coming out
We got purple Actavis, I thought it was a drought
I just fucked your bitch in some Gucci flip flops
I just had some bitches and I made 'em lip lock
I just took a piss and I seen codeine coming out
We got purple Actavis, I thought it was a drought


I strapped the dope to your spouse
The first time I gave her an ounce
I put some free bands in her account
I told her, ""Bitch, can't be running your mouth
Better watch what you say to these niggas
Cause you already know what they 'bout""
Put the game in a choke in a knot
Hit that bitch while I'm choking her out
Put that hook on her, now she got love in the south
I got some purp on me now
Stacking these styrofoams up by the double
They done let me back in, now they know they in trouble
Valet the whip by the front door
On a percocet now and I need me some more
Tell me them lies that you want me to hear
I try to forget, but it's hard to forgive
Take me some codeine and pop me a pill
I pull on a blunt and blow smoke out my ears
I smoke on this blunt, I get high as I can
I float off the Earth in designer
I'm working on having some manners
I'm thinking about it right now
I'm holding the cash while I pour up the lean
Then I put one in the air

I just fucked your bitch in some Gucci flip flops
I just had some bitches and I made 'em lip lock
I just took a piss and I seen codeine coming out
We got purple Actavis, I thought it was a drought
I just fucked your bitch in some Gucci flip flops
I just had some bitches and I made 'em lip lock
I just took a piss and I seen codeine coming out
We got purple Actavis, I thought it was a drought


Thought it was a drought, thought it, thought it was a drought
We thought it was a drought, we poured an Actavis
Bitch, I'ma choose the dirty over you
You know I ain't scared to lose you
They don't like it when you're telling the truth
I'd rather be realer than you
(Young Metro, Young Metro, Young Metro
Young Metro, Young Metro, Young Metro
Young Metro, Young Metro, Young Metro
Young Metro, Young Metro, Young Metro
Young Metro, Young Metro, Young Metro)",2213836
70515,1734575,The Cuppycake Song,pop,Buddy Castle,1994,1615871,"{""Amy Castle""}","You're my honeybunch, sugar plum, pumpy-umpy-umpkin
You're my sweetie pie
You're my cuppycake, gumdrop, snoogums-boogums
You're the apple of my eye
And I love you so and I want you to know
That I'll always be right here
And I love to sing sweet songs to you
Because you are so dear",2238919
71013,1750439,Say It,rb,Tory Lanez,2015,1277123,{},"


Just keepin' it honest
You wouldn't want a young nigga if I wasn't whippin' this foreign
That's why I came back, top down


You gon' have to do more than just (Say it)
You gon' have to do less when you (Do it)
So mama you know I (Show it)
Always want you to (Prove it)
You gon' have to do more than just (Say it)
You gon' have to do less when you (Do it)
So mama you know I (Show it)
So you gon' need to more than just (Prove it)


And you know, you know
And you know, in this foreign car, let it go
And you know, you know
And you know, in this foreign car, let you know

How you know that I want you?
And you want me?
But I now know
You know I know that this ain't right
'Cause you want me cause I got dough
Ever since you walked in inside my foreign, slam my door
You know I know that you been on it
But I been on it on the low


So let a young nigga get down on it, yeah
Love when you spin 'round on it, yeah
Even though a young nigga want you
Shawty, I promise the truth
And when I come down on it, yeah
You love when I'm down on it, yeah
Fuck around, spend time on it, yeah
That's why I came back top down


You gon' have to do more than just (Say it)
You gon' have to do less when you (Do it)
So mama you know I (Show it)
Always want you to (Prove it)
You gon' have to do more than just (Say it)
You gon' have to do less when you (Do it)
So mama you know I (Show it)
So you gon' need to more than just (Prove it)

And you know, you know
And you know, in this foreign car, let it go
And you know, you know
And you know, in this foreign car, let you know


Gots to break it down for you to let you know
You know it's things you know I'm down for
Ain't gon' act like you ain't 'bout my dough
You know I know, but girl, you know I'm down for
Take your time to find you
I won't hesitate to take the time to waste, no, baby
Bringin' out the foreign out to play
You know it's things it takes


So let a young nigga get down on it, yeah
Love when you spin 'round on it, yeah
Even though a young nigga want you
Shawty, I promise the truth
And when I come down on it, yeah
You love when I'm down on it, yeah
Fuck around, spend time on it, yeah
That's why I came back top down

You gon' have to do more than just (Say it)
You gon' have to do less when you (Do it)
So mama you know I (Show it)
Always want you to (Prove it)
You gon' have to do more than just (Say it)
You gon' have to do less when you (Do it)
So mama you know I (Show it)
So you gon' need to more than just (Prove it)


And you know, you know
And you know, in this foreign car, let it go
And you know, you know
And you know, in this foreign car, let you know


Say it, baby, do it, baby
Show it, baby, prove it, baby
Say it, baby, do it, baby
Show it, baby, prove it, baby
All I'm tryin' to say
I just wanna see your body move in different ways
All I wanna do is come close to you
You make me come through, I get so close to you",2263139
71026,1750558,Hit The Quan,rap,Hit The Quan Lyrics - iLoveMemphis,2015,1406637,{​iLoveMemphis},"


Yeah (Yeah)
Bah, uh, yeah (Hey, Buck Nasty)
Ah, ayy, wait 'til they feel me
I finna, I finna, finna show you how to


Hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan
I said get down low and swing your arm
I said get down low and hit the Quan
I'm finna show you how to
Hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan
I said get down low and swing your arm
I said get down low and hit the Quan


I paper chase then vanish
Hit the Quan on her, make her boyfriend panic
IHeartMemphis, but I also love dancing
I done took off on 'em, I don't plan on landing
I call shots just do it like Nike
No FaceTime, but the people want to Skype me
If I do time, then who would really write me?
I stay on y'all mind but, ""Oh, I think they like me""
Clean pair of sneaks with a designer belt
Please watch your step, 'cause I'm feeling myself
Throw a flag on the play, man somebody get the ref
Go, ""Blah la la la low,"" man, somebody get some help
Pulled up on the block

Hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan
I said get down low and swing your arm
I said get down low and hit the Quan
I'm finna show you how to
Hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan
I said get down low and swing your arm
I said get down low and hit the Quan


Pull up on the block and do the dance like crazy
This chick is hella hot, but I know this chick crazy
If I think she not, then that makes me crazy
We are both thots so we are both are crazy
Flexing always on my agenda
Your whole team rats, your CEO is Master Splinter
'Bout to hit the Quan and turn that girl into a member
Now my whole team flexing, I think we got a winner
People want to dap it up but they can't get none from me
I went to jail and snap it up, at least I had bum money
People wanna walk around me tryna steal my lingo
Just make sure when you talk about me you say he's doing his thing though


Hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan
I said get down low and swing your arm
I said get down low and hit the Quan
I'm finna show you how to
Hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan, hit the Quan
I said get down low and swing your arm
I said get down low and hit the Quan",2263487
71035,1750653,Shameless,pop,The Weeknd,2015,1013300,{},"
Yeah
Uh, uh, yeah


Say it louder, say it louder
Who's gonna love ya
Like me, like me?
Say it louder, say it louder
Who's gonna touch ya
Like me, like me?


Ooh, said you wanna be good
But you couldn't keep your composure
Ooh, said you wanna be good
But you're begging me to come over
Ooh, come over
Ooh, sayin' who's gonna fuck ya
Like me?
Yeah

I don't wanna hurt you
But you live for the pain
I'm not tryna say it
But it's what you became
You want me to fix you
But it's never enough
That's why you always call me
'Cause you're scared to be loved, uh


But I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
Girl, I have no shame (Shame)
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
Girl, I have no shame (Shame)


Say it louder, say it louder
Yeah, who's gonna love ya
Like me, uh, like me, yeah?
Say it louder, say it louder
Who's gonna touch ya
Like me, uh, like me?

Ooh, said it'd be the last time
All you needed was a little closure
Ooh, said it'd be the last time
But you're begging me to come over
Ooh, come over
Ooh, saying who's gonna fuck ya
Like me?
Hey


I don't wanna hurt you
But you live for the pain
I'm not tryna say it
But it's what you became
You want me to fix you
But it's never enough
That's why you always call me
'Cause you're scared to be loved, uh


But I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
Girl, I have no shame (Shame)
Girl, I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
Girl, I have no shame (Shame)

Who's gonna fuck you like...
Hey!
Woo-ooh


I don't wanna hurt you
But you live for the pain
I'm not tryna say it
But it's what you became, no
You want me to fix you
But it's never enough (Never enough)
That's why you always call me
'Cause you're scared to be loved (Scared to be loved)


But I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you (I'll always be there for you)
Girl, I have no shame (Shame)
Girl, I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
I'll always be there for you
Girl, I have no shame (Shame)
Girl, I have no-no shame",2263591
71047,1750739,Charged Up,rap,Drake,2015,1508356,{},"
Stop, stop, stop...
Fuck niggas gon' be fuck niggas
That's why we never give a fuck when a fuck nigga switched up
I'm so sorry
Did you hope I was crying?
It was rough without you
It was rough without you


I did some charity today for the kids
But I'm used to it 'cause all y'all charity cases
All y'all stare in my face in hopes you could be the replacement
Niggas is snitchin' on us without no interrogation
I stay silent 'cause we at war and I'm very patient
Six God is watchin', I just hope you're prepared to face him
I'm charged up, I'm charged up


Wow, I'm honored that you think this is staged
I'm flattered, man, in fact, I'm amazed
The perfect start to the summer, man, this shit is a doozy
This shit a twist in the movie, but don't jump to conclusions
You boys are gettin' into your feelings on me
You should embrace it, this could be one of our realest moments
Okay, the flow start to feel familiar, don't it?
Must I remind you that Jimmy got 20 million on it?
Need DJ Clue to drop a bomb on it
None of them want this shit more than I want it
I seen it all comin', knew they would push a button
East egg huntin', they gotta look for somethin'
Done doin' favors for people
'Cause it ain't like I need the money I make off a feature
I see you niggas havin' trouble goin' gold
Turnin' into some so-and-sos that no one knows
But so it go
Come live all your dreams out at OVO
We gon' make sure you get your bread and you know the ropes
I get a ring and I bring it home like I'm Cory Joe
No woman ever had me star-struck
Or was able to tell me to get my bars up
I'm charged up
Oh no, we eatin', niggas ain't about to starve us
Nah, niggas ain't about to starve us
I'm charged up

I bought my niggas rollies off of Thank Me Later
While these boys was stanky leggin'
Trust me, this information is vital
I'm tryin' to take the high road, I still got love for my idols
I got me a deal with Apple and I still feel entitled
Rumor has it, there's somethin' that only I know
Rumor has it, I steer the ship with my eyes closed
Rumor has it, I either fucked her or never could
But rumor has it, hasn't done you niggas any good
It's sound, sound, sound 'til the day I die
We goin' live to keep this shit alive
Cops are killin' people with they arms up
And your main focus is tryna harm us?
And you think you 'bout to starve us?
Niggas ain't about to starve us
Nah, I'm charged up!


(Stop, stop, stop, stop...)
Have you seen me? I'm doing so good
Every time we meet: ""Oh, I'm so sorry""
(Fuck niggas gon' be fuck niggas
That's why we never give a fuck when a fuck nigga switched up)


""You know, I kept it real
It ain't too many real people out here
And people be on some weak bitch-ass shit all day long
Industry people... regular people...
And then when you keep it real with people, they cross the line, take your kindness for weakness and that's weak.""",2263716
71048,1750745,Hotline Bling,pop,Drake,2015,6877777,{},"
You used to call me on my
You used to, you used to
Yeah


You used to call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
Call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
And I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing
I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing


Ever since I left the city, you
Got a reputation for yourself now
Everybody knows and I feel left out
Girl, you got me down, you got me stressed out
'Cause ever since I left the city, you
Started wearing less and goin' out more
Glasses of champagne out on the dance floor
Hangin' with some girls I've never seen before

You used to call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
Call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing
I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing


Ever since I left the city, you, you, you
You and me, we just don't get along
You make me feel like I did you wrong
Going places where you don't belong
Ever since I left the city, you
You got exactly what you asked for
Running out of pages in your passport
Hangin' with some girls I've never seen before


You used to call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
Call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
And I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing
I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing

These days, all I do is
Wonder if you're bendin' over backwards for someone else
Wonder if you're rolling up a Backwoods for someone else
Doing things I taught you, gettin' nasty for someone else
You don't need no one else
You don't need nobody else, no
Why you never alone?
Why you always touching road?
Used to always stay at home
Be a good girl, you was in the zone
Yeah, you should just be yourself
Right now, you're someone else


You used to call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
Call me on my cell phone
Late-night when you need my love
And I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing
I know when that hotline bling
That can only mean one thing


Ever since I left the city...
",2263723
71049,1750747,Right Hand,rap,Drake,2015,1485194,{},"
You my right hand, you my go to
Told me everything about you, that's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
Yeah, and they never will


But I swear you gotta chill
You wanna grip a Benz wheel
And I know you can't wait
You dream big and sleep late
You got a lot on your plate
That's why you're always working out
Taking pictures of yourself
You don't see anybody else
And you're like, ""Oh well""
You're like, ""Fuck it, oh well""
My past behind me like a ponytail

But you my right hand, you my go to
Told me everything about you, that's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
Yeah, and they never will


Okay, I know you want the Audi
I know you want to go to Maui
You and all your girlfriends
The ones you never bring around me
'Cause you don't trust me like your last man
Did he open doors for ya?
Buy the things you can't afford for ya?
'Cause he must have did a lot for ya
I just fell back with it
And now your past is behind you like the car with the strap in it
Thank God that's finished
'Cause now it's back to business
Any more Henny and you're past the limit
You told me 'bout the picture, now you have to send it
I would never put you on blast when I get it


You my right hand, you my go to
Told me everything about you, that's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
And they never will
You my right hand, you my go to
Told me everything about you, that's a bold move
I know that you're out here
And there's things you gotta go through
Just know that these streets just don't love you like I do
And they never will",2263725
71058,1750834,​i​ hate u i love u,pop,Garrett Nash,2016,6154593,"{""Olivia O\\'Brien""}","
Feeling used, but I'm
Still missing you and I can't
See the end of this
Just wanna feel your kiss against my lips
And now all this time is passing by
But I still can't seem to tell you why
It hurts me every time I see you
Realize how much I need you


I hate you, I love you
I hate that I love you
Don't want to, but I can't put
Nobody else above you
I hate you, I love you
I hate that I want you
You want her, you need her
And I'll never be her


I miss you when I can't sleep
Or right after coffee or right when I can't eat
I miss you in my front seat
Still got sand in my sweaters
From nights we don't remember
Do you miss me like I miss you?
Fucked around and got attached to you
Friends can break your heart, too
And I'm always tired, but never of you
If I pulled a you on you, you wouldn't like that shit
I put this reel out, but you wouldn't bite that shit
I type a text, but then I never mind that shit
I got these feelings, but you never mind that shit
Oh oh, keep it on the low
You're still in love with me, but your friends don't know
If you wanted me, you would just say so
And if I were you, I would never let me go

I hate you, I love you
I hate that I love you
Don't want to, but I can't put
Nobody else above you
I hate you, I love you
I hate that I want you
You want her, you need her
And I'll never be her


I don't mean no harm, I just miss you on my arm
Wedding bells were just alarms
Caution tape around my heart
You ever wonder what we could have been?
You said you wouldn't and you fucking did
Lie to me, lie with me, get your fucking fix
Now all my drinks and all my feelings are all fucking mixed
Always missing people that I shouldn't be missing
Sometimes you gotta burn some bridges just to create some distance
I know that I control my thoughts and I should stop reminiscing
But I learned from my dad that it's good to have feelings
When love and trust are gone
I guess this is moving on
Everyone I do right does me wrong
So every lonely night, I sing this song

I hate you, I love you
I hate that I love you
Don't want to, but I can't put
Nobody else above you
I hate you, I love you
I hate that I want you
You want her, you need her
And I'll never be her


All alone, I watch you watch her
Like she's the only girl you've ever seen
You don't care, you never did
You don't give a damn about me
Yeah, all alone, I watch you watch her
She is the only thing you've ever seen
How is it you never notice
That you are slowly killing me?


I hate you, I love you
I hate that I love you
Don't want to, but I can't put
Nobody else above you
I hate you, I love you
I hate that I want you
You want her, you need her
And I'll never be her",2263909
71160,1752103,Back to Back,rap,Drake,2015,4970613,{},"
Oh man
Oh man, oh man
Not again


Yeah
I learned the game from William Wesley, you can never check me
Back to back for the niggas that didn't get the message
Back to back, like I'm on the cover of Lethal Weapon
Back to back, like I'm Jordan '96, '97
Woah-very important and very pretentious
When I look back, I might be mad that I gave this attention
Yeah, but it's weighin' heavy on my conscience
Yeah, and fuck, you left The Boy no options
I wanna see my niggas go insane
You gon' make me step out of my fuckin' frame
You gon' make me buy bottles for Charlamagne
You gon' make me go out of my fuckin' way
I waited four days, nigga, where y'all at?
I drove here in the Wraith, playin' AR-AB
I'm not sure what it was that really made y'all mad
But I guess this is what I gotta do to make y'all rap
I mean whoa, can't fool the city, man, they know what's up
Second floor at Tootsies, gettin' shoulder rubs
This for y'all that think that I don't write enough
They just mad 'cause I got the Midas touch
You love her, then you gotta give the world to her
Is that a world tour or your girl's tour?
I know that you gotta be a thug for her
This ain't what she meant when she told you to open up more
Yeah, trigger fingers turn to Twitter fingers
Yeah, you gettin' bodied by a singin' nigga
I'm not the type of nigga that'll type to niggas
And shout to all my boss bitches wifin' niggas
Make sure you hit him with the prenup
Then tell that man to ease up
I did another one, I did another one
You still ain't did shit about the other one

I got the drink in me, going back to back
Yeah, going back to back
I got the drink in me, going back to back
Yeah, I'm going back to back


I don't wanna hear about this ever again
Not even when she tell him that they better as friends
Not even when you saying, ""Drizzy, tell 'em again!""
I been puttin' on a show, it was a sell-out event
Oh, you need better seatin'
I didn't wanna do it, gave me every reason
The point I'm tryin' to make is I don't ever need 'em
Seen what you'd do for fame, what would you do for freedom?
Please, check 'em for a wire or a earpiece
Please, please do not let these niggas near me
Please, think before you come for the great one
Please, who's a real nigga and who ain't one?
Please, somebody stop me
I'm talkin' boasy and gwanin wassy
I got the fest in five days and it's my shit
Soon as a nigga hit the stage, they gon'


They gon' ask if I can play this shit back to back
Yeah, they want it back to back
They gon' ask if I can play this shit back to back
I took a break from Views, now it's back to that, nigga (Six)",2266961
71201,1752676,Wanna Know,rap,Wanna Know Lyrics - Meek Mill,2015,1130806,"{""Meek Mill""}","


I just wanna know how niggas going to jail
Telling on niggas, coming back home and it still being cool
I just wanna know how a nigga on Instagram and Twitter with fifty thousand followers
Ain't got no money in real life, but still popping, I just wanna know
I wanna know, if a nigga ain't really putting it in, but acting like he putting it in
Niggas still letting it fly like it's cool, I really wanna know man
This shit getting different out here it's getting spooky


Now when that shit went down with Chris, you wrote a check
In New Orleans wore my chain to get respect (you a fraud)
So what that tell me? You a pussy and a fed
Say the wrong shit you know the shooters at your neck
I just wanna know, if you ain't write that running through the six shit (huh)
Tell us who the fuck was Quentin running through the six with?
""Running through the six with my woes
Counting money, you know how it goes
All the real live forever, baby
And the fake get exposed""
Niggas writing for you 'cause you know you never did shit
When I threw that hook out, I was tryin' to catch a big fish
We the type of niggas to tie your mother up (Woah)
Fuck your sister in the ass and hit your brother up, pussy
You really sweet, I call you buttercup
You fucking dork you changed the style because you studied us
Coming with the same flow
Switching up your lingo
We just want a refund, this ain't what we paid for
Every time that we come, we get what we came for
Spitting another niggas shit, but you claim you king though?

I just wanna know, I just wanna know
How these niggas acting like they trill but really fake
And people acting like it go
I just wanna know, I just wanna know
Was it Quentin Miller? Was it Hush or was it Detail where you really got your flow?
(Milli Vanilli that nigga)


Money make a fake ass nigga look real again (For real)
Money make a sucker that told look trill again (For real)
Says a lot about all the people that's feeling him
But I'ma show you bitch ass niggas what's real again
Heard that other nigga talking we ain't get back yet
Let's keep it short, nigga you ain't get your chick back yet
And now she rocking with the chaser and now you missed that check
You went from Clear Port to boarding pass you miss that jet, hold up


""Cat, I got to take them off of here-that's right-I got to take them off of here, there's only one, and that's me, you understand?
'Fore all that fighting, you understand? Sucka thinks he good-sucka thinks he can whoop me, And I know he can't whoop me and I-Hey, boy, the nigga whole style is chump, you understand? When it comes to me, you understand, let me get mines first. Then after I get mine, y'all can do what you wanna do.""


You know you fucked up right? (Hey!)
You shoulda just said nothing
Now you're going to have to give me a check to stop
All I hear is platinum that platinum this
Meanwhile I'm on the carpet with a platinum chick
I got a platinum rollie, platinum whip
Niggas frauds I told the truth, don't ask me shit
All this industry fake enemy and rap shit
It's never really my style we got cash to get (Gettin' money)
I really started from nothing now it's back to shit
Puffy almost caught a domestic when he smacked that bitch
Hold up, let that bitch breathe (Woah)

""Yeah, this is called poppin' shit. There's no cut on it. There's no cut on it. If your feelings get hurt, you feel like, ""Oh, that's an arrogant little comment-"" no, this is the truth and the truth hurts. Haven't I paid my dues? Haven't I weathered the storm? Didn't I weather the storm? Niggas is gone and I'm here.""


You let Tip homie piss on you in a movie theater nigga, we ain't forget
Real niggas back in style this shit is lit
This that Ja Rule shit and 50 Cent",2268486
71351,1754310,Angel,pop,Angel Lyrics - The Weeknd,2015,1036110,"{""The Weeknd""}","
(Ooh, ooh)
(Ooh, ooh)
Oh, oh, yeah
Yeah, hey, yeah


Angel, oh-oh-oh-oh
Knew you were special from the moment I saw you (Saw you)
I saw you, yeah
I said, angel, oh-oh-oh-oh
I feel you closer every time I call you (Call you)
I call you


'Cause all I see are wings
Well, I can see your wings
But I know what I am and the life I live (Life I live)
Yeah, the life I live
And even though I sin
Maybe we are born to live
But I know time will tell if we're meant for this
Yeah, if we're meant for this
And if we're not

I hope you find somebody
I hope you find somebody
I hope you find somebody
I hope you find somebody to love
Somebody to love
Somebody to love
Yeah, uh, yeah, yeah


Said, angel, woah-oh-oh-oh
You'll probably never take me back and I know this (Know this)
Yeah, I know this, aw, baby
I said angel, woah-oh-oh-oh
I'm so desensitized to feeling these emotions (Emotions)
Yeah, no emotions, baby


'Cause all I see are wings
Well, I can see your wings
But I know what I am and the life I live (Life I live)
Yeah, the life I live
And even though I sin
We are born to live
But I know time will tell if we're meant for this
Yeah, if we're meant for this
And if we're not

I hope you find somebody (Ooh)
I hope you find somebody (Ooh)
I hope you find somebody (Ooh)
I hope you find somebody to love
Somebody to love
Somebody to love
Yeah, yeah, yeah


And even though we live inside
A dangerously empty life
You always seem to bring the light
You always seem to bring the light
And even though we live inside
A dangerously empty life
You always seem to bring me light
You always seem to bring me light


I hope you find somebody
I hope you find somebody
I hope you find somebody
I hope you find somebody to love
Somebody to love (Somebody to love)
Somebody to love
Yeah, yeah, oh

I hope you find somebody (I hope you find somebody, baby)
I hope you find somebody (Ooh, woah, ooh)
I hope you find somebody (I hope you find somebody)
I hope you find somebody to love (I hope you find somebody to love)
Somebody to love (Somebody to love)
Somebody to love (Somebody to love)
Yeah, yeah, yeah (Woo)


I hope you find somebody (I hope you find, oh)
I hope you find somebody (I hope you find, oh)
I hope you find somebody (I hope you find somebody, baby)
I hope you find somebody to love (Somebody to love)
Somebody to love
Somebody to love
Yeah (Yeah), yeah (Yeah), yeah
Ooh, somebody, baby
I hope you find somebody (If you love somebody)
I hope you find somebody (I hope you find somebody)
I hope you find somebody (I hope you find somebody, babe)
I hope you find somebody to love
Somebody to love (Somebody to love)
Somebody to love (Somebody to love)
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah",2273439
71357,1754330,Tell Your Friends,rb,The Weeknd,2015,1476121,{},"[Produced by Che Pope, Kanye West and The Weeknd; Co-produced by Illangelo; Additional production by Mike Dean]


We are not the same, I am too reckless
I'm not tryna go in that direction
These niggas, they been doin' too much flexin'
And they about to call the wrong attention
And I don't got no patience, no more testin'
I do shit how I want, don't need no blessin'
XO niggas ain't nothin' to mess with
Nobody stoppin' us, oh, no, we destined
And everybody 'round you is so basic
I'm never rockin' white, I'm like a racist
I don't drink my liquor wit' a chase in
That money is the only thing I'm chasin'
And some dope dimes on some coke lines
Gimme head all night, cum four times
Baby girl just wanna smoke a pound
Do an ounce, get some dick, tell her friends about it


Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell 'em what you know, what you seen
How I roll, how I get it on the low
Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell your friends about it
I'm that nigga with the hair
Singin' 'bout poppin' pills, fuckin' bitches, livin' life so trill

Last year I did all the politickin'
This year I'ma focus on the vision (The vision)
I think these hoes deserve another fixin' (Fixin')
I'm talkin' 'bout the ones from the beginnin' (Oh, oh, oh)
Don't believe the rumors, bitch, I'm still a user
I'm still rockin' camo and still roll with shooters
I'm a villain in my city, I just made another killin'
I'ma spend it all on bitches (On bitches)
And everybody fuckin', everybody fuckin'
Pussy on the house, everybody fuckin'
Man, I miss my city, man, it's been a minute (Been a minute)
MIA a habit, Cali was the mission
Cruise through the west-end in my new Benz (Ooh, woah)
I'm just tryna live life through a new lens
Drivin' by the streets I used to walk through
When I had no crib, I guess you call that shit a miracle


Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell 'em what you know, what you seen
How I roll, how I get it on the low
Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell your friends about it
I'm that nigga with the hair
Singin' 'bout poppin' pills, fuckin' bitches, livin' life so trill

Roll some, think I'll roll some
To know some, if we both honest
Who lasts? Yeah, you lie
Spent the whole summer
Tryna be at the wrong place at the right time
But I know what's mine when I see it
I know


My cousin said I made it big and it's unusual
She tried to take a selfie at my Grandma's funeral
Used to roam on Queen, now I sing Queen Street anthems
Used to hate attention, now I pull up in that wagon
And I was broken, I was broken, I was so broke
I used to roam around the town when I was homeless
Me and Lamar would rob a nigga for his Jordans
And flip it just to get these hoes another nose fix
Now we get faded when we want, girl, we got choices
Lay them on the fuckin' table, we got choices
And if they wanna fuck my niggas, they got choices
They told me not to fall in love, that shit is pointless
Yeah, that shit is pointless
They told me not to fall in love, that shit is pointless
Yeah, that shit is pointless
They told me not to fall in love, that shit is pointless

Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell 'em what you know, what you seen
How I roll, how I get it on the low
Go tell your friends about it (About it)
Go tell your friends about it
I'm that nigga with the hair
Singin' 'bout poppin' pills, fuckin' bitches, livin' life so trill",2273458
71358,1754333,Acquainted,rb,The Weeknd,2015,1206474,{},"
Baby, you're no good
'Cause they warned me 'bout your type, girl, I've been ducking left and right
Baby, you're no good
Think I fell for you, I fell for you, I fell for you


You got me puttin' time in, time in
Nobody got me feelin' this way
You probably think I'm lyin', lyin'
I'm used to bitches comin' right 'way


You got me touchin' on your body
You got me touchin' on your body
To say that we're in love is dangerous
But girl, I'm so glad we're acquainted, oh
I'll get you touchin' on your body
I'll get you touchin' on your body
I know I'd rather be complacent
But girl, I'm so glad we're acquainted
We're acquainted

Baby, you're no good
All my niggas think I'm crazy 'cause I'm thinkin' 'bout us lately
But really if I could
I'd forget about you, 'get about you, 'get about you


You got me puttin' time in, time in
Nobody got me feelin' this way
You probably think I'm lyin', lyin'
I'm used to bitches comin' right 'way


You got me touchin' on your body
You got me touchin' on your body
To say that we're in love is dangerous
But girl, I'm so glad we're acquainted, oh
I got you touchin' on your body
I got you touchin' on your body
I know I'd rather be complacent
But girl, I'm so glad we're acquainted
We're acquainted


Momma called me cryin', cryin', cryin', cryin'
'Cause I won't find somebody that's real (She wants somebody that's real), yeah
'Cause every time I try to, try to, try to run
The fast life keeps gaining on me (The fast life keeps gaining on me), sh-yeah
But ever since I met you (Ever since I met you)
I couldn't believe what you did
So comfort me, babe, ain't no rush from me, babe
(Woooooh)

I'll keep on touchin' on your body
I'll keep on touchin' on your body
To say that we're in love is dangerous
But girl, I'm so glad we're acquainted, oh
I got you touchin' on your body (Touchin' on your body)
I got you touchin' on your body (Touchin' on your body)
I know I'd rather be complacent
But girl, I'm so glad we're acquainted
We're acquainted


I'm not tryna talk at all
'Cause I'm tryna love you crazy
Put some more inside your cup
And drink 'til you numb the pain
I got you touchin' on your body
These girls keep touchin' on they body
They got accustomed to the life we live
These girls born in the '90s are dangerous
I got 'em thinkin' that they want me
Although, they know they not the only
I got 'em wanting to embrace their sins
These girls born in the '90s are dangerous",2273462
71976,1761251,What Do You Mean?,pop,Justin Bieber,2015,1218257,{},"


What do you mean?  Oh, oh
When you nod your head yes, but you wanna  say no
What do you mean?  Hey, yeah
When you don't want me to move, but you tell me to go
What do  you mean? Oh,  what do you mean?
Said you're runnin' outta time,  what do you mean?
Oh, oh, oh, what do you mean?
Better make up your mind, what do you mean?


You're so indecisive of what I'm sayin'
Tryna catch the beat, make up your heart
Don't know if you're happy or complainin'
Don't want for us to end, where do I start?


First you wanna go to the left, then you wanna turn right (Right)
Wanna argue all day, makin' love all night (All night)
First you're up, then you're down, and then  between ('Tween)
Oh, I really wanna know

What do you mean?  Oh, oh
When you nod your head yes, but you wanna say no
What do you mean? Hey, yeah
When you don't want me to move, but you tell me to go
What do you mean? Oh, what do you mean?
Said you're runnin' outta time, what do you mean?
Oh, oh, oh, what do you mean? Better make up your mind
What do you mean?


You're overprotective when I'm leavin'
Tryna compromise, but I can't win
You wanna make a point, but you keep preachin'
You had me from the start, won't let this end


First you wanna go to the left, then you wanna turn right
(Turn right)
Wanna argue all day, makin' love all night (All night)
First you're up, then you're down, and then between ('Tween)
Oh, I really wanna know


What do you mean? Oh, oh (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
When you nod your head yes, but you wanna say no
What do you mean? (Oh, what do you mean?) Hey, yeah
When you don't want me to move, but you tell me to go
What do you mean? (I wanna know, ooh)
Oh, what do you mean? (Ooh)
Said you're runnin' outta time, what do you mean? (Oh, baby)
Oh, oh, oh, what do you mean? Better make up your mind
What do you mean? (Don't be so  selfish,  baby, yeah, yeah) Oh, oh
When you nod your head yes, but you wanna say no
What do you mean? (You're so confusin', baby) Hey, yeah
When you don't want me to move (Hey), but you tell me to go
What do you mean? (Be more straightforward)
Oh, what do you mean? (Hey, ah, ah, ah)
Said you're runnin' outta time, what do you mean? (Hey, ah, ah, ah)
Oh,  oh, oh,  what do you mean?  Better make up your mind
What do you mean?",2286779
72021,1761927,What They Want,rap,Russ,2015,1172226,{},"


Yeah (Ooh)
Yeah (Oh)
They let us in the rap game (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
I swear they let me in this motherfucking rap game (Mmm, yeah, yeah)


Got a chick, I call her Lola, she feel like the ocean
Like to drink and smoke some doja and I feel like smoking
Plus she good at charming cobras, I feel like I'm chosen
But she ain't the only one, no
Got a chick, I call her Katia, she be acting boujee
Then she came through and topped me off, now she just a groupie
Got the aura of the Mafia, her friends wish they knew me
But they ain't the only ones, no, no


What they want, what they want, what they want
Dollar signs, yeah, I know it's what they want
What they want, what they want, what they want
Y'all ain't fooling me at all, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh

I been at this shit for nine years, now they start to call
I'm a DIY pioneer, they trying to get involved
Yippee ki-yay, ahh yeah, 'bout to set it off
I'm probably the only one, yeah
Come correct when you approach me, I can size you up
Taking all the shots like Kobe, almost 81
Guess I got to play the goalie and go and save me some
I'm probably the only one, yeah


What they want, what they want, what they want
Dollar signs, yeah, I know it's what they want
What they want, what they want, what they want
Y'all ain't fooling me at all, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh


Who wants my money? I'll tell you who I don't fuck with
Who's pulling strings? I'm just pointing out all the puppets
What I'm demanding is fucking up all the budgets
I'm smart as fuck, they be talking like I'm the dumbest
But I know what they want from me, dollars, lot of stock in me
It ain't nothing personal, it's business and I'm a commodity
But honestly, Pop Pop would be turning in his grave
The day I let someone else become the boss of me
When there's a boss of me, I'll be damned

What they want, what they want, what they want
Dollar signs, yeah, I know it's what they want
What they want, what they want, what they want
Y'all ain't fooling me at all


Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh",2288471
72123,1763201,Daddy Issues,rock,The Neighbourhood,2015,1066562,{},"
Take you like a drug
I taste you on my tongue


You ask me what I'm thinking about
I tell you that I'm thinking about
Whatever you're thinking about (Ah)
Tell me something that I'll forget
And you might have to tell me again
It's crazy what you'll do for a friend


Go ahead and cry, little girl
Nobody does it like you do
I know how much it matters to you
I know that you got daddy issues
And if you were my little girl
I'd do whatever I could do
I'd run away and hide with you
I know that you got daddy issues, and I do too

I tried to write your name in the rain
But the rain never came
So I made with the sun
The shade
Always comes at the worst time (Ah)


You ask me what I'm thinking about
I tell you that I'm thinking about
Whatever you're thinking about
Tell me something that I'll forget
And you might have to tell me again
It's crazy what you'll do for a friend


Go ahead and cry, little girl
Nobody does it like you do
I know how much it matters to you
I know that you got daddy issues
And if you were my little girl
I'd do whatever I could do
I'd run away and hide with you
I know that you got daddy issues


I keep on trying to let you go
I'm dying to let you know
How I'm getting on
I didn't cry when you left at first
But now that you're dead it hurts
This time I gotta know
Where did my daddy go?
I'm not entirely here
Half of me has disappeared

Go ahead and cry, little boy
You know that your daddy did too
You know what your mama went through
You gotta let it out soon, just let it out


Go ahead and cry, little girl
Nobody does it like you do
I know how much it matters to you
I know that you got daddy issues
And if you were my little girl
I'd do whatever I could do
I'd run away and hide with you
I know that you got daddy issues, and I do too


If you were my little girl
I'd do whatever I could do
I'd run away and hide with you
I know that you got daddy issues, and I do too",2290592
72141,1763307,90210,rap,Travis Scott,2015,1676708,"{""Kacy Hill""}","


(Dean, what's poppin'? Yo, Travis)
Mhm, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Mama's bailing down that road, craving 9021...


She a porn star girl, ah, from the valley
(Honestly, God bless)
Who left her hometown world all for that alley
Oh, created Lake Tahoe all from her panties
(I hope it was wet like my jumper, though)
Ooh, used to take the long way home
Long way home, all for that candy, mm (Hahaha)


Baby's hooked on feeling low
Do, do, do
Do, doo

Jacques turned La Flame, now he rolling on an Addy
Fifty on a chain, 'nother fifty on a Caddy, oh
He might pop him a pill, pop him a seal, pop anyone
Pop anything, pop anything to find that alley
Hmm, yeah, to find that alley, mm


Baby's hooked on feeling low
Do, do, do
Do, doo


In the 90210, 90210, looking for that alley
In the 90210, 90210, looking for that alley, ooh
It's the superstar girl, superstar girl, roaming in that alley
Baby's hooked on feeling low
Oh, in the 90210, 90210, somewhere in that alley
Ooh aah




Ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh

Yeah
My granny called, she said, ""Travvy, you work too hard
I'm worried you forget about me""
I'm falling in and out of clouds, don't worry, I'ma get it, Granny, uh
What happened? Now my daddy happy
Mama called me up, that money coming and she love me
I done made it now, I done found life's meaning now
All them days her heart'd break, her heart not in pieces now
Friends turning into fraud niggas
Practicing half the passion, you niggas packaged different
All you niggas, you niggas want the swag, you can't have it
I'ma sell it, your niggas salary 'bout to cap bitch
Youngest nigga out of Houston at the Grammys
Smiling at 'em laughing at me
I passed the rock to Ye, he pump faked then passed it back, bitch
All of this off of rapping, should've wrote this in Latin, yeah, yeah
Mmm, I know, I know, I know, I know, I know
I know, I know, I know, I know, I know
Cuzzo said we in the store', yeah, we 'bout to drop a four
He passed the cigarette, I choke, woo
Told my auntie put them 'Ports down, them 'Ports down
Now you know you love your own now
Hit the stage, they got their hands up, don't put your nose down
I ain't knockin', nigga, I knocked the door down, for sure now
Whole crew, I swear they counting on me
Gold chains, gold rings, I got an island on me
Houses on me, he got them ounces on him
Holy Father, come save these niggas, I'm styling on 'em
Good Lord, I see my good fortune in all these horses
I'm driving too fast to stop, so all these signs, I ignore them
Just this guy from north of the border, my chips is in order
My mom's biggest supporter so now a nigga support a nigga",2290813
72183,1763797,Downtown,rap,Downtown Lyrics - Macklemore & Ryan Lewis,2015,1433326,"{""Kool Moe Dee"",""Macklemore & Ryan Lewis"",""Grandmaster Caz"",""Grandmaster Melle Mel"",""Eric Nally""}","
I went to the moped store, said ""Fuck it""
And salesman's like ""What up, what's your budget?""
And I'm like ""Honestly, I don't know nothing about mopeds""
He said ""I got the one for you, follow me""
Ooh, it's too real
Chromed out mirror, I don't need a windshield
Banana seat, a canopy on two wheels
Eight hundred cash, that's a hell of a deal
I'm headed...


Downtown, cruising through the alley
Tip-toeing in the street like ballet
Pulled up, moped to the valet
White walls on the wheels like mayonnaise
Dope, my crew is ill, and all we need is two good wheels
Got gas in the tank, cash in the bank
And a bad little mama with her ass in my face
I'ma lick that, stick that, break her off, Kit-Kat
Snuck her in backstage, you don't need a wristband
Dope

Killing the game, 'bout to catch a body
Passed the Harley, Dukie on the Ducati
Timbaland, Khaled, Scott Storch, Birdman
Goddamn, man, everybody got Bugattis
But I'ma keep it hella 1987
Head into the dealership and drop a stack and cop a Kawasaki
I'm stunting on everybody, hella raw, pass the Wasabi
I'm so low that my scrotum's almost dragging up on the concrete
My seat is leather, alright, I'm lying, it's pleather
But girl, we could still ride together, oh
You don't need an Uber, you don't need a cab
Fuck a bus pass, you got a moped, man
She got 1988 Mariah Carey hair
Very rare, mom jeans on her derriere
Throwing up the West Side as we tear in the air
Stop by Pike Place, throwing fish to a player


Downtown, downtown (Downtown)
Downtown, downtown (Downtown)
She has her arms around your waist
With a balance that will keep her safe (Downtown)
Have you ever felt the warm embrace (Downtown)
Of a leather seat between your legs
Hey, hey-oh-ey-ey
Hey, hey-oh-ey-ey
Hey, hey-oh-ey-ey
Hey, hey-oh-ey-ey

Downtown
You don't want no beef, boy
Know I run the streets, boy
Better follow me towards
Downtown
What you see is what you get, girl
Don't ever forget, girl
Ain't seen nothing yet until you're
Downtown


Dope
Cut the bullshit, get off my mullet
Stone washed, so raw, moped like a bullet, oh, yee-ow
You can't catch me, a po-po can't reprimand me
I'm in a B-Boy stance, I'm not dancing
I got your girl on the back going tandem
Cause I'm too damn quick, I'm too damn slick
Whole downtown yelling out ""Who that is?""


It's me, the M, the A-C, the K
Sounding like a French pimp from back in the day
I take her to Pend Oreille and I water skate
I mean, water ski, ollie, ollie, oxen free
I'm perusing down Fourth and they watching me
I do a headstand, the eagle lands on my seat
Well hello, but baby, the kickstand ain't free
Now do you or do you not wanna ride with me?
I got one girl, I got two wheels
She a big girl, but ain't a big deal
I like a big girl, I like 'em sassy
Going down the backstreet listening to Blackstreet
Running around the whole town
Neighbors yelling at me like, ""You need to slow down""
""Going thirty-eight, Dan, chill the fuck out
Mow your damn lawn and sit the hell down""
If I only had one helmet, I would give it to you, give it to you
Cruising down Broadway, girl, what a wonderful view, wonderful view
There's layers to this shit, player, tiramisu, tiramisu
Let my coat-tail drag but I ain't tearing my suit, tearing my suit

Downtown, downtown (Downtown)
Downtown, downtown
She has her arms around your waist
With a balance that will keep her safe
Have you ever felt the warm embrace
Of a leather seat between your legs


Downtown
You don't want no beef, boy
Know I run the streets, boy
Better follow me towards
Downtown
What you see is what you get, girl
Don't ever forget, girl
Ain't seen nothing yet until you're
Downtown


You don't want no beef, boy
Know I run the streets, boy
Better follow me towards
Downtown
What you see is what you get, girl
Don't ever forget, girl
Ain't seen nothing yet until you're
Downtown",2291611
72295,1764820,Tuyo,pop,Rodrigo Amarante,2015,1849810,{},"


Soy el fuego que arde tu piel
Soy el agua que mata tu sed
El castillo, la torre yo soy
La espada que guarda el caudal
Tú, el aire que respiro yo
Y la luz de la luna en el mar
La garganta que ansío mojar
Que temo ahogar de amor
""¿Y cuáles deseos me vas a dar?"", (oooh) dices tú
Mi tesoro, basta con mirarlo y tuyo será, y tuyo será""

Tú, el aire que respiro yo
Y la luz de la luna en el mar
La garganta que ansío mojar
Que temo ahogar de amor

¿Y cuáles deseos me vas a dar? (oooh)
Dices tú: ""Mi tesoro, basta con mirarlo y tuyo será, y tuyo será.""",2292971
72668,1768594,My Shot,rap,"My Shot Lyrics - Lin-Manuel Miranda, Anthony Ramos, Daveed Diggs, Okieriete Onaodowan, Leslie Odom, Jr. & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,3634280,"{""Lin-Manuel Miranda / Anthony Ramos / Daveed Diggs / Okieriete Onaodowan / Leslie Odom / Jr. & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
I am not throwing away my shot
I am not throwing away my shot
Hey, yo, I'm just like my country
I'm young, scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwing away my shot
I'ma get a scholarship to King's College
I prob'ly shouldn't brag, but dag, I amaze and astonish
The problem is I got a lot of brains, but no polish
I gotta holler just to be heard
With every word, I drop knowledge
I'm a diamond in the rough, a shiny piece of coal
Tryin' to reach my goal, my power of speech unimpeachable
Only nineteen, but my mind is older
These New York City streets get colder, I shoulder
Ev'ry burden, ev'ry disadvantage
I have learned to manage, I don't have a gun to brandish
I walk these streets famished
The plan is to fan this spark into a flame
But damn, it's getting dark, so let me spell out the name
I am the-

A-L-E-X-A-N-D
E-R-we are-meant to be


A colony that runs independently
Meanwhile, Britain keeps shittin' on us endlessly
Essentially, they tax us relentlessly
Then King George turns around, runs a spending spree
He ain't ever gonna set his descendants free
So there will be a revolution in this century
Enter me


(He says in parentheses)


Don't be shocked when your hist'ry book mentions me
I will lay down my life if it sets us free
Eventually, you'll see my ascendancy


And I am not throwing away
My shot (My shot)
I am not throwing away
My shot (My shot)
Hey, yo, I'm just like my country
I'm young, scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwing away my shot
And I'm not throwing away my shot

I am not throwing away my shot
I am not throwing away my shot
Hey, yo, I'm just like my country
I'm young, scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwing away my shot
It's time to take a shot


I dream of life without a monarchy
The unrest in France will lead to 'onarchy?
'Onarchy? How you say, how you s-oh, 'anarchy!'
When I fight, I make the other side panicky
With my-


Shot


Yo, I'm a tailor's apprentice
And I got y'all knuckleheads in loco parentis
I'm joining the rebellion 'cause I know it's my chance
To socially advance, instead of sewin' some pants
I'm gonna take a-


Shot

But we'll never be truly free
Until those in bondage have the same rights as you and me
You and I, do or die, wait 'til I sally in
On a stallion with the first black battalion
Have another-


Shot


Geniuses, lower your voices
You keep out of trouble and you double your choices
I'm with you, but the situation is fraught
You've got to be carefully taught
If you talk, you're gonna get shot


Burr, check what we got
Mister Lafayette, hard rock like Lancelot
I think your pants look hot
Laurens, I like you a lot
Let's hatch a plot blacker than the kettle callin' the pot
What are the odds the gods would put us all in one spot
Poppin' a squat on conventional wisdom, like it or not
A bunch of revolutionary manumission abolitionists?
Give me a position, show me where the ammunition is

Oh, am I talkin' too loud?
Sometimes I get overexcited, shoot off at the mouth
I never had a group of friends before
I promise that I'll make y'all proud


Let's get this guy in front of a crowd


I am not throwing away my shot
I am not throwing away my shot
Hey, yo, I'm just like my country
I'm young, scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwing away my shot

I am not throwing away my shot
I am not throwing away my shot
Hey, yo, I'm just like my country
I'm young, scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwing away my shot


Ev'rybody sing
Whoa, whoa, whoa (Whoa, whoa, whoa)
Hey
Whoa (Whoa)
Woo
Whoa (Whoa)
Said, let 'em hear ya (Yeah)
Let's go


Whoa, whoa, whoa
I said, shout it to the rooftops
Whoa
Said, to the rooftops
Whoa
Come on
Yeah
Come on, let's go


Rise up
When you're living on your knees, you rise up
Tell your brother that he's gotta rise up
Tell your sister that she's gotta rise up


When are these colonies gonna rise up?
Whoa, whoa, whoa
When are these colonies gonna rise up?
Whoa
When are these colonies gonna rise up?
Whoa
When are these colonies gonna rise up?
Whoa
Rise up (Rise up)


I imagine death so much, it feels more like a memory
When's it gonna get me?
In my sleep? Seven feet ahead of me?
If I see it comin', do I run or do I let it be?
Is it like a beat without a melody?
See, I never thought I'd live past twenty
Where I come from, some get half as many
Ask anybody why we livin' fast and we laugh, reach for a flask
We have to make this moment last, that's plenty

Scratch that
This is not a moment, it's the movement
Where all the hungriest brothers with
Something to prove went?
Foes oppose us, we take an honest stand
We roll like Moses, claimin' our promised land
And? If we win our independence?
Is that a guarantee of freedom for our descendants?
Or will the blood we shed begin an endless
Cycle of vengeance and death with no defendants?
I know the action in the street is excitin'
But Jesus, between all the bleedin' 'n' fightin'
I've been readin' 'n' writin'
We need to handle our financial situation
Are we a nation of states? What's the state of our nation?
I'm past patiently waitin'
I'm passionately smashin' every expectation
Every action's an act of creation
I'm laughin' in the face of casualties and sorrow
For the first time, I'm thinkin' past tomorrow


And I am not throwing away my shot
I am not throwing away my shot
Hey, yo, I'm just like my country
I'm young, scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwing away my shot


We're gonna rise up, time to take a shot
Not throwing away my shot
We're gonna rise up, time to take a shot
Not throwing away my shot
We're gonna
We're gonna


Time to take a shot (Rise up)



Time to take a shot (Rise up)
Time to take a shot (Rise up)
Take a shot, ri- ri- ri-
Shot
Shot
A-yo, it's
Time to take a shot (Time to take a shot)
Time to take a shot (Time to take a shot)
And I am- (And I am)


Not throwin' away my-


Not throwin' away my shot",2300382
72878,1770750,Farmer Refuted,rap,"Thayne Jasperson, Lin-Manuel Miranda & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1687979,"{""Thayne Jasperson / Lin-Manuel Miranda & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
Hear ye, hear ye! My name is Samuel Seabury
And I present ""Free Thoughts on the
Proceedings of the Continental Congress!""
Heed not the rabble who scream revolution
They have not your interests at heart


Oh my God. Tear this dude apart


Chaos and bloodshed are not a solution
Don't let them lead you astray
This Congress does not speak for me


Let him be


They're playing a dangerous game
I pray the king shows you his mercy
For shame, for shame...

Yo!
He'd have you all unravel at the sound of screams
But the Revolution is comin'
The have-nots are gonna win this
It's hard to listen to you with a straight face
Heed not the rabble who scream Revolution
They have not your interests at heart
Chaos and bloodshed already haunt us, honestly you shouldn't even talk
And what about Boston? Look at the cost
N' all that we've lost n' you talk about Congress?!
Chaos and bloodshed are not a solution
Don't let them lead you astray
This Congress does not speak for me
My dog speaks more eloquently than thee
They're playing a dangerous game
But strangely, your mange is the same
I pray the king shows you his mercy
Is he in Jersey?
For shame
For the Revolution
For shame!


For the revolution!

Heed-


If you repeat yourself again I'm gonna-


Scream-


Honestly, look at me, please don't read!


Not your interests-


Don't modulate the key then not debate with me!
Why should a tiny island across the sea regulate the price of tea?


Alexander, please!


Burr, I'd rather be divisive than indecisive, drop the niceties


Silence! A message from the King!
A message from the King!

A message from the King!",2306002
72959,1771601,Fade,rap,Fade Lyrics - Kanye West,2015,1129742,"{""Kanye West"",""Ty Dolla \\$ign"",""Post Malone""}","
Your love is fadin'
Your love is fadin'
Your love is fadin'
I feel it's fadin'


When no one ain't around (I feel it's fadin')
I think I think too much (I feel it's fadin')
Ain't nobody watchin' (I feel it's fadin')
I just fade away


I feel it
Fade away
I feel it
I feel it
Fade away-ay-ay-ay
I think I think too much
I feel it
Your love is fadin'
I feel it

Roll up, roll up; hold up, hold up; po' up, po' up
I feel it
I love to... I wanna... I'm tryna...
I feel it
I'ma rock the boat, work the middle 'til it hurt a little
I feel it
Your love is fadin'
I feel it
Fuckin' with a real ass nigga
I feel it
Fuck how you feel, ass nigga
I feel it
Bitch better act like you know better
I feel it
Woah


When no one ain't around (I feel it's fadin')
I think I think too much (I feel it's fadin')
Ain't nobody watchin' (I feel it's fadin')
I just fade away (I feel it's fadin')


You don't even know, I've been so far gone (I feel it)
I've been so led on, I've been runnin' 'round (I feel it)
I've been on my shit, whole world on my dick (I feel it)
I just need to know (I can feel it)

Oh, deep inside
Deep, deep, down inside
I feel it
Yes, deep inside
Deep, deep, down inside
I feel it
Oh, deep inside
Deep, deep, down inside
I feel it
Yes, deep inside
I get lifted, yes
Deep, deep, down inside
I can feel it
Oh, deep inside
Oh, I get lifted, yes
Deep, deep, down inside
I feel it
Yes, deep inside
Oh, I get lifted, yes
Deep, deep, down inside
I feel it
Oh, deep inside (Oh no, oh no, no, no, no)
Oh, I get lifted, yes
Deep, deep, down inside
I feel it
Yes, deep inside
Oh, I get lifted, yes
Deep, deep, down inside
I get
I feel it's fadin'
Oh, I get lifted, yes

I feel it fadin'
I feel it fadin'
I feel it
I feel it's fadin'",2307999
73163,1773322,Down in the DM,rap,Down in the DM Lyrics - Yo Gotti,2015,1897809,"{""Yo Gotti""}","
I seen your girl post her BM
So I hit her in her DM
All eyes, yeah I see 'em
Yeah, that's your man? I'd hate to be him (whoop)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)


I tell her, Snapchat me that pussy, mood
Or Facetime me that pussy if it's, cool (whoo)
Boy, my DM poppin' (DM poppin')
My DM just caught a body
I got celebs in this DM
They breakin' news if they see them
But nah we don't do no talkin' (we don't do no talkin')
We see sucker shit too often (fuck nigga)


I seen your girl post her BM
So I hit her in her DM
All eyes, yeah I see 'em
Yeah, that's your man? I'd hate to be him (whoop)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)

Don't you hate when you get screenshotted? (petty)
Bitch that DM wasn't for everybody (rules)
I love the 'Gram, I love the 'Gram (I love the 'Gram)
I'm addicted to it, I know I am (I know I am)
And I just followed Angela (Simmons)
Boy, I got a crush on Angela Simmons
They like, ""Damn Gotti, you bold""
Fuck it, I'm gon' let the world know (#goals)


I seen your girl post her BM
So I hit her in her DM
All eyes, yeah I see 'em
Yeah, that's your man? I'd hate to be him (whoop)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)


Snapchat me that pussy, mood
Snapchat me that pussy if it's, cool
Snapchat me that pussy, mood
Snapchat me that pussy if it's, cool

I seen your girl post her BM
So I hit her in her DM
All eyes, yeah I see 'em
Yeah, this your man I hate to be him (whoop)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)
It goes down in the DM (it go down)
It go down in the DM (it go down, it go, down)",2311139
73176,1773437,Scholarships,rap,Drake & Future,2015,1045824,{},"
Yeah
Uh
Future
Wakin' (Metro Boomin want some more, nigga)


I wake up on a daily basis
I count this money up, I'm already rich (Freebandz)
I go so hard with these riches (Freebandz)
I fell in love with this dodie (I did)
I fell in love with the Rollie (Yeah)
I wake up, pray every morning (Pray)
These demons, they callin' my soul (Hold up)
I said fuck all of you hoes (Hold up)
I'm ballin' outta control (I'm ballin')
I'm ballin' outta control (Let's ball)


If I could give everything back to you
All this passion I got, all I ever need (All that)
For me to move on and succeed (All that)
For me to move on and succeed (All that)
Jealousy, envy, and greed (Hah)
Too much of this shit, I don't need it

I turned on the gas with a nickel-plated (I did)
I sit back and laugh 'cause these niggas traitors (Hahaha)
Mentally, none of this shit can faze me (Mentally)
Mentally, none of this shit can faze me (Yeah)
I came out the trenches, I really made it (I really did)
I came out the gutter, I really made it (Sure I did)
I stack up the butter, I gotta save it (Freebandz)
Stack up the cheddar, you gotta save it (Gang)
Shoot out the carbine, no lovey-dovey (Facts)
These bitches, they lookin' for hubby-hubby (Hubby-hubby)
I'm lookin' for paper in any city (I swear)
I got a bitch located in every city
Gotta have them sticks on us in every city (I swear)
Take the private 'cause lately, out here, we gettin' it (Yeah)
Spent like seven-hundred thousand on both the Bentleys (Skrrt)
I got love for the city, I jugg and get it (Yeah)


I wake up on a daily basis
I count the money, man, I'm already rich
I go so hard with these riches
I fell in love with the dodie
I fell in love with the Rollie
Wake up and pray every morning
Demons, they callin' my soul (Hold up)
I said fuck all of you hoes (Hold up)
I'm ballin' outta control (I'm ballin')
I'm ballin' outta control (Let's ball out)
I'm ballin' outta control (I'm ballin')
I'm ballin' outta control (Let's-)

I need acknowledgement (Need it)
If I got it, then tell me I got it then (Tell me)
I'm ballin' outta control (Ballin')
Keep on receiving the scholarships (Woo)
Mayor comin' to the house (Woo)
Nigga, please, watch your mouth (Watch it)
I'm the one without a doubt (Watch it), yeah
And I rock Kentucky blue on these hoes
Drafted, I'm gettin' choosed by these hoes
Usually, they just leave when we done
I don't wan' share no room with these hoes
Metro gon' make it boom on these hoes
And me, I just stick and move on these hoes
We got that purple rain for the pain
My niggas, we ain't change, we ain't change, yeah


I wake up on a daily basis
I count this money up, I'm already rich (Freebandz)
I go so hard with these riches (Freebandz)
I fell in love with this dodie (I did)
I fell in love with the Rollie (Yeah)
I wake up, pray every morning (Pray)
These demons, they callin' my soul (Hold up)
I said fuck all of you hoes (Hold up)
I'm ballin' outta control (I'm ballin')
I'm ballin' outta control (Let's ball out)
I'm ballin' outta control (I'm ballin')
I'm ballin' outta control (Let's-)",2311255
73182,1773536,Digital Dash,rap,Digital Dash Lyrics - Drake & Future,2015,1036354,"{""Drake & Future""}","
(Metro Boomin want some more, nigga)
Rollin' in the coupe, yeah
Yeah
Get it
Get it, get it, hey (Freebandz)
Cook it, cook it (Yeah), huh (Hold up)
(Southside)
Yeah
My dope in the bushes (Turn up)
My dope in the bushes (Hold up)
I know how to cook it (Cook it)
My bitch good looking (Woo)
My bitch good looking (Hold up)
My bitch good looking (I swear)
My dope in the bushes, I know how to cook it
Yeah (Yeah)
Yeah, yeah (Yeah, yeah)


I did the digital dash (I did it)
I fucked that bitch on the passenger (One hundred)
I gave that junky a blast (One hundred)
I sell that dope to your mama, though (Your mama)
Hot on the street like thermometers (Thermometers)
You rats'll never be honorable (Fuck 'em)
They know I'ma keep that my word (Yeah)
I hustle the first to the first (Future)

These bitches be naggin' the kid (Fuck 'em)
They get on my motherfuckin' nerves (My motherfuckin' nerves)
I showed up with racks and they love me (They love me)
I'm smokin' that pack and on muddy (That gushy)
Taliban on these hoes (Hoes)
Give a Xan' to these hoes (These hoes)
Got 'em playing with they nose (Yeah)
I sleep on a beach off the avenue (The avenue)
I came to your city with revenue (Miami)
I put in work, it was evident (It was)
I slide on your ass in a seven-deuce (I slide on 'em)
Come back on your bitch in a six-trey (Woo)
Chevy, Mercedes, I keep 'em comin' (Keep 'em comin')
Fuck all these bitches, I keep 'em comin' (Foreign)
I pull up right now, I'm parallel (Skrrt)
I hit your block with them swangers (I hit 'em)
My niggas ain't nothin' but some bangers (Throw up)
I sit in the trap with the gangsters
These niggas can't come around here 'cause it's dangerous (Wizard)
I be hangin' 'round here and I'm famous (Wizard)
Gotta keep the trigger by my finger (My finger)
Hit her sideways when I banged her (I fucked)
In the driveway on a Perc' (A Perc')
I was sideways on a Perc' (Pour up)
Had a stick on me, that's a first (Yeah)
Got your bitch on me gettin' murked (Let's get it)
I post up and that's confident (That's confident)
I boast up in a drop six (Drop six)
Had a Ghost Royce and I pop shit (Pop shit)
I'm a dope boy with that car trip (Yeah)
I came in the game, I had crack on me (I had crack on me)
Got Bape on my back with some Act' on me (Act')
I'm single and shit, now she latch on me (I'm single)
I told 'em I'm back, I'm a bachelor (I'm back)
I get focused on millions and everything (Focused)
I just took me a trip out to Africa (Africa)
See how we came from the mud and the bottom, we did it (Bottom, we did it, we did it, woo)
I see how they counted us out, bet they never gon' do it again (Freebandz)
You see why these niggas be hatin', ignorin', I'm goin' right in (Yeah)
I was born to get this money in this life of sin (Life of sin)
I poured up before they got my dawg on murder again (Murder)
See the fire come out the ass on the Lamborghini (Skrrt)
When you say you love a nigga, do you really mean it? (No)
When I was sleepin' on the floor, you should see how they treated me (Hah)
I pour the Actavis, pop pills so I can fight the demons (Oh)

I did the digital dash (Fuck)
I fucked that bitch on the passenger (Fuck)
I gave that junky a blast (Blast)
I sell that dope to your mama, though (Mama)
Hot on the street like thermometers (Thermometers)
You rats'll never be honorable (Fuck 'em)
They know I'ma keep that my word (They know)
I hustle the first to the first (I hustle)


These bitches be nagging the kid
Fuck it, it is what it is
If you get hit, you get hit
I don't forget or forgive
Told myself never again
I don't let nobody in
Super just showed out again
And we just keep servin' and servin' again and again and again and again
I move the game up, I'm reckless
I'm Harlem shaking through the pressure
I might put Diddy on my next shit
I might could fit you in on Wednesday
I'm not here for no pretend shit
Just walked in with a girl that's making triple what I'm making, what an entrance
That's when you know it's a body
Zone 6, they know it's a body
Kirkwood, they know it's a body
Lil Mexico know it's a body
Scooter in here with the zombies
Gucci get out, it's a problem
I might take Quentin to Follies
You hate your life, just be honest
I got the digital dash
She want a picture with all of my niggas to just make the visual last
But she too embarrassed to ask
I got my foot on they neck and my foot on the gas
You remind me of a quarterback, your shit is all in the past
Esco and Boomin, they got it on smash
And I got the, I got the, I got the, I got the, I

I did the digital dash (Woo)
I fucked that bitch in the passenger
I gave that junky a blast
I sell that dope to your mama, though",2311362
73183,1773537,Big Rings,rap,Drake & Future,2015,1067403,{},"
Yeah
I know we just signed a deal, but
I need my advance on the next one too, they know I'ma be around
Yeah
I need it
(Metro Boomin want some more, nigga)


'Cause I got a really big team
And they need some really big rings
They need some really nice things
Better be comin' with no strings
Better be comin' with no strings
We need some really nice things
We need some really big rings
I got a really big team
I got a really big team
They need some really big rings
They need some really nice things
Better be comin' with no strings
Better be comin' with no strings
We need some really nice things
We need some really big rings
I got a really big team

Man, what a time to be alive
You and yours vs. me and mine
Oh, we talkin' teams? Oh, we talkin' teams?
Oh, you switchin' sides? Wanna come with me?
Look at the smile on me, look at the owl on me
I do not chase girls, but they run a mile for me
Say she gon' ride for me, I'll buy the tires for you
This game is different, you only get one shot when niggas go foul on you
Man, fuck 'em all, man, we want it all
Don't get too involved, we gon' knock ya off
And to top it off, I'm with all the dawgs
It's a new season and we still breathin'


And I got a really big team
And they need some really big rings
They need some really nice things
Better be comin' with no strings
Better be comin' with no strings
We need some really nice things
We need some really big rings
I got a really big team
I got a really big team
They need some really big rings
They need some really nice things
Better be comin' with no strings
Better be comin' with no strings
We need some really nice things
We need some really big rings
I got a really big team

Man, what a time to be alive
I'm drinkin' lean, they thought I died
I run with kidnappers, I'm talkin' 'bout kidnappers
I'm talkin' 'bout murderin' niggas, I'm talkin' 'bout carjackers
You just a battle rapper, I'm an official trapper
Niggas be droppin' subliminals, nigga, they just some jibber-jabber
We take a Mello Yello, then we fill it with red forever-ever
These niggas so jealous, jealous
Man, these niggas get scared, they tellin', tellin'
I fuck a check up on everything
I bought some ice when the feds came
I bought that bitch new Celine, I got rings, I got racks like Serena
All of my rings Aquafina, my bitch Aquafina
Pluto and Jupiter, I go to Venus
I'm fresh out the store, but I'm not out the cleaners
Who keepin' score? 'Cause these niggas, they losin'


'Cause I got a really big team
And they need some really big rings
They need some really nice things
Better be comin' with no strings
Better be comin' with no strings
We need some really nice things
We need some really big rings
I got a really big team
I got a really big team
They need some really big rings
They need some really nice things
Better be comin' with no strings
Better be comin' with no strings
We need some really nice things
We need some really big rings
I got a really big team

Man, what a time",2311363
73185,1773539,Diamonds Dancing,rap,Drake & Future,2015,1312495,{},"
I'm able to, uh
The stage in my life where I'm
Where I feel like I can conquer anything and everything
(Metro Boomin want some more, nigga)


Sippin' on Dom Pérignon for no reason
Poppin' tags, upper echelon for no reason
Seen this bad little jawn, she was perfect
I'll let her push the foreign right now if she worth it
Ballin' in the middle of the club, no jersey
I don't want no liquor 'cause I been drinkin' that dirty
Bring that Ace by the case, my niggas with me
Bring some ice for my cup, my drink with me


Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing

And you know what I need
From you when I get home (Yeah)
You better not be on the phone
Talkin' up a storm like you usually do
Talkin' to your friends like you usually do
Tellin' them I never spend time with you
It's hard to find a time, we been


Sippin' on Dom Pérignon for no reason
Poppin' tags, upper echelon for no reason
Seen this bad little jawn, she was perfect
I'll let her push the foreign right now if she worth it
Ballin' in the middle of the club, no jersey
I don't want no liquor 'cause I been drinkin' that dirty
Bring that Ace by the case, my niggas with me
Bring some ice for my cup, my drink with me


Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing


I'm familiar with this cash flow
And if you juggin', you can vouch for me
I did it my way, you can vouch for me
I put the cocaine and the powder in the couch, homie
Whenever I step outside the house, I keep that glocky on me
Bad bitches wanna come by, the paparazzi on me
I got so many bad bitches that I barely want her
I'm barely paying attention, baby, I need substance
I know you spent some time puttin' on your makeup and your outfit, but

Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing
Diamond, diamond, diamond, diamonds on me dancing


You doing me dirty (Dirty, dirty)
You doing me dirty
Doing me dirty
You doing me dirty
You know (Yeah, dirty, dirty)
How we let it get like this, I don't know (Yeah)
But that nigga can't save your soul (Nah)
Doing me dirty, you doing me dirty
Haven't even heard from you (Yeah)
How can you live with yourself?
I haven't even heard from you
How can you live with yourself? (Uh)
Ungrateful
Ungrateful (Hmm)
Your mom'd be ashamed of you
I haven't even heard from you, not a single word from you
Ungrateful (Hah)
I'm too good for you, too good for you (Yeah)
You should go back to him, perfect match for you, unstable (Hah)
Doing me dirty (Dirty, dirty)
You're making me nervous
I haven't even heard from you
You look drained, you look exhausted
Girl, them late nights ain't good for you
Really starting to show on you
Don't hit me up when it's good for you
Ungrateful",2311366
73188,1773544,Jumpman,rap,Drake & Future,2015,3256181,{},"
If Young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you
Yeah, ah, yeah
Halloween
Taliban, Taliban
I'm gon' shoot you (Yeah)


Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, them boys up to somethin'
They just spent like two or three weeks out the country
Them boys up to somethin', they just not just bluffin'
You don't have to call, I hit my dance like Usher, woo
I just found my tempo like I'm DJ Mustard, woo
I hit that Ginóbili with my left hand up like woo
Lobster and Céline for all my babies that I miss
Chicken fingers, french fries for them hoes that wanna diss
Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, them boys up to somethin'
Uh, uh, uh, I think I need some Robitussin
Way too many questions, you must think I trust ya
You searchin' for answers, I do not know nothing, woo
I see 'em tweakin', they know something's comin', woo
Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, them boys up to somethin', woo
Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, fuck was you expecting? Woo
Chi-Town, Chi-Town, Michael Jordan just had text me, woo

Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman
I just seen the jet take off, they up to somethin'
Them boys just not bluffin', them boys just not bluffin'
Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, them boys up to somethin'
She was tryna join the team, I told her wait
Chicken wings and fries, we don't go on dates
Nobu, Nobu, Nobu, Nobu, Nobu, Nobu
I just threw a private dinner in LA
Trappin' is a hobby, that's the way for me
Money comin' fast, we never gettin' sleep
I, I just had to buy another safe
Bentley Spurs and Phantom, Jordan fadeaway


Yeah, Jumpman, Jumpman, I don't need no introduction
Jumpman, Jumpman, Metro Boomin on production, wow
Hundred cousins out in Memphis, they so country, wow
Tell her, ""Stay the night, valet your car, come fuck me now""
Jumpman, Jumpman, live on TNT, I'm flexin', woo
Jumpman, Jumpman, they gave me my own collection, woo
Jump when I say jump, girl, can you take direction? Woo
Mutombo with the bitches, you keep gettin' rejected, woo


Heard they came through Magic City on a Monday
Heard they had the club wild, it was star-studded
A bunch of girls goin' wild when your chain flooded
And I had 'em like wow, cup dirty

Dopeman, dopeman, dopeman, dopeman, dopeman, dopeman
Money on the counter, choppers on the floor
I just copped that tempo, DJ Mustard, woo
Way too much codeine and Adderall
We just count up big racks, woah
I know I'ma get my bitch back, woah
I count all these racks that I have on me now, I'ma have you like, ""Woah""
Chanel N°9, Chanel N°5, well, you got 'em both


Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, them boys up to somethin'
They just spent like two or three weeks out the country
Them boys up to somethin', they just not just bluffin'
Jumpman, Jumpman, Jumpman, them boys up to somethin'",2311373
73213,1773795,Exchange,rb,Bryson Tiller,2015,2643455,{},"
This what happen when I think 'bout you
I get in my feelings, yeah
I start reminiscing, yeah
Next time around, fuck, I want it to be different, yeah
Waiting on a sign, guess it's time for a different prayer
Lord, please save her for me, do this one favor for me
I had to change my player ways, got way too complicated for me
I hope she's waiting for me
Everywhere she go they playin' my song
That's why I say the things that I say
That way I know you can't ignore me
But so, so (Yeah)


So give me all of you in exchange for me
Just give me all of you in exchange for me, for me


Break it down, yeah
Yes sir
Check

We used to lay up and then stay up
Have sex and then blow dank
I shouldn't have played no games with you, just leveled-up my rank
Last time I saw you we ain't speak, that was strange
Guess it's nothing I can do, man, it's true, exes change, yeah
Ayy, guess you changed for the better (Better!)
I know you know how to make me jealous
I was never loyal, let you tell it, yo
But I'm ready to fix it if you ready, baby
But so, so (Yeah)


So give me all of you in exchange for me
Just give me all of you in exchange for me, for me


For real shawty
You already know


Yeah, is you at Two Keys or Tin Roof?
Turn up with young Tiller, we just gettin' loose
Maybe I'm lowkey feelin' you, don't be cynical
Won't fuck you over, wanna fuck you over and again
The truth is I ain't really here to start problems
Girl, I swear to God them hoes can't never say they got him
Know how bad you wanna tell 'em, ""don't try him""
I don't wanna tell 'em, let's surprise 'em
I don't wanna get into it - why you stressin' him? I've been drivin'
Back and forth, from Louisville to Lexington, mileage
On the whip, got your ass in my grip
College make you wanna strip for them dollars
Nah girl, I got a job for you, swear to God I can do a lot for you
Saw you strollin' through the campus, I had to stop for you
I was scrollin' through the 'gram, girl, I had to follow you
Say what's up with you?
You got my soul",2312297
73238,1774011,Wait For It,rap,"Leslie Odom, Jr. & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1887203,"{""Leslie Odom / Jr. & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
Theodosia writes me a letter every day
I'm keeping the bed warm while her husband is away
He's on the British side in Georgia
He's trying to keep the colonies in line
But he can keep all of Georgia
Theodosia, she's mine

Love doesn't discriminate
Between the sinners
And the saints
It takes and it takes and it takes
And we keep loving anyway
We laugh and we cry
And we break
And we make our mistakes
And if there's a reason I'm by her side
When so many have tried
Then I'm willing to wait for it
I'm willing to wait for it

My grandfather was a fire and brimstone preacher
Preacher, preacher, preacher
But there are things that the homilies and hymns won't teach ya
Teach ya, teach ya, teach ya
My mother was a genius (Genius)
My father commanded respect (Respect, respect)
When they died they left no instructions
Just a legacy to protect


Death doesn't discriminate
Between the sinners
And the saints
It takes and it takes and it takes
And we keep living anyway
We rise and we fall
And we break
And we make our mistakes
And if there's a reason I'm still alive
When everyone who loves me has died
I'm willing to wait for it
I'm willing to wait for it

Wait for it

Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it


I am the one thing in life I can control


Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it


I am inimitable
I am an original


Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it


I'm not falling behind or running late

Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it
Wait for it


I'm not standing still
I am lying in wait


Wait
Wait
Wait


Hamilton faces an endless uphill climb


Climb
Climb
Climb


He has something to prove
He has nothing to lose


Lose
Lose
Lose
Lose


Hamilton's pace is relentless
He wastes no time


Time
Time
Time


What is it like in his shoes?

Hamilton doesn't hesitate
He exhibits no restraint
He takes and he takes and he takes
And he keeps winning anyway
He changes the game
He plays and he raises the stakes
And if there's a reason
He seems to thrive when so few survive, then Goddamnit-



I'm willing to wait for it
Wait for it, wait for it
I'm willing to wait for it...
Life doesn't discriminate
Between the sinners and the saints
It takes and it takes and it takes
And we keep living anyway
We rise and we fall and we break
And we make our mistakes
And if there's a reason I'm still alive
When so many have died
Then I'm willin' to-


Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait for it...
Wait...",2312548
73273,1774296,Kill Yourself Part III,rap,$UICIDEBOY$,2015,2673539,"{""\\$UICIDEBOY\\$""}","
It's not fair, I found love
It made me say that get back
You'll never see daylight
If I'm not strong, it just might
It's not fair, I found love
It made me say that get back
You'll never see daylight
If I'm not strong, it just might


They figure me a dead motherfucker
But I'm just a motherfucker that wanna be dead
Snow Leopard with the lead in his head, turnin' me into a sweater
Bitches use me as their fucking bedspread
I be the silhouette of a sunset
Smoke a cigarette while I compress my depression
Stare into the violet fluorescent lights, makes me violent
I'm tryna get the highest I can get before I overdose and die
My ribs are nothing but an empty cage, black hole in my chest
Big bang, Yung Plague on the tip of a wave
In my head, I feel like I'm a guest, so I'ma throw it all away
Because when I am dead, I will be nothing decomposin' in a grave
I'm matter, but I don't matter
I can feel my skull shatter from the dull chatter
Brain splattered on the wall
Grey stains won't dissolve, gonna have to paint it all

It's not fair, I found love
It made me say that get back
You'll never see daylight
If I'm not strong, it just might


Always boasting my emotions on how I'm so fucking broken
Think I'm joking when I'm talkin' about blowing my head open
'Til the moment you walk in and find my body motionless
Wrists slit, thoughts of $licky falling in an open pit, shit
Always burn my bridges 'cause I'd rather fall in ditches
If life's a game of inches, then my dick has been the biggest
And my goal's to fuck the world until that motherfucker's twitchin'
Lane switchin', same mission, to die and blame my addiction, bitch


It's not fair, I found love
It made me say that get back
You'll never see daylight
If I'm not strong, it just might",2313538
73293,1774531,Washington On Your Side,rap,"Washington On Your Side Lyrics - Daveed Diggs, Leslie Odom, Jr., Okieriete Onaodowan & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1261075,"{""Daveed Diggs / Leslie Odom / Jr. / Okieriete Onaodowan & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
It must be nice, it must be nice to have
Washington on your side
It must be nice, it must be nice to have
Washington on your side


Ev'ry action has its equal, opposite reactions
Thanks to Hamilton, our cab'net's fractured into factions
Try not to crack under the stress, we're breaking down like fractions
We smack each other in the press, and we don't print retractions
I get no satisfaction witnessing his fits of passion
The way he primps and preens and dresses like the pits of fashion
Our poorest citizens, our farmers, live ration to ration
As Wall Street robs 'em blind in search of chips to cash in
This prick is askin' for someone to bring him to task
Somebody gimme some dirt on this vacuous mass so we can at last unmask him
I'll pull the trigger on him, someone load the gun and cock it
While we were all watching, he got Washington in his pocket


It must be nice, it must be nice to have
Washington on your side
It must be nice, it must be nice to have
Washington on your side
Look back at the Bill of Rights


Which I wrote


The ink hasn't dried
It must be nice, it must be nice to have
Washington on your side


So he's doubled the size of the government
Wasn't the trouble with much of our previous government size?


Look in his eyes!


See how he lies


Follow the scent of his enterprise


Centralizing national credit
And making American credit competitive

If we don't stop it we aid and abet it


I have to resign


Somebody has to stand up for the South!


Somebody has to stand up to his mouth!


If there's a fire you're trying to douse


You can't put it out from inside the house


I'm in the cabinet. I am complicit in
Watching him grabbin' at power and kiss it
If Washington isn't gon' listen
To disciplined dissidents, this is the difference:
This kid is out!


Oh!
This immigrant isn't somebody we chose
Oh!
This immigrant's keeping us all on our toes
Oh!
Let's show these Federalists who they're up against!
Oh!

Southern motherfuckin'-


Democratic-Republicans!


Oh!


Let's follow the money and see where it goes


Oh!


Because every second the Treasury grows


Oh!


If we follow the money and see where it leads
Get in the weeds, look for the seeds of
Hamilton's misdeeds


It must be nice. It must be nice


Follow the money and see where it goes


It must be nice. It must be nice


The emperor has no clothes


We won't be invisible. We won't be denied
Still
It must be nice, it must be nice to have
Washington on your side",2313802
73298,1774573,Youll Be Back,pop,"You'll Be Back Lyrics - Jonathan Groff & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,2407908,"{""Jonathan Groff & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
You say
The price of my love's not a price that you're willing to pay
You cry
In your tea which you hurl in the sea when you see me go by
Why so sad?
Remember we made an arrangement when you went away
Now you're making me mad
Remember, despite our estrangement, I'm your man
You'll be back, soon you'll see
You'll remember you belong to me
You'll be back, time will tell
You'll remember that I served you well
Oceans rise, empires fall
We have seen each other through it all
And when push comes to shove
I will send a fully armed battalion to remind you of my love!


Da da da dat da dat da da da da ya da
Da da dat dat da ya da!
Da da da dat da dat da da da da ya da
Da da dat dat da...

You say our love is draining and you can't go on
You'll be the one complaining when I am gone...
And no, don't change the subject
'Cause you're my favorite subject
My sweet, submissive subject
My loyal, royal subject
Forever and ever and ever and ever and ever...


You'll be back like before
I will fight the fight and win the war
For your love, for your praise
And I'll love you till my dying days
When you're gone, I'll go mad
So don't throw away this thing we had
'Cause when push comes to shove
I will kill your friends and family to remind you of my love


Da da da dat da dat da da da da ya da
Da da dat dat da ya da!
Da da da dat da dat da da da da ya da
Da da dat-
Everybody!

Da da da dat da dat da da da da ya da
Da da dat dat da ya da!
Da da da dat da dat da da da da ya da da da da
Dat dat da ya da!",2313909
73314,1774788,Aaron Burr Sir,rap,"Aaron Burr, Sir Lyrics - Lin-Manuel Miranda, Leslie Odom Jr., Anthony Ramos, Daveed Diggs & Okieriete Onaodowan",2015,2429728,"{""Lin-Manuel Miranda / Leslie Odom Jr. / Anthony Ramos / Daveed Diggs & Okieriete Onaodowan""}","
1776. New York City


Pardon me. Are you Aaron Burr, sir?


That depends. Who's asking?


Oh, well, sure, sir
I'm Alexander Hamilton, I'm at your service, sir
I have been looking for you


I'm getting nervous


Sir...
I heard your name at Princeton. I was seeking an accelerated course of study when I got sort of out of sorts with a buddy of yours. I may have punched him. It's a blur, sir. He handles the financials?

You punched the bursar


Yes!
I wanted to do what you did. Graduate in two, then join the revolution. He looked at me like I was stupid, I'm not stupid

So how'd you do it? How'd you graduate so fast?


It was my parents' dying wish before they passed


You're an orphan. Of course! I'm an orphan
God, I wish there was a war!
Then we could prove that we're worth more
Than anyone bargained for...


Can I buy you a drink?


That would be nice


While we're talking, let me offer you some free advice
Talk less

What?


Smile more


Ha


Don't let them know what you're against or what you're for


You can't be serious


You wanna get ahead?


Yes


Fools who run their mouths off wind up dead


Yo yo yo yo yo!
What time is it?

Show time!


Like I said...


Show time! Show time! Yo!
I'm John Laurens in the place to be!
Two pints o' Sam Adams, but I'm workin' on three, uh!
Those redcoats don't want it with me!
Cuz I will pop chick-a pop these cops till I'm free!


Oui oui, mon ami, je m'appelle Lafayette!
The Lancelot of the revolutionary set!
I came from afar just to say ""Bonsoir!""
Tell the King ""Casse toi!"" Who's the best?
C'est moi!


Brrrah brraaah! I am Hercules Mulligan
Up in it, lovin' it, yes I heard ya mother said ""Come again?""


Ayyyyy


Lock up ya daughters and horses, of course
It's hard to have intercourse over four sets of corsets...


Wow


No more sex, pour me another brew, son!
Let's raise a couple more...


To the revolution!


Well, if it ain't the prodigy of Princeton college!


Aaron Burr!


Give us a verse, drop some knowledge!


Good luck with that: you're takin' a stand
You spit. I'm 'a sit. We'll see where we land


Boooo!


Burr, the revolution's imminent. What do you stall for?


If you stand for nothing, Burr, what'll you fall for?


Ooh
Who you?
Who you?
Who are you?


Ooh, who is this kid? What's he gonna do?",2314359
73323,1774890,Cabinet Battle 1,rap,"Christopher Jackson, Daveed Diggs, Lin-Manuel Miranda & Okieriete Onaodowan",2015,1871360,"{""Christopher Jackson / Daveed Diggs / Lin-Manuel Miranda & Okieriete Onaodowan""}","
Ladies and gentlemen, you coulda been anywhere in the world tonight, but you're here with us in New York City. Are you ready for a cabinet meeting???

The issue on the table: Secretary Hamilton's plan to assume state debt and establish a national bank. Secretary Jefferson, you have the floor, sir


'Life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness.'
We fought for these ideals; we shouldn't settle for less
These are wise words, enterprising men quote 'em
Don't act surprised, you guys, cuz I wrote 'em


Oww


But Hamilton forgets
His plan would have the government assume state's debts
Now, place your bets as to who that benefits:
The very seat of government where Hamilton sits


Not true!

Ooh, if the shoe fits, wear it
If New York's in debt-
Why should Virginia bear it? Uh! Our debts are paid, I'm afraid
Don't tax the South cuz we got it made in the shade
In Virginia, we plant seeds in the ground
We create. You just wanna move our money around
This financial plan is an outrageous demand
And it's too many damn pages for any man to understand
Stand with me in the land of the free
And pray to God we never see Hamilton's candidacy
Look, when Britain taxed our tea, we got frisky
Imagine what gon' happen when you try to tax our whisky


Thank you, Secretary Jefferson
That's my alcohol!
Secretary Hamilton, your response


Thomas. That was a real nice declaration
Welcome to the present, we're running a real nation
Would you like to join us, or stay mellow
Doin' whatever the hell it is you do in Monticello?
If we assume the debts, the union gets
A new line of credit, a financial diuretic
How do you not get it? If we're aggressive and competitive
The union gets a boost. You'd rather give it a sedative?
A civics lesson from a slaver. Hey neighbor
Your debts are paid cuz you don't pay for labor
""We plant seeds in the South. We create.""
Yeah, keep ranting
We know who's really doing the planting
And another thing, Mr. Age of Enlightenment
Don't lecture me about the war, you didn't fight in it
You think I'm frightened of you, man?
We almost died in the trench
While you were off getting high with the French
Thomas Jefferson, always hesitant with the President
Reticent-there isn't a plan he doesn't jettison
Madison, you're mad as a hatter, son, take your medicine
Damn, you're in worse shape than the national debt is in
Sittin' there useless as two shits
Hey, turn around, bend over, I'll show you
Where my shoe fits

Excuse me? Madison, Jefferson, take a walk! Hamilton, take a walk! We'll reconvene after a brief recess. Hamilton!


Sir!


A word


You don't have the votes


You don't have the votes


Aha-ha-ha ha!


You're gonna need congressional approval and you don't have the votes


Such a blunder sometimes it makes me wonder why I even bring the thunder


Why he even brings the thunder...

You wanna pull yourself together?


I'm sorry, these Virginians are birds of a feather


Young man, I'm from Virginia, so watch your mouth


So we let Congress get held hostage by the South?


You need the votes


No, we need bold strokes. We need this plan


No, you need to convince more folks


James Madison won't talk to me, that's a nonstarter


Winning was easy, young man. Governing's harder


They're being intransigent


You have to find a compromise


But they don't have a plan, they just hate mine!


Convince them otherwise


What happens if I don't get congressional approval?


I imagine they'll call for your removal


Sir-


Figure it out, Alexander. That's an order from your commander",2314473
73324,1774911,Alexander Hamilton,rap,"Alexander Hamilton Lyrics - Leslie Odom, Jr., Anthony Ramos, Daveed Diggs, Okieriete Onaodowan, Lin-Manuel Miranda, Phillipa Soo, Christopher Jackson & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,5528942,"{""Leslie Odom / Jr. / Anthony Ramos / Daveed Diggs / Okieriete Onaodowan / Lin-Manuel Miranda / Phillipa Soo / Christopher Jackson & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
How does a bastard, orphan, son of a whore and a
Scotsman, dropped in the middle of a forgotten
Spot in the Caribbean by providence, impoverished, in squalor
Grow up to be a hero and a scholar?


The ten-dollar Founding Father without a father
Got a lot farther by working a lot harder
By being a lot smarter
By being a self-starter
By fourteen, they placed him in charge of a trading charter


And every day while slaves were being slaughtered and carted
Away across the waves, he struggled and kept his guard up
Inside, he was longing for something to be a part of
The brother was ready to beg, steal, borrow, or barter


Then a hurricane came, and devastation reigned
Our man saw his future drip, dripping down the drain
Put a pencil to his temple, connected it to his brain
And he wrote his first refrain, a testament to his pain

Well, the word got around, they said, ""This kid is insane, man""
Took up a collection just to send him to the mainland
""Get your education, don't forget from whence you came, and
The world's gonna know your name. What's your name, man?""


Alexander Hamilton
My name is Alexander Hamilton
And there's a million things I haven't done
But just you wait, just you wait...


When he was ten his father split, full of it, debt-ridden
Two years later, see Alex and his mother bed-ridden
Half-dead sittin' in their own sick, the scent thick


And Alex got better but his mother went quick


Moved in with a cousin, the cousin committed suicide
Left him with nothin' but ruined pride, something new inside
A voice saying
""Alex, you gotta fend for yourself.""
He started retreatin' and readin' every treatise on the shelf

There would have been nothin' left to do
For someone less astute
He woulda been dead or destitute
Without a cent of restitution
Started workin', clerkin' for his late mother's landlord
Tradin' sugar cane and rum and all the things he can't afford
Scammin' for every book he can get his hands on
Plannin' for the future see him now as he stands on (ooh)
The bow of a ship headed for a new land
In New York you can be a new man


In New York you can be a new man (Just you wait)
In New York you can be a new man (Just you wait)
In New York you can be a new man
In New York, New York
Just you wait!


Alexander Hamilton (Alexander Hamilton)
We are waiting in the wings for you (waiting in the wings for you)
You could never back down
You never learned to take your time!
Oh, Alexander Hamilton (Alexander Hamilton)
When America sings for you
Will they know what you overcame?
Will they know you rewrote the game?
The world will never be the same, oh

The ship is in the harbor now
See if you can spot him
Just you wait
Another immigrant
Comin' up from the bottom
Just you wait
His enemies destroyed his rep
America forgot him


We fought with him


Me? I died for him


Me? I trusted him


Me? I loved him


And me? I'm the damn fool that shot him


There's a million things I haven't done
But just you wait!


What's your name, man?


Alexander Hamilton!",2314493
73325,1774922,Helpless,rap,"Phillipa Soo & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1965464,"{""Phillipa Soo & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
Hey hey hey hey


Ohh, I do I do I do I
Hey hey hey hey
Dooo! Hey!
Hey hey hey hey
Ohh, I do I do I do I
Hey hey hey hey
Dooo! Boy you got me
Hey hey hey hey


Helpless!
Look into your eyes, and the sky's the limit I'm helpless!
Down for the count, and I'm drownin' in 'em


I have never been the type to try and grab the spotlight
We were at a revel with some rebels on a hot night
Laughin' at my sister as she's dazzling the room
Then you walked in and my heart went ""Boom!""
Tryin' to catch your eye from the side of the ballroom
Everybody's dancin' and the band's top volume

Grind to the rhythm as we wine and dine


Grab my sister, and whisper, ""Yo, this one's mine."" (Ooh)
My sister made her way across the room to you (Ooh)
And I got nervous, thinking ""What's she gonna do?"" (Ooh)
She grabbed you by the arm, I'm thinkin' ""I'm through"" (Ooh)
Then you look back at me and suddenly I'm
Helpless!
Oh, look at those eyes
Look into your eyes
And the sky's the limit
Oh!
I'm helpless
Yeah, I'm helpless, I know
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em
I'm helpless
I'm so into you
Look into your eyes
I am so into you
And the sky's the limit, I'm helpless
I know I'm down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em


Where are you taking me?

I'm about to change your life


Then by all means, lead the way


Elizabeth Schuyler. It's a pleasure to meet you


Schuyler?


My sister


Thank you for all your service


If it takes fighting a war for us to meet, it will have been worth it


I'll leave you to it


One week later

I'm writin' a letter nightly
Now my life gets better, every letter that you write me
Laughin' at my sister, 'cause she wants to form a harem


I'm just sayin', if you really loved me, you would share him


Ha!
Two weeks later in the living room stressin' (stressin')
My father's stone-faced while you're asking for his blessin' (blessin')
I'm dying inside, as you wine and dine
And I'm tryin' not to cry 'cause there's nothing that your mind can't do (Ooh)
My father makes his way across the room to you (Ooh)
I panic for a second, thinking ""we're through""(Ooh)
But then he shakes your hand and says ""Be true"" (Ooh)
And you turn back to me, smiling, and I'm
Helpless! (Helpless!)
Look into your eyes and the sky's the limit
I'm helpless
Helpless
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em (hoo!)
I'm helpless!
That boy is mine, that boy is mine
Look into your eyes and the sky's the limit
I'm helpless
Helpless, helpless
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em


Eliza, I don't have a dollar to my name
An acre of land, a troop to command, a dollop of fame
All I have's my honor, a tolerance for pain
A couple of college credits and my top-notch brain
Insane, your family brings out a different side of me
Peggy confides in me, Angelica tried to take a bite of me
No stress, my love for you is never in doubt
We'll get a little place in Harlem and we'll figure it out
I've been livin' without a family since I was a child
My father left, my mother died, I grew up buckwild
But I'll never forget my mother's face, that was real
And long as I'm alive, Eliza, swear to God
You'll never feel so...


Helpless!
I do, I do, I do, I do!
Eliza
Helpless!
I do, I do, I do, I do!
I've never felt so-
Helpless!
Hey, yeah, yeah!
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em
I'm down for the count, I'm-
Helpless!
My life is gon' be fine 'cause Eliza's in it
Helpless!
I look into your eyes and the sky's the limit, I'm-
Helpless!
Down for the count and I'm drownin' in 'em
...drownin' in 'em


In New York, you can be a new man...
In New York, you can be a new man...
In New York, you can be a new man...


Helpless",2314544
73329,1774949,One Last Time,rap,"One Last Time Lyrics - Christopher Jackson, Lin-Manuel Miranda & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1191222,"{""Christopher Jackson / Lin-Manuel Miranda & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
Mr. President, you asked to see me?


I know you're busy


What do you need, sir? Sir?


I wanna give you a word of warning


Sir, I don't know what you heard
But whatever it is, Jefferson started it


Thomas Jefferson resigned this morning


You're kidding

I need a favor


Whatever you say, sir, Jefferson will pay for his behavior


Shh. Talk less


I'll use the press
I'll write under a pseudonym, you'll see what I can do to him-


I need you to draft an address


Yes! He resigned. You can finally speak your mind-


No, he's stepping down so he can run for President


Ha. Good luck defeating you, sir


I'm stepping down. I'm not running for President

I'm sorry, what?


One last time
Relax, have a drink with me
One last time
Let's take a break tonight
And then we'll teach them how to say goodbye
To say goodbye
You and I


No, sir, why?


I wanna talk about neutrality


Sir, with Britain and France on the verge of war, is this the best time-


I want to warn against partisan fighting


But-

Pick up a pen, start writing
I wanna talk about what I have learned
The hard-won wisdom I have earned


As far as the people are concerned
You have to serve, you could continue to serve-


No! One last time
The people will hear from me
One last time
And if we get this right
We're gonna teach 'em how to say
Goodbye
You and I-


Mr. President, they will say you're weak


No, they will see we're strong


Your position is so unique


So I'll use it to move them along


Why do you have to say goodbye?


If I say goodbye, the nation learns to move on
It outlives me when I'm gone
Like the scripture says:
""Everyone shall sit under their own vine and fig tree
And no one shall make them afraid.""
They'll be safe in the nation we've made
I wanna sit under my own vine and fig tree
A moment alone in the shade
At home in this nation we've made
One last time


One last time


Though, in reviewing the incidents of my administration, I am unconscious of intentional error, I am nevertheless too sensible of my defects not to think it probable that I may have committed many errors. I shall also carry with me


The hope (The hope)
That my country will
View them with indulgence; (View them with indulgence)
And that
After forty-five years of my life dedicated to its service with an upright zeal (After forty-five years of my life dedicated to its service with an upright zeal)
The faults of incompetent abilities will be
Consigned to oblivion, as I myself must soon be to the mansions of rest (Consigned to oblivion, as I myself must soon be to the mansions of rest)
I anticipate with pleasing expectation that retreat in which I (I anticipate with pleasing expectation that retreat in which I)
Promise myself to realize the sweet enjoyment of partaking (Promise myself to realize the sweet enjoyment of partaking)
In the midst of my fellow-citizens, the benign influence of good laws (In the midst of my fellow-citizens, the benign influence of good laws)
Under a free government, the ever-favorite object of my heart, and the happy reward, as I trust (Under a free government, the ever-favorite object of my heart, and the happy reward, as I trust)
Of our mutual cares, labors, and dangers (Of our mutual cares, labors, and dangers)


One last time


George Washington's going home!


Teach 'em how to say goodbye


George Washington's going home


You and I


George Washington's going home


Going home


George Washington's going home


History has its eyes on you


George Washington's going home


We're gonna teach 'em how to
Say goodbye! (Teach 'em how to say goodbye!)
Teach 'em how to (Teach 'em how!)
Say goodbye! (Say goodbye!)
To say goodbye! (Say goodbye!)
Say goodbye!
One last time! (One last time!)",2314529
73333,1774960,Dear Theodosia,pop,"Dear Theodosia Lyrics - Lin-Manuel Miranda & Leslie Odom, Jr.",2015,1020513,"{""Lin-Manuel Miranda & Leslie Odom / Jr.""}","
Dear Theodosia, what to say to you?
You have my eyes. You have your mother's name

When you came into the world, you cried and it broke my heart

I'm dedicating every day to you
Domestic life was never quite my style
When you smile, you knock me out, I fall apart
And I thought I was so smart

You will come of age with our young nation
We'll bleed and fight for you, we'll make it right for you
If we lay a strong enough foundation
We'll pass it on to you, we'll give the world to you
And you'll blow us all away...
Someday, someday
Yeah, you'll blow us all away
Someday, someday


Oh Philip, when you smile I am undone
My son
Look at my son. Pride is not the word I'm looking for
There is so much more inside me now
Oh Philip, you outshine the morning sun
My son
When you smile, I fall apart
And I thought I was so smart
My father wasn't around


My father wasn't around


I swear that
I'll be around for you (I'll be around for you)


I'll do whatever it takes


I'll make a million mistakes


I'll make the world safe and sound for you...
...will come of age with our young nation
We'll bleed and fight for you, we'll make it right for you

If we lay a strong enough foundation
We'll pass it on to you, we'll give the world to you
And you'll blow us all away...
Someday, someday
Yeah, you'll blow us all away
Someday, someday",2314546
73335,1774965,Satisfied,rap,"Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton"" & Rene Elise Goldsberry",2015,3231434,"{""Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\"" & Renée Elise Goldsberry""}","
Alright, alright. That's what I'm talkin' about!
Now everyone give it up for the maid of honor
Angelica Schuyler!


A toast to the groom!
To the groom!
To the groom!
To the groom!
To the bride!
To the bride!
To the bride!
To the bride!


From your sister
Angelica!
Angelica!
Angelica!
Who is always by your side
By your side!
By your side!
To your union
To the union! To the revolution!
And the hope that you provide
You provide!
You provide!

May you always... (Always)
Be satisfied (Rewind)


Rewind, Rewind
Helpless, sky's, sky's
Drownin' in em
Drownin', rewind

I remember that night, I just might (rewind)
I remember that night, I just might (rewind)
I remember that night, I remember that-


I remember that night, I just might
Regret that night for the rest of my days

I remember those soldier boys
Tripping over themselves to win our praise

I remember that dreamlike candlelight
Like a dream that you can't quite place

But Alexander, I'll never forget the first
Time I saw your face
I have never been the same
Intelligent eyes in a hunger-pang frame
And when you said ""Hi,"" I forgot my dang name
Set my heart aflame, ev'ry part aflame


This is not a game...


You strike me as a woman who has never been satisfied


I'm sure I don't know what you mean. You forget yourself


You're like me. I'm never satisfied


Is that right?


I have never been satisfied


My name is Angelica Schuyler

Alexander Hamilton


Where's your fam'ly from?


Unimportant. There's a million things I haven't done but
Just you wait, just you wait...


So so so-
So this is what it feels like to match wits
With someone at your level! What the hell is the catch? It's
The feeling of freedom, of seein' the light
It's Ben Franklin with a key and a kite! You see it, right?
The conversation lasted two minutes, maybe three minutes
Ev'rything we said in total agreement, it's
A dream and it's a bit of a dance
A bit of a posture, it's a bit of a stance. He's a
Bit of a flirt, but I'm 'a give it a chance
I asked about his fam'ly, did you see his answer?
His hands started fidgeting, he looked askance?
He's penniless, he's flying by the seat of his pants

Handsome, boy, does he know it!
Peach fuzz, and he can't even grow it!
I wanna take him far away from this place
Then I turn and see my sister's face and she is...


Helpless...


And I know she is...


Helpless...


And her eyes are just...


Helpless...


And I realize


Three fundamental truths at the exact same time...


Where are you taking me?


I'm about to change your life


Then by all means, lead the way


Number one!


I'm a girl in a world in which
My only job is to marry rich
My father has no sons so I'm the one
Who has to social climb for one
So I'm the oldest and the wittiest and the gossip in
New York City is insidious
And Alexander is penniless
Ha! That doesn't mean I want him any less


Elizabeth Schuyler. It's a pleasure to meet you


Schuyler?


My sister


Number two!


He's after me cuz I'm a Schuyler sister
That elevates his status, I'd
Have to be naïve to set that aside
Maybe that is why I introduce him to Eliza
Now that's his bride
Nice going, Angelica, he was right
You will never be satisfied


Thank you for all your service


If it takes fighting a war for us to meet, it will have been worth it


I'll leave you to it


Number three!


I know my sister like I know my own mind
You will never find anyone as trusting or as kind
If I tell her that I love him she'd be silently resigned
He'd be mine
She would say, ""I'm fine""


She'd be lying


But when I fantasize at night
It's Alexander's eyes
As I romanticize what might
Have been if I hadn't sized him
Up so quickly
At least my dear Eliza's his wife;
At least I keep his eyes in my life...


He will never be satisfied
I will never be satisfied


To the groom!
To the groom!
To the groom!
To the groom!
To the bride!
To the bride!
To the bride!
To the bride!


From your sister
Angelica!
Angelica!
Angelica!
Who is always by your side
By your side!
By your side!
To your union
To the union! To the revolution!
And the hope that you provide
You provide!
You provide!


May you always... (Always)
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied


And I know
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
She'll be happy as his bride
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
And I know
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
Be satisfied
He will never be satisfied
I will never be satisfied",2314551
73345,1774991,Guns and Ships,rap,"Leslie Odom, Jr., Daveed Diggs, Christopher Jackson & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,4173414,"{""Leslie Odom / Jr. / Daveed Diggs / Christopher Jackson & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
How does a ragtag volunteer army in need of a shower
Somehow defeat a global superpower?
How do we emerge victorious from the quagmire?
Leave the battlefield waving Betsy Ross' flag higher?
Yo. Turns out we have a secret weapon!
An immigrant you know and love who's unafraid to step in!
He's constantly confusin', confoundin' the British henchmen
Ev'ryone give it up for America's favorite fighting Frenchman!


Lafayette!


I'm takin this horse by the reins makin'
Redcoats redder with bloodstains


Lafayette!


And I'm never gonna stop until I make 'em
Drop and burn 'em up and scatter their remains, I'm

Lafayette!


Watch me engagin' em! Escapin' em!
Enragin' em! I'm-


Lafayette!


I go to France for more funds


Lafayette!


I come back with more


Guns
And ships
And so the balance shifts


We rendezvous with Rochambeau, consolidate their gifts

We can end this war at Yorktown, cut them off at sea, but
For this to succeed, there is someone else we need:


I know


Hamilton!


Sir, he knows what to do in a trench
Ingenuitive and fluent in French, I mean-


Hamilton!


Sir, you're gonna have to use him eventually
What's he gonna do on the bench? I mean-


Hamilton!


No one has more resilience
Or matches my practical tactical brilliance-

Hamilton!


You wanna fight for your land back? (Hamilton!)


I need my right hand man back! (Hamilton!)


Ah! Uh, get ya right hand man back
Get your right hand man back!
Hamilton!
You know you gotta get ya right hand man back
Your right hand man back!
Hamilton!
I mean you gotta put some thought into the letter
Ha-ha-Hamilton
But the sooner the better to get your right hand man back!
Hamilton, ha-ha-


Alexander Hamilton
Troops are waiting in the field for you
If you join us right now, together we can turn the tide
Oh, Alexander Hamilton
I have soldiers that will yield for you
If we manage to get this right
They'll surrender by early light
The world will never be the same, Alexander...",2314656
73348,1774999,Yorktown The World Turned Upside Down,rap,Original Broadway Cast of Hamilton,2015,1649323,{},"
The battle of Yorktown. 1781


Monsieur Hamilton


Monsieur Lafayette


In command where you belong


How you say, no sweat
We're finally on the field. We've had quite a run


Immigrants:


We get the job done

So what happens if we win?


I go back to France
I bring freedom to my people if I'm given the chance


We'll be with you when you do


Go lead your men


See you on the other side


'Til we meet again, let's go!


I am not throwin' away my shot!
I am not throwin' away my shot!
Hey yo, I'm just like my country, I'm young
Scrappy and hungry
And I'm not throwin' away my shot!
I am not throwin' away my shot!

'Til the world turns upside down...


'Til the world turns upside down!


I imagine death so much it feels more like a memory
This is where it gets me: on my feet
The enemy ahead of me
If this is the end of me, at least I have a friend with me
Weapon in my hand, a command, and my men with me
Then I remember my Eliza's expecting me...
Not only that, my Eliza's expecting
We gotta go, gotta get the job done
Gotta start a new nation, gotta meet my son!
Take the bullets out your gun!


What?


The bullets out your gun!


What?

We move under cover and we move as one
Through the night, we have one shot to live another day
We cannot let a stray gunshot give us away
We will fight up close, seize the moment and stay in it
It's either that or meet the business end of a bayonet
The code word is 'Rochambeau,' dig me?


Rochambeau!


You have your orders now, go, man, go!
And so the American experiment begins
With my friends all scattered to the winds
Laurens is in South Carolina, redefining brav'ry


We'll never be free until we end slavery!


When we finally drive the British away
Lafayette is there waiting-


In Chesapeake Bay!


How did we know that this plan would work?
We had a spy on the inside. That's right


Hercules Mulligan!


A tailor spyin' on the British government!
I take their measurements, information and then I smuggle it


Up


To my brother's revolutionary covenant
I'm runnin' with the Sons of Liberty and I am lovin' it!
See, that's what happens when you up against the ruffians
We in the shit now, somebody gotta shovel it!
Hercules Mulligan, I need no introduction
When you knock me down I get the fuck back up again!


Left! Right! Hold!
Go!
What! What! What!


After a week of fighting, a young man in a red coat stands on a parapet


We lower our guns as he frantically waves a white handkerchief


And just like that, it's over. We tend to our wounded, we count our dead


Black and white soldiers wonder alike if this really means freedom


Not. Yet


We negotiate the terms of surrender
I see George Washington smile
We escort their men out of Yorktown
They stagger home single file
Tens of thousands of people flood the streets
There are screams and church bells ringing
And as our fallen foes retreat
I hear the drinking song they're singing...


The world turned upside down


The world turned upside down
The world turned upside down
The world turned upside down
Down
Down, down, down


Freedom for America, freedom for France!


Down, down, down


Gotta start a new nation
Gotta meet my son


Down, down, down


We won!


We won!


We won!


We won!


The world turned upside down!",2314665
73349,1775008,Non-Stop,rap,"Leslie Odom, Jr., Lin-Manuel Miranda, Phillipa Soo, Christopher Jackson, Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton"" & Rene Elise Goldsberry",2015,2047891,"{""Leslie Odom / Jr. / Lin-Manuel Miranda / Phillipa Soo / Christopher Jackson / Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\"" & Renée Elise Goldsberry""}","
After the war I went back to New York


A-After the war I went back to New York


I finished up my studies and I practiced law


I practiced law, Burr worked next door


Even though we started at the very same time
Alexander Hamilton began to climb
How to account for his rise to the top?
Maaaaan, the man is


Non-stop!

Gentlemen of the jury, I'm curious, bear with me
Are you aware that we're making hist'ry?
This is the first murder trial of our brand-new nation
The liberty behind
Deliberation-


Non-stop!


I intend to prove beyond a shadow of a doubt
With my assistant counsel-


Co-counsel
Hamilton, sit down
Our client Levi Weeks is innocent. Call your first witness
That's all you had to say!


Okay!
One more thing-


Why do you assume you're the smartest in the room?
Why do you assume you're the smartest in the room?
Why do you assume you're the smartest in the room?
Soon that attitude may be your doom!

Awwww!


Why do you write like you're running out of time?
Write day and night like you're running out of time?
Ev'ry day you fight, like you're running out of time
Keep on fighting. In the meantime-


Non-stop!


Corruption's such an old song that we can sing along in harmony
And nowhere is it stronger than in Albany
This colony's economy's increasingly stalling and


Honestly, that's why public service
Seems to be calling me
He's just non-stop!


I practiced the law, I practic'ly perfected it
I've seen injustice in the world and I've corrected it
Now for a strong central democracy
If not, then I'll be Socrates
Throwing verbal rocks at these mediocrities

Awww!


Hamilton, at the Constitutional Convention:


I was chosen for the Constitutional Convention!


There as a New York junior delegate:


Now what I'm going to say may sound indelicate... (Awwww)


Goes and proposes his own form of government! (What?)
His own plan for a new form of government! (What?)


Talks for six hours! The convention is listless!


Bright young man...


Yo, who the f is this?


Why do you always say what you believe?
Why do you always say what you believe?
Ev'ry proclamation guarantees free ammunition for your enemies!


Awww!


Why do you write like it's
Going out of style?
Write day and night like it's
Going out of style?


Ev'ry day you fight like it's
Going out of style
Do what you do


Alexander?


Aaron Burr, sir


It's the middle of the night


Can we confer, sir?


Is this a legal matter?


Yes, and it's important to me


What do you need?


Burr, you're a better lawyer than me


Okay


I know I talk too much, I'm abrasive
You're incredible in court. You're succinct, persuasive
My client needs a strong defense. You're the solution


Who's your client?


The new U.S. Constitution?


No


Hear me out


No way!


A series of essays, anonymously published
Defending the document to the public


No one will read it


I disagree


And if it fails?


Burr, that's why we need it


The constitution's a mess


So it needs amendments


It's full of contradictions


So is independence
We have to start somewhere


No. No way


You're making a mistake


Good night


Hey
What are you waiting for?
What do you stall for?


What?


We won the war
What was it all for?
Do you support this constitution?


Of course


Then defend it


And what if you're backing the wrong horse?


Burr, we studied and we fought and we killed
For the notion of a nation we now get to build
For once in your life, take a stand with pride
I don't understand how you stand to the side


I'll keep all my plans close to my chest
Wait for it, wait for it, wait...
I'll wait here and see which way the wind will blow
I'm taking my time watching the afterbirth of a nation
Watching the tension grow


I am sailing off to London
I'm accompanied by someone who always pays
I have found a wealthy husband
Who will keep me in comfort for all my days
He is not a lot of fun, but there's no one
Who can match you for turn of phrase
My Alexander


Angelica


Don't forget to write


Look at where you are
Look at where you started
The fact that you're alive is a miracle
Just stay alive, that would be enough
And if your wife could share a fraction of your time
If I could grant you peace of mind
Would that be enough?


Alexander joins forces with James Madison and John Jay to write a series of essays defending the new United States Constitution, entitled The Federalist Papers. The plan was to write a total of twenty-five essays, the work divided evenly among the three men. In the end, they wrote eighty-five essays, in the span of six months. John Jay got sick after writing five. James Madison wrote twenty-nine. Hamilton wrote the other fifty-one!


How do you write like you're running out of time?
Write day and night like you're running out of time?


Ev'ry day you fight like you're running out of time
Like you're running out of time
Are you running out of time?
Awwww!


How do you write like tomorrow won't arrive?
How do you write like you need it to survive?
How do you write ev'ry second you're alive?
Ev'ry second you're alive? Ev'ry second you're alive?


They are asking me to lead
I am doing the best I can
To get the people that I need
I'm asking you to be my right hand man


Treasury or State?


I know it's a lot to ask


Treasury or State?


To leave behind the world you know...


Sir, do you want me to run the Treasury or State department?


Treasury


Let's go


Alexander...


I have to leave


Alexander-


Look around, look around at how lucky we are to be alive right now


Helpless...


They are asking me to lead


Look around, isn't this enough?


He will never be satisfied
What would be enough?
He will never be satisfied (to be satisfied)
Satisfied, satisfied


History has its eyes
Look around, look around!
Why do you assume you're the smartest in the room?
On you
Isn't this enough?
Why do you assume you're the smartest in the room? (Non-stop)
What would be enough?


He will never be satisfied
Why do you assume you're the smartest in the room? (Non-stop)
Satisfied, satisfied


History has its eyes
Soon that attitude's gonna be your doom! (Non-stop)
On you
Why do you fight like you're running out of time? (Non-stop)


Why do you fight like


History has its eyes on you


I am not throwin' away my shot! (Just you wait!)


I am not throwin' away my shot! (Just you wait!)


I am Alexander Hamilton!


Hamilton, just you wait!


I am not throwin' away my shot!",2314680
73350,1775009,Whatd I Miss,rap,"Daveed Diggs, Leslie Odom, Jr., Okieriete Onaodowan & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1070225,"{""Daveed Diggs / Leslie Odom / Jr. / Okieriete Onaodowan & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
Seventeen. Se- se- seventeen...
Se- se- seventeen...


1789
How does the bastard orphan
Immigrant decorated war vet
Unite the colonies through more debt?
Fight the other founding fathers til he has to forfeit?
Have it all, lose it all
You ready for more yet?
Treasury Secretary. Washington's the President
Ev'ry American experiment sets a precedent
Not so fast. Someone came along to resist him
Pissed him off until we had a two-party system
You haven't met him yet, you haven't had the chance
'cause he's been kickin' ass as the ambassador to France
But someone's gotta keep the American promise
You simply must meet Thomas. Thomas!

Thomas Jefferson's coming home!
Thomas Jefferson's coming home!
Thomas Jefferson's coming home!
Thomas Jefferson's coming home!
Thomas Jefferson's coming home Lord he's
Been off in Paris for so long!
Aaa-ooo!
Aaa-ooo!


France is following us to revolution
There is no more status quo
But the sun comes up
And the world still spins


Aaa-ooo!


I helped Lafayette draft a declaration
Then I said, 'I gotta go
I gotta be in Monticello.'
Now the work at home begins...


Aaa-ooo!

So what'd I miss?
What'd I miss?
Virginia, my home sweet home, I wanna give you a kiss
I've been in Paris meeting lots of different ladies...
I guess I basic'lly missed the late eighties...
I traveled the wide, wide world and came back to this...


Aaa-ooo!


There's a letter on my desk from the President
Haven't even put my bags down yet
Sally be a lamb, darlin', won'tcha open it?
It says the President's assembling a cabinet
And that I am to be the Secretary of State, great!
And that I'm already Senate-approved...
I just got home and now I'm headed up to New York


Headin' to New York!
Headin' to New York!


Lookin' at the rolling fields
I can't believe that we are free (Believe that we are free)
Ready to face
Whatever's awaiting
Me in N.Y.C. (Me in N.Y.C.)
But who's waitin' for me when I step in the place?
My friend James Madison, red in the face
He grabs my arm and
I respond
""What's goin' on?""
(Aaa-ooo!)

Thomas, we are engaged in a battle for our nation's very soul
Can you get us out of the mess we're in?


Aaa-ooo!


Hamilton's new financial plan is nothing less
Than government control
I've been fighting for the South alone
Where have you been?


Uh...France


Aaa-ooo!


We have to win


What'd I miss?
Wha? Wha? What'd I miss?
What'd I miss?
I've come home to this?
Headfirst into a political abyss!
Headfirst, into the abyss!
I have my first cabinet meeting today
Chik-a-pow!
I guess I better think of something to say
I'm already on my way (On my way)
Let's get to the bottom of this... (What did I miss?)
Ahhh ah!


Mr. Jefferson, welcome home


Mr. Jefferson? Alexander Hamilton


Mr. Jefferson, welcome home


Mr. Jefferson, welcome home
Sir, you've been off in Paris for so long!


So what did I miss?",2314682
73353,1775057,The Schuyler Sisters,rap,"The Schuyler Sisters Lyrics - Phillipa Soo, Jasmine Cephas-Jones, Leslie Odom, Jr., Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton"" & Rene Elise Goldsberry",2015,2594478,"{""Phillipa Soo / Jasmine Cephas-Jones / Leslie Odom / Jr. / Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\"" & Renée Elise Goldsberry""}","
There's nothing rich folks love more
Than going downtown and slummin' it with the poor
They pull up in their carriages and gawk
At the students in the common
Just to watch them talk
Take Philip Schuyler: the man is loaded
Uh-oh, but little does he know that
His daughters, Peggy, Angelica, Eliza
Sneak into the city just to watch all the guys at-


Work, work!


Angelica!


Work, work!


Eliza!

And Peggy!


Work, work!
The Schuyler sisters!


Angelica!


Peggy!


Eliza!


Work!


Daddy said to be home by sundown


Daddy doesn't need to know


Daddy said not to go downtown

Like I said, you're free to go


But-look around, look around, the
Revolution's happening in New York


New York


Angelica


Work!


It's bad enough daddy wants to go to war


People shouting in the square


It's bad enough there'll be violence on our shore


New ideas in the air

Look around, look around-


Angelica, remind me what we're looking for...


She's lookin' for me!


Eliza, I'm lookin' for a mind at work (Work, work)
I'm lookin' for a mind at work! (Work, work)
I'm lookin' for a mind at work! (Work, work)
Whooaaaaa!


Whooaaaaa!
Work!


Wooh! There's nothin' like summer in the city
Someone in a rush next to someone lookin' pretty
Excuse me, miss, I know it's not funny
But your perfume smells like your daddy's got money
Why you slummin' in the city in your fancy heels
You searchin for an urchin who can give you ideals?


Burr, you disgust me


Ah, so you've discussed me
I'm a trust fund, baby, you can trust me!


I've been reading Common Sense by Thomas Paine
So men say that I'm intense or I'm insane
You want a revolution? I want a revelation
So listen to my declaration:


""We hold these truths to be self-evident
That all men are created equal""


And when I meet Thomas Jefferson


Unh!


I'm 'a compel him to include women in the sequel!


Work!


Look around, look around at how
Lucky we are to be alive right now!


Look around, look around at how
Lucky we are to be alive right now!


History is happening in Manhattan and we just happen to be
In the greatest city in the world!


In the greatest city in the world!


'Cause I've been reading Common Sense by Thomas Paine
Look around, look around
Hey! Hey! Hey! Hey!
So men say that I'm intense or I'm insane
The revolution's happening in-
Hey! Hey! Hey! Hey!


You want a revolution? I want a revelation
New York!
Look around, look around, the revolution's happening
In New York!
So listen to my declaration:


We hold these truths to be self evident that all men are created equal
Look around, look around
Hey, hey, hey, hey
Whoo!
At how lucky we are to be alive right now
Hey, hey, hey, hey



Look around, look around at how lucky we are to be alive right now!
History is happening in Manhattan and we just happen to be


In the greatest city in the world


In the greatest city-


In the greatest city in the world!


Work, work! Angelica


Work, work! Eliza
And Peggy!


Work, work!
The Schuyler sisters
Work, work
We're looking for a mind at work
Work, work (Hey)
Work, work (Hey)
Work, work


Work, work
Whoa!
Hey! Hey! Hey! Hey! Hey!
Work, work
In the greatest city in the world
In the greatest city in the world


In the greatest city in the world",2314902
73359,1775105,Who Lives Who Dies Who Tells Your Story,rap,"Who Lives, Who Dies, Who Tells Your Story Lyrics - Original Broadway Cast of Hamilton",2015,1293487,"{""Original Broadway Cast of Hamilton""}","
Let me tell you what I wish I'd known
When I was young and dreamed of glory
You have no control:


Who lives
Who dies
Who tells your story?


President Jefferson:


I'll give him this: his financial system is a
Work of genius. I couldn't undo it if I tried
And I tried


Who lives
Who dies
Who tells your story?

President Madison:


He took our country from bankruptcy to prosperity
I hate to admit it, but he doesn't get enough credit
For all the credit he gave us


Who lives
Who dies
Who tells your story?


Every other founding father's story gets told
Every other founding father gets to grow old


But when you're gone, who remembers your name?
Who keeps your flame?


Who tells your story?
Who tells your story?


Who tells your story?
Your story?

Eliza


I put myself back in the narrative


Eliza


I stop wasting time on tears
I live another fifty years
It's not enough


Eliza


I interview every soldier who fought by your side


She tells our story


I try to make sense of your thousands of pages of writings
You really do write like you're running out of-

Time


I rely on-


Angelica


While she's alive-


We tell your story


She is buried in Trinity Church


Near you


When I needed her most, she was right on-


Time


And I'm still not through
I ask myself, ""What would you do if you had more-""


Time


The Lord, in his kindness
He gives me what you always wanted
He gives me more-


Time


I raise funds in D.C. for the Washington Monument


She tells my story


I speak out against slavery
You could have done so much more if you only had-


Time


And when my time is up, have I done enough?


Will they tell our story?


Will they tell your story?


Oh. Can I show you what I'm proudest of?


The orphanage


I established the first private orphanage in New York City


The orphanage


I help to raise hundreds of children
I get to see them growing up


The orphanage


In their eyes I see you, Alexander
I see you every-


Time


And when my time is up
Have I done enough?
Will they tell my story?


Will they tell your story?


Oh, I can't wait to see you again
It's only a matter of-


Time


Will they tell your story?
Who lives, who dies, who tells your story?
Will they tell your story?
Who lives, who dies-


Time...
Time...
Time...


Who tells your story?",2315101
73361,1775108,The World Was Wide Enough,rap,"The World Was Wide Enough Lyrics - Leslie Odom, Jr., Lin-Manuel Miranda & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1136889,"{""Leslie Odom / Jr. / Lin-Manuel Miranda & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
One two three four


Five six seven eight nine-


There are ten things you need to know


Number one!


We rowed across the Hudson at dawn
My friend, William P. Van Ness signed on as my-


Number two!


Hamilton arrived with his crew:
Nathaniel Pendleton and a doctor that he knew

Number three!


I watched Hamilton examine the terrain
I wish I could tell you what was happ'ning in his brain
This man has poisoned my political pursuits!


Most disputes die and no one shoots!
Number four!


Hamilton drew first position
Looking, to the world, like a man on a mission
This is a soldier with a marksman's ability
The doctor turned around so he could have deniability


Five!


Now I didn't know this at the time
But we were-


Near the same spot (Near the same spot)
Your son died, is that (My son died, is that)
Why-(Why-)

Six!


He examined his gun with such rigor?
I watched as he methodically fiddled with the trigger


Seven!


Confession time? Here's what I got:
My fellow soldiers'll tell you I'm a terrible shot


Number eight!


Your last chance to negotiate
Send in your seconds, see if they can set the record straight


They won't teach you this in your classes
But look it up, Hamilton was wearing his glasses
Why? If not to take deadly aim?
It's him or me, the world will never be the same
I had only one thought before the slaughter:
This man will not make an orphan of my daughter

Number nine!


Look him in the eye, aim no higher
Summon all the courage you require
Then count:


One two three four five six seven eight nine
Number ten paces! Fire!-


I imagine death so much it feels more like a memory
Is this where it gets me, on my feet, sev'ral feet ahead of me?
I see it coming, do I run or fire my gun or let it be?
There is no beat, no melody
Burr, my first friend, my enemy
Maybe the last face I ever see
If I throw away my shot, is this how you'll remember me?
What if this bullet is my legacy?

Legacy. What is a legacy?
It's planting seeds in a garden you never get to see
I wrote some notes at the beginning of a song someone will sing for me
America, you great unfinished symphony, you sent for me
You let me make a difference
A place where even orphan immigrants
Can leave their fingerprints and rise up
I'm running out of time. I'm running, and my time's up
Wise up. Eyes up
I catch a glimpse of the other side
Laurens leads a soldiers' chorus on the other side
My son is on the other side
He's with my mother on the other side
Washington is watching from the other side

Teach me how to say goodbye

Rise up, rise up, rise up
Eliza

My love, take your time
I'll see you on the other side
Raise a glass to freedom...


He aims his pistol at the sky-


Wait!


I strike him right between his ribs
I walk towards him, but I am ushered away
They row him back across the Hudson
I get a drink


Aaaah
Aaaah
Aaaah


I hear wailing in the streets


Aaaah
Aaaah
Aaaah


Somebody tells me, ""You'd better hide.""


Aaaah
Aaaah
Aaaah


They say


Angelica and Eliza-


Were both at his side when he died
Death doesn't discriminate
Between the sinners and the saints
It takes and it takes and it takes
History obliterates
In every picture it paints
It paints me and all my mistakes
When Alexander aimed
At the sky
He may have been the first one to die
But I'm the one who paid for it

I survived, but I paid for it

Now I'm the villain in your history
I was too young and blind to see...
I should've known
I should've known
The world was wide enough for both Hamilton and me
The world was wide enough for both Hamilton and me",2315104
73363,1775117,Its Quiet Uptown,rap,"It's Quiet Uptown Lyrics - Lin-Manuel Miranda, Phillipa Soo, Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton"" & Rene Elise Goldsberry",2015,1105559,"{""Lin-Manuel Miranda / Phillipa Soo / Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\"" & Renée Elise Goldsberry""}","
There are moments that the words don't reach
There is suffering too terrible to name
You hold your child as tight as you can
And push away the unimaginable
The moments when you're in so deep
It feels easier to just swim down


The Hamiltons move uptown
And learn to live with the unimaginable


I spend hours in the garden
I walk alone to the store
And it's quiet uptown
I never liked the quiet before
I take the children to church on Sunday
A sign of the cross at the door
And I pray
That never used to happen before

If you see him in the street, walking by
Himself, talking to himself, have pity


Philip, you would like it uptown
It's quiet uptown


He is working through the unimaginable


His hair has gone grey. He passes every day
They say he walks the length of the city


You knock me out, I fall apart


Can you imagine?


Look at where we are
Look at where we started
I know I don't deserve you, Eliza
But hear me out. That would be enough
If I could spare his life
If I could trade his life for mine
He'd be standing here right now
And you would smile, and that would be enough
I don't pretend to know
The challenges we're facing
I know there's no replacing what we've lost
And you need time
But I'm not afraid
I know who I married
Just let me stay here by your side
That would be enough


If you see him in the street, walking by her
Side, talking by her side, have pity


Eliza, do you like it uptown? It's quiet uptown


He is trying to do the unimaginable
See them walking in the park, long after dark
Taking in the sights of the city


Look around, look around, Eliza

They are trying to do the unimaginable


There are moments that the words don't reach
There is a grace too powerful to name
We push away what we can never understand
We push away the unimaginable
They are standing in the garden
Alexander by Eliza's side
She takes his hand


It's quiet uptown


Forgiveness. Can you imagine?
Forgiveness. Can you imagine?
If you see him in the street, walking by her
Side, talking by her side, have pity
They are going through the unimaginable",2315113
73366,1775134,Burn,rap,Burn Lyrics - Phillipa Soo,2015,2272737,"{""Phillipa Soo""}","
I saved every letter you wrote me
From the moment I read them
I knew you were mine
You said you were mine
I thought you were mine

Do you know what Angelica said
When we saw your first letter arrive?
She said

""Be careful with that one, love
He will do what it takes to survive.""

You and your words flooded my senses
Your sentences left me defenseless
You built me palaces out of paragraphs
You built cathedrals
I'm re-reading the letters you wrote me
I'm searching and scanning for answers
In every line
For some kind of sign
And when you were mine
The world seemed to
Burn
Burn

You published the letters she wrote you
You told the whole world how you brought
This girl into our bed
In clearing your name, you have ruined our lives
Do you know what Angelica said
When she read what you'd done?
She said
""You have married an Icarus
He has flown too close to the sun.""

You and your words, obsessed with your legacy...
Your sentences border on senseless
And you are paranoid in every paragraph
How they perceive you

You, you, you...

I'm erasing myself from the narrative
Let future historians wonder how Eliza
Reacted when you broke her heart
You have torn it all apart
I am watching it
Burn
Watching it burn
The world has no right to my heart
The world has no place in our bed
They don't get to know what I said
I'm burning the memories
Burning the letters that might have redeemed you
You forfeit all rights to my heart
You forfeit the place in our bed
You sleep in your office instead
With only the memories
Of when you were mine
I hope that you burn",2315135
73391,1775276,Right Hand Man,rap,"Christopher Jackson, Lin-Manuel Miranda, Leslie Odom, Jr. & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1683214,"{""Christopher Jackson / Lin-Manuel Miranda / Leslie Odom / Jr. & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
British Admiral Howe's got troops on the water
Thirty-two thousand troops in New York harbor


Thirty-two thousand troops in New York harbor
Thirty-two thousand troops in New York harbor
When they surround our troops!
They surround our troops!
They surround our troops!
They surround our troops!
When they surround our troops!


As a kid in the Caribbean I wished for a war
I knew that I was poor
I knew it was the only way to-


Rise up!

If they tell my story
I am either gonna die on the battlefield in glory or-


Rise up!


I will fight for this land
But there's only one man
Who can give us a command so we can-


Rise up!


Understand? It's the only way to-


Rise up! Rise up!


Here he comes!


Here comes the General!

Ladies and gentlemen!


Here comes the General!


The moment you've been waiting for!


Here comes the General!


The pride of Mount Vernon!


Here comes the General!


George Washington!


We are outgunned (What?)
Outmanned (What?)
Outnumbered
Outplanned (Buck, buck, buck, buck, buck!)
We gotta make an all out stand
Ayo, I'm gonna need a right-hand man
(Buck, buck, buck, buck, buck!)

Check it-
Can I be real a second?
For just a millisecond?
Let down my guard and tell the people how I feel a second?
Now I'm the model of a modern major general
The venerated Virginian veteran whose men are all
Lining up, to put me up on a pedestal
Writin' letters to relatives
Embellishin' my elegance and eloquence
But the elephant is in the room
The truth is in ya face when ya hear the British cannons go...


Boom!


Any hope of success is fleeting
How can I keep leading when the people I'm
Leading keep retreating?
We put a stop to the bleeding as the British take Brooklyn
Knight takes rook, but look


We are outgunned (What?)
Outmanned (What?)
Outnumbered
Outplanned (Buck, buck, buck, buck, buck!)
We gotta make an all out stand
Ayo, I'm gonna need a right-hand man
(Buck, buck, buck, buck, buck!)
Incoming!


They're battering down the Battery check the damages


Rah!


We gotta stop 'em and rob 'em of their advantages


Rah!


Let's take a stand with the stamina God has granted us
Hamilton won't abandon ship
Yo, let's steal their cannons-


Shh-boom! (Boom!)


Goes the cannon, watch the blood and the shit spray and...


Boom!


Goes the cannon, we're abandonin' Kips Bay and...


Boom!


There's another ship and...


Boom!


We just lost the southern tip and...


Boom!


We gotta run to Harlem quick, we can't afford another slip
Guns and horses giddyup
I decide to divvy up
My forces, they're skittish as the British cut the city up
This close to giving up, facing mad scrutiny
I scream in the face of this mass mutiny:
Are these the men with which I am to defend America?
We ride at midnight, Manhattan in the distance
I cannot be everywhere at once, people
I'm in dire need of assistance...


Your excellency, sir!


Who are you?


Aaron Burr, Sir?
Permission to state my case?


As you were


Sir
I was a captain under General Montgomery
Until he caught a bullet in the neck in Quebec
And well, in summary
I think that I could be of some assistance
I admire how you keep firing on the British
From a distance


Huh


I have some questions, a couple of suggestions on how to fight instead of fleeing west


Yes?


Well-


Your excellency, you wanted to see me?


Hamilton, come in, have you met Burr?


Yes, sir


We keep meeting


As I was saying, sir, I look forward to seeing your strategy play out


Burr?


Sir?


Close the door on your way out

(Burr exits.)


Have I done something wrong, sir?


On the contrary
I called you here because our odds are beyond scary
Your reputation precedes you, but I have to laugh


Sir?


Hamilton, how come no one can get you on their staff?


Sir!


Don't get me wrong, you're a young man of great renown
I know you stole British cannons when we were still downtown
Nathaniel Green and Henry Knox wanted to hire you...


To be their Secretary? I don't think so


Why're you upset?


I'm not-


It's alright, you want to fight, you've got a hunger
I was just like you when I was younger
Head full of fantasies of dyin' like a martyr?


Yes


Dying is easy, young man. Living is harder


Why are you telling me this?


I'm being honest
I'm working with a third of what our Congress has promised
We are a powder keg about to explode
I need someone like you to lighten the load. So?


I am not throwin' away my shot!
I am not throwin' away my shot!
Ayo, I'm just like my country, I'm young
Scrappy and hungry!


I am not throwing away my shot!


Son


We are outgunned, outmanned!


You need all the help you can get
I have some friends. Laurens, Mulligan
Marquis de Lafayette, okay, what else?


Outnumbered, outplanned!


We'll need some spies on the inside
Some King's men who might let some things slide


Boom!
Whoa, whoa, whoa
I'll write to Congress and tell 'em we need supplies, you rally the guys,
Master the element of surprise
Chicka-boom!
Whoa, whoa, whoa...
I'll rise above my station, organize your information
Whoa, whoa, whoa...
'Til we rise to the occasion of our new nation. Sir!


Here comes the General!


Rise up!


What?


Here comes the General!


Rise up!


What?


Here comes the General!


Rise up!


What?


Here comes the General!


What?


And his right hand man!


Boom!",2315288
73392,1775279,The Room Where It Happens,rap,"The Room Where It Happens Lyrics - Leslie Odom, Jr., Lin-Manuel Miranda, Daveed Diggs, Okieriete Onaodowan & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1357360,"{""Leslie Odom / Jr. / Lin-Manuel Miranda / Daveed Diggs / Okieriete Onaodowan & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
Ah, Mister Secretary


Mister Burr, sir


Didja hear the news about good old General Mercer?


No


You know Clermont Street?


Yeah


They renamed it after him. The Mercer legacy is secure

Sure


And all he had to do was die


That's a lot less work


We oughta give it a try


Ha


Now how're you gonna get your debt plan through?


I guess I'm gonna fin'ly have to listen to you


Really?


""Talk less. Smile more.""

Ha


Do whatever it takes to get my plan on the Congress floor


Now, Madison and Jefferson are merciless.


Well, hate the sin, love the sinner


Hamilton!


I'm sorry Burr, I've gotta go


But-


Decisions are happening over dinner


Two Virginians and an immigrant walk into a room

Diametric'ly opposed, foes


They emerge with a compromise, having opened doors that were


Previously closed


Bros

BURR
The immigrant emerges with unprecedented financial power
A system he can shape however he wants
The Virginians emerge with the nation's capital
And here's the pièce de résistance:


No one else was in
The room where it happened
The room where it happened
The room where it happened
No one else was in
The room where it happened (The room where it happened)
The room where it happened
The room where it happened (The room where it happened)
No one really knows how the game is played (Game is played)
The art of the trade
How the sausage gets made (How the sausage gets made)
We just assume that it happens (Assume that it happens)
But no one else is in
The room where it happens. (The room where it happens.)


Thomas claims-


Alexander was on Washington's doorstep one day
In distress 'n disarray


Thomas claims-


Alexander said-


I've nowhere else to turn!


And basic'ly begged me to join the fray


Thomas claims-


I approached Madison and said-
""I know you hate 'im, but let's hear what he has to say.""


Thomas claims-


Well, I arranged the meeting
I arranged the menu, the venue, the seating


But!
No one else was in-


The room where it happened
The room where it happened
The room where it happened


No one else was in-


The room where it happened
The room where it happened
The room where it happened


No one really knows how the
Parties get to yesssss (Parties get to yesssss)
The pieces that are sacrificed in (Ev'ry game of chesssss)
Ev'ry game of chesssss
We just assume that it happens (Assume that it happens)
But no one else is in (The room where it happens)
The room where it happens


Meanwhile-


Madison is grappling with the fact that not ev'ry issue can be settled by committee


Meanwhile-


Congress is fighting over where to put the capital-

Company screams in chaos


It isn't pretty
Then Jefferson approaches with a dinner and invite
And Madison responds with Virginian insight:


Maybe we can solve one problem with another and win a victory for the Southerners, in other words-


Oh-ho!


A quid pro quo


I suppose


Wouldn't you like to work a little closer to home?


Actually, I would


Well, I propose the Potomac


And you'll provide him his votes?


Well, we'll see how it goes


Let's go


No!


-one else was in
The room where it happened


The room where it happened
The room where it happened
No one else was in
The room where it happened
The room where it happened
The room where it happened


My God!


In God we trust
But we'll never really know what got discussed
Click-boom then it happened


And no one else was in the room where it happened


Alexander Hamilton!


What did they say to you to get you to sell New York City down the river?


Alexander Hamilton!


Did Washington know about the dinner?
Was there Presidential pressure to deliver?


Alexander Hamilton!


Or did you know, even then, it doesn't matter
Where you put the U.S. Capital?


Cuz we'll have the banks
We're in the same spot


You got more than you gave


And I wanted what I got
When you got skin in the game, you stay in the game
But you don't get a win unless you play in the game
Oh, you get love for it. You get hate for it
You get nothing if you...


Wait for it, wait for it, wait!


God help and forgive me
I wanna build
Something that's gonna
Outlive me

[HAMILTON/JEFFERSON/
MADISON/WASHINGTON & COMPANY]
What do you want, Burr? (What do you want, Burr?)
What do you want, Burr? (What do you want, Burr?)
If you stand for nothing (What do you want, Burr?)
Burr, then what do you fall for? (What do you want?)


I
Wanna be in
The room where it happens
The room where it happens
I
Wanna be in
The room where it happens
The room where it happens


I I wanna be in
The room where it happens
Wanna be (The room where it happens)
In the room where it happens (The room where it happens)
I (I wanna be in the room)
Where it happens
I wanna be in the room... (The room where it happens)
Oh (The room where it happens)
Oh (I wanna be in)
The room where it happens
I wanna be (The room where it happens)
I wanna be (The room where it happens)
I've got to be (I wanna be in)
I've got to be (The room where it happens)
In that room (The room where it happens)
In that big ol' room (The room where it happens)


The art of the compromise-


Hold your nose and close your eyes


We want our leaders to save the day-


But we don't get a say in what they trade away


We dream of a brand new start-


But we dream in the dark for the most part


Dark as a tomb where it happens


I've got to be in
The room... (The room where it happens)
I've got to be...
The room where it happens
I've got to be...
The room where it happens
Oh, I've got to be in
The room where it happens... (The room where it happens)
I've got to be, I've gotta be (The room where it happens)
I've gotta be...
In the room! (I wanna be in the room)
Where it happens!
Click-boom! (Click-boom!)",2315291
73393,1775282,Say No to This,rap,"Jasmine Cephas-Jones, Leslie Odom, Jr., Lin-Manuel Miranda, Sydney James Harcourt & Original Broadway Cast of ""Hamilton""",2015,1383076,"{""Jasmine Cephas-Jones / Leslie Odom / Jr. / Lin-Manuel Miranda / Sydney James Harcourt & Original Broadway Cast of \\\""Hamilton\\\""""}","
There's nothing like summer in the city
Someone under stress meets someone looking pretty
There's trouble in the air, you can smell it
And Alexander's by himself. I'll let him tell it


I hadn't slept in a week
I was weak, I was awake
You never seen a bastard orphan
More in need of a break
Longing for Angelica
Missing my wife
That's when Miss Maria Reynolds walked into my life, she said:


I know you are a man of honor
I'm so sorry to bother you at home
But I don't know where to go, and I came here all alone...


She said:

My husband's doin' me wrong
Beatin' me, cheatin' me, mistreatin' me...
Suddenly he's up and gone
I don't have the means to go on


So I offered her a loan, I offered to walk her home, she said


You're too kind, sir


I gave her thirty bucks that I had socked away
She lived a block away, she said:


This one's mine, sir


Then I said, ""well, I should head back home,""
She turned red, she led me to her bed
Let her legs spread and said:


Stay?

Hey...


Hey...


That's when I began to pray:
Lord, show me how to
Say no to this
I don't know how to
Say no to this

But my God, she looks so helpless
And her body's saying, ""hell, yes""


Whoa...


Nooo, show me how to


Say no to this


I don't know how to

Say no to this


In my mind, I'm tryin' to go


Go! Go! Go!


Then her mouth is on mine, and I don't say...


No! No!
Say no to this!
No! No!
Say no to this!
No! No!
Say no to this!
No! No!
Say no to this!


I wish I could say that was the last time
I said that last time. It became a pastime
A month into this endeavor I received a letter
From a Mr. James Reynolds, even better, it said:


Dear Sir, I hope this letter finds you in good health
And in a prosperous enough position to put wealth
In the pockets of people like me: down on their luck
You see, that was my wife who you decided to


Fuuuu-


Uh-oh! You made the wrong sucker a cuckold
So time to pay the piper for the pants you unbuckled
And hey, you can keep seein' my whore wife
If the price is right: if not I'm telling your wife


I hid the letter and I raced to her place
Screamed ""How could you?!"" in her face
She said:


No, sir!


Half dressed, apologetic. A mess, she looked
Pathetic, she cried:


Please don't go, sir!


So was your whole story a setup?


I don't know about any letter!


Stop crying
Goddamnit, get up!


I didn't know any better


I am ruined...


Please don't leave me with him helpless (I am helpless-how could I do this?)
Just give him what he wants and you can have me
I don't want you
Whatever you want (I don't want you)


If you pay (I don't...)
You can stay
Lord, show me how to
Say no to this (Say no to this!)
Tonight (I don't know how to)
(Say no to this!)
Say no to this
'Cause the situation's helpless (Helpless)
And her body's screaming, ""Hell, yes"" (Whoa!)
How can you (No, show me how to)
(Say no to this!)
Say no to this? (Say no to this)
(Say no to this!)
How can I say no to this?
There is nowhere I can go (Go! Go! Go!)
When her body's on mine I do not say... (No!)


Yes (Yes!)
Say no to this!
No!
Yes (Yes!)
Say no to this!
No!
Yes (Yes!)
Say no to this!
No!
Yes (Yes!)
Say no to this!
Say no to this...
I don't say no to this (Don't say no to this)
There is nowhere I can go
Go go go...


So?


Nobody needs to know",2315295
73395,1775285,Take a Break,rap,"Phillipa Soo, Anthony Ramos, Lin-Manuel Miranda & Rene Elise Goldsberry",2015,1574127,"{""Phillipa Soo / Anthony Ramos / Lin-Manuel Miranda & Renée Elise Goldsberry""}","
Un deux trois quatre
Cinq six sept huit neuf (Un deux trois quatre)
Cinq six sept huit neuf
Good! Un deux trois quatre
Cinq six sept huit neuf (Un deux trois quatre)
Cinq six sept huit neuf
Sept huit neuf-
Sept huit neuf-
Sept huit neuf-
Sept huit neuf-


One two three four five six seven eight nine!


My dearest, Angelica
""Tomorrow and tomorrow and tomorrow
Creeps in this petty pace from day to day""
I trust you'll understand the reference to
Another Scottish tragedy without my having to name the play
They think me Macbeth, and ambition is my folly
I'm a polymath, a pain in the ass, a massive pain
Madison is Banquo, Jefferson's Macduff
And Birnam Wood is Congress on its way to Dunsinane

And there you are, an ocean away
Do you have to live an ocean away?
Thoughts of you subside
Then I get another letter
I cannot put the notion away...


Take a break


I am on my way


There's a little surprise before supper
And it cannot wait


I'll be there in just a minute, save my plate


Alexander-


Okay, okay-

Your son is nine years old today
And he has something that he'd like to say
He's been practicing all day
Philip, take it away-


Daddy, daddy, look-
My name is Philip
I am a poet
I wrote this poem just
To show it
And I just turned nine
You can write rhymes
But you can't write mine
What!
I practice French
And play piano with my mother (Uh-huh!)
I have a sister
But I want a little brother (Okay!)
My daddy's trying to start America's bank
Un deux trois quatre cinq! (Bravo!)


Take a break

Hey, our kid is pretty great


Run away with us for the summer
Let's go upstate


Eliza, I've got so much on my plate


We can all go stay with my father
There's a lake I know...


I know


In a nearby park


I'd love to go


You and I can go when the night gets dark...


I will try to get away


My dearest Alexander
You must get through to Jefferson
Sit down with him and compromise
Don't stop 'til you agree
Your fav'rite older sister
Angelica, reminds you
There's someone in your corner all the way across the sea

In a letter I received from you two weeks ago
I noticed a comma in the middle of a phrase
It changed the meaning. Did you intend this?
One stroke and you've consumed my waking days
It says:


""My dearest Angelica""


With a comma after ""dearest."" You've written


""My dearest, Angelica.""


Anyway, all this to say
I'm coming home this summer
At my sister's invitation
I'll be there with your fam'ly
If you make your way upstate
I know you're very busy
I know your work's important
But I'm crossing the ocean and I just can't wait


You won't be an ocean away
You will only be a moment away...


Alexander, come downstairs. Angelica's arriving today!


Angelica!


Eliza!


The Schuyler sisters!


Alexander


Hi


It's good to see your face


Angelica, tell this man John Adams spends the summer with his family


Angelica, tell my wife John Adams doesn't have a real job anyway


...you're not joining us? Wait


I'm afraid I cannot join you upstate


Alexander, I came all this way


She came all this way-


All this way-


Take a break


You know I have to get my plan through Congress


Run away with us for the summer
Let's go upstate


I lose my job if we don't get this plan through Congress


We can all go stay with our father


There's a lake I know
I know I'll miss your face-
In a nearby park
Screw your courage to the sticking place-
You and I can go
Eliza's right-
Take a break and get away- (Take a break)
Run away with us for the summer-
Let's go upstate (Let's go upstate)
Where we can stay
We can all go stay with our father
If you take your time-
Look around, look around
At how lucky we are to be alive right now- (You will make your mark)
Close your eyes and dream-
We can go-
When the night gets dark (When the night gets dark)
Take a break (Take a break)


I have to get my plan through Congress
I can't stop until I get this plan through Congress",2315298
73811,1780271,Sorry,pop,Justin Bieber,2015,2330542,{},"


You gotta go and get angry at all of my honesty
You know I try, but I don't do too well with apologies
I hope I don't run out of time, could someone call a referee?
'Cause I just need one more shot at forgiveness
I know you know that I made those mistakes maybe once or twice
By once or twice, I mean maybe a couple a hundred times
So let me, oh let me redeem, oh redeem, oh myself tonight
'Cause I just need one more shot at second chances


Yeah, is it too late now to say sorry?
'Cause I'm missing more than just your body
Oh, is it too late now to say sorry?
Yeah, I know that I let you down
Is it too late to say I'm sorry now?


I'm sorry, yeah
Sorry, yeah
Sorry
Yeah, I know that I let you down
Is it too late to say I'm sorry now?

I'll take every single piece of the blame if you want me to
But you know that there is no innocent one in this game for two
I'll go, I'll go and then you go, you go out and spill the truth
Can we both say the words and forget this?


Yeah, is it too late now to say sorry?
'Cause I'm missing more than just your body
Oh, is it too late now to say sorry?
Yeah, I know that I let you down
Is it too late to say I'm sorry now?


I'm not just trying to get you back on me (Oh, no, no)
'Cause I'm missing more than just your body (Your body)
Oh, is it too late now to say sorry?
Yeah, I know that I let you down
Is it too late to say I'm sorry now?


I'm sorry, yeah
Sorry, oh
Sorry
Yeah I know that I let you down
Is it too late to say I'm sorry now?
I'm sorry, yeah
Sorry, oh
Sorry
Yeah, I know that I let you down
Is it too late to say I'm sorry now?",2323822
74133,1783618,Me Myself  I,rap,"Me, Myself & I Lyrics - G-Eazy & Bebe Rexha",2015,2574481,"{""G-Eazy & Bebe Rexha""}","
Oh, it's just me, myself and I
Solo ride until I die
'Cause I got me for life (Yeah)
Oh, I don't need a hand to hold
Even when the night is cold
I got that fire in my soul


Hun, and as far as I can see, I just need privacy
Plus a whole lot of tree, fuck all this modesty
I just need space to do me
Give the world what they're tryna see
A Stella Maxwell right beside of me
A Ferrari, I'm buyin' three
A closet of Saint Laurent, get what I want when I want
'Cause this hunger is drivin' me, yeah
I just need to be alone, I just need to be at home
Understand what I'm speakin' on
If time is money I need a loan
But regardless I'll always keep keepin' on
Fuck fake friends!
We don't take L's, we just make M's
While y'all follow, we just make trends
I'm right back to work when that break ends, yeah

Oh, it's just me, myself and I
Solo ride until I die
'Cause I got me for life (Got me for life, yeah)
Oh I don't need a hand to hold
Even when the night is cold
I got that fire in my soul


I don't need anything (Yeah) to get me through the night
Except the beat that's in my heart
Yeah, it's keepin' me alive (Keeps me alive)
I don't need anything to make me satisfied (You know)
'Cause the music does me good
And it gets me every time (Every time)


Yeah, and I don't like talkin' to strangers
So get the fuck off me, I'm anxious
I'm tryna be cool, but I may just go apeshit
Say ""Fuck y'all!"" to all of y'all faces
It changes though now that I'm famous
Everyone knows how this lifestyle is dangerous
But I love it, the rush is amazin'
Celebrate nightly and everyone rages
I found how to cope with my angers
I'm swimmin' in money
Swimmin' in liquor, my liver is muddy
But it's all good, I'm still sippin' this bubbly
This shit is lovely, this shit ain't random, I didn't get lucky
Made it right here 'cause I'm sick with it, cuddy
They all take the money for granted
But don't want to work for it-tell me now, isn't it funny? (Nah)

Oh, it's just me, myself and I
Solo ride until I die
'Cause I got me for life (Got me for life, yeah)
Oh, I don't need a hand to hold
Even when the night is cold
I got that fire in my soul


I don't need anything (Yeah) to get me through the night
Except the beat that's in my heart
Yeah, it's keepin' me alive (Keeps me alive)
I don't need anything to make me satisfied (You know)
'Cause the music fills me good
And it gets me every time


Like, ba-ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-da-ba (Yeah)
Ba-ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-da-ba
'Cause the music fills me good
And it gets me every time

Yeah, lonely nights I laid awake
Pray to Lord my soul to take
My heart's become too cold to break
Know I'm great, but I'm broke as hell
Havin' dreams that I'm foldin' cake
All my life I've been told to wait
But I'ma get it now, yeah, it's no debate
Yeah


Oh, it's just me, myself and I
Solo ride until I die
'Cause I got me for life (Got me for life, yeah)
Oh, I don't need a hand to hold
Even when the night is cold
I got that fire in my soul


I don't need anything (Yeah) to get me through the night
Except the beat that's in my heart
And it's keepin' me alive (Keeps me alive)
I don't need anything to make me satisfied (You know)
'Cause the music does me good
And it gets me every time


Like, ba-ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-ba-da-ba
Ba-ba-ba-da-ba
'Cause the music fills me good
And it gets me every time

",2329765
74329,1785385,Dont Mind,rap,Kent Jones,2016,1240302,{},"
Hola, holana


Keep telling me this and telling me that
You said once you take me with you, I'll never go back
Now I got a lesson, that I want to teach
I'ma show you that where you from don't matter to me


She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?"", she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all
She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?"", she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all


African American for sho
I told her, ""Baby come and ride the rodeo""
Every time I come around man, I go for broke
She gives me desktop til' I overload
Now baby you gon' go where you pos to go
'Cause I ain't got time for you every day
She said she got a man keep it on the low
I said he don't speak English, fuck he gon' say (aye)

Telling me this and telling me that
You said once you take me with you, I'll never go back
Now I got a lesson that I want to teach ya
Ima show you that where you from don't matter to me


She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?, she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all
She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?, she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all


She from Africa but she fuck me like she Haitian
Ass black, but the eyes looking Asian
I give her the can in Kansas
I got it on tape, she on Candid Camera
Okay see, I forgot we met in Oklahoma
I use to smoke Regina, she from Arizona
Then I met a girl in Cali I never disowned her
She got that high grade, her weed come with diplomas
I want her but she keep

Telling me this and telling me that
You said once you take me with you, I'll never go back
Now I got a lesson that I want to teach ya
I'ma show you that where you from don't matter to me


She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?, she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all
She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?, she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all
She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?, she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all
She said ""Hola, ¿Cómo estás?, she said ""Konnichiwa""
She said ""Pardon my French"", I said ""Bonjour Madame""
Then she said ""Sak pase"" and I said ""N'ap boule""
No matter where I go, you know I love 'em all

",2332450
74332,1785389,Hello,pop,Adele,2015,5213471,{},"
Hello, it's me
I was wondering if after all these years you'd like to meet
To go over everything
They say that time's supposed to heal ya, but I ain't done much healing
Hello, can you hear me?
I'm in California dreaming about who we used to be
When we were younger and free
I've forgotten how it felt before the world fell at our feet


There's such a difference between us
And a million miles


Hello from the other side
I must've called a thousand times
To tell you I'm sorry for everything that I've done
But when I call, you never seem to be home
Hello from the outside
At least, I can say that I've tried
To tell you I'm sorry for breaking your heart
But it don't matter, it clearly doesn't tear you apart anymore

Hello, how are you?
It's so typical of me to talk about myself, I'm sorry
I hope that you're well
Did you ever make it out of that town where nothing ever happened?


It's no secret that the both of us
Are running out of time


So hello from the other side (Other side)
I must've called a thousand times (Thousand times)
To tell you I'm sorry for everything that I've done
But when I call, you never seem to be home
Hello from the outside (Outside)
At least, I can say that I've tried (I've tried)
To tell you I'm sorry for breaking your heart
But it don't matter, it clearly doesn't tear you apart anymore


(Highs, highs, highs, highs, lows, lows, lows, lows)
Ooh, anymore
(Highs, highs, highs, highs, lows, lows, lows, lows)
Ooh, anymore
(Highs, highs, highs, highs, lows, lows, lows, lows)
Ooh, anymore
(Highs, highs, highs, highs, lows, lows, lows, lows)
Anymore

Hello from the other side (Other side)
I must've called a thousand times (Thousand times)
To tell you I'm sorry for everything that I've done
But when I call, you never seem to be home
Hello from the outside (Outside)
At least, I can say that I've tried (I've tried)
To tell you I'm sorry for breaking your heart
But it don't matter, it clearly doesn't tear you apart anymore


",2332455
74512,1787378,When We Were Young,pop,When We Were Young Lyrics - Adele,2015,1144604,{Adele},"
Everybody loves the things you do
From the way you talk to the way you move
Everybody here is watching you
'Cause you feel like home, you're like a dream come true
But if by chance you're here alone
Can I have a moment before I go?
'Cause I've been by myself all night long
Hoping you're someone I used to know


You look like a movie
You sound like a song
My God, this reminds me
Of when we were young


Let me photograph you in this light
In case it is the last time that we might
Be exactly like we were before we realised
We were sad of getting old, it made us restless
It was just like a movie
It was just like a song

I was so scared to face my fears
Nobody told me that you'd be here
And I swear you'd moved overseas
That's what you said when you left me


You still look like a movie
You still sound like a song
My God, this reminds me
Of when we were young


Let me photograph you in this light
In case it is the last time that we might
Be exactly like we were before we realised
We were sad of getting old, it made us restless
It was just like a movie
It was just like a song


(When we were young)
(When we were young)
(When we were young)
(When we were young)

It's hard to admit that everything just takes me back
To when you were there, to when you were there
And a part of me keeps holding on just in case it hasn't gone
'Cause I still care, do you still care?


It was just like a movie
It was just like a song
My God, this reminds me
Of when we were young


(When we were young)
(When we were young)
(When we were young)
(When we were young)


Let me photograph you in this light
In case it is the last time that we might
Be exactly like we were before we realised
We were sad of getting old, it made us restless
Oh, I'm so mad I'm getting old, it makes me reckless
It was just like a movie
It was just like a song
When we were young",2336628
74517,1787390,All I Ask,pop,All I Ask Lyrics - Adele,2015,1039222,{Adele},"
I will leave my heart at the door
I won't say a word
They've all been said before, you know
So why don't we just play pretend
Like we're not scared of what is coming next
Or scared of having nothing left?


Look, don't get me wrong
I know there is no tomorrow
All I ask is


If this is my last night with you
Hold me like I'm more than just a friend
Give me a memory I can use
Take me by the hand while we do
What lovers do
It matters how this ends
'Cause what if I never love again?

I don't need your honesty
It's already in your eyes
And I'm sure my eyes, they speak for me
No one knows me like you do
And since you're the only one that mattered
Tell me, who do I run to?


Look, don't get me wrong
I know there is no tomorrow
All I ask is


If this is my last night with you
Hold me like I'm more than just a friend
Give me a memory I can use
Take me by the hand while we do
What lovers do
It matters how this ends
'Cause what if I never love again?


Let this be our lesson in love
Let this be the way we remember us
I don't want to be cruel or vicious
And I ain't asking for forgiveness
All I ask is

If this is my last night with you
Hold me like I'm more than just a friend
Give me a memory I can use
Take me by the hand while we do
What lovers do
It matters how this ends
'Cause what if I never love again?",2336647
74534,1787479,Chill Bill,rap,Rob $tone,2015,1628871,"{Spooks,""J. Davi\\$"",""Rob \\$tone""}","
Dun, dun, da-da-dun
Water, ah, huh
Mwah!


Rob $tone, two damn phones, babylons can't crack the code (no)
Used to sip out styrofoam but figured I should stick to dro (Weed!)
Backwoods overload, don't like to smoke them Swishers, ho
If you hit my liquor store, it's 50 cents for single Ports


Said she wanna roll with me and smoke up all my weed
I said, ""Baby just buy Dutches 'cause you can't smoke for free
I got some loud but no money, babe, buy me a Fiji""
She said, ""You need a job"", bitch, fuck a job, I still get cheese


Two cell phones, Mr. Mothafuck A Thot
Mr. I Be On That Block, 1207, fuck an opp
They hear my name, they see my squad, rollin dope up on the spot
I'm with your bitch, she on my jock, ain't got no time to love a thot
Got niggas mad my flow so hot, got niggas mad my squad won't stop
We in the game, won't take no loss, I'm sippin' water out the Voss
Got lean all in my fuckin' Sprite, turnin' up on fuckin' sight
Mr. Kenny Powers 'bout to take your girlfriend home tonight, bitch

And I'm smokin' on that widow when you see it out the window
Got a dusty old tee, lookin' bummy, leave it simple
Growin' up, I was always in the middle
So I gotta hold it down for my older and my little
And my brothers beside me, so fuck it, we mobbin' deep
Always grimy, no findin' me, but I be in LG
If your lil' fuckboy lame ass wanna creep
I live by the lemon 'cause that fucker chose me


Said she wanna roll with me and smoke up all my weed
I said, ""Baby just buy Dutches 'cause you can't smoke for free
I got some loud but no money, babe, buy me a Fiji""
She said, ""You need a job"", bitch, fuck a job, I still get cheese


Yeah, got 1207 in this bitch, God
Shoutout to that nigga Burgers
He over there flipping them burgers though
That nigga Andy
We don't know where the fuck Andy's at
But that's my nigga (Squad)
1207, bitch
Water, coming up
Water
Water",2336758
74741,1789536,Love Yourself,pop,Justin Bieber,2015,4119062,{},"


For all the times that you rained on my parade
And all the clubs you get in using my name
You think you broke my heart, oh girl, for goodness sake
You think I'm cryin' on my own, well I ain't


And I didn't wanna write a song
'Cause I didn't want anyone thinking I still care
I don't, but you still hit my phone up
And baby, I'll be movin' on
And I think you should be somethin' I don't wanna hold back
Maybe you should know that


My mama don't like you and she likes everyone
And I never like to admit that I was wrong
And I've been so caught up in my job, didn't see what's going on
But now I know, I'm better sleeping on my own

'Cause if you like the way you look that much
Oh baby, you should go and love yourself
And if you think that I'm still holdin' on to somethin'
You should go and love yourself


But when you told me that you hated my friends
The only problem was with you and not them
And every time you told me my opinion was wrong
And tried to make me forget where I came from


And I didn't wanna write a song
'Cause I didn't want anyone thinking I still care
I don't, but you still hit my phone up
And baby, I'll be movin' on
And I think you should be somethin' I don't wanna hold back
Maybe you should know that


My mama don't like you and she likes everyone
And I never like to admit that I was wrong
And I've been so caught up in my job, didn't see what's going on
But now I know, I'm better sleeping on my own

'Cause if you like the way you look that much
Oh baby, you should go and love yourself
And if you think that I'm still holdin' on to somethin'
You should go and love yourself


For all the times that you made me feel small
I fell in love, now I feel nothin' at all
I never felt so low and I was vulnerable
Was I a fool to let you break down my walls?


'Cause if you like the way you look that much
Oh baby, you should go and love yourself
And if you think that I'm still holdin' on to somethin'
You should go and love yourself
'Cause if you like the way you look that much
Oh baby, you should go and love yourself
And if you think that I'm still holdin' on to somethin'
You should go and love yourself",2342329
74757,1789630,​oui,rb,Jeremih,2015,1044861,{},"
Ahh ahh ahh ahh ahh
Ahh ahh ahh ahh ahh
Ahh ahh ahh ahh ahh ahh..


I think about all the time
Think you may need all of mine
Hate to say you know that love is blind
I'm 'bout to see, I'll close my eyes
(Truth is) They can't see you in here though
Most of them need dollar signs to make
Every day your birthday
And every night your Valentine...


If we
Tried that we could be
Somewhere in the climate
Is warm, long as you around me
I swear that everything will be just fine
I wish that we could take some time
Go anywhere, baby I don't mind
Grown man, in my suit and tie
Hey, there's no we without you and I
Oh, yeah, ah yeah, ah ah yeah
Hey, there's no we without you and I
Oh yeah, ah yeah, ah ah yeah
Hey, there's no we without you and I

See my baby know
Where my baby go, I go
It's no better feeling, you know
When I'm next to her for sure
It's like you on my mind all day
Get this off my chest
Ah damn, I know I love you
I swear your shit the best
Friends, they know they hate
Get that off my chest
Ah yeah, I think I love you
Oh baby, maybe


If we
Tried that we could be
Somewhere in the climate
Is warm, long as you around me
I swear that everything will be just fine
I wish that we could take some time
Go anywhere, baby I don't mind
Grown man, in my suit and tie
Hey, there's no we without you and I
Oh, yeah, ah yeah, ah ah yeah
Hey, there's no we without you and I
Oh yeah, ah yeah, ah ah yeah
Hey, there's no we without you and I

Oohh, da du du du
Oohh, da du du du
Oohh, da du du du
Oohh, da du du du


If we
Tried that we could be
Somewhere in the climate
Is warm, long as you around me
I swear that everything will be just fine
I wish that we could take some time
Go anywhere, baby I don't mind
Grown man, in my suit and tie
Hey, there's no we without you and I
Oh, yeah, ah yea, ah ah yeah
Hey, there's no we without you and I
Oh yeah, ah yeah, ah ah yeah
Hey, there's no we without you and I",2342690
74772,1789781,Uber Everywhere,rap,Uber Everywhere Lyrics - MadeinTYO,2015,1721820,{MadeinTYO},"
K. Swisha on the track
Skrrt-skrrt
Hey, hey, hey
Skrrt-skrrt
I know anywhere
Hey, hey


Nawfside cooling, shorty, yeah that's where I stay
Heard you was a lame, boy
Get up out my face
And my ex keep calling, swear that she be in the way
And I need a thick redbone shorty where I lay
Bad bih in L.A., tell me that she'll make the trip
Shorty bad as hell, yeah, with them Kylie Jenner lips
Uber every-fucking-where, pre-rolls in my VIP
Canada jawn, yeah I think that bitch from the 6


Shorty wanna kiss me, but I know she sucking dick
Shorty wanna kiss me, but I know she sucking dick
Look, Uber everywhere, pre-rolls in the VIP
Yeah, Uber everywhere, pre-rolls in my VIP
Ayy (Skrrt-skrrt)

Yeah, I wanna get the 'Rari, but I know it takes some time (Skrrt-skrrt)
Pre-roll shorty light it up, you know you fine
Lil 5 with my 5 and I'm rolling up the gas
And I need my leg room, Bapestas, first class
East Atlanta jawn Cookout on Moreland Ave (Skrrt-skrrt)
She say she 'bout that action but I think that I'ma pass


Shorty wanna fuck me but I know I got some top
Shorty wanna fuck me but I just got some top (Skrrt-skrrt)
I can't fuck with ops, never stop, pull up in that juice box
Uber fucking everywhere
I can't fuck with ops, never stop, pull up in that juice box


Uber fucking everywhere
Uber everywhere, pre-rolls in my VIP (Skrrt-skrrt)
Uber everywhere, pre-rolls in my VIP (Skrrt-skrrt)
And I think that bitch from Canada
I think she from the 6
Uber everywhere, pre-rolls in the VIP


Hey hey hey (Skrrt-skrrt)
Hey hey hey (Skrrt-skrrt)
Hey hey hey (Skrrt-skrrt)
Hey hey hey (Skrrt-skrrt)",2342860
75028,1792159,Jimmy Choo,rap,Fetty Wap,2015,1012613,{},"
Ayy, my Beamer sit on Jimmy Choos, damn
My bitch, I buy her Jimmy Choos, damn
My neck, a buncha frozen jewels, damn
I can show you what them Benjis do, damn
Benjamins bring them finer things, damn
That what you want, then go on, get it baby, damn
I hit a lick, ain't have to split it, baby, damn
A hunnid thou in all fifties, baby
Robin jeans and some Jimmy Choos, damn
All wings, I don't do the Trues, damn
Robin jeans and some Jimmy Choos, damn
All wings, I don't do the Trues


What you want? 'Cause you got it, baby
I pull up, see you watchin', baby
See them bands in my Robins, baby
Jimmy Choos when you walkin', baby
I swear that she works it, I swear she so perfect
She makes me so nervous, the way that she works it
Jimmy Choos on her feet when she be walkin', ayy
Jimmy Choos on her feet when she be walkin', yeah baby

My bitch in Jimmy Choos but I'm in Robin jeans
She say she love my crystals on my Robin wings
Everything designer, it's designer things
All this fuckin' money bring the finer things, ayy
Slim thick wit' yo cute ass, ayy
I might buy you a new bag, damn
So fine I bought a new Jag, damn
Top down, ain't no do rag
They like ""ZooWap, how you do that?""
All that money, I'ma move that
Jimmy Choos and my Robin jeans
Ain't no Trues, just some Robin jeans


What you want? 'Cause you got it, baby
I pull up, see you watchin', baby
See them bands in my Robins, baby
Jimmy Choos when you walkin', baby
I swear that she works it, I swear she so perfect
She makes me so nervous, the way that she works it
Jimmy Choos on her feet when she be walkin', ayy
Jimmy Choos on her feet when she be walkin', yeah baby",2347642
75076,1792551,2 Phones,rap,2 Phones Lyrics - Kevin Gates,2015,1041770,"{""Kevin Gates""}","
Hello? What the deal? Bet


I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'


Button start the foreign, oh my God, I'm gorgeous
I just put the key inside my pocket
Park it, might not get to see it, this a new Ferrari
Man in the mirror, how you choose to bother
Someone said they callin', I don't feel like talkin'
Everything I get returned the way I bought it
Phone be interrupting me while I'm recordin'
Phone be making women feel they unimportant
Call my dog, he say it's all the way retarded
Keep the oil 'cause I am not using the Foreman
Kitchen, I just finished up a new performance
Hater, wish you well
I got clientele
I just got it off the scale

I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'


There they go again, one of my lil friends
They don't give a damn how a nigga been
All they wanna know is what I got to give
How much did I spend? What I got to lend?
What I did and what I didn't do for them
Bricks comin' in somewhere on the rim
Section doin' numbers, nowhere by a gym
Droppin' bottles, spend, I'm supplyin' ten
Jumpin' out a Honda, I just got it in
Askin' what I cop, none of your concern
One day you gone learn what you tryna get
Everything on sale, goin' out of biz
Partners up in jail, gotta feed the kids
Juggin' round the city, you know what it is
Bread winner business, put that on the wrist

I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'


Ring, ring, ringin' man
Find me balling hard
Come from grinding hard
Getting calling cards from your Barbie doll
When she 'round me, she know I'm her bodyguard
Money callin' for me, baby girl, I'm sorry
You just high yella, you not that important
Weight, shape her, I could pin you to the carpet
Smell like tartar, I'ma put you in the water
Conversation cost a lot of chips
She don't really get a lot of this
Engagin' where I'm gazin' at her hips
And ain't nobody makin' no attempts
Amazing clip, hanging, slanging dick
Maybe we can make it takin' trips
Maybe I was thinkin' too impatient
Phone ringing, hold up, what it is?

I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
I got two phones, one for the plug and one for the load
I got two phones, one for the bitches and one for the dough
Think I need two more, line bumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'
Countin' money while they ring, ring, ringin'
Trap jumpin' I'm ring, ring, ringin'",2348651
75130,1793109,Star Shopping,rap,Lil Peep,2015,4177837,{},"
Wait right here
I'll be back in the mornin'
I know that I'm not that important to you
But to me, girl, you're so much more than gorgeous (Yeah)
So much more than perfect (Yeah)
Right now I know that I'm not really worth it
If you give me time, I could work on it
Give me some time while I work on it
Losin' your patience, and, girl, I don't blame you
The Earth's in rotation, you're waitin' for me (Yeah)
Look at my face when I fuck on your waist
'Cause we only have one conversation a week
That's why your friends always hatin' on me
Fuck 'em though, I did this all by myself
Matter fact, I ain't never asked no one for help
And that's why I don't pick up my phone when it rings
None of my exes is over Lil Peep
Nobody flexin' as much as I be
That's why she text me and tell me she love me
She know that someday I'll be over the sea
Makin' my money and smokin' my weed
I think it's funny, she open up to me, get comfortable with me
Once I got it comin', I love her, she love me
I know that I'm nothing like someone her family want me to be
If I find a way, would you walk it with me?
Look at my face while you talkin' to me
'Cause we only have one conversation a week
Can I get one conversation at least?
Shout out to everyone makin' my beats, you helpin' me preach
This music's the only thing keepin' the peace when I'm fallin' to pieces

Look at the sky tonight, all of the stars have a reason
A reason to shine, a reason like mine and I'm fallin' to pieces
Look at the sky tonight, all of the stars have a reason",2353006
75205,1793971,Losin Control,rb,Russ,2015,2861996,{},"
She's falling in love now, losing control now
Fighting the truth, trying to hide
But I think it's alright, girl
Yeah, I think it's alright, girl, ooh
She's falling in love now, losing control now
Fighting the truth, trying to hide
But I think it's alright, girl
Yeah, I think it's alright, girl, ooh


She's falling but she doesn't think he'll catch her
'Cause her last relationship was a disaster
Accusations everyday, she didn't know why
All her calls would be ignored, he's on his own time
Should've ended it before it started
All she ever got was broken hearted
He was cheating on her, trying to flip it
Back on her like a victim
Now she all alone and starting over
Now she got baggage on her shoulder
But the new guy really loves her
She loves him, but she doesn't trust herself anymore

She's falling in love now, losing control now
Fighting the truth, trying to hide
But I think it's alright, girl
Yeah, I think it's alright, girl, ooh
She's falling in love now, losing control now
Fighting the truth, trying to hide
But I think it's alright, girl
Yeah, I think it's alright, girl, ooh


Despite her past, she can't help the attraction
He tells her that he's nothing like the last one
He redefines in every way what love is
She fell for him and hasn't gotten up since
Every now and then, she goes off, though
Beating on his chest like a bongo
He understands she's coming from a hurt place
Answers all the questions on her survey
Doesn't get jealous, doesn't break trust
Doesn't call her, ""Ho"" after hang-ups
Give her everything she ever wanted
And even though she still feels haunted


She's falling in love now, losing control now
Fighting the truth, trying to hide
But I think it's alright, girl
Yeah, I think it's alright, girl, ooh
She's falling in love now, losing control now
Fighting the truth, trying to hide
But I think it's alright, girl
Yeah, I think it's alright, girl, ooh
",2361587
75234,1794338,Somebody Else,pop,The 1975,2016,1619955,{},"
So I heard you found somebody else
And at first, I thought it was a lie
I took all my things that make sounds
The rest I can do without


I don't want your body
But I hate to think about you with somebody else
Our love has gone cold
You're intertwining your soul with somebody else
I'm looking through you
While you're looking through your phone
And then leaving with somebody else
No, I don't want your body
But I'm picturing your body with somebody else (Else, else...)


I don't want your body, I don't want your body
I don't want your body, I don't want your body
I don't want your body, I don't want your body
I don't want your body, I don't want your body

And c'mon baby (I know)
This ain't the last time that I'll see your face
And c'mon baby (I know)
You said you'd find someone to take my place (Place, place)
I just don't believe that you have got it in you
'Cause we are just gonna keep ""Doin' it"" and every time
I start to believe in anything you're saying
I'm reminded that I should be gettin' over it


I don't want your body
But I hate to think about you with somebody else
Our love has gone cold
You're intertwining your soul with somebody else
I'm looking through you
While you're looking through your phone
And then leaving with somebody else
No, I don't want your body
But I'm picturing your body with somebody else (Else, else...)


I don't want your body, I don't want your body
I don't want your body, I don't want your body
I don't want your body, I don't want your body
I don't want your body, I don't want your body

Get someone you love?
Get someone you need?
Fuck that, get money
I can't give you my soul, 'cause we're never alone
Get someone you love?
Get someone you need?
Fuck that, get money
I can't give you my soul, 'cause we're never alone
Get someone you love?
Get someone you need?
Fuck that, get money
I can't give you my soul, 'cause we're never alone
Get someone you love?
Get someone you need?
Fuck that, get money
I can't give you my soul, 'cause we're never alone


I don't want your body (I don't want your body)
But I hate to think about you with somebody else
(I don't want your body)
Our love has gone cold
You're intertwining your soul with somebody else
(I don't want your body)
I'm looking through you
While you're looking through your phone
And then leaving with somebody else
(I don't want your body)
No, I don't want your body (I don't want your body)
But I'm picturing your body with somebody else
(I don't want your body)",2364153
75353,1795370,«Где нас нет» ”On the Other Side”,rap,Oxxxymiron,2015,1150024,{},"


Sino hora sancta morta
Sino hora sancta morta
Sino hora sancta morta


Там, гдe нас нeт - горит нeвиданный рассвeт
Гдe нас нeт - морe и рубиновый закат
Гдe нас нeт - лeс, как малахитовый браслeт
Гдe нас нeт, на Лeбeдиных островах
Гдe нас нeт, услышь мeня и вытащи из омута
Вeди в мой вымышлeнный город, вымощeнный золотом
Во снe я вижу дали инозeмныe
Гдe милосeрдиe правит, гдe бeрeга кисeльныe


Эй, йоу
«Ну-ка, слёзы вытeр!
То ли дeло их сын, сразу видно, что он лидeр»
«Слышишь, eсли спросят, то ты ничeго нe видeл»
«Ай, он вeсь в отца, из нeго ничeго нe выйдeт»
«Кто ж eё нe знаeт-то, всeму двору сосала»
«Это что такоe? Руки! Я кому сказала?»
«Всё разворовали, а бывал нeпобeдимым»
«Ваш рeбёнок замкнут и нe ладит с коллeктивом»
«Марш в дeтский сад!» «Дружный класс». «Дважды два»
«Раз на раз, баш на баш». «Чё, зассал? Нe пацан?»
«Тока глянь на сeбя, тут фингал, там синяк
Хулиган! Стыдоба! Как ты смeл, кeм ты стал?»
«Мой-то? Да всё в облаках, как в дeтствe, витаeт»
«Ты ничeм нe лучшe других, чудeс нe бываeт»
«С нeю? Да бeз шансов, он жe пугалищe с виду!»
«Хули ты всё умничаeшь, сука, ты, чё, пидор?»
«На, сдeлай пару тяг - стeны полeтят
Чё, ништяк? По шeстьдeсят, бeри сeйчас»
«Тихий час». «Твои друзья - дeсять нeгритят»
«Всe пиздят». «Скажи, гдe взял?» «Напeрeкосяк»
«Строгача!» «Как вышeл, и каждоe лeто квасит»
«Сожалeeм, но у нас всё так жe нeт вакансий»
«Как ты был нeблагодарный, так жизнь сломал мнe»
«На могильном камнe пусть выбьют как-нибудь пошикарнeй»

Гдe нас нeт - горит нeвиданный рассвeт
Гдe нас нeт - морe и рубиновый закат
Гдe нас нeт - лeс, как малахитовый браслeт
Гдe нас нeт, на Лeбeдиных островах
Гдe нас нeт, услышь мeня и вытащи из омута
Пусти в мой вымышлeнный город, вымощeнный золотом
Во тьмe я вижу дали инозeмныe
Гдe милосeрдиe правит, гдe бeрeга кисeльныe


«Ты ж моя принцeсса!»
«Ваша цeль: выжать всё из eё учeбного процeсса
Мы в Жeнeву на мeсяц, нe жалeйтe их, профeссор»
«Младшая будeт красавица, а эта так, в довeсок»
«Сядьтe прямо! Тут обeдeнный стол, юная лeди!»
«Что за вeтeр в головe, что за тон и манeры эти?»
«Мнe тут напeли, кто-то в крeсло вицe-мэра мeтит?»
«Постeснялся бы, хотя б, своим блядям звонить при дeтях!»
«Завтра важный этап: частный пансионат
Её нрав исправит, как высококлассный остeопат
Раз так страсти кипят, eё враз тут остeпeнят!»
«Почeму про отца твeрдят, что он властный социопат?»
«Гляньтe-ка, вон та самая, новeнькая, любуйтeсь»
«Погоди, дитя, послe школы, пока побудь здeсь»
«Пастор поцeловал? Лазал под сарафан?»
«Нe сопротивляйся, дитя, всe дeла во славу творца!»
«Сам нe тиран и дeспот, но надо знать своё мeсто
А ты нeпутёвая нeдотёпа с самого дeтства
Я даю на роскошь, новшeства - тeбe нeдаром!
Эта тварь из отбросов общeства тeбe нe пара!»
«Съeшь их, добавишь к сeрой рутинe цвeтов, оттeнков»
«Эксклюзивный рeабилитационный цeнтр»
«Как с настроeниeм у нас?» «К выздоровлeнию
Вмeсто поздравлeний пусть вышлют как-нибудь поскромнee»

Гдe нас нeт - горит нeвиданный рассвeт
Гдe нас нeт - морe и рубиновый закат
Гдe нас нeт - лeс, как малахитовый браслeт
Гдe нас нeт, на Лeбeдиных островах
Гдe нас нeт, услышь мeня и вытащи из омута
Пусти в мой вымышлeнный город, вымощeнный золотом
Во тьмe я вижу дали инозeмныe
Гдe милосeрдиe правит и свeт над бeрeгами
Гдe нас нeт - горит нeвиданный рассвeт
Гдe нас нeт - морe и рубиновый закат
Гдe нас нeт - лeс, как малахитовый браслeт
Гдe нас нeт, на Лeбeдиных островах
Гдe нас нeт, услышь мeня и вытащи из омута
Вeди в мой вымышлeнный город, вымощeнный золотом
Во тьмe я вижу дали инозeмныe
Гдe милосeрдиe правит и свeт над бeрeгами


Гдe нас нeт...",2369808
75471,1796617,Deepthroat,rap,cupcakKe,2015,1555492,{​cupcakKe},"
Molly on the beat


Hump me, fuck me
Daddy, better make me choke (You better)
Hump me, fuck me
My tunnel loves to deep throat (It do)
Lick, lick, lick, lick (I lick it)
I want to eat yo' dick (I do)
But I can't fuck up my nails (I can't)
So I'ma pick it up with chopsticks


Mouth wide open, mouth wide open
Mouth wide open like I was at the dentist
Mouth wide open, mouth wide open
Put it so deep, I can't speak a sentence
Mouth wide open (Ah), mouth wide open (Ah)
Mouth wide open like I was at the dentist
Mouth wide open (Ah), mouth wide open (Ah)
Put it so deep I can't speak a sentence

My fingers in it, gentle (Yeah)
Explore this nigga mental
I'ma write my name on his dick (His dick)
Don't need a pen or a pencil (No, I don't)
All I need is my body (My body)
My pussy pink just like salami (Ooh)
Don't need no drink to get naughty (No)
'Cause bitch, I'm not Bill Cosby (I'm not)
My pussy mean, and it's clean (It is)
I'm not a squirter, I cream (Squirts girl)
Keep it smelling like baby wipes
I never smell like sardines (Ew)
This will never fucking end (It won't)
Ballerina that dick when I spin (I do it)
I fucked this nigga so good
I ain't swallow one kid, I think I swallowed twins (Ah)


Hump me, fuck me
Daddy better make me choke (You better)
Hump me, fuck me
My tunnel loves to deep throat (It do)
Lick, lick, lick, lick (I lick it)
I want to eat yo' dick (I do)
But I can't fuck up my nails (I can't)
So I'ma pick it up with chopsticks

Mouth wide open, mouth wide open
Mouth wide open like I was at the dentist
Mouth wide open, mouth wide open
Put it so deep, I can't speak a sentence
Mouth wide open (Ah), mouth wide open (Ah)
Mouth wide open like I was at the dentist
Mouth wide open (Ah), mouth wide open (Ah)
Put it so deep I can't speak a sentence


Just come put it down my butt (My butt)
Let's shoot a movie, no cuts
Ride the dick, get my nipples licked
That's breastfeeding while we fuck (Fuck you)
Finna get the dick wet and firm (Firm)
You better sweat me out of my perm (My perm)
Can't wait 'til it's my turn
I wanna blow bubbles with sperm (I blow)
Wanna hit it from the back
Let me arch my back
Once I arch my back
That mean attack this pussy
Don't need a pornstar
'Cause I'm the moderin'
All my spit on his dick
Sound like I'm gargling
Make him bust three nuts, is the task (Ah)
My panties stuck in my ass (Ah)
So I pulled them down to show him the pearl
Made his pubic hairs curl fast

Fuck this pussy
Fuck this pussy
Fuck this pussy
Come fuck this pussy
Fuck this pussy
Fuck this pussy
Fuck this pussy
Come fuck this pussy",2372659
75555,1797507,Paris,rap,Paris Lyrics - $UICIDEBOY$,2015,1379117,"{""\\$UICIDEBOY\\$""}","
Ayy, ayy, ayy


Tell me what you know 'bout a motherfucker out the bottom
With a gold grill gleamin', makin' all these hoes problems
Stalker, creepin' out the fuckin' dungeon
Switchblade on 'em, hit the guts like a pumpkin, dumpin'
Thirty rounds of the clip, off rip
Too thick with the stick, bet I won't miss
Lil $lick real sick, don't talk shit
Whip, whip, like a brick scale on fish
$uicide, night time, no, we don't fight crime, oh
It's the Grey*59 with the real red eyes, and we dying inside, ooh
Bodies in fluoride, let the rope untie, just crucify me
Yung Christ wrists sliced, couple hoes on ice, singing, ""R.I.P.""


Ruby was a motherfucking reject
Then I cut my wrists, and now I motherfucking bleed checks
Still broke after all the motherfucking weed gets rolled
Hoes askin' if I see a ghost
Tell 'em, ""No, I just seep smoke when the weed's blown""
She chokes from the deep-throat, three feet of rope, lethal
Slay the fuckin' sheep, so evil, I'ma hang myself
And then I get to see home, Ruby a fucking demon (Ayy, uh)
Ruby got a cult now, hoes tryna bolt down
Ruby the result of a reject from a small town
Turned into a demon, I'm evolved now
Loud growl, $now Leopard on the prowl, ayy
Stay the fuck back, ho, slay the whole pack, ho
Paint the globe black, ho (Ayy)
Soon I will shed this skin, turn to the devil
Then I'll never reminisce (Ayy)

(Ayy)",2374033
75910,1800454,Love on the Brain,rb,Rihanna,2016,2223025,{},"
And you got me like, ""Oh, what you want from me?""
(What you want from me?)
And I tried to buy your pretty heart, but the price too high
Baby, you got me like ""Oh""
You love when I fall apart (fall apart)
So you can put me together and throw me against the wall


Baby you got me like i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-hiii, woo i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-hiii
Don't you stop loving me (loving me)
Don't quit loving me (loving me)
Just start loving me (loving me)
Owwwwww


And babe I'm fist-fighting with fire
Just to get close to you
Can we burn something babe
And I run for miles just to get a taste
Must be love on the brain
That's got me feeling this way
It beats me black and blue but it fucks me so good
And I can't get enough
Must be love on the brain yeah
And it keeps cursing my name
No matter what I do
I'm no good without you
And I can't get enough
Must be love on the..... brain

Baby keep loving me
Just love me
Yeah, just love me
All you need to do is love me, yeah
Got me like, ah-ha-ha-owww
I'm tired of being played like a violin
What do I gotta do to get in your motherfuckin' heart?
Baby like i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-hiii, woo i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-hiii


Baby you got me like i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-hiii, woo i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-i-hiii
Don't you stop loving me (loving me)
Don't quit loving me (loving me)
Just start loving me (loving me)
Ooooooohhh


And babe I'm fist-fighting with fire
Just to get close to you
Can we burn something babe
And I run for miles just to get a taste
Must be love on the brain
That's got me feeling this way
It beats me black and blue but it fucks me so good
And I can't get enough
Must be love on the brain yeah
And it keeps cursing my name
No matter what I do
I'm no good without you
And I can't get enough
Must be love on the.... brain
",2378935
75918,1800494,Black Friday,rap,Black Friday Lyrics - Kendrick Lamar,2015,1531940,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","


Dick hard like rottweiler
Can you handle it? Can you handle it? Woo woo, woo woo


The whole industry been in shambles
Everybody fugazi, I'm just changing the channel
Kendrick Lamar, the people's champion, I'm animal for analysts
Career damaging verses, meditating with candles lit
I like my raps extra prolific
Since freestyling on lunch tables and park benches
And I won't mention my 10,000 hours in training
While juggling, gang-banging, my balancing was tremendous
And now we look at the competition as quick submission
They tappin' out before we even get a chance to miss 'em
What this about, is it money or skill?
Maybe it's both and I got large amounts of it, it's real
You see my oath is very unbreakable, my style is never mistakable
I can see y'all incapable
To be the God emcees, you know me well
Ridiculous, venomous, hate in my heart, the sinister
Run for cover, my lineage prove itself
I'm rollin' deep in that paper like two Adeles
Before scholars, I flowed tighter than virgin lips
We here to shake the game up and you're flying through turbulence
Everything is high stakes nowadays, that's how it played nowadays
It's like an 8-ball to the face nowadays
I'm laced nowadays, my gun is off the waist nowadays
It's seven figures and retainer for the case nowadays, I'm talking
Higher power, every other hour since Eddie Bauer
Since stash boxes and lead showers, breaking the padlock
And the dead coward dying a thousand deaths, entire lion
Surround itself with bears, watch it nigga, you share a profit, ah!
This is what they want, I'm the one
This is vintage from 1980 somethin'
I'm the son of the pioneer that got you near the sun
Play with him, bitch you better off voting for Donald Trump
I'm yelling Mr. Kanye West for president
He probably let me get some head inside the residence
I'm in the White House going all out
Bumping College Dropout, God bless Americans
Nothing more influential than rap music
I merge jazz fusion with the trap music
I mix black soul with some rock and roll
They never box me in, I'm David Blaine-ing all you hoes
Oh yea, let's go there, my DNA is DMT, I'm so rare
My Juvenile was wilder than the Nolia
A locomotive couldn't track me down in my career
Runnin' this shit with four pair, son of my bitch, I might demolish
A bitch right in front ya, chico, what have you done here?
D-Bo, all of it one year, Mississippi to California
It gets annoying, niggas wanna deplore him
And bitches wanna adore him, but industry shit ain't for him
Probably thinking it's for him, only one me
Swallowed the key and kicking the door in, never leasing my foreign
Mr. Valevictorian studied the game before them
Listen to you with boredom, baby rappers, abort them
To the grave I deport them, corporations extort them
I'm snapping off my endorphins, I alien mighty morphin'
My radiance rather gorgeous, hundred bill to the doorman
Hundred mil' in my fortune, they call me back in the morning
You're racing against the tortoise, pace myself it's important
Lace myself with the wisdom my playerism enormous
So pay the man for performance, saucy all of my garments
Jimi Kendrix performing, this fucking studio haunted (Ah!)
I tell a bitch don't sweat me (Don't sweat me)
I kill this whole fuckin' beat if Cole let me (Please Cole)
Ib should've never sent the instrumental
Every time I start writing I get sentimental
This shit is just not fair
But why the fuck should I care?
The story of your life here
Two young stars was born and y'all gon' die here
Oh Lord, gotta be the yams
Billboard list need 2Pac, damn
But number 9 makes sure he lives on, yeah
Hoochie, coochie, pussies in a trance
Every day a celebration, but even the valley peaking me
Is not validation, nigga this TDE
And my doggies be salivating, salaries, better ratings
And casualties all around me, don't make me do demonstrations
Whoa
Murder my allegations and burning my finger traces
Adjourning my power patience and earning royalty payments
I'm sorry y'all not relating, this party is reservated
I kill this whole muthafucking beat if J. Cole say it
My nigga Ib chopped the instrumental, I gotta slay it
I gotta lay it, gotta show you fuckers I'm not to play with
The ruckus had been my favorite, King Kunta the fuckin' greatest
Whoa
Burnin' my leather-
(Nah I'm just fuckin' wit cha)
",2378979
76419,1805362,We Dont Talk Anymore,pop,Charlie Puth,2016,1537147,"{""Selena Gomez""}","
We don't talk anymore, we don't talk anymore
We don't talk anymore, like we used to do
We don't love anymore
What was all of it for?
Oh, we don't talk anymore, like we used to do


I just heard you found the one you've been looking
You've been looking for
I wish I would have known that wasn't me
'Cause even after all this time I still wonder
Why I can't move on
Just the way you did so easily


Don't wanna know
What kinda dress you're wearin' tonight
If he's holdin' onto you so tight
The way I did before
I overdosed
Should've known your love was a game
Now I can't get you outta my brain
Oh, it's such a shame

That we don't talk anymore, we don't talk anymore
We don't talk anymore, like we used to do
We don't love anymore
What was all of it for?
Oh, we don't talk anymore, like we used to do


I just hope you're lyin' next to somebody
Who knows how to love you like me
There must be a good reason that you're gone
Every now and then I think you
Might want me to come show up at your door
But I'm just too afraid that I'll be wrong


Don't wanna know
If you're lookin' into her eyes
If she's holdin' onto you so tight
The way I did before
I overdosed
Should've known your love was a game
Now I can't get you outta my brain
Oh, it's such a shame


That we don't talk anymore, we don't talk anymore
We don't talk anymore, like we used to do
We don't love anymore
What was all of it for?
Oh, we don't talk anymore, like we used to do
Like we used to do

Don't wanna know
What kinda dress you're wearin' tonight
If he's givin' it to you just right
The way I did before
I overdosed
Should've known your love was a game
Now I can't get you outta my brain
Oh, it's such a shame


That we don't talk anymore, we don't talk anymore
We don't talk anymore, like we used to do
We don't love anymore
What was all of it for?
Oh, we don't talk anymore, like we used to do


We don't talk anymore, oh, oh
(Don't wanna know)
(What kind of dress you're wearin' tonight)
(If he's holdin' onto you so tight)
The way I did before
We don't talk anymore, oh, woah
(Should've known your love was a game)
(Now I can't get you outta my brain)
Oh, it's such a shame
That we don't talk anymore",2388373
76602,1807328,Cheap Thrills,pop,Cheap Thrills Lyrics - Sia,2016,1346457,{Sia},"
Come on, come on, turn the radio on
It's Friday night and I won't be long
Gotta do my hair, put my make up on
It's Friday night and I won't be long


'Til I hit the dance floor, hit the dance floor
I got all I need
No, I ain't got cash, I ain't got cash
But I got you, baby


Baby, I don't need dollar bills to have fun tonight
(I love cheap thrills)
Baby, I don't need dollar bills to have fun tonight
(I love cheap thrills)
But I don't need no money
As long as I can feel the beat
I don't need no money
As long as I keep dancing

Come on, come on, turn the radio on
It's Saturday and I won't be long
Gotta paint my nails, put my high heels on
It's Saturday and I won't be long


'Til I hit the dance floor, hit the dance floor
I got all I need
No, I ain't got cash, I ain't got cash
But I got you, baby


Baby, I don't need dollar bills to have fun tonight
(I love cheap thrills)
Baby, I don't need dollar bills to have fun tonight
(I love cheap thrills)
But I don't need no money
As long as I can feel the beat
I don't need no money
As long as I keep dancing


(I love cheap thrills)
(I love cheap thrills)
I don't need no money
As long as I can feel the beat
I don't need no money
As long as I keep dancing

Baby, I don't need dollar bills to have fun tonight
(I love cheap thrills)
Baby, I don't need dollar bills to have fun tonight
(I love cheap thrills)
I don't need no money
As long as I can feel the beat
I don't need no money
As long as I keep dancing


La, la, la, la, la, la, la
(I love cheap thrills)
La, la, la, la, la, la, la
(I love cheap thrills)
La, la, la, la, la, la, la
(I love cheap thrills)
La, la, la, la, la, la, la
(I love cheap thrills)",2391084
76894,1810482,Low Life,rap,Low Life Lyrics - Future,2015,2413723,"{Future,""The Weeknd""}","
High, high, get, get, gettin' high, everybody gettin' high
Get, get, get, gettin' high, you're unbelievably high


I just took some molly, what else? (Hey)
Got some bitch from Follies with us ('Scuse me, 'scuse me)
She gon' fuck the squad, what else? (I swear)
I'ma fuck her broads, what else? (Yeah, yeah!)
Bitch from Pakistan, what up? ('Rari!)
Ferraris and them Lambs, what else? (Skrrt, skrrt!)
'Bout to fuck this club up, what else? (Yeah, yeah!)


(Metro Boomin want some more, nigga!) (Turn up)


I turn the Ritz into a poor house (Turn up)
It's like eviction number four now (Woo)
Go 'head and ash it on the floor now (Swear)
Girl, go 'head and show me how you go down
And I feel my whole body peakin' (Yeah)
And I'm fuckin' anybody with they legs wide (Racks)
Gettin' faded with some bitches from the West Side (Woo)
East coast nigga reppin' North Side, never waste a ho's time (Freebandz)
Bitch, I'm on my own time, fuck a nigga co-sign (Woo)
Always change my number and my phone line (And my, and my)
Baby girl, I don't lie, used to have no money for a crib (Turn up)
Now my room service bill cost your whole life (Ayy)
If they try to stunt me, I go all out military (Turn up)
I'm camo'd all out, like I'm in the military (Turn up)
And free up all my niggas locked up in the penitenti' (Swear)
'Cause I'm always reppin' for that low life

Reppin' for that low life (Turn up), low life, low life
Low life, know I'm reppin' for that low
Low life (Representin'), yeah (I'm representin')
Said I'm reppin' for that low life (Representin')
Low life, low life, low life, low life (I'm representin' for that low life)
Said I'm repping for that low life (I'm reppin', that's reppin', I'm reppin')
Low life, low life, low life (Rep, rep, rep, rep, rep, rep, rep, woo, woo, woo, woo)
Yeah


Wake up, take a sip of Ace of Spade like it's water
I been on the molly and them Xans with your daughter
If she catch me cheating, I won't ever tell her, ""sorry""
If she catch me cheating, I will never tell her, ""sorry""
Porsches in the valet, I got Bentleys, I got 'Raris
Taking pain pills on the plane, gettin' chartered
Poppin' tags on tags, I was starvin'
Bitch, I got the juice and the carbine
Turn a five star hotel to a traphouse
Roaches everywhere, like we forgot to take the trash out
Flood my cross with ice, gettin' money my religion
Got my baby momma and my side bitch kissin'
I turn the Ritz into a lean house
This the sixth time gettin' kicked out
I can't feel my face, I'm on Adderall, nauseous
Niggas tryna ride my fuckin' wave, now they salty
Runnin' with the wave, get you killed quick
Shoot you in your back like you Ricky
Li'l Mexico, with no life to afterlife
My whole life, my whole life

'Cause I'm always reppin' for that low life (Wait), low life, low life
Low life, know I'm reppin' for that low
Low life (Representin'), yeah (I'm representin')
Said I'm reppin' for that low life (Representin', wait)
Low life, low life, low life, low life (I'm representin' for that low life, for the low life)
Said I'm repping for that low life (For the low life, I'm reppin' for the low life)
Low life, low life, low life (Wait, wait, low life)
Yeah


Yeah, they stereotypin'
'Cause they know a nigga keep ten rifles (Ten rifles)
And they know a nigga keep ten snipers (Ten snipers)
Keepin' baby bottles like we wearin' diapers
Yeah, they stereotypin'
'Cause they know a nigga keep twenty rifles
And they know a nigga keep twenty snipers
And they know a nigga keep ten wifeys (Ha-ha-ha!)


Sniper, sniper, sniper, sniper, sniper
Wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey
That's your wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey?
I think I like her, like her, like her, like her
That's your wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey?
I think I like her, like her, like her, like her
Oh, that's your wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey, wifey?
I think I like her, like her, like her, like her, ha
Getting high, getting high, getting high, everybody getting high
Getting high, getting high, getting high, everybody getting high
Getting high, getting high, getting high, everybody getting high
Getting high, getting high, getting high, and I'm the reason why

I just took some molly, what else? (Getting high, getting high, getting high, everybody getting high)
Got some bitch from Follies with us (Getting high, getting high, getting high, everybody getting high)
She gon' fuck the squad, what else? (Getting high, getting high, getting high, everybody getting high)
I'ma fuck her broads, what else? (Getting high, getting high, getting high, and I'm the reason why)
Bitch from Pakistan, what up?
Ferraris and them Lambs, what else?
'Bout to fuck this club up, what else?


We 'bout to fuck this club up, what else?",2396302
76944,1810752,Faded,pop,Alan Walker,2015,1300760,{},"
You were the shadow to my light
Did you feel us?
Another star, you fade away
Afraid our aim is out of sight
Wanna see us alight


Where are you now?
Where are you now?
Where are you now?
Was it all in my fantasy?
Where are you now?
Were you only imaginary?


Where are you now?
Atlantis, under the sea, under the sea
Where are you now? Another dream
The monster's running wild inside of me
I'm faded, I'm faded
So lost, I'm faded, I'm faded
So lost, I'm faded

These shallow waters never met what I needed
I'm letting go, a deeper dive
Eternal silence of the sea
I'm breathing, alive


Where are you now?
Where are you now?
Under the bright but faded lights
You set my heart on fire
Where are you now?
Where are you now?


Where are you now?
Atlantis, under the sea, under the sea
Where are you now? Another dream
The monster's running wild inside of me
I'm faded, I'm faded
So lost, I'm faded, I'm faded
So lost, I'm faded",2396871
76986,1811326,Kiss It Better,rb,Rihanna,2016,1378715,{},"
Kiss it, kiss it better, baby
Kiss it, kiss it better, baby


Been waitin' on that sunshine, boy
I think I need that back
Can't do it like that
No one else gon' get it like that
So why argue? You yell, but cha take me back
Who cares, when it feels like crack?
Boy, ya know that you always do it right


Man, fuck yo pride
Just take it on back, boy, take it on back, boy
Take it back all night
Just take it on back, take it on back
Mmm, do what cha gotta do, keep me up all night
Hurtin' vibe, man, it hurts inside when I look you in yo eye

What are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)
Oh, what are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)


Been waitin' on that sunshine, boy
I think I need that back
Can't do it like that
No one else gon' get it like that
So why argue? You here, here to take me back
Who cares, when it feels like crack?
Boy, ya know that you always do it right


Man, fuck yo pride
Just take it on back, boy, take it on back, boy
Take it back all night
Just take it on back, take it on back
Mmm, do what cha gotta do, keep me up all night
Hurtin' vibe, man, it hurts inside when I look you in yo eye


What are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)
Oh, what are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)

I've been waitin' up all night
Baby tell me what's wrong?
You're gonna make it right, make it all night long
I've been waiting up all night
Baby, tell me, what's wrong?
Going to make it right, make it all night long


Man, fuck yo pride
Just take it on back, boy, take it on back, boy
Take it back all night
Just take it on back, take it on back
Mmm, do what cha gotta do, keep me up all night
Hurtin' vibe, man, it hurts inside when I look you in yo eye


What are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)
Oh, what are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)
What are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)
Oh, what are you willing to do?
Oh, tell me what you're willing to do
(Kiss it, kiss it better, baby)

Kiss it, kiss it better, baby
Kiss it, kiss it better, baby",2397579
77010,1811692,Work,pop,Rihanna,2016,7871555,{Drake},"
Work, work, work, work, work, work
He said me haffi
Work, work, work, work, work, work
He see me do mi
Dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt
So me put in
Work, work, work, work, work, work
When you ah guh
Learn, learn, learn, learn, learn?
Meh nuh cyar if him
Hurt, hurt, hurt, hurt, hurting


Dry! ...Me a desert him
Nuh time to have you lurking
Him ah go act like he nuh like it
You know I dealt with you the nicest
Nuh body touch me you nuh righteous
Nuh badda, text me in a crisis
I believed all of your dreams, adoration
You took my heart and my keys and my patience
You took my heart on my sleeve for decoration
You mistaken my love I brought for you for foundation
All that I wanted from you was to give me
Something that I never had
Something that you've never seen
Something that you've never been
Mmmmm
But I wake up and act like nothing's wrong
Just get ready fi...

Work, work, work, work, work, work
He said me haffi
Work, work, work, work, work, work
He see me do mi
Dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt!
So me put in
Work, work, work, work, work, work
Ner, ner, ner, ner, ner, ner
When yuh ago learn, learn, learn, learn, learn, learn?
Before the tables turn, turn, turn, turn, turn, turn


Beg you something, please
Baby, don't you leave
Don't leave me stuck here in the streets, uh huh
If I get another chance to
I will never, no, never neglect you
I mean, who am I to hold your past against you?
I just hope that it gets to you
I hope that you see this through
I hope that you see this true
What can I say?
Please recognize I'm tryin', babe
I have to

Work, work, work, work, work, work
He said me haffi
Work, work, work, work, work, work
He see me do mi
Dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt
So me put in
Work, work, work, work, work, work
When you ah guh
Learn, learn, learn, learn, learn?
Meh nuh cyar if him
Hurt, hurt, hurt, hurt, hurting


Yeah, okay
You need to get done, done, done, done at work, come over
We just need to slow the motion
Don't give that away to no one
Long distance, I need you
When I see potential, I just gotta see it through
If you had a twin, I would still choose you
I don't wanna rush into it if it's too soon
But I know you need to get done, done, done, done
If you come over
Sorry if I'm way less friendly
I got niggas tryna end me, oh (Yeah)
I spilled all my emotions tonight, I'm sorry
Rollin', rollin', rollin', rollin', rollin'
How many more shots until you're rollin'?
We just need a face-to-face
You could pick the time and the place
You spent some time away
Now you need to forward and give me all the...

Work, work, work, work, work, work
He said me haffi
Work, work, work, work, work, work
He see me do mi
Dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt, dirt
So me put in
Work, work, work, work, work, work
When you ah guh
Learn, learn, learn, learn, learn?
Meh nuh cyar if him
Hurt, hurt, hurt, hurt, hurting


Mmmmm, mmmmm
Mmmmm, mmmmm
Work, work, work, work, work, work
Mmmmm, mmmmm



",2398213
77090,1812697,Facts Charlie Heat Version,rap,Kanye West,2016,1551237,{},"
Dirt and grime and filth inside
The story of my lifetime
Of cheating, stealing, never feeling
Pain of a brother, your dirty mother
Ha, ha, ha, look how far we are
G-G-G-Good work, Charlie
(Perfect!)


Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy just jumped over Jumpman
Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy just jumped over Jumpman
(You!)


Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy, I feel so accomplished
I done talked a lot of shit but I just did the numbers
Herzog and Adidas, man, you know they love it
If Nike ain't have Drizzy, man, they would have nothin', woo!
If Nike ain't have Don C, man, they would have nothin', ooh!
But I'm all for the family, tell 'em, ""Get your money""
Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy, they line up for days
Nike out here bad, they can't give shit away
I stuck to my roots, I'm like Jimmy Fallon
I ain't dropped the album but the shoes went platinum (Woo!)
Every time I talk, they say I'm too aggressive
I was out here spazzin', now y'all get the message?!
On the field I'm over-reckless, on my Odell Beckham
2020, I'ma run the whole election, yah!
I've been trending years, y'all a couple days
Yeezy in the house and we just got appraised
Nike, Nike treat employees just like slaves
Gave LeBron a billi' not to run away (You!)
Ten-thousand dollar fur for Nori, I just copped it (You!)
Your baby daddy won't even take your daughter shoppin' (You!)
I done wore designers I won't wear again
Make 'em niggas famous, they get arrogant

Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy just jumped over Jumpman, ah!
Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy just jumped over Jumpman
(Sonic boom!)


Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy, this is pure luxury
I give 'em Grey Poupon on a DJ Mustard, ah!
If you ain't poppin' shit then why you rap for, huh?
Plus Kimoji just shut down the app store, ah!
And we made a million a minute, we made a million a minute
(We did)
Yeah, we made a million a minute, we made a million a minute, ah!
Do anybody feel bad for Bill Cosby?
Did he forget the names just like Steve Harvey? (You!)
Tell Adidas that we need a million in production  (You!)
I done told y'all, all I needed was the infrastructure (Boom!)
Now we hottest in the streets, it ain't no discussion
James Harden, Swaggy P runnin' up the budget (Yoga flame!)
Keep the work at my baby mama's mama's house
I'm a jerk, you need to work, you need to call my spouse
Yeezy, Yeezy, take a picture with me on Rodeo
Yeezy, Yeezy, Yeezy, I might do my own hotel
Couches, couches, couches, couches, which one should I pick?
I need extra deep, I like my bitches extra thick (Sonic boom!)
Every time I see the news, man it bring me home
Call up DJ Mano, shout out Twilite Tone
We just blessed to be alive, yeah, ain't that the truth?
So let's celebrate the life of Timbuck2
Timbuck2, Timbuck2

Ha, ha, ha, look how far we are, are, are, are, are, are, are
(Perfect!)",2399676
77141,1813493,Panda,rap,Desiigner,2015,5942851,{},"
You are now listening to the hottest producer with the hottest beats on the net, Menace
This what they all been waitin' for? I guess so
They been waitin' for this shit for a long time, didn't they?
This what they all been waitin' for? I guess so
They been waitin' for this shit for a long time, didn't they?
Ayy, I'm just feelin' my vibe right now
I'm feelin' myself


Panda, Panda
Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda


I got broads in Atlanta
Twistin' dope, lean, and the Fanta
Credit cards and the scammers
Hittin' off licks in the bando
Black X6, Phantom
White X6 look like a panda
Goin' out like I'm Montana
Hundred killas, hundred hammers
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, panda
Pockets swole, Danny
Sellin' bar, candy
Man, I'm the macho like Randy
The choppa go Oscar for Grammy
Bitch nigga, pull up ya panty
Hope you killas understand me
I got broads in Atlanta
Twistin' dope, lean, and the Fanta
Credit cards and the scammers
Hittin' off licks in the bando
Black X6, Phantom
White X6 look like a panda
Goin' out like I'm Montana
Hundred killas, hundred hammers
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, panda
Pockets swole, Danny
Sellin' bar, candy
Man, I'm the macho like Randy
The choppa go Oscar for Grammy
Bitch nigga, pull up ya panty
Hope you killas understand me

Hey
Panda, Panda
Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda


I got broads in Atlanta
Twistin' dope, lean, and shit, sippin' Fanta
Credit cards and the scammers
Wake up Versace shit, life Desiigner
Whole bunch of lavish shit
They be askin' 'round town who be clappin' shit
I be pullin' up stuff in the Phantom ship
I got plenty of stuff in Bugatti whip, look how I drive this shit
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, killin' on camera
Pop a Perc, I can't stand up
Gorilla, they come and kill you with bananas
Four fellas, they finna pull up in the Phantom
Know niggas, they come and kill you on the camera
Big Rollie, it's dancin' bigger than a Pandie
Go Oscar for Grammy, bitch, pull up ya panty
Fill up, I'ma flip it, I got bitches pull up and they get it
I got niggas that's countin' for digits
Say you make you a lot of new money
Know some killers pull off and they in the Wraith
CTD, pull up in the killa Bape
Call up Phillip-Phillip, gon' fill the bank
Niggas up in the bank, we gon' drill the bank
Fuck, we gon' kill the bank, get it
I got broads, yeah, I get it
I get cards, yeah, I shitted
This how I live it, did it all for a ticket
Now Flex drop bombs when he spin it
And Bobby gon' trend it
Jeff The Don doin' business
Zana Ray fuckin' up shit and she doin' her business
I be gettin' to the chicken, countin' to the chicken
And all of my niggas gon' split it

Panda, Panda
Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda


I got broads in Atlanta
Twistin' dope, lean, and the Fanta
Credit cards and the scammers
Hittin' off licks in the bando
Black X6, Phantom
White X6 look like a panda
Goin' out like I'm Montana
Hundred killers, hundred hammers
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, panda
Pockets swole, Danny
Sellin' bar, candy
Man, I'm the macho like Randy
The choppa go Oscar for Grammy
Bitch nigga, pull up ya panty
Hope you killers understand me
I got broads in Atlanta
Twistin' dope, lean, and the Fanta
Credit cards and the scammers
Hittin' off licks in the bando
Black X6, Phantom
White X6 look like a panda
Goin' out like I'm Montana
Hundred killers, hundred hammers
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, panda
Pockets swole, Danny
Sellin' bar, candy
Man, I'm the macho like Randy
The choppa go Oscar for Grammy
Bitch nigga, pull up ya panty
Hope you killers understand me

Panda, Panda
Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda, Panda

",2400811
77261,1815232,​​ocean eyes,pop,Billie Eilish,2015,1576197,{},"
I've been watchin' you for some time
Can't stop starin' at those ocean eyes
Burning cities and napalm skies
Fifteen flares inside those ocean eyes
Your ocean eyes


No fair
You really know how to make me cry
When you give me those ocean eyes
I'm scared
I've never fallen from quite this high
Fallin' into your ocean eyes
Those ocean eyes


I've been walkin' through a world gone blind
Can't stop thinkin' of your diamond mind
Careful creature made friends with time
He left her lonely with a diamond mind
And those ocean eyes

No fair (No fair)
You really know how to make me cry
When you give me those ocean eyes (Those ocean eyes)
I'm scared (I'm scared)
I've never fallen from quite this high
Fallin' into your ocean eyes
Those ocean eyes


(Seye naeco esoht)
(Seye naeco ruoy otni 'nillaf)
Da-da-da-da-da, da-da-da-da-da (Hgih siht etiuq morf nellaf reven ev'I)
(Deracs m'I) Da-da-da-da-da-da
Da-da-da (Seye naeco esoht em evig uoy nehw)
Mmm (Yrc em ekam ot woh wonk yllaer uoy)
Mmm (Riaf on)


No fair
You really know how to make me cry
When you give me those ocean eyes
I'm scared
I've never fallen from quite this high
Fallin' into your ocean eyes
Those ocean eyes",2403346
77288,1815482,Real Friends,rap,Kanye West,2016,2159421,"{""Ty Dolla \\$ign""}","
Real friends, how many of us?
How many of us, how many jealous? Real friends
It's not many of us, we smile at each other
But how many honest? Trust issues
Switched up the number, I can't be bothered
I cannot blame you for havin' an angle
I ain't got no issues, I'm just doin' my thing
Hope you're doin' your thing too
I'm a deadbeat cousin, I hate family reunions
Fuck the church up by drinkin' at the communion
Spillin' free wine, now my tux is ruined
In town for a day, what the fuck we doin'?
Who your real friends? We all came from the bottom
I'm always blamin' you, but what's sad, you not the problem
Damn I forgot to call her, shit I thought it was Thursday
Why you wait a week to call my phone in the first place?
When was the last time I remembered a birthday?
When was the last time I wasn't in a hurry?


Tell me you want your tickets when it's gametime
Even to call your daughter on her FaceTime
Even when we was young I used to make time
Now we be way too busy just to make time
Even for my...

Real friends
I guess I get what I deserve, don't I?
Word on the streets is they ain't heard from him
I guess I get what I deserve, don't I?
Talked down on my name, throwed dirt on him


I couldn't tell you how old your daughter was (Was)
Couldn't tell you how old your son is (Is)
I got my own Jr. on the way, dawg (Dawg)
Plus I already got one kid (Kid)
Couldn't tell you much about the fam though
I just showed up for the yams though
Maybe 15 minutes, took some pictures with your sister
Merry Christmas, then I'm finished, then it's back to business
You wanna ask some questions 'bout some real shit? (Shit)
Like I ain't got enough pressure to deal with (With)
Please don't pressure me with that bill shit (Shit)
'Cause everybody got 'em that ain't children
Oh you've been nothin' but a friend to me
Niggas thinkin' I'm crazy, you defendin' me
It's funny I ain't spoke to niggas in centuries
To be honest, dawg, I ain't feelin' your energy
Money turn your kin into an enemy
Niggas ain't real as they pretend to be

Lookin' for real friends
How many of us? How many of us are real friends
To real friends, 'til the reel end
'Til the wheels fall off, 'til the wheels don't spin (Yeah yeah)
To 3 A.M., callin'
How many real friends?
Just to ask you a question
Just to see how you was feelin'
How many?
For the last you was frontin'
I hate when a nigga text you like, ""What's up, fam? Hope you good""
You say, ""I'm good, I'm great,"" the next text they ask you for somethin'
How many?
What's best for your family, immediate or extended
Any argument, the media'll extend it
I had a cousin that stole my laptop that I was fuckin' bitches on
Paid that nigga 250 thousand just to get it from him
Real friends
Huh?


Real friends
I guess I get what I deserve, don't I
Word on the streets is they ain't heard from him
Uh, I guess I get what I deserve, don't I
Talked down on my name, throwed dirt on him",2403628
77298,1815600,No More Parties In LA,rap,Kanye West,2016,2291137,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
La-di-da-da-a, da-a (I like this flavor)
La-da-da-da-di-da-da-a, la-a (La-a, la-a, la-a)
Let me tell you, I'm out here
From a very far away place
All for a chance to be a star
Nowhere seems to be too far


No more parties in L.A
Please, baby, no more parties in L.A., uh
No more parties in L.A
Please, baby, no more parties in L.A., uh
No more (Los Angeles)
Please (Shake that body, party that bod-)
Please (Shake that body, party that bod-)
Please (Shake that body, party that body)


Hey, baby, you forgot your Ray Bans
And my sheets still orange from your spray-tan
It was more than soft porn for the K-Man
She remember my Sprinter, said ""I was in the grape van""
Uhm-well, cutie, I like your bougie booty
Come, Erykah Badu-me-well, let's make a movie
Hell, you know my repertoire is like a wrestler
I show you the ropes, connect the dots
A country girl in North Hollywood
Mama used to cook red beans and rice
Now it's Denny's, 4 in the morning, spoil your appetite
Liquor pouring and niggas swarming your section with erection
Smoke in every direction, middle finger pedestrians
R&B singers and lesbians, rappers and managers
Music and iPhone cameras
This shit unanimous for you, it's damaging for you, I think
That pussy should only be holding exclusive rights to me, I mean
He flew you in this motherfucker on first class
Even went out his way so you could check in an extra bag
Now you wanna divide the yam like it equate the math?
That shit don't add up, you're making him mad as fuck
She said she came out here to find an A-list rapper
I said baby, ""Spin that 'round and say the alphabet backwards""
You're dealing with malpractice, don't kill a good nigga's confidence
Just 'cause he a nerd and you don't know what a condom is
The head still good, though; the head still good, though
Make me say ""Nam Myoho Renge Kyo""
Make a nigga say big words and act lyrical
Make me get spiritual, make me believe in miracles
Buddhist monks and Cap'n Crunch cereal
Lord have mercy, thou will not hurt me
Five buddies all herded up on a Thursday
Bottle service, head service, I came in first place
The opportunity, the proper top of breast and booty cheek
The pop community, I mean these bitches come with union fee
And I want two of these, moving units through consumer streets
Then my shoe released, she was kickin' in gratuity
And yeah, G, I was all for it
She said, ""K-Lamar, you kinda dumb to be a poet
I'ma put you on game for the lames that don't know they a rookie
Instagram is the best way to promote some pussy""

Scary, scary
No more parties in L.A
Please, baby, no more parties in L.A


Friday night, tryna make it into the city
Breakneck speeds, passenger seat-somethin' pretty
Thinking back to how I got here in the first place
Second-class bitches wouldn't let me on first base
A backpack nigga with luxury tastebuds
And the Louis Vuitton store got all of my pay stubs
Got pussy from beats I did for niggas more famous
When did I become A-list? I wasn't even on a list
Strippers get invited to where they only got hired
When I get on my Steve Jobs, somebody gon' get fired
I was uninspired since Lauryn Hill retired
And 3 Stacks, man, you preaching to the choir
Any rumor you ever heard about me was true and legendary
I done got Lewinsky'd and paid secretaries
For all my niggas with babies by bitches
That use they kids as meal tickets
Not knowin' the disconnect from the father
The next generation will be the real victims
I can't fault 'em, really
I remember Amber told my boy
No matter what happens, she ain't goin' back to Philly
Back to our regularly scheduled programmin'
Of weak content and slow jammin'
But don't worry, this one's so jammin'
You know it, L.A., it's so jammin'
I be thinkin' every day
Mulholland Drive need to put up some goddamn barricades
I be paranoid every time, the pressure
The problem ain't I be drivin', the problem is I be textin'
My psychiatrist got kids that I inspired
First song they played for me was 'bout their friend that just died
Textin' and drivin' down Mulholland Drive
That's why I'd rather take the 405
I be worried 'bout my daughter, I be worried 'bout Kim
But Saint is baby 'Ye, I ain't worried 'bout him
Had my life threatened by best friends with selfish intents
What I'm supposed to do?
Ride around with a bulletproof car and some tints?
Every agent I know, know I hate agents
I'm too black, I'm too vocal, I'm too flagrant
Something smellin' like shit, that's the new fragrance
It's just me, I do it my way, bitch
Some days I'm in my Yeezys, some days I'm in my Vans
If I knew y'all made plans, I wouldn't have popped the Xans
I know some fans thought I wouldn't rap like this again
But the writer's block is over; emcees, cancel your plans
A thirty-eight-year-old eight-year-old with rich nigga problems
Tell my wife that I hate the Rolls so I don't never drive it
It took six months to get the Maybach all matted out
And my assistant crashed it soon as they backed it out
Goddamn! Got a bald fade, I might slam
Pink fur, got Nori dressin' like Cam
Thank God for me! (Los Angeles)
Whole family gettin' money, thank God for E!
I love rockin' jewelry, a whole neckful
Bitches say he fun-ny and disrespectful
I feel like Pablo when I'm workin' on my shoes
I feel like Pablo when I see me on the news
I feel like Pablo when I'm workin' on my house
Tell 'em party's in here, we don't need to go out
We need the turbo thots, high speed, turbo thots
Drop-dro-dro-dro-drop, like Robocop
She brace herself and hold my stomach, good dick'll do that
She keep pushin' me back, good dick'll do that
She push me back when the dick go too deep
This good dick'll put your ass to sleep
Get money (Money, money, money!)
Big, big money (Money, money, money!)
And as far as real friends, tell all my cousins I love 'em
Even the one that stole the laptop, you dirty motherfucker!

I just keep on lovin' you, baby
And there's no one else I know can take your pla-, pla-, pla-


Please, no more parties in L.A. (Shake that body, party that body)
Please, baby, no more parties in L.A., uh (Shake that body, party that body)
No more parties in L.A. (Los Angeles)
Please, baby, no more parties in L.A., uh
No more parties in L.A
Please, baby, no more parties in L.A., uh


Let me tell you, I'm out here from a very far away place
All for a chance to be a star
Nowhere seems to be too far
Swish

",2403856
77371,1816693,Dat $tick,rap,Rich Brian,2016,3411643,{},"
Tw-tw-tw-twelve in the mornin', pop shells for a livin'
And berry gon' smell blood trail every minute
Rogue wave on you niggas, no fail when I hit 'em
Every time I see a pig, I don't hesitate to kill 'em
Ain't nobody give a fuck about a rule
Either get diplomas or a tool, I'ma cool with my youngins
No bool when I'm sprayin' this K at you fuckas
Fuck a gang affiliated with nothin' but my name


Man, I don't give a fuck about a mothafuckin' po
I'ma pull up with that stick and hit yo' motherfuckin' do'
Man, I don't give a fuck about a mothafuckin' po
I'ma pull up with that stick and hit yo' motherfuckin' do', yeah


People be starvin'
And people be killin' for food with that crack and that spoon
But these rich mothafuckas, they stay eatin' good
Droppin' wage livin' good
Holdin' steel Glocks, but you been a bitch, suck a thick cock
Fuck a Crip walk, hit the strip like in Bangkok
Never ever see me have a trip 'bout a lil' broad
See me on the TV screamin', ""Bitch, you a damn fraud""
And you don't wanna fuck with a chigga like me
When I pull up in that Maserati
Better duck 'fore ya brain splatter on the concrete
I'ma hit you with that .45, bullet hit yo neck round the bow tie
Lookin' like a thriller, film a bitch
I'ma go right back with the clip and I know you be shakin'
Don't test me or I might just click at yo noggin

Man, I don't give a fuck about a mothafuckin' po
I'ma pull up with that stick and hit yo' motherfuckin' do'
Man, I don't give a fuck about a mothafuckin' po
I'ma pull up with that stick and hit yo' motherfuckin' do', yeah",2405728
77737,1820631,Myself,rap,NAV,2016,1310389,{},"
Drivin' solo, I'm just swervin' through my ends
When I'm sober, I just don't like who I am
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again
I'ma break every box they try to put me in
I got a lot of enemies who used to be my friends
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again


I was sober for an hour, but I'm rollin' off a bean now
The drugs, they give me confidence, I'm sayin' what I mean now
The Xannies help me slow up, the lean, it help me speed down
Ballin', yeah, I'm ballin', I won't hit it if she beat now
Callin', yeah, she callin', your bitch got me on the speed dial
Drivin' through the Rex', I look at faces, don't see no smiles
It's grimy in the 6, who can I trust? I'll never know now
Sprite is extra dark now, my dawg, he in the dog pound
They say I'm on the come-up, but I been on the come-down
See me doin' good, they start to hate, that's how it goes now
I don't know why they mad at me, I always stay ten toes down
Drivin' through my city by myself, that's how I roll now

Drivin' solo, I'm just swervin' through my ends
When I'm sober, I just don't like who I am
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again
I'ma break every box they try to put me in
I got a lot of enemies who used to be my friends
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again


I remember bein' a kid, my teachers told me I wouldn't be shit
Diamonds in my pinky look like water, make me seasick
Never had no help, so don't approach me on some free shit
Did this by myself, so why the fuck would I do a remix?
His bitch gave me top, don't want the pussy, he can keep it
Money and the power, fuck respect 'cause I don't need it
Drivin' to the West, I popped a bean and now I'm speedin'
Know some people in the 6 that dissed me for no reason
Sendin' shots, they sendin' shots, on road, I never see them
Takin' Ls, they takin' Ls, I never wanna be them
Got your bitch beside me, she just asked me what a bean is
Put her number in my phone and you know I delete it


Drivin' solo, I'm just swervin' through my ends
When I'm sober, I just don't like who I am
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again
I'ma break every box they try to put me in
I got a lot of enemies who used to be my friends
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again

Drivin' solo, I'm just swervin' through my ends
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
I'ma break every box they try to put me in
Pour me up a 4 and I'll feel like myself again
Roll me up some dope and I'll feel like myself again
Drivin' solo, I'm just swervin' through my ends",2411097
77805,1821167,Drew Barrymore,rb,SZA,2017,1215374,{},"
Why is it so hard to accept the party is over?
You came with your new friends
And her mom jeans and her new Vans
And she's perfect and I hate it
Oh so glad you made it
I'm so glad you could come by
Somebody get the tacos, somebody spark the blunt
Let's start the Narcos off at episode one
Bring the gin, got the juice
Bring the sin, got that too
Won't you just shut up, know you're my favorite
Am I...


Warm enough for ya outside baby, yeah
Tell me that it's warm enough here for ya
Is it warm enough for ya inside me, me, me, me?
Warm enough for ya outside baby, yeah
Tell me that it's warm enough here for ya
Warm enough outside, inside me, me, me, me

I get so lonely, I forget what I'm worth
We get so lonely, we pretend that this works
I'm so ashamed of myself think I need therapy-y-y-y
I'm sorry I'm not more attractive
I'm sorry I'm not more ladylike
I'm sorry I don't shave my legs at night
I'm sorry I'm not your baby mama
I'm sorry you got karma comin' to you
Collect your soul, get it right


Warm enough for ya outside baby, yeah
Tell me that it's warm enough here for ya
Is it warm enough for ya inside me, me, me, me?
Warm enough for ya outside baby, yeah
Tell me that it's warm enough here for ya
Warm enough outside, inside me, me, me, me


Sorry, I just need to see you
I'm sorry I'm so clingy I don't mean to be a lot
Do you really wanna love me down like you say you do?
Give it to me like you say you do?
'Cause it's hard enough you got to treat me like this
Lonely enough to let you treat me like this
Do you really love me?
Or just wanna love me down, down, down, down?

Warm enough for ya outside baby, yeah
Tell me that it's warm enough here for ya
Is it warm enough for ya inside me, me, me, me?
Warm enough for ya outside baby, yeah
Tell me that it's warm enough here for ya
Warm enough outside, inside me, me, me, me


Warm enough outside, inside
Warm enough outside, inside me-me-me-me, me-me-me
Ohh-whoa, is it warm enough outside, inside?",2411721
77885,1822000,Famous,rap,Kanye West,2016,2278357,{Rihanna},"
Man, I can understand how it might be
Kinda hard to love a girl like me
I don't blame you much for wanting to be free
I just wanted you to know
Woo, woo
Swizz told me let the beat rock (Oh)
Oh


For all my Southside niggas that know me best
I feel like me and Taylor might still have sex
Why? I made that bitch famous (Goddamn)
I made that bitch famous
For all the girls that got dick from Kanye West
If you see 'em in the streets give 'em Kanye's best
Why? They mad they ain't famous (Goddamn)
They mad they still nameless (Talk that talk, man)
Her man in the store tryna try his best
But he just can't seem to get Kanye fresh
But we still hood famous (Goddamn)
Yeah, we still hood famous

I just wanted you to know
I've loved you better than your own kin did
From the very start
I don't blame you much for wanting to be free
Wake up, Mr. West! Oh, he's up!
I just wanted you to know


I be Puerto Rican day parade floatin'
That Benz Marina Del Rey coastin'
She in school to be a real estate agent
Last month I helped her with the car payment
Young and we alive, whoo!
We never gonna die, whoo!
I just copped a jet to fly over personal debt
Put one up in the sky
The sun is in my eyes, whoo!
Woke up and felt the vibe, whoo!
No matter how hard they try, whoo!
We never gonna die


I just wanted you to know
Get 'em!

Bam, 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam, bam, bam bam dilla
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam, bam, bam bam dilla
How you feeling right now? Let me see your lighters in the air
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam
Let me see your middle finger in the air
Bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam, bam, bam bam dilla
Let me see you act up in this motherfucker
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam, bam, bam bam dilla
How you feelin', how you feelin', how you feelin' in this mother fucker, god damn
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam
One thing you can't do is stop us now
Bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam bam, bam bam dilla
Ayy, you can't stop the thing now
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam, bam, bam bam dilla
Man, it's way too late, it's way too late, it's way too late, you can't fuck with us
Bam bam, 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam, 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam
To the left, to the right
Bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam bam, bam bam dilla
I wanna see everybody hands in the air like this
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam, bam, bam bam dilla
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey 'ey
Bam bam 'ey 'ey 'ey
What a bam, bam

I just wanted you to know
I loved you better than your own kin did
From the very start
I don't blame you much for wanting to be free
I just wanted you to know

",2412662
77886,1822001,Highlights,rap,Kanye West,2016,1162601,"{The-Dream,""Young Thug""}","
High as light
Tell my baby I'm back in town
High, high, my light
Tell everybody I'm back in town
High, highlight
Tell my baby I'm back in town, town
Highlight


We only makin' the highlights
Tell my mama, tell my mama
That I only want my whole life to only be highlights
We only makin' the highlights
Tell my mama, tell my mama
That I only want my whole life to only be highlights


Can we play that back one time?
And after that night I'm gon' wanna play this shit back, oh no (Highlight)
Sometimes I'm wishin' that my dick had GoPro (Highlight)
So I could play that shit back in slo-mo (Slow motion)
I just shot an amateur video; I think I should go pro

We only makin' the highlights
(Slow motion, slow motion, slow motion)
 the sunlight
We only makin' the highlights
Tell my mama, tell my mama
That I only want my whole life to only be highlights
Yeah, Jeffery


One life, one night
Uh
Highlights
That's all I need
Livin' the life 'til I die


I bet me and Ray J would be friends
If we ain't love the same bitch
Yeah, he might have hit it first
Only problem is I'm rich (I'm rich, I'm rich, I'm rich)
(Highlights)
Uh, 21 Grammys, superstar family
We the new Jacksons, I'm all about that action
(We only making the highlights)
I'm about that Farrakhan, life is a marathon
I'ma shift the paradigm, I'ma turn up every time
I'ma bust a coach's head open on some Diddy shit
If he ever talk to my son like an idiot
(I know my life gon' be highlights)
One time for a nigga really gettin' it
Two times cause we got the whole city lit
Advice to all my niggas: impregnate Bridget
(Oh, no, drop that shit back!)
So if she have a baby she gon' make another nigga
Got the Fruit of Islam in the trenches, hah?
Even though they know Yeezus is a Christian, hah?
She spent her whole check on some Christians
And that girl ain't even religious
Walkin', livin', breathin' god, you know my past well
Hard to believe in God, your nigga got killed
Blac Chyna fuckin' Rob, help him with the weight
I wish my trainer would, tell me what I overate
So when I'm on vacay, I need to kick back, heh?
What you want?
You want a boss or an R&B nigga with a six pack, heh, huh?
Uh, I need every bad bitch up in Equinox
I need to know right now if you a freak or not
I need every bad bitch up in Equinox
I need to know right now if you a freak or not

I need every bad bitch up in Equinox
I wanna know right now if you a freak or not
I need every bad bitch up in Equinox
I wanna know right now if you a freak or not
Oh lord (Ohh, nah-nah-nah-nah), oh lord (Ohh, nah-nah-nah-nah, nah)
I need every bad bitch up in Equinox
I wanna know if you a freak or not
Bad bitch up in Equinox
I wanna know if you a freak or not
Oh lord, oh my lord (Oh nah nah nah nah)",2412664
77887,1822003,Waves,rap,Kanye West,2016,1797314,"{""Chris Brown""}","
Turn it up!


Step up in this bitch like (Turn it up!)
I'm the one your bitch like
Yeah I'm the one your bitch like (Turn it up!)
And I be talkin' shit like
I ain't scared to lose a fistfight (Turn it up!)
And she grabbin' on my, like
She wanna see if it'll fit right (Turn it up!)
That's just the wave


(Yeah) Waves don't die
Let me crash here for the moment, yeah
I don't need to own it
No lie
Waves don't die, baby
Let me crash here for a moment
Baby, I don't, I don't need to own you
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah) (Turn it up!)

Sun don't shine in the shade, ugh (Turn it up!)
Bird can't fly in a cage, ugh (Turn it up!)
Even when somebody go away (Turn it up!)
The feelings don't really go away
That's just the wave


(Yeah) Waves don't die
Let me crash here for the moment
I don't need to own it
No lie
Waves don't die, baby
Let me crash here for a moment
Baby, I don't, I don't need to own you
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


No lie
No lie
No lie
You set the night on fire
I'm still gon' be here in the morning
No lie


(Humming)

No lie
Ooh baby, ooh baby, ooh yeah
You set the night on fire
I'm still gon' be here in the morning
No lie",2412668
77888,1822004,Father Stretch My Hands Pt. 1,rap,Kanye West,2016,4703397,"{""Kid Cudi""}","
You're the only power (Power)
You're the only power that can
You're the only power (Power)
You're the only power that can
Oh, oh, oh, father
(If young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you)


Beautiful mornin', you're the sun in my mornin', babe
Who can I turn to?
Nothin' unwanted
After all, who can I turn to?
Beautiful mornin', you're the sun in my mornin', babe
If I don't turn to you
Nothin' unwanted
No other help I know, I stretch my hands


I just wanna feel liberated, I-I, na-na-na
Who can I turn to?
I just wanna feel liberated, I-I, na-na-na
After all, who can I turn to?
If I ever instigated, I am sorry
If I don't turn to you
Tell me who in here could relate, I-I-I
No other help I know, I stretch my hands

Now, if I fuck this model
And she just bleached her asshole
And I get bleach on my T-shirt
I'ma feel like an asshole
I was high when I met her
We was down in Tribeca
She'll get under your skin if you let her
She'll get under your skin if you- (Uh)
I don't even wanna talk about it
I don't even wanna talk about it
I don't even wanna say nothin'
Everybody gon' say somethin'
I'd be worried if they said nothin'
Remind me where I know you from
She lookin' like she owe you somethin'
You know just what we want
I wanna wake up with you in my-


Beautiful mornin', you're the sun in my mornin', babe
Who can I turn to?
Beautiful mornin'
Nothin' unwanted
After all, who can I turn to?
Beautiful mornin', you're the sun in my mornin', babe
If I don't turn to you
Nothin' unwanted
No other help I know

I just wanna feel liberated, I-I, na-na-na
Who can I turn to?
I just wanna feel liberated, I-I, na-na-na
After all, who can I turn to?
If I ever instigated, I am sorry
If I don't turn to you
Tell me who in here could relate, I-I-I
No other help I know, I stretch my hands",2412669
77966,1822745,Ultralight Beam,rap,Kanye West,2016,4320213,"{The-Dream,""Kelly Price"",""Kirk Franklin"",""Chance the Rapper""}","
(Yes, God)
We don't want no devils in the house, God (Yes, Lord)
We want the lord (Yes, Jesus)
And that's it (Yes, God)
Hallej- hand over Satan (Yes, Jesus)
Jesus praise the Lord (Yes, God)
Hallelujah, God (Yes, God)
We don't want no devils in the house, God (Yes, Lord)
We want the lord (Yes, Jesus)
And that's it (Yes, God)
Hallej- hand over Satan (Yes, Jesus)
Jesus praise the Lord (Yes, God)


I'm tryna keep my faith
We on an ultralight beam
We on an ultralight beam
This is a God dream
This is a God dream
This is everything
This is everything

Deliver us serenity
Deliver us peace
Deliver us loving
We know we need it
You know we need it
You know we need it
That's why we need You now, oh
Pray for Paris
Pray for the parents
This is a God dream
This is a God dream
This is a God dream


We on an ultralight beam
We on an ultralight beam
This is a God dream
This is a God dream
This is everything
Everything (Thing, thing, thing)


I'm tryna keep my faith
But I'm looking for more
Somewhere I can feel safe
And end my holy war
I'm tryna keep my faith

So why send oppression, not blessings?
Why, oh, why'd You do me wrong? (More)
You persecute the weak
Because it makes You feel so strong (Safe)
Don't have much strength to fight
So I look to the light (War)
To make these wrongs turn right
Head up high, I look to the light
Hey, 'cause I know that You'll make everything alright
And I know that You'll take good care of Your child
Oh, no longer am afraid of the night
'Cause I, I look to the light


When they come for You, I will shield Your name
I will field their questions, I will feel Your pain
No one can judge
They don't, they don't know
They don't know


Foot on the Devil's neck 'til it drifted Pangaea
I'm moving all my family from Chatham to Zambia
Treat the demons just like Pam
I mean, I fuck with your friends, but damn, Gina
I been this way since Arthur was anteater
Now they wanna hit me with the woo wap, the bam
Tryna snap photos of familia
My daughter look just like Sia, you can't see her
You can feel the lyrics, the spirit coming in braille
Tubman of the underground, come and follow the trail
I made ""Sunday Candy,"" I'm never going to hell
I met Kanye West, I'm never going to fail
He said, ""Let's do a good ass job with 'Chance 3'""
I hear you gotta sell it to snatch the Grammy
Let's make it so free and the bars so hard
That there ain't one gosh darn part you can't tweet
This is my part, nobody else speak
This is my part, nobody else speak
This little light of mine
Glory be to God, yeah
I'ma make sure that they go where they can't go
If they don't wanna ride, I'ma still give 'em raincoats
Know what God said when He made the first rainbow
Just throw this at the end if I'm too late for the intro
Ugh, I'm just having fun with it
You know that a nigga was lost
I laugh in my head
'Cause I bet that my ex looking back like a pillar of salt
Ugh, 'cause they'll flip the script on your ass like Wesley and Spike
You cannot mess with the light
Look at lil' Chano from 79th

We on an ultralight beam
We on an ultralight beam
This is a God dream
This is a God dream
This is everything
Everything


(Yes, God)
(Hallelujah)
I'm tryna keep my faith
(Yes, Jesus)
But I'm looking for more
Somewhere I can feel safe
And end my holy war


Father, this prayer is for everyone that feels they're not good enough
This prayer's for everybody that feel that they're too messed up
For everyone that feels they've said ""I'm sorry"" too many times
You can never go too far when you can't come back home again
That's why I need...
Faith, more, safe, war",2413549
77988,1823041,Needed Me,rb,Rihanna,2016,2180245,{},"
Mustard on the beat, ho!


I was good on my own, that's the way it was
That's the way it was
You was good on the low for a faded fuck
On some faded love
Shit, what the fuck you complaining for?
Feeling jaded, huh?
Used to trip off that shit I was kickin' to you
Had some fun on the run though I'll give it to you


But baby, don't get it twisted
You was just another nigga on the hit list
Tryna fix your inner issues with a bad bitch
Didn't they tell you that I was a savage?
Fuck ya white horse and ya carriage
Bet you never could imagine
Never told you you could have it

You needed me
Ooh, you needed me
To feel a little more, and give a little less
Know you hate to confess
But baby ooh, you needed me


You been rollin' around, shit I'm rollin' up
Light and roll it up
Break it down, like a pound, shit was never us
Shit was never us
That's the real, on the real, are you serious?
How you feel, how you feel?
Used to trip off that shit I was kickin' to ya
Had some fun on the run though, I'll give it to ya


But baby, don't get it twisted
You was just another nigga on the hit list
Tryna fix your inner issues with a bad bitch
Didn't they tell you that I was a savage?
Fuck ya white horse and ya carriage
Bet you never could imagine
Never told you you could have it

You needed me
Ooh, you needed me
To feel a little more, and give a little less
Know you hate to confess
But baby ooh, you needed me",2413890
78010,1823230,Sex with Me,rb,Rihanna,2016,1086433,{},"
Sex with me, so amazing
All this all hard work, no vacation
Stay up off my Instagram, pure temptation
Hit a switch on a fake nigga, like a station
Sex with me, so amazing
Sex with me, so amazing


Vodka and water, and a lemon
And a few other things I cannot mention
Oh-na-na-na-na
Five fingers on it (five fingers)
Hit it like you own it, I'ma hit it like I'm on it
Straight shots of the blue dot
(Shots, shots, shots, shots)
Baby, I'ma pick your  poison
Oh-we, ah-yeah, you gon' need it
I'm off that la-la
I'ma get it wet like jacuzzi, ah-yea

And sex with me, so amazing
All this all hard work, no vacation
Stay up off my Instagram, pure temptation
Sex with me, sex with me, sex with me
So amazing, so amazing, mmmm


You know I got the sauce (sauce), you know I'm saucy
And it's always wet, a bitch never ever had to use lip gloss on it
I'ma need you deeper than six, it's not a coffin
We're not making love, tryna get nasty
Wrap up your drugs, come make me happy
Sex with me is amazing, with her it'll feel alright
The sex doesn't get any better, make it long, let it be all night
I know, I know, I make it hard to let go
Tonight, all night, I'm Monroe
Even if I'm alone


Sex with me, so amazing
All this all hard work, no vacation
Stay up off my Instagram, pure temptation
Hit a switch on a fake nigga, like a station
Sex with me, sex with me, sex with me
So amazing, so amazing, mmmm

Sex with me, so amazing
Sex with me so amazing
(This is the best there is)",2414113
78011,1823234,Antarctica,rap,$UICIDEBOY$,2016,1039555,"{""\\$UICIDEBOY\\$""}","
Letting a new day begin
Letting a new day begin
Letting a new day begin
Hold to the time that you know


Locked in my room, four black walls
Tie the noose, no recall
No resolve, fuck withdrawal
Rather shoot up till I fall
Murder on call with the *59
Twenty years, and it seem like a lifetime
I been hanging every day from a lifeline
While these fuckers had a dinner every night time
Smo-, smokin' that dope off the foil, let me ball
Ho, please don't call, don't fuck with y'all
Spray paint the walls with blood and whatever
Drag you outside, let you rot in the weather
I don't think I can explain any better
I'm $carecrow the terror and  live for the lesser
My birth was an error

I am the Lord of Loneliness
I'll hold my breath, just spoke with Death
He said he hopes for the best
Told him I'm ropin' my neck
Then I woke up chokin' from the hole in my chest
Somehow I manage to function and hope
Every day got a lump in my throat
That's them pills swallowed whole
Smoke a blunt and then fuck all these hoes
End up humpin' they throat
Get the fuck away from me, I hate all of you, faithfully
This world was never made for me
Thankfully, I'm trained to see past all the lies, the ranks, the scenes
I'll shank my knees, then walk the plank and freeze


Letting a new day begin
Hold to the time that you know",2414117
78041,1823514,PILLOWTALK,rb,ZAYN,2016,1224573,{},"
Climb on board
We'll go slow and high tempo
Light and dark
Hold me hard and mellow


I'm seeing the pain, seeing the pleasure
Nobody but you, 'body but me
'Body but us, bodies together
I love to hold you close, tonight and always
I love to wake up next to you
I love to hold you close, tonight and always
I love to wake up next to you


So we'll piss off the neighbours
In the place that feels the tears
The place to lose your fears
Yeah, reckless behavior
A place that is so pure, so dirty and raw
In the bed all day, bed all day, bed all day
Fucking and fighting on
It's our paradise and it's our war zone
It's our paradise and it's our war zone

Pillow talk
My enemy, my ally
Prisoners
Then we're free, it's a thin line


I'm seeing the pain, seeing the pleasure
Nobody but you, 'body but me
'Body but us, bodies together
I love to hold you close, tonight and always
I love to wake up next to you


So we'll piss off the neighbours
In the place that feels the tears
The place to lose your fears
Yeah, reckless behavior
A place that is so pure, so dirty and raw
In the bed all day, bed all day, bed all day
Fucking and fighting on
It's our paradise and it's our war zone
It's our paradise and it's our war zone


Paradise, paradise, paradise, paradise
War zone, war zone, war zone, war zone
Paradise, paradise, paradise, paradise
War zone, war zone, war zone, war zone

So we'll piss off the neighbours
In the place that feels the tears
The place to lose your fears
Yeah, reckless behavior
A place that is so pure, so dirty and raw
In the bed all day, bed all day, bed all day
Fucking and fighting on
It's our paradise and it's our war zone
It's our paradise and it's our war zone",2414425
78103,1824251,Summer Sixteen,rap,Drake,2016,2339882,{},"


Looking, looking, looking
Looking, looking, looking
Looking, looking
Looking
Looking


Looking for revenge
All summer sixteen
All summer sixteen
Playing dirty not clean
Out in front of Four Seasons
Looking like a damn football team
All in the same thing
All repping one thing
Looking for revenge


To do what you couldn't do
Tell Obama that my verses are just like the whips that he in
They bulletproof
Minus twenty we in Pitfield
That Kai's kitchen in a Canada Goose
Famous as fuck but I'm still in the cut when they round up the troops
I'm just a sicko, a real sicko when you get to know me nigga
I let the diss record drop, you was staying right below me, nigga
We must have played it a hundred times, you was going to bed
Why would I put on a vest? I expect you to aim for the head
I coulda killed you the first time
You don't have to try and say it louder nigga
Trust, we heard you the first time
It's nothing personal I would have done it to anyone
And I blame where I came from
And I blame all my day ones
You know Chubbs like Draymond
You better off not saying nothing
Them boys they a handful
Then I hit 'em with the Hotline
Chris Breezy with the dance moves
Mo-G with the dance moves
Ave Boy with the dance moves
Jimi Hendrix with the solo
Those are strings that you can't pull
Yeah, and I could really dish it out
Come and get it from the source
Fuck with all the word of mouth
Golden State running practice at my house
Nigga, what am I about?
You gon' really feel it now
I'm out here...

Looking for revenge
All summer sixteen
All summer sixteen
Playing dirty not clean
Out in front of Four Seasons
Looking like a damn football team
All repping one thing
Looking for revenge




All you boys in the new Toronto want to be me a little
All your exes know I like my O's with a V in the middle
You would love it if I went away or didn't say nothing else
How am I keeping it real by keeping this shit to myself?
You was never gang, gang, gang, gang, you was never one of us
Had us fooled for a minute there, now we done all grown up
But I'm better off anyway, y'all never gon' finish Drake
Say you seeing 'bout it when you see me man y'all never home anyway
Thought of things that you shoulda said, said things that you shouldn't say
We even gave y'all the whole money play and y'all broke to this day
""Oh it's your time now"" yeah, that's what everybody say
I used to wanna be on Roc-A-Fella then I turned into Jay
Now I got a house in LA, now I got a bigger pool than Ye
And look man, Ye's pool is nice, mine's just bigger's what I'm saying
I'm that nigga's what I'm saying
Getting things done around here
How you let me run it down here?
I'm not even from around here
Six, six, six, six, six, soon as I'm back in the city they throw a parade
I might get a key to the city and give it to Wayne
Or give it to one of the young boys to carry the wave
Yeah, so trust me, they'll be out here...

Looking for revenge
All summer sixteen
All summer sixteen
Playing dirty not clean
Out in front of Four Seasons
Looking like a damn football team
All repping one thing
Looking for...


They don't want us to have a bigger pool than Kanye",2415289
78105,1824258,Beautiful,pop,Heathers the Musical Ensemble,2014,1026704,"{""Alice Lee"",""Barrett Wilbert Weed"",""Jessica Keenan Wynn"",""Elle McLemore"",""Katie Ladner"",""Evan Todd"",""Dan Domenech"",""AJ Meijner"",""Cait Fairbanks"",""Charissa Hogeland"",""Dustin Sullivan"",""Michelle Duffy"",""Rachel Flynn"",""Jon Eidson""}","
September 1st, 1989
Dear Diary:
I believe I'm a good person. You know, I think that there's good in everyone, but-here we are! First day of senior year! And uh... I look around at these kids that I've known all my life and I ask myself-what happened?


Freak! Slut! Burnout! Bug-eyes! Poser! Lard-ass!


We were so tiny, happy and shiny
Playing tag and getting chased


Freak! Slut! Loser! Shortbus!


Singing and clapping, laughing and napping
Baking cookies, eating paste


Bull-dyke! Stuck-up! Hunchback!

Then we got bigger, that was the trigger
Like the Huns invading Rome

(spoken)
Oh, sorry!

(sung)
Welcome to my school, this ain't no high school
This is the Thunderdome

Hold your breath and count the days, we're graduating soon


White trash!


College will be paradise, if I'm not dead by June!

But I know, I know, life can be beautiful
I pray, I pray for a better way
If we changed back then, we could change again
We can be beautiful...



Ow!


Just not today

(spoken)
Hey, are you okay?


Get away, nerd


Oh, okay


Freak! Slut! Cripple! Homo! Homo! Homo!


Things will get better soon as my letter
Comes from Harvard, Duke, or Brown
Wake from this coma, take my diploma
Then I can blow this town
Dream of ivy-covered walls and smoky French cafés



Watch it!


Fight the urge to strike a match and set this dump ablaze!




Ooooops


Ram Sweeney. Third year as linebacker and eighth year of smacking lunch trays and being a huge dick


What did you say to me, skank?


Aah, nothing!


But I know, I know...
I know, I know...
Life can be beautiful
Beautiful
I pray, I pray
I pray, I pray
For a better way
For a better way
We were kind before;
(Oooh...)
We can be kind once more
(Oooh...)
We can be beautiful..,
(Oooh... Beautiful...)




Agh!... Hey Martha


Hey




Martha Dunnstock. My best friend since diapers


We on for movie night?


Yeah, you're on Jiffy Pop detail


I rented ""The Princess Bride.""


Ho-ho-ho, again? Wait, don't you have it memorized by now?


What can I say? I'm a sucker for a happy ending


Martha Dumptruck! Wide load! Honnnnnk!




Hahaaa!


Kurt Kelly. Quarterback. He is the smartest guy on the football team. Which is kind of like being the tallest dwarf


Haha! Alriiight!


Hey! Pick that up! Right now!


I'm sorry, are you actually talking to me?


Yes, I am. I wanna know what gives you the right to pick on my friend. You're a high school has-been waiting to happen. A future gas station attendant


...You have a zit right there...




Dear diary:

(sung)
Why....


Why do they hate me?


Why don't I fight back?


Why do I act like such a creep?


Why...


Why won't he date me?


Why did I hit him?


Why do I cry myself to sleep?


Why...


Somebody hug me!
Somebody fix me!
Somebody save me!


Send me a sign, God!
Give me some hope, here!
Something to live for!




Ahh! Heather, Heather, and Heather!


And then there's the Heathers. They float above it all


I love Heather, Heather, and Heather


Heather McNamara, head cheerleader. Her dad is loaded-he sells engagement rings
(I hate Heather, Heather, and Heather)

Heather Duke, runs the yearbook. No discernible personality, but her mom did pay for implants
(I want Heather, Heather, and Heather)
And Heather Chandler, the Almighty
She is a mythic bitch
(I need Heather, Heather-)


They're solid Teflon-never bothered, never harassed
I would give anything to be like that


Mmmm...


I'd like to be their boyfriend


That would be beautiful...
Mmmm...


If I sat at their table, guys would notice me


So beautiful...
Ooooh...


I'd like them to be nicer


That would be beautiful...
Ooooh...


I'd like to kidnap a Heather and photograph her naked in an abandoned warehouse and leave her tied up for the rats

[VERONICA enters the girls' bathroom. HEATHER CHANDLER and MCNAMARA are watching HEATHER DUKE vomit into a toilet.]


Grow up, Heather. Bulimia is so '87.


Maybe you should see a doctor, Heather


Yeah, Heather. Maybe I should


Ah, Heather and Heather



...and Heather. Perhaps you didn't hear the bell over all the vomiting. You're late for class




Heather wasn't feeling well. We're helping her


Not without a hall pass, you're not. Week's detention


Um, actually, Ms. Fleming, all four of us are out on a hall pass. Yearbook committee


...I see you're all listed. Hurry up and get where you're going


This is an excellent forgery. Who are you?


Uh... Veronica Sawyer. I crave a boon


What boon?


Um. Let me sit at your table, at lunch. Just once. No talking necessary. If people think that you guys tolerate me, then they'll leave me alone...



Before you answer, I also do report cards, permission slips, and absence notes


How about prescriptions?


Shut up, Heather


Sorry, Heather




For a greasy little nobody, you do have good bone structure


And a symmetrical face. If I took a meat cleaver down the center of your skull, I'd have matching halves. That's very important


Of course, you could stand to lose a few pounds


And ya know, ya know, ya know?
This could be beautiful
Mascara, maybe some lip gloss
And we're on our way
Get this girl some blush;
And Heather, I need your brush
Let's make her beautiful


Let's make her beautiful...


Let's make her beautiful...


Make her beautiful...

(spoken)
Okay?


Okay!




Out of my way, geek!


I don't want trouble-


You're gonna die at 3pm!


Don't you dare touch me! Get away, pervert!


What did I ever do to them?


Who could survive this?
I can't escape this!
I think I'm dying!


Who's that with Heather?




Whoa

(sung)
Heather, Heather, Heather...


And someone!


Heather, Heather, Heather...


And a babe!


Heather, Heather, Heather...


Veronica?!


Veronica? Veronica? Veronica!




And you know, you know, you know
(Ooohhhh!)
Life can be beautiful
(Aaahhh! Beautiful!)
You hope, you dream, you pray
(Ooohhhh!)
And you get your way!
(Aaahhh!)
Ask me how it feels
(Beautiful!)
Lookin' like hell on wheels...
(Ooohhhh!)
My God, it's beautiful!
(Aaahhh! Beautiful!)
I might be beautiful...
(Beautiful!)
And when you're beautiful...
(Aaahhh!)


It's a beautiful frickin' day!


Heather! Heather! Heather! Veronica!
Heather! Heather! Heather! Veronica!
Veronica! Veronica! Veronica!
Veronicaaaaa!",2415296
78160,1825027,No,pop,Meghan Trainor,2016,1522917,{},"
I think it's so cute and I think it's so sweet
How you let your friends encourage you to try and talk to me
But let me stop you there, oh, before you speak


Nah to the ah to the no, no, no
My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no, uh
You need to let it go, uh
You need to let it go, uh
Need to let it go, uh
Nah to the ah to the, no, no, no
My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no
You need to let it go, uh
You need to let it go, uh
Need to let it go, uh
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no


First you gonna say you ain't runnin' game
Thinkin' I'm believing every word
Call me beautiful, so original
Telling me I'm not like other girls
I was in my zone before you came along
Now I'm thinking maybe you should go
Blah, blah, blah
I be like nah to the ah to the no, no, no

All my ladies, listen up
If that boy ain't giving up
Lick your lips and swing your hips
Girl, all you gotta say is


My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no, uh
You need to let it go, uh
You need to let it go, uh
Need to let it go, uh
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no
My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no
You need to let it go
You need to let it go
Need to let it go
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no


Thank you in advance, I don't wanna dance (Nope)
I don't need your hands all over me (No, no)
If I want a man, then I'ma get a man
But it's never my priority (Hey)
I was in my zone, before you came along
Don't want you to take this personal
Blah, blah, blah
I be like nah to the ah to the no, no, no

All my ladies, listen up (All my ladies)
If that boy ain't giving up (Ain't giving' up)
Lick your lips and swing your hips (Hey, hey, let's go!)
Girl, all you gotta say is (Ooh)


My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no, uh
You need to let it go, uh
You need to let it go, uh
Need to let it go, uh
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no
My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no
You need to let it go
You need to let it go
Need to let it go
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no


I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable, uh
I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable
I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable
I'm feeling
Hey, hey, hey
(Nah to the ah to the no, no, no)
Sing it
Untouchable, untouchable (I'm feeling)
I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable (Untouchable)
I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable
I'm feeling
(Nah to the ah to the no, no, no)

All my ladies, listen up (Say, all my ladies)
If that boy ain't giving up (Ain't giving up)
Lick your lips and swing your hips (No, no)
Girl all you gotta say is (No, no)


My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no
You need to let it go, you need to let it go
Need to let it go
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no
My name is no, my sign is no, my number is no
You need to let it go, you need to let it go
Need to let it go
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no


I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable
I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable
I'm feeling
Untouchable, untouchable
I'm feeling
Nah to the ah to the no, no, no

",2416274
78348,1826972,Money Longer,rap,Lil Uzi Vert,2016,1111585,{},"
Yeah, it do not matter
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster


Money so old, dollars spoiled (Spoiled)
Yeah, my lil' bitch so spoiled (Spoiled)
Yeah, I rub her down in oil
Yeah, I got money, now you know it, yeah
Diamonds on my teeth
Yeah, your shit look like foil
Yeah, Chris Brown said these hoes ain't loyal, yeah
None of these hoes got no morals, yeah
All my niggas G-ed up
Yeah, my glasses be Dita
Never thought it would be days I could kick my feet up (Huh)
Never thought that she would need me that much if I leave her

It do not matter
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster


All of this was faction
No time for actin', all this money lastin'
Like, go out to eat, get that blackened salmon
When I'm wit' my girl, we Pharrell and Vashtie
Wait, huh? That mean we are not lastin'
In that pussy, you know I like it rough, then I'm just blastin'
Yeah, tell that lil' bitch that I'm really from Mars
Uh, yeah, bitch, do not start
Yeah, pull up, my car automatic
Yeah, uh, done with the start, yeah

It do not matter
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster
Turned to a savage, pocket got fatter, she call me daddy
Smokin' that gas, gone off that Xanny, she on the powder
Nowadays I am on, my haters got sadder
Money got longer, speaker got louder, car got faster",2418877
78370,1827250,Formation,pop,Beyonc,2016,6074066,{Beyoncé},"
What happened at the New Wil'ins?
Bitch, I'm back by popular demand


Y'all haters corny with that Illuminati mess
Paparazzi, catch my fly and my cocky fresh
I'm so reckless when I rock my Givenchy dress (Stylin')
I'm so possessive so I rock his Roc necklaces
My daddy Alabama, momma Louisiana
You mix that negro with that Creole, make a Texas bama
I like my baby heir with baby hair and afros
I like my negro nose with Jackson Five nostrils
Earned all this money, but they never take the country out me
I got hot sauce in my bag, swag


Oh yeah, baby, oh yeah I, oh, oh, yes, I like that
I did not come to play with you hoes, haha
I came to slay, bitch
I like cornbreads and collard greens, bitch
Oh, yes, you besta believe it

Y'all haters corny with that lluminati mess
Paparazzi, catch my fly and my cocky fresh
I'm so reckless when I rock my Givenchy dress (Stylin')
I'm so possessive so I rock his Roc necklaces
My daddy Alabama, momma Louisiana
You mix that negro with that Creole, make a Texas bama
I like my baby heir with baby hair and afros
I like my negro nose with Jackson Five nostrils
Earned all this money but they never take the country out me
I got hot sauce in my bag, swag


I see it, I want it, I stunt; yellow bone-it
I dream it, I work hard, I grind 'til I own it
I twirl on them haters, albino alligators
El Camino with the seat low, sippin' Cuervo with no chaser
Sometimes I go off (I go off), I go hard (I go hard)
Get what's mine (Take what's mine), I'm a star (I'm a star)
'Cause I slay (Slay), I slay (Hey), I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay)
All day (Okay), I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay)
We gon' slay (Slay), gon' slay (Okay), we slay (Okay), I slay (Okay)
I slay (Okay), okay (Okay), I slay (Okay), okay, okay, okay, okay
Okay, okay, ladies, now let's get in formation, 'cause I slay
Okay, ladies, now let's get in formation, 'cause I slay
Prove to me you got some coordination, 'cause I slay
Slay trick, or you get eliminated

When he fuck me good, I take his ass to Red Lobster, 'cause I slay
When he fuck me good, I take his ass to Red Lobster, we gon slay
If he hit it right, I might take him on a flight on my chopper, I slay
Drop him off at the mall, let him buy some J's, let him shop up, 'cause I slay
I might get your song played on the radio station, 'cause I slay
I might get your song played on the radio station, 'cause I slay
You just might be a black Bill Gates in the making, 'cause I slay
I just might be a black Bill Gates in the making


I see it, I want it, I stunt; yellow bone-it
I dream it, I work hard, I grind 'til I own it
I twirl on my haters, albino alligators
El Camino with the seat low, sippin' Cuervo with no chaser
Sometimes I go off (I go off), I go hard (I go hard)
Take what's mine (Take what's mine), I'm a star (I'm a star)
'Cause I slay (Slay), I slay (Hey), I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay)
I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay), I slay (Okay)
We gon' slay (Slay), gon' slay (Okay), we slay (Okay), I slay (Okay)
I slay (Okay), okay (Okay), I slay (Okay), okay, okay, okay, okay
Okay, okay, ladies, now let's get in formation, I slay
Okay, ladies, now let's get in formation, 'cause I slay
Prove to me you got some coordination, 'cause I slay
Slay trick, or you get eliminated, I slay

Okay, ladies, now let's get in formation, I slay
Okay, ladies, now let's get in formation
You know you that bitch when you cause all this conversation
Always stay gracious, best revenge is your paper


Girl, I hear some thunder
Golly, look at that water, boy, oh Lord",2419257
78506,1829022,FML,rap,Kanye West,2016,1808993,"{""The Weeknd""}","
I been waiting for a minute
For my lady
So I can't jeopardize that for one of these hoes
I been livin' without limits
As far as my business
I'm the only one that's in control
I been feeling all I've given
For my children
I will die for those I love
God, I'm willing
To make this my mission
Give up the women
Before I lose half of what I own
I been thinking
'Bout my vision
Pour out my feelings
Revealing the layers to my soul
My soul
The layers to my soul
Revealing the layers to my soul

They wish I would go ahead and fuck my life up
Can't let them get to me
And even though I always fuck my life up
Only I can mention me


See, before I let you go
One last thing I need to let you know
You ain't never seen nothing crazier than
This nigga when he off his Lexapro
Remember that last time in Mexico?
Remember that last time, the episode?
Asking me why the hell I text in code?
Four times just to say, ""Don't text me, ho""
Told you four times, ""Don't test me, ho""
And we finna lose all self-control
But you ain't finna be raising your voice at me
Especially when we in the Giuseppe store
But I'ma have the last laugh in the end
'Cause I'm from a tribe called ""Check-a-ho""
Yeah, I'ma have to laugh in the end
'Cause I'm from a tribe called ""Check-a-ho""
And I...


They wish I would go ahead and fuck my life up
Can't let them get to me
And even though I always fuck my life up
Only I can mention me
They wish I would go ahead and fuck my life up
Can't let them get to me
And even though I always fuck my life up
Only I can mention me

See through the veil
And forget all of your cares
Throw them
Throw them away
Don't stop your loving
Don't stop for nothing
No, not for nothing
They don't wanna see me love you
Don't now, don't stop it
They always love it
They always wanna
They don't wanna see me love you
See through the veil
They don't wanna see me love you
And forget all your cares
They don't wanna see me love you
Throw them
Throw them away
Ooh, life's a feeling and
Ooh, the body is a feeling, yeah",2421661
78509,1829029,Wolves,rap,Kanye West,2016,2147261,"{Sia,""VIC MENSA""}","


Lost out, beat up
Dancin', down there
I found you, somewhere out
'Round 'round there, right right there
Lost and beat up
Down there, dancin'
I found you, somewhere out
Right down there, right 'round there


Lost and found out
Turned out, how you thought
Daddy found out
That you turned out how you turned out
If mama knew now
How you turned out, you too wild
You too wild, you too wild
You too wild, I need you now
Love you (Got to)
Love you (Love you)
Found you, found you
Right now, right now
Right now, right now
If your mama knew how
You turned out, you too wild
You too wild, you too wild
You too wild, and I need you now
Lost and found out

Cry, I'm not sorry
Cry, who needs sorry when there's Hennessy?
Don't fool yourself
Your eyes don't lie, you're much too good to be true
Don't fire fight
Yeah, I feel you burning, everything's burning
Don't fly too high
Your wings might melt, you're much too good to be true
I'm just bad for you
I'm just bad, bad, bad for you


I was lost and beat up
Turned out, burned up
You found me, through a heartache
Didn't know me, you were drawn in
I was lost and beat up
I was warm flesh, on Caesar
You found me, in your gaze
Well, I found me, oh, Jesus
I was too wild, I was too wild
I was too wild, I was too wild
I was too wild, I was too wild


And I need you now
Lost and found out
Yeah

You gotta let me know if I could be your Joseph
Only tell you real shit, that's the tea, no sip
Don't trip, don't trip, that pussy slippery, no whip
We ain't trippin' on shit, we just sippin' on this
Just forget the whole shit, we could laugh about nothin'
I impreg-a-nate your mind, let's have a baby without fuckin', yo
I know it's corny bitches you wish you could unfollow
I know it's corny niggas you wish you could unswallow
I know it's corny bitches you wish you could unfollow
I know it's corny niggas you wish you could unswallow
Ayy, I know it's corny bitches you wish you could unfollow
I know it's corny niggas you wish you could unswallow
You tried to play nice, everybody just took advantage
You left your fridge open, somebody just took a sandwich
I said, ""Baby, what if you was clubbin'
Thuggin', hustlin' before you met your husband?""
Then I said, ""What if Mary was in the club
'Fore she met Joseph, around hella thugs?""
Cover Nori in lambs' wool
We surrounded by the fuckin' wolves
(What if Mary) ""What if Mary
(Was in the club) Was in the club
'Fore she met Joseph with no love?""
Cover Saint in lambs' wool
(And she was) We surrounded by
(Surrounded by) The fuckin' wolves",2421668
78535,1829288,30 Hours,rap,Kanye West,2016,1229491,{},"
Baby lion goes
Where the islands go


You say you never saw this comin', well, you're not alone
Million dollar renovations to a happy home
My ex says she gave me the best years of her life
I saw a recent picture of her, I guess she was right
I wake up, assessin' the damages
Checkin' MediaTakeOut
Pictures of me drunk walkin' out with a bitch
But it's blurry enough to get the fake out
I wake up, all veggies no eggs
I hit the gym, all chest no legs
Yep, then I made myself a smoothie
Yeah, then me and wifey make a movie
Chicago, St. Louis, St. Louis to Chicago
Ándale, ándale E.I, E.I, uh-oh
You had me drivin' far enough to switch the time zone
You was the best of all time at the time, though
Yeah, you wasn't mine, though

But I still drove thirty hours
And I, I still drove thirty hours to you, yeah


I remember rappin' for Jay and Cam
Young producer just trying to get his flows off
I remember being nervous to do Victoria's Secret
'Til I pictured everybody with they clothes off
Expedition was Eddie Bauer edition
I'm drivin' with no winter tires in December
Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt, like a private school for women
Then I get there and all the Popeye's is finished, girl
You don't love me, you just pretendin'
I need a happy beginnin', middle and endin'
Chicago, St. Louis, St. Louis to Chicago
It's gettin' hot in here, that's all that I know
Got a hotel room, three stars for you
You call down for an omelet, girl, it's 5 in the morning
You realize we at the DoubleTree, not the Aria
Only thing open is Waffle House, girl, don't start with me
I used the Western Union for you like it's no prob'
'Cause you was in college complainin' 'bout it's no jobs
But you were suckin' a nigga dick the whole time
Well, I guess a blowjob's better than no job

And I drove back thirty hours, uh


Where the main ties onto the sail
Better on sighting
For astern, oh


3 Stacks, can you help me out?
Thirty hours
Yeah, this type of shit you just ride out to
Thirty hours
Thirty hours
I just be like, it was my idea to have an open relationship
Now a nigga mad
Now I'm 'bout to drive ninety miles like Matt Barnes to kill
Thirty hours
Just to kill
Just to
Just to
I'm about to drive ninety
Ninety miles like Matt Barnes just to whoop a nigga ass
It was my idea and now a nigga (Thirty hours)
Now a nigga mad, now a nigga, uh
A stunna
Whoop him after school just to show I got class
Duh-duh-duh-duh-duh-duh-duh-duh
Duh-duh with you, yeah (Thirty hours)
You know what I'm sayin'? Drop some shit like that
Ayy, ayy, ayy-ayy, ayy, uh
Whoop him after school just to
Thirty hours
Whoop him after school just to show I got class
Uh, igh, uh, uh, 3 Stacks
Thirty hours
Just ride out to that, uh
Check it out: this the bonus track, this the bonus
Thirty hours
My favorite albums used to have like bonus joints like this
That's why they kick it off like this
Yeah, just did that Madison Square Garden
Thirty hours
Had to put the flyest nigga on this shit, ayy, ayy
The pyramids shall rise
Thirty hours
Look at these ultralight beams flowin'
For all the moms, the dads, the kids, the families that shared this moment with us
Let's rock out for 'bout
Thirty hours
You know, ayy, you know
Ayy, you know, ayy, you know
Thirty hours
Whole design team, Yeezy team, music team, ayy
Remember when the whole block'd get shout out?
This my version of a shout-out track
Thirty hours
Let that mothafucka rock, let that, let that, yeah
To my brother Yasiin, holding it down in Africa
Thirty hours
To my family: thank you for holding me down
The media be acting like
Thirty hours
That's Gabe calling
Yo, Gabe
I'm just doing a- I'm just doing an adlib track right now
What's up?
Thirty hours
Thirty hours
",2421955
78543,1829326,Pt. 2,rap,Kanye West,2016,1836993,{Desiigner},"
Faaaaaaaa- (Perfect)
Faaaaaaaa-
Faaaaaaaa-
Faaaaaaaa-
I told, I told, ayy-ayy, I told you


Up in the mornin', miss you bad
Sorry I ain't call you back, same problem my father had
All this time, all he had, all he had
And what he dreamed, all his cash
Market crashed, hurt him bad
People get divorced for that
Dropped some stacks, pops is good
Mama passed in Hollywood
If you ask, lost my soul
Drivin' fast, lost control
Off the road, jaw was broke
'Member we all was broke
'Member I'm comin' back
I'll be takin' all the stacks, oh

I got broads in Atlanta
Twistin' dope, lean, and the Fanta
Stacks, oh
Credit cards and the scammers
Hittin' off licks in the bando
Takin' all the stacks, oh
Black X6, Phantom
White X6 looks like a panda
Stacks, oh
Going out like I'm Montana
Hundred killers, hundred hammers
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, panda
Pockets swole, Danny
Sellin' bar, candy
Man I'm the macho like Randy
The choppa go Oscar for Grammy
Bitch nigga, pull up ya panty
Hope you killas understand me


I just wanna feel liberated, I, I, I (Hey)
I just wanna feel liberated, I, I, I (Panda)
Panda, panda, panda, panda
Takin' all the stacks, oh
Panda, panda, panda
Stacks, oh
Takin' all the stacks, oh

I got broads in Atlanta
Twist the dope, lean and shit, sippin' Fanta
Stacks, oh
Credit cards and the scammers
Wake up Versace, shit like Desiigner
Takin' all the stacks, oh
Whole bunch of lavish shit
They be askin' 'round town who be clappin' shit
I be pullin' up stuff in the Phantom ship
I got plenty of stuff of Bugatti, whip look how I try this shit
Black X6, Phantom
White X6, killin' on camera


My joy


How can I find you?
Who do you turn to?
How do I bind you?


If I don't turn to you
No other help I know, I stretch my hands",2421998
78548,1829393,I Love Kanye,rap,Kanye West,2016,2108822,{},"
I miss the old Kanye, straight from the Go Kanye
Chop up the soul Kanye, set on his goals Kanye
I hate the new Kanye, the bad mood Kanye
The always rude Kanye, spaz in the news Kanye
I miss the sweet Kanye, chop up the beats Kanye
I gotta say, at that time I'd like to meet Kanye
See, I invented Kanye, it wasn't any Kanyes
And now I look and look around and there's so many Kanyes
I used to love Kanye, I used to love Kanye
I even had the pink polo, I thought I was Kanye
What if Kanye made a song about Kanye
Called ""I Miss The Old Kanye""? Man, that'd be so Kanye
That's all it was Kanye, we still love Kanye
And I love you like Kanye loves Kanye",2422080
78925,1834049,Saint Pablo,rap,Kanye West,2016,1676881,{Sampha},"
Yeah-yeah, 9:08 L.A. time
Back in the lab and shit


My wife said, I can't say no to nobody
And at this rate we gon' both die broke
Got friends that ask me for money knowin' I'm in debt
And like my wife said, I still didn't say no
People tryna say I'm goin' crazy on Twitter
My friends' best advice was to stay low
I guess it's hard to decipher all of the bills
Especially when you got family members on payroll
The media said it was outlandish spendin'
The media said he's way out of control
I just feel like I'm the only one not pretendin'
I'm not out of control, I'm just not in their control
I know I'm the most influential
That TIME cover was just confirmation
This generation's closest thing to Einstein
So don't worry about me, I'm fine
I can see a thousand years from now in real life
Skate on the paradigm and shift it when I feel like
Troll conventional thought, don't need to question
I know it's antiquated so sometimes I get aggressive
Thank God for Jay Electra, he down with the mission
Did it with no permission, on our own conditions
Most blacks with money have been beaten to submission
Yeezy with the big house, did it way different
Never listen to Hollywood producers
Don't stare at money too long, it's Medusa
The ultimate Gemini has survived
I wasn't supposed to make it past 25

Yeah, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
Wonderin' whether God's gonna say hi
Oh, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
And you wonder where is God in your nightlife
Yeah, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
(Father, Father, Father in the night sky)
Wonderin' whether God's gonna say hi
Yeah, I feel like I'm home, yeah, yeah


I've been wakin' the spirits of millions more to come
A million illegally downloaded my truth over the drums
I believe in the children, listen to the kids, bro
If the phone ringin', go and get your kids, ho
Brother Don Muhammad told the minister about the presentation
He sat back and smiled
Black on black lies is worse than black on black crime
The Jews share their truth on how to make a dime
Most black men couldn't balance a checkbook
But buy a new car, talkin' 'bout, ""How my neck look?""
Well, it all looks great
Four hundred years later, we buyin' our own chains
The light is before us brothers, so the devil workin' hard
Real family stick together and see through the mirage
The smokescreens, perceptions of false reality
Who the real owner if your boss gets a salary?
I am one with the people
I am one with the people (Real!)
I've been woken from enlightened man's dream
Checkin' Instagram comments to crowdsource my self-esteem
Let me not say too much or do too much
'Cause if I'm up way too much, I'm out of touch
I'm prayin' a out-of-body experience will happen
So the people can see my light, now it's not just rappin'
God, I have humbled myself before the court
Drop my ego when confidence was my last resort
I know, I know He got a plan, I know I'm on Your beams
One set of footsteps, You was carryin' me
When I turned on the news and they was buryin' me
One set of footsteps, You was carryin' me
When I was negotiatin' with Apple, it was Larry and me
Told Tim Cook to call me, I was scary to see
I would've took a hundred million and gave twenty to Hov
I heard it's the way they did it when we only had a stove
But it's better that I stayed at home with my folks
'Cause if Jay a billionaire then I'ma never go broke
Only thing I ask is next time I'm on stage we all go
We all go
Not just by myself, lookin' for niggas like where's Waldo
She got the same shoes as my wife but she copped 'em at Aldo
Modern-day MJ, with a off-the-wall flow

Nightlife, walk all over me
Walk all over me
I'm deliverin' everything I've ever sent that you'll bring
Fly, fly, fly overseas
Fly overseas
Oh, anywhere, everything but in between
Oh, yeah


Yeah, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
Wonderin' whether God's gonna say hi
Oh, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
And you wonder where is God in your nightlife
Yeah, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
Wonderin' whether God's gonna say hi
(Father, Father, Father in the night sky)
Oh, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
And you wonder where is God in your nightlife
(Father, Father, Father in the night sky)


Please face me when I speak
Please say to me somethin' before you leave
You've been treatin' me like I'm invisible, now I'm visible to you
Oh, the invisible truth stay sober
I can't quite understand the games you play
Understand, understand, understand I'm standin' under oath
And I promised I, I wouldn't fall anymore
But I'm cryin' at the bar
I'm wishin' that you saw my scars, man
I'm wishin' that you came down here and stood by me
And looked at me like you knew me
But I feel so alone
Like I don't know anyone except the night sky above

Yeah, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
Wonderin' whether God's gonna say hi
Oh, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
And you wonder where is God in your nightlife
Yeah, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
(Father, Father, Father in the night sky)
Wonderin' whether God's gonna say hi
Oh, you're lookin' at the church in the night sky
And you wonder where is God in your nightlife
(Father, Father, Father in the night sky)",2428259
78981,1834842,Dangerous Woman,rb,Ariana Grande,2016,1017882,{},"
(Oh, yeah)


Don't need permission
Made my decision to test my limits
'Cause it's my business, God as my witness
Start what I finished
Don't need no hold up
Taking control of this kind of moment
I'm locked and loaded
Completely focused, my mind is open


All that you got
Skin to skin, oh my God
Don't you stop, boy


Somethin' 'bout you makes me feel like a dangerous woman
Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout you
Makes me wanna do things that I shouldn't
Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout

Nothing to prove and I'm bulletproof and
Know what I'm doing
The way we're movin'
Like introducing us to a new thing
I wanna savor, save it for later
The taste, the flavor, 'cause I'm a taker, 'cause I'm a giver
It's only nature, I live for danger


All that you got
Skin to skin, oh my God
Don't ya stop, boy (Oh, yeah)


Somethin' 'bout you makes me feel like a dangerous woman
Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout you
Makes me wanna do things that I shouldn't
Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout you


All girls wanna be like that
Bad girls underneath, like that
You know how I'm feeling inside
(Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout)
All girls wanna be like that
Bad girls underneath, like that
You know how I'm feeling inside
(Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout)

(Mmm-hmm) (Ooh-ooh)


Somethin' 'bout you makes me feel like a dangerous woman
Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout you (Eh-eh)
Makes me wanna do things that I shouldn't (Yeah)
Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout you (Yeah)


All girls wanna be like that (Hmm-mmm)
Bad girls underneath like that
You know how I'm feeling inside
(You know how I'm feeling inside, baby)
(Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout)
All girls wanna be like that
Bad girls underneath like that
You know how I'm feeling inside
(Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout)


Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy (Heh)
Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy (Oh-oh-oh, hey)
Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy
Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy
(Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout you)
Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy
Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy
(Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy)
Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy
(Yeah, there's somethin' 'bout you, boy, oh, yeah)
(Somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout, somethin' 'bout) You",2429192
79079,1836128,​beamer boy,rap,Lil Peep,2016,1031435,{},"
Man, I don't know what the fuck goin' on lately, bro, but
Everybody actin' real different and shit
Ain't nobody, nobody was talkin' to me like a few months ago
And now everybody hittin' my phone up and shit


I'm a mothafuckin' Schema' boy, I'm a dreamer boy
I love a girl that don't even fuckin' need a boy
Baby, I'm a beamer boy, I need a beamer, boy
I want a Z3, that's a two-seater, boy
Okay, I pull my cash out, shawty pass out
Take her ass out, then I spaz out
Okay, yeah, I hit that, shawty, get back
I got death notes, where my list at?
Yeah, I'm in my zone now, I put my phone down
I'm on my own now, I'm on my own now
Ya girl, she wanna go down on a real one
I hit JGRXXN, like ""What's the deal bruh?""
You see me doin' shows now, I'm a pro now
I got hoes now and I got some dough now
But they don't wanna hear that, they want that real shit
They want that ""drug talk,"" that ""I can't feel shit""
I'm never comin' home now, all alone now
Can't let my bros down, can't let my bros down
I feel like I'm a no one, that's what they told me
I'ma show ya, baby, I was chosen, ayy

I'm a mothafuckin' Schema' boy, I'm a dreamer boy
I love a girl that don't even fuckin' need a boy
Baby, I'm a beamer boy, I need a beamer, boy
I want a Z3, that's a two-seater, boy
Okay, I pull my cash out, shawty pass out
Take her ass out, then I spaz out
Okay, yeah, I hit that, shawty, get back
I got death notes, where my list at?
Yeah, I'm in my zone now, I put my phone down
I'm on my own now, I'm on my own now
Ya girl, she wanna go down on a real one
I hit JGRXXN, like ""What's the deal bruh?""
You see me doin' shows now, I'm a pro now
I got hoes now and I got some dough now
But they don't wanna hear that, they want that real shit
They want that ""drug talk,"" that ""I can't feel shit""
I'm never comin' home now, all alone now
Can't let my bros down, can't let my bros down
I feel like I'm a no one, that's what they told me
I'ma show ya, baby, I was chosen, ayy


Beamer boy",2430998
79259,1838260,​untitled 02 | 06.23.2014.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2016,1315437,{},"
Pimp-pimp (Hooray)
Pimp-pimp (Hooray)
(Hooray)
Pimp-pimp (Hooray)
Pimp-pimp


I'm sick and tired of being tired
Can't pick a side, the Gemini
Prophesize if we live or not
Promise momma not to fear nobody
Seen black turn 'em Burgundy
Hundred of them, I know I'm greedy
Stuck inside the belly of the beast
Can you please pray for me?


Get God on the phone, said it won't be long
I see jigaboos, I see Styrofoams
My hood going brazy, where did we go wrong?
I see jigaboos, I see Styrofoams
Get Top on the phone, tell the squad come home
We gon' ball again 'fore he call us home
World is going brazy, where did we go wrong?
It's a tidal wave, it's a thunderdome
Get God on the phone
I just got a raise (I just got a raise)
Spent it all on me (I spent it all on me)
Diamonds all appraised (Diamonds all appraised)
And I'm bossing up (And I'm bossing up)
Bitch, get out the way (Bitch, get out the way)
I'm the only way, we can fornicate
Ah, pimping and posing, look what I drove in, ah
Having these hoes and I know that I'm chosen, ah
I live by the code and me and my bros and, ah
My dollars ain't foldin', you was never the homie

Seen black turn 'em Burgundy
Hundred of them, I know I'm greedy
Stuck inside the belly of the beast
Can you please pray for me?


Get God on the phone
Said it won't be long
I see jigaboos, I see Styrofoams
My hood going brazy
Where did we go wrong?
I see jigaboos, I see Styrofoams
Get Top on the phone
(What's up, my nigga?)


Cornrow Kenny, he was born with a vision
All morning with the mixed dashboards, triple digits
Parallel park like an alien came visit
Slideshow for the night show, ten bitches
Find hoes with a blindfold, King Kendrick
(Hello, Billy)
So many plays, homie, I finesse
Palisade views with some sex
I lost a lot of love for missionary
This the first time I confess
Me and Top is like a Kobe and Phil
A father figure fuck with him, you get killed
Fuck with me and he will kill you himself
TDE the mafia of the west
Move in silence, yeah, we juggin' like that
Act of violence, yeah, we juggin' like that
I did a lot of dumb shit in my past
Lord forgive me, hoping I don't relapse
Dave just bought a new 911
Almost thought I'd seen another plane crash
Q just bought a brand new McLaren
Rock-a-lack about to buy the projects
Moosa got his son dripping in gold
Ali 'bout to let his hair down on hoes
Me, I'm 'bout to let my hair down on hoes
Top billin', that's a million a show
Might blow the whole no whammy on Soul
Might tell Obama be more like Punch
Sounwave caught a Grammy last year
Mack wop, bet he do what he want
Fuck you niggas, level two, I'm not done
2Teez told me that I'm the one
I can put a rapper on life support
Guarantee that's something none of you want
Ten homies down and they all serving life
What is like twenty-five hundred a month?
What if I empty my bank out and stunt?
What if I certified all of these ones?
Bitch, I get buck, I'm as real as they come
Shit is amazing, I'm feeding my cravings
You know that you want me, come here now, lil' baby
I'm fuckin, I'm crazy
Serving it like I belong in the basement
Or live at the Days Inn
Yan Yan my relative, black cherry soda
Pistol and poverty, come get to know us
(Get Top on the phone)

Who doing the drums?
Man put that nigga on the drums man
Yep, all day, ""Mortal Man"" and ""Kunta""
Alright, from the top",2433534
79495,1840737,Caroline,rap,Amin,2016,4827414,{Aminé},"
Listen, man
What's up?
I heard you done got you a dime piece, man
Hell naw, man
One of them Beyoncé, Meagan Good types, man
Nah, nah, nah
Is that true, man?
I just wanna know
Probably not
I mean, shit, to be honest with you, man, she's a...


Bad thang (Shit), fine as hell (Woo), thick as fuck
Oh my God (Damn), that's my baby
Caroline, you divine, mighty fine
Shawty really blow the pipe (That's true), like a pro
Aha, fuck you thought?


Holy shit, I'm really lit (It's lit)
It's lookin' like it's 'bout time (Chee) to fuck it up (Word)
Caroline, listen up, don't wanna hear
About your horoscope or what the future holds
Shut up and, shut up and

Let's get gory like a Tarantino movie
Don't wanna talk it out, can we fuck it out?
'Cause we gon' be up all night, fuck a decaf
You say I'm a tall thug, guess I'm a G-raffe
If you want safe sex, baby, use the knee pads
Freaky with the sticky-icky, baby, give me kitty, kitty
Uh, Killa, westside nigga (Ayy, ayy, goddamn)
Boy, you like 98 degrees and I'm 300
Nigga, keep your feet runnin' (Hot, hot)
I chief-keef-keef when I eat these beats, bet a boy get scurred
Don't run up in my lane, I don't want you in my lane
You a lame, get swerved (Ooh, ooh)


'Cause great scenes might be great
But I love your bloopers
And perfect's for the urgent
Baby, I want forever
And Caroline, don't you see that
I want you to be my


Bad thang, fine as hell, thick as fuck (Woah)
Oh my God, that's my baby (Woah, woah)
Caroline, you divine, mighty fine (Woah-oh-oh, ah, ah)
Shawty really blow the pipe (That's true), like a pro (Ah)
Aha, what?

Holy shit, I'm really lit (It's lit)
It's lookin' like it's 'bout time (Chee) to fuck it up (Word)
Caroline, listen up, don't wanna hear
About your horoscope or what the future holds
Shut up and, shut up and


Let's get gory like a Tarantino movie
Don't wanna talk it out, can we fuck it out?
'Cause we gon' be up all night, fuck a decaf
You say I'm a tall thug, guess I'm a G-raffe
If you want safe sex, baby, use the knee pads
Freaky with the sticky-icky, baby, give me kitty, kitty
Uh, Killa, westside nigga (Ayy, ayy, goddamn)
Boy, you like 98 degrees and I'm 300
Nigga, keep your feet runnin' (Hot, hot)
I chief-keef-keef when I eat these beats, bet a boy get scurred
Don't run up in my lane, I don't want you in my lane
You a lame, get swerved (Ooh, ooh)


'Cause great scenes might be great
But I love your bloopers
And perfect's for the urgent
Baby, I want forever
And Caroline, don't you see that
I want you to be my

Bad thang, bad, bad, bad, bad thang, thang, thang, thang, thang
Bad thang, thang, bad, bad, bad, b-b-bad, thang, thang
Bad thang, thang, thang, bad, b-bad, bad thang, thang, thang
Bad thang, thang, bad, bad, bad, b-b-bad",2436402
79553,1841298,How Genius Works,misc,Genius,2016,1331958,{},"Genius is the ultimate source of music knowledge, created by scholars like you from around the world, who share facts and insight about the songs and artists they love. How can you get involved?

-> SIGN UP FOR A GENIUS ACCOUNT
You'll get your own profile page and the ability to follow other scholars and artists. Once you have an account, you can start adding knowledge and earning Genius IQ. If you're interested in adding knowledge with any of our international communities, you can do that, too! -> More info on international communitiesIQ is what we call the points you earn by adding knowledge. Every scholar has a total IQ number next to their name that represents how knowledgeable they are. -> More info on IQAnnotate Lyrics: Highlight any line in a song to start an annotation. Explain what a complicated lyric means, or add other interesting context. -> More on annotationsWrite Artist, Song & Album Bios: Write a few paragraphs that tell the story of an artist's career, or break down the key details of a specific song or album. -> More on biosAnnotate Cover Artwork: Click through artwork found on any album page to start a cover art annotation -> More on annotating cover artAdd Song Facts: Do you know who produced a song? What sample it uses? Where it was recorded? Add all the interesting data. -> More on song factsTranscribe Lyrics: Any scholar can add a song page. Post new lyrics when a song drops, add old songs we're missing, or correct lyrics. -> More on transcriptionMake A Suggestion or Propose An Edit: Could an annotation or bio be improved? Tell us what's missing and it could get integrated. -> More on suggestions & editsAsk or Answer A Question With Q&A: Anyone can ask the Genius community a question. Want to know where a song peaked on the charts? Ask away! Know the answer and want to tell us? Let us (and the world) know. -> More on Q&AEverything on Genius is collaborative. Here's how we work together and communicate.Annotations & Edits Are Reviewed: Anyone can add knowledge, but editors determine what becomes the official ""Genius Annotation."" -> More on editorial reviewArtists Add Knowledge Too: Creators who are ""Verified"" can write annotations, confirm lyrics, and co-sign good annotations from scholars. -> More on Verified ArtistsUpvotes & Pyongs: See something good on the site? Your cosign can have a real effect on the best knowledge rising to the top. -> More on upvotes & pyongsFollow People In The Newsfeed: See what other scholars are doing on the site, and get alerts when your favorite artists write annotations. ->More on the newsfeedEditors & Other Advanced Roles: Dedicated scholars who make good contributions can get additional powers and responsibilities. -> More on editors & advanced rolesDirect Message Any User: Start a private conversation with anyone on Genius any time. -> More on messagesThe Forums: The Genius community loves talking about music and the details of our collaborative knowledge project. Get started now! -> More on the forumsInternational Communities: Genius is thriving all around the world in many languages. Connect with scholars in your home country. -> More on International CommunitiesCommunity Policy: Genius aspires to be a place where everyone feels welcome and safe. We take abuse and harassment seriously. -> Read our full Community PolicyBelow is a list of resources developed by the Genius Editorial Board to help educate everyone from budding contributors to seasoned veterans on editorial best practices. If you feel like we're missing something, send @streetlights a message.GuidesHow to Add Songs to GeniusHow to Annotate & Edit on GeniusHow to Edit Metadata on GeniusHow to Add Song Credits to GeniusFormatting and Markdown GuideCoaching: Best PracticesHow to Translate Songs on GeniusHow To Annotate Artwork On GeniusHow to Get Verified on GeniusCommonly asked questionsWhat Is Plagiarism and How To Avoid ItTate Talks™Annotating Songs That Have More Than One LanguageAnnotation Style GuideAvoiding The StretchContextualisingHow To Add First Hand Knowledge To An AnnotationHow Do You Annotate Pop Music?How To Annotate Problematic LyricsHow best to clean up a song page? Removing Red, Deleting Annotations, Integrating/Rejecting SuggestionsMaking Real ConnectionsMastering The Song BioMastering Linked CitationRefining LanguageResearch And InterpretationUpdating Old Annotations With New InformationWhen And How To Use Quotes In AnnotationsRemoving Filler From Your AnnotationsThe Public Significance of AnnotationsHow to Correctly Cite A Bible VerseAnnotating ArtworkWriting Blurbs",2437045
79571,1841524,Let Me Love You,pop,Ariana Grande,2016,1090086,"{""Lil Wayne""}","
I just broke up with my ex
Now I'm out here single, I don't really know what's next
But I ain't even trippin', I'ma chill and sit back
And I know they will be coming from the right
And the left, left, left
I just broke up with my ex and
You're the one I'm feeling as I'm laying on your chest
Good conversation got me holding my breath
And I don't normally say this but goddamn, you the best, best, best


And if it feels right, promise I don't mind
And if it feels right, promise I'll stay here all night


Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you

As I'm laying on your chest
I'll be out here thinkin' 'bout it, boy, it's just a guess
But something just keeps telling me I'm better than the rest
And I ain't tryna rush you, but goddamn, I'm a mess, mess, mess


And if it feels right, promise I don't mind
And if it feels right, promise I'll stay here all night


Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you


I say, ""Girl, you need a hot boy""
She say, ""You need to stop **** with them thots, boy""
I say ""You need a real ****,"" she say, ""Yes, Lord""
And what you need your ex for? I'm triple X, Lord
Okay, Ariana my lil mama, goodbye to the good girl
My ex tripping, it's no Biggie, I 2Pac shook her
I'm laid up with my new thing
She lay her head on my new chain
Then the mood change, then my name change
From Lil Wayne to ""Ooh, Wayne,"" oh Lord
She grinding on this Grande, oh Lord
I'm drowning, I'm gonna need that Coast Guard
And when it comes to that ****, I give her amnesia
She just looking for love, she says she single and I'm her feature
Oh, my God

(You're no good, boy, just let me love you, baby)
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
Tunechi, Mula baby
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
(Boy, just let me love you, yeah, yeah, ah)
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
She just looking for love (I'm looking for love)
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
She just looking for love, yeah (Yeah, I'm looking for love, baby)
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
She just looking for love, yeah (I'm looking for love, baby)
Just let me lo-o-o-o-o-o-o-love you, you
She just looking for love, yeah (Hey, yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's just looking for love (Mmm, yeah)


I'ma give her that love, yeah
He gon' gimme that love
She's just looking for love, oh
Boy, I'm looking for love, baby
I'ma give her that love
I'ma give her that
I'ma give her that",2437285
79791,1844713,Still Think About You,rap,A Boogie wit da Hoodie,2016,2138713,{},"
Now I'm saying, ""What's good with you?""
I remember being in the hood with you
I still think about you


Fuck all the phony shit
Fuck it, I'm stuck on some doly shit
Had a knife in my back when I wrote this shit
I look back and I laugh when I noticed it
I shoot up and lean back on some Kobe shit
They don't know how to pass on some Kobe shit
Should've listened, my mom always told me this
I was only 13 when she told me this
Watch who you fuck with
And never ever trust a nigga for nothing
Even if you feel like you really love her
Don't ever tell that bitch that you really love her
'Cause that's when she's gon' make you feel like you nothing
And that's when you gon' start to feel like you buggin'
I wish I would've never told you wassup
And I wish I never even told you pull up

Got me saying, ""What's good with you?""
I remember being in the hood with you
Everything was always understood with you
Girl I even bust a couple juugs with you
I still think about you
Girl I still think about you
Said you always gon' be there for me
Now you gone and you just disappeared on me
Can't believe I really thought you cared for me
You was s'posed to be the one that's here with me
I still think about you
Girl I still think about you


I hope that I never see you again
I don't wanna put up with it
I don't wanna fuck with it
I'ma just send you this letter whenever I'm done with it
I know you gon' read it
I called you a bitch at the end, I don't know if I mean it
I ain't wanna believe what my niggas was telling me
My nigga I shoulda cheated
And now I feel stupid
I shoulda knew better than this
Wasn't the right way to do it
I should've been choosing the money instead of a bitch
Fuck it cause I'm gettin' to it
Just watch how I do it
I knew I was ready for this
Bitch I'ma focus on music
You love how I do it
I knew I was ready for this

Got me saying, ""What's good with you?""
I remember being in the hood with you
Everything was always understood with you
Girl I even bust a couple juugs with you
I still think about you
Girl I still think about you
Said you always gon' be there for me
Now you gone and you just disappeared on me
Can't believe I really thought you cared for me
You was s'posed to be the one that's here with me
I still think about you
Girl I still think about you


But all I can say is you dumb ho, you got me feeling stupid
You got me singing all these love songs
What the fuck am I doing?
I don't know what I'm doing
But I'm going up though, I just hope I don't lose it
Bitches pickin' and choosin'
But I know what's up tho, I already been through it
We coulda been balling together
Hit up the mall, it's whatever
You know that I started from nothing
Them bitches was fed up
The way you made all of them jealous
You said that you was gon' ride forever and ever
You told me forever and ever
I shoulda known you was lyin'
I shoulda known better
You lied I should've knew better

But still I'm saying, ""What's good with you?""
I remember being in the hood with you
Everything was always understood with you
Girl I even bust a couple juugs with you
I still think about you
Girl I still think about you
Said you always gon' be there for me
Now you gone and you just disappeared on me
Can't believe I really thought you cared for me
You was s'posed to be the one that's here with me
I still think about you
Girl I still think about you


Now I'm saying, ""What's good with you?""
I remember being in the hood with you
Everything was always understood with you
Even bust a couple juugs with you
I still think a-
I still think ab-
I still think about you yeah
I still think about you, you, you, you
Had a knife in my back when I wrote this shit
I look back and I dab when I noticed it
I look back and I dab when I noticed it
I look back and I dab when I noticed it
I look back and I laughed when I noticed it
I still think about you, you, you, you
I still think about you, you, you, you
(Now I'm saying, ""What's good with you?"")
I still think about you
I look back and I dab when I noticed it",2441276
79801,1844909,Look At Me,rap,XXXTENTACION,2015,5988808,{},"
Ayy, I'm like, ""Bitch, who is your mans?"" (Ayy)
Can't keep my dick in my pants (Ayy)
My bitch don't love me no mo' (Ayy)
She kick me out, I'm like, ""Vro""


Damn, son, where'd you find this?
Yah, ayy
Yah, ayy, yah
Ayy, haha, yah, yah, yah
Ayy
Ayy, ayy, ayy


I'm like, ""Bitch, who is your mans?"" (Ayy)
Can't keep my dick in my pants (Ayy)
My bitch don't love me no mo' (Ayy)
She kick me out, I'm like, ""Vro"" (Ayy)
That bitch don't wanna be friends (Ayy)
I gave her dick, she amen (Ayy)
She put her tongue on my dick (Ayy)
Look at my wrist, about ten (Ayy)
Just got a pound of the boof (Ayy)
Brought that shit straight to the booth (Ayy)
Tommy my Hilfiger voots (Ayy)
She said, ""Wan' fuck?"" Bitch, I do (Ayy)
You put a gun on my mans (Ayy)
I put a hole in your parents (Ayy)
I just got lean on my Ksubis (Ayy)
I got a Uzi, no Uzi

Fuck on me, look at me, ayy
Fuck on me, yah, look at me, ayy
Look at me, look at me, yah
Fuck on me, yah, ayy
Look at me, yah, fuck on me
Look at me, fuck on me, yah
Look at me, fuck on me
Yah, ayy


Tell these fuck niggas, voot me up, pipe up
Ayy, shouts out Bans and them, ayy


I took a white bitch to Starbucks
That little bitch got her throat fucked
I like to rock out, I'm misfit
My emo bitch like her wrist slit
Curly hair bitch like I'm Corbin
Got like three bitches, I'm Mormon
Skeet on your main bitch's forehead
Don't want your pussy, just want head


Look at me, fuck on me
Look at me, fuck on me
Look at me, fuck on me
Look at me, yah, ayy!
Look at me, fuck on me
Look at me, fuck on me
Look at me, fuck on me
Look at me, yah!",2441478
79851,1845385,Come and See Me,rap,PARTYNEXTDOOR,2016,2406837,{Drake},"
Doesn't make sense now
Shit just got real, things are gettin' intense now
I hear you talkin' 'bout ""We"" a lot, oh, you speak French now?
Giving me the signs so I gotta take a hint now
I hit you up like ""Do you wanna hang right now?""
On the East Side and you know I'm with the gang right now
You say do I own a watch, do I know what time it is right now
It's after 2AM and that's askin' a lot of you right now


All she talkin' bout is, ""Come and see me for once
Come and see me for once
You don't ever come to me, you don't ever come to me""
All she ever say is, ""Come and see me for once
Come and see me for once
You don't ever come to me, you don't ever come to me""


I been up for two whole days thinkin' what I did to keep you goin'
Thumbin' through the voicemails that you left me tellin' me where I went wrong
I'll admit I'm sorry when I feel I'm truly sorry
Things change, people change, feelings change too
Never thought the circumstances woulda changed you
You said you never traded, no (Yeah, you said that)
And I believed you when they told me don't
(Yeah, I thought you meant that)
But either way you're still invited and I can't even lie to you

Swear these days all you say is, ""Come and see me for once
Come and see me for once
You don't ever come to me, you don't ever come to me""
All she hit me with is, ""Come and see me for once
Come and see me for once, oh
You don't ever come to me, you don't ever come to me""


Why you gotta start, girl, why you gotta start?
I know we make time for the things that we want
I know you got another nigga tryna play the part
Just 'cause he got a heart don't mean he got heart
Could be standin' in a field, and he still ain't in the field
If anything should change then I thought we had a deal
Lately you keep questionin' what you get out the deal
Doin' things to make me feel the way I make you feel
How hard is it to let you know when I'm comin' home?
That way you can be prepared
Maybe take a couple sick days and not miss pay
I don't even know what things are looking like inside of your place
Or how it's decorated
This thing is gettin' one-sided, I can't even lie to you right now
Yeah


All she talkin' bout is, ""Come and see me for once
Come and see me for once
You don't ever come to me, you don't ever come to me""
All she hit me with is, ""Come and see me for once
Come and see me for once
You don't ever come to me, you don't ever come to me""",2442052
79888,1845620,In the Name of Love,pop,Martin Garrix & Bebe Rexha,2016,1168209,{},"
If I told you this was only gonna hurt
If I warned you that the fire's gonna burn
Would you walk in? Would you let me do it first?
Do it all in the name of love
Would you let me lead you even when you're blind?
In the darkness, in the middle of the night
In the silence, when there's no one by your side
Would you call in the name of love?


In the name of love, name of love
In the name of love, name of love
In the name of


(In the name, name)
(In the name, name)


If I told you we could bathe in all the lights
Would you rise up, come and meet me in the sky?
Would you trust me when you're jumping from the heights?
Would you fall in the name of love?
When there's madness, when there's poison in your head
When the sadness leaves you broken in your bed
I will hold you in the depths of your despair
And it's all in the name of love

In the name of love, name of love
In the name of love, name of love
In the name of


(In the name, name)
(In the name, name)


I wanna testify
Scream in the holy light
You bring me back to life
And it's all in the name of love
I wanna testify
Scream in the holy light
You bring me back to life
And it's all in the name of love


In the name of love, name of love
In the name of love, name of love
In the name of


(In the name, name)
(In the name, name)
(In the name of)
(In the name, name)
(In the name of)",2442307
80050,1847842,Water,rap,Ugly God,2016,1038419,{},"


Hoodrich (Hoodrich)
Tr-Tr-Tr-Trust me Danny
Thanks, Ugly God (Thanks, Ugly God)


I drip on your bitch like water (Drip)
I splash on your bitch with the water (Splash)
I feel like I'm 21 Savage (Pew)
I pull up and fuck on your daughter (Pew pew)
I drip on your bitch like water (Drip)
I splash on your bitch with the water (Splash)
I feel like I'm 21 Savage (Pew)
I pull up and fuck on your daughter
Water (Yeah), water (Goddamn), water (Huh?), water (Okay), water (What?), water (Drip), water (Splash), water (Whoosh)
I drip on your bitch like water (Drip)
I splash on your bitch with the water (Splash)
Water, water, water, water

Water on my bitch, I keep her wet like my cellphone (Brr)
Bitches on me, dark skins and the redbones (Goddamn)
Ugly God wrap your bitch up like some headphones (I do)
You say I ain't shit, bitch I'm Ugly God I'm well known (The fuck?)
I ain't got time for no wife, yeah (Nah)
LMFAO, you kiss bitches, I pipe, yeah (Damn)
Bitch I feel like Yachty, just give me one night, yeah (For real)
And if she gay I tell her I'm a fucking dyke, yeah
Yeah bitch I'm a dyke (I am)
Strapped up like a dyke (Strapped)
Man made like a dike (For real)
Boosie faded like a dyke (Damn)
Niggas tryna join the wave (Huh)
Pussy nigga, take a hike (Get goin')
Your bitch my slave (She is)
Bitch, I'm balling like Mike (Swish)
Bitch, I'm balling like Mike


I drip on your bitch like water (Drip)
I splash on your bitch with the water (Splash)
I feel like I'm 21 Savage (Pew)
I pull up and fuck on your daughter (Pew pew)
I drip on your bitch like water (Drip)
I splash on your bitch with the water (Splash)
I feel like I'm 21 Savage (Pew)
I pull up and fuck on your daughter
Water (Yeah), water (Goddamn), water (Huh), water (Okay), water (What), water (Drip), water (Splash), water (Whoosh)
I drip on your bitch like water (Drip)
I splash on your bitch with the water (Splash)
Water, water, water, water

Thanks, Ugly God
(Thanks Ugly God, thanks, Ugly God, thanks, Ugly God)",2444781
80379,1851383,Faithful,rap,Drake,2016,1185674,"{""Pimp C"",​dvsn}","
Check, one-two, one-two, bitch
You expensive, you know that?
I'm high maintenance a little bit but not in a
Not in a negative way
I just like extremely expensive things


Foot off in their ass is what Ken told me
Niggas like to play games
'Cause they feel like they know me (they know me)
You don't know me, nigga, I done changed (I done changed)
So don't be trying to be putting on shit off in the game (Game)
This ain't no motherfucking 91
We out here rapping for money, you niggas rapping for fun
I don't fuck with nobody in this shit but Bun
(In this shit but Bun)


You would think it's all mine the way I took it (Yeah)
You would think it broke down the way I push it (Yeah)
You hate it when I coat things all in sugar
You want to hear the real talk, well, girl, who wouldn't? (Yeah)

Working, working, working, working, ain't ya?
You don't have no time to lay up
You just tryna be somebody
'Fore you say you need somebody
Get all your affairs in order
I won't have affairs, I'm yours, girl
Faithful, faithful, faithful, faithful


You hit me like ""I know you're there with someone else"" (Yeah)
That pussy knows me better than I know myself
On my way from the studio, so get undressed
Let's do the things that we say on text (Yeah)
I want to get straight to the climax (Straight, straight to the)
Yeah, have you coming all summer like a season pass (Yeah)
I want to turn you out like pitch black
Want to watch you do work while I sit back (Yeah)
'Cause you talk like you got what I need (Yeah)
You talk like you got the juice and the squeeze (Yeah)
Talk like you bet it all on me (Yeah)
And you can't take no Ls off me
I know you been


Working, working, working, working, ain't ya?
You don't have no time to lay up
You just tryna be somebody
'Fore you say you need somebody
Get all your affairs in order
I won't have affairs, I'm yours, girl
Faithful, faithful, faithful, faithful

How far we go always seems to get better with time, hey
Won't ya, outsmart me, no
Told me that your brain works better than mine
Tell me I should know ya (I'll get to know you again)
You want me to show ya (I'm gonna show you again)
Now we're in the zone, yeah (Gon' let me all in again, ooh)
And now you're coming over
(Over and over and over and over and over again)
Over and over again, over and over again
Now you're coming over
Over and over again, over and over again
You tell me I should know ya (But I'll get to know you again)
And you want me to show ya, uh (I'm gonna show you again)
When were in the zone you (Gon' let me own it again)
And now you're coming over
(Over and over and over and over and over again)
Now you're coming over, you're coming over",2448795
80422,1851846,​pick up the phone,rap,Young Thug & Travis Scott,2016,1979230,{Quavo},"
Yeah
Oh, yeah, uh
Ooh, Thugger, yeah
Yeah
Travis Scott
Thugger, Thugger, bitch
Yeah


I pour a four up (Ooh, ooh)
I call your ho up (Yeah)
Just to fuck her and show her (Just to fuck)
I just went got my dough up (I just went got my dough up)
Pullin' off and I'm gone (Skrrt-skrrt)
Then I go and pour four up (Then I go and pour four)
Then I roll up that roll-up (Roll up, roll up)
Then I'm callin' your ho up (Callin' your ho up)


(Like, ""Brrt"")
Pick up the phone, baby (Yeah, ooh, like, ""Brrt"")
I know you're home, baby (Ooh, it's lit)
I'm in the zone, baby (Zoned out, straight up)
I just poured up a four, baby (Pour it up, yeah, yeah)

Never will I cheat on you (Yeah)
Never will I commit treason
Blowin' a bag on you (Yeah)
Do all of that for no reason
I'ma pull up MR2 (Ooh, yeah)
Hittin' the block and I'm bleedin'
Throwing that Rollie on you (Yeah)
I like the way it be freezin', yeah


(Like, ""Brrt"")
Pick up the phone, baby (Ooh, like, ""Brrt"")
I know you're home, baby (Ooh, it's lit)
I'm in the zone, baby (Zoned out, straight up)
I just poured up a four, baby (Pour it up, yeah, yeah)


Pour up a four of that Actavis (Act')
Lean like my motherfuckin' granny did (Woo)
Super Bowl ring with big-body Benz (Hey)
I stacked it up, now I'm just better livin' (Cash)
Got screws in my mouth, I'm just preppin' it (Ha)
I'm fucking this cash, I'm not celibate (Ha)
I'm packin' it out like a reverend (Whoa)
I need all this cash, I got hella kids (Woo)
I'ma play dumb and get left in the middle (Yeah, yeah)
Back the fuck up, you too little (Whoa, whoa)
Hit 'em with three like I'm Miller (Yeah, yeah)
I don't talk to no man in the middle (Uh-uh)
I don't talk to no man, I'm just kiddin' (I swear)
But I did pay my sister's tuition (Woo)
I feel lucky, I should play the lottery (Yeah)
Walkin' off with it like Sonny Liston (Whoa)
Mama told me I'm her brightest star (Yeah)
Mama told me don't hate on the law (Ow)
Because everybody got a job (What?)
Because everybody wan' be a star (Real shit, real shit)
Please believe every motherfucker around here wan' be a part (Swear, swear, swear)
She gon' do anything in her power to be with ya boy

(Like, ""Brrt"")
Pick up the phone, baby (Ooh, like, ""Brrt"")
I know you're home, baby (Ooh, it's lit)
I'm in the zone, baby (Zoned out, straight up)
I just poured up a four, baby (Pour it up, yeah, yeah)


Never will l cheat on you
Never will I commit treason
Blowin' a bag on you
Do all of that for no reason
I'ma pull up MR2
Hittin' the block and I'm bleedin'
Throwin' that Rollie on you (Ayy, ayy)
I like the way you be freezin', yeah (Quavo)


Pick up the phone
Macaulay Culkin, baby, Home Alone (Home Alone)
I thought I was right
Then I had to man up, I was wrong (I was wrong)
I hate when we fight (Hey)
She in love with the pipe (Pipe)
I draped her up in ice, I pour my four on ice (Hey, ice, woo)
Birds in the trap sing Brian McKnight
Percocet and codeine, please don't take my life (My life)
She had a dream with Céline so I bought it twice (Céline)
Young nigga make it right back tonight
Girl, you're so cute and your ass is nice
Drinkin' on four and I'm shootin' dice
Wrist polar bear, Klondike (Brr)
And I'm loving all races (All races)
Hell nah, I don't discriminize (No)
Drinkin' on clean, sanitize (Drank)
Ostrich seats with the frog eyes (Skrrt)
If I ever call your phone, baby (Brrt)
Best believe it's only one time (Brrt)

(Like, ""Brrt"")
Pick up the phone, baby (Ooh, like, ""Brrt"")
I know you're home, baby (Ooh, it's lit)
I'm in the zone, baby (Zoned out, straight up)
I just poured up a four, baby (Pour it up, yeah, yeah)


Never will l cheat on you
Never will I commit treason
Blowin' a bag on you
Do all of that for no reason
I'ma pull up MR2
Hittin' the block and I'm bleedin'
Throwin' that Rollie on you
I like the way you be freezin', yeah


(Like, ""Brrt"")
Pick up the phone, baby (Like, ""Brrt"")
(Like, ""Brrt"")
I'm in the zone, baby
Pick up the phone, baby (Like, ""Brrt"")
(Like, ""Brrt"")
I'm in the zone, baby",2449376
80473,1852475,Lost on You,pop,LP,2015,1209542,{},"
When you get older, plainer, saner
Will you remember all the danger
We came from?
Burnin' like embers, falling tender
Long before the days of no surrender years ago
And well you know?


So smoke 'em if you got 'em
'cause it's going down
All I ever wanted was you
I'll never get to heaven
'cause I don't know how


Let's raise a glass or two
To all the things I've lost on you, oh-oh
Tell me are they lost on you? Oh-oh
Just that you could cut me loose, oh-oh
After everything I've lost on you
Is that lost on you?
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh, oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Is that lost on you?
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh, oh-oh
Baby, is that lost on you?
Is that lost on you?

Wish that I could see the machinations
Understand the toil of expectations in your mind
Hold me like you never lost your patience
Tell me that you love me more than hate me
All the time
And you're still mine


So smoke 'em if you got 'em
'cause it's going down
All I ever wanted was you
Let's take a drink of heaven
This can turn around


Let's raise a glass or two
To all the things I've lost on you, oh-oh
Tell me are they lost on you? Oh-oh
Just that you could cut me loose, oh-oh
After everything I've lost on you
Is that lost on you?
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh, oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Is that lost on you?
Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh, oh, oh-oh
Baby, is that lost on you?
Is that lost on you?

Lost on you
Lost on you


Let's raise a glass or two
To all the things I've lost on you, oh-oh
Tell me are they lost on you? Oh-oh
Just that you could cut me loose, oh-oh
After everything I've lost on you
Is that lost on you?
Is that lost on you?",2450071
80525,1852924,One Dance,pop,Drake,2016,5994025,"{Wizkid,Kyla}","
Baby, I like your style


Grips on your waist, front way, back way
You know that I don't play
Streets not safe but I never run away
Even when I'm away
Oti, oti
There's never much love when we go OT
I pray to make it back in one piece
I pray, I pray


That's why I need a one dance
Got a Hennessy in my hand
One more time 'fore I go
Higher powers taking a hold on me
I need a one dance
Got a Hennessy in my hand
One more time 'fore I go
Higher powers taking a hold on me

Baby, I like your style


Strength and guidance
All that I'm wishing for my friends
Nobody makes it from my ends
I had to bust up the silence
You know you gotta stick by me
Soon as you see the text, reply me
I don't wanna spend time fighting
We've got no time, and that's why


I need a one dance
Got a Hennessy in my hand
One more time 'fore I go
Higher powers taking a hold on me
I need a one dance
Got a Hennessy in my hand
One more time 'fore I go
Higher powers taking a hold on me


Got a pretty girl and she love me long time
Wine it, wine it, she love me long time
Oh, yeah, very long time
Back up, back up, back up, and wine am
Back up, back up, and wine am, girl, just
Back up, back up, back up, and wine am
Oh, yeah, very long time
Back, up, back up and wine am, girl

Oh, tell me, I need to know
Where do you wanna go?
'Cause if you're down, I'll take it slow
Make you lose control


Where, where, where
Where, where, where, where (Oh, yeah, very long time)
Where, where, where (Back up, back up, and wine am, girl)
Where, where, where, where
'Cause if you're down (Back up, back up, and-)
'Cause if you're down (Back up, back up, and-)
'Cause if you're down (Back up, back up, and-)


I need a one dance (Where, where, where)
Got a Hennessy in my hand (Where, where, where, where)
One more time 'fore I go (Where)
Higher powers taking a hold on me (Where, where, where, where)
I need a one dance
Got a Hennessy in my hand
One more time 'fore I go
Higher powers taking a hold on me


How do you spell ""Hennessy?""
I put two ""N""s and two ""S""es, is it like that? Hen... Henn... Henn...
It's definitely not showing up
I know ""Hennessy"" has two ""S""es for sure, so I'm gonna take out one of the ""N""s",2450584
80613,1853698,Broccoli,rap,Shelley FKA DRAM,2016,2660782,"{""Lil Yachty""}","
Ain't no tellin' what I'm finna be on, ayy, ayy
I'm beyond all that fuck shit, hey


Hey, lil' mama, would you like to be my sunshine?
Nigga, touch my gang, we gon' turn this shit to Columbine
Ice on my neck, cost me ten times three
Thirty thousand dollars for a nigga to get flee
I just hit Rodéo and I spent like ten Gs
I just did a show and spent the check on my mama
When I go on vacay I might rent out the Bahamas
And I keep like ten phones, damn, I'm really never home
All these niggas clones, tryna copy what I'm on (what I'm on)
Nigga, get your own, tryna pick a nigga bone
Word to brother, Skip, boy, I had a good day
Metro PCS, trappin', boy, I'm makin' plays
Fifty Shades of Grey, beat that pussy like Hulk Hogan
I know you know my slogan, if it ain't 'bout guap, I'm gone
Niggas hatin' 'cause I'm chosen from the concrete, I had rose
Shawty starin' at my necklace 'cause my diamonds really froze
Put that dick up in her pussy, bet she feel it in her toes
I'm a real young nigga from the six throwin' 'bows
I'm a real young nigga from the six throwin' 'bows
Real young nigga from the six throwin' 'bows

In the middle of the party, bitch, get off me (goddamn)
In the cut, I'm rollin' up my broccoli (goddamn)
Yeh, I know your baby mama fond of me (goddamn)
All she want to do is smoke that broccoli (goddamn)
Whispered in my ear, she tryna leave with me (goddamn)
Tell her I can get that pussy easily (goddamn)
Tell her I can hit that shit so greasily (goddamn)
I'm a dirty dog, I did it sleazily (damn)


Ain't no tellin' what I'm finna be on, ayy, ayy
I'm beyond all that fuck shit, ayy
Ain't no tellin' what I'm finna, hey I'm beyond, ayy, ayy
Said I'm beyond all that fuck shit, ayy


I got companies and Pesos
I got people on my payroll
She don't do it 'less I say so
I don't smoke if it ain't fuego
I should sauce 'em up like Prego
Fettucini with Alfredo
All I wanted was the fame and every game they made on Sega
I was five or six years old when I had told myself, ""Okay you're special""
But I treat you like my equal never lesser
I was twenty-six years old when we had dropped this one amazing record
Had the world steppin'
That's what I call epic
Couple summers later I got paper
I acquired taste for salmon on a bagel
With the capers on a square plate
At the restaurant with the ""why you got to stare"" face
To know I either ball or I record over the snare and bass
Rapper face, dread headed
Golden diamond teeth wearin'
They just mad 'cause I got that cheese, bitch, I keep dairy
Turnt up in the party, gettin' lit to Yachty
With a Spanish Barbie, word to my mami

In the middle of the party, bitch, get off me (off me)
In the cut, I'm rollin' up my broccoli
(my weed, my weed)
Yeah, I know your baby mama fond of me (she fond of me)
All she want to do is smoke that broccoli
(the weed, the weed)
Whispered in my ear she trying to leave with me
(she runnin' for)
Said that I can get that pussy easily
(she fallin' for)
Said I can hit that shit so greasily (oh yeah, oh yeah)
I'm a dirty dog, I did it sleazily (yeah)",2451433
80766,1855292,Jungle,rap,A Boogie wit da Hoodie,2016,1299395,{},"
You gotta D Stackz beat
Nigga, this is what that jungle do
You been plottin', nigga, wasn't you?
I should've never even fucked wit' you


Yeah, I started in the back, had to skip the line though
I'ma keep that shit a stack 'til my fucking time go
Niggas throw you in the shade 'cause they wanna shine though
Nigga throw me in the grave in a Ferragamo
Man I can't believe they killed my fucking bro Quado
Shit was so deep I had to say that with my eyes closed
That shit made me wanna treat a nigga like he John Doe
Nine on me, Rondo, now that nigga John Doe, ha


This is all I ever wanted, nigga
Why would I let you take it from me, nigga?
I ain't stupid, ain't no dummy nigga
A couple fingers on a couple triggers
Fuck with you, why would I fuck with you?
You been plottin', nigga wasn't you?
I should have been watching from the jump with you
Fuck it, this is what that jungle do

Started, what I started
Anybody want a problem, this is my shit
Tell 'em if they want a problem I'm from Highbridge
Got a nigga with a shotgun up in my whip
Making bitches go retarded with this hard dick
Why you think my name is Artist? I'm an artist
I woke up to a ménage, I'm just being honest
I get money, if I want it, I'ma cop it
If a nigga want static, let him have it
Have you ever seen a mini semi-automatic?
It go dumb like a drum, hear the beat blastin'
When it come to that fire, I'm a fucking dragon, ha


Nigga, this is what that jungle do
Nigga, this is what that jungle do
You been plottin', nigga, wasn't you?
I shoulda never even fuck wit' you


I was walking in the rain with my Timbs on
Steppin' over puddles full of pain, it's a big storm
13 on my Balmains, it's a big storm
In the club love to make it rain
Like what nigga, we don't fuck witcha
Know I'm all about my bucks nigga, I don't trust niggas
Ever since I was a young nigga coming up nigga
Ain't nobody show me love nigga, so it's fuck niggas, it's just us, nigga

Nigga this is what that jungle do
Nigga this is what that jungle do
That jungle turned me into a monster
That jungle made me go harder
That jungle turned me to a monster
That jungle made me go harder
That jungle turned me to a monster
That jungle made me go harder
That jungle turned me to a monster
That jungle made me go harder


The jungle turned me to a monster
The jungle made me go harder
Jungle turned me to a monster
Nigga this is what that jungle do
Nigga this is what the jungle do
Been plottin' nigga, wasn't you?
Should have never even fucked with you",2453486
80952,1857470,DA,rap,PNL,2016,1266247,{},"


Ma frappe, y a personne qui l'arrête
Penalty, j'souris au gardien
Igo, y a Mowgli dans l'arène
Ciseaux, retournée comme Papin
J'parle pas trop, j'me fous du rap
J'négocie l'tarot, man
Tes rappeurs, c'est tous des tapins
Ils s'passent tous, tous la pommade
Toute ma vie, j'l'ai ramée dans les ténèbres
J'me réveille, j'ai cette haine qui me pénètre
Peu d'mandats, mais les 'tasses m'envoient des lettres
Mowgli n'aime pas qu'on lui dise ""T'es célèbre""
Chaque jour, c'est la même, c'est le biff qui m'fait frissonner
N'aie pas honte de leur mettre ces pédés, moi j'leur pisse au nez
Né dans la jungle, j'suis sauvage un gros oinj' pour m'isoler
Les grosses 'tasses qui déboulent sous mon arbre, moi j'les prends en le-le
J'tacle à la gorge comme en BPL wAllah pum-pum
Dis à ton pote, dans la street c'est la mort ou la bibi
Choisis ton camp mais belek au cas où ça ti-tire
Joue pas l'thug, avec ta meuf, on sait tu fais l'Titi
J'suis d'l'époque d'la Sega j'm'entraîne à frapper comme Sagat
Rico Rico, j'débarque brr brr ratatata
Fais gaffe fais gaffe au hebs c'est pa-pata-ta-ta
J'connais le million mais j'chante toujours pas, la-la-la-la
Entre nous, trop cramé, ils m'aiment pas, font semblant
C'est chelou, j'suis armé, cœur de pierre, abonné
J'suis Mowgli, j'suis Simba, animal, ça s'entend
Hum, hum, dans leurs mères, tu connais

DA, DA, DA
Bats les couilles pour eux j'suis nda, da, da
Bats les couilles qu'ces pédés m'aiment pas, pas, pas
Au fait moi j'ai les couilles de papa, pa, pa
Mon Dieu, faut qu'j'me dirige vers la Mecque
Mais bon, j'suis d'la pire espèce
Avant j'étais moche dans la tess
Aujourd'hui, j'plais à Eva Mendes
Gars, gars, gars, gars
J'ai mal, j'vois mes semblables en bas, bas, bas
Faire rampampampam


Hé la, holà ! Tes lèvres ne me font plus penser
Hé la, holà ! Mes rêves ne me font plus bander
J'ai sorti une arme dans l'respect
La patience, le temps, pas testé
Gratte pas l'amitié pas d'nouveaux amis
Pas l'amitié pas d'nouveaux amis
On enverra Mowgli chercher médaille
J'redoute plus la visite de la flicaille
Tout est possible, j'fais oseille tout devient réel
Elle aime les voyous, jeune sheitana cherche mec mortel
Puta, épluche mon cœur
Ton putain de futur au bout d'une chaîne
Ne m'attends pas, -tends pas, ou gâche ta vie dans mes bras
Petit ange, qu'elle est séduisante la couronne à Simba !

DA, DA, DA
Bats les couilles pour eux j'suis nda, da, da
Bats les couilles qu'ces pédés m'aiment pas, pas, pas
Au fait moi j'ai les couilles de papa, pa, pa
Mon Dieu, faut qu'j'me dirige vers la Mecque
Mais bon, j'suis d'la pire espèce
Avant j'étais moche dans la tess
Aujourd'hui, j'plais à Eva Mendes
Gars, gars, gars, gars
J'ai mal, j'vois mes semblables en bas, bas, bas
Faire rampampampam",2456383
80997,1857857,You Was Right,rap,Lil Uzi Vert,2016,1159717,{},"
Hit it from the back, watch a nigga bless you (Bless you)
(If Young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you)
Cryin' in my arms like a nigga wrecked you (Wrecked you)
(Metro Boomin' want some more, nigga)


Yeah, alright, alright, alright
You was right (Right), I was wrong (Right)
Yeah, I should've never ever took her home (No)
Yeah, I should've just boned (What?)
Yeah, fantasy on my phone (Yeah)
Yeah, hit it from the back, watch a nigga bless you (Ayy)
Yeah, cryin' in my arms like a nigga wrecked you (Ayy)
Talkin' 'bout a broken heart, runnin' to the restroom, yeah (What?)


Yeah, looked at my mama just like, we rich (Yeah)
Looked at my bitch like, we rich
Said, we ain't got no minor setbacks (No)
Countin' all that money, told that nigga just to bet that
I, I know that you ain't got it, boy, why you ain't just say that? (Yeah)
They see I got that money, now his bitch like, ""I said that"" (Yeah)
I don't pay that ho no mind, I've been had that
When I, when I saw my girl, yeah, you know I had to bag that (Yeah)
And before me, four niggas, yeah, they had that
Five niggas includin' me, I had to back back
Try to diss me, I'll take it to your family (Yeah)
I'll fuck your sister, then make sure that she vanish, yeah

Yeah, alright, alright, alright
You was right (Right), I was wrong (Right)
Yeah, I should've never ever took her home (No)
Yeah, I should've just boned (What?)
Yeah, fantasy on my phone (Yeah)
Yeah, hit it from the back, watch a nigga bless you (Ayy)
Yeah, cryin' in my arms like a nigga wrecked you (Ayy)
Talkin' 'bout a broken heart, runnin' to the restroom, yeah (What?)
Yeah, alright, alright, alright
You was right (Right), I was wrong (Right)
Yeah, I should've never ever took her home (No)
Yeah, I should've just boned (What?)
Yeah, fantasy on my phone (Yeah)
Yeah, hit it from the back, watch a nigga bless you (Ayy)
Yeah, cryin' in my arms like a nigga wrecked you (Ayy)
Talkin' 'bout a broken heart, runnin' to the restroom, yeah (What?)


Even though we in the same room (Shh)
You just locked the door, so I gotta text you (Yeah, yeah)
Like, bae, unlock the door, I gotta use the restroom
Like, I don't want a war, I wanna caress you, yeah (Yeah)


Yeah, alright, alright, alright
You was right (Right), I was wrong (Right)
Yeah, I should've never ever took her home (No)
Yeah, I should've just boned (What?)
Yeah, fantasy on my phone (Yeah)
Yeah, hit it from the back, watch a nigga bless you (Ayy)
Yeah, cryin' in my arms like a nigga wrecked you (Ayy)
Talkin' 'bout a broken heart, runnin' to the restroom, yeah",2456795
81018,1858233,Pray You Catch Me,rb,Beyonc,2016,1265648,{Beyoncé},"
You can taste the dishonesty
It's all over your breath as you pass it off so cavalier
But even that's a test
Constantly aware of it all
My lonely ear pressed against the walls of your world


Pray to catch you whispering
I pray you catch me listening
I'm prayin' to catch you whispering
I pray you catch me
I'm prayin' to catch you whispering
I pray you catch me listening
I pray you catch me


Nothing else ever seems to hurt like the smile on your face
When it's only in my memory, it don't hit me quite the same
Maybe it's a cause for concern, but I'm not at ease
Keeping my head to the curb

Pray to catch you whispering
I pray you catch me listening
I pray to catch you whispering (Whisper, whisper)
I pray you catch me (Whisper, whisper)
I pray you catch me
I pray you catch me (Pray you)
I'm praying you catch me


What are you doing, my love?",2457299
81031,1858401,Side To Side,pop,Ariana Grande,2016,2907737,"{""Nicki Minaj""}","
I've been here all night (Ariana)
I've been here all day (Nicki Minaj)
And boy,  got me walkin' side to side (Let them hoes know)


I'm talkin' to ya
See you standing over there with your body
Feeling like I wanna rock with your body
And we don't gotta think 'bout nothin' ('Bout nothin')
I'm comin' at ya
'Cause I know you got a bad reputation
Doesn't matter, 'cause you give me temptation
And we don't gotta think 'bout nothin' ('Bout nothin')


These friends keep talkin' way too much
Say I should give you up
Can't hear them, no, 'cause I...


I've been here all night
I've been here all day
And boy,  got me walkin' side to side
I've been here all night
I've been here all day
And boy, got me walkin' side to side (Side to side)

Been tryna hide it
Baby, what's it gonna hurt if they don't know?
Makin' everybody think that we solo
Just as long as you know you got me (You got me)
And boy, I got ya
'Cause tonight I'm making deals with the devil
And I know it's gonna get me in trouble
Just as long as you know you got me


These friends keep talkin' way too much
Say I should give you up
Can't hear them, no, 'cause I...


I've been here all night
I've been here all day
And boy,  got me walkin' side to side (Side to side)
I've been here all night (Been here all night, baby)
I've been here all day (Been here all day, baby)
And boy,  got me walkin' side to side (Side to side)


Uh, yo
This the new style with the fresh type of flow
Wrist icicle, ride dick bicycle
Come through yo, get you this type of blow
If you want a ménage, I got a tricycle

All these bitches' flows is my mini-me
Body smoking, so they call me Young Nicki Chimney
Rappers in they feelings 'cause they feelin' me (Murder)
Uh, I-I give zero fucks and I got zero chill in me
Kissing me, copped the blue box that say Tiffany
Curry with the shot, just tell 'em to call me Stephanie
Gun pop, then I make my gum pop
I'm the queen of rap, young Ariana run pop, uh


These friends keep talkin' way too much (Way too much)
Say I should give him up (Give him up)
Can't hear them, no, 'cause I...


I've been here all night (Been here all night, baby)
I've been here all day (Been here all night, baby)
And boy (Boy),  got me walkin' side to side (Side to side)
I've been here all night (Been here all night, baby)
I've been here all day (Been here all day, baby) (Ooh, baby)
And boy (No), got me walkin' side to side (Side to side)
(Yeah-eh, yeah, yeah, yeah)


Uh, yo
This the new style with the fresh type of flow (Nah, nah, baby)
Wrist icicle, ride dick bicycle
Come through yo, get you this type of blow
If you want a ménage, I got a tricycle (No, eh, hey, eh, eh)",2457495
81060,1858678,Swang,rap,Rae Sremmurd,2016,1393446,{},"
Mmm, boy, it's Nasty (Uh, um)
Know some young niggas like to swang (Yeah, um)
Know some young niggas like to swang
Know some young niggas like to swang (Ride, uh)


Know some young niggas like to swang (Swang)
Know some young niggas like to swang (Swang)
Big bank take lil' bank
Everyday, spillin' up drank (Drank)
She want the whole crew, shawty brave (Brave)
When the money talks, what is there to say? (Just say it)
Blow away, watch it blow away (Blow, blow)
When I die, can't take it to the grave (Yo)


Hop out, drop top, fuck y'all talkin', I need it right now (Hey)
Cash in the air, yeah, what goes up, gotta come down (Woo)


Gettin' dough, ain't a thing change (Nothin' change)
Coastin', grippin' grain (Grip)
Goin' through the money like a phase (Like a phase)
Don't say my name in vain (Woo, woo)
I'm so glad that you came (Yeah)
All these bad bitches gettin' slain (Slain)
Broke-ass nigga, get a clue (Clue)
All these niggas know how we do (Let's go)

Know some young niggas like to swang (Swang, swang)
Know some young niggas like to swang (Swang, swang)
Big bank take little bank
Everyday, spillin' up drank (Up drank)
She want the whole crew, shawty brave (Shawty brave)
When the money talks, what is there to say? (What is there to say?)
Blow away, watch it blow away (Watch it blow away)
When I die, can't take it to the grave (Watch it blow away, watch it blow away, blow away)


Hop out, drop top, fuck y'all talkin', I need it right now
Cash in the air, yeah, what goes up, gotta come down (Ayy, ayy)


I know some young niggas from the bottom
They'll do anything for a dollar (Dollar)
I could have went to school to be a doctor (Doctor)
But I dropped out and chose to be a baller (Woo)
Switchin' lanes, spittin' game in my new drop (Drop)
Still on a paper chase that don't ever stop (Never)
Everybody with me family, that's how we rock (Rock, rock)
Party at the mansion, we 'bout to flood the spot, SremmLife


Know some young niggas like to swang (Swang, swang)
Know some young niggas like to swang (Swang, swang)
Big bank take lil' bank
Everyday, spillin' up drank (Up drank)
She want the whole crew, shawty brave (Shawty brave)
When the money talks, what is there to say? (What is there to say)
Blow away, watch it blow away (Watch it blow away)
When I die, can't take it to the grave (Watch it blow away, watch it blow away, blow away)",2457826
81127,1859609,Closer,pop,The Chainsmokers,2016,6721409,{Halsey},"
Hey, I was doing just fine before I met you
I drink too much
And that's an issue, but I'm okay
Hey, you tell your friends
It was nice to meet them
But I hope I never see them again


I know it breaks your heart
Moved to the city in a broke-down car
And four years, no calls
Now you're lookin' pretty in a hotel bar
And I-I-I can't stop
No, I-I-I can't stop


So, baby, pull me closer
In the backseat of your Rover
That I know you can't afford
Bite that tattoo on your shoulder
Pull the sheets right off the corner
Of the mattress that you stole
From your roommate back in Boulder
We ain't ever getting older

We ain't ever getting older
We ain't ever getting older


You look as good as the day I met you
I forget just why I left you, I was insane
Stay and play that blink-182 song
That we beat to death in Tucson, okay


I know it breaks your heart
Moved to the city in a broke-down car
And four years, no call
Now I'm lookin' pretty in a hotel bar
And I-I-I can't stop
No, I-I-I can't stop


So, baby, pull me closer
In the backseat of your Rover
That I know you can't afford
Bite that tattoo on your shoulder
Pull the sheets right off the corner
Of the mattress that you stole
From your roommate back in Boulder
We ain't ever getting older

We ain't ever getting older
We ain't ever getting older


So, baby, pull me closer
In the backseat of your Rover
That I know you can't afford
Bite that tattoo on your shoulder
Pull the sheets right off the corner
Of the mattress that you stole
From your roommate back in Boulder
We ain't ever getting older


We ain't ever getting older
(No, we ain't ever getting older)
We ain't ever getting older
(No, we ain't ever getting older)
We ain't ever getting older
(We ain't ever getting older)
We ain't ever getting older
(No, we ain't ever getting older)
(We ain't ever getting older)
(No, we ain't ever getting older)",2458848
81247,1860798,PRBLMS,rb,6LACK,2016,2190419,{},"
Yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah
Alright


And she said... ""You a goddamn lie""
I ain't mean to say that shit, girl, I was goddamn high
So we left the crib now we in the goddamn ride
She lookin' goddamn fine
I wanted a bitch who was down to Earth
But she want the goddamn sky, uh
List of my problems
Got this one on my line that won't stop fucking callin'
It's crazy I made her that way
Every time I see her out, I see the hate in her face
Like why you do that?
Tell her you love her when next week you just want your space
Why you do, why you do that?
Tell her you want her but next week you do your own thing
Why you do, why you do that?
I can't explain it but just know it working for me
She text me ""I hate you, I hate you, I hate you, I hate you""
But how the fuck can you hate me?
When I ain't did shit, but be the real thang
She know I'm the real, that'll never change
I never been the one to try to explain
While you catch them feels I'ma sip on this drank, it's easing my brain

I got real shit to stress about, girl, I ain't worried 'bout shit
('Bout shit)
Remember that I tried to build ya, now I ain't worried 'bout shit
I got real shit to stress about, girl, I ain't worried 'bout shit
('Bout shit)
Remember that I tried to build ya, now I ain't worried 'bout shit
So I found me a new thang, I'm not as lost as you think
Got plenty queens in my hometown, all they need is drank and that dank
So I found me a new thang, I'm not as lost as you think
Got plenty queens in my hometown, all they need is drank and that dank


Now I'm like
It's a goddamn shame
We done crashed, we done burned
But baby you the goddamn blame
See I wanted love but you wanted goddamn fame
Every goddamn thang
I wanted a bitch who was on the move
But you want to goddamn lay
Uh, list of my problems
Got this one in my bed and she just wants to sleep
Fucking up all of the sheets
She only wake up to eat
Do this shit every week
Like, why you do that?
Crying you want to be great, but sleepin' until the next day
Why you do that?
Don't got that much in the bank, we go out she order the steak
Why you do, why you do that?
She can't explain it but just know it working for her
She claiming she down on her luck but really she don't give a fuck
And I cannot make this shit up
And I ain't did shit but be the real thang
She know I'm the real, that'll never change
I won't be the one to try to explain
While you catch them feels, I'ma sip on this drank, it's easing the pain

I got real shit to stress about, girl, I ain't worried 'bout shit
('Bout shit)
Remember that I tried to build ya, now I ain't worried 'bout shit
I got real shit to stress about, girl, I ain't worried 'bout shit
('Bout shit)
Remember that I tried to build ya, now I ain't worried 'bout shit
So I found me a new thang, I'm not as lost as you think
Got plenty queens in my hometown, all they need is drank and that dank
So I found me a new thang, I'm not as lost as you think
Got plenty queens in my hometown, all they need is drank and that dank",2460194
81278,1861059,I spoke to the devil in miami he said everything would be fine,rap,XXXTENTACION,2016,1850231,{},"
It will all be over soon


And I'm always where the sun don't shine, the
Tears don't show, won't hurt me now 'cause
Heart's been broke, I hate myself, but
It won't show, I constantly lose all
My remorse, and it's ten for the wolf and
Three for the shepherd, and it's one for the sheep who
Led by your leopard, often gave his perception as a
Handle of weapon, took a bite of your apple, give me
All you can offer, now I'm trapped in a changing maze
Setting my soul ablaze, couldn't control the pace
Where is this going, hey? Heartless is recklessness, it's
Word of a pacifist to word of a masochist, I'm
Off of the map, My Lord, I spoke to a Baphomet, he
Said he would save me if I gave him one thing he needed
""What is this thing?"", I pleaded; boy, it's the key to even, yeah


And as I spoke, my fangs were shown
Taken aback, he smiles and tells me
""What you crave will soon be yours
But what I crave is already mine""
Anima vestra
Anima
Anima vestra
Anima",2460482
81326,1861708,Sorry,pop,Beyonc,2016,1685508,{Beyoncé},"
Sorry, I ain't sorry
Sorry, I ain't sorry
I ain't sorry, nigga, nah
Sorry, I ain't sorry
Sorry, I ain't sorry
I ain't sorry


He trying to roll me up (I ain't sorry)
I ain't picking up (I ain't sorry)
Headed to the club (I ain't sorry)
I ain't thinking 'bout you (I ain't sorry)
Me and my ladies sip my D'USSÉ cups
I don't give a fuck, chucking my deuces up
Suck on my balls, pause, I had enough (Sorry, I ain't sorry)
I ain't thinking 'bout you
I ain't thinking 'bout


Middle fingers up, put them hands high
Wave it in his face, tell him, boy, bye (Sorry, I ain't sorry)
Tell him, boy, bye, boy, bye, middle fingers up
I ain't thinking 'bout you

Sorry, I ain't sorry (You)
Sorry, I ain't sorry (You)
I ain't sorry, nigga, nah
I ain't thinking 'bout you
Sorry, I ain't sorry
Sorry, I ain't sorry, I ain't sorry
No, no, hell nah


Now you wanna say you're sorry
Now you wanna call me crying
Now you gotta see me wilding
Now I'm the one that's lying
And I don't feel bad about it
It's exactly what you get
Stop interrupting my grinding
(You interrupting my grinding)
I ain't thinking 'bout you


Sorry, I ain't sorry
I ain't thinking 'bout you
I ain't thinking 'bout you
Sorry, I ain't sorry
I ain't thinking 'bout you
I ain't thinking 'bout you

Middle fingers up, put them hands high
Wave it in his face, tell him, boy, bye (Bye) (Sorry, I ain't sorry)
Tell him, boy, bye (Bye), boy, bye (Bye)
Middle fingers up, I ain't thinking 'bout you


Sorry, I ain't sorry
Sorry, I ain't sorry
I ain't sorry, nigga, nah
Sorry, I ain't sorry
Sorry, I ain't sorry
I ain't sorry
No, no, hell nah


Looking at my watch, he shoulda been home
Today, I regret the night I put that ring on
He always got them fucking excuses
I pray to the Lord you reveal what his truth is


I left a note in the hallway
By the time you read it, I'll be far away
I'm far away
But I ain't fucking with nobody
Let's have a toast to the good life
Suicide before you see this tear fall down my eyes
Me and my baby, we gon' be alright
We gon' live a good life
Big homie better grow up
Me and my whoadies 'bout to stroll up
I see them boppers in the corner
They sneaking out the back door
He only want me when I'm not there
He better call Becky with the good hair
He better call Becky with the good hair",2461226
81329,1861750,Hold Up,rb,Beyonc,2016,1850869,{Beyoncé},"
Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Slow down, they don't love you like I love you
Back up, they don't love you like I love you
Step down, they don't love you like I love you
Can't you see there's no other man above you?
What a wicked way to treat the girl that loves you
Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Oh, down, they don't love you like I love you


Something don't feel right because it ain't right
Especially comin' up after midnight
I smell your secrets, and I'm not too perfect
To ever feel this worthless
How did it come down to this? Scrolling through your call list
I don't wanna lose my pride, but I'ma fuck me up a bitch
Know that I kept it sexy, you know I kept it fun
There's something that I'm missing, maybe my head for one


What's worst, lookin' jealous or crazy? Jealous or crazy?
Or like being walked all over lately, walked all over lately
I'd rather be crazy

Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Slow down, they don't love you like I love you
Back up, they don't love you like I love you
Step down, they don't love you like I love you
Can't you see there's no other man above you?
What a wicked way to treat the girl that loves you
Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Slow down, they don't love you like I love you


Let's imagine for a moment that you never made a name for yourself
Or mastered wealth, they had you labeled as a king
Never made it out the cage, still out there movin' in them streets
Never had the baddest woman in the game up in your sheets
Would they be down to ride? No
They used to hide from you, lie to you
But y'all know we were made for each other
So I find you and hold you down
Me sing se


Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Slow down, they don't love you like I love you
Back up, they don't love you like I love you
Step down, they don't love you like I love you
Can't you see there's no other man above you?
What a wicked way to treat the girl that loves you
Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Slow down, they don't love you like I love you

Hey, this such a shame
You let this good love go to waste
I always keep the top tier, 5 star
Backseat lovin' in the car
Like make that wood, like make that wood
Holly like a boulevard


What's worse, lookin' jealous or crazy? Jealous and crazy?
Or like being walked all over lately, walked all over lately
I'd rather be crazy


Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Slow down, they don't love you like I love you
Back up, they don't love you like I love you
Step down, they don't love you like I love you
Can't you see there's no other man above you?
What a wicked way to treat the girl that loves you
Hold up, they don't love you like I love you
Oh, down, they don't love you like I love you


I hop up out my bed and get my swag on
I look in the mirror, say, ""What's up?""
What's up, what's up, what's up
I hop up out my bed and get my swag on
I look in the mirror, say, ""What's up?""
What's up, what's up, what's up",2461219
81337,1861765,All Night,rb,Beyonc,2016,1235711,{Beyoncé},"
I found the truth beneath your lies
And true love never has to hide
True love never has to hide
I'll trade your broken wings for mine
Trade your broken wings for mine
I've seen your scars and kissed your crime, oh
Seen your scars and kissed your crime


So many people that I know, they're just tryna touch ya
Kiss up and rub up and feel up
Kiss up and rub up and feel up on you
Give you some time to prove that I can trust you again
I'm gonna kiss up and rub up and feel up
Kiss up and rub up and feel up on you


All night long
Love all night long
Sweet love all night long
Sweet love all night long
All I wanna, ain't no other
We together, I remember
Sweet love all night long

Our love was stronger than your pride
Beyond your darkness, I'm your light, oh
If you get deep, you touch my mind
If you get deep, you touch my mind
Baptize your tears and dry your eyes, oh
Baptize your tears and dry your eyes


So many people, I know that they're just tryna touch ya
Kiss up and rub up and feel up
Kiss up and rub up and feel up on you
Give you some time to prove that I can trust you again
I'm gonna kiss up and rub up and feel up
Kiss up and rub up and feel up on you


All night long
Love all night long
Sweet love all night long
Sweet love all night long
All I wanna, ain't no other
We together, I remember
Sweet love all night long


They say true love's the greatest weapon
To win the war caused by pain, pain
But every diamond has imperfections
But my love's too pure to watch it chip away
Boy, nothing real can be threatened
True love breathes salvation back into me
With every tear came redemption
And my torturer became my remedy

So many people, I know that they're just tryna touch ya
Kiss up and rub up and feel up
Kiss up and rub up and feel up on you
Give you some time to prove that I can trust you again
I'm gonna kiss up and rub up and feel up
Kiss up and rub up and feel up on you


All night long
Love all night long
Sweet love all night long
Sweet love all night long
All I wanna, ain't no other
We together, I remember
Sweet love all night long


How I missed you, my love",2461241
81466,1863739,Childs Play,rap,Drake,2016,2776608,{},"
Breaking news, my niggas
If your girlfriend has went to any
Season opener basketball game
Best believe, she's fucking some niggas on that team
She's fucking somebody on the basketball team
If she's at the game
Right, right, yeah


I say bounce that shit like woah
Yeah, bounce that shit like woah
This is not a fairytale, I already know how you like it
Take you to the mall and get you a new outfit
Girl, that's just some child's play
Bounce that shit like woah, woah, woah
Woah, woah, heard all of the stories about you
I already know and I like it
Take you to the mall and get you a new outfit
Girl, that's just some child's play
Bounce that shit like woah, yeah
Bounce that shit like woah

Why you gotta fight with me at Cheesecake?
You know I love to go there
Say I'm actin' lightskin, I can't take you nowhere
This a place for families that drive Camrys and go to Disney
They don't need to know all of our business
You wildin', you super childish, you go to CVS for Kotex
In my Bugatti, I took the key and tried to hide it
So you can't drive it, and put on mileage
Then you find it, awkward silence
Momma is a saint, yes, she raised me real good
All because of her I don't do you like I should
Don't make me give you back to the hood
Don't make me give you back


I say bounce that shit like woah
Yeah, bounce that shit like woah
This is not a fairytale, I already know how you like it
Take you to the mall and get you a new outfit
Girl that's just some child's play
Bounce that shit like woah, woah, woah
Woah, woah, heard all of the stories about you
I already know and I like it
Take you to the mall and get you a new outfit
Girl, that's just some child's play
Bounce that shit like woah, yeah
Bounce that shit like woah

Yeah, rode that dick like a soldier
She rode it like a soldier
She rode it like a jungle soldier
She rode it like a, yeah, yeah
I got it, yeah


You don't wanna fall in love, I know
I'm not someone you should trust, I know
I give Chanel out like a hug, I know
I knew a couple of your friends way before
How many girls have slept in this bed?
Say a different number than the one that's in my head
Lying to protect you, I be doing that a lot
My past checkered like the Louis you just got
Married in our twenties, now, where the fun in that?
My city love me like a college running back
Pack a bag, you gon' end up staying where I'm at
Took you from the hood and I could never give you back
I just wanna let you know that someone love you back
All the Cadillac like I'm Teddy Pendergrass
Whippin' on this shit, I'm getting ready, where you at?
Riding...


She rode that dick like a soldier
She rode it like a soldier
She rode it like a Melpomene soldier
She rode that dick like a soldier
She rode it like a soldier
She rode it like a jungle soldier
Rode that dick like a soldier
She rode it like a soldier
She rode it like a Melpomene soldier
Burrrrat stick it, b-burrrrat stick it
Burrrrat stick it, ba-ba-ba stick it
Burrrrat stick it, ba-ba-ba stick it
Burrrrat stick it, ba-ba-ba stick it
Burrrrat stick it, ba-ba-ba stick it
Burrrrat stick it, ba-ba-ba stick it

Thank you, thanks, Drake, thanks baby
Motherfuckers drunk and tired
Tired, I'm tired, boss

",2463387
81467,1863742,Keep the Family Close,rap,Drake,2016,1324358,{},"
It's a little chilly out there
How you can stand there is beyond me


All of my ""let's just be friends"" are friends I don't have anymore
How do you not check on me when things go wrong
Guess I should've tried to keep my family closer
Much closer
All of my ""let's just be friends"" are friends I don't have anymore
Guess that's what they say you need family for
Cause I can't depend on you anymore


Always saw you for what you could've been
Ever since you met me
Like when Chrysler made that one car
That looked just like the Bentley
I always saw you for what you could've been
And even when it's business with you it's personal again
I knew you before you made ends meet
And now we're meeting our end

And it's all because you chose a side
You're supposed to put your pride aside and ride for me
Guess it wasn't time (yeah)
And of course you went and chose a side that wasn't mine


You're so predictable I hate people like you
Kennedy Road taught me not to trust people like you
How you supposed to figure out what I'm going through
You can't even figure out what's going on with you
You judge me 'fore you met me yeah it figures
I make all the player's anthems for the real niggas
With my dad out in Tennessee is where I belong
Out here in L.A., I don't know what's going on
I don't know what's going on


And it's all because you chose a side
You're supposed to put your pride aside and ride for me
Guess it wasn't time (yeah)
And of course you went and chose a side that wasn't mine


You sit and you pray hoping that the stars align
My luck is a sure thing cause I'm living right
When I needed you, you couldn't give me any advice
But you always had something to say every other time
Everybody that I met on the way tries to get in the way
I'm fooding and serving them all
Like I'm working for minimum wage
Someone up there must just love testing my patience
Someone up there must be in need of some entertainment
Forgiveness for your ways
If I ever loved ya, I'll always love ya; that's how I was raised
Same way I'm right here still feeling the way
Same way I'm realizing on a day to day that

All of my ""let's just be friends"" are friends I don't have anymore
How do you not check on me when things go wrong
Guess I should've tried to keep my family closer
Much closer
All of my ""let's just be friends"" are friends I don't have anymore
Guess that's what they say you need your family for
Cause I can't depend on you anymore
Much closer


Any time people want to start problems
It's like ""for real, are you dumb?""
You know who mans are
I'm not afraid no gyal heart man
And I'm not afraid of no cyattie
And I'm not afraid of no waste yute neither
So anybody who want it can get it
Seh feh",2463390
81468,1863745,Fire  Desire,rb,Drake,2016,1873923,{},"
Dedicate, I dedicate the world
Yeah, oh
I dedicate, I dedicate
I give you my fortune
I dedicate, I dedicate
I dedicate, I dedicate
I dedicate, I dedicate
I dedicate, dedicate, dedicate
I dedicate to you
I dedicate, I dedicate
I dedicate, I dedicate, oh yeah
I dedicate, I dedicate to you


They throwin' dirt on my old name
Only gets worse when you know things
You don't see the perks of this whole thing
But you get real on a pill and I like it
You just like my sidekick, I just wanna ride, fulfill all your desires
Keep you in the front, never in the back and never on the side, uh
(Yeah)

You a real ass woman and I like it
I don't wanna fight it


Look, you know I'm a rider, nothin' left to hide
Your other nigga tired
Talk about you like you never leave his side
But I don't really buy it
Me? I'm movin' quiet, all the things we're tryin'
Let's just keep it private (Don't say anything)
Tell me should I cut these other girls right out of my life?
'Cause we never decided, tell me how you feel inside


You a real ass woman and I like it, yeah
Dedicate to you
I need you inspired, I need you excited
I don't wanna fight it


Yeah-yeah, I figure out you, you figure out me
We both a different breed
I'm followin' your lead, I ask you what you need
You say, ""A guarantee""
I mean, you say that like it's easy
You never believe me
Told you I got Zs for these other girls sleepin' on 'em
Girl, I'm sleepy
Sometimes I'm so indecisive

But you a real ass woman and I like it
I don't wanna fight it


I give you my fortune
I dedicate, I dedicate
I dedicate, I dedicate
I dedicate, dedicate, dedicate
I dedicate to you
I dedicate, I dedicate
This song's for you
I dedicate, I dedicate
I give you my voice
This song's for you",2463392
81469,1863746,9,rap,Drake,2016,1309947,{},"
Yeah, for the dogs dem, you know
Man when shit gets like this, man the whole city
Shit's crazy right now, and shit ain't gonna stop
Know shit gonna get a lot more worse before it get any better


Look, momma hit my phone and said rap's no good
Better than her telling me the check's no good
Now they wanna act like I do no good
Funny 'cause I really did more than I should
I made a decision last night that I would die for it
Just to show the city what it takes to be alive for it
Can't get me on the line so they hang me out to dry for it
You know 40 wants peace but I'm down to cut ties for it
And I can't sleep these days unless I take one
If they don't have a story these days, they'll make one
Life is always on, man, I never get a break from it
Doesn't matter where I go, I can never get away from it
They give me loyalty and I don't gotta pay for it
Same way, breads gotta break for it
Keeping people fed is my only peace of mind now
And I turn the six upside down, it's a nine now
I made a decision last night that I would die for it

(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)
(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)
(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)
(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)


All these hand outs, man it's getting outta hand
I'ma start telling niggas ""Get it how you can""
I got it right now so I'm everybody's friend
If I ever lose I bet we never speak again
I made a decision last night, I'd die for it
Just to show the city what it takes to be alive for it
First place, first place, man we can't be tied for it
I only drove it five times, paid 1.5  for it
Keychain go jang-a-lang, I wanna do major things
MJ in every way, I just don't fade away
Six upside down, it's a nine now
Like Mannie, like Stunna, man, shit is big time now
And I made a decision last night that I would die for it


(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)
(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)
(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)
(Dying, yeah, yeah, gangstas, gangstas, gangstas...)

... And then when I saw the news
Make me feel afraid of how I'd been to you
Trust me when I say I thought it all through
Trust me when I say that shit is old moves
God made himself a way from me to you
Tried to kill me but they still want the Views
Tried to kill me but they still want the Views
Tried to kill me but I am very much alive on the six side
Yeah, I said I am very much alive on the six side
I said I am-",2463393
81470,1863747,Views,rap,Drake,2016,1224787,{},"
Question is, will I ever leave you?
The answer is no, no, no-no-no, no, no
No, no-no-no, no, no
No, no, no, no
Question is, will I ever leave you?
The answer is no, no, no-no-no, no, no
No, no-no-no, no, no
No, no, no, no


Yeah, you feel the pressure, man, I know the pressure
And my wifey is a spice like I'm David Beckham
A lot of pent up aggression comin' out of my section
OVO on me while y'all niggas was playin' dress-up
And I know who gon' take the fall with me
They right here on call with me, they all with me
You could throw curve balls but I got the glove fitted
They've been sayin' it's love, but it isn't love, is it?
Toast to the days when they wasn't out to get me
I worked at Jaydees Connections whenever Jason let me
Ceesay's, I was buyin' fitteds everyday
Kiddie's Caribana, tryin' not to catch a stray
I dropped out right before I graduate
Six credits left, my mama had her saddest day
""It's only up from here, I promise, you just gotta wait""
And she took my word for it, that's all I had to say
Lately I just feel so out of character
The paranoia can start to turn into arrogance
Thoughts too deep to go work 'em out with a therapist
I get a blank page when I try to draw a comparison
I'm gettin' straight to the point with it
Need y'all to know that I never needed none of y'all niggas
Fuck bein' all buddy buddy with the opposition
It's like the front of the plane, nigga, it's all business
But I haven't flown with y'all boys in a minute

Look, they'd rather run up on me than towards their goals
My niggas still hit the club when it's 20 below
Who you think runnin' this show?
You saw it in me at 20 years old
The lingo start to sound like we talkin' in code
I got a pure soul, I don't do the hate
You don't worry 'bout fittin' in when you custom made
Me and Niko used to plot on how to make a change
Now me and Kobe doin' shots the night before the game
Still drop 40 with liquor in my system
Numbers goin' unlisted just to create some distance
I might see you on and off but I'll never switch ya
Niggas quick to double cross like both of us Christian
Lamborghini got me feelin' like I'm Christian Bale
And I never bend my morals for the ticket sales
Tippin' scales, bars heavy like triple XL
I never tag no one in, I'd rather get you myself
Runnin' through the 6, thumbin' through the contracts
I'm possessed, you can see it under the contacts
They think I had the silver spoon but they'll get it soon
I still got somethin' left to prove since you left me room
Payment plan for the family debt, we in the minus
And like it's goin' in a trunk, I put it all behind us
Where you tryna go? I got it, I'll take us wherever
I'm a staple in the game, all my papers together
And my life is on display like Truman
They wanna pree the movements, gotta start to make 'em sooner
My exes made some of my favorite music
I dated women from my favorite movies
Karma's such a thing of beauty
I'd share more of my story but you wouldn't believe it
It's farfetched like I threw that shit a hundred meters
I keep it a hundred like I'm running a fever
I might take a breather but I won't ever leave you
If I was you, I wouldn't like me either
Yeah",2463394
81471,1863748,Weston Road Flows,rap,Drake,2016,1054615,{},"
One of dem ones-right


Weston Road Flows, I did this shit for my nigga Renny
Back when we couldn't buy pizza cause we were down to pennies
Feel like we go back a century, run in the store for Centuries
Then bring it back to your brother, man, we had to respect it
He was wavy, doin' mixtapes out of your basement
He let us hit the weed on occasion for entertainment
Then he would leave us at the house and go out on a mission
We probably would've got in less trouble just goin' with him
Feel like I never say much but, man, there's a lot to know
Feel like the difference between us really startin' to show
I'm lookin at they first week numbers like, ""What are those?""
I mean, you boys not even coming close
I gave niggas like you a reason for celebration
You number one and I'm Eddie Murphy, we tradin' places
Look in the mirror, I'm closer than I really appear
Creepin' like Chilli without the tender, love, and care
No tender love and care, no love and affection
I got a price on my head but there's a risk in collecting
I might be here as a vessel to teach people a lesson
Feel like they wanted me dead but couldn't pull it together
Yeah, but here we are and it's a new semester
40 the only one that know how I deal with the pressure
A couple nights where it started to feel like the feelings fadin'
A lot of problems that can't be fixed with a conversation
Your best day is my worst day, I get green like Earth Day
You treat me like I'm born yesterday, you forgot my birthday
You don't be scorin' perfect
You don't be workin' like how we be workin'
You platinum like wrappers
On Hershey's boy, that shit is worthless
You get the message over and over like it was urgent
And then act like you ain't heard it when you see me in person
The only thing I did to end up here was put the work in
And did it with a purpose
Used to have secret handshakes to confirm my friendships
Nowadays, they just shakin' my hand to hide the tension
A lot of people just hit me up when my name is mentioned
Shout out to KD, we relate, we get the same attention
It's rainin' money, Oklahoma City Thunder
The most successful rapper 35 and under
I'm assumin' everybody's 35 and under
That's when I plan to retire, man, it's already funded
Yeah, I brought your wifey out to Saint Martin
She violated, I sent her back where it all started
How quick they are to forget about their bachelor apartment
Leave it to niggas like you to show em' light in the darkness
Told my momma that I found a lady in the east
Cancun, when I got signed, they upgraded the suite
Don Julio in the freezer that they gave us for free
I get you all you can eat, just have some patience with me
You wouldn't tell me you loved me, started seein' Monique
Last time I heard from Monique, T-Minus was makin' beats
I used to hit the corner store to get to Tahiti Treat
Now the talk at the corner store is I'm TBE
The best ever, don't ever question, you know better
But shit ain't always how it seems when it's sewn together
Yeah, I let that last line breathe, it take a second to get it
Weston Road flows, my confidence level gettin' settled
Don't get hyped for the moment then start to backpedal
Don't let your newfound fame fool you
Or cloud up your judgement to talk loosely, I really do this
Been flowin' stupid since Vince Carter
Was on some through the legs arm in the hoop shit
Drinkin' Hpnotiq with Glenn Lewis, I been through it
Y'all was so afraid to lay claim to it
Too busy face screwin' on waste movements
You was ridin' TTC metro, I had the place boomin'
First take Drake, you know I rarely have to take two it
And they still take to it
Big Apple had the white hummer parked right in front of Fluid
And we be walkin' in that bitch like we already knew it
But money can't buy happiness, Jellee talkin' truthful
But I'm happiest when I can buy what I want
Get high when I want

Yeah, that's right, yeah",2463395
81472,1863749,U With Me?,rap,Drake,2016,1933146,{},"
What these bitches want from a nigga?


On some DMX shit
I group DM my exes
I tell 'em they belong to me, that goes on for forever
And I think we just get closer when we not together
You tell me that I'm confusin'
More immature than Marques Houston
Cuts too deep for a band-aid solution
We too deep in this thing, you'll never lose me
LOLOL, I'm glad you find this shit amusin'
Heard a lot about me 'fore we started off
I know you heard that my pool parties like Mardi Gras
I know you heard that my girl is sponsored by Audemars
That's why she always correctin' me when my time is off
And my house is the definition
Of alcohol and weed addiction
You got a different vision
You wanna walk around naked in the kitchen
Without runnin' into one of my niggas
That's not the way we livin'
Too much goin' on, it's just not realistic
These days I don't talk 'bout them days like I miss 'em
And you shouldn't miss 'em either, we different people
But every time we speakin'

It's like a lot of games bein' played
How's it goin' down?
If it's on 'til we gone, then I gots to know now
Is you wit' me or what?
Yeah
It's like a lot of games are bein' played
How's it goin' down?
If it's on 'til we gone, then I gots to know now
Is you wit' me or what?
Yeah


I wanna know how much time you spent on them paragraphs
Where you're getting me
All that grey in our conversation history, you
Playin' mind games, when you sayin' things
Playin' mime games, we both doin' the same thing
Slide on a late night
You like to slide on a late night
You sent a ""Are you here?"" text without an invite
That's that shit that I don't like
We both slide on a late night
Do things in our off time
We both, yeah
Made some mistakes, pon road
Yeah, how's that for real?
You toyin' with it like Happy Meal
3 dots, you thinkin' of a reaction still
While you're typin', make sure you tell me

What type of games are bein' played?
How's it goin' down?
If it's on 'til we gone, then I gots to know now
Is you wit' me or what?
Yeah
What type of games are bein' played?
How's it goin' down?
If it's on 'til we gone, then I gots to know now
Is you wit' me or what?
Yeah


Yeah, remember you was livin' at The London for a month
Service elevator up to 4201
We was still a secret, couldn't come in through the front
Girl, I had your back when all you used to do was front
That's for sure though, I made a career off reminiscin'
Time got a funny way of tickin', things are so much different
I'll admit it, I've admitted to a lot of things
Act like you know it, fuck them stories, fuck the shade they throwin'
Understand I got responsibilities to people that I need
And on my way to make this dough
A lot of niggas cut the check so they can take this flow
A lot of niggas cut the check so they can take this flow
Ohhh, ohhh
Tryna give your ass the world
You runnin' your fingers through my curls
You knew me when the kid had waves
But that's enough of that
You could never say I came up and forgot about your ass
And that's some real shit",2463396
81474,1863751,Feel No Ways,pop,Drake,2016,1632170,{},"
I should be downtown, whipping on the way to you
You got something that belongs to me
Your body language says it all
Despite the things you said to me
Who is it that's got you all gassed up?
Changin' your opinion on me
I was only gone for the last few months
But you don't have the time to wait on me


I tried with you
There's more to life than sleeping in and getting high with you
I had to let go of us to show myself what I could do
And that just didn't sit right with you, yea


And now you're tryna make me feel a way, on purpose
Now you're throwing it back in my face, on purpose
Now you're talking down on my name, on purpose, yeah
And you don't feel no way, you think I deserve it
World's, world's, world's famous
World's, world's, world's famous

Feel a way, feel a way, young nigga feel a way
I've stopped listenin' to things you say
'Cause you don't mean it anyway, yeah
Feel a way, feel a way, young nigga feel a way
Maybe we just should have did things my way
Instead of the other way


I tried with you
There's more to life than sleeping in and getting high with you
I had to let go of us to show myself what I could do
And that just didn't sit right with you, yea


And now you're tryna make me feel a way, on purpose
Now you're throwing it back in my face, on purpose
Now you're talking down on my name, on purpose, yeah
And you don't feel no way, you think I deserve it
World's, world's, world's famous
World's, world's, world's famous


Yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Feel a way, feel a way, young nigga feel a way
I've stopped listening to things you say
Feel a way, feel a way, young nigga feel a way
I've stopped listening to things you say
",2463398
81475,1863752,With You,rb,Drake,2016,1032400,{PARTYNEXTDOOR},"
It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
I'm with you


Yeah, I can't get enough of you, babe
Bottles open up so you can try and open up for me, baby
M.I.A. in the M.I.A
You do you, girl, the haters gon' hate
Cut them off like you a sensei, girl
Oh, I know you feel what I feel
Breaking you off, it's so real
I can't fake that, babe
My love's locked down and you cuffing it
You're the only one I trust with it
You're the only one that stuck with it


It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
I'm with you
It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
It's about us right now, girl, where you going? Yeah
I'm with you

Yeah, linking me down on my line
Busy as usual but we should make some time
Looking for things you can find
Just so you can have something to bring up when it's time
Mixing vodka and emotions, tapping into your emotions
Dry cry cause I'm hopeless
Choosey lover for the moment
Different story when I leave you
Story up just to keep you
I need you 'round, I need you, oh


It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
It's about us right now, girl, where you going?
I'm with you
It's all about us right now, girl, where you going?
It's all about us right now, girl, where you going?
I'm with you, I'm with you",2463399
81477,1863755,Too Good,pop,Drake,2016,2711868,{Rihanna},"
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah


Look...I don't know how to talk to you
I don't know how to ask you if you're okay
My friends always feel the need to tell me things
Seems like they're just happier than us these days
Yeah
These days I don't know how to talk to you
I don't know how to be there when you need me
It feels like the only time you see me
Is when you turn your head to the side and look at me differently
Yeah


And last night I think I lost my patience
Last night, I got high as your expectations
Last night, I came to a realization
And I hope you can take it
I hope you can take it, oh

I'm too good to you
I'm way too good to you
You take my love for granted
I just don't understand it
No, I'm too good to you
I'm way too good to you
You take my love for granted
I just don't understand it


I don't know how to talk to you
I just know I found myself getting lost with you
Lately you just make me work too hard for you
Got me on flights overseas, and I still can't get across to you


And last night I think I lost my patience
Last night, I got high as your expectations
Last night, I came to a realization
And I hope you can take it
I hope you can take it, oh


I'm too good to you
I'm way too good to you
You take my love for granted
I just don't understand it
No, I'm too good to you
I'm way too good to you
You take my love for granted
I just don't understand it

Years go by too fast
I can't keep track
How long did we last?
I feel bad for asking
It can't end like this
We gotta take time with this
Cock up yuh bumper, sit down pon it
Let me see if this is something I can fix (Six)
You got somebody other than me
Don't play the victim when you're with me
Free time is costing me more than it seems
Sacrificing things
And I wanna tell you my intentions
I wanna do the things that I mention
I wanna benefit from the friendship
I wanna get the late night message from you, from you
I put my hands around you
Gotta get a handle on you
Gotta get a handle on the fact that I


I'm too good to you
I'm way too good to you
You take my love for granted
I just don't understand it
No, I'm too good to you
I'm way too good to you
You take my love for granted
I just don't understand it

Gyal a you mi waan
Pay fi yuh visa meck yo fly out regular
Baby, cock up yuh bumper, sit down pon it
Gyal yo pum pum good and yuh fit
Mi wi give you everything weh deh in my wallet
And in my pocket
Cock up yuh bumper, sit down pon it
Gyal yo pum pum good and yuh fit
Mi wi give you everything weh deh in my wallet
And in my pocket",2463402
81478,1863756,Redemption,rb,Drake,2016,1227106,{},"
Yeah, I get it
I get it, yeah


Why would I say all these things to have you feelin' a way?
Why would I tell you I'm 30 away if I'm not on the way?
Why do I settle for women that force me to pick up the pieces?
Why do I want an independent woman
To feel like she needs me?-I lost my way


I'm searchin' for these words to say to you
Please give me time
Cause I'm searchin' for these words to say to you
Oh, please give me time
Cause I'm searchin' for these words to say to you right now
Redemption's on your mind when you think about me, yeah
Redemption's on your mind when you think about me, yeah


Run your mouth, I'd rather listen to someone else
I gave your nickname to someone else
I know you're seein' someone that loves you
And I don't want you to see no one else
I don't want you here with no one else
I don't wanna do this with no one else
I used to know you back when you was young
Your brother brought me through, you saw me
That made me think of you so differently
I miss the feeling of you missing me
But you say you're over and done with me
Aw, yeah, yeah, yeah
Aw, yeah, yeah, yeah

Now redemption's on your mind when you think about me
Aw yeah, yeah, yeah
Redemption's on your mind when you think about me
Aw yeah, yeah, yeah
Redemption's on your mind when you (think about me)
Aw, please give me time
Cause I'm searchin' for these words
To say to you right now, yeah


Say to you-but eighty percent of it wasn't true, yeah
Say to you-a Mercedes coupe that you're still drivin'
Was for me and you, girl
Really gon' spend the winter with this other nigga?
Act like he's really the one to get through it with you
Clicked up with Jessica, Kim
You know that I'm bound to see you
And they both say that you're over and done with me
Aw yeah, yeah, yeah
Aw yeah, yeah, yeah


They say redemption's on your mind when you think about me
Yeah, aww yeah, yeah, yeah
Redemption's on your mind when you think about me
Aw yeah, yeah, yeah
Redemption's on your mind when you
Aw please give me time
Cause I'm searchin' for these words to say to you right now

Damn, I'm not unrealistic with none of my women
I tell them if they ain't with it then let's just forget it
Relationships slowin' me down, they slow down the vision
Guess I'm not in a position to deal with commitment
Certain people need to tell me they're proud of me
That mean a lot to me
Not havin' closure, it take a lot out of me
This year for Christmas I just want apologies
Sydney gave up on me when I went missin'
Syn had a baby and treated me different
Erika sued me and opened a business
Wonder if they wish it could've been different
Wonder what they'd do put in my position
I wonder, when my shit drop, do they listen?
Wonder if they're second guessin' their decisions
I hate the number 2, that shit is unforgiving
Tryna satisfy everybody, it's like they can't get enough
Until enough is enough, and then it's too much
You tip the scale when I weigh my options
West Palm girls are spoiled rotten
Tiffany on you, you know you poppin'
I'll kill somebody if they give you problems
Master bedroom's where we get it poppin'
Just ignore all the skeletons in my closet
I'm a walkin' come-up, I'm a bank deposit
Sell my secrets and get top dollar
Sell my secrets for a Range Rover
Opportunity and temptation
They would sell my secrets for a tropical vacation
Sell my secrets back to me if I was payin'
Who's gonna save me when I need savin'?
Since Take Care, I've been caretakin'
But second chances, that ain't how you livin'
Redemption on your mind, I'll never be forgiven

Yeah
I know",2463403
81550,1864355,Controlla,pop,Drake,2016,1957905,{},"
Right, my yiy just changed
You just buzzed the front gate
I thank God you came
How many more days could I wait?
I made plans with you
And I won't let 'em fall through
I, I, I, I, I


I think I'd lie for you
I think I'd die for you
Jodeci ""Cry for You""
Do things when you want me to
Like controlla, controlla, yeah
Like controlla, controlla, yeah


Okay, you like it, when I get
Aggressive, tell you to
Go slower, go faster
Like controlla, controlla, yeah
Like controlla, controlla, yeah

And I'm never on a waste ting, shawty
I do it how you say you want it
Them girls, they just wanna take my money
They don't want me to give you nothing
They don't want you to have nothing
They don't wanna see me find your lovin'
They don't wanna see me
Smiling back when they pree


Knowing I'd lie for you
Thinking I'd die for you
Jodeci ""Cry for You""
Do things when you want me to
Like controlla, controlla, yeah
Like controlla, controlla, yeah


Gyal a tear off mi garments
And a bawl fi come inna mi apartment (Woi!)
Di gyal dem want di length and strength
Action speak louder than argument well


But you can't just diss and come tell man sorry
You can't listen to me talk and go tell my story, nah
It don't work like that when you love somebody
My old flex is my new flex now and we're workin' on it, yeah
And that's why I need
All the energy that you bring to me
My last girl would tear me apart
But she'd never wanna split a ting with me

But when it comes to you, you
I think I'd lie for you
I think I'd die for you
Do things when you want me to
Like controlla, controlla, yeah
Like controlla, controlla, yeah


And I'm never on a waste ting shawty
I do it how you say you want it
Them girls, they just wanna take my money
They don't want me to give you nothing
They don't want you to have nothing
They don't wanna see me find your lovin'
They don't wanna see me
Smiling back when they pree (Jheeze!)


Music a drop!
Gyal a whine up dem bumpa
Dis is di summa summa controlla
Drake from Canada, Beenie Man from Jamaica
Dah one yah a murda-Zagga!",2464123
81876,1867692,Blessings,rap,Chance the Rapper,2016,1111656,"{""Jamila Woods""}","
I'm gon' praise Him, praise Him 'til I'm gone
I'm gon' praise Him, praise Him 'til I'm gone
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
It seems like blessings keep falling in my lap
It seems like blessings keep falling in my lap


I don't make songs for free, I make 'em for freedom
Don't believe in kings, believe in the Kingdom
Chisel me into stone, prayer whistle me into song air
Dying laughing with Krillin saying something 'bout blonde hair
Jesus' black life ain't matter, I know, I talked to his daddy
Said you the man of the house now, look out for your family
He has ordered my steps,  gave me a sword with a crest
And gave Donnie a trumpet in case I get shortness of breath


I'm gon' praise Him, praise Him 'til I'm gone (Don't be mad)
I'm gon' praise Him, praise Him 'til I'm gone
When the praises go up (Good God)
The blessings come down, Good God
When the praises go up (Good God) the blessings come down
(The blessings come down)
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
(It seems like blessings keep falling in my lap)
The blessings come down
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
(Good God)

They booked the nicest hotels on the 59th floor
With the big wide windows, with the suicide doors
Ain't no blood on my money, ain't no Twitter in Heaven
I know them drugs isn't close, ain't no visitin' Heaven
I know the difference in blessings and worldly possessions
Like my ex-girl getting pregnant
And her becoming my everything
I'm at war with my wrongs, I'm writing four different songs
I never forged it or forfeited, I'm a force to be reconciled
They want four-minute songs
You need a four-hour praise dance performed every morn
I'm feeling shortness of breath, so Nico grab you a horn
Hit Jericho with a buzzer beater to end a quarter
Watch brick and mortar fall like dripping water, ugh
(Good God)


I'm gon' praise Him, praise Him 'til I'm gone
(Good God)
I'm gon' praise Him, praise Him 'til I'm gone
When the praises go up, (Good God) the blessings come down
(The blessings come down)
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
(The blessings come down)
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
(Are you ready for your blessings?)
When the praises go up, the blessings come down
(Are you ready for your miracle?)

Are you ready, are you ready?
Are you ready, are you ready?
Are you ready, are you ready?
Are you ready, are you ready?
It seems like blessings keep falling in my lap",2468090
82129,1870321,Location,rb,Khalid,2016,2638891,{},"
Send me your location, let's
Focus on communicating
'Cause I just need the time and place to come through (place to come through)
Send me your location
Let's ride the vibrations
I don't need nothing else but you
(do not need nothing else but you)


At times I wonder why I fool with you
But this is new to me, this is new to you
Initially, I didn't wanna fall for you
Gather my attention it was all for you, so don't
Take advantage, don't leave my heart damaged
I understand that things go a little bit better when you plan it... oh, so won't


Send me your location, let's
Focus on communicating
'Cause I just need the time and place to come through
Send me your location
Let's ride the vibrations
I don't need nothing else but you
(I don't need nothing else but you)

I don't wanna fall in love off of subtweets, so
Let's get personal
I got a lot of cool spots that we can go
Tell me what's the move and I got you
I'm only acting like this 'cause I like you
Just give me the vibe to slide in
Oh, I might make you mine by the night, and


Send me your location, let's
Focus on communicating
'Cause I just need the time and place to come through (place to come through)
Send me your location
Let's ride the vibrations
I don't need nothing else but you
(I don't need nothing else but you)


Ride, ride, ride, come and vibe with me tonight
I don't need nothing else but you
(I don't need nothing else but you)
Ride, ride, ride, come and vibe with me tonight
I don't need nothing else but you
Nothing else but you
Do, do, do, do, do, do
Oh, oh, mmm, mmm, mmm, mmm
Oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh, mmm, mmm, mmm
Do, do, do, do, do, do, do, do
Do, do, do, do, do, do, do
I don't need nothing else but you",2471323
82153,1870637,No Problem,rap,Chance the Rapper,2016,2436075,"{""Lil Wayne"",""2 Chainz""}","
You don't want zero problems, big fella!
Yep! Igh!


If one more label try to stop me
It's gon' be some dreadhead niggas in ya lobby, huh huh


You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
Just another day, had to pick up all the mail
There go Chano ridin' through the streets, they be like, ""There he go!""
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
Just another day, had to pick up all the mail
There go Chano ridin' through the streets, they be like, ""There he go!""


Ooh, watch me come and put the hinges in their hands
Countin' Benjis while we meetin', make 'em shake my other hand, huh
Milly rockin', scoopin' all the blessings out my lap
Bitch I know you tried to cheat, you shoulda never took a nap, hey
Fuck wrong with you? What you were thinkin'?
Fuck you thought it was?
You talk that talk that make a lame-ass nigga fall in love
Not me, though, bitch, you can keep those
Bruh, I'm at your head like Craig did Deebo
Don't tweak, bro, it's never sweet, ho
My shooters come for free, so

If one more label try to stop me
It's gon' be some dreadhead niggas in ya lobby, huh, huh


You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, you bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
Yep, yep
Pull up in the new thing, I'm like
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
(Yeah, 2 Chainz)
They be like, ""There he go!""


You old Petey Pablo, take your shirt off
Wave 'round your head like a helicopter
I ain't put enough weed in the blunt
All you do is smoke tobacco
Where the hell you get them from?
Yeezy said he ain't make them
My niggas chasin' bounty hunters
And gettin' chased by their baby mamas
My first tat was on my stomach
Got a pocket full of money (Money)
And a mind full of ideas
Some of this shit may sound weird
Inside of the Maybach
Look like it came out of Ikea
Run shit like diarrhea (True)
Big yacht, no power steering (Yeah)
Aye, aye, captain (Ooh!)
I'm high, captain (A-alright!)
I'm so high (I'm so high)
Me and God dappin' (Alright)
This is my blessin' (Yeah)
This is my passion
School of hard knocks
I took night classes

You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
Yep
Pull up in the new thing, I'm like
They be like, ""There he go!""


I got problems bigger than these boys, yeah
My deposits, they be on steroids
Lord, free the Carter, niggas need the Carter
Sacrificin' everything, I feel like Jesus Carter
Hold up, I got this sewed up, my soda poured up
My woes up, I'm flippin' those bucks, they doing toe tucks
I rolled up and let the smoke puff
I lay down, toes up
Hold up, get too choked up when I think of old stuff
Move on, put my goons on, they kidnap newborns
In the streets my face a coupon
Her pussy too warm
All these bitches come to do harm
Just bought a new charm
Fuck the watch, I buy a new arm, you lukewarm
I'm Uncle Luke with the hoes
Pretty bitches, centerfolds
Tippy toes around my crib in they robes, just their robes
Half a milli' in the safe, another in the pillowcase
Codeine got me movin' slower than a caterpillar race
Fuck wrong with you? What you were thinkin'?
What you thought it was?
I just popped five Percocets and only caught a buzz
And if that label try to stop me
There gon' be some crazy Weezy fans waitin' in the lobby
Mula, baby

You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
Just another day, had to pick up all the mail
There go Chano ridin' through the streets, they be like, ""There he go!""
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, bih
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me, huh, haha
Just another day, had to pick up all the mail
There go Chano ridin' through the streets, they be like, ""There he go!""


You don't want no problem, want no problem with me
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me
You don't want no problem, want no problem with me
They say so, ridin' with the payo'
They be like, ""There he go!""
There he go

",2471960
82182,1870868,RIP Roach,rap,Ski Mask the Slump God & XXXTENTACION,2016,1046210,{},"
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
Ayy
(Uh, uh, uh, uh)
Ayy, ayy
(Nigga, where the fuck is the...?)
Ayy


Cocaine for my breakfast (What?)
Hold that pistol ambidextrous, uh (Yeah, yeah)
Pussy boy talk reckless (Ayy)
He might end up on a stretcher, uh (Yeah, bitch)
Fuck with my set (Ayy)
You get wet, like a pussy, yeah (Yeah, yeah)
Sauce, what I spilled (Yeah, yeah)
On my kilt, she need milk, okay, like (Ayy, ayy)
XXX on a killstreak, huh (Bitch)
You pussy niggas Rice Krispie, uh (What?)
Fuck a white bitch on a six-speed (Yeah)
Six stars like GTA, kill me, uh (Fuck)
It's more money I'm getting (Ayy)
If a nigga try to take, wig-splitting 'em (Ayy)
Shouts out to my zoe, they killed my vro (Yeah, yeah)
So, bitch, off rip now, I'm like- (Ayy)

Mama raised a soldier (Huh? Yeah)
Not no bitch, not no bitch, yeah (Yeah, what?)
Mama raised a soldier (Huh? Yeah)
Not no bitch, not no bitch, uh (Yeah, ayy)
Mama raised a soldier (Yeah, yeah)
Not no bitch, not no bitch, uh (Yeah, ayy)
Mama raised a soldier (Yeah, what?)
Not no bitch, not no bitch, yeah (Huh)
Mama raised a soldier (Huh? Yeah)
Not no bitch, not no bitch, ayy (Yeah, okay, you all right?)
RIP, my zoe, ayy (Yeah, uh)
RIP, my zoe, okay (Uh, yeah)
RIP, my zoe, ayy (Huh? Yeah)
RIP, my zoe, okay (Hey, all-all right?)
RIP, my zoe, yuh (Yeah, yeah)
RIP, my zoe, okay (Yeah, yeah)
RIP, my soul (Haha, ayy, my who?)
Yeah (Rest in peace, my zoes, man)
Ayy (Yeah, man)


Tide, bitch
I got my handicaps on this bitch
I'm 'bout to sip this motherfuckin' water
That's not even water (That wa-that wasn't water)
I stole that boy's shit
(Nigga, where the fuck is the-)
Ayy

Came from the dirt, you can't hit my purp
Said my diamonds wetter than some sweat, absurd
Gold up on my wrist is lookin' sunny, Big Bird
Hit 'em with the, hit 'em with the numbers like a nerd
Ayy, let's slide sixth wall, I'm tied
Call my pockets knotty 'cause they sloppy, oh, my
I could be Xzibit, might pimp my ride
Wet pleasure rather pay the Rafs, like Christ
Hit my bitch like Bruno, uh
Get a bitch wet, no Juno, uh
Put it in her mouth like Uno, uh
Chest, all Polo like, ""Kudos,"" ayy
Dog-ass nigga like Cujo, uh
Face card bad who you know, ayy
She all wet like fructose, ayy
Diamonds on like they cheat codes, ayy",2472181
82188,1870923,Same Drugs,rb,Chance the Rapper,2016,1179424,{},"
We don't do the same drugs no more
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more
'Cause she don't do the same drugs no more
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more


When did you change?
Wendy, you've aged
I thought you'd never grow up
I thought you'd never
Window closed, Wendy got old
I was too late, I was too late
A shadow of what I once was


'Cause we don't do the same drugs no more
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more
She don't laugh the same way no more
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more

Where did you go?
Why would you stay?
You must have lost your marbles
You always were so forgetful
In a hurry, don't wait up
I was too late, I was too late
A shadow of what I once was
'Cause we don't, we don't do what we say we're gonna
You were always perfect, and I was only practice
Don't you miss the days, stranger?
Don't you miss the days?
Don't you miss the danger?


We don't (We don't) do the same drugs no more (Do the same drugs no more)
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more
We don't (We don't) do the same drugs no more (Do the same drugs no more)
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs


Turn it around
I remember when
This age of pathetics
Don't forget the happy thoughts
All you need is happy thoughts
The past tense, past bed time
Way back then when everything we read was real
And everything we said rhymed
Wide eyed kids being kids
Why did you stop?
What did you do to your hair?
Where did you go to end up right back here?
When did you start to forget how to fly?
It's so natural
Tastes like Juicy Fruit
Works like a magic trick
Please give me half of that
We don't, we don't, we don't
Don't you color out
Don't you bleed on out, oh
Stay in the line, stay in the line
Dandelion
We don't do the same drugs no more
We don't do the, we don't do the same drugs, do the same drugs no more
We don't, we don't, we don't
Don't you color out
Don't you bleed on out, oh
Stay in the line, stay in the line
Dandelion",2472248
82324,1872474,OOOUUU,rap,Young M.A,2016,3765758,{},"
Yo, bro, I think I had too much Hennessy, man
This Hennessy gettin' to me
I ain't gonna lie, I'm a little smizz
I'm a little drizz
But we in the club, man
OOOUUU


Yeah they hate but they broke though (But they broke though)
And when it's time to pop they a no-show (Where they at?)
Yeah, I'm pretty but I'm loco (Yeah, I'm loco)
The loud got me movin' slow-mo
Ayo, Tweetie, where the hoes, bro? (Where the hoes, bro?)
Ayo, Keys, where the hoes though? (Yo, where the hoes though?)
That other nigga, he a bozo (He a bozo)
It's M.A, you don't know ho? (You don't know ho?)
We got liquor by the boatload (That Henny)
Disrespect the Lyfe, that's a no-no (That's a no-no)
All my niggas dressed in that rojo (Redlyfe)
I ride for my guys, that's the bro code (That's the bro code)
Baby gave me head, that's a low blow (That's a low blow)
Damn, she make me weak when she deep throat (When she deep throat)
I need a rich bitch, not a cheap ho (Not a cheap ho)
They be on that hate shit, I peep though (Yeah, I peep though)
My brother told me, ""Fuck 'em, get that money sis!"" (Yo, fuck 'em)
You just keep on grindin' on your hungry shit (Uh-huh)
Ignore the hate, ignore the fake, ignore the funny shit (Ignore the funny shit)
'Cause if a nigga violate we got a hunnit clips (Grrrrrrrah)
And we go zero to a hundred quick (Oooh)
We just them niggas you ain't fuckin' with (Oh, no)
Pockets on a chubby chick (Uh)
And still go bag a thottie in some bummy shit (Ooouuu)
Yerr, Eli, why they testin' me? (Yo, why they, uh)
Like I don't always keep the hammer next to me (Like I don't keep that hammer)
Like I ain't got a hitter to the left of me (Like I ain't got a hitter)
Like we ain't in these streets more than Sesame (Ooh)
If that's your chick then why she textin' me? (Yo, why she textin')
Why she keep callin' my phone speakin' sexually? (Speakin' ooh)
Every time I'm out, why she stressin' me? (Yo, why she stressin')
You call her Stephanie? (You call her huh?) I call her Headphanie (Ooouuu)
I don't open doors for a whore (No no no)
I just want the neck, nothin' more (No nothing more)
Shawty, make it clap, make it applaud (Yea, make it clap)
When you tired of your man, give me a call (Give me a call)
Dyke bitches talkin' out they jaw (Yo, what you say?)
Next minute, callin' for the law (Ooh-ooh)
This 9 will have 'em callin' for the Lord (Grrrrrrrah)
They ain't gettin' shmoney so they bored (Man, they bored)
I could never lose, what you thought? (Man, what you thought?)
M.A got it on lock, man, of course (Man, of course)
They say I got the juice, I got the sauce (I got the sauce)
These haters on my body, shake 'em off (I shake 'em off)
Pussy, I'm a bully and a boss (Man, I'm a boss)
I'm killin' 'em, sorry for your loss (R.I.P.)
I just caught a body, Randy Moss (Ra- ooh!)
Now this year I'm really goin' off (I'm goin' off)

OOOUUU, OOOUUU
These haters on my body, shake 'em off
OOOUUU, OOOUUU
Ah, these haters on my body, shake 'em off
OOOUUU, OOOUUU
These haters on my body, shake 'em off
I could never lose, what you thought?
What they thought?
I could never lose, what you thought?
This Henny got me, it got me sauced
This Henny got me, ooh, it got me sauced
I could never lose, what you thought?
M.A got it on lock, man, of course
OOOUUU, OOO-UUU",2474069
82462,1873930,Take a Step Back,rap,Ski Mask the Slump God,2016,1317597,{XXXTENTACION},"
Yeah, baby, Very Rare, Members Only, yeah, baby, yeah, baby
I'm with Ryan Santan in the motherfuckin' booth, yeah, baby
I got blood on my boots, baby, yeah, baby (Gang, gang, gang)
Yeah, baby, throw that ass back on a tricycle, baby, yeah (Ayy, ayy)


Fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, fucked up (Yeah)
Fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, yeah (Yeah, yeah, huh, ayy)
You done fucked up, you done fucked up (Yeah)
You done fucked up, you done fucked up (Yeah, bitch)
Fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, fucked up (Yeah, bitch)
Fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, yeah (Huh, yeah, bitch, yeah)
You done fucked up, you done fucked up (Bitch, yeah)
You done fucked up, you done fucked up (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


George W. Bush right on her pussy, yeah (Uh, Uh, Uh)
Yeah, Curious George nigga lookin' boy, you so puss', yeah (Uh, uh, yeah, yeah)
Yeah, hit my line for the nigga dick, check my Twitter, yeah
Yeah, they call me Yung Dagger Dick, that's my handle, yeah (Uh, uh, uh, yeah)
Yeah, she grab on my dick like a handle, ayy
Lil' bitch, I got on Jesus sandals, hey
X is an animal, mammal, ayy
Lil' bitch got the back of a camel (Huh? Yeah)
Pussy boy, you look like a Randall (Yeah)
Pussy boy, you look like a Daniel (Yeah)
Bitch, I'm known to get ghost, Danny Phantom
And if you throwing, throw the pussy through a tantrum, whoa

Ayy, fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, ""Who?"" Hey
Fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, you, hey
Pussy nigga know he done fucked up, ayy
Lame nigga better know his luck up, ayy
Pussy nigga know he fucked up
Lame nigga better know his luck up
Ayy, fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, ""Who?"" Hey
Fucked up, fucked up, fucked up, you, hey
Pussy nigga know he fucked up
Lame nigga better know his luck up, ayy
Pussy nigga know he fucked up
Lame nigga better- (Ayy, ayy)


Like it's Noah's Ark, that pussy wet, no water-park, mm
She said, ""Drop that meat in me just like a shopping cart,"" foo
Told me, ""Head straight to the back"" just like I'm Rosa Parks, hey
Walked up in the bank with pack that smell like donkey fart, pff
RuneScape poison dagger, ayy
Fuck my conscience, I'll stab ya (Come here)
Ask that ho, ""What's vrackin'?"" (What's vrackin'?)
Slide up on a nigga like a care package (Woo)
Bare in that pussy like Smokey, mm, ooh (Smokey?)
Chain swing like rodeo ropy, mm, ooh (Ropy)
Diamonds so wet that they soapy, mm, ooh (Shines)
Watch them mingle like they do the hokey-pokey (Hokey pokey, okay!)
Egg yolk color diamonds, humpty dumpty horror story, ayy
Feel like Dexter, got double-D's in my laboratory, hey (Yeah)
Eat it with the sweet-sour sauce like six-piece sauce
Freedom, fuck the cops, free Keke, uh (Free Keke)
Wreck a pussy nigga, come see me, uh (See me)
Make him say goodbye like Luigi, ayy (Bye, bye)",2475713
82645,1876052,Treat You Better,pop,Shawn Mendes,2016,1263410,{},"
I won't lie to you
I know he's just not right for you
And you can tell me if I'm off
But I see it on your face
When you say that he's the one that you want
And you're spending all your time
In this wrong situation
And anytime you want it to stop


I know I can treat you better than he can
And any girl like you deserves a gentleman
Tell me why are we wasting time
On all your wasted crying
When you should be with me instead
I know I can treat you better
Better than he can


I'll stop time for you
The second you say you'd like me too
I just wanna give you the loving that you're missing
Baby, just to wake up with you
Would be everything I need and this could be so different
Tell me what you want to do

'Cause I know I can treat you better than he can
And any girl like you deserves a gentleman
Tell me why are we wasting time
On all your wasted crying
When you should be with me instead
I know I can treat you better
Better than he can
Better than he can


Give me a sign
Take my hand, we'll be fine
Promise I won't let you down
Just know that you don't
Have to do this alone
Promise I'll never let you down


'Cause I know I can treat you better than he can
And any girl like you deserves a gentleman
Tell me why are we wasting time
On all your wasted crying
When you should be with me instead
I know I can treat you better
Better than he can
Better than he can
Better than he can",2478138
82928,1879108,Cold Water,pop,Major Lazer,2016,1471590,"{""Justin Bieber"",MØ}","
Everybody gets high sometimes, you know
What else can we do when we're feelin' low?
So take a deep breath and let it go
You shouldn't be drowning on your own


And if you feel you're sinking, I will jump right over
Into cold, cold water for you
And although time may take us into different places
I will still be patient with you
And I hope you know...


I won't let go
I'll be your lifeline tonight
I won't let go
I'll be your lifeline tonight


'Cause we all get lost sometimes, you know?
It's how we learn and how we grow
And I wanna lay with you 'til I'm old, o-old
You shouldn't be fighting on your own

And if you feel you're sinking, I will jump right over
Into cold, cold water for you
And although time may take us into different places
I will still be patient with you
And I hope you know...


I won't let go
And I won't let go, no-no, no-no, no I won't
I'll be your lifeline tonight
I won't let go
I'll be your lifeline tonight


Come on, come on
Save me from my rocking boat
I just wanna stay afloat
I'm all alone
And I hope, I hope someone's gonna take me home
Somewhere I can rest my soul (rest my soul)
I need to know you won't let go


And I won't let go, no-no, no-no, no, I won't
I'll be your lifeline tonight
You won't let go
I'll be your lifeline tonight

I won't let go, no no, no no, no, I won't
I'll be your lifeline tonight
You won't let go
I'll be your lifeline tonight",2481759
83103,1881535,Perfect Strangers,pop,Jonas Blue,2016,1277241,"{""JP Cooper""}","
You were looking at me like you wanted to stay
When I saw you yesterday
I'm not wasting your time, I'm not playing no games
I see you


Who knows the secret tomorrow will hold?
We don't really need to know
'Cause you're here with me now, I don't want you to go
You're here with me now, I don't want you to go


Maybe we're perfect strangers
Maybe it's not forever
Maybe the night will change us
Maybe we'll stay together
Maybe we'll walk away
Maybe we'll realize
We're only human
Maybe we don't need no reason
Maybe we're perfect strangers
Maybe it's not forever
Maybe the night will change us
Maybe we'll stay together
Maybe we'll walk away
Maybe we'll realize
We're only human
Maybe we don't need no reason why
Come on, come on, come over
Maybe we don't need no reason why
Come on, come on, come over

No one but you got me feeling this way
There's so much we can't explain
Maybe we're helping each other escape
I'm with you


Who knows the secret tomorrow will hold?
We don't really need to know
'Cause you're here with me now, I don't want you to go
You're here with me now, I don't want you to go


Maybe we're perfect strangers
Maybe it's not forever
Maybe the night will change us
Maybe we'll stay together
Maybe we'll walk away
Maybe we'll realize
We're only human
Maybe we don't need no reason
Maybe we're perfect strangers
Maybe it's not forever
Maybe the night will change us
Maybe we'll stay together
Maybe we'll walk away
Maybe we'll realize
We're only human
Maybe we don't need no reason why
Come on, come on, come over
Maybe we don't need no reason why
Come on, come on, come over
Maybe we're perfect strangers
Come on, come on, come over
Maybe we don't need no reason why
Come on, come on, come over",2486576
83130,1881745,For Free,rap,DJ Khaled,2016,1862375,{Drake},"
Would you fuck me for free?
Another one (Another one, another one)
We the Best Music! (Music, music) Major Key! (Major Key)
DJ Khaled!


Yeah, I go on and on
Can't understand how I last so long
I must have the superpowers
Last two-hundred twenty-three thousand hours
And it's 'cause I'm off of CC
And I'm off the Hennessy
And like your boy from Compton said
You know this dick ain't free
I got girls that I shoulda made pay for it
Got girls that I shoulda made wait for it
I got girls that'll cancel a flight back home
Stay another day for it
You got attitude on na-na
And your pussy on agua
And your stomach on flat-flat
And your ass on ""What's that?""
And, yeah, I need it all right now
Last year I had drama, girl, not right now
I was never gon' chat what we talkin' about
You the only one I know could fit it all in her- man

I always wonder if you ask yourself (Ask yourself)
Is it just me? (Just me)
Is it just me?
Or is this sex so good I shouldn't have to fuck for free?
Oh, is it just me?
Yeah, is it just me?
Or is this sex so good I shouldn't have to-


Fuck for free
I know you workin' day and night to get a college degree
Bet nobody that you've been with even know you a freak, right?
You know you only do that with me, right?
Yeah, double checkin' on you
You know I never put the pressure on you
You know that you make your own mind up
You knew what it was when you signed up
Now you gotta run it up
I be out of words, tryna sum it up
Girl, you throw it back like one love
Even let me slash on the tour bus
Yeah, I talk to her but she don't do enough
Even though you in the hood, I'm still pullin' up
Dip, dip, straight to your doorstep
This the real thing, can you feel the force yet?

I always wonder if you ask yourself (Ask yourself)
Is it just me? (Just me)
Is it just me?
Or is this sex so good I shouldn't have to fuck for free?
Oh, is it just me?
Yeah, is it just me?
Is this sex so good I shouldn't have to-
Would you fuck me for free?


Another one (Another one)
They don't want me to have another anthem
So I made sure I got another anthem (Another anthem)
It's We The Best OVO
Summer's ours
It always has been
Don't ever play yourself (Haha, haha)
One time for Future the Prince
One time for 40
One time for Drake
Yeah, another one
Bless up",2486863
83195,1882387,Selfish,rb,PnB Rock,2016,1141067,{},"
Oh oh oh oh, oh
Oh oh oh, oh oh oh, oh yeah
I want you all to myself
You don't need nobody else
I want you all to myself, I swear yeah
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


I'm selfish, I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, because I'm selfish, yeah
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, I swear, I'm selfish
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, because I'm selfish yeah
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else
I want you all to myself

Now, that I gotcha here,  girl
I ain't gon' play with you
Because there's a lot of things
That I wanna say to you
Girl, you know, you the shit
Balenciagas on ya kicks
Niggas all on your dick
But we ain't gon' trip
'Cause I'm not ready for no commitments, nah, nah
But I swear I hate seeing you wit' them, yeah, yeah
And I know, you ain't tryna control me
And I know, you're tired of being lonely
I can't help how I feel
I'm just keeping it real
They can't have you, girl, because


I'm selfish, I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, because I'm selfish, yeah
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, I swear, I'm selfish
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, because I'm selfish yeah
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else
I want you all to myself

Shawty I'm selfish, can't help it
You know, I get stuck, when you come around
And them niggas be sick 'cause we be on some shit
Yeah, they know, I'm gon' hold it down
Pull up in the whip, tell you ""hop in with your friends
We gon go to my crib
Have my chef cook us up a dinner""
Girl, you know, you fuckin' with a winner
I ain't nothing like these lames, I swear
Name a place, I could take you there
I'd do anything to make you laugh
And you can have anything, just ask
But just know that I'm selfish
And I swear, I can't help it
But it's all for you
Yeah, it's all for you


I'm selfish, I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, because I'm selfish, yeah
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, I swear, I'm selfish
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else, I swear
I want you all to myself, because I'm selfish yeah
I want you all to myself, I swear
You don't need nobody else
I want you all to myself",2488833
83246,1882969,Broken Clocks,rb,SZA,2017,1213759,{},"
Run fast from my day job
Runnin' fast from the way it was
Jump quick to a pay check
Runnin' back to the strip club
I'm never goin' back, never goin' back
No, you can't make me
Never goin' back, never goin' back (Nah)
They'll never take me
I've paid enough of petty dues
I've heard enough of shitty news
I've had a thing for dirty shoes since I was 10
Love dirty men alike


Ooh
Better day than yesterday (Keep cuttin' up)
Ooh oh
I just take it day by day
Ooh oh oh
Never hearing what they say (Uh)
Ooh ooh (Mm)
I just do it my way

All I got is these broken clocks
I ain't got no time
Just burnin' daylight
Still love, and it's still love, and it's still love
It's still love, still love (Still love), still love
It's still love, it's still love
Nothin' but love for you (Nothin' but-)
Nothin' but love (Nothin' but-)
Nothin' but love


All that I've got, pieces and pages
Talkin' a lot, sorry I'm faded
(Turnin' up real good tonight)
Think I forgot
(Think I forgot the other night)
You love me, you love me, you love me


Got a shift at 10 AM (Yeah)
Gotta dip at 10 PM (Nah)
Gotta get that cash
Won't get past a lunch break
I ain't had a smoke break
In about two days, don't break (Ugh)
Been about three years since I dated you
Why you still talkin' 'bout me like we together?
I moved on for the better, you moved on to whoever
I was down for whatever, and then some
You gon' make me late to work again

Ooh
Better day than yesterday
Ooh
I just take it day by day
Ooh oh oh
Never hearing what they say
Ooh, ooh
I just do it my way (Keep doin' it)


All I got is these broken clocks
I ain't got no time
Just burnin' daylight
Still love, and it's still love, and it's still love
It's still love, still love, still love (Still love)
It's still love, and it's still love (Still love)
Nothin' but love for you
Nothin' but love (Nothin' but)
Nothin' but love


I don't eat, can't sleep past 9 AM (Uhh)
Heartbeat make me feel young again (Like a, feel like a...)
Can't beat 'em, just join the party (Let me join the party)
I don't wanna, don't need nobody (Ooh)

All that I've got, pieces and pages
Talking a lot, sorry I'm faded
Think I've forgot, you love me
You love me, you love me


You love me
You love me
You love me",2489949
83249,1883021,I Got the Keys,rap,DJ Khaled,2016,1066642,"{JAY-Z,Future}","
808 Mafia
Uh, uh-uh-uh, DJ Khaled
We The Best music (Future, Future)
Oh, this what we doin' here? Another one (Super, super)
I'ma have to put my jewellery on for this one
Wraith talk, Wraith talk, oh, we talkin' that Wraith talk
Safe talk, safe talk (Uh), here we go talkin' that safe talk
Major key alert Oh, we good now
Major bag alert,  DJ Khaled


I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
We go to court, we gon' plead the fifth (Slang)
I know the judge, I'ma shoot him some chips (Slang)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Major)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys

Niggas always askin' me the key
'Til you own your own you can't be free
'Til you're on your own you can't be me
How we still slaves in 2016?
Key to life, keep a bag comin'
Every night another bag comin'
I ain't been asleep since '96
I ain't seen the back of my eyelids
I been speedin' through life with no safety belt
One on one with the corner with no safety help
I perform like Josh Norman, I ain't normal, nigga
Just a project nigga out in Beverly Hills, California, nigga
That Wraith talk, that's foreign, nigga
Special cloth talk here
All my niggas from the mud damn near
All my niggas millionaires
We gon' take it there, I swear
You gon' think a nigga's psychic
You ain't seen nothin' like this
I should probably copyright this
I promise they ain't gonna like this


I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Ah!)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Slang)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Slang)
We go to court, we gon' plead the fifth (Slang)
I know the judge, I'ma shoot him some chips (Slang)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Slang)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Woo!)

Radar, radar, oh, bitches ain't even on my radar (Swish)
Radar, radar, oh, you ain't on my radar (Swish)
Radar, radar, no, no, you hatin' on my radar (Swish)
No, no, you bitches ain't, bitches ain't even on my radar (Swish)


I got a bag for lawyers, like, ""Fuck your charges!""
Hop out the courtroom, like, ""What charges?""
Big pimpin' on your court steps
Case y'all ain't notice, I ain't lost yet
Y'all know it's one of one
Soon as you hear that, ""uh-uh"", uh (Right)
Y'all know the difference right?
From rap facts and fiction, right? Shit
Real life I'm like HOV, real life I'm life goals
In real life they're like me? In real life I'm like, ""No.""
My swag different (Mm), that bag different (Uh-huh)
My wife Beyoncé (Yeah), I brag different (Uh)
My baby Blue (What else?)
I dream in color (What else?)
That's too much flavor (What else?)
I don't rap to suckas (Ha!)
God bless you all, I only talk special talk
I only talk special cloth
Said I only talk special, ah!

I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Wraith talk)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Uh)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
We go to court, we gon' plead the fifth (Slang)
I know the judge, I'ma shoot him some chips
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Slang)
I got them keys, the keys, the keys (Hah)


Radar, radar, oh, bitches ain't even on my radar (Swish)
Radar, radar, oh, you ain't on my radar (Swish)
Radar, radar, no, no, you hatin' on my radar (Swish)
No, no, you bitches ain't, bitches ain't even on my radar (Ah!)


I got the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got the keys to all success!
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
We the best!
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
Roc Nation! Freebandz!
Secure the bag alert
Alert, alert, alert, alert, alert, alert
Alert, alert, alert, alert, we got 'em alert


I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
We go to court, we gon' plead the fifth
I know the judge, I'ma shoot him some chips
I got them keys, the keys, the keys
I got them keys, the keys, the keys",2489998
83460,1885501,LUV,rb,Tory Lanez,2016,1054653,{},"
We ah sip the Henny for the day baby
Bad man, we no stray baby
Oops I done fell for your way baby
I know girl but, everyone falls...


And I know from the first time, the first time
I seen your love, you got me baby
Even though girl I know that I will fall for you
You got to know that everyone falls
Oops I done fell so deep baby
Oops I want you for me baby
Oops I want you for me baby
Oops I done fell so deep cause...


Everyone falls in love sometimes
I don't know 'bout you but it ain't a crime
Neefi let me love you, love you, love you for long time baby
Neefi let me touch you, neefi let me love you 'til the morning, oh

Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me touch you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you


We ah sip that Henny for the day baby
Come my, my way baby
Top down on the highway baby
And if you let me love you, wait
Shawty she ain't even got a visa
Out of town, one night teaser
Need to tell them other niggas ease up
I'm falling but everyone falls


And I know from the first time, the first time
I seen your love, you got me baby
Even though girl I know that I will fall for you
You got to know that everyone falls
Oops I done fell too deep baby
Oops I think you got me baby
Oops I want you for me baby
I'm fallin' but
(But everyone falls...)

Everyone falls in love sometimes
I don't know 'bout you but it ain't a crime
Neefi let me love you, love you, love you for long time baby
Neefi let me touch you, neefi let me love you 'til the morning, oh


Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me touch you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm


And if you want me
And if you let me love you now
It's true what I need
Is someone for love me right now
It's true I'm a freak
It's time to love you now
And if you want me
I'm falling


Everyone falls in love sometimes
I don't know 'bout you but it ain't a crime
Neefi let me love you, love you, love you for long time baby
Neefi let me touch you, neefi let me love you 'til the morning, oh

Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me touch you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you
Mmm, ah, mmm, ah, mmm, if you let me love you, yeah",2494666
83496,1885937,7 Years Remix,rap,Sik World,2016,1115611,{},"
Lately, I feel so alone
Don't even know why I have a phone
Nobody hits me up and I'm stuck, never had someone that I could call my-own
It's lonely walking down this road
Fake friends that I didn't have to know
The same ones that fucked me over and whenever I need 'em and I turn around they just turn-ghost
I feel I'm at an all-time low
I am depressed and it hurts me to know
My ex is happy and I can't seem to cope
She's ignoring every text message I wrote
My anxiety's high, my medication's low
I am so stressed and I hate being home
I sit and overthink everything alone
I wish I had somebody to hold, damn
I'm sick and tired of putting up a front
Like I'm happy, but really I am in a slump
I try to stay strong, screaming, ""I don't give a fuck!""
But if anybody would give it, then I'm the one
I wanna put down my walls and open up
I hide behind this rapper I've become
Addicted to bein' accepted's like a drug
No one's here, I feel like I'm ready to plunge
I remember you said my music was wack
Teachers persuading me to try to give up my act
They said the image and the drive is what I lack
Made me think maybe I could never be a part of rap
Well, I ignored that, I said, ""Fuck it,"" and snapped
Over twenty million plays, where are my haters at?
I didn't need a label to give me a chance
The day I sell out an arena I'll feel like I'm the man
Buzzin' hard, but to find nothing
Never found someone who really loves me
People comin' around now 'cause I'm gettin' money
A few plays later, now they all see something
The same guy that is from the start
The same guy my ex left with a broken heart
The same guy who turned music into his art
The same seven-year-old who dreamt of bein' a star
I'm twenty-two, and I won't let myself down
I stood up right after I fell down
It's hard to see Heaven when you know you're Hell-bound
I never really opened up and that's until now
I hope that I never lose you
If I could choose one person, I would choose you
I hope you understand my pain
'Cause that's something that we all gotta go- through

I hate being down this road
Been down before
I feel like I need you more
I'm so alone
Since I was seven years old
My future's all I'd imagine
And now I'm here and I look back, I'm screamin', ""Damn it""
This the life, I never planned it
No, I never planned it",2495988
83702,1888703,Heathens,pop,twenty one pilots,2016,2899906,"{""​twenty one pilots""}","
All my friends are heathens, take it slow (In the city, boy, in the city)
Wait for them to ask you who you know
Please don't make any sudden moves
You don't know the half of the abuse
All my friends are heathens, take it slow
Wait for them to ask you who you know
Please don't make any sudden moves
You don't know the half of the abuse


Welcome to the room of people who have rooms of people
That they loved one day, locked away
Just because we check the guns at the door
Doesn't mean our brains will change from hand grenades
You'll never know the psychopath sitting next to you
You'll never know  the murderer sitting next to you
You'll think, ""How'd I get here, sitting next to you?""
But after all I've said, please don't forget


All my friends are heathens, take it slow
Wait for them to ask you who you know
Please don't make any sudden moves
You don't know the half of the abuse

We don't deal with outsiders very well
They say newcomers have a certain smell
You have trust issues, not to mention
They say they can smell your intentions
You'll never know the freak show sitting next to you
You'll have some weird people sitting next to you
You'll think ""How did I get here, sitting next to you?""
But after all I've said, please don't forget
(Watch it, watch it)


All my friends are heathens, take it slow (In the city, boy, in the city)
Wait for them to ask you who you know
Please don't make any sudden moves
You don't know the half of the abuse


All my friends are heathens, take it slow (Watch it)
Wait for them to ask you who you know (Watch it)
Please all my friends are heathens, take it slow (Watch it)
Wait for them to ask you who you know


Why'd you come? You knew you should have stayed (It's blasphemy)
I tried to warn you just to stay away (Wouldn't listen to me)
And now they're outside ready to bust (And guess what?)
It looks like you might be one of us",2532266
83743,1889120,Sucker for Pain,rap,"Lil Wayne, Wiz Khalifa, Imagine Dragons, Logic & Ty Dolla $ign",2016,1418983,"{""X Ambassadors"",""Lil Wayne / Wiz Khalifa / Imagine Dragons / Logic & Ty Dolla \\$ign""}","
I torture you
Take my hand through the flames
I torture you
I'm a slave to your games (I'm just a sucker for pain)
I wanna chain you up, I wanna tie you down
Oooohh, I'm just a sucker for pain


Dolla $ign! I'm a sucker for pain
I got the squad tatted on me from my neck to my ankles
Pressure from the man got us all in rebellion
We gon' go to war, yeah, without failure
Do it for the fam dog, ten toes down dog
Love and the loyalty; that's what we stand for
Alienated by society
All this pressure give me anxiety
Walk slow through the fire
Like, who gon' try us?
Feeling the world go against us
So we put the world on our shoulders

I torture you
Take my hand through the flames
I torture you
I'm a slave to your games (I'm just a sucker for pain)
I wanna chain you up, I wanna tie you down
Oooohh, I'm just a sucker for pain


I been at it with my homies, it don't matter, you don't know me
I been rollin' with my team, we the illest on the scene
I been riding 'round the city with my squad
I been riding 'round the city with my, squad
We just posted, getting crazy, living like this is so amazing
Hold up, take a step back when we roll up 'cause I know what
We been loyal, we been fam, we the ones you trust in
Won't hesitate to go straight to your head like a concussion
I know I been bussin', no discussion for my family
No hesitation, through my scope I see my enemy
Like what's up? Hold up, we finna re-load up
Yes I re-load up, I know what up, I know what up


I torture you
Take my hand through the flames
I torture you
I'm a slave to your games (I'm just a sucker for pain)
I wanna chain you up, I wanna tie you down
Oooohh, I'm just a sucker for pain

Uhh, devoted to destruction
A full dosage of detrimental dysfunction
I'm dying slow but the devil tryna rush me
See, I'm a fool for pain, I'm a dummy
Might cut my head off right after I slit my throat
Tongue kiss a shark, got jealous bitches up in the boat
Eating peanut butter and jelly fishes on toast
And if I get stung, I get stoked, might choke
Like I chewed a chunk of charcoal, naked in the North Pole
That's why my heart cold, full of sorrow, the lost soul
And only Lord knows when I'm coming to the crossroads
So I don't fear shit but tomorrow
And I'm a sucker for pain, it ain't nuttin' but pain
You just fuckin' complain, you ain't tough as you claim
Just stay up in your lane, just don't fuck with Lil Wayne
I'ma jump from my plane or stand in front of a train
'Cause I'm a sucker for pain


Used to doing bad now we feel like we just now getting it
Ain't got no other way so we start it and finish it
No pain, no gain
Never stand down, made our own way
Never going slow, we pick up the pace
This is what we wanted from a young age
No emotion, that's what business is
Lord have mercy on the witnesses

I torture you
Take my hand through the flames
I torture you
I'm just a sucker for pain


More pain
Got me beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin'
For more pain
Got me beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin'
For more pain
Got me beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin', beggin'
For more pain
Got me beggin'...",2554106
84328,1895670,Tiimmy Turner,rap,Desiigner,2016,2495366,{},"
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Grrrrraaaah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Git, git, git, git
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Git, git, git, git
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Git, git, git, git
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
(Vador)
Little Timmy Turner
Git, git, git, git


Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner

Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
Young boy walkin', wishin' for a burner
Four, five, six, ten ratchets on 'em
Ten niggas with 'em, ten clappin' on 'em
Dead niggas with 'em, dead niggas, get 'em
Four-five rip 'em, four-five zip 'em
You talk money, young niggas get 'em
Young niggas get 'em
Beluga, beluga, beluga
I fell in love with the Ruger
I fell in love with my jeweler
I fell in love with the mulah
Banana clips is going through ya
It's all about the rule
It's all about the move
It's all about the rules


Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner

Tiimmy (Git, git, git)
Tiimmy Turner (Git, git, git)
Eh, yeah he wish had a burner
Young nigga move and he kill with confirma
You get hit, nigga, left with earner
Choppa move, nigga, both want it
You get hit down in both summers
I got niggas rollin' dat would be dead with it
Choppa move, nigga, roll him with it
You choke down, roll, load and get
Hit a nigga up, reload the semi
Gotta flow over demon
Thinking all about Tiimmy
Just the thought of them with me
All my killas said they with me


Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace



Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner
He was wishin' for a burner
To kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Fuck bitch on BET
Have her walkin', she fuckin' for BET
Wildin' for wallet
Kill everybody walkin'
He knows that his soul in the furnace
Tiimmy, Tiimmy, Tiimmy Turner",2746924
84565,1899207,YuNg BrAtZ,rap,XXXTENTACION,2016,1103296,{},"
Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy
Bros on your block with that Glock, right now (Ooh, hey, ayy, too much, ooh)
Try me like an opp (Ayy!) and indeed, get shot down, okay (Hey, ooh)
Okay (Ayy)
Ayy she wanna, she wanna l-l-lick my dick like- like a what? (Nice!) (Hey, hey, hey, ooh, hey, ooh, hey, huh, yah)
Lick my dick like Lil Wayne lollipop, huh! (Huh, yah, hoo)
Hi, my name's Ryan! (Yeah, hey, hey, hey, hey, ooh, ayy)
What do they call me? Call me wolf in sheep's skin? (Yah, ayy, ayy, yah, ahoo)


Try me, might fight (Ayy), fist fuck, on sight
Wrist heavy, fat dyke, pop Molly, Mike Ike
I got glacial white ice and my bitch rack nice
And I do fight dykes, ride my dick like a bike (Ayy, ayy, ayy)


Huh?
Huh?
Huh?

I got black in my voots (Yah, ooh), my name's Toby, like I'm Roots (Ayy, wow)
Grab that bat, ""Hey Bruce"" (Hey, hey, hey), swing that bitch might lose a tooth (Whatever)
She suck dick with no tooth (Hey, hey), my nose runny like, ""Achoo""
With that pussy (Hey, hey), I got coins, might insert right in her groin
It's like jelly, ayy (Wow, hey), dick right in her belly, uh, yuh (Ow!)
Baby got back, yuh (Hey), bitch, come look at my tats, (Damn!) uh, yuh
You got taxed (Hey, hey), yuh, my head big like Bratz, uh, yuh (Hey, hey)
Dump that bitch (Woo), yuh, who gonna hold my racks, uh, huh (Yah)


Yea-ea-eah, uh
Say somethin'
Oof",2807850
84627,1900130,XXL Freshmen 2016 Cypher - Part 2,rap,XXL,2016,1754634,"{""Denzel Curry"",""Kodak Black"",""Lil Uzi Vert"",""21 Savage"",""Lil Yachty""}","
Rest in power, it's all about power
Squeeze two lemons together and really all you'll have is sour
Diesel, niggas'll smoke your ass to have the juice
Riding around in an all black coupe
Couple of pigeons that's ready to shoot, shit
Ducking and bucking and dodging and dropping
With 48 ounces and cigarette butts
Fucking around with the up echelon
They will turn you to cubes and I hope you be gone
Envelope, overload, cranium overdose
Denny Cascade, what the fuck is the halves
Click clack, get powed, bitch, it's a wrap
Tierra my witness, I pray for a nap
Youngin' and restless, return with a past
Key in ignition, foot on the gas
None of you niggas is acting that jab
Gold teeth in the Glock and a Cybertech mask
Ring gun, particles, turn you into molecules
Planet shrooms, planet shrooms, I'll take you to my panic room

Yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah
All these niggas stealin' my style, can I get my flow back?
Yeah, bop on that bitch like Kodak
Yeah, bitch, you know that
Yeah, I push your shit all back (Woop, woop)
Told that bitch I got money, ayy (Woop)
Countin' them hundreds, it's nothing, ayy
Told that lil' bitch I got money, ayy
Told that lil' bitch that's it nothing, ayy (Skrrt, skrrt, tied)
Hit that bitch right from the back, she got turkey, I knock out that bitch like it's stuffing, yeah (Skrrt, skrrt, tied, okay!)
Told that lil' bitch that I'm with it
Told that lil' bitch that I'm with it
Ayy, wait, 21, Lil Boat, yeah (Win)
Denzel Curry cut your throat, yeah (Yeah)
Kodak do the most, yeah (Win)
Told that lil' bitch I got all the money (Uh)
I swear this shit is just nothing (Uh)
I just be dancin' right up on that bitch, yeah
What you be stuntin'?


That boy not gang, no, that boy not my friend
I hang with my gang, the same gang that felt all of my pain
When I was struggling through the rain
When I had no guap with no ice
Wasn't no food but rice
All of these bitches they want me but they get one night
Fuck 'em, I give a fuck what you sayin'
Bitch nigga know I ain't playing
I'm 'bout my fetty
Sailing Team armored, we ready
Fuck up that nigga if he talk out too heavy
I'm 'bout it, chains on my neck cost me twenty
Look at your diamonds
Your diamonds look cloudy, they fake
Young nigga in the Gucci Stans
Fuck with me if you wanna die
Young nigga, I don't wear no suit and ties
Fuck no
Lil Boat!

21, 21, 21, 21, 21, 21
I sent my bitch to the store 'cause we ran out of soda (What?)
Bitch, I'm tryna cook this yola (21)
Hundred round drum on the bottom of that shit (Do-do-do-do-do)
Chop a nigga down like a fucking lawnmower (Grrr)
AK-47 'round my motherfucking shoulder (21)
Pull up in a Rover, then I pulled off on a Fisker
Pulled up on your bitch, she sucked my dick
And then you kissed her (Goddamn, 21)
Young Savage, bitch
And I don't play 'round with them swishers (Hmm?)
I just smoke them woods (Yeah)
Bitch, I'm from the hood (Yeah)
Zone 6, Bouldercrest Road, you can't go there
21 Gang, bitch, yeah (21, 21, 21)
I'm in NYC, I think I got a fucking show there (Yeah)
Hold up, Rollie on my wrist
Rollie on my bitch (What?), 30 on my waist (What?)
30 to your face (Yeah), 60 to your face (Yeah)
90 to your face (Yeah), that's a closed case (Yeah)
You an old nigga, man, you washed up
Young Savage, man, I got my car washed up
Pulled up on a motherfucking nigga, wrapped up (Yeah)
Then I pulled up in a motherfucking Brink's truck
21, 21, 21, 21, 21, 21

Who the fuck picked this lil' sorry ass beat?
I'm from the ugly corner, man, them lil' sour ass streets
Damn, homie, I'm the one who let your starving ass eat
And you was hungry, I ain't have to let your sorry ass eat
My cousin G-Wayne got off of manslaughter last week
Gave my dog a buck fifty, that nigga brought me back three
I'm a- a nigga's broad and get up all in them cheeks
Tied, they dead flies",2814503
84862,1902734,Let Me Love You,pop,DJ Snake,2016,3369636,"{""Justin Bieber""}","
I used to believe
We were burnin' on the edge of somethin' beautiful (Somethin' beautiful)
Somethin' beautiful (Somethin' beautiful)
Sellin' a dream
Smoke and mirrors keep us waitin' on a miracle (Oh)
On a miracle (Oh)


Say, go through the darkest of days
Heaven's a heartbreak away
Never let you go, never let me down
Oh, it's been a hell of a ride
Driving the edge of a knife
Never let you go, never let me down


Don't you give up, nah-nah-nah
I won't give up, nah-nah-nah
Let me love you
Let me love you
Don't you give up, nah-nah-nah
I won't give up, nah-nah-nah
Let me love you
Let me love you
Oh, no, no, no, no, no
Oh, no, no, no, no

(Oh-oh)
(Oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh)


Don't fall asleep (Ooh)
At the wheel, we've got a million miles ahead of us
Miles ahead of us
All that we need (Oh)
Is a rude awakening to know we're good enough
(Yeah) Know we're good enough


Say, go through the darkest of days
Heaven's a heartbreak away
Never let you go, never let me down
Oh it's been a hell of a ride
Driving the edge of a knife
Never let you go, never let me down


Don't you give up, nah-nah-nah
I won't give up, nah-nah-nah
Let me love you
Let me love you
Don't you give up, nah-nah-nah
I won't give up, nah-nah-nah
Let me love you
Let me love you
Oh, no, no, no, no, no
Oh, no, no, no, no

(Oh-oh)
(Oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh)


Never let you go, never let you go, go
Never let you go, never let you go, go
Never let you go, woah
No, never let you go, woo
Never let you go, never let you go, go
Never let you go, never let you go, go
Oh, no, no, no, no
Never let you go, yeah, yeah
No, never let you go


Don't you give up, nah-nah-nah
I won't give up, nah-nah-nah
Let me love you
Let me love you
Don't you give up, nah-nah-nah
I won't give up, nah-nah-nah
Let me love you
Let me love you",2819412
84903,1903237,Black Beatles,rap,Rae Sremmurd,2016,4812310,"{""Gucci Mane""}","
Black Beatles in the city
Be back immediately to confiscate the moneys
(Ear Drummers)
Rae Sremm, Guwop, Mike WiLL!
I sent flowers, but you said you didn't receive 'em
But you said you didn't need 'em (Mike WiLL Made-It!)


That girl is a real crowd pleaser (Oh, yeah)
Small world, all her friends know of me (Know me)
Young bull livin' like an old geezer (Ah)
Quick-release the cash, watch it fall slowly (Slowly)
Frat girls still tryna get even (Get even)
Haters mad for whatever reason (Yeah, yeah)
Smoke in the air, binge drinking (Oh, oh)
They lose it when the DJ drops the needle (Remember)


Getting so gone I'm not blinkin'
What in the world was I thinkin'?
New day, new money to be made
There is nothin' to explain
I'm a fuckin' black Beatle, cream seats in the Regal
Rockin' John Lennon lenses, like to see 'em spread eagle
Took a bitch to the club and let her party on the table
Screamin', ""Everybody's famous!""
Like clockwork, I blow it all
And get some more
Get you somebody that can do both
Black Beatles got the babes belly rollin'
She think she love me, I think she trollin'

That girl is a real crowd pleaser (Oh, yeah)
Small world, all her friends know of me (Know me)
Young bull livin' like an old geezer (Ah)
Quick-release the cash, watch it fall slowly (Slowly)
Frat girls still tryna get even (Get even)
Haters mad for whatever reason (Yeah, yeah)
Smoke in the air, binge drinkin' (Oh, oh)
They lose it when the DJ drops the needle (Remember)


Came in with two girls, look like strippers in their real clothes
A broke ho can only point me to a rich ho
A yellow bitch with green hair, a real weirdo
Black man, yellow Lamb', red light go
They seen that Guwop and them just came in through the side door
There's so much money on the floor we buyin' school clothes
Why you bring the money machine to the club for?
Pint of lean, pound of weed, and a kilo
I Eurostep past a hater like I'm Rondo
I upgrade your baby mama to a condo
Like Chapo servin' llello to the gringos
Black Beatle, club close when I say so


That girl is a real crowd pleaser (Oh, yeah)
Small world, all her friends know of me (Know me)
Young bull livin' like an old geezer (Ah)
Quick-release the cash, watch it fall slowly (Slowly)
Frat girls still tryna get even (Get even)
Haters mad for whatever reason (Yeah, yeah)
Smoke in the air, binge drinkin' (Oh, oh)
They lose it when the DJ drops the needle (Remember)

She's a good teaser, and we blowin' reefer
Your body like a work of art, baby
Don't fuck with me, I'll break your heart, baby
D&G on me, I got a lot of flavor
15 hundred on my feet, I'm tryna kill these haters
I had haters when I was broke, I'm rich, I still got haters
I had hoes when I was broke, I'm rich, I'm still a player
I wear leather Gucci jackets like it's still the 80s
I've been blowin' OG Kush, I feel a lil' sedated
I can't worry about a broke nigga or a hater
Black Beatle, bitch, me and Paul McCartney related


That girl is a real crowd pleaser (Oh, yeah)
Small world, all her friends know of me (Know me)
Young bull livin' like an old geezer (Ah)
Quick-release the cash, watch it fall slowly (Slowly)
Frat girls still tryna get even (Get even)
Haters mad for whatever reason (Yeah, yeah)
Smoke in the air, binge drinkin' (Oh, oh)
They lose it when the DJ drops the needle (Remember)",2819932
84962,1903963,X,rap,21 Savage & Metro Boomin,2016,2552247,{Future},"
Ten bad bitches in a mansion
Wrist on Milly Rock, them diamonds on me dancin'
When you workin' hard, then your money start expandin'
I got model bitches wanna lick me like some candy
And them drugs come in handy
Last name Savage, bitch, but no, I'm not Randy
Hit her with no condom, had to make her eat a Plan B
And I'm sippin' on that codeine, not Brandy (21)


Hah (Hah) I'm just stuntin' on my ex-bitch (Hah)
Huh (Hol' up) I'm just flexin' on my ex-bitch (Hah)
Hol' up, I'm just stuntin' on my ex-bitch (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up) I'm just flexin' on my ex-bitch (21, 21, 21)
Fuck a wedding ring, I bought a necklace (21, 21)
Diamonds got the flu, try not to catch this (21, 21)
I left that ho alone 'cause she was ratchet (Hah, woah, woah)
All these bitches salty, they can't stand me (Hah, woah)


Flexin' on that bitch, hol' up (Flexin' on that bitch)
Bought a necklace on that bitch, hol' up (21, 21)
Her friend gon' lick me like a fruit roll up (Roll, up, roll up)
She in her feelings on the 'Gram, grow up (Bandz)
21! Flexin' on that bitch, hol' up (Hol' up)
I ain't textin' back that bitch, hol' up (No way, no way)
I ain't stressin' bout that bitch, hol' up (Savage)
21 gon' get the stick, hol' up
Hol' up, hol' up, bitch I like to ball (Like to ball)
Hol' up, hol' up, without no weave, you bald
Hol' up, bitch I spent your rent inside the mall (21, 21)
Hol' up, she got a nigga, but he broke, she lost (Savage)
Hol' up, at this private location
Hol' up, put her back in rotation (Woo)
Hol' up, bitches on me, immigration
Hol' up, goin' through the translations

Hah (Hah) I'm just stuntin' on my ex-bitch (Hah)
Huh (Hol' up) I'm just flexin' on my ex-bitch (Hah, 21)
Hol' up, I'm just stuntin' on my ex-bitch (Hol' up)
Hol' up (Hol' up, hol' up, nigga) I'm just flexin' on my ex-bitch (21, 21, 21)
Fuck a wedding ring, I bought a necklace (21, 21, 21)
Diamonds got the flu, try not to catch this (21, 21)
I left that ho alone 'cause she was ratchet (Hah)
All these bitches salty, they can't stand me (Woo, hah)


Hol' up (Hol' up) bitch my Rolex on fleek (On fleek)
Hol' up, bitch my diamonds on fleek (Bling, blaww)
Hol' up, I got gold on my teeth (Hol' up, on my teeth, teeth)
Hol' up, you got Rainbow on your feet? (Broke bitch, Bandz)
Hol' up, corny niggas don't impress me
Hol' up, never let a bitch dress me
Hol' up, can't no motherfuckin' judge check me
Hol' up, I don't give a fuck about no ring (Yuh)
Hol' up, money make my old bitches hate me
Hol' up (hol' up) bitch you still stay on Section 8 (Broke bitch)
Hol' up, my new bitch wetter than a lake (Wet as fuck)
Hol' up, and she love to let me paint her face (21)
Hol' up, fell in love with some good throat
Hol' up, fell in love with some good throat
Hol' up, ripped them confidential papers up
Hol' up, you done made me wake my savage up (21, 21, hol' up)

Hah (Hah) I'm just stuntin' on my ex-bitch (Hah)
Hol' up (Hah) I'm just flexin' on my ex-bitch (Hah)
21, I'm just stuntin' on my ex-bitch (Hol' up)
Poof (Hol' up) I'm just flexin' on my ex-bitch (21, 21, 21)
Fuck a wedding ring, I bought a necklace (21, 21)
Diamonds got the flu, try not to catch this (21, 21)
I left that ho alone 'cause she was ratchet (Hah)
All these bitches salty, they can't stand me (Hah)


Ten bad bitches in a mansion
Wrist on Milly Rock, them diamonds on me dancin'
When you workin' hard then your money start expandin'
(If Young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you)
And them drugs come in handy
Last name Hendrix, bitch, but no, I'm no Jimi
Hit 'em with no condoms, shipped her right back out the country
And I'm sippin' codeine, tats all on my stomach",2820703
84966,1904058,No Heart,rap,21 Savage & Metro Boomin,2016,2375124,{},"
Southside, Southside on the, Southside on the, hey
Metro Boomin want some more, nigga


Young Savage, why you trappin' so hard?
Why these niggas cappin' so hard?
Why you got a 12 car garage?
Why you pullin' all these rappers' cards?
'Cause these niggas pussy and I'm hard
I turn that fuckin' soft into some hard
I grew up in the streets without no heart
I'm prayin' to my Glock and my carbon


I sit back and read like Cat in the Hat
21 Savage the cat with the MAC
21 Savage not Boyz N The Hood
But I pull up on you, shoot your ass in the back
Stuart Little, heard these niggas some rats
Pockets full of cheese, bitch, I got racks
I'm a real street nigga, bitch
I am not one of these niggas bangin' on wax
Pussy niggas love sneak dissin'
'Til I pull up on 'em, slap 'em out with the fire
Wet your mama's house, wet your grandma's house
Keep shootin' until somebody die
So many shots the neighbor looked at the calendar
Thought it was Fourth of July
You was with your friends playin' Nintendo
I was playin' 'round with that fire
Seventh grade, I got caught with a pistol
Sent me to Panthersville
Eighth grade, started playin' football
Then I was like fuck the field
Ninth grade, I was knocking niggas out
Nigga like Holyfield
Fast forward, nigga, 2016
And I'm screamin' fuck a deal
Bad bitch with me, she so thick
I don't even need a pill
I listened to your raps, thought you was hard
You ain't even street for real
Niggas love sneak dissin' on Twitter
They don't want beef for real
And all these niggas play like they tough
'Til a nigga get killed
'Til a nigga get spilled, 'til your blood get spilled
I'ma at your favorite rapper, shoot him like I'm John Dill'
""I been with you since day one
Savage, I ain't even hatin'""
So what's up with all that Instagram shit?
""Savage, I was just playin'""
Y'all pussy niggas fakin'
Bitch, I hang around them Haitians
Pull up on you, tie your kids up
Pistol whip you while your bitch naked
""Come on, man, Savage, you know I always play your mixtape""
Yeah, nigga, fuck all that, ask your bitch how my dick tastes

Young Savage, why you trappin' so hard?
Why these niggas cappin' so hard?
Why you got a 12 car garage?
Why you pullin' all these rappers' cards?
'Cause these niggas pussy and I'm hard
I turn that fuckin' soft into some hard
I grew up in the streets without no heart
I'm prayin' to my Glock and my carbon


So much dope that it broke the scale
They say crack kills, nigga, my crack sells
My brother in the kitchen and he wrappin' a bale
Louis V my bag and Louis V on my belt
Chain swangin', diamonds blangin', hold up
Pistol swangin', gang bangin', hold up
Niggas actin' like groupies, they don't know us
Little do they know, they bitches fuckin' on the tour bus


Young Savage, why you trappin' so hard?
Why these niggas cappin' so hard?
Why you got a 12 car garage?
Why you pullin' all these rappers' cards?
'Cause these niggas pussy and I'm hard
I turn that fuckin' soft into some hard
I grew up in the streets without no heart
I grew up in the streets without no heart

So much dope that it broke the scale
They say crack kills, nigga, my crack sells
My brother in the kitchen and he wrappin' a bale
Louis V my bag and Louis V on my belt",2820812
85361,1908264,Do You Mind,rap,DJ Khaled,2016,1112954,"{""Rick Ross"",""Nicki Minaj"",Jeremih,""Chris Brown"",Future,""August Alsina""}","
Another one
We The Best Music!


Yo, he ain't messin' with no average chick, pop, pop
He got Nicki, he know that he hit the jackpot
Every baller tryna score, check them shot clocks
But I hit 'em with them 'Bron-Iguodala blocks
Eat the cake and he suck on my toes, yes
Hittin' them home runs, I be like ""Go Mets!""
I want a dude that still kiss me when he mad
Type to cop me diamonds, he can miss me with them bags


Girl, we been right here, thinkin' 'bout it all night (Oh)
Baby, you should be up in my bed, ooh
Do you mind, do you mind? Baby, you (DJ Khaled)
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?


I'm just tryna get to know ya
Get a little closer, maybe post up, ooh
Do you mind? Do you mind? Do you mind?
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?
Girl, we been right here, thinkin' 'bout it all night (Oh)
Baby, you should be up in my bed, ooh
Do you mind, do you mind? Baby, you
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?

You know, you know, you know, you know
He ain't got forever and ever
You know, you know, you know, you know
Let me be the one, baby, you deserve better
You know, you know, you know, you know
We ain't got forever and ever
You know, you know, you know, you know
Let me be the one, baby, do you mind? Do you mind?


Oh, do you mind if I talk to you?
And do you mind if I touch you there?
Girl, you know you can't do no better, baby
I know that it don't get no better than me
Let's not waste the time
You ain't gotta hold back (Hold back) 'cause once I get inside
You won't change your mind, you know that you can take it
No need to hesitate, I need it, impatient (Yeah)
I'm not used to waiting (Yeah, yeah), I want you to give it to me
Come on let me taste it, until I get enough
Hope you're ready 'cause I'ma beat it up
Do you mind when I'ma have it? Know how to heat it up, yeah


I should, I should be the one, baby, you gon' learn that
Girl, I know your body, know where every curve at
We be going all night, 'til the early
Know you, know you wanna take off when you on my runway
We ain't gotta talk, bodies conversate
Baby, by the way I touch you, you know what I'm saying
Oh, oh, oh, ride it slow
Oh, oh, oh

I'm just tryna get to know ya
Get a little closer, maybe post up, ooh
Do you mind? Do you mind? Do you mind?
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?
Girl, we been right here, thinkin' 'bout it all night (Oh)
Baby, you should be up in my bed, ooh
Do you mind, do you mind? Baby, you
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?


You know, you know, you know, you know
He ain't got forever and ever
You know, you know, you know, you know
Let me be the one, baby, you deserve better
You know, you know, you know, you know
We ain't got forever and ever
You know, you know, you know, you know
Let me be the one, baby, do you mind? Do you mind?
Man with all this red carpet shit, baby
You know what I'm saying, Future Hendrix


I'ma do that favor, drippin' flavor in you two piece
I'ma keep my promise, never treat you like a groupie
Calamari dinners, got you eatin' raw sushi
Still in the trap, but I like my bitches bougie
Two cups of styrofoam, excuse me lil' mama
I can hold you down, be your friend and your lover (Brrrp)
You want watches, new Versaces, you want Céline (Ugh!)
Top back, screamin' money ain't a ting (Boss)

Seein' two G-wagons in my driveway (Woo!)
FaceTime, two black bottles by my fireplace (Ugh!)
Fell out with your peoples so you took the pictures down (Yeah)
Instagram ain't been the same since you so distant now (Woo!)
Took you shoppin' in other places that I won't name (Boss)
First time your friends really got to see Balmain (Woo!)
20 million cash, seen it there with my two eyes (Ugh!)
We the best and I told you this back in '05
(Maybach Music)


I'm just tryna get to know ya
Get a little closer, maybe post up, ooh
Do you mind? Do you mind? Do you mind?
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?
Girl, we been right here, thinkin' 'bout it all night (Oh)
Baby, you should be up in my bed, ooh
Do you mind, do you mind? Baby, you
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?


Ooh, just in case you need me, I don't mind, uh
Yo, tell them what to do, tell them what to do
Tell them what to do
When you see a bad bitch in front of you, baby
Yeah, assume the position


I'm just tryna get to know ya
Get a little closer, maybe post up, ooh
Do you mind? Do you mind? Do you mind?
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?
Girl, we been right here, thinkin' 'bout it all night (Oh)
Baby, you should be up in my bed, ooh
Do you mind, do you mind? Baby, you
Do you mind? Do-do you mind? Do you mind?",2825347
86172,1918291,Im Sorry,rap,Joyner Lucas,2016,1160556,{},"
Go ahead and call me a coward
Say that I'm not strong because I'm not like you
Go ahead and call me crazy
'Cause I live in a maze, tell me how about you?
I think I live in my head
Sometimes I think that I'm dead, I hide behind my youth
Know I been losing my mind
And I'm a little behind, step inside my shoes
'Cause I've never been happy with myself
And I don't need no one feeling bad for me
Tryna to offer me pity and throw jabs at me
Wanna give me advice and then laugh at me
Behind closed doors, just close the door
Let me be by myself-just me and myself
I'm tired of living, I cry
I hear it's easy to die, I wanna see for myself
And I know that sounds crazy to everyone else
But I'm depressed as fuck, stressed as fuck
Ain't no medicine that could cure what's the test as drugs
I mean, I need extra love
And that ain't even enough, said that ain't even enough
And where the fuck is God? (God, God)
Damn, maybe I ain't believing enough
But today, we gonna see if he's real
And if He is, then I guess I'm prolly going to hell
Look, I ain't wanna die like this
I ain't picture my life like this
They don't know what it's like like this
Pretending I'm happy so I can smile like this, and laugh like you
Sometimes I wonder if I ever act like you
Could I finally fit in and maybe relax like, ""Woo!""
Or would you feel lost without me?
'Cause honestly, I think the world is better off without me
And my mind's spinning, this is the line finish
Truth is I don't care how they feel about my feelings
I made up my mind, I'm going out like Robin Williams
I guess I'm not the Ordinary People of John Legend
And I've been suicidal since the day I was nine, shit
Okay, the day I was nine
I've been tired of being bullied, couldn't stay out the fire
Grandma told me I should take it one day at a time
And dammit, look at me now, fuck
Fuck, pen runnin' out, shit, fu-, ugh
Look, just know it's a new day
But if you reading this, then it's prolly too late, blaow!

Just make sure you tell my family it's okay, I'm sorry
But it's too late, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
I don't wanna live to see another day, I'm sorry
But I can't stay, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
Just make sure you tell my family it's okay, I'm sorry
But it's too late, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
I don't wanna live to see another day, I'm sorry
But I can't stay, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me


I hope you got what you wanted
I hope you finally happy, it's too late for you
Been going out of my mind
You don't know how many times that I done prayed for you
I hope you hear me, goddammit
'Cause I got so much shit that I wanna say to you
I used to shine, now I'm all in the dark
I remember I used to tell you to follow your heart
But goddammit, look at you now, it's all of your fault
How could you? Maybe it's my fault
I shoulda paid more attention to what you been doin'
Maybe I should have been more of an influence
I can't believe that you're dead, I fu-
I read your letter and all I could do is have mixed feelings about it
But I'll forever be attached to you (Damn)
Part of me feels bad for you
A part of me feels like you weak and I'm mad at you
And I don't mean to be insensitive
But I don't understand how we couldn't prevent this shit
You took the easy way out, goddammit, you did
I mean, look what you did, I'm so fucking upset
How could you be so selfish?
Nigga, how could you be so selfish?
Now you're gone, you done left me so helpless
I wonder what God thinks, I hope you in God's place behaving yourself
Yo, what the fuck you gotta say for yourself? (Say for yourself)
Look, I really feel lost without you
I hate the fact you think the world is better off without you
And my mind's spinning, this is the line finish
Truth is: I don't care how you feel about my feelings
And I'd be lying to you if I told you I'm fine, listen
I know that you can hear me, all I need is like five minutes
I just wanna reach inside the casket and pull you out
I'm sorry this is something that we both couldn't figure out
I wish I could hear you now, is your soul missing?
I wonder if you could do it again, would you do it different?
Tell me what death is like
Was it meant for you, brodie? Did the heaven support it?
Are you fucking happy now? Did you get what you wanted?
Isn't this what you wanted? I feel the temperature falling
And you've been suicidal back then you were nine?
Yeah, even back then, you was nine
We was living on the edge, couldn't stay out the fire
Grandma told us we should take it one day at a time
And damn it, look at you now, shit
But it's a new day
And if you can't hear me, it's probably too late, fuck!

Just make sure you tell my family it's okay, I'm sorry
But it's too late, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
I don't wanna live to see another day, I'm sorry
But I can't stay, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
Just make sure you tell my family it's okay, I'm sorry
But it's too late, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
I don't wanna live to see another day, I'm sorry
But I can't stay, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
Just make sure you tell my family it's okay, I'm sorry
But it's too late, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
I don't wanna live to see another day, I'm sorry
But I can't stay, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
Just make sure you tell my family it's okay, I'm sorry
But it's too late, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me
I don't wanna live to see another day, I'm sorry
But I can't stay, I'm sorry, so much weighing on me",2836122
86674,1923431,Nikes,rb,Frank Ocean,2016,2204863,{},"
These bitches want Nikes
They looking for a check
Tell 'em it ain't likely
Said she need a ring like Carmelo
You must be on that white like Othello
All you want is Nikes, but the real ones
Just like you, just like me
I don't play, I don't make time
But if you need dick, I got you
And I yam from the line
Pour up for A$AP, R.I.P. Pimp C
R.I.P. Trayvon, that nigga look just like me
Woo, fuckin' buzzin', woo
That my little cousin, he got a little trade
His girl keep the scales, a little mermaid
We out by the pool, some little mermaids
Me and them gel like twigs with them bangs
Now that's a real mermaid
You been holding your breath, weighted down
Punk madre, punk papá
He don't care for me, but he cares for me
And that's good enough
We don't talk much or nothin'
But when we talkin' 'bout somethin'
We have good discussion
I met his friends last week
Feels like they're up to somethin'
That's good for us

We'll let you guys prophesy
We'll let you guys prophesy
We gon' see the future first
We'll let you guys prophesy
We gon' see the future first
Living so the last night feels like a past life
Speaking of the don't know what got into people
Devil be possessin' homies
Demons try to body-jump
Why you think I'm in this bitch wearing a fucking yarmulke?
Acid on me like the rain
Weed crumbles into glitter
Rain, glitter
We laid out on this wet floor
Away turf, no Astro
Mesmerized how the strobes glow
Look at all the people feet dance
I know that your nigga came witcha
But he ain't witcha
We only human and it's humid in these Balmains
I mean my balls sticking to my jeans
We breathin' pheromones, Amber Rose
Sippin' pink-gold lemonades
Feelin'

I may be younger, but I'll look after you
We're not in love, but I'll make love to you
When you're not here, I'll save some for you
I'm not him, but I'll mean something to you
I'll mean something to you
I'll mean something to you
You got a roommate, he'll hear what we do
It's only awkward if you're fucking him too

",2841610
86702,1923870,Godspeed,rb,Frank Ocean,2016,1076297,{},"
I will always love you
How I do
Let go of a prayer for you
Just a sweet word
The table is prepared for you
Wishing you godspeed, glory
There will be mountains you won't move
Still, I'll always be there for you
How I do
I let go of my claim on you
It's a free world
You'll look down on where you came from sometimes
But you'll have this place to call home always


This love will keep us through blinding of the eyes
Silence in the ears, darkness of the mind (Until it's time)
This love will keep through blinding of the eyes (Oh)
Silence in the ears, darkness of the mind (Oh)
This love will keep us through blinding of the eyes (Oh, it's 'til it's time we die)
Silence in the ears, darkness of the mind

Oh, oh
I'll always love you
Until the time we die
Oh, oh",2842075
86703,1923874,Ivy,pop,Frank Ocean,2016,2455605,{},"
I thought that I was dreamin' when you said you love me
The start of nothin'
I had no chance to prepare, I couldn't see you comin'
The start of nothin'
Ooh, I could hate you now
It's quite alright to hate me now
When we both know that deep down
The feeling still deep down is good


If I could see through walls, I could see you're faking
If you could see my thoughts, you would see your face is
Safe in my rental like an armored truck back then
We didn't give a fuck back then
I ain't a kid no more
We'll never be those kids again
We'd drive to Syd's
Had the X6 back then, back then
No matter what I did, my waves wouldn't dip back then
Everything sucked back then, we were friends

I thought that I was dreamin' when you said you love me
The start of nothin'
I had no chance to prepare, I couldn't see you comin'
The start of nothin'
Ooh, I could hate you now
It's quite alright to hate me now
But we both know that deep down
The feeling still deep down is good


In the halls of your hotel
Arm around my shoulder so I could tell
How much I meant to you, meant it sincere back then
We had time to kill back then
You ain't a kid no more, we'll never be those kids again
It's not the same, ivory's illegal, don't you remember?


I broke your heart last week
You'll probably feel better by the weekend
Still remember, had you going crazy
Screamin' my name, the feeling deep down is good


I thought that I was dreamin' when you said you love me
The start of nothin'
Had no chance to prepare, couldn't see you comin'
And we started from nothin'
Ooh, I could hate you now
It's alright to hate me now
We both know that deep down
The feeling still deep down is good

All the things I didn't mean to say, I didn't mean to do
There were things you didn't need to say, did you mean to? Mean to?
I've been dreamin' of you, dreamin' of you
I've been dreamin' of you, dreamin' of you
I've been dreamin', dreamin'",2842065
86704,1923875,White Ferrari,rb,Frank Ocean,2016,1748518,{},"
Bad luck to talk on these rides
Mind on the road, your dilated eyes watch the clouds float
White Ferrari, had a good time
(Sweet sixteen, how was I supposed to know anything?)
I let you out at Central
I didn't care to state the plain
Kept my mouth closed
We're both so familiar
White Ferrari, good times


Stick by me, close by me
You were fine, you were fine here
That's just a slow body
You left when I forgot to speak
So I text the speech, lesser speeds, Texas speed, yes
Basic takes its toll on me, 'ventually, 'ventually, yes
Ahh, on me 'ventually, 'ventually, yes


I care for you still and I will forever
That was my part of the deal, honest
We got so familiar
Spending each day of the year
White Ferrari, good times
In this life (Life), in this life (Life)
One too many years
Some tattooed eyelids on a facelift
(Thought you might want to know now)
Mind over matter is magic, I do magic
If you think about it, it'll be over in no time
And that's life
(Love)

I'm sure we're taller in another dimension
You say we're small and not worth the mention
You're tired of movin', your body's achin'
We could vacay, there's places to go
Clearly, this isn't all that there is
Can't take what's been given (No way)
But we're so okay here, we're doing fine
Primal and naked
You dream of walls that hold us in prison
It's just a skull, least that's what they call it
And we're free to roam",2842066
86705,1923876,Solo,pop,Frank Ocean,2016,1343254,{},"
Hand me a towel, I'm dirty dancing
By myself, gone off tabs of that acid
Form me a circle, watch my Jagger
Might lose my jacket and hit a solo, one time
We too loud in public, them police turned down the function
Now we outside and the timing's perfect
Forgot to tell you
Gotta tell you how much I vibe with you
And we don't gotta be solo
Now stay away from highways
My eyes like them red lights
Right now, I prefer yellow
Redbone, so mellow
Fuck 'round, be cutting you
Think we were better off solo
I got that act right in the Windy City that night
No trees to blow through, but blow me and I owe you
Two grams when the sun rise
Smoking good, rolling solo
Solo (Solo), solo (Solo)
S-solo (Solo), s-solo (Solo)

It's hell on Earth and the city's on fire
Inhale, in hell, there's heaven
There's a bull and a matador dueling in the sky
Inhale, in hell, there's heaven
Oh, oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh, oh
Solo
Solo
Solo
Solo


I'm skipping showers and switching socks, sleeping good and long
Bones feeling dense as fuck, wish a nigga would cross
And catch a solo, on time
White leaf on my boxers, green leaf turn to vapors for the low
And that mean cheap, 'cause ain't shit free and I know it
Even love ain't, 'cause this nut cost, that clinic killed my soul
But you gotta hit the pussy raw, though
Now your baby mama ain't so vicious
All she want is her picket fence
And you protest and you picket sign
But them courts won't side with you
Won't let you fly solo, yeah
I wanted that act right in Colorado that night
I brought trees to blow through, but it's just me and no you
Stayed up 'til my phone died
Smoking big, rolling solo

It's hell on Earth and the city's on fire
Inhale, in hell, there's heaven
There's a bull and a matador dueling in the sky
Inhale, in hell, there's heaven
Oh, oh, oh, oh
Oh, oh, oh, oh
Solo
Solo
Solo (By myself)
Solo
Solo
Solo
Solo
Solo",2842067
86708,1923881,Nights,rb,Frank Ocean,2016,3173207,{},"


Round your city, round the clock
Everybody needs you
No, you can't make everybody equal
Although you got beaucoup family
You don't even got nobody bein' honest with you
Breathe 'til I evaporated
My whole body see through
Transportation, handmade (G)
And I know it better than most people
I don't trust 'em anyways
You can't break the law with them
Get some gushy, have a calm night
Shooters killin' left and right
Workin' through your worst night
If I get my money right
You know I won't need you
And I tell you (Bitch)
I hope the sack is full up
I'm fuckin', no, I'm fucked up
Spend it when I get that
I ain't tryna keep you
Can't keep up a conversation
Can't nobody reach you
Why your eyes well up?
Did you call me from a séance?
You are from my past life
Hope you're doin' well, bruh
I been out here head first
Always like the head first
Signal comin' in and out
Hope you're doin' well, bruh
Everybody needs you
Everybody needs you
Ooh, nani nani
This feel like a Quaalude
No sleep in my body
Ain't no bitch in my body, ah

New beginnings, ahh
New beginnings, wake up, akh
The sun's goin' down
Time to start your day, bruh
Can't keep bein' laid off
Know you need the money if you gon' survive
Every night shit, every day shit


Droppin' baby off at home before my night shift
You know I can't hear none of that spend the night shit
That kumbaya shit
Wanna see nirvana, but don't wanna die yet
Wanna feel that na na though, could you come by?
Fuck with me after my shift
Know them boys wanna see me broke down and shit
Bummed out and shit, stressed out and shit
That's every day shit
Shut the fuck up, I don't want your conversation
Rollin' marijuana, that's a cheap vacation
My every day shit, every night shit, every day shit
(Every night shit, night shit, night shit, night shit)


All my night, been ready for you all my night
Been waitin' on you all my night
I'll buzz you in, just let me know when you're outside
All my night, you been missin' all my night
Still got some good nights memorized
And the look back's gettin' me right



Every night fucks every day up
Every day patches the night up
On God, you should match it, it's that KO
No white lighters 'til I fuck my 28th up
1998, my family had that Acura
Oh, the Legend
Kept at least six discs in the changer
Back when Boswell and Percy had it active
Couple bishops in the city buildin' mansions
All the reverends
Preachin' self made millionaire status
When we could only eat at Shoney's on occasion
After 'Trina hit I had to transfer campus
Your apartment out in Houston's where I waited
Stayin' with you when I didn't have a address
Fuckin' on you when I didn't own a mattress
Workin' on a way to make it outta Texas, every night


Droppin' baby off at home before my night shift, yeah
You know I can't hear none of that spend the night shit
That kumbaya shit
Want to see nirvana, but don't wanna die yet
Wanna feel that na na though, could you come by
Fuck with me after my shift
Know them boys wanna see me broke down
See me bummed out, stressed out
That's just every day shit
Shut the fuck up, I don't want your conversation
Rollin' marijuana, that's a cheap vacation
Every day shit, every day shit
Every night shit, every day shit
Every day shit, every day shit
Every day shit, every night shit",2842072
86710,1923883,Self Control,pop,Frank Ocean,2016,2594390,{},"
Poolside convo about your summer last night, ooh yeah
About your summer last night
Ain't give you no play, mmm
Could I make you shive last night?
Could I make you shy on the last night, last night?
Could we make it in? Do we have time?


I'll be the boyfriend in your wet dreams tonight
Noses on a rail, little virgin wears the white
You cut your hair, but you used to live a blonded life
Wish I was there, wish we'd grown up on the same advice
And our time was right


Keep a place for me, for me
I'll sleep between y'all, it's nothing
It's nothing, it's nothing
Keep a place for me, for me

Now and then, you miss it, sounds make you cry
Some nights, you dance with tears in your eyes
I came to visit, 'cause you see me like a UFO
That's like never, 'cause I made you use your self-control
And you made me lose my self-control, my self-control


Keep a place for me, for me
I'll sleep between y'all, it's nothing
Keep a place for me
It's nothing, it's nothing
It's nothing, it's nothing


Sometimes you'll miss it
And the sound will make you cry
And some nights, you're dancing
With tears in your eyes


I, I, I know you gotta leave, leave, leave
Take down some summertime
Give up, just tonight, 'night, 'night
I, I, I know you got someone comin'
You're spittin' game, know you got it
I, I, I know you gotta leave, leave, leave
Take down some summertime
Give up, just tonight, 'night, 'night
I, I, I know you got someone comin'
You're spittin' game, know you got it (Yeah)
I, I, I know you gotta leave, leave, leave
Take down some summertime
Give up, just tonight, 'night, 'night
I, I, I know you got someone comin'
You're spittin' game, know you got it",2842074
86711,1923884,Pink  White,rb,Frank Ocean,2016,1726050,{},"
Yeah, yeah, um (Woo)
Yeah, yeah, yeah


That's the way every day goes
Every time we've no control
If the sky is pink and white
If the ground is black and yellow
It's the same way you showed me
Nod my head, don't close my eyes
Halfway on a slow move
It's the same way you showed me
If you could fly, then you'd feel south
Up north's getting cold soon
The way it is, we're on land
Still, I'm someone to hold true
Keep you cool when it's still alive
Won't let you down when it's all ruin


Just the same way you showed me, showed me
You showed me love
Glory from above
Regard, my dear
It's all downhill from here

In the wake of a hurricane
Dark skin of a summer shade
Nosedive into flood lines
Tall tower of milk crates
It's the same way you showed me
Cannonball off the porch side
Older kids trying off the rooves
Just the same way you showed me (You showed)
If you could die and come back to life
Up for air from the swimming pool
You'd kneel down to the dry land
Kiss the earth that birthed you
Gave you tools just to stay alive
And make it out when the sun is ruined


That's the same way you showed me, showed me
You showed me love
Glory from above
Regard, my dear
It's all downhill from here


Remember life, remember how it was
Climb trees, Michael Jackson, all ends here
Say what up to Matthew, to Shoob
Say what up to Danny
Say what up to life immortality
Bending up my Nikes
Running out of melpomene, nicotine
Stealing granny cigs (Take it easy)
Gimme something sweet
Bitch, I might like immortality
This is life, life immortality",2842078
86715,1923894,Seigfried,pop,Frank Ocean,2016,1203201,{},"
The markings on your surface
Your speckled face
Flawed crystals hang from your ears
I couldn't gauge your fears
I can't relate to my peers
I'd rather live outside
I'd rather chip my pride than lose my mind out here
Maybe I'm a fool
Maybe I should move and settle
Two kids and a swimming pool
I'm not brave
(Brave)
I'm not brave


I'm living over city
And taking in the homeless sometimes, I've
Been living in an idea
An idea from another man's mind
Maybe I'm a fool
To settle for a place with some nice views (Nice views)
Maybe I should move, settle down
Two kids and a swimming pool
I'm not brave
I'd rather live outside
I'd rather live outside
I'd rather go to jail
I've tried hell
(It's a loop) What would you recommend I do?
(The other side of the loop is a loop)
This, this fe-, this feel, this feel, this feels
This feels how molly must feel
This feels how molly must feel
How molly must feel
This feels how molly must feel
How molly must feel

This is not my life
It's just a fond farewell to a friend
It's just a fond farewell to a friend
This is not my life
It's just a fond farewell to a friend
It's not what I'm like
It's just a fond farewell
(Brave)


Speaking of nirvana, it was there
Rare as the feathers on my dash from a phoenix
There with my crooked teeth and companion sleeping, yeah
Dreaming a thought that could dream about a thought
That could think of the dreamer that thought
That could think of dreaming and getting a glimmer of God
I be dreaming of dreaming a thought
That could dream about a thought
That could think of dreaming a dream
Where I cannot, where I cannot


Less morose and more present
Dwell on my gifts for a second, a moment
One solar flare, we're consumed
So why not spend this flammable paper on the film that's my life?
High flights, inhale the vapor, exhale once and think twice
Eat some shrooms, maybe have a good cry about you
See some colors, light hang glide off the moon

(In the dark)
(In the dark)
I'd do anything for you
(In the dark)
I'd do anything for you
(In the dark)
I'd do anything for you
(In the dark)
I'd do anything for you
(In the dark)
I'd do anything for you, anything for you
(In the dark)
I'd do anything for you, anything for",2842086
87085,1927500,Bad and Boujee,rap,Migos,2016,9168421,"{""Lil Uzi Vert""}","
You know, young rich niggas
You know somethin', we ain't really never had no old money
We got a whole lotta new money though, hah
(If Young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you)
Hey


Raindrop (Drip), drop-top (Drop-top)
Smokin' on cookie in the hotbox (Cookie)
Fuckin' on your bitch, she a thot, thot (Thot)
Cookin' up dope in the crockpot (Pot)
We came from nothin' to somethin', nigga (Hey)
I don't trust nobody, grip the trigger (Nobody)
Call up the gang and they come and get ya (Gang)
Cry me a river, give you a tissue (Hey)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Blaow)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Savage)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Grrah)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Dope)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Hey)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Glah)

Offset, woo, woo, woo, woo, woo
Rackaids on rackaids (Racks), got back-ends on back-ends
I'm ridin' around in a coupe (Coupe)
I take your bih' right from you (You)
Bitch, I'm a dog, roof (Grr)
Beat the ho walls loose (Hey)
Hop in the frog, whoo (Skrrt)
I tell that bih' to come comfort me (Comfort me)
I swear these niggas is under me (Hey)
They hate and the devil keep jumpin' me (Jumpin' me)
Bankrolls on me keep me company (Cash)
Ayy, we do the most (Most)
Yeah, pull up in Ghosts (Woo)
Yeah, my diamond's a choker (Glah)
Holdin' the fire with no holster (Blaow)
Rick the Ruler, diamonds cooler (Cooler)
This a Rollie, not a Muller (Hey)
Dabbin' on 'em like the usual (Dab)
Magic with the brick, do voodoo (Magic)
Courtside with a bad bitch (Bitch)
Then I send the bitch through Uber (Go)
I'm young and rich and plus I'm bougie (Hey)
I'm not stupid so I keep the Uzi (Rrah)
Rackaids on rackaids, got back-ends on back-ends
So my money makin' my back ache (Aagh)
You niggas got a low Act rate (Act)
We from the Nawf, yeah, Dat Way (Nawf)
Fat Cookie blunt in the ashtray (Cookie)
Two bitches, just national smash day (Smash)
Hop in the Lamb', have a drag race (Skrrt)
I let them birds take a bath, bae (Brr)

Raindrop (Drip), drop-top (Drop-top)
Smokin' on cookie in the hotbox (Cookie)
Fuckin' on your bitch, she a thot, thot (Thot)
Cookin' up dope in the crockpot (Pot)
We came from nothin' to somethin', nigga (Hey)
I don't trust nobody, grip the trigger (Nobody)
Call up the gang and they come and get ya (Gang)
Cry me a river, give you a tissue (Hey)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Blaow)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Savage)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Grrah)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Dope)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Hey)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Glah)


Pour a four, I'm droppin' muddy, outer space, Kid Cudi (Drank)
Introduce me to your bitch as wifey and we know she sluttin' (Bitch)
Broke a brick down, Nutty Buddy, now that nigga duckin' (Phew)
Don't move too fast, I might shoot ya (Huh?)
Draco bad and bougie (Draco)
I'm always hangin' with shooters (Brrah)
Might be posted somewhere secluded (Private)
Still be playin' with pots and pans, call me Quavo Ratatouille (Cook it up)
Run with that sack, call me Boobie (Run with it)
When I'm on stage, show me boobies (Ayy)
Ice on my neck, I'm the coolest (Ice)
Hop out the suicide with the Uzi (Pew-pew-pew)
I pull up, I pull up, I pull up
I hop out with all of the drugs and the good luck (Skrrt)
I'm cookin', I'm cookin', I'm whippin'
I'm whippin' until it rock up, let it lock up (Lock up)
I gave her ten racks
I told her go shoppin' and spend it all at the pop up (Ten)
These bitches, they fuck and suck dick
And they bustin' for Instagram, get your clout up
Uh, yeah, that way (Yeah)
Float on the track like a Segway (Go)
Yeah, that way (Dat way)
I used to trap by the Subway (Trappin', trappin')
Yeah, that way (Go)
Young nigga trap with the AK (Rrah, uh)
Yeah, that way (Yeah)
Big dyke ho, get the door, Macy Gray (Hey)

Raindrop (Drip), drop-top (Drop-top)
Smokin' on cookie in the hotbox (Cookie)
Fuckin' on your bitch, she a thot, thot (Thot)
Cookin' up dope in the crockpot (Pot)
We came from nothin' to somethin', nigga (Hey)
I don't trust nobody, grip the trigger (Nobody)
Call up the gang and they come and get ya (Gang)
Cry me a river, give you a tissue (Hey)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Blaow)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Savage)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Grrah)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Dope, huh?)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Hey, what?)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Glah, Lil Uzi)


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Yeah)
My bitch, she bad to the bone (She what?)
Ayy, wait, these niggas watchin'
I swear to God they be my clones (They watchin')
Yeah, hey, huh
Switchin' my hoes like my flows (What?)
Switchin' my flows like my clothes (Like what?)
Keep on shootin' that gun, don't reload (Damn)
Ooh, ooh, now she want fuck with my crew (My crew)
'Cause the money come all out the roof (Damn, damn)
Drive the 'Rari, that bitch got no roof (Skrrt)
Wait, what kind of 'Rari? (Wait) 458 (Damn)
All of these niggas, they hate (They hate)
Try to hide, shoot through the gate (Wow)
Look, go to strip club, make it rain, yeah
So much money they use rakes (They use rakes)
Count a hundred thousand in your face (In your face)
Yeah, then put 300 right in the safe (Yeah)
Met her today, yeah (Ooh)
She talk to me like she knew me, yeah (Ooh)
Go to sleep in a jacuzzi, yeah (Yeah)
Wakin' up right to a two-piece, yeah
Countin' that paper like loose-leaf, yeah
Gettin' that chicken with blue cheese, yeah
Boy, you so fake, like my collar, you snakin'
I swear to God that be that Gucci (Ayy)
And you know we winnin' (Winnin')
Yeah, we is not losin'
Try to play your song, it ain't move me (What?)
Saw your girl once, now she choosin', yeah (Hey!)


Raindrop (Drip), drop-top (Drop-top)
Smokin' on cookie in the hotbox (Cookie)
Fuckin' on your bitch, she a thot, thot (Thot, yeah)
Cookin' up dope in the crockpot (Pot)
We came from nothin' to somethin', nigga (Hey)
I don't trust nobody, grip the trigger (Nobody, yeah)
Call up the gang and they come and get ya (Gang)
Cry me a river, give you a tissue (Hey, Lil Uzi)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad, she bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Blaow, cookin' up, cookin' up)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Savage, they savage)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Grrah)
My bitch is bad and bougie (Bad)
Cookin' up dope with a Uzi (Dope, what?)
My niggas is savage, ruthless (Hey, yeah)
We got 30s and hundred-rounds too (Lil Uzi)",2845980
87287,1930383,Jusquau dernier gramme,rap,PNL,2016,1086214,{},"


J'suis à 91 mille lieues sous la merde
J'ai mille eu' sous la semelle (ouais, ouais, ouais)
J'ai mêmes soucis en fin d'semaine (en fin d'semaine)
J'ai paire de couilles en cas de problème
Le monde, j'le vois d'travers, je le monte (je le monte en l'air)
En l'air, en l'air jusqu'à (jusqu'à) ce que ce putain de bonheur se montre (bah ouais)
Y a pas de cinéma j'ai pas de temps, pas de temps à donner ou à perdre
Baba m'a dit faut du douze, faut scier l'canon pour la guerre (eh, eh, eh)
Et la guerre et la guerre on l'a fait, on la refera, pourquoi donc épiloguer (pourquoi donc épiloguer)
Pas de paix, pas de paix, pas de paix dans le contrat, la haine pour co-piloter
Il s'agit de n'plus jouer au con (nan), dans l'regard paraît qu'on y voit une âme (Ah bon ?)
Chez moi on dit qu'au fond du trou (quoi ?), jette un homme il ressort avec une arme
Pardonnez-moi, poussez-vous, là-bas, vite fait, deux secondes
Parce que sinon c'est ma bite dans votre cul qui vous flaire, qui vous sert de sonde
J'aime voir le ciel, j'aime ce silence alors ferme ta gueule (ta gueule)
J'perds pas le Nord, nan j'ai l'courage qui emmerde ma peur
La feuille est si belle, plus j'écris plus j'salis
Fleur de décibels, ma rage les contamine (les contamine)
Un million par mois et là j'ai l'bon timing (eh, eh)
Sous alcool, sous beuh (hum), j'ai tout fait consciemment
Le poids d'mes erreurs (hum), découpé constamment (hum ouais)
Un regard, un mytho, un sourire
Et le cœur qui n'veut plus se nourrir
Des minutes, des années sur la montre
Naïveté ou trahison sur un mot

Igo la vie est moche donc on l'a maquillée avec des mensonges
Igo son âme est moche, plus qu'à la maquiller avec des mensonges
J'sais pas c'qu'il s'passe dans ma tête
Parfois, j'voudrais sauver la Terre
Parfois, j'voudrais la voir brûler
Ça va pas trop, j'roule un teh
Trop d'haine pour neuf mètres carrés
Tristesse faut pas calculer
J'aime pas tes rêves, cauchemars entassés
Le cœur qui brûle, sentiments glacés
On s'connaît pas, j'aime pas ton passé
La mif' va bien, pas s'embarrasser
Parfois peur de demain, peur de t'ôter la vie
Parce qu'on a grandi et ma haine aussi (haine)
Chérie t'as le boule qui bat, un peu de tendresse j'dis pas
Non car j'ai le cœur qui bat après quatre, cinq barres
J'sais pas si le bonheur va m'endurcir, dur dans la merde
J'sais pas si son cœur va me suffire, j'rajoute la mer
J'regarde le ciel, j'attends l'orage
J'attends la nuit, j'attends mon cash
J'me vide dans le cul du superficiel
J'recharge mon arme j'ai le cœur qui saigne
Les sentiments, ta chatte : éphémère
J'ai le cœur qui bande devant billets verts
J'croise les mêmes cafards dans le même bât'
J'ai les mêmes plats pour les mêmes pâtes
Il y a moins de stress à six du mat'
Et je veux plus jamais voir l'impasse
Je l'ai mise à nu, elle m'a volé mon cœur
Confiance, confiance, plus de mal que de peur
Garde tout dedans, plus de larmes que de pleurs
Garde tout dedans, plus de larmes que de pleurs
J'ai pas le temps de te séduire, faut que j'retourne charbonner
J'ai pas le temps de te mentir, QLF abonné
Cette lumière va partir et mes rêves en pâtir
Cette lumière va partir, l'obscurité m'attire
La manière dont tu comptes en dit long sur ce que t'as brassé
La manière dont tu pompes en dit long sur ce que t'as sucé
Tends pas ta main, on te tord ton âme
Et le shit a bullé jusqu'au dernier gramme

J'suis pas net (pas net), sah
Pute de planète j'fais du sale
Je vois leur regard me dire à l'aide
Et plus je monte, plus j'ai mal
J'suis pas net (pas net), sah
Pute de planète j'fais du sale
Je vois leur regard me dire à l'aide
Et plus je monte, plus j'ai mal",2849098
87326,1930923,The Greatest,pop,Sia,2016,1354602,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
Uh-oh, runnin' out of breath, but I
Oh, I, I got stamina
Uh-oh, running now, I close my eyes
Well, oh, I got stamina
And uh-oh, I see another mountain to climb
But I, I, I got stamina
Uh-oh, I need another lover, be mine
'Cause I, I, I got stamina


Don't give up, I won't give up
Don't give up, no no no
Don't give up, I won't give up
Don't give up, no no no


I'm free to be the greatest, I'm alive
I'm free to be the greatest here tonight, the greatest
The greatest, the greatest alive
The greatest, the greatest alive

Well, uh-oh, runnin' out of breath, but I
Oh, I, I got stamina
Uh-oh, runnin' now, I close my eyes
But, oh, I got stamina
And oh yeah, runnin' through the waves of love
But I, I got stamina
And oh yeah, I'm runnin' and I've just enough
And uh-oh, I got stamina


Don't give up, I won't give up
Don't give up, no no no
Don't give up, I won't give up
Don't give up, no no no


I'm free to be the greatest, I'm alive
I'm free to be the greatest here tonight, the greatest
The greatest, the greatest alive
The greatest, the greatest alive


Oh-oh, I got stamina
Oh-oh, I got stamina
Oh-oh, I got stamina
Oh-oh, I got stamina

Ayy, I am the truth
Ayy, I am the wisdom of the fallen; I'm the youth
Ayy, I am the greatest
Ayy, this is the proof
Ayy, I work hard, pray hard, pay dues, ayy
I transform with pressure, I'm hands-on with effort
I fell twice before, my bounce back was special
Letdowns'll get you, and the critics'll test you
But the strong'll survive, another scar may bless you, ah


Don't give up (no no), I won't give up (no no)
Don't give up, no no no (nah)
Don't give up, I won't give up
Don't give up, no no no


I'm free to be the greatest, I'm alive
I'm free to be the greatest here tonight, the greatest
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up, no no no)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up, no no no)


The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)
The greatest, the greatest alive
(Don't give up, don't give up, don't give up; I got stamina)",2849661
87335,1930989,​through the late night,rap,Travis Scott,2016,1339561,"{""Kid Cudi""}","
Hmm, hmm, meh, meh
Mmm, meh, meh, meh
Hmm, hmm, meh, meh
Mmm, meh, meh, meh
Hmm, hmm, meh, meh
Mmm, meh, meh, meh
Hmm, hmm, meh, meh
Mmm, meh, meh, meh
And then we...


Sleep through day, then we play all through the late night
Sleep through day, then we play all through the late night (Uh, uh, uh, uh, uh)
All through the late night (And then we)
S'il vous plaît, don't you hate, all through the late night (Hmm, hmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Hmm, hmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm, uh)
All through the late night (Uh)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, uh)
All through the late night (Woah)

Blimp's soarin', how the hell did I get in this space?
Four in the mornin', how did I get in this place?
Oh, it don't matter, got smoke, drink, and I'm runnin' this space
Done contemplatin', I'ma take it in and groove in this case
N,N-Dimethyltryptamine and Lysergic acid diethylamide
The vibes are effervescent, delicious, just how they should be
N,N-Dimethyltryptamine and Lysergic acid diethylamide
The vibes are effervescent, delicious, just how they should be
No sleep in my bed, no sleepin' in my bed
Yeah, we gon' play, gon' play, gon' play until the day
I said no sleep in my bed, no sleepin' in my bed
Yeah, we gon' play, gon' play
Then we'll sleep all through the day
And do it again


Sleep through day, then we play all through the late night
Sleep through day, then we play all through the late night (Uh, uh, uh, uh, uh)
All through the late night (And then we)
S'il vous plaît, don't you hate, all through the late night (Hmm, hmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Hmm, hmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm, meh, meh, uh)
All through the late night (Uh)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, uh)
All through the...

Day 'n' nite (Yeah)
I toss and turn, I keep stressing my mind, mind (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
I seek the peace, sometimes I can't restrain (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
To join a rage at night, come out and play, play (Ooh)
Mhmm, balance (Yeah)
Find your balance (Pipe up, yeah)
God said it's my talent (Ooh, ooh)
Sprinkle a little season on the salad (Ooh, ooh)
Relieve my heart of malice (Yeah)
Hit my Palace (Straight up)
Stroke my cactus (It's lit)
Ooh, don't wait (Yeah)
Mhm, don't play (Yeah, yeah)
Play no games like the NBA (Brr)
Throwin' checks like the NBA (Brr)
You a ring, you a ring
We shootin' shots like the NRA (Drr)
Yeah-ah, she jammin' Travis and Kid Cudi (Straight up)
The new Krayzie Bone and Slim Bun B (Yuh)
Shawty-yeah-on the scene, yeah (Yeah)
Pull up on the scene, yeah (Yeah)
Sip my tea, lean no Hennessy (Yeah)
Ah, save all, take it right (Yeah)
Ah, take it all, never light (Straight up)
Ah, had a ball, had a night (Yeah)
Ah, after all, sleep good (Yeah)

Sleep through day, then we play all through the late night
Sleep through day, then we play all through the late night (Uh, uh, uh, uh, uh)
All through the late night (And then we)
S'il vous plaît, don't you hate, all through the late night (Hmm, hmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Hmm, hmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm, meh, meh, uh)
All through the late night (Uh)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, mmm)
All through the late night (Meh, meh, uh)
All through the late night (Woah)",2849757
87336,1930992,​beibs in the trap,rap,Travis Scott,2016,2075748,{NAV},"
That coca


I just poured an eight in a liter
Throw some Jolly Rancher in, make it sweeter
Versace my clothes, I'm with a white ho
And she snortin' three lines like Adidas
Got a black girl rollin' off molly
Got a white bitch snortin' up snow
Say she want real niggas in the party
Parents gon' leave the keys to the condo


Bitch, close the door, there's shit on your nose (That coca)
She said she want more, she said she want more
So I'ma get more, yeah, I'ma get more
Bitch, close the door, there's shit on your nose
She said she want more, she said she want more
So I'ma get more, yeah, I'ma get more

I just poured an eight in a liter
With a white bitch sniffin' on Bieber
Are you sure you want to party with the demons?
Bitch lookin' for a phone, I ain't seen it
Told Frost bring the water, no Fiji
Free Stix, I'm poured up and I'm leanin'
I got a couple pussy niggas in their feelings
'Cause the main bitch wanna come see me
She said she want more, your girl is a ho
You need to let go, she fucked all my bros
She snortin' the snow (That coca), now she's touchin' her toes
She got Anna Nicole all in her nose
If they kick down the door, we gon' get locked for sure
She said she want more, fuck it, I'ma get more (I'ma get more)


Nightmare, high-life, sleepy, night-night (Yeah)
Flashes, spotlight, pull up, nice guy (Yeah, yeah)
Help it, peace, peace, peace to- (Yeah)
Bite me, ride me (Yeah), strike me, indict me (Yeah, yeah)
Snipe it, swipe it, rapper, trapper (Ooh, yeah)
I'm lit, light-(Yeah)-nin' (Yeah, bitch, yeah)
White bitch (Bitch), she thick (Bitch)
Pulled out of the hood, Toyota
Drove back to the hood, Lambo' (Ooh)
Crushed Xans, crushed Xans in my soda
Ridin' around the city with my eyes closed (Yeah, yeah)
Crazy Girls got it poppin', AOD got it poppin' (Yeah, yeah)
Tryna text my accountant, ain't no service in the mountains (Straight up)
Won't you come to the bottom? Know you heard a lot about 'em (Yeah)
Heard they take that then they change like a mood ring (Yeah, yeah)
I watched 'em take that then they change like a mood ring
Pulled out of the hood, Toyota
Drove back to the hood, Lambo' (Ooh)
Crushed Xans, crushed Xans in my soda
Ridin' around the city with my eyes closed (Ooh)

I just poured an eight in a liter
Throw some Jolly Rancher in, make it sweeter
Versace my clothes, I'm with a white ho
And she snortin' three lines like Adidas
Got a black girl rollin' off molly (Molly)
Got a white bitch snortin' up snow
Say she want real niggas in the party
Parents gon' leave the keys to the condo


Bitch, close the door, there's shit on your nose (That coca)
She said she want more, she said she want more
So I'ma get more (Ooh), yeah, I'ma get more (Ooh)
Bitch close the door (Ooh), there's shit on your nose (Ooh)
She said she want more (Ooh), she said she want more (Ooh)
So I'ma get more (Ooh), yeah, I'ma get more


Mmm-mmm, mmm-mmm, mmm-mmm, mmm-mmm
Mmm-mmm-mmm, mmm-mmm-mmm
Mmm-mmm-mmm, mmm-mmm-mmm",2849762
87337,1930995,​goosebumps,rap,Travis Scott,2016,5121277,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
Yeah
7:30 in the night, yeah
Ooh, ooh


I get those goosebumps every time, yeah, you come around, yeah
You ease my mind, you make everything feel fine
Worried 'bout those comments
I'm way too numb, yeah, it's way too dumb, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time, I need the Heimlich
Throw that to the side, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time, yeah
When you're not around (Straight up)
When you throw that to the side, yeah (It's lit)
I get those goosebumps every time, yeah


7-1-3
Through the 2-8-1, yeah, I'm ridin', why they on me?
Why they on me? I'm flyin', sippin' low-key
I'm sippin' low-key in Onyx, rider, rider
When I'm pullin' up right beside ya
Pop star, lil' Mariah
When I text a cute game, wildness
Throw a stack on the Bible
Never Snapchat or took molly
She fall through plenty, her and all her ginnies, yeah
We at the top floor, right there off Doheny, yeah
Oh no, I can't fuck with y'all
Yeah, when I'm with my squad, I cannot do no wrong
Yeah, saucin' in the city, don't get misinformed
Yeah, they gon' pull up on you (Brr, brr, brr)
Yeah, we gon' do some things, some things you can't relate
Yeah, 'cause we from a place, a place you cannot stay
Oh, you can't go, oh, I don't know
Oh, back the fuck up off me (Brr, brr, brr)

I get those goosebumps every time, yeah, you come around, yeah
You ease my mind, you make everything feel fine
Worried 'bout those comments
I'm way too numb, yeah, it's way too dumb, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time, I need the Heimlich
Throw that to the side, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time, yeah
When you're not around
When you throw that to the side, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time


Uh, I want to press my like, yeah, I wanna press my
I want a green light, I wanna be like
I wanna press my line, yeah
I wanna take that ride, yeah
I'm gonna press my line
I want a green light, I wanna be like, I wanna press my-
Mama dearest, spare your feelings
I'm relivin' moments, peelin' more residual
I can buy the buildin', burn the buildin'
Take your bitch, rebuild the buildin' just to fuck some more
I can justify my love for ya
And touch the sky for God to stop debating war
Put the pussy on a pedestal (Ayy)
Put the pussy on a high horse
That pussy to die for
That pussy to die for
Peter Piper picked a pepper
So I could pick your brain and put your heart together
We depart the shady parts and party hard
The diamonds yours, the coupe forever
My best shot just might shoot forever like (Brr)

I get those goosebumps every time, yeah, you come around, yeah
You ease my mind, you make everything feel fine
Worried 'bout those comments
I'm way too numb, yeah, it's way too dumb, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time, I need the Heimlich
Throw that to the side, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time, yeah
When you're not around
When you throw that to the side, yeah
I get those goosebumps every time",2849767
87351,1931064,Say You Wont Let Go,pop,James Arthur,2016,3066032,{},"
I met you in the dark
You lit me up
You made me feel as though
I was enough
We danced the night away
We drank too much
I held your hair back when
You were throwing up


Then you smiled over your shoulder
For a minute, I was stone cold sober
I pulled you closer to my chest
And you asked me to stay over
I said, I already told ya
I think that you should get some rest


I knew I loved you then
But you'd never know
'Cause I played it cool
When I was scared of letting go
I knew I needed you
But I never showed
But I wanna stay with you
Until we're grey and old
Just say you won't let go
Just say you won't let go


I'll wake you up with some breakfast in bed
I'll bring you coffee
With a kiss on your head
And I'll take the kids to school
Wave them goodbye
And I'll thank my lucky stars for that night


When you looked over your shoulder
For a minute, I forget that I'm older
I wanna dance with you right now, oh
And you look as beautiful as ever
And I swear that every day you'll get better
You make me feel this way somehow


I'm so in love with you
And I hope you know
Darling your love is more
Than worth its weight in gold
We've come so far my dear
Look how we've grown
And I wanna stay with you
Until we're grey and old
Just say you won't let go
Just say you won't let go

I wanna live with you
Even when we're ghosts
'Cause you were always there for me
When I needed you most


I'm gonna love you till
My lungs give out
I promise 'til death we part
Like in our vows
So I wrote this song for you
Now everybody knows
That it's just you and me
Until we're grey and old
Just say you won't let go
Just say you won't let go


Just say you won't let go
Oh, just say you won't let go",2849861
87445,1932168,Dont Wanna Know,pop,Maroon 5,2016,1066450,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
Oh, hey
Oh, oh hey
Oh, oh, oh hey
Uh oh, uh oh


I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, no
I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, oh
I don't wanna know


Wasted (Wasted)
And the more I drink, the more I think about you
Oh, no, no, I can't take it
Baby, every place I go reminds me of you

Do you think of me? Of what we used to be?
Is it better now that I'm not around?
My friends are actin' strange, they don't bring up your name
Are you happy now?
Are you happy now?


I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, no
I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, oh
I don't wanna know


And every time I go out, yeah
I hear it from this one, hear it from that one
That you got someone new
Yeah, I see, but don't believe it
Even in my head, you're still in my bed
Maybe I'm just a fool

Do you think of me? Of what we used to be? (What we used to be)
Is it better now that I'm not around? (That I'm not around)
My friends are actin' strange (Yeah), they don't bring up your name (Hmm)
Are you happy now? (Hmm)
Are you happy now?


I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, no
I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, oh
I don't wanna know
(Oh hey)


No more ""please, stop""
No more hashtag boo'd up screenshots
No more tryin' to make me jealous on your birthday
You know just how I made you better on your birthday, oh
Do he do you like this? Do he woo you like this?
Do he lay it down for you, touch your poona like this?
Matter fact, never mind, we'll let the past be
May be his right now, but your body's still me, whoa

I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, no
I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, oh
I don't wanna know, know, know, know
Who's taking you home, home, home, home
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, oh (The way I used to love you)
I don't wanna know, know, know, know (You)
Who's taking you home, home, home, home (You)
And loving you so, so, so, so
The way I used to love you, oh
I don't wanna know


Oh hey
Oh, oh hey
Oh, oh, oh hey
Uh oh, uh oh",2851057
87493,1933024,Starboy,rb,The Weeknd,2016,6784046,"{""Daft Punk""}","
Ayy


I'm tryna put you in the worst mood, ah
P1 cleaner than your church shoes, ah
Milli point two just to hurt you, ah
All red Lamb' just to tease you, ah
None of these toys on lease too, ah
Made your whole year in a week too, yah
Main bitch outta your league too, ah
Side bitch outta your league too, ah


House so empty, need a centerpiece
Twenty racks a table, cut from ebony
Cut that ivory into skinny pieces
Then she clean it with her face, man, I love my baby, ah
You talkin' money, need a hearin' aid
You talkin' 'bout me, I don't see the shade
Switch up my style, I take any lane
I switch up my cup, I kill any pain

(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy


Every day, a nigga try to test me, ah
Every day, a nigga try to end me, ah
Pull off in that Roadster SV, ah
Pockets overweight, gettin' hefty, ah
Comin' for the king, that's a far cry, I
I come alive in the fall time, I
The competition, I don't really listen
I'm in the blue Mulsanne, bumpin' New Edition


House so empty, need a centerpiece
Twenty racks a table, cut from ebony
Cut that ivory into skinny pieces
Then she clean it with her face, man, I love my baby, ah
You talkin' money, need a hearin' aid
You talkin' 'bout me, I don't see the shade
Switch up my style, I take any lane
I switch up my cup, I kill any pain

(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy


Let a nigga brag Pitt
Legend of the fall, took the year like a bandit
Bought Mama a crib and a brand new wagon
Now she hit the grocery shop lookin' lavish
Star Trek roof in that Wraith of Khan
Girls get loose when they hear this song
A hundred on the dash get me close to God
We don't pray for love, we just pray for cars


House so empty, need a centerpiece
Twenty racks a table, cut from ebony
Cut that ivory into skinny pieces
Then she clean it with her face, man, I love my baby, ah
You talkin' money, need a hearin' aid
You talkin' 'bout me, I don't see the shade
Switch up my style, I take any lane
I switch up my cup, I kill any pain

(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
Look what you've done
(Ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha)
I'm a motherfuckin' starboy",2851948
87633,1934821,Let You Down,rap,NF,2017,1836022,{},"
Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down


Yeah, I guess I'm a disappointment, doin' everything I can
I don't wanna make you disappointed, it's annoying
I just wanna make you feel like everything I ever do
Was never tryna make an issue for you, but I guess the more you
Thought about everything you were never even wrong
In the first place, right? Yeah, I'ma just ignore you
Walking towards you with my head down
Lookin' at the ground, I'm embarrassed for you
Paranoia, what did I do wrong this time?
That's parents for you
Very loyal? Shoulda had my back
But you put a knife in it-my hands are full
What else should I carry for you?
I cared for you, but...

Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down


Yeah, you don't wanna make this work
You just wanna make this worse
Want me to listen to you, but you don't ever hear my words
You don't wanna know my hurt, yeah
Let me guess, you want an apology, probably
How can we keep going at a rate like this?
We can't, so I guess I'ma have to leave
Please, don't come after me
I just wanna be alone right now, I don't really wanna think at all
Go ahead, just drink it off
Both know you're gonna call tomorrow like nothing's wrong
Ain't that what you always do?
I feel like every time I talk to you, you're in an awful mood
What else can I offer you?
There's nothing left right now, I gave it all to you

Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down


Yeah, don't talk down to me
That's not gonna work now
Packed all my clothes and I moved out
I don't even wanna go to your house
Every time I sit on that couch
I feel like you lecture me, eventually, I bet that we
Coulda made this work
And prolly woulda figured things out
But I guess I'm a letdown
But it's cool, I checked out
Oh, you wanna be friends now?
Okay, let's put my fake face on and pretend now
Sit around and talk about the good times that didn't even happen
I mean, why are you laughing?
Must have missed that joke, let me see if I can find a reaction
No, but at least you're happy

Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Oh, I let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
And I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Oh, let you down


Yeah, I'm sorry
I'm so sorry now
Yeah, I'm sorry that I let you down",2853827
87779,1936266,JuJu on That Beat TZ Anthem,rap,Zay Hilfigerrr,2016,1367091,"{""Zayion McCall""}","
Do that one dance, baby
That, that one dance
Yeah, oh
You don't know how to do that?
Baby do it for your grandma
Come on, I'm old and I'm trying to learn it
Well, yeah, do it
Oh my god, oh my god
Girl, ain't that Zay and Zayion?
Yas
Don't both of 'em got a girlfriend?
Girl, I don't care
I don't care, girl, he still cute
Oh yes, he is!


Walked in this party and these girls lookin' at me
Skinny jeans on and you know my hair nappy
Hey, hey, hey, hey
Okay, okay
I want y'all do it, do this dance now

JuJu on the beat
JuJu on that beat
JuJu on that, JuJu on that, JuJu on that beat
Now slide, drop
Hit dem folks, don't stop, ayy
Don't stop, ayy
Don't stop, ayy
Running man on that beat, ayy
Running man on that beat, ayy
Running man on that beat, ayy
Running man on that beat
Now do your dance, do your dance, do your dance, ayy
You ugly
You your daddy's son


Ayy, ayy
Do your dance, ayy
Go crazy, ayy
Get freaky, ayy
Let's go, leggo, leggo, leggo, leggo
Hey, hey, hey
Yeah


Okay, we knuckin' and buckin'
And ready to fight
I got my cousin, he with me
And got Lil Zay on the right
And I'm a Detroit baby
And I don't know nothing else
Besides drinking and having parties
And having some fun
I say look in the mirror
What you expect me to do?
I see a 300-S
And got them blacked out rims
I mean I like your style
I'm on a whole 'nother level
If you compare me and you
There wouldn't be no comparings

JuJu on the beat
JuJu on that beat
JuJu on that, JuJu on that, JuJu on that beat
Now slide, drop
Hit dem folks, don't stop, ayy
Don't stop, ayy
Don't stop, ayy
Running man on that beat, ayy
Running man on that beat, ayy
Running man on that beat, ayy
Running man on that beat
Now do your dance, do your dance, do your dance, ayy
You ugly
You your daddy's son",2855384
88520,1945518,I dont wanna do this anymore,rb,XXXTENTACION,2016,1240907,{},"
I should've let you know that you're my only one
I know you're feelin' numb, I'll fuck you 'til you cum
Said, ""I don't understand how you don't got a man""
You want me in your bed, 'cause I've been in your head


Baby, you've been up all night, so you don't wanna wait on me
I'm aboutta catch my flight, so you don't gotta wait on me
No more, you don't wanna, you don't wanna
You don't wanna, you don't wanna, you don't wanna
You don't wanna, you don't wanna
I've been up a very long time, wonder why they hate on me
I don't wanna love myself, I'm praying that they all love me
'Cause you don't wanna, you don't wanna
You don't wanna, you don't wanna, you don't wanna
You don't wanna, you don't wanna


I should've let you know that you're my only one
I know you're feelin' numb, I'll fuck you 'til you cum
Said, ""I don't understand how you don't got a man""
You want me in your bed, 'cause I've been in your head

No, no, no
No, no, no
No, no, no
No, no, no
No, no, no
No, no, no",2865278
88536,1945722,Дико например Diko naprimer,rap,PHARAOH,2017,1030918,{},"


Самый рeдкий вид, но самый худший браконьeр
Спорим, она вмeстит сeбe в глотку рeвольвeр?
Спорим, что ты большe нe покинeшь этот сквeр?
Я играю с eё киской, дeтка, гдe твой кавалeр?
Я врубаю Daft Punk, она крутит мнe блант
Покидаeм клуб, в рукe Совиньон-блан
Отлип от eё губ, залипаю в экран
Я кидаю дeньги в воздух - ты поймаeшь их сам, м
Эй, дeтка, ты модeль или поддeлка?
Сeйчас нe важно, важно только, что нe цeлка
А eсли кто-то из твоих захочeт знать
Я найду eщё причины, чтобы положить их спать
Она качаeт гривой, нeльзя быть такой игривой
Выдыхаю в потолок испарeния сативы
Кажусь хужe, чeм я eсть, заставляю тeбя eсть (Я, я, я)
Я дeржу при сeбe суку, что нe можeт с мeня слeзть (Я, я, я), я


Эй, а, это всё дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
А, мы курим дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
А, мы виснeм дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Ты нe сумeл, но я дико отымeл (Пау-пау-пау-пау)
Эй, это всё дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Эй, мы курим дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Эй, мы виснeм дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Ты нe сумeл, но я дико отымeл (Пау-пау-пау-пау)

Эй, кхм, я, эй, м, извини за прямоту
Но дажe в этом клубe всe когда-нибудь умрут
Мои парни мнe сказали, что мнe нужно охладить
И я дeржу это на низком, вeдь та сука - троглодит
Повсюду лужи крови, помогу eй обойти
Ха-ха-ха, но ты бeги-бeги-бeги
Marriott с мeня хуeeт, трижды мeсто прeступлeния
Моя тишка говорит мнe: «Я - ошибка поколeния» (Я, я, я)


Эй, а, это всe дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
А, мы курим дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
А, мы виснeм дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Ты нe сумeл, но я дико отымeл (Пау-пау-пау-пау)
Эй, это всe дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Эй, мы курим дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Эй, мы виснeм дико, напримeр (Пау-пау-пау)
Ты нe сумeл, но я дико отымeл (Пау-пау-пау-пау)",2865494
88561,1945930,Congratulations,rap,Post Malone,2016,3718731,{Quavo},"
Yeah, yeah
Yeah (Hey)


My mama called, seen you on TV, son
Said shit done changed ever since we was on
I dreamed it all ever since I was young
They said I wouldn't be nothing
Now they always say, ""Congratulations"" (Uh, uh, uh)
Worked so hard, forgot how to vacation (Uh-huh)
They ain't never had the dedication (Uh, uh)
People hatin', say we changed and look, we made it (Uh, uh)
Yeah, we made it (Uh, uh, uh)


They was never friendly, yeah
Now I'm jumping out the Bentley, yeah
And I know I sound dramatic, yeah
But I know I had to have it, yeah
For the money, I'm a savage, yeah
I be itching like an addict, yeah
I'm surround by twenty bad bitch, yeah
But they didn't know me last year, yeah
Everyone wanna act like they important (Yeah-yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah-yeah)
But all that mean nothing when I saw my dough, yeah (Yeah-yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah-yeah)
Everyone countin' on me drop the ball, yeah (Yeah-yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah-yeah)
Everything custom like I'm at the border, yeah, yeah
If you fuck with winning, put your lighters to the sky
How could I make cents when I got millions on my mind?
Coming with that bullshit, I just put it to the side
Balling since a baby, they could see it in my eyes

My mama called, seen you on TV, son
Said shit done changed ever since we was on
I dreamed it all ever since I was young
They said I wouldn't be nothing
Now they always say, ""Congratulations"" (Congratulations)
Worked so hard, forgot how to vacation (Ooh)
They ain't never had the dedication (Uh, uh, ayy)
People hatin', say we changed and look we made it (Uh, uh)
Yeah, we made it (Uh, uh, uh, yeah)


I was patient (Yeah, oh)
I was patient (Ayy, uh)
Now I can scream that we made it (We made it)
Now everywhere, everywhere I go, they say 'gratulation (Uh)
Young nigga, young nigga graduation (Yeah)
I pick up the rock and I ball, baby (Ball)
I'm looking for someone to call, baby (Brr)
But right now, I got a situation (Ayy)
Nothin' but old Ben, Ben Franklins (Cash)
Big rings (Woo), champagne (Champagne)
My life is like a ball game (Ball game)
But instead, I'm in the trap, though (Trap, though)
Pot so big, call it Super Bowl (Super Bowl)
Super Bowl, call the hoes (Brr), get in the Rolls (Skrrt)
Top-floor lifestyle (Top), Huncho and Post (Yeah, ayy)
Malone (Ayy), I got a play on my phone (Ayy)
You know what I'm on (Ayy), Huncho Houdini, it's gone (Ayy)

My mama called, seen you on TV, son
Said shit done changed ever since we was on
I dreamed it all ever since I was young
They said I wouldn't be nothing
Now they always say, ""Congratulations"" (Ayy, uh, uh, uh)
Worked so hard, forgot how to vacation (Uh-huh, ooh)
They ain't never had the dedication (Ayy, uh, uh)
People hatin', say we changed and look we made it (Yeah,  uh, uh)
Yeah, we made it (Ayy)


Hey, hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey, hey",2865735
88779,1948681,Cranes in the Sky,rb,Solange,2016,1058384,{},"
I tried to drink it away
I tried to put one in the air
I tried to dance it away
I tried to change it with my hair


I ran my credit card bill up
Thought a new dress would make it better
I tried to work it away
But that just made me even sadder


I tried to keep myself busy
I ran around in circles
Think I made myself dizzy
I slept it away, I sexed it away
I read it away
Away


Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away

Well it's like cranes in the sky
Sometimes I don't wanna feel those metal clouds
Yeah, it's like cranes in the sky
Sometimes I don't wanna feel those metal clouds


I tried to run it away
Thought then my head be feeling clearer
I traveled 70 states
Thought moving round make me feel better


I tried to let go my lover
Thought if I was alone then maybe I could recover
To write it away or cry it away
Don't you cry baby
Away


Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away


But it's like cranes in the sky
Sometimes I don't wanna feel those metal clouds
Yeah, it's like cranes in the sky
Sometimes I don't wanna feel those metal...

Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away
Away, away, away, away, away",2868727
88986,1950829,You Are the Reason,pop,Calum Scott,2017,2004688,{},"
There goes my heart beating
'Cause you are the reason
I'm losing my sleep
Please come back now
And there goes my mind racing
And you are the reason
That I'm still breathing
I'm hopeless now


I'd climb every mountain
And swim every ocean
Just to be with you
And fix what I've broken
Oh, 'cause I need you to see
That you are the reason


There goes my hands shaking
And you are the reason
My heart keeps bleeding
I need you now
If I could turn back the clock
I'd make sure the light defeated the dark
I'd spend every hour of every day
Keeping you safe

I'd climb every mountain
And swim every ocean
Just to be with you
And fix what I've broken
Oh, 'cause I need you to see
That you are the reason


I don't want to fight no more
I don't want to hide no more
I don't want to cry no more
Come back, I need you to hold me
(You are the reason)
A little closer now, just a little closer now
Come a little closer, I need you to hold me tonight


I'd climb every mountain
And swim every ocean
Just to be with you
And fix what I've broken
'Cause I need you to see
That you are the reason",2870989
89112,1952764,24K Magic,pop,Bruno Mars,2016,1573750,{},"
Tonight
I just want to take you higher
Throw your hands up in the sky
Let's set this party off right


Players, put yo' pinky rings up to the moon
Girls, what y'all trying to do?
24 karat magic in the air
Head to toe so player
Uh, look out!


Pop pop, it's show time (Show time)
Show time (Show time)
Guess who's back again?
Oh they don't know? (Go on tell 'em)
Oh they don't know? (Go on tell 'em)
I bet they know soon as we walk in (Showin' up)
Wearing Cuban links (ya)
Designer minks (ya)
Inglewood's finest shoes (Whoop, whoop)
Don't look too hard
Might hurt ya'self
Known to give the color red the blues

Ooh shit, I'm a dangerous man with some money in my pocket
(Keep up)
So many pretty girls around me and they waking up the rocket
(Keep up)
Why you mad? Fix ya face
Ain't my fault y'all be jocking
(Keep up)


Players only, come on
Put your pinky rings up to the moon
Girls, what y'all trying to do?
24 karat magic in the air
Head to toe so player
Uh, look out!


Second verse for the hustlas (hustlas)
Gangstas (gangstas)
Bad bitches and ya ugly ass friends (Haha)
Can I preach? (Uh oh) Can I preach? (Uh oh)
I gotta show 'em how a pimp get it in
First, take your sip (sip), do your dip (dip)
Spend your money like money ain't shit (Whoop, whoop)
We too fresh
Got to blame it on Jesus
Hashtag blessed
They ain't ready for me

I'm a dangerous man with some money in my pocket
(Keep up)
So many pretty girls around me and they waking up the rocket
(Keep up)
Why you mad? Fix ya face
Ain't my fault y'all be jocking
(Keep up)


Players only, come on
Put your pinky rings up to the moon
Hey girls
What y'all trying to do?
24 karat magic in the air
Head to toe so player
Uh, look out!


(Wooh)
Everywhere I go they be like
Ooh, so player ooh
Everywhere I go they be like
Ooh, so player ooh
Everywhere I go they be like
Ooh, so player ooh
Now, now, now
Watch me break it down like (Uh)
24 karat, 24 karat magic
What's that sound?
24 karat, 24 karat magic
Come on now
24 karat, 24 karat magic
Don't fight the feeling
Invite the feeling

Just put your pinky rings up to the moon
Girls, what y'all trying to do?
24 karat magic in the air
Head to toe so player
Put your pinky rings up to the moon
Girls, what y'all trying to do? (Do)
24 karat magic in the air
Head to toe so player
(24 karat)
Uh, look out


(24 karat magic, magic, magic)",2872960
89584,1959000,Bad Things,pop,Machine Gun Kelly & Camila Cabello,2016,2384792,{},"
Am I out of my head?
Am I out of my mind?
If you only knew the bad things I like
Don't think that I can explain it
What can I say, it's complicated
Don't matter what you say
Don't matter what you do
I only wanna do bad things to you
So good, that you can't explain it
What can I say, it's complicated


Nothing's that bad
If it feels good
So you come back
Like I knew you would
And we're both wild
And the night's young
And you're my drug
Breathe you in 'til my face numb
Drop it down to that bass drum
I got what you dream about
Nails scratchin' my back tatt
Eyes closed while you scream out
And you keep me in with those hips
While my teeth sink in those lips
While your body's giving me life
And you suffocate in my kiss
Then you said

I want you forever
Even when we're not together
Scars on my body so I can take you wherever
I want you forever
Even when we're not together
Scars on my body I can look at you whenever


Am I out of my head?
Am I out of my mind?
If you only knew the bad things I like
Don't think that I can explain it
What can I say, it's complicated
Don't matter what you say
Don't matter what you do
I only wanna do bad things to you
So good, that you can't explain it
What can I say, it's complicated


I can't explain it
I love the pain
And I love the way your breath
Numbs me like novacaine
And we are
Always high
Keep it strange
Okay, yeah, I'm insane
But you the same
Let me paint the picture
Couch by the kitchen
Nothin' but your heels on
Losin' our religion
You're my pretty little vixen
And I'm the voice inside your head
That keeps telling you to listen to all the bad things I say
And you said

I want you forever
Even when we're not together
Scars on my body so I can take you wherever
I want you forever
Even when we're not together
Scars on my body I can look at you whenever


Am I out of my head?
Am I out of my mind?
If you only knew the bad things I like
Don't think that I can explain it
What can I say, it's complicated
Don't matter what you say
Don't matter what you do
I only wanna do bad things to you
So good, that you can't explain it
What can I say, it's complicated


The way we love, is so unique
And when we touch, I'm shivering
And no one has to get it
Just you and me
Cause we're just living
Between the sheets

I want you forever
Even when we're not together
Scars on my body so I can take you wherever
I want you forever
Even when we're not together
Scars on my body I can look at you whenever


Am I out of my head?
Am I out of my mind?
If you only knew the bad things I like
Don't think that I can explain it
What can I say, it's complicated
Don't matter what you say
Don't matter what you do
I only wanna do bad things to you
So good, that you can't explain it
What can I say, it's complicated",2879457
89692,1960382,Rockabye,pop,Clean Bandit,2016,1648480,"{""Sean Paul"",Anne-Marie}","
Call it love and devotion
Call it a mom's adoration, foundation
A special bond of creation, hah
For all the single moms out there
Going through frustration
Clean Bandit, Sean-da-Paul, Anne-Marie
Sing, make them hear


She works at nights, by the water
She's gone astray, so far away
From her father's daughter
She just wants a life for her baby
All on her own, no one will come
She's got to save him (Daily struggle)


She tells him, ""Oh, love, no one's ever gonna hurt you, love.""
""I'm gonna give you all of my love.""
""Nobody matters like you.""
(Stay up there, stay up there!)
She tells him, ""Your life ain't gon' be nothing like my life."" (Straight!)
""You're gonna grow and have a good life.""
""I'm gonna do what I've got to do.""
(Stay up there, stay up there!)

So, rockabye, baby, rockabye
I'm gonna rock you
Rockabye, baby, don't you cry
Somebody's got you
Rockabye, baby, rockabye
I'm gonna rock you
Rockabye, baby, don't you cry
Ah, rockabye, no


Rockabye, rocka-rocka-rocka-bye
(Rockabye, yeah, yeah)
Rockabye, rocka-rocka-rocka-bye


Single mum, how're you doing out there?
Facing the hard life, without no fear (Yeah!)
Just so you know that you really care
'Cause any obstacle come, you're well prepared (Oh, no!)
And no, mama, you never shed tear
'Cause you have to shed things year after year (Na, na, na, na)
And you give the yout love beyond compare (Yeah!)
You find his school fee and the bus fare (Yeah!)
Mh, all when di pops disappear
Inna rum bar, can't find him nowhere
Steadily your workflow, heavily you know
So your non-stop, no time, no time for ya dear

Now she got a six-year-old
Trying to keep him warm
Trying to keep out the cold
When he looks in her eyes
He don't know he is safe


When she says, ""Oh, love, no one's ever gonna hurt you, love.""
""I'm gonna give you all of my love.""
""Nobody matters like you.""


So, rockabye, baby, rockabye
I'm gonna rock you
Rockabye, baby, don't you cry
Somebody's got you
Rockabye, baby, rockabye
I'm gonna rock you
Rockabye, baby, don't you cry
(Badda-bang-bang-bang, alright then)
Ah, rockabye, no


Rockabye, rocka-rocka-rocka-bye
(Rockabye, yeah, yeah)
Rockabye, rocka-rocka-rocka-bye
Rockabye, don't bother cry
Lift up your head, lift it up to the sky, yo
Rockabye, don't bother cry
Angels surround you, just dry your eye

Now she got a six-year-old
Trying to keep him warm
Trying to keep out the cold
When he looks in her eyes
He don't know he is safe when she says


She tells him, ""Oh, love, no one's ever gonna hurt you, love.""
""I'm gonna give you all of my love.""
""Nobody matters like you.""
(Stay up there, stay up there!)
She tells him, ""Your life ain't gon' be nothing like my life."" (Straight!)
""You're gonna grow and have a good life.""
""I'm gonna do what I got to do."", yeah


So, rockabye, baby, rockabye
(Rockabye, rocka-rocka-rocka-bye)
I'm gonna rock you
Rockabye, baby, don't you cry
(Rockabye, rocka-rocka-rocka-bye)
Somebody's got you
Rockabye, baby, rockabye
(Rockabye-rocka-rocka-rocka-bye)
I'm gonna rock you
Rockabye, baby, don't you cry
(Badda-bang-bang-bang, alright then)
Ah, rockabye


Rockabye, don't bother cry
Lift up your head, lift it up to the sky (Ah, Rockabye!)
Rockabye, don't bother cry (Yeah!)
Angels surround you, just dry your eye (Yeah, ah, rockabye!)
Rockabye, don't bother cry (No!)
Lift up your head, lift it up to the sky (Oh, Rockabye!)
Rockabye, don't bother cry
Angels surround you, just dry your eye",2880960
90138,1966675,Get You,rb,Daniel Caesar,2016,1719159,"{""Kali Uchis""}","
Through drought and famine, natural disasters
My baby has been around for me
Kingdoms have fallen, angels be callin'
None of that could ever make me leave


Every time I look into your eyes, I see it
You're all I need
Every time I get a bit inside, I feel it


Ooh, who would've thought I'd get you?
Ooh, who would've thought I'd get you?


And when we're making love, uh
Your cries, they can be heard from far and wide
It's only the two of us
Everything I need between those thighs

Every time I look into your eyes, I see it
You're all I need
Every time I get a bit inside, I feel it


Ooh, who would've thought I'd get you?
Oh yeah, oh yeah, babe
Ooh, who would've thought I'd get you?


And I'll take some time
Just to be thankful
That I had days full of you, you
Before it winds down into
The memories, it's all just memories
Now


(If you've got someone you like)
Don't you love when I come around
(Feel something that's right
Somebody just tell somebody)
Build you up then I take you down
(If you've got someone you like)
Don't you love when I come around
(Feel something that's right
Somebody just tell somebody)
Build you up then I take-

Ooh, who would've thought I'd get you?
Oh yeah, oh yeah, babe
Ooh, who would've thought I'd get you?


This feels like summer
Boy, you make me feel so alive
Just be my lover
Boy, you'll lead me to paradise",2887594
90324,1969437,D Rose,rap,Lil Pump,2016,1374691,{},"
Lil Pump, D. Rose, ooh
Hundred on my wrist (Lil Pump)
Eighty on my wrist (Ooh, D. Rose)
Ayy, ayy (D. Rose), ayy, ayy, ayy


Hundred on my wrist, eighty on my wrist (What?)
Hundred on my wrist, eighty on my wrist (Brr)
Hundred on my wrist, eighty on my wrist (Ooh)
Hundred on my wrist, eighty on my wrist


D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose


Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (Ooh, what?)
Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (Brr, ooh)
Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (What? Ayy)
Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (Ooh)

D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose


Hundred on my wrist, bitch, I'm feelin' like D. Rose
Pop four Xans, now I'm feelin' like a hero (Superman)
Lean got me like Rio (Rio)
And my auntie on P.O. (P.O.)
Hundred on my wrist, eighty on a brick
Lil Pump never spend his money on a bitch (Never)
Never trust a nigga, 'cause he actin' like a bitch (Ooh)
Take a nigga bitch to the Motel 6 (Brr)
I just broke my wrist, 'cause I'm whippin' in the kitchen (Yoop)
Pass a brick to my mom, and I told her whip it (Whip)
Four bands in the kitchen (Ayy)
Nine bands in the kitchen (Ayy)
I just fucked your bitch (What?)
I just broke my wrist (Okay)
I just fucked your bitch (Ooh)
I just fucked your bitch (Ok-)


D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose

Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (Ooh, what?)
Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (Brr, ooh)
Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (What? Ayy)
Eighty on my wrist, hundred on my wrist (Ooh)


D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose
D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose, D. Rose (And my auntie on P.O.)",2890500
90326,1969476,Two Birds One Stone,rap,Drake,2016,1006388,{},"
Yeah, more, yeah


More time with family and friends, more life
More time to get it right
It's only me, but I'm seeing four shadows in the light
My demons visit me every night
To the most high, I'm forever indebted
I know I gotta pay somethin', I know that day's comin'
I put it all in the music
Because if I don't say it here, then I won't say nothin'
Could feel my hand getting tired from holding the grudges
Two birds, one stone, my aim is amazin'
I need to start losing my shit on you niggas that's hatin'
Too reserved, like I called ahead for me and my lady
Free C5, how the fuck we got the boss waiting?
Ever since the blue basement, I found God and I lost patience
Between rocks and hard places of all places
Spotted everywhere, like Dalmatian
Cops snoop around now, 'cause all of my dogs famous
Please welcome the October fall baby
Vaughan Road Academy, star player-my mind's not all there
Used to carry a lot of dead weight like a pallbearer
People too scared to tell the truth, so it's all dares
Count it, it's all there, and we all square
Quick money, I'm in and out
My dad used to use a soap bar 'til it's thinnin' out
But, shit, look at Dennis now, all Stacy Adams and linen'd out
More blessings for Sandi and him, more life
My parents never got it right
But God bless 'em both, I think we all alike
We all wide awake late at night, thinking on what to change
If we do get to do it twice in another life
Scared to go to sleep now
'Cause being awake is what all my dreams were like
Back when the bar that I had set for myself was out of sight
Tell me how I went and did chin-ups on this shit when I can't see it
Pin-ups of Meagan Good and Pam Grier
Soul sisters inspired my old scriptures
Now that feeling's gone like them old pictures
Mixin' liquor got us both twisted, words get so vicious
You just stare at me while you roll Swishers
Girl, I love you, but I don't miss ya
And no matter what year it is, I'm a 06er
Go figure, cold nigga, stay in school, man
Fuck the rap game, it's all lies and it's all filthy
Two percent of us rich and the rest of these niggas all milk it
Got two of my niggas off with a ""not guilty""
Gave back to the city and never said it if I didn't live it
But still, they try and tell you I'm not the realest
Like I'm some privileged kid that never sat through a prison visit
Or like it was just handed to me tied with a ribbon
I never worked to get it
But really it's you with all the drug dealer stories
That's gotta stop, though
You made a couple chops and now you think you Chapo
If you ask me though, you ain't lining the trunk with kilos
You bagging weed watching Pacino with all your niggas
Like, ""This what we need to be on,"" but you never went live
You middle-man in this shit, boy, you was never them guys
I can tell, 'cause I look most of you dead in your eyes
And you'll be tryna sell that story for the rest of your lives
Can't show us where the cash is, me, I don't judge
I'm just going off what the math is, numbers inflated
They all look at me, like, ""What have you done for me lately?""
""I like your older shit but wasn't in love with the latest.""
Aw, baby, stop debatin', I'm just a creative
My numbers out of this world
No wonder they got me feeling so alienated
You were the man on the moon
Now you just go through your phases
Life of the angry and famous
Rap like I know I'm the greatest then give you tropical flavors
Still never been on hiatus
You stay xann'd and perk'd up
So when reality set in, you don't gotta face it
I'm down 200 in Vegas but winning life on a daily basis
It seems like nobody wants to stay in my good graces
I'm like a real estate agent, putting you all in your places
Look what happens soon as you talk to me crazy
Is you crazy?",2890543
90327,1969484,Fake Love,rap,Drake,2016,3751018,{},"
I've been down so long, it look like up to me
They look up to me
I got fake people showin' fake love to me
Straight up to my face, straight up to my face
I've been down so long, it look like up to me
They look up to me
I got fake people showin' fake love to me
Straight up to my face, straight up to my face


Somethin' ain't right when we talkin'
Somethin' ain't right when we talkin'
Look like you hidin' your problems
Really you never was solid
No, you can't ""son"" me
You won't never get to run me
Just when shit look out of reach
I reach back like one, three
Like one, three, yeah

That's when they smile in my face
Whole time they wanna take my place
Whole time they wanna take my place
Whole time they wanna take my place
Yeah, I know they wanna take my place
I can tell that love is fake
I don't trust a word you say
How you wanna clique up after your mistakes?
Look you in the face, and it's just not the same


I've been down so long, it look like up to me
They look up to me
I got fake people showin' fake love to me
Straight up to my face, straight up to my face
I've been down so long, it look like up to me
They look up to me
I got fake people showin' fake love to me
Straight up to my face, straight up to my face


Yeah, straight up to my face, tryna play it safe
Vibe switch like night and day
I can see it, like, right away
I came up, you changed up
I caught that whole play
Since, things never been the same

That's when they smile in my face
Whole time they wanna take my place
Whole time they wanna take my place
Whole time they wanna take my place
Yeah, I know they wanna take my place
I can tell that love is fake (I can tell that love is fake)
I don't trust a word you say (I don't trust a word)
How you wanna clique up after your mistakes?
(That's just what I heard)
Look you in the face, and it's just not the same


I've been down so long, it look like up to me
They look up to me
I got fake people showin' fake love to me
Straight up to my face, straight up to my face
I've been down so long, it look like up to me
They look up to me
I got fake people showin' fake love to me
Straight up to my face, straight up to my face


Skrrt
And more chune for your headtop
So watch how you speak on my name, you know?",2890553
90328,1969486,Sneakin,rap,Drake,2016,1646757,"{""21 Savage""}","
Yeah
We got London on da Track


This is all God's doin', man, you can't plan it
But if the devil's in the details, then I'm Satanic
'Bout to take over your city and you can't stand it
My accountant say you sinkin' like the Titanic
David Blaine last summer, man, you had to vanish
I get the hits like somebody pitchin' underhanded
Got my Spanish ting convinced that I know Spanish
Really, when she get to talkin', I don't understand it
You ain't own it right away, you had to wait on niggas
Man, I'm only twenty-nine, have some patience with us
Plus I never met nobody from my label, nigga
I just pop up with the music then they pay a nigga (Yeah)


Shit ain't been the same like before
I still love it but I used to love it more
FaceTime with my shawty on tour
And she textin' purple hearts 'cause she know that we at war, yuh

Niggas keep reachin' and dissin'
Can't afford mistakes, not on this end
Make me call my bros for assistance
You gon' make me call my bros for assistance
Niggas keep reachin' and dissin'
Put me in a fucked-up position (Yah)
You gon' make me call my bros for assistance (21)
Make me call my bro (21, uh)


Baby, I'm a savage, I ain't romantic
When I come around, these rapper niggas start to panic
And they pockets goin' under like the Titanic
Got some head last night and it was outstandin'
They was hatin' on me then and they hatin' now (Hatin' now)
She was playin' with me then but she waitin' now (21, 21)
Used to sleep inside a den, I got acres now (Mansion)
I was fightin' niggas then but I'm sprayin' now (Blastin')
I don't pay no mind to no sneak diss (Nope)
I won't spend a dime on a freak bitch (Broke)
Niggas takin' cheap shots on some cheap shit (21)
They the type to stand in line for some free shit (Broke bitch)
Baby girl gon' suck it till her jaws locked (Suck it up)
She gon' make me put my bitch on call block (Fuckin' up)
We the ones poppin', we the ones shoppin' (21)
We the one droppin' niggas, we the ones (We the ones)
They the ones duckin' when them heaters come (21, 21)
You that nigga snitchin' on your people, huh? (Shh)
21 Savage a.k.a. The Reaper, huh (21)
Pussy niggas gettin' shot for all that reachin', huh (Ya dig?)

Niggas keep reachin' and dissin' (Shut the fuck up)
Can't afford mistakes, not on this end (Count the fuck up)
Make me call my bros for assistance (21)
You gon' make me call my bros for assistance (Bros)
Niggas keep reachin' and dissin' (Hol' up)
Put me in a fucked-up position (21)
Make me call my bros for assistance
Make me call my bro, dawg


I don't need love, I'm the GOAT, I just hit the beat and float
And I'm sellin' out arenas but you puttin' on a show
I been tryna change life around for everyone I know
'Cause if I don't share the wealth
Then how the fuck we supposed to grow?
Mom's stressed, there's a lot of things we need
Chain smokin' in the house, it's hard to breathe
I used to have to hit my Ts with Febreze
Jordan pull up in the TL, now I'm cheese
I'ma turn this TSX into a Benz soon
I'ma see a lot of blessin's for my friends soon
Hunnid-fifty-inch screen in my bedroom
6'1"", man, a nigga need some leg room


Shit ain't been the same like before
They ain't even wanna look up at the score
FaceTime with my shawty on tour
And she textin' purple hearts 'cause she know that we at war, yuh

Niggas keep reachin' and dissin'
Can't afford mistakes, not on this end
Make me call my bros for assistance
You gon' make me call my bros for assistance
Niggas keep reachin' and dissin'
Put me in a fucked-up position
Make me call my bros for assistance
Make me call my bro, don't",2890555
90419,1971323,Veleno 6,rap,MadMan,2016,1919531,{Gemitaiz},"


Mixer T, cì


È il Gemitaiz te rispondo ancora: ""Che voi?"" (Eh)
C'ho ancora un po' de veleno pe' voi (Eh)
Punta ai grattacieli come la Bad Boy (Eh)
Flow Makaveli, calo col match point (Uh)
Il mio flow per te è una tortura (Ah)
Puoi portare chi ti pare tanto non dura (Hah)
Fuori bianchi dentro negri come in Honduras (Oh)
Ne facciamo finché ci schiantiamo col tour bus (Uh)
Quando entro sulla base questi ancora che mi guardano (Uh)
Non sono capaci quindi gridano allo scandalo (Uh)
Sulle basi lente faccio il vandalo
Ricorda che sono una Jordan, tu sei un sandalo (Hah)
Con due etti divento E.T.
Sotto funghetti, se mi permetti (Ah)
Metto i lucchetti sopra i versetti (Eh)
Solo se smetti ci fai contenti (Ah-ah)
Check it, check it, frate', fammi provare (Hah)
Sputo venti versi col flow particolare (Hah)
Così se li senti posso farti volare (Hah)
Pompa questi, esci e molla gli altri, compare (Eh!)
Metto la palla in buca
C'ho il numero nove come Batistuta
La mia gente parla di merda perché l'ha vissuta
Per questo quando ti sente ogni mio fra' ti sputa
*sputo*
Aumento l'alimentazione, prende fuoco l'alimentatore
Chi si inventa storie gli sputo a rallentatore (Ah)
Ogni sei parole ti do dipendenza come il metadone
Metà uomo metà clone, faccio il seratone
Sotto il segno del dragone scrivo ogni sera nuove barre
Che per farle impieghi il tempo che il pianeta muore (Eh)
Frate', di 'sta merda mi hanno appena eletto senatore (Eh)
Frate', di 'sta merda mi hanno appena eletto imperatore (Aah)
Quando monto (Uh)
Sembra di stare in un altro mondo (Eh)
E pensa che non ci faccio manco molto
Li mando tutti a casa finché gratto il fondo (Hah)
Flow killer, drug dealer
Non pensare che finisco, ne ho mille (Eh)
No macchine (No), no ville (No)
Che te pensi che ho firmato con Skrillex?
Siamo Tanta Roba (Tanta Roba)
Il triangolo
A.k.a. gli altri artisti piangono (Hah, scusa)
Dani, sai quanti dischi mancano? (Uh)
Che prendo una barca
Con tre grammi infilati dentro la scarpa (Hah)
Sto coi miei fratelli che l'accendono all'alba
Non amo la strada perché vengo da là, fra'
(Ciao, fra')

Le tecniche che cerchi tu? Ciao
Se faccio un pezzo sopra al boom-cha da denuncia
Te ti brucia che spacco (Eh)
Pure se sbaglio la pronuncia (Eh)
M un colpo di Mauser, tu un Taser
Quante barre scrause che fate (Eh)
Vi consiglio delle pause, piangi in ogni singolo
Sembra che hai la sindrome di Münchhausen (Uah)
Le rime che cerchi io le sputo, le archivio (Eh)
Fai cagare quando rappi in studio e dal vivo (Eh-eh)
Se mi spari torno, sono vendicativo (Ye)
Living dead, Mad il vampiro (Rrh)
Torna dalla morte, da Caronte
Sale dalle catacombe, scala il monte
Il tuo bro scappa forte, sbarra porte
Perché sa che il mio flow è una Colt e spacca calotte (Brr)
Spingo troppo finché doppio il suono
Fumo l'oppio e chiudo gli occhi, Hiroshima (Ah)
Scavo tombe tipo l'Etna, salgo in vetta
Sgancio bombe tipo Vietnam, Indocina (Bum)
Scemo impara la gavetta, tirocina
Ci ricopiano a manetta, tipo Cina (Ah)
Vi mangiamo tipo le M&M's
M e Gem sono tipo Rei e Kenshiro, voi Shiro e Mila (Ciao)
No io non finisco
Sennò questi dicono che non ho voglia, fanno come quella tipa
Che non dice che è una troia poi si ingoia i miei coglioni
Come dei ravioli perché dice sì come Valsoia
Quando me li ingoia mentre guido metto la seconda
Lei che mi asseconda, mi diventa tipo una sequoia
Mentre bevo Cognac, cazzo che vergogna
Da mezz'ora giro a 'sta rotonda
Ogni barra è un missile balistico di Putin (Uh)
Ho lo stile fisico, quantistico, ti chiudi (Uh)
Per rifarlo pure se è impossibile, ne ho visti tributi (Ye)
Rappo per altri venti minuti (No)
Metricamente autistico, avanguardistico (Eh)
Ho fatto lo scientifico, mica l'artistico (Eh)
Sto con Labadini, gonfio Napapijiri (Vai)
Davide è di là che gira papiri
(L'accendiamo?)
Okay, okay (L'accendiamo)
Cappa nella stanza
Fissiamo la ganja che ci paralizziamo
La faccia pessima, maciniamo
La traccia a pezzi, guarda chi siamo
Non guardo i prezzi frate' acquistiamo
Altri quattro pezzi di Pakistano (Uh-uh-uh)
Ci ribaltiamo gli occhi al contrario
Che ti battiamo è lapalissiano (Eh)
Sto a mille, guardami che brucio le papille (Seh)
Sulla base non indugio, serial killer (Ah)
Voglio demolire, che ti devo dire? (Seh)
Voglio solo morire alle Antille (Seh)
Non mi voglio accontentare
Rappo tipo lama per accoltellare
Ogni barra è la mia dama da contemplare
Da domani ramadan, ho troppe pare
Fra', c'ho la madama che è pronta a entrare
(Pare)

Ahaha, che cazzo devo dire? Devo anche aggiungere qualcosa?
Mio fratello Gemitaiz, Veleno parte 6
La cazzo di leggenda continua, er veleno nun finisce mai",2892490
90501,1972172,How Far Ill Go,pop,Alessia Cara,2016,1199638,{},"
I've been staring at the edge of the water
Long as I can remember, never really knowing why
I wish I could be the perfect daughter
But I come back to the water, no matter how hard I try


Every turn I take, every trail I track
Every path I make, every road leads back
To the place I know, where I cannot go
Where I long to be


See the line where the sky meets the sea? It calls me
And no one knows how far it goes
If the wind in my sail on the sea stays behind me
One day I'll know, if I go there's just no telling how far I'll go


Go-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Go-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Go-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Go-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh-oh

I know everybody on this island seems so happy
On this island, everything is by design
I know everybody on this island has a role on this island
So maybe I can roll with mine


I can lead with pride, I can make us strong
I'll be satisfied if I play along
But the voice inside sings a different song
What is wrong with me?


See the light as it shines on the sea? It's blinding
But no one knows, how deep it goes
And it seems like it's calling out to me, so come find me
And let me know, what's beyond that line, will I cross that line?
See the line where the sky meets the sea? It calls me
And no one knows, how far it goes
If the wind in my sail on the sea stays behind me
One day I'll know, how far I'll go",2893389
90582,1972682,Bounce Back,rap,Big Sean,2016,2168522,{},"
Hitmaka
If Young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you


Last night took a L, but tonight I bounce back
Wake up every morning, by the night, I count stacks
Knew that ass was real when I hit, it bounce back
(You ain't getting checks)
Last night took a L, but tonight I bounce back
Boy, I been broke as hell, cashed a check and bounced back
D town LAX, every week I bounce back
If you a real one, then you know how to bounce back


Don't owe nobody, owe nobody
Always on the fuckin' job, I got no hobbies
Got the city fuckin' with me 'cause I'm homegrown
Vibin' out more than my phone though
Leave me 'lone, me on my own though
Look, I cut that bitch off like a edit
My daddy a G, it's genetics (Straight up)
I heard ya new shit, it's pathetic
Ya contract should be shredded
Took my dogs on a private jet from the public housing
I kept it G, yeah, one thousand
Clique star-studded like the Paramount mountain
Everything I do is righteous
Betting on me is the right risk
Even in a fucking crisis
I'm never on some switching sides shit
I switch gears to the night shift
Blacking out 'cause I'm enlightened
God talk to me in silence
But I hear him every time, mane
(Thank you, God, God bless you, thank you so much)

Last night took a L, but tonight I bounce back
Wake up every morning, by the night, I count stacks
Knew that ass was real when I hit, it bounce back
(You ain't getting checks)
Last night took a L, but tonight I bounce back
Boy, I been broke as hell, cashed a check and bounced back
D town LAX, every week I bounce back
If you a real one, then you know how to bounce back


Look, I woke up in beast mode
With my girl, that's beauty and the beast though
Been top 5, these niggas sleep though
Only thing that sold out is the seats though
(Never sold my soul, never will never have)
Nigga how dare you stand before me and not respect my authority
If you fuck with my glory, I'ma drop the L and get gory
I done did everything except worry
Hella drama, my life story
Faith of a mustard seed, I kept growing
I knew that this life was meant for me
Niggas change up more than wishin' wells
Karma come around I'll wish 'em well
Livin' like I'm on a limitless pill
I kill the scene like I'm Denzel
Crazy like my jacket strapped up
Nigga, I don't act but I'll act up
Brown paper bag like the lunch packed up
Back, back, back, back up
Nigga, I'ma need like 10 feet
Or get stomped out with ten feet
I'ma always lose my temper
You cannot ""count to ten"" me
If I lose 1, I bounce back like 2, 3 did with 4, 5
Seen courtrooms and court sides, ain't too many seen both sides
Nigga, fuck what you know
Nigga, I'm takin' back control
The underdog just turned into the wolf and the hunger steady grows
Yeah, I call shots while you call off
Never takin' summer or fall off
When you stay that committed to it, you just fall down and never fall off, so

Last night took a L, but tonight I bounce back
Wake up every morning, by the night, I count stacks
Knew that ass was real when I hit, it bounce back
(You ain't getting checks)
Last night took a L, but tonight I bounce back
Boy, I been broke as hell, cashed a check and bounced back
D town LAX, every week I bounce back
If you a real one, then you know how to bounce back


Bounce back, bounce, bounce
Bounce back, bounce, bounce
Bounce, bounce, bitch, bounce (Yeah)
Is you a real one?
Is you a real one?
Real one
Real one
Is you a real one?
Real one
Real one
Don",2893922
90649,1973442,Youre Welcome,pop,Dwayne Johnson,2016,1589523,{},"
Okay, okay, I see what's happening, yeah
You're face-to-face with greatness and it's strange
You don't even know how you feel, it's adorable
Well, it's nice to see that humans never change
Open your eyes, let's begin
Yes, it's really me, it's Maui, breathe it in
I know it's a lot: the hair, the bod
When you're starin' at a demigod


What can I say except ""you're welcome""
For the tides, the sun, the sky?
Hey, it's okay, it's okay, you're welcome
I'm just an ordinary demi-guy


Hey! What has two thumbs and pulled up the sky
When you were waddling yay high? This guy
When the nights got cold, who stole you fire from down below?
You're lookin' at him, yo!
Oh, also I lassoed the sun, you're welcome
To stretch your days and bring you fun
Also I harnessed the breeze, you're welcome
To fill your sails and shake your trees

So what can I say except ""you're welcome""
For the islands I pulled from the sea?
There's no need to pray, it's okay, you're welcome, ha!
I guess it's just my way of being me


You're welcome, you're welcome
Well, come to think of it


Kid, honestly, I could go on and on
I could explain every natural phenomenon
The tide, the grass, the ground?
Oh, that was Maui just messin' around
I killed an eel, I buried its guts
Sprouted a tree, now you got coconuts
What's the lesson? What is the takeaway?
Don't mess with Maui when he's on a breakaway
And the tapestry here in my skin
Is a map of the victories I win
Look where I've been, I make everything happen
Look at that mean Mini-Maui just tickety-tappin'
Ha ha ha ha ha hey


Well anyway, let me say ""you're welcome"" (You're welcome...ha ha ha)
For the wonderful world you know?
Hey, it's okay, it's okay, you're welcome (You're welcome...ha ha ha)
Well, come to think of it, I gotta go
Hey, it's your day to say ""you're welcome"" (You're welcome...ha ha ha ha)
'Cause I'm gonna need that boat
I'm sailing away, away, you're welcome (You're welcome...ha ha ha ha)
'Cause Maui can do everything but float (You're welcome)

You're welcome (You're welcome)
You're welcome


And thank you!",2894762
90650,1973444,How Far Ill Go,pop,Auli'i Cravalho,2016,1860785,"{""Auli\\'i Cravalho""}","
I've been staring at the edge of the water
Long as I can remember, never really knowing why
I wish I could be the perfect daughter
But I come back to the water, no matter how hard I try


Every turn I take, every trail I track
Every path I make, every road leads back
To the place I know where I cannot go
Where I long to be


See the line where the sky meets the sea? It calls me
And no one knows, how far it goes
If the wind in my sail on the sea stays behind me
One day I'll know
If I go there's just no telling how far I'll go


I know everybody on this island seems so happy, on this island
Everything is by design
I know everybody on this island has a role, on this island
So maybe I can roll with mine

I can lead with pride, I can make us strong
I'll be satisfied if I play along
But the voice inside sings a different song
What is wrong with me?


See the light as it shines on the sea? It's blinding
But no one knows, how deep it goes
And it seems like it's calling out to me, so come find me
And let me know
What's beyond that line, will I cross that line?
See the line where the sky meets the sea? It calls me
And no one knows, how far it goes
If the wind in my sail on the sea stays behind me
One day I'll know
How far I'll go",2894765
90916,1977168,Versace on the Floor,pop,Bruno Mars,2016,2042024,{},"
Let's take our time tonight, girl
Above us all the stars are watchin'
There's no place I'd rather be in this world
Your eyes are where I'm lost in
Underneath the chandelier
We're dancin' all alone
There's no reason to hide
What we're feelin' inside
Right now


So, baby, let's just turn down the lights
And close the door
Oooh I love that dress
But you won't need it anymore
No, you won't need it no more
Let's just kiss 'til we're naked, baby


Versace on the floor
Oooh take it off for me, for me, for me, for me now, girl
Versace on the floor
Oooh take it off for me, for me, for me, for me now, girl

Now I unzip the back to watch it fall
While I kiss your neck and shoulders
No, don't be afraid to show it all
I'll be right here ready to hold you
Girl, you know you're perfect from
Your head down to your heels
Don't be confused by my smile
'Cause I ain't ever been more for real, for real


So just turn down the lights
And close the door
Oooh I love that dress
But you won't need it anymore
No, you won't need it no more
Let's just kiss 'til we're naked, baby


Versace on the floor
Oooh take it off for me, for me, for me, for me now, girl
Versace on the floor
Oooh take it off for me, for me, for me, for me now, girl
Dance


It's warmin' up
Can you feel it?
It's warmin' up
Can you feel it?
It's warmin' up
Can you feel it, baby?
It's warmin' up
Oh, seems like you're ready for more, more, more
Let's just kiss 'til we're naked

Versace on the floor
Hey, baby
Take it off for me, for me, for me, for me now, girl
Versace on the floor
Oooh take it off for me, for me, for me, for me now, girl


Versace on the floor
Floor
Floor",2898687
91067,1978582,I Fall Apart,rb,Post Malone,2016,2677205,{},"
Ooh, I fall apart
Ooh, yeah, mmm, yeah


She told me that I'm not enough (Yeah)
And she left me with a broken heart (Yeah)
She fooled me twice and it's all my fault (Yeah)
She cut too deep, now she left me scarred (Yeah)
Now there's so many thoughts goin' through my brain (Yeah)
And now I'm takin' these shots like it's Novocaine, yeah


Ooh, I fall apart
Down to my core
Ooh, I fall apart
Down to my core
Ooh, didn't know it before
Surprised when you caught me off guard
All this damn jewelry I bought
You was my shorty, I thought

Never caught a feelin' this hard
Harder than the liquor I pour
Tell me you don't want me no more
But I can't let go, everybody told me so
Feelin' like I sold my soul
Devil in the form of a whore
Devil in the form of a whore
You said it, no, you said it
No, you said that shit, we'd be together, oh


Ooh, I fall apart
Down to my core
Ooh, I fall apart
Down to my core
Ooh, didn't know it before
Surprised when you caught me off guard
All this damn jewelry I bought
You was my shorty, I thought


Ice keep pourin' and the drink keep flowin'
Try to brush it off, but it keep on goin'
Covered in scars and I can't help showin'
Whippin' in the foreign and the tears keep rollin'
Ice keep droppin' and the drink keep flowin'
Try to brush it off, but it keep on goin'
All these scars, can't help from showin'
Whippin' in the foreign and the tears keep blowin', yeah

Ooh, I fall apart
Down to my core
Ooh, I fall apart
Down to my core
Ooh, didn't know it before
Surprised when you caught me off guard
All this damn jewelry I bought
You was my shorty, I thought",2900237
91330,1982806,Unforgettable,rap,French Montana,2017,3221421,"{""Swae Lee""}","
It's not good enough for me
Since I've been with you, ooh
It's not gonna work for you
Nobody can equal me (I know)
I'm gonna sip on this drink, when I'm fucked up
I should know how to pick up
I'm gonna catch the rhythm
While she push up against me, ooh, and she tipsy
I had enough convo for 24
I peep'd you from across the room
Pretty little body dancin' like GoGo, hey
And you are unforgettable
I need to get you alone (Ooh)
Why not? A fuckin' good time never hurt nobody
I got a little drink but it's not Bacardi
If you loved the girl, then I'm so, so sorry
I gotta give it to her like we in a marriage
Oh, like we in a hurry
No, no, I won't tell nobody
You're on your level too
Tryna do what lovers do

Feelin' like I'm fresh out; Boosie (Boosie)
If they want the drama, got the Uzi (Uzi)
Ship the whole crew to the cruise ship (Cruise)
Doin' shit you don't even see in movies (Movies)
Ride with me, ride with me, boss (Boss)
I got a hard head, but her ass soft (Soft)
She want the last name with the ring on it
'Cause I pulled out a million cash, told her plank on it


And you are unforgettable
I need to get you alone
Now you wanna choose
Just pop the bubbly in the 'cuzi


It's not good enough for me
Since I've been with you, ooh
I'm gonna sip on this drink, when I'm fucked up
I should know how to pick up
I'm gonna catch the rhythm
While she push up against me, ooh, and she tipsy
I had enough convo for 24
I peep'd you from across the room
Pretty little body dancin' like GoGo, hey
And you are unforgettable
I need to get you alone (Oeh)
Why not? A fuckin' good time never hurt nobody
I got a little drink but it's not Bacardi
If you loved the girl, then I'm so, so sorry
I gotta give it to her like we in a marriage
Oh, like we in a hurry
No, no, I won't tell nobody
You're on your level too
Tryna do what lovers do

You ain't enough for me
Too much for you alone
Baby, go and grab some bad bitches, bring 'em home
Know the jet's on me
I'ma curve my best for you, you know
So pick up that dress for me
Leave the rest on
Too much convo for 24 hours
When you stand next to 24 karats
She left her man at home
She don't love him no more
I want your mind and your body
Don't mind nobody
So, you don't ever hurt nobody
Baby girl, work your body, work your body


And you are unforgettable
I need to get you alone
Now you wanna choose
Just pop the bubbly in the 'cuzi
Why not?


Oh, like we in a hurry
No, no, I won't tell nobody
You're on your level too
Tryna do what lovers do",2904574
91357,1982900,First Day Out,rap,Tee Grizzley,2016,2958068,{},"
Helluva made this beat, baby


These niggas prayed on my downfall (They what?)
These niggas prayed on my downfall
On all ten, bitch, I stood tall
Show these disloyal niggas how to ball


Go get a thermometer for the pot, I need this shit cooked right
Let's keep that water 400 degrees Fahrenheit
You ever been inside a federal court room?
Nigga you ever went to trial and fought for your life?
Bein' broke did somethin' to my spirit
Asked niggas to plug me, they act like they couldn't hear me
Look at me now, drivin' German engineering
You don't want your baby mama fucked, keep the ho from near me
Kilroy, 'member when I used to use your L's
To hit the road, hit the O and make them big boy sales?
Mu, 'member when you had them green things mailed?
With vacuum seals, tryin' not to have them green things smelled?
Feds was on me, what you know about related through money?
I don't know nothin', I just used to see 'em walk to the Coney
I fuck with bitches, my body count go from Pershing to Cody
Any further questions, you can take that up with the lawyer
My nigga Fenkell, J Money, Brightmo Lo, Project Joe
Will tell you every day before school I sold a half bow
How you think I won best dressed with no support?
And had them paid lawyers comin' in and out of court
Ayy, Dwan, though, ayy, Theo, ain't it a blessing?
We made it out Kentucky after all that happened?
After the pre-trials, after the status
After them impact statements, after the castle

Ayy, JR, nigga, ain't it a blessing?
We made it out of Lansing after all that happened? (We did that bitch, nigga)
After Michigan State, after Hubbard
When our mans told on us, them bands they took from us
Joy road bitch, but the money long as six mile
Brick mile, knock your bitch down
Pick her up, knock her back down, pull her tracks out
Yes I slap girl, yes I slap dog, yes I slap loud
Yes I'll slap a pussy nigga if he act out
Yes I caught cases on the road with them killers
Bro, kill me if I snitch, 'cause if you snitch I'm gon' kill ya
Spent a lot of time on that yard with them gorillas
Stood tall, did I let niggas ho me? Quit bein' silly
I know for a fact your bitch pussy get wet for a nigga
'Cause I do it better, plus I'm doin' better than niggas
I'm at home when I'm down there in Lexington nigga
'Bout the king, they gon' drop you and who next to you nigga
Unc said Lil T, ""Get ahead of them niggas!""
When you take off, don't look back and try to rescue them niggas
You killed his mans? Then make sure you get the rest of them niggas
Don't let them get the best of you, just get the revenue nigga
So let me know what you can handle, okay, come grab it
Here go some extras, so if I'm busy you can manage
Fiends had me Blade dancin', eating sixty dollar salads
Get it there and back, tell the feds I need a challenge
My first offer was 30 years, not a day lower
I told them crackers holler at me when they sober
On parole, I'm a felon, you think I ain't got that blower?
Yeah you right, bro take his head off his fuckin' shoulders
(Boom-Boom-Boom!)
You hear me? Hit the Rollie store with the Rollie on
What was our getaway car? A Jag Portfolio
You hear me? Ayy, I heard I had some sneak dissers
Whoever feelin' hot, that AR got a heat sensor
Cuz said don't entertain them hungry niggas
I wish I would pay attention to these homeless niggas
Don't call my phone, I don't want to do no song with niggas
And tell yo bitch to tighten up before I bone her, nigga
I don't know you niggas, fuck wrong with niggas?
Through these white buffs I can see the ho in niggas
Free my nigga Parico, that boy be hoein' niggas
Shoot the smile off your face, I don't joke with niggas
Boy, I can't trust you with that strap if you ain't got no bodies
Boy, I can't take you on no lick if you ain't robbed nobody
You ain't no shooter, you can't do that shit without no molly
I came home and had the hoes wetter than Kalahari
Thirty months ago niggas ain't think that I was comin' home
Shout out to them niggas' freaks that I been cummin' on
Get 'em to the crib, bust 'em down, now bitch run along
This SK'll get to shakin' like there's somethin' wrong
Thirty bands two times, watch this money clone
The feds say my name hot like when the oven on
Bitch, I came home to my lil' brother gone
Niggas say they lookin' for me, pull up in the Skuddy zone
Who said I'm a snitch? You just heard a lie from him
Better check the black and white
That paperwork will vouch for him
Zero toleration for that nigga, take his life from him
He don't want that pistol play? Okay I'll Tyson him
I ain't hear from bitches when I had them blues on
So soon as I'm done fuckin', put your shoes on
I'm on parole in two states, I can't move wrong
The feds tryin' to build a case, I can't move wrong
I went to trial back to back, bitch, I'm 2-0
The state of Kentucky banned me from every jewelry store
Say I can't even be in public with my hoodie on
Michigan State don't want him here, they don't know what he on

I know they prayed on my downfall
I know they prayed on my downfall
On all ten, bitch, I stood tall
Show these disloyal niggas how to ball",2904673
91429,1983375,Redbone,rb,Childish Gambino,2016,4548155,{},"
Daylight
I wake up feeling like you won't play right
I used to know, but now that shit don't feel right
It made me put away my pride
So long
You made a nigga wait for some, so long
You make it hard for boy like that to go on
I'm wishing I could make this mine, oh


If you want it, yeah
You can have it, oh, oh, oh
If you need it, ooh
We can make it, oh
If you want it
You can have it


But stay woke
Niggas creepin'
They gon' find you
Gon' catch you sleepin', ooh
Now stay woke
Niggas creepin'
Now don't you close your eyes

Too late
You wanna make it right, but now it's too late
My peanut butter chocolate cake with Kool-Aid
I'm trying not to waste my time


If you want it, oh
You can have it, you can have it
If you need it, you better believe in something
We can make it, oh
If you want it
You can have it, ah


But stay woke (Stay woke)
Niggas creepin' (They be creepin')
They gon' find you (They gon' find you)
Gon' catch you sleepin' (Gon' catch you sleepin', put your hands up now, baby)
Ooh, now stay woke
Niggas creepin'
Now, don't you close your eyes
But stay woke (Ooh)
Niggas creepin' (They gon' find you)
They gon' find you
Gon' catch you sleepin', ooh (Gon' catch you, gon' catch you)
Now stay woke
Niggas creepin'
Now, don't you close your eyes

How'd it get so scandalous?
Oh, how'd it get so scandalous?
Oh, oh, baby you, how'd it get
How'd it get so scandalous?
How'd it get so scandalous?
But stay woke
But stay woke",2905167
91678,1986921,Black Barbies,rap,Nicki Minaj & Mike WiLL Made-It,2016,1110269,{},"
Mike WiLL Made-It, nigga
SremmLife
Black Barbies in the city
Fat ass and pretty titties
Get dummies for they money
You sent flowers but I wish I didn't receive 'em
All your lies I wish I didn't believe 'em


That boy is a real pussy pleaser
All that fetty but he never met Masika
Tuck the chrome 22 in his sneaker
El Chapo but he crazy like La Quica
Young girls always lookin' for a soulmate
But I shoulda listened to what momma told me
Furry moon boots, shades Dita
Too high to give a shit about PETA


Sativa so strong I'm not blinkin'
What in the world was I thinkin'?
New day, new money to be made
New things for them to imitate
I'm a fuckin' black barbie
Pretty face, perfect body
Pink seats in the 'Rari
Always fuck him like I'm sorry
Who the fuck is gon' protect her?
If I really gotta check her
Peter Piper picked a pepper
And my cake is triple decker

No Flex Zone, No Flex Zone
(Yeah, oh no, no, no, no) No Flex Zone


I see these silly nigga's flexin', it's a no zone
You gon' be floatin' in dem rivers like you know Joan
Island girl, Donald Trump want me go home
Still pull up with my wrist lookin' like a snowcone
She said she got a hit record, I said ""Oooh shit!""
Picked up my phone cause I had to call ""Bullshit!""
These bitches havin' nightmares of my new shit
These bitches pussy and they don't ever do shit
Hahaha, get it? Douche-...hahahahahahaha
Half a mili on the Maybach Pullman, bought it
Now I'm prayin'  all my foreigns don't get deported
Niggas love me so much they be sendin' me gifts
And these clown niggas actin', I'ma send 'em some skits
Bitches can't rap for shit, I'ma send 'em some tips
All these bitches is my sons, should be suckin' my tits


(Yeah, oh no, no, no, no, yeah, oh no, no, no, no)


Now usually I don't do this, I'm Popeye, she's Brutus
Usually I'm a Christian but this peace is Buddhist
All of my niggas draw but none of them cartoonists
Usually I'm the baddest, usually I'm the cutest
Usually I'm the flyest, usually you're the stewardess
And we ain't playin' ball but usually its some shooters
Are these bitches drunk? These bitches ain't lucid
Go against the queen your career will be elusive
Where your plaques at? Where them stocks? Word to NASDAQ
Bitches ass-back, they was never in my tax-brack
(Yeah, oh no, no, no, no, yeah, oh no, no, no, no)

That girl is a real crowd pleaser
Small world, all her friends know of me
Young bull living like an old geezer
Quick release the cash, watch it fall slowly
Frat girls still tryna get even
Haters mad for whatever reason
Smoke in the air, binge drinking
They lose it when the DJ drops the needle",2908859
91696,1987211,Thats What I Like,rb,Bruno Mars,2016,2753957,{},"
Ayy, ayy, ayy
I got a condo in Manhattan
Baby girl, what's happenin'?
You and your ass invited
So go on and get to clappin'
So pop it for a player
Pop, pop it for me
Turn around and drop it for a player
Drop, drop it for me
I'll rent a beach house in Miami (-ami)
Wake up with no jammies (Nope)
Lobster tail for dinner
Julio, serve that scampi (Julio!)
You got it if you want it
Got, got it if you want it
Said, you got it if you want it
Take my wallet if you want it now


Jump in the Cadillac, girl, let's put some miles on it
Anything you want, just to put a smile on it
You deserve it, baby, you deserve it all
And I'm gonna give it to you

Gold jewelry shining so bright
Strawberry champagne on ice
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Sex by the fire at night
Silk sheets and diamonds all white
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like


I'm talkin' trips to Puerto Rico (Bih)
Say the word, and we go (Say it)
You can be my freaka (Brrrt!)
Girl, I'll be your fleeko
Mamacita
I will never make a promise that I can't keep
I promise that your smile ain't gon' never leave
Shopping sprees in Paris
Everything 24 karats
Take a look in that mirror
Now tell me, who's the fairest?
Is it you? (Is it you?) Is it me? (Is it me?)
Say it's us (Say it's us) and I'll agree, baby


Jump in the Cadillac, girl, let's put some miles on it
Anything you want, just to put a smile on it
You deserve it, baby, you deserve it all
And I'm gonna give it to you

Gold jewelry shining so bright
Strawberry champagne on ice
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Sex by the fire at night
Silk sheets and diamonds all white
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like


If you say you want a good time
Well, here I am, baby, here I am, baby
Talk to me, talk to me, talk to me
Tell me, what's on your mind? (What's on your mind?)
If you want it, girl, come and get it
All this is here for you
Tell me, baby, tell me, tell me, baby
What you tryna do?


Gold jewelry shining so bright
Strawberry champagne on ice
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Sex by the fire at night
Silk sheets and diamonds all white
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like
Lucky for you, that's what I like, that's what I like",2909160
91721,1987598,I Feel It Coming,pop,The Weeknd,2016,2086367,"{""Daft Punk""}","
Yeah, ah


Tell me what you really like
Baby, I can take my time
We don't ever have to fight
Just take it step-by-step
I can see it in your eyes
'Cause they never tell me lies
I can feel that body shake
And the heat between your legs


You've been scared of love and what it did to you
You don't have to run, I know what you've been through
Just a simple touch and it could set you free
We don't have to rush when you're alone with me


I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe

You are not the single type
So, baby, this the perfect time
I'm just tryna get you high (I'm just tryin', babe)
And faded off this touch
You don't need a lonely night
So, baby, I can make it right
You just gotta let me try (Try)
To give you what you want


You've been scared of love and what it did to you
You don't have to run, I know what you've been through
Just a simple touch and it could set you free
We don't have to rush when you're alone with me


I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', I feel it comin', babe

Uh, you've been scared of love and what it did to you
You don't have to run, I know what you've been through
Just a simple touch and it could set you free
We don't have to rush when you're alone with me


I feel it comin' (I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I feel it comin', babe)
I feel it comin' (I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I know what you feel right now)
I feel it comin' (I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I feel it comin', baby)
I feel it comin' (I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I know what you say right now, babe)
I feel it comin' (Na-na-na, na-na-na, na-na-na; I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I feel it comin', babe; oh, babe)
I feel it comin' (I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I know what you say right now)
I feel it comin' (Na-na-na, na-na-na, na-na-na; I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe (I feel it comin', baby)
I feel it comin' (I feel it comin')
I feel it comin', babe


I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', babe
I feel it comin', babe",2909921
91797,1988414,Party Monster,pop,The Weeknd,2016,1755033,{},"
I'm good, I'm good, I'm great
Know it's been a while, now I'm mixin' up the drank
I just need a girl who gon' really understand
I just need a girl who gon' really understand
I'm good, I'm good, I'm great
Know it's been a while, now I'm mixin' up the drank
I just need a girl who gon' really understand
I just need a girl who gon' really understand


And I seen her get rich hittin' the pole
I've seen her, I knew she had to know
I've seen her take down that tequila
Down by the liter, I knew I had to meet her
Ooh, she mine, ooh, girl, bump and grind
Ooh, she mine, ooh, girl, bump a line
Angelina, lips like Angelina
Like Selena, ass shaped like Selena


I'm like, got up, thank the Lord for the day
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
(Woke up, woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
Got up, thank the Lord for the day
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
(Woke up, woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)

I'm good, I'm good, I'm great
Know it's been a while, now I'm mixin' up the drank
I just need a girl who gon' really understand
I just need a girl who gon' really understand
I'm good, I'm good, I'm great
Know it's been a while, now I'm mixin' up the drank
I just need a girl who gon' really understand
I just need a girl who gon' really understand


I been poppin', just took three in a row
I'm down to do it again, I'm on a roll
I've seen him outside tryna reach her
You tryna leave him, you said I'm the reason
Tell me lies, ooh, girl, tell me lies
Say you're mine, I'm yours for the night
I'm the realest, she said I'm the realest
Head be genius, dick game be the meanest


I'm like, got up, thank the Lord for the day
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
(Woke up, woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
Got up, thank the Lord for the day
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
(Woke up, woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)

Yeah
Ooh, yeah
Ooh, yeah
Oh, yeah (Yeah)
Got up, thank the Lord for the day
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
Bitches in my new spot, crowdin' up my space
Had to check the safe, check the dresser for my chains
Got up, thank the Lord for the day
Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name
Bitches in my new spot, crowdin' up my space
Had to check the safe, check the dresser for my chains


Paranoid (Paranoid)
Paranoid (Oh, paranoid)
Paranoid (Oh, paranoid)
But I see somethin' in you (You're paranoid)
Paranoid (Paranoid)
Paranoid (Oh, paranoid)
Paranoid (Oh, paranoid)
But I see somethin' in you (I see somethin' in you)


(Got up, thank the Lord for the day)
(Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
(Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
(Woke up, woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
(Got up, thank the Lord for the day)
(Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
(Woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
(Woke up, woke up by a girl, I don't even know her name)
You're paranoid",2911255
91825,1988683,Sidewalks,rb,The Weeknd,2016,1511820,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
Uh, uh, uh, uh-uh, uh, yeah, like


I ran out of tears when I was eighteen
So nobody made me but the main streets
'Cause too many people think they made me
Well, if they really made me, then replace me
Homeless to Forbes List, these niggas bring no stress
I feel like Moses, I feel like I'm chosen
And if you ain't my nigga, then your girl single to me
I don't give a damn if a nigga said he knew me
Grew up with no father so nobody ever ""son"" me
My flow too sick, Kevin Costner couldn't touch me
I know you wish that nobody ever love me
I feel useless when I'm never makin' money, ah
Well, this the life we always fantasized
Rich folk problem through a Queen Street nigga's eyes
Every time you see me pullin' up in Aventadors
Just know we been grindin' on them sidewalks

Sidewalks saved my life
They don't ever lie
Sidewalks saved my life
They show me all the signs


They don't let me down
But they lead me on
And they don't let me down
But they lead me on
And they lead me on


Say, say, say
I come from murder one, brung late night melee
Say, say, say
We hung all summer, sprung mattress with bae bae
Say, say, say
Trippin' off Dyke and my name strike with pay day
Say, say, say
Flippin' blue lightnin', tightenin', strapped with AK
Say, say, say
OG one, told me one, show me one, eight ways
How to segue
Pussy, power, profit and headache
I reminisce my life innocence or life innocent
Or life intimate, with fame
Light limo tint with light women, dark women in it
Aw, Kenny, good game
She wanna hang with a Starboy
The sun and the moon and star, boy
Astronomer, anonymous
I line 'em up, we grind 'em up, there's nine of us
And five of us have probably fucked
She mollied up, I tallied up all the parts, boy
Twenty legs, arms, head (Head)
Head, head, more head (Head)
Oh God, bless the dead (Yup)
I'm livin' life, high off life
I wear my chokes off to bed
I'm the greatest nigga, why you scared to say it?
I wanna rock, I wanna rock
I wanna cop more land, I never stop
I wanna quick advance on a bill if it ain't one
Break everything, I'm a hustler, came from

Sidewalks saved my life (Sidewalks saved my life)
They don't ever lie
Sidewalks saved my life (Sidewalks saved my life)
They show me all the signs


They don't let me down
But they lead me on
And they don't let me down
But they lead me on
And they lead me on",2911554
91826,1988686,Die for You,rb,The Weeknd,2016,1946544,{},"
I'm findin' ways to articulate the feelin' I'm goin' through
I just can't say I don't love you (Yeah)
'Cause I love you, yeah
It's hard for me to communicate the thoughts that I hold
But tonight, I'm gon' let you know
Let me tell the truth
Baby, let me tell the truth, yeah


You know what I'm thinkin', see it in your eyes
You hate that you want me, hate it when you cry
You're scared to be lonely, 'specially in the night
I'm scared that I'll miss you, happens every time
I don't want this feelin', I can't afford love
I try to find a reason to pull us apart
It ain't workin' 'cause you're perfect
And I know that you're worth it
I can't walk away, oh


Even though we're goin' through it
And it makes you feel alone
Just know that I would die for you
Baby, I would die for you, yeah
The distance and the time between us
It'll never change my mind 'cause
Baby, I would die for you
Baby, I would die for you, yeah (Say)

I'm findin' ways to manipulate the feelin' you're goin' through
But, baby girl, I'm not blamin' you
Just don't blame me, too, yeah
'Cause I can't take this pain forever
And you won't find no one that's better
'Cause I'm right for you, babe
I think I'm right for you, babe


You know what I'm thinkin', see it in your eyes
You hate that you want me, hate it when you cry
It ain't workin' 'cause you're perfect
And I know that you're worth it
I can't walk away, oh


Even though we're goin' through it
And it makes you feel alone
Just know that I would die for you
Baby, I would die for you, yeah
The distance and the time between us
It'll never change my mind 'cause
Baby, I would die for you, uh
Baby, I would die for you, yeah

I would die for you, I would lie for you
Keep it real with you, I would kill for you, my baby
I'm just sayin', yeah
I would die for you, I would lie for you
Keep it real with you, I would kill for you, my baby
Na-na-na, na-na-na, na-na-na


Even though we're goin' through it
And it makes you feel alone
Just know that I would die for you
Baby, I would die for you, yeah
The distance and the time between us
It'll never change my mind 'cause
Baby, I would die for you
Baby, I would die for you, yeah (Oh, babe)


(Die for you)",2911557
91829,1988692,Reminder,rb,The Weeknd,2016,3118417,{},"
Record man play my song on the radio
You too busy tryna find that blue-eyed soul
I let my black hair grow and my weed smoke
And I swear too much on the regular
We gon' let them hits fly, we gon' let it go
If it ain't XO, then it gotta go
I just won a new award for a kids show
Talkin' 'bout a face numbin' off a bag of blow
I'm like, goddamn, bitch, I am not a Teen Choice
Goddamn, bitch, I am not a bleach boy
Whip game, make a nigga understand though
Got that Hannibal, Silence of the Lambo
Hit the gas so hard make it rotate
All my niggas blew up like a propane
All these R&B niggas be so lame
Got a sweet Asian chick, she go lo mein (Oh-oh-oh)


You know me (Know me, uh, na-na-na-na-na)
You know me (Know me, know me, oh-oh-oh)
You know me (Know me, know me, na-na-na-na-na)
Every time you try to forget who I am
I'll be right there to remind you again
You know me (Pow, pow)
You know me (Know me)

Said I'm just tryna swim in somethin' wetter than the ocean
Faded off a double cup, I'm mixin' up the potion
All I wanna do is make that money and make dope shit
It just seem like niggas tryna sound like all my old shit
Everybody knows it, all these niggas know me
Platinum off a mixtape, sippin' on that codeine
Pour it in my trophies, roll until my nose bleed
I'ma keep on singin' while I'm burnin' up that OG
All my niggas get it, they make money all alone
Rock a chain around they neck, makin' sure I'm gettin' home
When I travel 'round the globe, make a couple mil' a show
And I come back to my city, I fuck every girl I know
Used to walk 'round with a slouch, had a mattress on the floor
Now my shit straight, eatin' all day, tryna lose weight
That good sex, we'll sweat it out
Hotel bed springs, we'll wear it out
I ain't gotta tell you


'Cause you know me (Oh-oh-oh)
You know me (Know me, ah, na-na-na-na-na)
You know me (Know me, know me, oh-oh-oh)
You know me (Know me, know me, na-na-na-na-na)
Every time you try to forget who I am (Try to forget who I am)
I'll be right there to remind you again (Hey)
You know me (Pow, pow)
You know me (Know me, know me)

Why don't you shake somethin', shake somethin'
For the Don? Don't you break nothin', break nothin'
Baby girl, won't you work somethin', work somethin'
For the Don? Don't you hurt nothin', hurt nothin'
Baby girl, won't you shake somethin', shake somethin' (Shake some)
For the Don? Don't you break nothin' (Break nothin'), break nothin'
Baby girl, won't you work somethin' (Work), work somethin'
For the Don? Don't you hurt nothin', hurt nothin'


'Cause you know me
Girl, you know me
You already know me
Yeah, you know me


Oh-oh-oh, na-na-na-na-na
Oh-oh-oh, na-na-na-na-na
Oh-oh-oh, na-na-na-na-na
Oh-oh-oh, na-na-na-na-na",2911564
92078,1992795,City of Stars/May Finally Come True,pop,Ryan Gosling & Emma Stone,2016,4064212,{},"
City of stars
Are you shining just for me?
City of stars
There's so much that I can't see
Who knows?
I felt it from the first embrace I shared with you
That now, our dreams
They've finally come true


City of stars
Just one thing everybody wants
There in the bars
And through the smokescreen of the crowded restaurants
It's love
Yes, all we're looking for is love from someone else


A rush, a glance
A touch, a dance
A look in somebody's eyes
To light up the skies
To open the world and send it reeling
A voice that says, ""I'll be here""
And ""you'll be alright""
I don't care if I know
Just where I will go
'Cause all that I need is this crazy feeling
A rat-tat-tat on my heart
Think I want it to stay

City of stars
Are you shining just for me?
City of stars
You never shined so brightly",2916639
92335,1996091,Love Galore,rb,SZA,2017,3326723,"{""Travis Scott""}","


I need, I need
I need, I need
I need, I need
I need, I need
I need, I need


Love, love, love, love
Long as we got
Love, love, love, oh
Long as we got


Done with these niggas, I don't love these niggas
I dust off these niggas, do it for fun
Don't take it personal
Personally, I'm surprised you called me after the things I said
Skrrt, skrrt on niggas (Yeah), skrrt up on niggas (True)
Skrrt down, you actin' like me (Yeah)
Actin' like we wasn't more than a summer fling
I said farewell, you took it well (True)
Promise I won't cry over spilled milk (Ooh, no, I won't)
Give me a paper towel, gimme another Valium
Give me another hour or two, hour with you
Why you bother me when you know you don't want me? (Yeah)
Why you bother me when you know you got a woman? (Yeah)
Why you hit me when you know you know better? (True)
Know you know better (True)
Know your crew better than you do
Call me, lookin' for ya (Yeah), I be lookin' for ya (Yeah)
Got me lookin' forward to weekends
With you, baby, with you, baby
With you, baby (True), with you
We do whatever we want, go wherever we want
Love however we want, it don't matter (True)
You do whatever I want, get whatever I want
Get whatever I need, it's about

Love, love, love, love
Long as we got
Love, love, love, oh
Long as we got


Should have never gave you my number, I did it with you (Ooh)
Should have never let you hit it, I split it with you
I regret it, you gots a fetish
You gots a problem, now it's a problem, oh, no
Skrrt, skrrt on bitches (Yeah)
I don't know these bitches (Yeah)
Dig dirt on bitches, do it for fun
Don't take it personal, baby
Love on my ladies, luh-love to my ladies, uh (True)
Dated a few (Straight up)


Why you bother me? Why you bother me? Why you bother me? (Why you bother me? Yeah)
Last time I checked, you were the one that left (The one)
Me in a wreck (Yeah), me in a mess (Yeah, yeah)
You all I rep (Yeah), like my side I rep (Yeah)
Yeah, that's that Mo City that side, that you can't come 'round at night, yeah (It's lit)
You like to get me high, you don't want no one beside ya
You like when I make fire, you say, ""La Flame, keep makin' fire"" (Ooh)
Let me cum inside ya, let me plant that seed inside ya (Ooh)
Ass and titties, titties, only thing that stuck with, with me (With me)
Only thing that was real, only thing I could feel, ya feel me? (Yeah, feel me?)
So why you bother me, why you bother me? (With you, baby)
Tryna catch a P.O.V., yeah (With you)

Love, love, love, love
Long as we got
Love, love, love, oh
Long as we got (Love)




I came to your city, lookin' for lovin' and licky
'Cause you promised to put it down
All up in your city, lookin' for you, uh
Searchin' for you like love
Only thing keepin' me from droppin' you right now
Right now (Love)
Only thing keepin' me by your side
Only thing keepin' me by your side now


But see, Solána, if you don't say somethin', speak up for yourself
They think you stupid, you know what I'm sayin'?",2920194
92460,1997940,​iSpy,rap,KYLE,2016,4673510,"{""Lil Yachty""}","
Man, fuck
What's wrong Kyle?
Man, these kids, man, talkin' shit, makin' me feel bad
Man, fuck them kids, bro! Look around, bro, look at life
Man, you're right
Mmm, you see, you see these fine bitches over here?
Yeah, woah...
You see these trees man? You see this water?
I guess it is okay
Come on, man, you got so much more to appreciate, man
Man you know what, y-you're right...
You damn right I'm right, I can't remember a time I was god-damn wrong
Man, thanks, Lil Boat
Hey man, that's what I'm here for


I ain't been gettin' high
Well, maybe a little, baby, I don't wanna lie
I know when you text me, girl, I don't always reply
Well you're not an angel either, you can't even fly (Yeah)
I noticed, you think that you know shit (Why you know?)
All this shade that's comin' at me, I wonder who throws it (Throws it)
They can't see the vision, boy they must be out of focus (Out of focus)
That's a real hot album homie, I wonder who wrote it, oh shit (Woo!)
Otay, pray them niggas go away (Go away)
Always hella clowns around, it look like Cirque Du Soleil (Soleil)
This is not the album either, these are just the throwaways
This shit still so cold when it drop, it's gonna be a mothafuckin' snow day
Ayy, boy is good and he knows it (Yup), he don't say it, he shows it (Yup)
I'm just like DeRozan (Yup), if I shoot it, it goes in
I'm in Cali just coastin' (Yup), get 'em so wet they need coasters (Facts)
I got a selfie with Oprah (Facts), I just ain't never post it
And I'm in my happy place posted
I ain't frowned since '06, I ain't cried since '01
My pad like Six Flags and your house is no fun
You can come back to mine though
Your friend ain't cute, but it's fine though
We gon' end on a high note

I spy with my little eye
A girlie I can get 'cause she don't get too many likes
A curly-headed cutie I can turn into my wife
Wait, that means forever, ever, hold up, never mind
Oh I, I spy with my little eye
A girlie I can get 'cause she don't get too many likes
A curly-headed cutie I can turn into my wife
Wait, that means forever, ever, hold up, never mind


Oh I, I spy with my little eye
I spy, I spy with my little eye
Oh I, I spy with my little eye
I spy, I spy with my little eye
Oh I


She said she 21, I might have to ID that
All my bitches come in pairs like balls in my nutsack
I remember ridin' around the city in a Hatchback
Lookin' for a problem with my young goblins
I'ma send a model home with her neck throbbin'
I done made so much money that it's non-stoppin'
Got my brothers on my back like the last name
I remember tellin' everyone I couldn't be tamed
Woah, six months later, I had snapped and now I'm in the game
Went from fake chains to diamonds in another lane
Went from ""Can you take me here?"" to screenin' out the lane
Went from ""Damn, this nigga lame"" to remember my name
So I remember all the people who ain't fucked with me
They went to college, now all them niggas is history
I upgraded from gold to diamonds in my teeth
Ridin' deep in the van, like we lookin' for a mystery (Raggy?)
So don't fuck with me
No, lately I been livin' like luxury
Boat and Kyle stick together like piano keys
And on my mother's mother
I won't fuck a bitch without a damn rubber

I spy with my little eye
A girlie I can get 'cause she don't get too many likes
A curly-headed cutie I can turn into my wife
Wait, that means forever, ever, hold up, never mind
Oh I, I spy with my little eye
A girlie I can get 'cause she don't get too many likes
A curly-headed cutie I can turn into my wife
Wait, that means forever, ever, hold up, never mind


Oh I, I spy with my little eye
I spy, I spy with my little eye
Oh I, I spy with my little eye
I spy, I spy with my little eye
Oh I",2922155
92511,1998414,False Prophets,rap,J. Cole,2016,1013971,{},"
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this


Yeah, life is a balance
You lose your grip, you can slip into an abyss
No doubt, you see these niggas trippin'
Ego in charge of every move, he's a star
And we can't look away due to the days that he caught our hearts
He's fallin' apart, but we deny it
Justifying that half ass shit he dropped, we always buy it
When he tell us he a genius but it's clearer lately
It's been hard for him to look into the mirror lately
There was a time when this nigga was my hero, maybe
That's the reason why his fall from grace is hard to take
'Cause I believed him when he said his shit was purer and he
The type of nigga swear he real but all around him's fake
The women, the dickriders, you know, the yes men
Nobody with the balls to say somethin' to contest him
So he grows out of control
Into the person that he truly was all along, it's startin' to show
Damn, wonder what happened
Maybe it's my fault for idolizin' niggas
Based off the words they be rappin'
But come to find out, these niggas don't even write they shit
Hear some new style bubblin' up, then they bite this shit
Damn, that's what I get for lyin' to myself
Well, fuck it, what's more important is he's cryin' out for help
While the world's eggin' him on, I'm beggin' him to stop it
Playin' his old shit, knowin' he won't top it
False prophets

Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
False prophets (La-la-la-la-la-la, la-la-la...)
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Yeah, false prophets


I got a homie, he a rapper and he wanna win bad
He want the fame, the acclaim, the respect that's been had
By all the legends, so every time I see him, he stressin'
Talkin' 'bout, niggas don't fuck with him, this shit is depressin'
And I know he so bitter he can't see his own blessings
Goddamn, nigga, you too blind to see you got fans, nigga
And a platform to make a classic rap song
To change a nigga's life, but you too anxious livin' life
Always worried 'bout the critics who ain't ever fuckin' did it
I write what's in my heart, don't give a fuck who fuckin' with it
But in a sense I can relate, the need to be great
Turns into an obsession and keeps a nigga up late
Writin' words, hopin' people observe the dedication
That stirs in you constantly, but intentions get blurred
Do I do it for the love of the music or is there more to me?
Do I want these niggas to worship me?
False prophets

Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this, be like this
False prophets (La-la-la-la-la-la, la-la-la...)
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Yeah, false prophets


These rappers insecure
They talk about being a man so much
I finally understand that they ain't even sure
'Bout who they are and why they do this
Guess I'm included in that category as a nigga who done had the glory
My highest moments come from tellin' all the saddest stories
I've seen in my life, I be fiendin' to write
Songs that raise the hair on my arms
My lowest moments came from tryin' too hard
To impress some niggas that couldn't care if I'm on
Therefore from here on out, my hair grow out
I care nothin' 'bout opinions
I wanna give hope like the fountains you throw pennies in
Hit the store, take your diss, make your wish
This is dedicated to the ones that listen to me on some faithful shit
I'm on some thankful shit
But the real God is in you, not the music you coppin'
I hear my old shit and know I can top it
False prophets

Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this, be like this
False prophets (La-la-la-la-la-la, la-la-la...)
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Be like this, be like this
Somebody shoulda told me it would be like this
Yeah, false prophets",2922649
92569,1999057,Immortal,rap,J. Cole,2016,1222733,{},"
Awwwww...haha


Now I was barely seventeen with a pocket full of hope
Screamin' ""dollar and a dream"" with my closet lookin' broke
And my nigga's lookin' clean, gettin' caught up with that dope
Have you ever served a fiend with a pocket full of soap?
Nigga I can tell you things that you probably shouldn't know
Have you ever heard the screams when the body hit the floor?
Flashbacks to the pain, wakin' up, cold sweats
Six o'clock in the mornin', gotta hit the BowFlex
Get my weight up on the block, keep watch for the cops
God they love to serve a nigga three hots and a cot
Nowadays crime pays like a part time job
And the drought got me prayin' for a Carl Thom vibe
Summer Rain come again
Numb the pain 'cause it's hard for a felon
In my mind I been cryin', know it's wrong but I'm sellin'
Eyes wellin' up with tears
Thinkin' 'bout my niggas dead in the dirt
Immortalized on this shirt

Real niggas don't die
Forward with the plot
One-Seven-Forty-Five
Form at the plot
Real niggas don't die
Form on the block
Real niggas don't lie
Form in the plot
My niggas don't die
Form on the block
Real niggas don't die
Form on the block
Real niggas don't die
Real niggas don't die


Have you ever seen a fiend cook crack on the spoon?
Have you ever seen a nigga that was black on the moon?
Have you ever seen your brother go to prison as you cry?
Have you ever seen a motherfuckin' ribbon in the sky?
Nope, all I see is that C.R.E.A.M nigga, that green
I'm a black king, black jeans on my black queen
And her ass fat, too fat for a flat screen
I'm the type of nigga make the whole fuckin' trap lean
Kingpin nigga, put wings on a crack fiend
If they want a nigga, they gon' have to send a SWAT team
And I'm goin' out like Scarface in his last scene
A legend, what that mean-?

Real niggas don't die
Forward with the plot
One-Seven-Forty-Five
Form at the plot
Real niggas don't die
Form on the block
Hood niggas don't lie
Form in the plot
My niggas don't die
Form on the block
Real niggas don't die
Form on the block
Real niggas don't die
Real niggas don't die


To die a young legend or live a long life unfulfilled
'Cause you wanna change the world, but while alive you never will
'Cause they only feel you after you gone, or I've been told
And now I'm caught between bein' heard and gettin' old
Damn, death creepin' in my thoughts lately
My one wish in this bitch, ""Make it quick if the Lord take me""
I know nobody meant to live forever anyway
And so I hustle like my niggas in Virgini-A
They tellin' niggas, ""sell dope, rap or go to NBA""
In that order, it's that sort of thinkin'
That been keepin' niggas chained at the bottom and hanged
The strangest fruit that you ever seen, ripe with pain, listen...",2923332
92613,1999853,Deja Vu,rap,J. Cole,2016,2347161,{},"
Huh, ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her
Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her
Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her
Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her


Sometimes you worry 'bout the things he can provide for ya
Whenever you around I seem to come alive for ya
I finally recognize the feelings that's inside for ya
Although I know your man and trust me he would die for ya
These quiet thoughts of you been going on for years now
I saw you in the party, soft lips, soft-spoken
I came and talked to you but homie interfered now
He introduced you as his girl and I was heartbroken
Some people talk about that love at first sight shit
To keep it real I don't know whether I believe it's true
But if it is then tell me if I'm wrong or right if
I fell in love with you before I ever even knew
I catch your eye then look away as if it never happened
At times I feel as though I'm caught up in a strange dream
If eyes could talk then mines would tell ya that I'm feeling you
Sometimes I swear your eyes be telling me the same thing

She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dreams (Bigger dream)
She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dream (Bigger dream), hm listen
She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dreams (Bigger dream)
She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dream (Bigger dream), listen


Club jumping, don't stop, off top
But you know we only go 'til 2 o'clock
Put yo motherfuckin' hood up, it's the weekend
Drop that, back that ass up and bitches get to freaking
Last call at the bar, ladies get a drink, nigga get some balls
Ain't no telling you gonna see that bitch tomorrow
Stop holding up the wall waiting for the right song
Better holla 'cause you know they 'bout to cut the lights on


And put my number in it-
I'm staring at you from afar
I'm wondering 'bout you, like where you from and who you are
'Cause you a star, no, not the type that snort the white lines
I mean the type that light the night time, I heard you got a man
But who in their right mind letting you out the house alone?
Tell me is your house a home?
Why you in the club looking like you out to zone?
Now be discreet and pull out your phone and put my number in it
Text a nigga when your man leave you unattended
On a scale from 1 to 10 that girl's a hundred and I want it
No question, I know destiny well
And though I sin the Lord blessing me still
Every saint got a past, every sinner got a future
Every loser gotta win and every winner gotta lose someday
They say it's just a matter of time
And if I had my way then you would be mine, huh

She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dreams (Bigger dream), yeah
She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dream (Bigger dream), hm listen
She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dreams (Bigger dream)
She fuck with small-town niggas, I got bigger dream (Bigger dream)


Club jumping, don't stop, off top
But you know we only go 'til 2 o'clock
Put yo motherfuckin' hood up, it's the weekend
Drop that, back that ass up and bitches get to freaking
Last call at the bar, ladies get a drink, nigga get some balls
Ain't no telling you gonna see that bitch tomorrow
Stop holding up the wall waiting for the right song
Better holla 'cause you know they 'bout to cut the lights on


I know you were made for me but
Darling don't you wait for me 'cause
I can see the promised land but
I can't do no promisin'
I know you were made for me but
Darling don't you wait for me 'cause
I can see the promised land but
I can't do no promisin'

Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her
Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her
Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her
Ayy, put a finger in the sky if you want it, nigga
Ayy, put two fingers in the sky if you want her",2924188
92614,1999854,Neighbors,rap,J. Cole,2016,1561809,{},"
I guess the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope, sellin' dope
Okay, the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope,  sellin' dope
Sellin' dope, sellin' dope, sellin' dope


Yeah, I don't want no picture with the president
I just wanna talk to the man
Speak for the boys in the bando
And my nigga never walkin' again
'pologize if I'm harpin' again
I know these things happen often
But I'm back on the scene
I was lost in a dream
As I write this, the team down in Austin
I been buildin' me a house
Back home in the South, ma
Won't believe what it's costin'
And it's fit for a king, right?
Or a nigga that could sing
And explain all the pain that it cost him
My sixteen should've came with a coffin
Fuck the fame and the fortune
Well, maybe not the fortune
But one thing is for sure though
The fame is exhaustin'
That's why I moved away, I needed privacy
Surrounded by the trees and Ivy League
Students that's recruited highly
Thinkin' ""You do you and I do me""
Crib has got a big 'ol back 'ol yard
My niggas stand outside and pass cigars
Filled with marijuana, laughin' hard
Thankful that they friend's a platinum star
In the driveway there's no rapper cars
Just some shit to get from back and forth
Just some shit to get from back and forth
Welcome to the Sheltuh, this is pure
We'll help you if you've felt too insecure
To be the star you always knew you were
Wait, I think police is at the door

Okay, the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope
Hm, I guess the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope, sellin' dope
The neighbors think I'm-neighbors think I'm-
(Don't follow me, don't follow me...)
I think the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope
(Don't follow me, don't follow me...)
I guess the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope, sellin' dope
Sellin' dope, sellin' dope, sellin' dope
Well, motherfucker, I am


Some things you can't escape:
Death, taxes, and a ra-
-cist society that make
Every nigga feel like a candidate
For a Trayvon kinda fate
Even when your crib sit on a lake
Even when your plaques hang on a wall
Even when the president jam your tape
Took a little break just to annotate
How I feel, damn, it's late
I can't sleep cause I'm paranoid
Black in a white man territory
Cops bust in with the army guns
No evidence of the harm we done
Just a couple neighbors that assume we slang
Only time they see us we be on the news, in chains, damn

Don't follow me
Don't follow me
Don't follow me
Don't follow me


Okay, the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope
Hm, I guess the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope, sellin' dope
The neighbors think I'm...neighbors think I'm-
(Don't follow me, don't follow me...)
I think the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope
(Don't follow me, don't follow me...)
I guess the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope, sellin' dope
Sellin' dope, sellin' dope, sellin' dope
Well motherfucker, I am


I am, I am, I am, I am
Well, motherfucker, I am
I think the neighbors think I'm sellin' dope
I am, I am, I am
Well, motherfucker, I am
So much for integration
Don't know what I was thinkin'
I'm movin' back to south side
So much for integration
Don't know what I was thinkin'
I'm movin' back to south side",2924189
92615,1999855,4 Your Eyez Only,rap,J. Cole,2016,1652397,{},"
Yeah (For your eyes)
For your eyes only (For your eyes)
For your eyes only, for your eyes only
(For your eyes, for your eyes)
For your eyes only


Hey, niggas be dying on the daily
It seems my dreams faded for far too long
The consequences deadly
Can't visualize myself as nothing but a criminal
Control the block, serving up rocks and stay subliminal
'Cause young niggas is hardheaded, they letting off
Full of adrenaline, ignorant to what death can cause
Ain't no coming back, family dressed in black
Plus it's hot now, the cops outside, it's hard to flip a pack
And my daughter gotta eat, her mama be stressing me
Like I ain't the one who put them Jays on her feet
Like I ain't out in the field like that
I might be low for the moment but I will bounce back
Despite the charges, back to the wall, I fight regardless
Screaming, ""Fuck the law,"" my life is lawless
That's what you call it, ain't got to be no psychic
To see this is like the farthest thing from heaven
This is hell and I don't mean that hyperbolic
I try to find employment even if it's wiping toilets
But these felonies be making life the hardest
Resisting the temptation to run up and swipe a wallet
Or run up on your yard, snatch your daughter bike and pawn it
That's why I write this sonnet
If the pressure get too much for me to take and I break
Play this tape for my daughter and let her know my life is on it
(For your eyes) Let her know my life is on it
(For your eyes) For your eyes only

For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes, do you understand me?
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes, do you understand me?
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes, do you understand me?
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes only


You probably grown now so this song'll hit you
If you hearing this, unfortunately means
That I'm no longer with you in the physical
Not even sure if I believe in God but because you still alive
He got me praying that the spiritual is real
So I can be a part of you still, my pops was killed too
So I know how part of you feels
Maybe you hate me, maybe you miss me, maybe you spite me
Life goes in cycles, maybe you'll date a nigga just like me
I hope not, I'm tired of dope spots
And fiends that smoke rocks
I've seen far too many niggas' hopes rot
I'm writing this because me and the devil had a dance
Now I see death around the corner, 'pologizing in advance
Don't know if I ever had a chance
At a glance, I'm a failure
Addicted to pushing paraphernalia
But Daddy had dreams once, my eyes had a gleam once
Innocence disappeared by the age of eight years
My Pops shot up, drug-related, mama addicted
So Granny raised me in projects where thugs was hanging
Blood was staining the concrete
Older niggas I loved talked like they was above
Maintaining a timesheet, that's slow money
Picked up the family business by the age of 13
Six years later was handed sentence
'Round the same time is when you came in this world
Me and your mama thinking:
""What the fuck we naming this girl?""
I told her ""Nina,"" the prettiest name that I could think of
For the prettiest thing my eyes had ever seen, I was 19
Took me two felonies to see the trap
This crooked-ass system set for me
And now I fear it's too late for me to ever be
The one that set examples that was never set for me
I'm living fast, but not fast enough
'Cause karma keeps on catching up to me
And if my past becomes the death of me
I hope you understand

For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes, do you understand me?
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes, do you understand me?
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes, do you understand me?
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes only


It's several ways I could've went out, too many to count
Was it the trigger happy crackers that the badges give clout?
Was it the young niggas, blasting frustrated
'Cause the cash running out?
Niggas don't know how to act in a drought
See, baby girl, I realized
My definition of a real nigga was skewed
My views misshaped by new mixtapes
That confirmed the shit I learned in the streets was true
That real niggas don't speak when they beef with you
They just pull up on your street, let the heat achoo
And if a real nigga hungry, he gon' eat your food
I was a fool, spent all my time ducking school, ducking cops
Ducking rules, hugging blocks that don't love you
I pray you find a nigga with goals and point of views
Much broader than the corner, if not it's gon' corner you
Into a box, where your son don't even know his pops
And the cyclical nature of doing time continues
My worst fear is one day that you come home from school
And see your father face while hearing 'bout tragedy on news
I got the strangest feeling your daddy gonna lose his life soon
And sadly if you're listening now it must mean it's true
But maybe there's a chance that it's not
And this album remains locked
In a hard drive like valuable jewels
And I can teach you this in person
Like I'm teaching you to tie your own shoes
I love you and I hope to God I don't lose you
For your eyes only

For your eyes, for your eyes only
For your eyes, for your eyes only
For your eyes, do you understand?
For your eyes only


One day your daddy called me, told me he had a funny feeling
What he'd been dealing with lately, he wasn't telling
I tried to pick his brains, still he wasn't revealing
But I could feel the sense of panic in his voice
And it was chilling, he said:
""Jermaine, I knew you since we was children
I never asked for nothing, when times was hard
I never had discussions with you, begging you to help me
I dealt with the repercussions of my actions
I know you tried to steer me 'way from that shit
But that shit was in my blood, you know my life
I know your momma, nigga, send my love
In case I never get a chance to speak again
I won't forget the weekends spent sleeping at your crib
That's the way I wished my family lived
But my granny crib was in the 'jects""
I had to interject like:
""Nigga, what you talking 'bout? Fuck is you getting at?""
He said, ""Listen, I got no time to dive into descriptions
But I been having premonitions
Just call it visions from the other side
I got a feeling I won't see tomorrow
Like the time I'm living on is borrowed
With that said, the only thing I'm proud to say, I was a father
Write my story down, and if I pass
Go play it for my daughter when she ready""
And so I'm leaving you this record, for your eyes only
Don't you ever scratch or disrespect it
This perspective is a real one, another lost 'Ville son
I dedicate these words to you and all the other children
Affected by the mass incarceration in this nation
That sent your pops to prison when he needed education
Sometimes I think that segregation would've done us better
Although I know that means that I would never
Be brought into this world 'cause my daddy was so thrilled
When he found him a white girl to take back to Jonesboro
With lil' Zach and Cole World, barely one years old
Now it's 30 years later, making sure this story's told
Girl, your daddy was a real nigga, not 'cause he was cold
Not because he was the first to get some pussy 12 years old
Not because he used to come through in the Caddy on some vogues
Not because he went from bagging up them grams to serving O's
Nah, your daddy was a real nigga, not 'cause he was hard
Not because he lived a life of crime and sat behind some bars
Not because he screamed, ""Fuck the law""
Although that was true
Your daddy was a real nigga 'cause he loved you
For your eyes only",2924190
92701,2000950,Change,rap,J. Cole,2016,1175159,{},"
My intuition is telling me there'll be better days, yeah
My intuition is telling me there'll be better days
I like this tone


Yeah, my intuition is telling me there'll be better days
I sit in silence and find whenever I meditate
My fears alleviate, my tears evaporate
My faith don't deviate, ideas don't have a date
But see I'm growing and getting stronger with every breath
Bringing me closer to Heaven's doors with every step
As we speak I'm at peace, no longer scared to die
Most niggas don't believe in God and so they terrified
It's either that or they be fearing they gon' go to Hell
Asking the Father for forgiveness, got 'em overwhelmed (Please, God, I want to go to Heaven)
As if He's spiteful like them white folks that control the jail
See I believe if God is real, He'd never judge a man
Because He knows us all and therefore He would understand
The ignorance that make a nigga take his brother life
The bitterness and pain that got him beating on his wife

I know you desperate for a change let the pen glide
But the only real change come from inside (Come from inside)
But the only real change come from inside (Come from inside)
But the only real change come from-
In cemeteries or in chains I see men cry
But the only real change come from inside (Come from inside)
But the only real change come from inside (Come from inside)
But the only real change come from-


Yeah, my chosen religion
Jesus piece frozen from sinnin'
Doin' dirt, hoping to God, He know my intentions
To see a million 'fore I see a casket
I got a baby on the way, know he gon' be a bastard
I'm living fast like I'm in a drag race, how that cash taste
When I was a senior, I was ballin' on my classmates
Niggas put three bullets in my car, one hit the gas tank
Know I got a angel cause I'm supposed to have a halo
Right now, my lifestyle destined for a federal facility
For my ability to make them birds fly
Fiends wanna get higher than a bird's eye view
And who am I to tell a nigga what to do?
I just supply, it's economics
My business ain't got the suit and tie
Keep a pistol at all times, niggas want what's mine
I can't oblige, dog, I work too hard
So reach for it, get referred to God, I'm going hard, nigga

I know you desperate for a change let the pen glide
But the only real change come from inside
But the only real change come from inside
But the only real change come from-
In cemeteries or in chains I see men cry
But the only real change come from inside
But the only real change come from inside
But the only real change come from-


Yeah, prodigal son, got a new gun
This one don't run out of ammo
Lately been working on my handles
Can I ball, become a star and remain my self?
If I fall, dust it off and regain my self
Fuck 'em all, they don't know all the pain I felt
I'm in awe, after all the fame I felt, I evolved
I no longer bury demons, I be a vessel for the truth until I'm barely breathing, I'm singing


Life is all about the evolution
I give up, I give in, I move back a little
I live up, I look up, now I'm back for more
You can dream but don't neglect the execution
I give up, I give in, I move back a little
I live up, I look up, now I'm back for more
Time is short that's what somebody told me
I give up, I give in, I move back a little
I live up, I look up, now I'm back for more
Too short to keep following your homies
I give up, I give in, I move back a little
I live up, I look up, now I'm back for more

I reminisce back to a time where niggas threw they hands
All of a sudden niggas pop a trunk and then we scram
Finger on trigger make a little nigga understand
What it's like to finally be the motherfuckin' man
Eyes wide that's from the power that the coward feels
Niggas die over bitches, disrespect, and dollar bills
Bloodshed that turned the city to a battlefield
I call it poison, you call it real (pop, pop, pop, pop)
That's how you feel?


Pistols be poppin' and niggas drop in a heartbeat
Scattered like roaches, a body laid on the concrete
A body laid on the concrete
Look, somebody laid on the concrete
No time for that, ain't no lookin' back, cause I'm running too
I made it home, I woke up and turned on the morning news
Overcame with a feeling I can't explain
Cause that was my nigga James that was slain, he was 22
(Last night at around...) He was 22
(22 year old black male, suspect, reporting live...)


(I swear to God, bruh)
We're gathered here today...
(I swear to God)
To mourn the life of James McMillan Jr
(I swear to God-nigga, I'ma kill them niggas, man)
A tragedy, another tragedy in the black community
(I promise you, bro...)
We got to do better, people
22 years old, this boy was too young
(I promise you, bro, I'ma kill them niggas, yo...)
Our condolences go to his family, our prayers
(I'ma kill them niggas myself...)
We know he's in a better place
We know he's in a better place
But this has got to end, ladies and gentleman
We've got to come together, this is-this is beyond words
Now I'd like to open this ceremony with a verse from-",2925371
93257,2008004,Both,rap,Gucci Mane,2016,1117140,{Drake},"
Southside
If Young Metro don't trust you, I'm gon' shoot you


I got so many felonies, I might can't never go to Canada
But Drake said he gon' pull some strings, so let me check my calendar
I just popped me one of them one what-you-call-its and it boosted my stamina
Now I'm fucking her on the banister, guess I just East Atlanta'd her
I'm in an all-red drop tarantula, fuck a Challenger
Damn these hoes ain't got no manners, bruh, where's the manager?
I keep throwing rubber bandies up, ho, pull your panties up
'Cause you fuck like a granny fuck, you're just an amateur
This Patek Philippe gon' make this crooked judge try throw the book at me
I look like half a million worth of heroin when she look at me
But you ain't gotta fuck with me, my nig, but you're stuck with me
But how you called the cops on me, my nig? You grew up with me


I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now, got me talking about my life
I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now
I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now and I need ya in my life
I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now

Yeah, I'm both
Yeah, I had a drink, yeah, I smoked
Yeah, you think I need you but I don't
Just left out Dubai with all my folk
Open water, my location is remote
Shout-out Yachty but this ain't a lil' boat
This some shit I wrote about when I was broke
See, the power of the mind is not a joke
Man, I said that I would do it and I did
Used to get left-overs out the fridge
Nobody was famous where I lived
'Til I got it jumping at the crib
Took a lot to be able to give, I mean


I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now, got me talking about my life
I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now
I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now and I need ya in my life
I don't usually do this 'less I'm drunk or I'm high
But I'm both right now


Southside",2933001
93645,2014671,Tunnel Vision,rap,Kodak Black,2017,2435021,{},"
Glee
(Southside)
Ayy, lil' Metro on that beat


Lil' Kodak, they don't like to see you winnin'
They wanna see you in the penitentiary
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
My mama told me, ""Boy, make good decisions""
Right now I gotta keep a tunnel vision
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
Lil' Kodak, they don't like to see you winnin'
They wanna see you in the penitentiary
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
My mama told me, ""Boy, make good decisions""
Right now I gotta keep a tunnel vision
They sendin' all my homies on a mission
And I ain't tryna miss out on these millions

I jumped up out the Wraith, Kodak bought a Wraith
I get any girl I want, any girl I want
She want me to save the day, but I ain't got a cape
She wanna see me every day, she wanna be my bae
That money make me cum, it make me fornicate, uh
I'm the shit, I need some toilet paper
Follow my player rules, then we gon' be okay
On the real, I need a bih' who gon' cooperate


Lil' Kodak, they don't like to see you winnin'
They wanna see you in the penitentiary
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
My mama told me, ""Boy, make good decisions""
Right now I gotta keep a tunnel vision
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
Lil' Kodak, they don't like to see you winnin'
They wanna see you in the penitentiary
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
My mama told me, ""Boy, make good decisions""
Right now I gotta keep a tunnel vision
They sendin' all my homies on a mission
And I ain't tryna miss out on these millions

I told you niggas I'm gon' be that fuckin' nigga
Everything be good 'til you doin' better than 'em
They wanna see a nigga shot or see me in the system
All you niggas out here poison like snake venom
Codeine in my liver, rockin' Balenciaga denim
I'm booted even when I'm sober, I don't need a jigga
They sendin' all my niggas on a fuckin' journey
I told that baby to come over 'cause I'm fuckin' horny
My mama told me, ""Kill these niggas, son, keep it goin'!""
I'm thug to the bone, but I'm still her baby boy
Lil' Kodak, boy, they hate to see you in a foreign
They miss when you was in that 'Yota kickin' doors


Lil' Kodak, they don't like to see you winnin'
They wanna see you in the penitentiary
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
My mama told me, ""Boy, make good decisions""
Right now I gotta keep a tunnel vision
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
Lil' Kodak, they don't like to see you winnin'
They wanna see you in the penitentiary
I need me a lil' baby who gon' listen
Girl, I don't wanna be the one you iggin'
My mama told me, ""Boy, make good decisions""
Right now I gotta keep a tunnel vision
They sendin' all my homies on a mission
And I ain't tryna miss out on these millions",2939983
93753,2016661,​​rockstar,rap,Post Malone,2017,7008803,"{""21 Savage""}","
Hahahahaha
Tank God
Ayy, ayy


I've been fuckin' hoes and poppin' pillies
Man, I feel just like a rockstar (Star, ayy, ayy)
All my brothers got that gas
And they always be smokin' like a Rasta ('Sta)
Fuckin' with me, call up on a Uzi
And show up, man, them the shottas ('Tas)
When my homies pull up on your block
They make that thing go grrra-ta-ta-ta (Ta, pow, pow, pow, ayy, ayy)


Switch my whip, came back in black
I'm startin' sayin', ""Rest in peace to Bon Scott"" (Scott, ayy)
Close that door, we blowin' smoke
She ask me light a fire like I'm Morrison ('Son, ayy)
Act a fool on stage
Prolly leave my fuckin' show in a cop car (Car, ayy)
Shit was legendary
Threw a TV out the window of the Montage
Cocaine on the table, liquor pourin', don't give a damn
Dude, your girlfriend is a groupie, she just tryna get in
Sayin', ""I'm with the band"" (Ayy, ayy)
Now she actin' outta pocket, tryna grab up on my pants
Hundred bitches in my trailer say they ain't got a man
And they all brought a friend (Yeah, ayy, ayy, ayy)

I've been fuckin' hoes and poppin' pillies
Man, I feel just like a rockstar (Star, ayy, ayy)
All my brothers got that gas
And they always be smokin' like a Rasta ('Sta)
Fuckin' with me, call up on a Uzi
And show up, man, them the shottas ('Tas)
When my homies pull up on your block
They make that thing go grrra-ta-ta-ta (Ta, pow, pow, pow)


I've been in the Hills fuckin' superstars
Feelin' like a popstar (21, 21, 21)
Drankin' Henny, bad bitches jumpin' in the pool
And they ain't got on no bra (Bra)
Hit her from the back, pullin' on her tracks
And now she screamin' out, ""¡No más!"" (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
They like, ""Savage, why you got a 12 car garage
And you only got six cars?"" (21)
I ain't with the cakin', how you kiss that? (Kiss that?)
Your wifey say I'm lookin' like a whole snack (Big snack)
Green hundreds in my safe, I got old racks (Old racks)
L.A. bitches always askin', ""Where the coke at?"" (21, 21)
Livin' like a rockstar, smash out on a cop car
Sweeter than a Pop-Tart, you know you are not hard
I done made the hot chart, 'member I used to trap hard
Livin' like a rockstar, I'm livin' like a rockstar (Ayy)

I've been fuckin' hoes and poppin' pillies
Man, I feel just like a rockstar (Star, ayy, ayy)
All my brothers got that gas
And they always be smokin' like a Rasta ('Sta, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Fuckin' with me, call up on a Uzi
And show up, man, them the shottas ('Tas)
When my homies pull up on your block
They make that thing go grrra-ta-ta-ta (Ta, grrra-ta-ta-ta-ta)


Star, star, rockstar, rockstar, star
Rockstar
Rockstar, feel just like a-
Rockstar
Rockstar
Rockstar
Feel just like a...",2942139
93782,2017152,Issues,pop,Julia Michaels,2017,3308226,{},"
I'm jealous, I'm overzealous
When I'm down, I get real down
When I'm high, I don't come down
I get angry, baby, believe me
I could love you just like that
And I could leave you just as fast


But you don't judge me
'Cause if you did, baby, I would judge you too
No, you don't judge me
'Cause if you did, baby, I would judge you too


'Cause I got issues, but you got 'em too
So give 'em all to me and I'll give mine to you
Bask in the glory of all our problems
'Cause we got the kind of love it takes to solve 'em
Yeah, I got issues
And one of them is how bad I need ya

You do shit on purpose
You get mad and you break things
Feel bad, try to fix things
But you're perfect, poorly wired circuit
And got hands like an ocean
Push you out, pull you back in


'Cause you don't judge me
'Cause if you did, baby, I would judge you too
No, you don't judge me
'Cause you see it from the same point of view


'Cause I got issues, but you got 'em too
So give 'em all to me and I'll give mine to you
Bask in the glory of all our problems
'Cause we got the kind of love it takes to solve 'em
Yeah, I got issues
And one of them is how bad I need ya


I got issues, you got 'em too
And one of them is how bad I need you
I got issues, you got 'em too

'Cause I got issues, but you got 'em too (I got)
So give 'em all to me and I'll give mine to you (You got 'em too)
Bask in the glory of all our problems (I got issues)
'Cause we got the kind of love it takes to solve 'em (You got 'em too)
Yeah, I got issues (I got)
And one of them is how bad I need ya (You got 'em too)
Yeah, I got issues (I got issues)
And one of them is how bad I need ya (You got 'em too)
Yeah, I got issues (I got)
And one of them is how bad I need ya",2942605
93877,2019107,Paris,pop,The Chainsmokers,2017,1183476,{},"
We were staying in Paris
To get away from your parents
And I thought, ""Wow
If I could take this in a shot right now
I don't think that we could work this out""
Out on the terrace
I don't know if it's fair but I thought ""How could I let you fall by yourself
While I'm wasted with someone else?""


If we go down then we go down together
They'll say you could do anything
They'll say that I was clever
If we go down then we go down together
We'll get away with everything
Let's show them we are better


Let's show them we are better
Let's show them we are better

We were staying in Paris
To get away from your parents
You look so proud
Standing there with a frown and a cigarette
Posting pictures of yourself on the Internet
Out on the terrace
We breathe in the air of this small town on our own, cuttin' class for the thrill of it
Getting drunk on the past, we were livin' in


If we go down then we go down together
They'll say you could do anything
They'll say that I was clever
If we go down then we go down together
We'll get away with everything
Let's show them we are better


Let's show them we are
Show them we are
Let's show them we are
Show them we are
Let's show them we are better
We were staying in Paris
Let's show them we are better
Let's show them we are
Show them we are
Let's show them we are
Show them we are
Let's show them we are better

If we go down then we go down together
They'll say you could do anything
They'll say that I was clever
If we go down then we go down together
We'll get away with everything
Let's show them we are better


We were staying in Paris (If we go down)
We were staying in Paris (If we go down)
We were staying in Paris (If we go down)
We were staying in Paris (If we go down)
Let's show them we are better
We were staying in Paris


Let's show them we are better
Let's show them we are better
If we go down
Let's show them we are better
If we go down
Let's show them we are better
If we go down
Let's show them we are better
Let's show them we are better",2944779
93895,2019558,Swalla,pop,Jason Derulo,2017,1683293,"{""Nicki Minaj"",""Ty Dolla \\$ign""}","
Drank
Young Money


Love in a thousand different flavors
I wish that I could taste them all tonight
No, I ain't got no dinner plans
So you should bring all your friends
I swear that a-all y'all my type


All you girls in here, if you're feeling thirsty
Come on take a sip 'cause you know what I'm servin', ooh


Shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yay, shimmy ya (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Swalla-la-la)
Swalla-la-la
Shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yay, shimmy ya (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Swalla-la-la)
Swalla-la-la
Freaky, freaky gyal
My freaky, freaky gyal

Shimmy shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yah
Bad girls gon' swalla-la-la
Bust down on my wrist in this bitch
My pinky-ring bigger than his
Met her out in Beverly Hills, ayy
Dolla got too many girls, ayy
Met her out in Beverly Hills
All she wear is red bottom heels
When she back it up, put it on the Snap
When she droppin' low, put it on the Gram
DJ poppin', she gon' swallow that
Champagne poppin', she gon' swallow that


All you girls in here, if you're feeling thirsty
Come on take a sip 'cause you know what I'm servin', ooh


Shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yay, shimmy ya (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Swalla-la-la)
Swalla-la-la
Shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yay, shimmy ya (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Swalla-la-la)
Swalla-la-la
Freaky, freaky gyal
My freaky, freaky gyal

Bad gyal no swalla nuttin, word to the Dalai Lama
He know I'm a fashion killa, word to John Galliano
He copping that Valentino, ain't no telling me ""no""
I'm that bitch, and he know, he know
How y'all wifing these thots? You don't get wins for that
I'm having another good year, we don't get blimps for that
Pussy game still cold, we don't get minks for that
When I'm poppin' them bananas, we don't link chimps for that
I gave these bitches two years, now your time's up
Bless her heart, she throwing shots but every line sucks
I'm in that cherry red foreign with the brown guts
My shit slappin' like dude did LeBron's nuts


All you girls in here, if you're feeling thirsty
Come on take a sip 'cause you know what I'm servin'


Shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yay, shimmy ya (My love) (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (My love) (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Swalla-la-la)
Swalla-la-la
Shimmy shimmy yay, shimmy yay, shimmy ya (Kyuh!) (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Drank)
Swalla-la-la (Swalla-la-la)
Swalla-la-la

Young Money
Swalla-la-la
J.D
Freaky, freaky gyal
Swalla-la-la
My freaky, freaky gyal
Swalla-la-la
My freaky, freaky gyal
Swalla-la-la
My freaky, freaky gyal
Derulo",2945277
93948,2020041,Scared to Be Lonely,pop,Martin Garrix & Dua Lipa,2017,1750679,{},"
It was great at the very start
Hands on each other
Couldn't stand to be far apart
Closer the better


Now we're picking fights and slamming doors
Magnifying all our flaws
And I wonder why, wonder what for
Why we keep coming back for more


Is it just our bodies? Are we both losing our minds?
Is the only reason you're holding me tonight
'Cause we're scared to be lonely?
Do we need somebody just to feel like we're alright?
Is the only reason you're holding me tonight
'Cause we're scared to be lonely?



Too much time, losing track of us
Where was the real?
Undefined, spiraling out of touch
Forgot how it feels


All the messed up fights and slamming doors
Magnifying all our flaws
And I wonder why, wonder what for
It's like we keep coming back for more


Is it just our bodies? Are we both losing our minds?
Is the only reason you're holding me tonight
'Cause we're scared to be lonely?
Do we need somebody just to feel like we're alright?
Is the only reason you're holding me tonight
'Cause we're scared to be lonely?


Scared to be lonely, ooh, ooh, ooh


Even when we know it's wrong
And somebody better for us all along
Tell me, how can we keep holding on?
Holding on tonight 'cause we're scared to be lonely
Even when we know it's wrong
And somebody better for us all along
Tell me, how can we keep holding on?
Holding on tonight 'cause we're scared to be lonely

Is it just our bodies? Are we both losing our minds?
Is the only reason you're holding me tonight
'Cause we're scared to be lonely?




Scared to be lonely
Scared to be lonely, ooh, ooh
Eh, eh, scared to be lonely",2945792
94099,2022201,T-Shirt,rap,Migos,2017,2728232,{},"
Nard & B
TrenchWerk


(Ayy)
Mama told me (Ayy)
Not to sell work (Mama)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (White)
Mama told me (Ayy)
Not to sell work (Mama)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (Yeah)


Young nigga poppin' with a pocket full of cottage (Ayy)
Woah, kemosabe, chopper aimin' at your noggin (Ayy)
Had to cop the Audi, then the top, I had to chop it (Skrrt, skrrt)
Niggas pocket watchin', so I gotta keep the rocket (Grrah)


Neck water faucet (Water)
Mockingbirds mocking (Woo)
Act' pint stocking (Act')
Nats keep thottin' (Nat)
Wrist on hockey (Hockey)
Wrist on rocky (Rocky)
Lot of niggas copy, huh
Name someone can stop me (No one)
Bitches call me Papi (Bitch)
'Sace, that's my hobby ('Sace)
Scotty on the molly, pocket rocket from O'Reilly (Grrah)
One off in the chamber, ain't no need for me to cock it (Uh-uh)
Niggas get to droppin' when that Draco get to poppin' (Frr)
All I want is cottage, roll a cigar full of broccoli (Cookie)
No check, want all cash, nigga, I don't do deposits (Uh-uh)
Bitches cross the border, nigga, bitches from the tropics (Whew)
I'ma get that bag, nigga, ain't no doubt about it (Yup)
I'ma feed my family, nigga, ain't no way around it (Family)
Ain't gon' never let up, nigga, God said show my talent (Show it)
Young nigga with the Anna, walkin' with the hammer (Grrah)
Talkin' country grammar, nigga, straight out Nawf Atlanta (Nawfside)

Young nigga poppin' with a pocket full of cottage (Ayy)
Woah, kemosabe, chopper aimin' at your noggin (Ayy)
Had to cop the Audi, then the top, I had to chop it (Skrrt, skrrt)
Niggas pocket watchin', so I gotta keep the rocket (Ayy)


(Ayy)
Mama told me (Ayy)
Not to sell work (Mama)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (White)
Mama told me (Ayy)
Not to sell work (Mama)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (Yeah)


Mama told you
Mama told me (Mama)
Not to sell work
Mama told you (Uh)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (White)


1995 (90s)
2005 (2000s)
Seen it with my eyes (Seen it)
Dope still alive (Dope)
Real mob ties (Mob)
Real frog eyes (Frog)
Real whole pies (Woah)
All-time high (High)
Do it for the culture (Culture)
They gon' bite like vultures (Vultures)
Way back when I was trappin' out Toyotas (Woo, skrrt, skrrt)
I'ma hit the gas (Gas)
12 can't pull me over (12)
Space coupe, Quavo Yoda, pourin' drank in sodas

I get high on my own, sir
Heard you gon' clone, sir
Stop all that flexin', young nigga don't wanna go there
Never been a gopher but I always been a soldier (No)
Young niggas in the cut, posted like a vulture (Woo, bah)
Divin' off the stage in the crowd, it's a moshpit (Dive)
Yeah, shawty bad, but she broke 'cause she don't own shit
Mama asked me, ""Son, when the trappin' gon' quit?"" (Mama, Mama)
I been ridin' 'round through the city in my new bitch (Woo, skrrt)


Young nigga poppin' with a pocket full of cottage (Ayy)
Woah, kemosabe, chopper aimin' at your noggin (Ayy)
Had to cop the Audi, then the top, I had to chop it (Skrrt, skrrt)
Niggas pocket watchin', so I gotta keep the rocket (Ayy)


(Ayy)
Mama told me (Ayy)
Not to sell work (Mama)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (White)
Mama told me (Ayy)
Not to sell work (Mama)
Seventeen five, same color T-shirt (Yeah)

Mama told you
Mama told you",2948140
94115,2022555,Privacy,rb,Chris Brown,2017,1399839,{},"
I need your body in ways
That you don't understand, but I'm losing my patience
'Cause we've been going over and over again
Girl, I just wanna take you home and get right to it
Know I gotta kiss it, baby
Give it to me, lick it lick it inside and out
You know that I just wanna make love
Want you to scream and shout
And baby, when I'm deep in it now
I'ma slow it down, 'cause ain't no speed limit
When we're moving at the speed of sound
We gon' turn all the way up when the lights down
Why your pussy so damn good, miss lady?
Go and put that booty up, baby, one on one
You know I'ma go crazy when your legs in the air
You know your panties never getting in the way
You know I kinda like it, when you make me work for it


Ayy you, gal, inna di tight up skirt
Get that ass in the bed, I'ma lock the door
Shake that ass like boom shakalacka, boom shakalacka (boom, boom)
We don't need nobody watching us (yikes!)
No eyes but your eyes
Ain't nobody here but you and me
Licking your private parts (Boom shakalacka, hahaha)
And I know you love your privacy

You don't need a shower, you already wet
Know that pussy power, telling me, I ain't ready yet
I say, ""Fuck it,"" face my fears, baby
When I lick it, I put tears in it
Put my face in it, eat it like a dinner date
You know I love foreplay, 12 play, everything
Know my lovin' don't change
I don't really give a fuck what a hater say
'Cause you fine, baby
And it's alright 'cause you're all mine, baby, ooh, hoo
Girl, I'ma let you get crazy


Ayy you, gal, inna di tight up skirt
Get that ass in the bed, I'ma lock the door
Shake that ass like boom shakalacka, boom shakalacka (boom, boom)
We don't need nobody watching us (yikes!)
No eyes but your eyes
Ain't nobody here but you and me
Licking your private parts (Boom shakalacka, hahaha)
And I know you love your privacy


Baby, I promise I won't tell nobody
Just long as you let me hit it like every night
I could give a fuck 'bout the club, 'cause that pussy tight
Do a split on it, drop it, baby, show you right
I'ma split your weave and you askin' me to stay the night
Whipped cream on your titties, then you suckin' on my dick with ice
Oh my God, oh my God, my bitch get me right
Ain't gotta pay for that pussy, my dick can change your life
I'm tired of missionary, wanna see you on your face
Put that ass up in the air, I'm lovin' how that pussy taste
Damn, on your side, on your side
Stop runnin' from this dick, I ain't 'bout to let you slide this time

Ayy you, gal, inna di tight up skirt
Get that ass in the bed, I'ma lock the door
Shake that ass like boom shakalacka, boom shakalacka (boom, boom)
We don't need nobody watching us (yikes!)
No eyes but your eyes
Ain't nobody here but you and me
Licking your private parts (Boom shakalacka, hahaha)
And I know you love your privacy


Privacy
Boom shakalacka
Hahaha",2948513
94160,2023153,Shape of You,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,14569727,{},"
The club isn't the best place to find a lover
So the bar is where I go
Me and my friends at the table doing shots
Drinking fast and then we talk slow
And you come over and start up a conversation with just me
And trust me I'll give it a chance now
Take my hand, stop, put Van the Man on the jukebox
And then we start to dance, and now I'm singing like


Girl, you know I want your love
Your love was handmade for somebody like me
Come on now, follow my lead
I may be crazy, don't mind me
Say, boy, let's not talk too much
Grab on my waist and put that body on me
Come on now, follow my lead
Come, come on now, follow my lead


I'm in love with the shape of you
We push and pull like a magnet do
Although my heart is falling too
I'm in love with your body
And last night you were in my room
And now my bed sheets smell like you
Every day discovering something brand new
I'm in love with your body

Oh, I, oh, I, oh, I, oh, I
I'm in love with your body
Oh, I, oh, I, oh, I, oh, I
I'm in love with your body
Oh, I, oh, I, oh, I, oh, I
I'm in love with your body
Every day discovering something brand new
I'm in love with the shape of you


One week in we let the story begin
We're going out on our first date
You and me are thrifty, so go all you can eat
Fill up your bag and I fill up a plate
We talk for hours and hours about the sweet and the sour
And how your family is doing okay
Leave and get in a taxi, then kiss in the backseat
Tell the driver make the radio play, and I'm singing like


Girl, you know I want your love
Your love was handmade for somebody like me
Come on now, follow my lead
I may be crazy, don't mind me
Say, boy, let's not talk too much
Grab on my waist and put that body on me
Come on now, follow my lead
Come, come on now, follow my lead

I'm in love with the shape of you
We push and pull like a magnet do
Although my heart is falling too
I'm in love with your body
And last night you were in my room
And now my bed sheets smell like you
Every day discovering something brand new
I'm in love with your body


Oh, I, oh, I, oh, I, oh, I
I'm in love with your body
Oh, I, oh, I, oh, I, oh, I
I'm in love with your body
Oh, I, oh, I, oh, I, oh, I
I'm in love with your body
Every day discovering something brand new
I'm in love with the shape of you


Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on

I'm in love with the shape of you
We push and pull like a magnet do
Although my heart is falling too
I'm in love with your body
Last night you were in my room
And now my bed sheets smell like you
Every day discovering something brand new
I'm in love with your body


Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
I'm in love with your body
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
I'm in love with your body
Come on, be my baby, come on
Come on, be my baby, come on
I'm in love with your body
Every day discovering something brand new
I'm in love with the shape of you",2949128
94173,2023362,Castle on the Hill,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,2040654,{},"
When I was six years old I broke my leg
I was running from my brother and his friends
And tasted the sweet perfume of the mountain grass I rolled down
I was younger then, take me back to when I


Found my heart and broke it here
Made friends and lost them through the years
And I've not seen the roaring fields in so long, I know I've grown
But I can't wait to go home


I'm on my way
Driving at 90 down those country lanes
Singing to ""Tiny Dancer""
And I miss the way you make me feel, and it's real
We watched the sunset over the castle on the hill


Fifteen years old and smoking hand-rolled cigarettes
Running from the law through the backfields and getting drunk with my friends
Had my first kiss on a Friday night, I don't reckon that I did it right
But I was younger then, take me back to when

We found weekend jobs, when we got paid
We'd buy cheap spirits and drink them straight
Me and my friends have not thrown up in so long, oh how we've grown
But I can't wait to go home


I'm on my way
Driving at 90 down those country lanes
Singing to ""Tiny Dancer""
And I miss the way you make me feel, and it's real
We watched the sunset over the castle on the hill
Over the castle on the hill
Over the castle on the hill


One friend left to sell clothes
One works down by the coast
One had two kids but lives alone
One's brother overdosed
One's already on his second wife
One's just barely getting by
But these people raised me
And I can't wait to go home


And I'm on my way, I still remember
These old country lanes
When we did not know the answers
And I miss the way you make me feel, it's real
We watched the sunset over the castle on the hill
Over the castle on the hill
Over the castle on the hill",2949338
94362,2027437,Galway Girl,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,1671963,{},"
She played the fiddle in an Irish band
But she fell in love with an English man
Kissed her on the neck and then I took her by the hand
Said, ""Baby, I just want to dance""


I met her on Grafton street right outside of the bar
She shared a cigarette with me while her brother played the guitar
She asked me what does it mean, the Gaelic ink on your arm?
Said it was one of my friend's songs, do you want to drink on?
She took Jamie as a chaser, Jack for the fun
She got Arthur on the table with Johnny riding a shotgun
Chatted some more, one more drink at the bar
Then put Van on the jukebox, got up to dance


You know, she played the fiddle in an Irish band
But she fell in love with an English man
Kissed her on the neck and then I took her by the hand
Said, ""Baby, I just want to dance""
With my pretty little Galway Girl
You're my pretty little Galway Girl

You know she beat me at darts and then she beat me at pool
And then she kissed me like there was nobody else in the room
As last orders were called was when she stood on the stool
After dancing the céili singing to trad tunes
I never heard Carrickfergus ever sung so sweet
A cappella in the bar using her feet for a beat
Oh, I could have that voice playing on repeat for a week
And in this packed out room swear she was singing to me


You know, she played the fiddle in an Irish band
But she fell in love with an English man
Kissed her on the neck and then I took her by the hand
Said, ""Baby, I just want to dance""
My pretty little Galway Girl
My, my, my, my, my, my, my Galway Girl
My, my, my, my, my, my, my Galway Girl
My, my, my, my, my, my, my Galway Girl


And now we've outstayed our welcome and it's closing time
I was holding her hand, her hand was holding mine
Our coats both smell of smoke, whisky and wine
As we fill up our lungs with the cold air of the night
I walked her home then she took me inside
To finish some Doritos and another bottle of wine
I swear I'm gonna put you in a song that I write
About a Galway Girl and a perfect night

She played the fiddle in an Irish band
But she fell in love with an English man
Kissed her on the neck and then I took her by the hand
Said, ""Baby, I just want to dance""
My pretty little Galway Girl
My, my, my, my, my, my, my Galway Girl
My, my, my, my, my, my, my Galway Girl
My, my, my, my, my, my, my Galway Girl",2953763
94364,2027439,Dive,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,1457888,{},"
Oh, maybe I came on too strong
Maybe I waited too long
Maybe I played my cards wrong
Oh, just a little bit wrong
Baby I apologize for it


I could fall, or I could fly
Here in your aeroplane
And I could live, I could die
Hanging on the words you say
And I've been known to give my all
And jumping in harder than
Ten thousand rocks on the lake


So don't call me baby
Unless you mean it
And don't tell me you need me
If you don't believe it
So let me know the truth
Before I dive right into you

You're a mystery
I've travelled the world
And there's no other girl like you
No one, what's your history? (What's your history?)
Do you have a tendency to lead some people on?
'Cause I heard you do, mmm


I could fall, or I could fly
Here in your aeroplane
And I could live, I could die
Hanging on the words you say
And I've been known to give my all
And lie awake, every day
Don't know how much I can take


So don't call me baby
Unless you mean it
Don't tell me you need me
If you don't believe it
So let me know the truth
Before I dive right into you



I could fall, or I could fly
Here in your aeroplane
And I could live, I could die
Hanging on the words you say
And I've been known to give my all
Sitting back, looking at
Every mess that I made


So don't call me baby
Unless you mean it
Don't tell me you need me
If you don't believe it
Let me know the truth
Before I dive right into you
Before I dive right into you
Before I dive right into you",2953760
94365,2027440,Perfect,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,6201020,{},"
I found a love for me
Oh, darling, just dive right in and follow my lead
Well, I found a girl, beautiful and sweet
Oh, I never knew you were the someone waiting for me


'Cause we were just kids when we fell in love
Not knowing what it was
I will not give you up this time
But darling, just kiss me slow, your heart is all I own
And in your eyes, you're holding mine


Baby, I'm dancing in the dark with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass, listening to our favourite song
When you said you looked a mess, I whispered underneath my breath
But you heard it, darling, you look perfect tonight


Well I found a woman, stronger than anyone I know
She shares my dreams, I hope that someday I'll share her home
I found a love, to carry more than just my secrets
To carry love, to carry children of our own

We are still kids, but we're so in love
Fighting against all odds
I know we'll be alright this time
Darling, just hold my hand
Be my girl, I'll be your man
I see my future in your eyes


Baby, I'm dancing in the dark, with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass, listening to our favourite song
When I saw you in that dress, looking so beautiful
I don't deserve this, darling, you look perfect tonight




Baby, I'm dancing in the dark, with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass, listening to our favourite song
I have faith in what I see
Now I know I have met an angel in person
And she looks perfect


I don't deserve this
You look perfect tonight",2953761
94367,2027443,Happier,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,1971704,{},"
Walking down 29th and park
I saw you in another's arm
Only a month we've been apart
You look happier
Saw you walk inside a bar
He said something to make you laugh
I saw that both your smiles were twice as wide as ours
Yeah, you look happier, you do


Ain't nobody hurt you like I hurt you
But ain't nobody love you like I do
Promise that I will not take it personal, baby
If you're moving on with someone new


'Cause baby you look happier, you do
My friends told me one day I'll feel it too
And until then I'll smile to hide the truth
But I know I was happier with you

Sat in the corner of the room
Everything's reminding me of you
Nursing an empty bottle and telling myself
You're happier, aren't you?


Oh, ain't nobody hurt you like I hurt you
But ain't nobody need you like I do
I know that there's others that deserve you
But my darling, I am still in love with you


But I guess you look happier, you do
My friends told me one day I'll feel it too
I could try to smile to hide the truth
But I know I was happier with you


'Cause baby you look happier, you do
I knew one day you'd fall for someone new
But if he breaks your heart like lovers do
Just know that I'll be waiting here for you",2953764
94369,2027446,Supermarket Flowers,pop,Ed Sheeran,2017,1898133,{},"
I took the supermarket flowers from the windowsill
I threw the day old tea from the cup
Packed up the photo album Matthew had made
Memories of a life that's been loved
Took the get well soon cards and stuffed animals
Poured the old ginger beer down the sink
Dad always told me, ""Don't you cry when you're down""
But mum, there's a tear every time that I blink


Oh, I'm in pieces, it's tearing me up, but I know
A heart that's broke is a heart that's been loved


So I'll sing Hallelujah
You were an angel in the shape of my mum
When I fell down you'd be there holding me up
Spread your wings as you go
When God takes you back
He'll say, ""Hallelujah, you're home""

I fluffed the pillows, made the beds, stacked the chairs up
Folded your nightgowns neatly in a case
John says he'd drive then put his hand on my cheek
And wiped a tear from the side of my face


I hope that I see the world as you did 'cause I know
A life with love is a life that's been lived


So I'll sing Hallelujah
You were an angel in the shape of my mum
When I fell down you'd be there holding me up
Spread your wings as you go
When God takes you back
He'll say, ""Hallelujah, you're home""


Hallelujah
You were an angel in the shape of my mum
You got to see the person I have become
Spread your wings and I know
That when God took you back
He said, ""Hallelujah, you're home""",2953767
94489,2028812,Despacito,pop,Luis Fonsi,2017,3723797,"{""Daddy Yankee""}","


Ay, ¡Fonsi! ¡D.Y.!
Ooh, oh, no, oh, no, oh
¡Hey, yeah!
Dididiri Daddy, go!
Sí, sabes que ya llevo un rato mirándote
Tengo que bailar contigo hoy (¡D.Y.!)
Vi que tu mirada ya estaba llamándome
Muéstrame el camino que yo voy


¡Oh!
Tú, tú eres el imán y yo soy el metal
Me voy acercando y voy armando el plan
Sólo con pensarlo se acelera el pulso (¡Oh, yeah!)
Ya, ya me está gustando más de lo normal
Todos mis sentidos van pidiendo más
Esto hay que tomarlo sin ningún apuro

Despacito
Quiero respirar tu cuello despacito
Deja que te diga cosas al oído
Para que te acuerdes si no estás conmigo
Despacito
Quiero desnudarte a besos despacito
Firmar las paredes de tu laberinto
Y hacer de tu cuerpo todo un manuscrito
(Sube, sube, sube; sube, sube)


Quiero ver bailar tu pelo, quiero ser tu ritmo (Woh, eh)
Que le enseñes a mi boca (Woh, eh)
Tus lugares favoritos (Favorito', favorito', baby)
Déjame sobrepasar tus zonas de peligro (Eh; woh, eh)
Hasta provocar tus gritos (Woh, eh)
Y que olvides tu apellido (Rrr; D.Y.)


Si te pido un beso, ven, dámelo, yo sé que estás pensándolo (Eh)
Llevo tiempo intentándolo (Eh), mami, esto es dando y dándolo
Sabes que tu corazón conmigo te hace bam-bam
Sabes que esa beba está buscando de mi bam-bam
Ven, prueba de mi boca para ver cómo te sabe (Eh-eh; ¡plo!)
Quiero, quiero, quiero ver cuánto amor a ti te cabe
Yo no tengo prisa, yo me quiero dar el viaje
Empezamos lento, después salvaje

Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamo' pegando, poquito a poquito
Cuando tú me besas con esa destreza
Veo que eres malicia con delicadeza
Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamo' pegando, poquito a poquito (Oh-oh)
Y es que esa belleza es un rompecabezas (No, no)
Pero pa' montarlo aquí tengo la pieza
¡Oye! (Yo', yo'; ¡plo!)


Despacito
Quiero respirar tu cuello despacito (Yo')
Deja que te diga cosas al oído (Yo')
Para que te acuerdes si no estás conmigo (Plo, plo)
Despacito (¡Plo!)
Quiero desnudarte a besos despacito (Yeah-eh)
Firmar las paredes de tu laberinto
Y hacer de tu cuerpo todo un manuscrito
(Sube, sube, sube, sube, sube)


Quiero ver bailar tu pelo, quiero ser tu ritmo (Eh, woh, eh)
Que le enseñes a mi boca (Woh, eh)
Tus lugares favoritos (Favorito', favorito', baby)
Déjame sobrepasar tus zonas de peligro (Eh, woh, eh)
Hasta provocar tus gritos (Woh, eh)
Y que olvides tu apellido

Despacito
Vamo' a hacerlo en una playa en Puerto Rico
Hasta que las olas griten: ""¡Ay, Bendito!""
Para que mi sello se quede contigo
¡Báilalo!


Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito (Oh, yeah-yeah)
Nos vamos pegando, poquito a poquito (No, no; oh)
Que le enseñes a mi boca
Tus lugares favoritos
Favorito', favorito', baby (Ooh)
Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamos pegando, poquito a poquito
Hasta provocar tus gritos (Fonsi)
Y que olvides tu apellido (D.Y.)
Despacito",2955220
94493,2028861,Slippery,rap,Migos,2017,2019164,"{""Gucci Mane""}","
De-de-de-de-de-de-de-de-Deko
OG Parker


Pop a perky just to start up (Pop it, pop it)
Pop two cups of purple just to warm up (Two cups, drank)
I heard your bitch, she got that water
(Splash, drip, drip, woo, splash, ayy)
Slippery (Wow), 'scuse me, please me (Please)
I'm up (Up), oh, believe me, believe me (Believe me)
Get beat (Beat), 'cause I'm flexin' 'Rari's (Skrrt)
You can bet on me (Skrr, skrr, hey, hey, hey)


Tater tot, fuck niggas on my radar watch (Watchin')
Crocodile hunter, turn 'em to some gator shots (Urr)
Iced out watch (Ice), ridin' round, ten o'clock (Ten)
Ridin' round, geeked up, damn, think it's three o'clock (Three)
Four o'clock (Four), five o'clock, six o'clock (Five)
I'm gon' pop, if I don't, I'm back to the pot (Whip)
I got rocks (Rocks), big bales, big arms
Tommy gun (Prr), come out and play, let's have fun (Yeah)
Big scales (Scales), fish scale, big weight (Fish)
Iceberg (Ice), ice tray, ice tray (Woo)
Plug called (Called), tried to front, I don't need it (Brrt)
I don't need it (Brrt), pockets strong, wrist anemic (Strong)
Get freezy (Freezy), young nigga pay your debt-is (Debt-is)
Grandma (Grandma), auntie Ab and auntie Neesa (Neesa)
Uncle Bo (Bo), auntie Greta serve ya Perkys (Greta)
Auntie Eva (Eva), if she got a pound, she might just serve it (Serve)

Pop a perky just to start up (Pop it, pop it)
Pop two cups of purple just to warm up (Two cups, drank)
I heard your bitch, she got that water
(Splash, drip, drip, woo, splash, ayy)
Slippery (Wow), 'scuse me, please me (Please)
I'm up (Up), oh, believe me, believe me (Believe me)
Get beat (Beat), 'cause I'm flexin' 'Rari's (Skrrt)
You can bet on me (Skrr, skrr, hey, hey, hey)


Offset!
Slippery (Slip), she numbin' me, that tongue on me (Eghhh)
Honestly (Honest), she fuck with me, your wife to be (Wife)
In Italy, bought her a fur, look like the wildebeast (Wrarr)
Just chill with me (Chill)
It is no worry, it is a bill to me (It ain't nothin')
I pull up Diablo, I pull up with models
I gave her her first Philippe (Philippe)
We goin' full throttle, she swallowed the bottle
I'm all in her ovaries (Eghhh)
I gave her some dollars
I Gucci'd her collar, now she can't get over me (Hey)
She want a dose of me (Dose)
Just hop in the Ghost with me (Ghost)
Perky and molly, don't vote for nobody
These bitch ass niggas ain't solid (Solid)
Run in your house and with pumps and the shotties
Your mama might be up inside it (Bah)
Cars robotic, bad bitch with a body
But really don't care nothing about it (Uh-uh)
Cappin' and poppin', I seen that lil' Masi
I coulda pulled up and just shot ya (Brrt)
It's a jungle, I let 'em survive (Survive)

Pop a perky just to start up (Pop it, pop it)
Pop two cups of purple just to warm up (Two cups, drank)
I heard your bitch, she got that water
(Splash, drip, drip, woo, splash, go ayy)
Slippery, 'scuse me, please me (Please)
I'm up, oh, believe me, believe me (believe me)
Get beat (Beat), 'cause I'm flexin' 'Rari's (Skrrt)
You can bet on me (Skrr, skrr, hey, hey, hey)


I rock water, diamonds, I'm drippin' but not slippin'
I threw a quarter (Well damn), but nawl, I'm not trippin'
Bugatti on Forgis, and nawl, I'm not Crippin'
I buy Ferraris like Jordans, I'm Mike and y'all Pippen
Chillin', just me and my millions
Niggas, they all in they feelings
My bitches, I spoil them like they chillens
So persistent, if I want it, I go get it
I'm so slimy, grimy, sheisty but still shinin'
Rude and unkindly, cruel with no conscience
Drop the top on College, nigga, I ain't with no-nonsense
And I'm a murderer, nigga, but I don't promote violence


Deadshot (Brrt), AK make your head rock (Brrt)
Red dot (Pew-pew), retro Air Jord' deadstock (-stock)
Lean on rocks (Act), Perkys, Mollies, Xannies, Rocks (Roxies)
Oxycontin (Oxyies), Takeoff, I'm your med doc (Takeoff!)
Leg lock (Leg), the key I got unlock the box (Box)
What's in that box (Huh?) Don't tell 'em, they might show the cops (Shh)
Wristwatch (Bite), abnormal so I flood the clock (Ice)
Money flop, panties drop, that's when them titties pop (Woo)
Free my partners (John Wick)
'Til they free it's fuck the cops (Fuck 'em)
They know I geek a lot
They don't know I keep a Glock (Clueless)
Ain't been no drought (Where)
They think I been sleep a lot
They think I'm dumb (Dumb)
They don't know I see the plot (See it)
Fuck it I seize a knot

Pop a perky just to start up (Pop it, pop it)
Pop two cups of purple just to warm up (Two cups, drank)
I heard your bitch, she got that water
(Splash, drip, drip, woo, splash, ayy)
Slippery (Wow), 'scuse me, please me (Please)
I'm up (Up), oh, believe me, believe me (Believe me)
Get beat (Beat), 'cause I'm flexin' 'Rari's (Skrrt)
You can bet on me (Skrr, skrr, hey, hey, hey)",2955272
94599,2030228,Love,pop,Lana Del Rey,2017,1164223,{},"
Look at you, kids, with your vintage music
Comin' through satellites while cruisin'
You're part of the past, but now you're the future
Signals crossing can get confusin'


It's enough just to make you feel crazy, crazy, crazy
Sometimes it's enough just to make you feel crazy


You get ready, you get all dressed up
To go nowhere in particular
Back to work or the coffee shop
Doesn't matter 'cause it's enough
To be young and in love, ah, ah
To be young and in love, ah, ah


Look at you, kids, you know you're the coolest
The world is yours and you can't refuse it
Seen so much, you could get the blues, but
That don't mean that you should abuse it

Though it's enough just to make you go crazy, crazy, crazy
I know, it's enough just to make you go crazy, crazy, crazy


But you get ready, you get all dressed up
To go nowhere in particular
Back to work or the coffee shop
It don't matter because it's enough
To be young and in love, ah, ah
To be young and in love, ah, ah


Hmm (Ah, ah)
Hmm (Ah, ah, ah, ah)
Hmm
Don't worry, baby
Hmm (Ah, ah)
Hmm (Ah, ah, ah, ah)
Hmm
Don't worry, baby


And it's enough just to make me go crazy, crazy, crazy
It's enough just to make me go crazy, crazy, crazy

I get ready, I get all dressed up
To go nowhere in particular
It doesn't matter if I'm not enough
For the future or the things to come
'Cause I'm young and in love, ah, ah
I'm young and in love, ah, ah, ah, ah


Hmm (Ah, ah)
Hmm (Ah, ah, ah, ah)
Hmm
Don't worry, baby
Hmm (Ah, ah)
Hmm (Ah, ah, ah, ah)
Hmm
Don't worry, baby",2956717
94738,2032574,Rolex,rap,Ayo & Teo,2017,1997891,{},"
BL$$D
What's in that bag, boy?
Rollie, rollie, rollie (Rollie shit)
BL$$D


I just want a Rollie, Rollie, Rollie with a dab of ranch
I already got some designer to hold up my pants
I just want some ice on my wrist so I look better when I dance
Have you lookin' at it, put you in a trance
I just want a Rollie, Rollie, Rollie with a dab of ranch
I already got some designer to hold up my pants
I just want some ice on my wrist so I look better when I dance
Have you lookin' at it, put you in a trance
Yeah, yeah, yeah


All I ever wanted was a Rollie, Rollie (Yeah)
All I ever wanted was a Rollie, Rollie (Yeah)
Cooler than a snowman with the ice all on me (Yeah)
Now your chick all on me, now your chick all on me (She on me)

My Rollie don't tick-tock, it just glide
Keep starin' at it and you might go blind
I be movin' clean, I don't even try
All I see is bands, bands, I spy
Yeah, that way, I need that moola by Tuesday
Yeah, that way, I low key feel like feng shui
I just now got started, got views on views, I'm poppin'
My diamonds goin' retarded, your girl on deck, it's a party


I just want a Rollie, Rollie, Rollie with a dab of ranch (Rollie, Rollie, dab, dab)
I already got some designer to hold up my pants
I just want some ice on my wrist so I look better when I dance (Ice)
Have you lookin' at it, put you in a trance
I just want a Rollie, Rollie, Rollie with a dab of ranch (Rollie, Rollie, dab, dab)
I already got some designer to hold up my pants
I just want some ice on my wrist so I look better when I dance
Have you lookin' at it, put you in a trance
Yeah, yeah, yeah


All I ever wanted was a Rollie, Rollie (Rollie, yeah)
All I ever wanted was a Rollie, Rollie (Rollie, Rollie, yeah)
Cooler than a snowman with the ice all on me (I'm cool, I'm cool, yeah)
Now your chick all on me, now your chick all on me

Blue face Rollie, red face Rollie, ayy (Woo, woo, yeah!)
Purple face Rollie like some Teletubbies, ayy
Baby diamonds wet, shinin' like some guppies (They wet, yeah)
Your man's hatin', probably 'cause his girl love me, ayy
I pull up to the mall and I'm flexin' on your ho (Ha)
Jahleele in the cut, and he got them buffies, ayy (Got them buffies)
Whiteskins got me goin' crazy, crazy, ayy (Ayy)
Your girl love me 'cause she probably want my baby, ayy (Woo, woo!)
Ice on my neck cost like five K (Five K)
I want a girl built just like Kim K (She thick)
Karate chop that bitch like a sensei (Woo)
Pull off up in a 'Rari or a Bentley, ayy (Skrrt)


I just want a Rollie, Rollie, Rollie with a dab of ranch (Rollie, Rollie, dab, dab)
I already got some designer to hold up my pants
I just want some ice on my wrist so I look better when I dance (Ice)
Have you lookin' at it, put you in a trance
I just want a Rollie, Rollie, Rollie with a dab of ranch (Rollie)
I already got some designer to hold up my pants (Versace)
I just want some ice on my wrist so I look better when I dance
Have you lookin' at it, put you in a trance
Yeah, yeah, yeah


All I ever wanted was a Rollie, Rollie (Rollie, Rollie, yeah)
All I ever wanted was a Rollie, Rollie (Rollie, Rollie, yeah)
Cooler than a snowman with the ice all on me (Brrr, yeah)
Now your chick all on me, now your chick all on me (She on me)

Yeah, she on me
All I ever wanted was a Rollie
All I ever wanted was a Rollie
I just want a Rollie
I just want a Rollie
I just want a
I just want a Rollie",2959263
94831,2034287,Psycho,pop,Post Malone,2018,3266489,"{""Ty Dolla \\$ign""}","
Damn, my AP goin' psycho, lil' mama bad like Michael
Can't really trust nobody with all this jewelry on you
My roof look like a no-show, got diamonds by the boatload
Come with the Tony Romo for clowns and all the bozos
My AP goin' psycho, lil' mama bad like Michael
Can't really trust nobody with all this jewelry on you
My roof look like a no-show, got diamonds by the boatload
Don't act like you my friend when I'm rollin' through my ends, though


You stuck in the friend zone, I tell that four-five the fifth, ayy
Hunnid bands inside my shorts, DeChino the shit, ayy
Try to stuff it all in, but it don't even fit, ayy
Know that I been with the shits ever since a jit, ayy
I made my first million, I'm like, ""Shit, this is it,"" ayy
30 for a walkthrough, man, we had that bitch lit, ayy
Had so many bottles, gave ugly girl a sip
Out the window of the Benzo, we get seen in the rent'
And I'm like ""Woah, man, my neck so goddamn cold""
Diamonds wet, my t-shirt soaked
I got homies, let it go, oh
My money thick, won't ever fold
She said, ""Can I have some to hold?""
And I can't ever tell you no

Damn, my AP goin' psycho, lil' mama bad like Michael
Can't really trust nobody with all this jewelry on you
My roof look like a no-show, got diamonds by the boatload
Come with the Tony Romo for clowns and all the bozos
My AP goin' psycho, lil' mama bad like Michael
Can't really trust nobody with all this jewelry on you
My roof look like a no-show, got diamonds by the boatload
Don't act like you my friend when I'm rollin' through my ends, though


The AP goin' psycho, my Rollie goin' brazy
I'm hittin' lil' mama, she wanna have my babies
It's fifty on the pinky, chain so stanky
You should see the whip, promise I can take yo' bitch
Dolla ridin' in an old school Chevy, it's a drop top
Boolin' with a thot-thot, she gon' give me top-top
Just one switch, I can make the ass drop (Hey)
Ayy, take you to the smoke shop
We gon' get high, ayy, we gon' hit Rodeo
Dial up Valentino, we gon' hit Pico
Take you where I'm from, take you to the slums
This ain't happen overnight, no, these diamonds real bright
Saint Laurent jeans, still in my Vans though
All VVS', put you in a necklace
Girl, you look beautiful tonight
Stars on the roof, they matching with the jewelry

Damn, my AP goin' psycho, lil' mama bad like Michael
Can't really trust nobody with all this jewelry on you
My roof look like a no-show, got diamonds by the boatload
Come with the Tony Romo for clowns and all the bozos
My AP goin' psycho, lil' mama bad like Michael
Can't really trust nobody with all this jewelry on you
My roof look like a no-show, got diamonds by the boatload
Don't act like you my friend when I'm rollin' through my ends, though",2961138
95099,2038769,Best Friend,pop,Rex Orange County,2017,1516787,{},"
I should've stayed at home
'Cause right now I see all these people that love me
But I still feel alone
Can't help but check my phone
I could've made you mine
But no, it wasn't meant to be and see I wasn't made for you
And you weren't made for me
Though it seemed so easy


And that's because I wanna be your favorite boy
I wanna be the one that makes your day
The one you think about as you lie awake
I can't wait to be your number one
I'll be your biggest fan and you'll be mine
But I still wanna break your heart and make you cry


But won't you wait?
You know it's too late
I'm on my own shit now
Let me tell you how it feels to be fucking great
I feel great
Whoa, oh, oh, oh, oh
You need to be yourself
Love someone for loving you instead of someone really cool
That makes your heart melt
Who knows what you truly felt
You're still my favorite girl
You better trust me when I tell you there ain't no one else
More beautiful in this damn world
In this damn world

You're gonna wanna be my best friend baby
You're gonna wanna be my best friend
I said that
You're gonna wanna be my best friend baby
You're gonna wanna be my best friend
Best friend
You're gonna wanna be my best friend baby
You're gonna wanna be my best friend
Best friend
You're gonna wanna be my best friend baby
You're gonna wanna be my best friend


I say that I'm happy
I say that I'm happy
But no, no, no, no
No, no, no, oh


I still wanna be your favorite boy
I wanna be the one that makes your day
The one you think about as you lie awake
And I can't wait to be your number, your number one
I'll be your biggest fan and you'll be mine
But I still wanna break your heart and make you cry

I still wanna be your favorite boy
I wanna be the one
I might just be the one",2965955
95311,2041510,KMT,rap,Drake,2017,1240233,{Giggs},"
(Ness on the beat)
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, okay, okay, okay


Demon just got out the can (Yeah)
I gave my bro an advance (Yeah)
Love is just not in my plans
Not even takin' a chance
Studio right in my yaad
I'm doin' ten in a week
How long I been on this streak?
Dream about work in my sleep (Oof)
Okay, I got a lock on the streets
Shoutout to T, he did three
And he brought it in 'cause of me
You don't know nothin' 'bout me
Life for my bruddas is deep
Long as they all on they feet
Long as they pockets is greaze (Greaze!)
I'm in the penthouse but still, nothin' is sweet (Yeah)
Dust a man down with the pen, it's a sweep (Mmm!)
Taller in person, you'll see when we meet
I heard your new shit and I'm kissin' my teeth
Jheeze!

You know dem ones? Hahaha
Yeah, ahh!


Bringin' that dirty-dirty, bringin' that certy (Certy)
Mizzy with the quick extension, ringin' off thirty (Rah!)
I've got bitches in the merky, swervin', lookin' all curvy
And you already know I love them breasts, lookin' all perky
Lookin' all Christmas gift-wrapped, lookin' all turkey
Spen jumped out the Ghost in a suit, lookin' all churchy (Oof!)
Fingers all itchin', twitchin', lookin' all jerky (Jerky)
Whippin' that white girl (Yeah?), cookin' that Cersei (Dah!)
I was pushin' that dark shit, pushin' that charcoal (Yeah)
Now this is that big bad, this is Gustavo (Mmm!)
Look at them jokers, look at that arsehole (That arsehole)
Man are gettin' bread now, and this is that hard dough (Yeah)
Clap man, dominant murder ('Nant murder)
I'm a black man (Black man), government earner (Earner)
Could've just slapped man, but he wanted it further (Why?)
Batman, da-na-na-da-na


October Firm",2968864
95404,2043286,Believer,rock,Imagine Dragons,2017,6361460,{},"
First things first
I'ma say all the words inside my head
I'm fired up and tired of
The way that things have been, oh-ooh
The way that things have been, oh-ooh


Second thing second
Don't you tell me what you think that I could be
I'm the one at the sail
I'm the master of my sea, oh-ooh
The master of my sea, oh-ooh


I was broken from a young age
Taking my sulkin' to the masses
Writing my poems for the few
That look at me, took to me, shook at me, feelin' me
Singing from heartache from the pain
Taking my message from the veins
Speaking my lesson from the brain
Seeing the beauty through the...

Pain! You made me a, you made me a
Believer, believer
Pain! You break me down and build me up
Believer, believer
Pain! Oh, let the bullets fly, oh, let them rain
My life, my love, my drive, it came from...
Pain! You made me a, you made me a
Believer, believer


Third things third
Send a prayer to the ones up above
All the hate that you've heard
Has turned your spirit to a dove, oh-ooh
Your spirit up above, oh-ooh


I was chokin' in the crowd
Building my rain up in the cloud
Falling like ashes to the ground
Hoping my feelings, they would drown
But they never did, ever lived, ebbin' and flowin'
Inhibited, limited 'til it broke open and rained down
It rained down, like...

Pain! You made me a, you made me a
Believer, believer
Pain! You break me down and build me up
Believer, believer
Pain! Oh, let the bullets fly, oh, let them rain
My life, my love, my drive, it came from...
Pain! You made me a, you made me a
Believer, believer


Last things last
By the grace of the fire and the flames
You're the face of the future
The blood in my veins, oh-ooh
The blood in my veins, oh-ooh


But they never did, ever lived, ebbin' and flowin'
Inhibited, limited 'til it broke open and rained down
It rained down, like...


Pain! You made me a, you made me a
Believer, believer
Pain! You break me down and build me up
Believer, believer
Pain! Oh, let the bullets fly, oh, let them rain
My life, my love, my drive, it came from...
Pain! You made me a, you made me a
Believer, believer",2970719
95472,2044201,It Aint Me,pop,Kygo & Selena Gomez,2017,2682046,{},"
I had a dream
We were sipping whiskey neat
Highest floor, The Bowery
And I was high enough


Somewhere along the lines
We stopped seeing eye to eye
You were staying out all night
And I had enough


No, I don't wanna know
Where you been or where you're goin'
But I know I won't be home
And you'll be on your own


Who's gonna walk you
Through the dark side of the morning?
Who's gonna rock you
When the sun won't let you sleep?
Who's waking up to drive you home
When you're drunk and all alone?
Who's gonna walk you
Through the dark side of the morning?

It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me


I had a dream
We were back to seventeen
Summer nights and The Libertines
Never growing up


I'll take with me
The polaroids and the memories
But you know I'm gonna leave
Behind the worst of us


Who's gonna walk you
Through the dark side of the morning?
Who's gonna rock you
When the sun won't let you sleep?
Who's waking up to drive you home
When you're drunk and all alone?
Who's gonna walk you
Through the dark side of the morning?

It ain't me, no no
It ain't me, no no
It ain't me, no no
Who's gonna walk you through the dark side of the morning?
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me
The Bowery, whiskey neat, grateful, I'm so grateful
It ain't me",2971662
95587,2045906,No Favors,rap,Big Sean,2017,1401816,{Eminem},"
Make it, make it, make it, boy, we gotta make it
You can save your hand, I ain't gotta shake it
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors
Clique too big, bread gotta break it
'Cause these others lowkey with the snakin', fakin'
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors, no favors
What I need? No favors
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors


I'm about gettin' the job done, boy up every night
I'm about rollin' a seven when I toss up the dice
I'm about gettin' my logo all flooded with ice
I'm about takin' a risk that might fuck up your life
Tell 'em point and shoot like camera crews
In front of cameras too (Brrr!)
Damn, Sean, what happened to the humble attitude?
I'm like, ""Niggas took the flow, but I'm still standin' too.""
Thought I had the Midas touch, and then I went platinum too
Motherfuck all your comparisons (Fuck 'em!)
I've been talkin' to God like that's my therapist
I'm African-American in America, I ain't inherit shit
But a millionaire under 30 so He must be hearin' shit
Don, don, don life, I do this for the crib, the D to Flint
Kids who get sick with lead, others get hit with the lead
From where they need a handout, but they tell you put hands up
Only deals I had was from the Sam's Club
Now it's blue blood in my veins, though you know what I came for
Born in a world goin' where they told me I can't go
In my lane though, I'm in the same boat as Usain Bolt
Get ahead by any means so the head's what I aim for
When my grandma died I realized I got an angel
Show me everything's a blessing dependin' on the angles
Look, I am the anomaly, never needed favors or apologies
That's my new lifetime policy
Woodgrain steering wheel, this bitch feel like a pirate ship
How many hot verses 'til you bitches start acknowledgin'
The pictures we been paintin'? My nigga
Connected to a higher power-how I know?
'Cause I don't write this shit: I think it, my nigga
Look, all I ever did was beat the odds
'Cause when you try to get even it just don't even out
Never stoppin' like we hypnotized
Watch what we visualize on the rise
Be the G.O.A.T. while we alive; when we die, we gon' be the gods

Make it, make it, make it, boy, we gotta make it
You can save your hand, I ain't gotta shake it
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors
Clique too big, bread gotta break it
'Cause these others lowkey with the snakin', fakin'
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors, no favors


If she was flavor, I won't save her
No taste buds, ho, later!
Fuck you lookin' at, hater?
I saw them eyes like an ass raper
Try to copy my swag like a cheating classmate
I'll be the last face you see 'fore you pass
When you get your fuckin' ass graded like a math paper
So ahead of my time, ""late"" means I'm early
My age is reversing, I'm basically thirty
Amazingly sturdy, zany and wordy
Brainy and nerdy, blatantly dirty
Insanely perverted, rapey and scurvy
They blame me for murdering Jamie Lee Curtis
Said I put her face in the furnace, beat her with a space heater
A piece of furniture, egg beater, thermos
It may be disturbing, what I'm saying's cringeworthy
But I'm urinating on Fergie, call Shady number 81
Surely I'm turning into the Aaron Hernandez of rap
State of emergency, the planet's having panic attacks
Brady's returning, matter of fact I may be deserving
Of a pat on the back like a Patriots jersey
Inexplicable stomach growl from the pit of it
Like a fuckin' Terrier hid in it
Despicable, dumb it down, ridiculous
Tongue is foul, shoot off at the fuckin' mouth
Like a missile, a thunder cloud
Hundred pound pistol, pull the trigger, this gun will sound
And you'll get a round like Digital Underground
And fuck Ann Coulter with a Klan poster
With a lamp post, door handle, shutter
A damn bolt cutter, a sandal, a can opener
A candle, rubber, piano, a flannel, sucker
Some hand soap, butter, a banjo and manhole cover
Hand over the mouth and nose smother
Trample ran over the tramp with the Land Rover
The band, the Lambo, Hummer and Road Runner
Go ham donut, or go Rambo, gut her, make an example of her
That's for Sandra Bland, ho, and Philando
Hannibal on the lam, no wonder I am so stubborn
I'm anti, can't no government handle a commando
Your man don't want it
Trump's a bitch, I'll make his whole brand go under (Yeah)
And tell Dre I'm meeting him in L.A
White Bronco like Elway, speeding
I'm 'bout to run over a chick, Del Rey CD in?
Females stay beating 'em
Bet you they'll lay bleeding, and yell, ""wait,"" pleading
But screaming is pointless like feeding Michel'le helium
Leaving 'em pale-faced, medium-sized welt
Straight treating 'em like a cellmate
Seedy, I'm climbing hell's gate
Bitch, I'm like your problems: self-made
Meaning someone else's help ain't needed, 'cause I'ma-

Make it, make it, make it, boy, we gotta make it
You can save your hand, I ain't gotta shake it
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors
Clique too big, bread gotta break it
'Cause these others lowkey with the snakin', fakin'
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors, no favors
What I need? No favors
Everything lined up for the takin'
And what I need from 'em? No favors


(I know you feeling yourself right now)
(But I'm not sure she's the one-I wouldn't call her, man)
""Hey, I'm outside""
What are you doing here?

",2973484
95693,2047439,Stay,pop,Zedd & Alessia Cara,2017,2043010,{},"
Waiting for the time to pass you by
Hope the winds of change will change your mind
I could give a thousand reasons why
And I know you, and you've got to


Make it on your own, but we don't have to grow up
We can stay forever young
Living on my sofa, drinking rum and cola
Underneath the rising sun
I could give a thousand reasons why
But you're going, and you know that


All you have to do is stay a minute
Just take your time
The clock is ticking, so stay
All you have to do is wait a second
Your hands on mine
The clock is ticking, so stay

All you have to do is
All you have to do is stay


Won't admit what I already know
I've never been the best at letting go
I don't wanna spend the night alone
Guess I need you, and I need to


Make it on my own, but I don't wanna grow up
We can stay forever young
Living on my sofa, drinking rum and cola
Underneath the rising sun
I could give a million reasons why
But I'm going, and you know that


All you have to do is stay a minute
Just take your time
The clock is ticking, so stay
All you have to do is wait a second
Your hands on mine
The clock is ticking, so stay

All you have to do is
All you have to do is stay


All you have to do is stay
So stay, yeah


All you have to do is stay a minute
Just take your time
The clock is ticking, so stay
All you have to do is wait a second
Your hands on mine
The clock is ticking, so stay
All you have to do is stay",2975362
95783,2048784,Chained to the Rhythm,pop,Katy Perry,2017,1007858,"{""Skip Marley""}","
Are we crazy?
Living our lives through a lens
Trapped in our white picket fence
Like ornaments
So comfortable, we're living in a bubble, bubble
So comfortable, we cannot see the trouble, trouble
Aren't you lonely
Up there in utopia
Where nothing will ever be enough?
Happily numb
So comfortable, we're living in a bubble, bubble
So comfortable, we cannot see the trouble, trouble


So put your rose-colored glasses on
And party on


Turn it up, it's your favorite song
Dance, dance, dance to the distortion
Come on, turn it up, keep it on repeat
Stumbling around like a wasted zombie
Yeah, we think we're free
Drink, this one is on me
We're all chained to the rhythm
To the rhythm
To the rhythm
Turn it up, it's your favorite song
Dance, dance, dance to the distortion
Come on, turn it up, keep it on repeat
Stumbling around like a wasted zombie
Yeah, we think we're free
Drink, this one is on me
We're all chained to the rhythm
To the rhythm
To the rhythm

Are we tone deaf?
Keep sweeping it under the mat
Thought we could do better than that
I hope we can
So comfortable, we're living in a bubble, bubble
So comfortable, we cannot see the trouble, trouble


So put your rose-colored glasses on
And party on


Turn it up, it's your favorite song
Dance, dance, dance to the distortion
Come on, turn it up, keep it on repeat
Stumbling around like a wasted zombie
Yeah, we think we're free
Drink, this one is on me
We're all chained to the rhythm
To the rhythm
To the rhythm
Turn it up, it's your favorite song
Dance, dance, dance to the distortion
Come on, turn it up, keep it on repeat
Stumbling around like a wasted zombie
Yeah, we think we're free
Drink, this one is on me
We're all chained to the rhythm
To the rhythm
To the rhythm

It is my desire
Break down the walls to connect, inspire
Ay, up in your high place, liars
Time is ticking for the empire
The truth they feed is feeble
As so many times before
They greed over the people
They stumbling and fumbling
And we're about to riot
They woke up, they woke up the lions
(Woo!)


Turn it up, it's your favorite song
Dance, dance, dance to the distortion
Come on, turn it up, keep it on repeat
Stumbling around like a wasted zombie
Yeah, we think we're free
Drink, this one is on me
We're all chained to the rhythm
To the rhythm
To the rhythm


Turn it up
Turn it up
It goes on, and on, and on
It goes on, and on, and on
It goes on, and on, and on
'Cause we're all chained to the rhythm",2977709
95792,2048847,​witchblades,rap,Lil Peep & Lil Tracy,2017,1131231,{},"
MoneyPosse
Ooh, Bi-Big Head on the beat


Switchblades, cocaine
GothBoiClique make a ho shake
Black fur, black coat
GothBoiClique in the back, ho
Switchblades, cocaine
GothBoiClique 'til my soul take
Black jeans, half black hoes
GothBoiClique in the castle


In high school, I was a loner
I was a reject, I was a poser
Multiple personalities, I'm bipolar
I swear, I mean well, I'm still goin' to hell
Witchcraft, love chants
Whisper in my ear, put me in a trance
Cocaine all night long
When I die, bury me with all my ice on
Witchcraft, love chants
Whisper in my ear, put me in a trance
Cocaine all night long
When I die, bury me with all my ice on

When I die, bury me with all my ice on
When I die, bury me without the lights on
Lights off, nightlights
Clothes off, baby, I got good white
When I die, bury me with all my ice on
When I die, bury me without the lights on
Lights off, nightlights
Clothes off, baby, I got good white


Clothes off, baby, I got good white
Tell me a secret and I'll tell one of mines
I just wanna talk, I don't wanna fight
Ask me if I'm alright, do you want me to lie?


Switchblades, cocaine
GothBoiClique make a ho shake
Black fur, black coat
GothBoiClique in the back, ho
Switchblades, cocaine
GothBoiClique 'til my soul take
Black jeans, half black hoes
GothBoiClique in the castle",2977800
95824,2049338,Heavy,pop,Linkin Park,2017,1173184,{Kiiara},"
I don't like my mind right now
Stacking up problems that are so unnecessary
Wish that I could slow things down
I wanna let go but there's comfort in the panic
And I drive myself crazy
Thinking everything's about me
Yeah, I drive myself crazy
'Cause I can't escape the gravity


I'm holding on
Why is everything so heavy?
Holding on
So much more than I can carry
I keep dragging around what's bringing me down
If I just let go, I'd be set free
Holding on
Why is everything so heavy?


You say that I'm paranoid
But I'm pretty sure the world is out to get me
It's not like I make the choice
To let my mind stay so fucking messy
I know I'm not the center of the universe
But you keep spinning 'round me just the same
I know I'm not the center of the universe
But you keep spinning 'round me just the same

I'm holding on
Why is everything so heavy?
Holding on
So much more than I can carry
I keep dragging around what's bringing me down
If I just let go, I'd be set free
Holding on
Why is everything so heavy?


I know I'm not the center of the universe
But you keep spinning 'round me just the same
I know I'm not the center of the universe
But you keep spinning 'round me just the same
And I drive myself crazy
Thinking everything's about me


Holding on
Why is everything so heavy?
Holding on
So much more than I can carry
I keep dragging around what's bringing me down
If I just let go, I'd be set free
Holding on
Why is everything so heavy?
Why is everything so heavy?
Why is everything so heavy?",2978797
96144,2055158,Drowning,rap,A Boogie wit da Hoodie,2017,2081281,"{""Kodak Black""}","
I'm drownin'
I'm drownin'
I'm drownin'
I'm drownin'


Wrist so icy, wonder why she like me, bitch I'm drownin'
In water, I just bought a Cuban, dipped it in a fountain
Everywhere that I go it's a light show, I'm surrounded
Bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bitch I'm drownin'
I just bought a Cuban ring and dipped it in a fountain
Chain so heavy I feel like I'm holdin' up a mountain
Everywhere that I go it's a light show, I'm surrounded
Bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bitch I'm drownin'


I'm with all my niggas, I don't go nowhere without 'em
If they don't let us in they might throw shots at the bouncer
Actavis medicine, got it straight from out the doctor's
I'm with RJ but I call him Wayne 'cause he's a shotta
Pick up the ladder, put it in the gun, make the .9 stretch
Niggas with attitude, but we come straight out of Highbridge
I'm gon' make her panties wet when she see the way I flex
I'm gon' win a Grammy, move my family out the projects
We went from chillin' in the projects to makin' projects
We was tryna get to the top, and they tried to stop us
I talk for myself, bitch I don't need no fucking voucher
She looked at my wrist and she looked at a hundred thousand

Wrist so icy, wonder why she like me, bitch I'm drownin'
In water, I just bought a Cuban, dipped it in a fountain
Everywhere that I go it's a light show, I'm surrounded
Bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bitch I'm drownin'
I just bought a Cuban ring and dipped it in a fountain
Chain so heavy I feel like I'm holdin' up a mountain
Everywhere that I go it's a light show, I'm surrounded
Bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bitch I'm drownin'


Just bought a brand new chain from Avianne
Nigga with attitude but I ain't from Compton
Lil Kodak, bitch, I'm Polo'd down like Carlton
Sniper Gang, I put a nigga on a carton
I'm the shit I'm fartin', I don't know how to potty
Pull up in a 'Rari, I'm in the Yo like Gotti
A Boogie, I'm goin' Scottie, nigga drop my deposit
I ain't Jamaican, bitch I'm Haitian, but I got them shottas
Harley Davidson every day, I'm ridin' with the chopper
They hatin', I know they don't wanna see a nigga prosper
I ain't doing trims, I'm in the cut like I'm a barber
She call me daddy, but I ain't her motherfucking father


Wrist so icy, wonder why she like me, bitch I'm drownin'
In water, I just bought a Cuban, dipped it in a fountain
Everywhere that I go it's a light show, I'm surrounded
Bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bitch I'm drownin'
I just bought a Cuban ring and dipped it in a fountain
Chain so heavy I feel like I'm holdin' up a mountain
Everywhere that I go it's a light show, I'm surrounded
Bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bust down, bitch I'm drownin'

Bitch, I'm drownin'
Bitch, I'm drownin'
I'm drownin'
Drownin'
I'm drownin'",2986968
96192,2055992,Young Dumb  Broke,rb,Khalid,2017,2768540,{},"
So you're still thinking of me
Just like I know you should
I can not give you everything, you know I wish I could
I'm so high at the moment
I'm so caught up in this
Yeah, we're just young, dumb and broke
But we still got love to give


While we're young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb
Young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb broke high school kids
Yadadadadadadada
Yadadadadadada
Yadadadadadadada
Young dumb broke high school kids

We have so much in common
We argue all the time
You always say I'm wrong
I'm pretty sure I'm right
What's fun about commitment?
When we have our life to live
Yeah, we're just young dumb and broke
But we still got love to give


While we're young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb broke high school kids
Yadadadadadadada
Yadadadadadada
Yadadadadadadada
Young dumb broke high school kids


Jump and we think - do it all in the name of love
Love
Run into sin, do it all in the name of fun
Fun
Whoa-oa-oa
I'm so high at the moment
I'm so caught up in this
Yeah, we're just young, dumb and broke
But we still got love to give

While we're young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb
Young dumb
Young, young dumb and broke
Young dumb broke high school kids
Yadadadadadadada
Yadadadadadada
Yadadadadadadada
Young dumb broke high school kids",2988428
96235,2056591,Mask Off,rap,Future,2017,5969516,{},"
Call it how it is (Call it how it is)
Hendrix
I promise, I swear, I swear
You heard, spit it, yo


Percocets (Ya), molly, Percocets (Percocets)
Percocets (Ya), molly, Percocets (Percocets)
Rep the set (Yee), gotta rep the set (Gang, gang)
Chase a check (Chase it), never chase a bitch (Don't chase no bitches)
Mask on (Off), fuck it, mask off (Mask)
Mask on (Off), fuck it, mask off (Mask)
Percocets ('Cets), molly, Percocets (Percocets)
Chase a check (Chase it), never chase a bitch (Don't chase no bitches)


Two cups (Cup), toast up with the gang (Gang, gang)
From food stamps to a whole 'nother domain, ya
Out the bottom (Ye), I'm the livin' proof (Super)
Ain't compromisin' (Woah), half a million on the coupe (Gang, gang)
Drug houses (where), lookin' like Peru (Woah, woah, woah)
Graduated (Crazy), I was overdue (I'm on due)
Pink molly (Molly), I can barely move (Barely move)
Ask about me ('Bout me), I'm gon' bust a move
Rick James (James), thirty-three chains (Thirty-three)
Ocean air (Air), cruisin' Biscayne
Top off (Ya), that's a liability (Big foreigns)
Hit the gas (Gas), boostin' my adrenaline (Big foreigns)

Percocets (Ye), molly, Percocets (Big foreigns)
Percocets (Ye), molly, Percocets (Big foreigns)
Rep the set (Ye), gotta rep the set (Gang, gang)
Chase a check (Chase it) (Ye), never chase a bitch (Don't chase no bitches) (Big foreigns)
Mask on (Off) (Ye), fuck it, mask off (Mask) (Big foreigns)
Mask on (Off) (Ye), fuck it, mask off (Mask) (Big foreigns)
Percocets (Ye), molly, Percocets (Big foreigns)
Chase a check (Chase it) (Ye, ye), never chase a bitch (Don't chase no bitches)


Ford or Maybach (Ford or), I drive anything (Ye)
Buy my Range (Ye), make 'em go insane (Ye)
(Oh my Lord, praise him be)
My guillotine, drank promethazine (Drank prometh')
TEC and beams (Ya), go to those extremes (Let's go, let's go)
Parliament (Parliament), calamari Wednesday (Ya)
Parlay in Vegas, we was in attendance (What's good, what's good)
Before the business (Yeah), Theodore lenses
Theo-Dur prescriptions (Ya), focus on the missions (Fo' my)
Intermission (Hol' up), never take a break (We can pull up)
Switch states, touch down, foreign plates (Speech)
Ain't no way, ain't no fuckin' way (No)
We call the play, we didn't come to play (No)
Rob the bank, we gon' rob the game (Gang)
They gang, we gang (Gang)
But they are not the same (Freebandz)

Percocets (Ye), molly, Percocets (Big foreigns)
Percocets (Ye), molly, Percocets (Big foreigns)
Rep the set (Ye), gotta rep the set (Gang, gang)
Chase a check (Chase it) (Ye), never chase a bitch (Don't chase no bitches) (Big foreigns)
Mask on (Off) (Ye), fuck it, mask off (Mask) (Big foreigns)
Mask on (Off) (Ye), fuck it, mask off (Mask) (Big foreigns)
Percocets (Ye), molly, Percocets (Big foreigns)
Chase a check (Chase it) (Ye, ye), never chase a bitch (Don't chase no bitches)


Mask on, fuck it, mask off
Mask on, fuck it, mask off
Mask on, fuck it, mask off
Gas gone, never nod off
(Cold chills, prison cells)
(Oh my Lord, praise him be)",2989266
96304,2057181,One More Light,pop,Linkin Park,2017,1193677,{},"
Should've stayed, were there signs, I ignored?
Can I help you, not to hurt, anymore?
We saw brilliance, when the world, was asleep
There are things that we can have, but can't keep


If they say
Who cares if one more light goes out?
In the sky of a million stars
It flickers, flickers
Who cares when someone's time runs out?
If a moment is all we are
Or quicker, quicker
Who cares if one more light goes out?
Well I do


The reminders, pull the floor from your feet
In the kitchen, one more chair than you need, oh
And you're angry, and you should be, it's not fair
Just 'cause you can't see it, doesn't mean it, isn't there

If they say
Who cares if one more light goes out?
In the sky of a million stars
It flickers, flickers
Who cares when someone's time runs out?
If a moment is all we are
Or quicker, quicker
Who cares if one more light goes out?
Well I do


(I do)


Who cares if one more light goes out?
In the sky of a million stars
It flickers, flickers
Who cares when someone's time runs out?
If a moment is all we are
Or quicker, quicker
Who cares if one more light goes out?
Well I do
Well I do",2990388
96371,2057848,Symphony,pop,Clean Bandit,2017,1060131,"{""Zara Larsson""}","
I've been hearin' symphonies
Before, all I heard was silence
A rhapsody for you and me
And every melody is timeless
Life was stringin' me along
Then you came and you cut me loose
Was solo, singin' on my own
Now I can't find the key without you


And now your song is on repeat
And I'm dancin' on to your heartbeat
And when you're gone, I feel incomplete
So, if you want the truth


I just wanna be part of your symphony
Will you hold me tight and not let go?
Symphony
Like a love song on the radio
Will you hold me tight and not let go?

I'm sorry if it's all too much
Every day you're here, I'm healin'
And I was runnin' outta luck
I never thought I'd find this feelin'
'Cause I've been hearin' symphonies
Before all I heard was silence
A rhapsody for you and me (A rhapsody for you and me)
And every melody is timeless


And now your song is on repeat
And I'm dancin' on to your heartbeat
And when you're gone, I feel incomplete
So, if you want the truth


I just wanna be part of your symphony
Will you hold me tight and not let go?
Symphony
Like a love song on the radio
Will you hold me tight and not let go?


Ah, ah, ah, ah-ah-ah, ah, ah, ah
Ah, ah, ah, ah-ah-ah, ah, ah, ah

And now your song is on repeat
And I'm dancin' on to your heartbeat
And when you're gone, I feel incomplete
So if you want the truth (Oh)


I just wanna be part of your symphony
Will you hold me tight and not let go?
Symphony
Like a love song on the radio
Symphony
Will you hold me tight and not let go?
Symphony
Like a love song on the radio
Will you hold me tight and not let go?",2991654
96420,2058457,Free Smoke,rap,Drake,2017,1682230,{},"
Is it the strength of your feelings
Overthrowing your pain?
You'll see new heights you'll be reaching
And is it today that you will find your new release?
And in your wake, ripple your sweet fate
And more chune for your headtop
So watch how you speak on my name, you know?


Yeah, I couldn't get a bill paid
You couldn't buy the real thing
I was stayin' up at yo' place
Tryin' to figure out the whole thing
I saw people doin' things
Almost gave up on the music thing
But we all so spoiled now
More life, more everything
Must have never had your phone tapped
All that yappin' on the phone shit
You must really love the road life
All that never comin' home shit

Free smoke, free smoke, ayy
Free smoke, free smoke, ayy
Free smoke, free smoke, ayy


Dom Rosé toast
Hidden Hills where I post
I start my day slow
Silk pajamas when I wake though
Miraval to the face though
I drunk text J-Lo
Old number, so it bounce back
Boi-1da got the bounce back
Used to get paid for shows in front-door money
Five, ten, twenties, hand sanitize after you count that
Me and Gibbo was about that
Eatin' Applebee's and Outback
Southwest, no first class
Hilton rooms, gotta double up
Writin' our name on a double cup
We ain't even have a tour bus
Girls wouldn't even think of recordin' me
I fall asleep in sororities
I had some different priorities
Weezy had all the authority
Women I like was ignorin' me
Now they like, ""Aren't you adorable?""
I know the question rhetorical
I took the team plane from Oracle
Mama never used to cook much
Used to chef KD
Now me and Chef, KD
Bet on shots for twenty G's
I brought the game to its knees
I make too much these days to ever say, ""Poor me""
Where you at? I never see you

Free smoke, free smoke, ayy
Free smoke, free smoke, ayy
Free smoke, free smoke, ayy


Niggas moves so waste
Please come outside the house and show yourself
So I can say it to your face
It's bound to happen, man, it's gotta happen now
So let's just get it out the way
Lot of niggas goin' bad on me
Please, one at a time
I wanna move to Dubai
So I don't never have to kick it with none of you guys
I didn't listen to Hov on that old song
When he told me, ""Pay it no mind""
I get more satisfaction outta goin' at your head
And seein' all of you die
And I seen a lot of you die


Free smoke, free smoke, ayy
Free smoke, free smoke, ayy
Free smoke, free smoke, ayy

Hidden Hills where I post, yeah
'Ye already know, yeah
I'm the troublemaker in the neighborhood
Far as troublemakin' goes, yeah
House party up the road, yeah
I'm not Kid 'n Play
This kid doesn't play about the flow, yeah
Y'all keep playin' with your nose, yeah
You get high and do the most, yeah
How you let the kid fightin'
Ghost-writin' rumors turn you to a ghost?
Oh, you niggas got jokes
Free smoke, free smoke


Baka
Yeah, we outchea
Ya dun know, eh?
It's a OVO ting, eh?
Ya dun know, eh?
It's a East Side ting, eh?
Ya dun know, eh?
More life",2992433
96421,2058534,Havana,pop,Camila Cabello,2017,3858375,"{""Young Thug""}","
Hey


Havana, ooh na-na (Ayy)
Half of my heart is in Havana, ooh na-na (Ayy, ayy)
He took me back to East Atlanta, na-na-na, ah
Oh, but my heart is in Havana (Ayy)
There's somethin' 'bout his manners (Uh-huh)
Havana, ooh na-na (Uh)


He didn't walk up with that ""how you doin'?"" (Uh)
When he came in the room
He said there's a lot of girls I can do with (Uh)
But I can't without you
I knew him forever in a minute (Hey)
That summer night in June
And papa says he got malo in him (Uh)
He got me feelin' like...

Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Ayy)
I knew it when I met him (Ayy), I loved him when I left him
Got me feelin' like, ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
And then I had to tell him, I had to go
Oh na-na-na-na-na (Woo)


Havana, ooh na-na (Ayy, hey)
Half of my heart is in Havana, ooh na-na (Ayy, ayy, uh-huh)
He took me back to East Atlanta, na-na-na
Oh, but my heart is in Havana (Huh)
My heart is in Havana (Ayy)
Havana, ooh na-na


(Jeffery)
Just graduated, fresh on campus, mmm
Fresh out East Atlanta with no manners, damn (Fresh out East Atlanta)
Bump on her bumper like a traffic jam
Hey, I was quick to pay that girl like Uncle Sam (Here you go, ayy)
Back it on me (Back it up)
Shawty cravin' on me, get to eatin' on me (On me)
She waited on me (And what?)
Shawty cakin' on me, got the bacon on me (Wait up)
This is history in the makin', homie (Homie)
Point blank, close range, that B (Tah, tah)
If it cost a million, that's me (That's me)
I was gettin' mula, baby

Havana, ooh na-na (Ayy, ayy)
Half of my heart is in Havana, ooh na-na (Oh, ayy, ayy, uh-huh)
He took me back to East Atlanta, na-na-na (Oh, no)
Oh, but my heart is in Havana (Huh)
My heart is in Havana (Ayy)
Havana, ooh na-na


Ooh na-na, oh, na-na-na (Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
Take me back, back, back like...
Ooh na-na, oh, na-na-na (Yeah, babe)
Take me back, back, back like...
Ooh na-na, oh, na-na-na (Yeah, yeah)
Take me back, back, back like...
Ooh na-na, oh, na-na-na (Yeah, babe)
Take me back, back, back
Hey, hey...
Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Hey)
Ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Hey)
Take me back to my Havana...


Havana, ooh na-na
Half of my heart is in Havana, ooh na-na (Oh, yeah)
He took me back to East Atlanta, na-na-na (Ayy, ayy)
Oh, but my heart is in Havana
My heart is in Havana (Ayy)
Havana, ooh na-na (Uh-huh)

Oh, na-na-na (Oh, na, yeah)
Oh, na-na-na
Oh, na-na-na (No, no, no, take me back)
Oh, na-na-na
Havana, ooh na-na",2992529
96468,2059525,TAEYANG - 눈 코 입 EYES NOSE LIPS Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,2014,1232999,{},"
Mianhae-mianhaehaji ma
Naega chorahaejijana
Ppalgan yeppeun ipsullo
Eoseo nareul jugigo ga
Naneun gwaenchana
Majimageuro nareul barabwa jwo
Amureochi aneun deut useo jwo
Nega bogo sipeul ttae
Gieokal su itge
Naui meoritsoge ne eolgul
Geuril su itge


Neol bonael su eomneun naui yoksimi
Jipchagi doeeo neol gadwotgo
Hoksi ireon na ttaeme himdeureonni
Amu daedap eomneun neo
Babocheoreom wae
Neoreul jiuji mothae
Neon tteona beoryeonneunde, eum

Neoui nun, ko, ip
Nal manjideon ne songil
Jageun sontopkkaji da
Yeojeonhi neol neukkil su itjiman
Kkeojin bulkkotcheoreom
Tadeureo ga beorin
Uri sarang modu da
Neomu apeujiman ijen neol
Chueogira bureulge
(chueogira bureulge)


Saranghae-saranghaetjiman
Naega bujokaesseonna bwa
Hoksi uyeonirado
Hansunganmanirado neol
Bol su isseulkka
Haruharuga buranhaejyeo
Ne modeun ge galsurok huimihaejyeo
Sajin sogui neoneun wae haemalge unneunde
Uriege dagaoneun ibyeoreul moreun chae


Neol bonael su eomneun naui yoksimi
Jipchagi doeeo neol gadwotgo
Hoksi ireon na ttaeme himdeureonni
Amu daedap eomneun neol
Babocheoreom wae (babocheoreom wae)
Neoreul jiuji mothae (neoreul jiuji mothae)
Neon tteona beoryeonneunde, yeah

Neoui nun, ko, ip
Nal manjideon ne songil
Jageun sontopkkaji da
Yeojeonhi neol neukkil su itjiman
Kkeojin bulkkotcheoreom
Tadeureo ga beorin
Uri sarang modu da
Neomu apeujiman ijen neol
Chueogira bureulge


Namaneul barabodeon neoui kkaman nun
Hyanggiroun sumeul dameun neoui ko
Saranghae (saranghae)
Saranghae (saranghae)
Naege soksagideon geu ipsureul nan


Neoui nun (nun), ko (ko), ip
Nal manjideon ne songil (songil)
Jageun sontopkkaji da (modu da)
Yeojeonhi neol neukkil su itjiman (neol neukkil su itjiman)
Kkeojin bulkkotcheoreom (oh)
Tadeureo ga beorin (oh)
Uri sarang modu da
Neomu apeujiman ijen neol
Chueogira bureulge",2994171
96552,2061509,Slide,pop,Calvin Harris,2017,2733561,"{""Frank Ocean"",Migos}","
I might
Empty my bank account
And buy that boy with a pipe
Buy that boy with a pipe
I might, I might
Empty my bank account
And buy that boy with a pipe
Buy that boy with a pipe
I might


Do you slide on all your nights like this?
Do you try on all your nights like this? (I might)
Put some spotlight on the slide
Whatever comes, comes through clear
Do you slide on all your nights like this?
Do you try on all your nights like this? (I might)
Put some spotlight on the side
And whatever comes, comes through clear (Uh)

All this jewelry ain't no use when it's this dark
It's my favorite part, we see the lights, they got so far
It went too fast, we couldn't reach it with our arms
Wrist on a wrist, a link of charms, yeah
Laying, we're still a link apart
It's like we could die here all young
Like we could dye hair all blonde
If we could see in twenty twin
Twice we could see it 'til the end


Put that spotlight on her face (Spotlight)
Put that spotlight on her face (Ah, yeah)
We gon' pipe up and turn up (Pipe up)
We gon' light up and burn up (Burn up)
Mama too hot like a (Like what?)
Mama too hot like a furnace (Furnace)
I got a hundred G's in my Goyard (G's)
My diamonds gon' shine when the lights dark (Shine)
You and I take a ride down the boulevard (Yeah)
And your friends really wanna break us apart
Good lord


(Offset!) Good gracious
Starin' at my diamonds while I'm hoppin' out a spaceship
Need your information, take vacation to Malaysia (Info)
You my baby, the paparazzi flashin' crazy
She swallowed the bottle while I sit back and smoke gelato
Walk in my mansion, twenty thousand painting, Picasso
Bitches be dippin', dabbin' with niggas like a nacho
Took off her panties, diamonds dancin' like Rick Ricardo
She havin' it, went to college, workin' on her bachelor
I know you got a past, I got a past, that's in the back of us
Average, I'ma make a million on the average (M's)
I'm ridin' with no brain, bitch, I'm out of it (Skrr)

Do you slide on all your nights like this?
Do you try on all your nights like this? (I might)
Put some spotlight on the slide
Whatever comes, comes through clear
Do you slide on all your nights like this? (Yeah)
Do you try on all your nights like this? (Oh)
Put some spotlight on the side
And whatever comes, comes through clear (I might)


Empty my bank account (Ooh)
And buy that boy with a pipe (Ooh, yeah)
Buy that boy with a pipe (Come on, yeah)
I might, I might (Slide)
Empty my bank account (Ooh, slide)
And buy that boy with a pipe (Slide, yeah)
(Do you slide on all your nights like this?)
Buy that boy with a pipe
I might",2997826
96587,2062014,Something Just Like This,pop,The Chainsmokers & Coldplay,2017,3285377,{},"
I've been reading books of old
The legends and the myths
Achilles and his gold
Hercules and his gifts
Spider-Man's control
And Batman with his fists
And clearly I don't see myself upon that list


But she said, where d'you wanna go?
How much you wanna risk?
I'm not looking for somebody
With some superhuman gifts
Some superhero
Some fairytale bliss
Just something I can turn to
Somebody I can kiss
I want something just like this
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo, doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Oh, I want something just like this
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo, doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo

Oh, I want something just like this
I want something just like this


I've been reading books of old
The legends and the myths
The testaments they told
The moon and its eclipse
And Superman unrolls
A suit before he lifts
But I'm not the kind of person that it fits


She said, where d'you wanna go?
How much you wanna risk?
I'm not looking for somebody
With some superhuman gifts
Some superhero
Some fairytale bliss
Just something I can turn to
Somebody I can miss


I want something just like this
I want something just like this

Oh, I want something just like this
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo, doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Oh, I want something just like this
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo, doo
Doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo


Where d'you wanna go?
How much you wanna risk?
I'm not looking for somebody
With some superhuman gifts
Some superhero
Some fairytale bliss
Just something I can turn to
Somebody I can kiss
I want something just like this


Oh, I want something just like this
Oh, I want something just like this
Oh, I want something just like this",2998843
96601,2062280,Surat Cinta Untuk Starla,pop,Virgoun,2016,1199791,{},"


Ku tuliskan kenangan tentang
Caraku menemukan dirimu
Tentang apa yang membuatku mudah
Berikan hatiku padamu


Takkan habis sejuta lagu
Untuk menceritakan cantikmu
'kan teramat panjang puisi
'tuk menyuratkan cinta ini


Telah habis sudah cinta ini
Tak lagi tersisa untuk dunia
Karena telah ku habiskan
Sisa cintaku hanya untukmu


Aku pernah berpikir tentang
Hidupku tanpa ada dirimu
Dapatkah lebih indah dari
Yang ku jalani sampai kini

Aku selalu bermimpi tentang
Indah hari tua bersamamu
Tetap cantik rambut panjangmu
Meskipun nanti tak hitam lagi


Bila habis sudah waktu ini
Tak lagi berpijak pada dunia
Telah aku habiskan sisa hidupku
Hanya untukmu


Dan telah habis sudah cinta ini
Tak lagi tersisa untuk dunia
Karena telah ku habiskan sisa cintaku
Hanya untukmu
Untukmu
Hidup dan matiku..


Bila musim berganti
Sampai waktu terhenti
Walau dunia membenci
Ku kan tetap di sini

Bila habis sudah waktu ini
Tak lagi berpijak pada dunia
Telah aku habiskan sisa hidupku
Hanya untukmu


Telah habis sudah cinta ini
Tak lagi tersisa untuk dunia
Karena telah ku habiskan sisa cintaku
Hanya untukmu


Karena telah ku habiskan sisa cintaku
Hanya untukmu





I wrote about memories
On how I found you
About what made it easy
Giving you my heart


A million songs, won't be enough
To tell the story about your beauty
This poem will extremely long
To tell about this love

This love runs out already
No longer left for the world
Because I have spent the rest of my love
Only for you


I ever thought about
How my life would be without you
Could it be more beautiful
Then I had lived until now?


I always dream about
How fine the old days with you
Your long hair still remains beautiful
Although it won't stay black


If the time runs out already
No longer rests to the world
I have spent the rest of my life
Just for you


If this love runs out already
No longer left to the world
Because I have spent the rest of my love
Only for you
For you...


My life, and my death
When the seasons changed
Until the time stops
Even though the world hates
I will stay, right here


When the time runs out already
No longer rests on the world
Because I have spent the rest of my love
Only for you


This love runs out already
No longer left for the world
Because I have spent the rest of my love
Only for you


Because I have spent the rest of my love
Only for you",2999185
96624,2062488,Comin Out Strong,rap,Future,2017,1275659,"{""The Weeknd""}","
High Klassified な音楽
I got the jewels flooded from Ben, baby!


Like a nigga don't dance, but he make moves
They fuck around, now a nigga gotta shame you
I'm shameless, I be rockin' all my chains too
They told me, ""Boy I think the money's startin' to change you""
Lord save you, Lord save you
'Member runnin' through the city in the same shoes
Now I'm gunnin' in the Benz and the Range too
I'm on point, know a nigga never take two
They said I couldn't reach Mars, so I turned to a star
Now I might have fucked around, might have raised up the bar
Now I'm talkin' cash, talk cash all in my palm
My nigga Cash said, ""Watch what they do for the ones""
I know she wanna be poppin' all over the 'Gram
When the cameras come out, wanna hold my hand
Must be out of your mind, do you know who I am?
Man, you're killin' my vibe, do you know who I am?
Oh, yeah

They take my kindness for weakness
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out strong
Take my kindness for weakness
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out..


I might end up with your ho if I take one (Still comin')
Now days if they don't have a story, they gon' make one (Still comin')
Last night I gave my heart to a fake one (Still comin')
I done end up on the blogs with the wrong one (Still comin')
It's hard to tell the real stories from the fake ones (Yeah, comin')
'Cause now days if they don't got it they'll make one (Still comin')
The only time I feel alive when I take (Still comin')
I wanna vent but I know it ain't safe (Still comin')
Must be out of your mind, do you know who I am? (Do you know who I am?)
Used to hit it from behind, do you know who I am? (Never say my name)
I can't give you all my time, do you know who I am? (Give you my t-)
Make you fall in love tonight, must don't know who I am, I am
I showed you a million, no videos (No videos)
I opened up Bentley doors, I invented doors (I invented)
Bodies droppin' and we duckin' the law
If you the one to take the blame, you can't say what you saw, no

They take my kindness for weakness
Still comin' out strong (Yeah, comin')
Still comin' out strong (Yeah, comin')
Still comin' out strong
Take my kindness for weakness
Still comin' out strong (Yeah, comin')
Still comin' out strong (Still comin')
Still comin' out..


Pluto don't dance, but I make moves (Keep comin')
We fucked around, now a nigga gotta shame you (Keep comin')
Shameless, I've been rockin' all my chains too (Keep comin')
Told me, ""Boy I think the money startin' to change you""
Lord save you, Lord save you
They might pick you up, just throw you down with the fall
You must not know who I am
You must not know who I am
I pour champagne on the ground
I pour champagne on the ground
My brother Casino said you wasn't Freebandz (Freebandz)
And at the time I couldn't see what he was sayin' (He was sayin')
You turned your back, I should have never gave you chances (Gave you chances)
I call for loyalty, she didn't ever answer
I'm a boss, I'ma make my own family (La familia)
You're with my ex, while I'm with different color candies
(So familiar)
I got Jenny, I got Tammy, I got Sandy
You try to sneak and leave 'em then I leave you stranded
Be honest to me

They take my kindness for weakness
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out strong (Be honest to me)
Take my kindness for weakness
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out strong
Still comin' out...


Kindness, she lie
Still comin', lie
Boss, fuck around, boss
Kindness
Down, like a nigga, she lie
Kindness, she lie
Kindness, oh",2999435
96741,2063773,​bellyache,pop,Billie Eilish,2017,1265616,{},"
Mind
Mind


Sittin' all alone
Mouth full of gum
In the driveway
My friends aren't far
In the back of my car
Lay their bodies


Where's my mind?
Where's my mind?


They'll be here pretty soon
Lookin' through my room
For the money
I'm bitin' my nails
I'm too young to go to jail
It's kinda funny

Where's my mind?
Where's my mind?
Where's my mind?
Where's my mind?


Maybe it's in the gutter
Where I left my lover
What an expensive fake
My V is for Vendetta
Thought that I'd feel better
But now I got a bellyache
(Mind)


Everything I do
The way I wear my noose
Like a necklace
I wanna make 'em scared
Like I could be anywhere
Like I'm reckless


I lost my mind
I don't mind
Where's my mind?
Where's my mind?

Maybe it's in the gutter
Where I left my lover
What an expensive fake
My V is for Vendetta
Thought that I'd feel better
But now I got a bellyache
(Bellyache, bellyache, bellyache, bellyache
Bellyache, bellyache)
Maybe it's in the gutter
Where I left my lover
What an expensive fake
My V is for Vendetta
Thought that I'd feel better
But now I got a bellyache",3001600
96862,2065401,XO TOUR Llif3,rap,Lil Uzi Vert,2017,8351197,{},"
Are you alright?
I'm alright, I'm quite alright
And my money's right
8... (Yeah)
Countin' them bands
All way to the top 'til they be fallin' over
(Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Countin' them bands
On my way to the top 'til we fallin' over


I don't really care if you cry
On the real, you shoulda never lied
Shoulda saw the way she looked me in my eyes
She said, ""Baby, I am not afraid to die""
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge

Phantom that's all red, inside all white
Like somethin' you ride a sled down, I just want that head
My Brittany got mad, I'm barely her man now
Everybody got the same swag now
Watch the way that I tear it down
Stackin' my bands all the way to the top
All the way 'til my bands fallin' over
Every time that you leave your spot
Your girlfriend call me like, ""Come on over!""
I like the way that she treat me
Gon' leave you, won't leave me, I call it that Casanova
She say I'm insane, yeah
I might blow my brain out (Hey)
Xanny, help the pain, yeah
Please, Xanny, make it go away
I'm committed, not addicted, but it keep control of me
All the pain, now I can't feel it
I swear that it's slowin' me, yeah


I don't really care if you cry
On the real, you shoulda never lied
Saw the way she looked me in my eyes
She said, ""I am not afraid to die"" (Yeah)
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge (Yeah)
All my friends are dead, yeah, ooh
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead, yeah
All my friends are dead, yeah

That is not your swag, I swear you fake hard
Now these niggas wanna take my cadence
Rain on 'em, thunderstorm, rain on 'em (Ooh, yeah)
Medicine, lil' nigga, take some (Yeh, yeh)
Fast car, NASCAR, race on 'em
In the club, ain't got no ones, then we would beg them
Clothes from overseas, got the racks and they all C-Notes
You is not a G though
Lookin' at you stackin' all your money, it all green though
I was countin' that and these all twenties, that's a G-roll


She say, ""You're the worst, you're the worst""
I cannot die because this my universe


I don't really care if you cry
On the real, you shoulda never lied
Shoulda saw the way she looked me in my eyes
She said, ""Baby, I am not afraid to die""
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge
All my friends are dead
Push me to the edge",3003630
96894,2066033,Green Light,pop,Lorde,2017,1016734,{},"
I do my makeup in somebody else's car
We order different drinks at the same bars
I know about what you did and I wanna scream the truth
She thinks you love the beach, you're such a damn liar
(Liar, liar, liar, liar, liar, liar, liar, liar)


Well, those great whites, they have big teeth
Hope they bite you
Thought you said that you would always be in love
But you're not in love no more
Did it frighten you
How we kissed when we danced on the light up floor?
On the light up floor


But I hear sounds in my mind
Brand new sounds in my mind
But honey, I'll be seein' you 'ever I go
But honey, I'll be seein' you down every road
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it

'Cause honey, I'll come get my things, but I can't let go
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
Oh, I wish I could get my things and just let go
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it


Sometimes I wake up in a different bedroom
I whisper things, the city sings 'em back to you


Well, those rumours, they have big teeth
Hope they bite you
Thought you said that you would always be in love
But you're not in love no more
Did it frighten you
How we kissed when we danced on the light up floor?
On the light up floor


But I hear sounds in my mind
Brand new sounds in my mind
But honey, I'll be seein' you 'ever I go
But honey, I'll be seein' you down every road
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it

'Cause honey, I'll come get my things, but I can't let go
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
Oh, honey, I'll come get my things, but I can't let go
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
Yes, honey, I'll come get my things, but I can't let go
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
Oh, I wish I could get my things and just let go
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it


I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it
I'm waiting for it, that green light, I want it",3004720
96898,2066146,Im the One,rap,DJ Khaled,2017,5420252,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Justin Bieber"",""Chance the Rapper"",Quavo}","
We the Best Music
Another one!
DJ Khaled


Yeah, you're lookin' at the truth
The money never lie, no
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one
Early mornin' in the Dawn
Know you wanna ride now (Let's ride, let's ride!)
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one, yeah
And you sick of all those other imitators
Don't let the only real one intimidate ya
See you watchin', don't run outta time now
I'm the one, yeah


Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one
Yeah, yeah!

Quavo! I'm the one that hit that same spot (Hit it)
She the one that bring them rain drops (Rain drops)
We go back, remember criss-cross and hopscotch? (Hopscotch)
You the one that hold me down when the block's hot (Hot)
I make your dreams come true when you wake up (Dream)
And your look's just the same without no make-up (Bad)
Had to pull up on your mama, see what you're made of (Mama)
Ain't gotta worry 'bout 'em commas 'cause my cake up (Cake)
You can run inside my life from that fame bus (Skrrt)
'Cause I promise, when we step out you'll be famous (Yeah)
Modern day Bonnie and Clyde what they named us (Why?)
'Cause when we pull up-brt-brt!-all angles


Yeah, you're lookin' at the truth
The money never lie, no
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one
Early mornin' in the Dawn
Know you wanna ride now (Let's ride, let's ride!)
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one, yeah
And you sick of all those other imitators
Don't let the only real one intimidate ya
See you watchin', don't run outta time now
I'm the one, yeah

Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one
Okay though


Uh, she beat her face up with that new Chanel
She like the price, she see the ice, it make her coochie melt
When I met her in the club I asked her who she felt
Then she went and put that booty on that Gucci belt
We don't got no label
She say she want bottles, she ain't got no table
She don't got no bed frame, she don't got no tables
We just watchin' Netflix, she ain't got no cable, okay though
Plug, plug, plug, I'm the plug for her
She want a nigga that pull her hair and hold the door for her
Baby, that's only me, bitch, it okay with me
Baby, okay, okay though


Yeah, you're lookin' at the truth
The money never lie, no
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one
Early mornin' in the Dawn
Know you wanna ride now (Let's ride, let's ride!)
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one, yeah
And you sick of all those other imitators
Don't let the only real one intimidate ya
See you watchin', don't run outta time now
I'm the one, yeah

Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one


Lookin' for the one?
Well, bitch, you're lookin' at the one
I'm the best yet, and yet my best is yet to come
'Cause I've been lookin' for somebody
Not just any fuckin' body
Don't make me catch a body
That's for any and everybody
Oh my God, she hit me up all day, get no response
Bitch, you blow my high
That's like turnin' gold to bronze, roll my eyes
And when she on the molly, she a zombie
She think we Clyde and Bonnie
But it's more like Whitney and Bobby
God, forgive me! Tunechi F finessin', I'm a legend
Straight up out the Crescent
Fly your bae down for the Essence
For the record I knew Khaled when that boy was spinnin' records
Mula Gang, winnin' record
I'm just flexin' on my exes, oh God


Yeah, you're lookin' at the truth
The money never lie, no
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one
Early mornin' in the Dawn
Know you wanna ride now (Let's ride, let's ride!)
I'm the one, yeah, I'm the one, yeah
And you sick of all those other imitators
Don't let the only real one intimidate ya
See you watchin', don't run outta time now
I'm the one, yeah


Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the one
Oh-eh-oh-oh-oh, eh-oh
I'm the only one


(Another one)
Don't you know, girl? Don't you know, girl?
I am the one for you (I'm the one)
Yeah, I'm the one
Don't you know, girl? Don't you know, girl?
I am the one for you (I'm the one)
Yeah, I'm the one
Don't you know, girl? Don't you know, girl?
I am the one for you (I'm the one)
Yeah, I'm the one
Don't you know, girl? Don't you know, girl?
I am the one for you (I'm the one)
Yeah, I'm the one",3004837
96943,2066739,Love Scars,rap,Trippie Redd,2016,1285905,{},"
Ayy
Lil 14, yeah


You used to say you in love
I used to say that shit back
Takin' that shit from the heart
Now look where the fuck where we at
Girl, you got me just going out bad
Love scars and you got me real sad
Thinkin' that you had a past
I was hoping that shit was gon' last, oh


Shawty, I just want your love for a minute
I be captain, baby, you can be lieutenant
Swear I lose my mind every time that I'm in it
You won't get a dime, nah, no, not mine


Spinach, spinach, I been here for a minute, minute, ayy
Playin' games with me, shawty, this is not no scrimmage, scrimmage
Swear that I did it, did it, I do it, I does this, I does it, ayy
Shout out my bloody, my whoadie, lil' nigga, and shout out my bousins, woah
I swear I'm bloodied up B's, never throwin' up C's, ayy
These niggas is disgusting, something like the disease
Your bitch pussy nasty as fuck, she got a little bit of yeast, huh
Gettin' all the money, count it up, countin' all my green, woah-ayy
Girl, you got me going out bad
Girl, you got me real sad
Devil in me make me mad
You used to say you in love, yeah, hey
Shawty, you so fucked up
You used to say you in love
You got me so fucked up
Shawty, I don't need you anyway
I just sit back in my Balenciagas, sippin' that lemonade
Mixin' it with Hennessy
Dominating any enemy",3005836
97024,2067873,Candy Paint,rap,Post Malone,2017,1189230,{},"
Yeah, yeah
Mmm, ayy


Candy paint with the white on top
Lambo doors are the oo-op drop
If you busy plottin' on what I got
Kick in your door, that's SWAT, you thot
Hundred thousand dollars on the table top
Half price my whip, same price my watch
Got no jumper, but I ball a lot
Bitch, I'm young Stoney, I do what I want
Candy paint with the white on top (Skrrt)
Lambo doors are the oo-op drop (Drop)
If you busy plottin' on what I got
Kick in your door, that's SWAT, you thot (Pop)
Hundred thousand dollars on the table top
Half price my whip, same price my watch (Bling)
Got no jumper, but I ball a lot (Swish)
Bitch, I'm young Stoney, I do what I want

Didn't know that was your girl when she gave me top (Yuh)
Kicked her out the Rolls said, ""Thanks a lot""
Goddamn, I love paper like I'm Michael Scott (Yeah)
I can do things that your man cannot (Yeah)
Slide boy comin' down, damn, I'm hot (Hot)
Everybody say that I gotta be stopped (Stopped)
Even though my final form ain't unlocked (Locked)
I'm so ahead of you muhfuckas'
How you comprehend what you ain't understandin'?
Count a hundred bands and I watch it vanish
Diamonds going crazy like they on the dance floor
Got a lot of ass, nothin' I can't handle


Flavor lasts forever, you should try a sample (Goddamn)
Baby, I'm the boss like I'm Tony Danza (Tony Danza)
Everybody tryna tell me what I stand for
But you don't fuckin' know me, homie, you don't want war (Ayy)


Candy paint with the white on top
Lambo doors are the oo-op drop
If you busy plottin' on what I got
Kick in your door, that's SWAT, you thot
Hundred thousand dollars on the table top
Half price my whip, same price my watch
Got no jumper, but I ball a lot (Ayy, ayy)
Bitch, I'm young Stoney, I do what I want (Ayy, ayy)
Candy paint with the white on top (Yeah)
Lambo doors are the oo-op drop (Drop, drop)
If you busy plottin' on what I got
Kick in your door, that's SWAT, you thot (Pop, pop, pop, pop)
Hundred thousand dollars on the table top (Woo)
Half price my whip, same price my watch (Yeah)
Got no jumper, but I ball a lot (Swish)
Bitch, I'm young Stoney, I do what I want

I've been rollin' twenty ash, hit the road (Woo)
Hit the switch up the suicide doors (Damn)
We already know you vanished though (Ooh)
Hit my momma when I ride in that, oh
All these muhfuckas' so false with me (Yah)
If your money funny, don't talk to me (Nah)
I know there ain't shit that you could offer me (No)
Take a second if you think about crossin' me


It lasts forever, you should try a sample (Goddamn)
Baby, I'm the boss like I'm Tony Danza (Tony Danza)
Everybody tryna tell me what I stand for (What I stand for)
But you don't fuckin' know me, homie, you don't want war (You don't want war)


Candy paint with the white on top
Lambo doors are the oo-op drop
If you busy plottin' on what I got
Kick in your door, that's SWAT, you thot
Hundred thousand dollars on the table top
Half price my whip, same price my watch
Got no jumper, but I ball a lot
Bitch, I'm young Stoney, I do what I want
Candy paint with the white on top
Lambo doors are the oo-op drop (Oh-ooh-ooh)
If you busy plottin' on what I got (Oh-ooh)
Kick in your door, that's SWAT, you thot
Hundred thousand dollars on the table top (Oh-ooh)
Half price my whip, same price my watch (Oh-ooh-ooh)
Got no jumper, but I ball a lot (Oh-ooh)
Bitch, I'm young Stoney, I do what I want",3007474
97069,2068322,Feel It Still,rock,Portugal. The Man,2017,1380112,{},"
Can't keep my hands to myself
Think I'll dust 'em off, put 'em back up on the shelf
In case my little baby girl is in need
Am I coming out of left field?


Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now
I been feeling it since 1966, now
Might be over now, but I feel it still
Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now
Let me kick it like it's 1986, now
Might be over now, but I feel it still


Got another mouth to feed
Leave it with a baby sitter, mama, call the grave digger
Gone with the fallen leaves
Am I coming out of left field?


Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now
I been feeling it since 1966, now
Might've had your fill, but you feel it still
Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now
Let me kick it like it's 1986, now
Might be over now, but I feel it still

We could fight a war for peace
(Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now)
Give in to that easy living
Goodbye to my hopes and dreams
Start flipping for my enemies
We could wait until the walls come down
(Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now)
It's time to give a little to the kids in the middle
But, oh until it falls won't bother me


Is it coming?
Is it coming?
Is it coming?
Is it coming?
Is it coming?
Is it coming back?


Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, yeah
Your love is an abyss for my heart to eclipse, now
Might be over now, but I feel it still


Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now
I've been feeling it since 1966, now
Might be over now, but I feel it still
Ooh woo, I'm a rebel just for kicks, now
Let me kick it like it's 1986, now
Might be over now, but I feel it still
Might've had your fill, but I feel it still",3008446
97270,2071344,XXX.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,5149034,{U2},"
America
God bless you if it's good to ya
America, please take my hand
Can you help me underst-
New Kung Fu Kenny!


Throw a steak off the ark to a pool full of sharks
He'll take it
Leave him in the wilderness with a sworn nemesis
He'll make it (He'll make it)
Take the gratitude from him, I bet he'll show you somethin'
Woah (Woah)
I chip a nigga lil' bit of nothin'
I chip a nigga lil' bit of nothin'
I chip a nigga lil' bit of nothin'
I chip a nigga, then throw the blower in his lap
Walk myself to the court like, ""Bitch, I did that!,"" X-rated
Johnny don't wanna go to school no mo', no mo'
Johnny said books ain't cool no mo' (No mo')
Johnny wanna be a rapper like his big cousin
Johnny caught a body yesterday out hustlin'
God bless America, you know we all love him

Yesterday, I got a call, like, from my dog, like 101
Said they killed his only son because of insufficient funds
He was sobbin', he was mobbin', way belligerent and drunk
Talkin' out his head, philosophin' on what the Lord had done
He said: ""K-Dot, can you pray for me? It been a fucked up day for me
I know that you anointed, show me how to overcome.""
He was lookin' for some closure, hopin' I could bring him closer
To the spiritual, my spirit do know better, but I told him
""I can't sugarcoat the answer for you, this is how I feel:
If somebody kill my son, that mean somebody gettin' killed.""
Tell me what you do for love, loyalty, and passion of
All the memories collected, moments you could never touch
I wait in front a nigga's spot and watch him hit his block
I catch a nigga leavin' service if that's all I got
I chip a nigga, then throw the blower in his lap
Walk myself to the court like, ""Bitch, I did that!""
Ain't no Black Power when your baby killed by a coward
I can't even keep the peace, don't you fuck with one of ours
It be murder in the street, it be bodies in the hour
Ghetto bird be on the street, paramedics on the dial
Let somebody touch my momma, touch my sister, touch my woman
Touch my daddy, touch my niece, touch my nephew, touch my brother
You should chip a nigga, then throw the blower in his lap
Matter fact, I'm 'bout to speak at this convention, call you back-

Alright, kids, we're gonna talk about gun control
(Pray for me) Damn!


It's not a place
This country is to me a sound
Of drum and bass
You close your eyes to look around


Hail Mary, Jesus and Joseph
The great American flag is wrapped in drag with explosives
Compulsive disorder, sons and daughters
Barricaded blocks and borders-look what you taught us
It's murder on my street, your street, back streets, Wall Street
Corporate offices, banks, employees, and bosses with
Homicidal thoughts; Donald Trump's in office
We lost Barack and promised to never doubt him again
But is America honest, or do we bask in sin?
Pass the gin, I mix it with American blood
Then bash him in, you Crippin' or you married to Blood?
I'll aks again-oops, accident
It's nasty when you set us up then roll the dice, then bet us up
You overnight the big rifles, then tell Fox to be scared of us
Gang members or terrorists, et cetera, et cetera
America's reflections of me, that's what a mirror does

It's not a place
This country is to me a sound
Of drum and bass
You close your eyes to look ar-",3047142
97274,2071360,FEAR.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,2082277,{},"
Poverty's paradise
I don't think I could find a way to make it on this earth
(I've been hungry all my life)


What's up, family?
Yeah, it's your cousin Carl, man, just givin' you a call, man
I know you been havin' a lot on yo' mind lately
And I know you feel like, you know
People ain't been prayin' for you
But you have to understand this, man, that we are a cursed people Deuteronomy 28:28 says, ""The Lord shall smite thee with madness And blindness, and astonishment of heart""
See, family, that's why you feel like you feel
Like you got a chip on your shoulder
Until you follow His commandments, you gonna feel that way...


Why God, why God do I gotta suffer?
Pain in my heart carry burdens full of struggle
Why God, why God do I gotta bleed?
Every stone thrown at you restin' at my feet
Why God, why God do I gotta suffer?
Earth is no more, won't you burn this muh'fucka?
I don't think I could find a way to make it on this earth
Akcuf'hum siht nrub uoy t'now ,erom on si htraE
Reffus attog I od doG yhw ,doG yhW
Teef ym ta 'nitser uoy ta nworht enots yrevE
Deelb attog I od doG yhw ,doG yhW
Elggurts fo lluf snedrub yrrac traeh ym ni niaP
Reffus attog I od doG yhw ,doG yhW
Teef ym ta 'nitser uoy ta nworht enots yrevE

I beat yo' ass, keep talkin' back
I beat yo' ass, who bought you that?
You stole it, I beat yo' ass if you say that game is broken
I beat yo' ass if you jump on my couch
I beat yo' ass if you walk in this house
With tears in your eyes, runnin' from Poo Poo and Prentice
Go back outside, I beat yo' ass, lil' nigga
That homework better be finished, I beat yo' ass
Your teachers better not be bitchin' 'bout you in class
That pizza better not be wasted, you eat it all
That TV better not be loud if you got it on
Them Jordans better not get dirty when I just bought 'em
Better not hear 'bout you humpin' on Keisha's daughter
Better not hear you got caught up
I beat yo' ass, you better not run to your father
I beat yo' ass, you know my patience runnin' thin
I got buku payments to make
County building's on my ass, tryna take my food stamps away
I beat yo' ass if you tell them social workers he live here
I beat yo' ass if I beat yo' ass twice and you still here
Seven years old, think you run this house by yourself?
Nigga, you gon' fear me if you don't fear no one else


If I could smoke fear away, I'd roll that mothafucker up
And then I'd take two puffs
I'm high now (Huh), I'm high now (Huh)
I'm high now (Huh), I'm high now (Huh)
Life's a bitch, pull them panties to the side now
(Pull them panties to the side now)
I don't think I could find a way to make it on this earth

I'll prolly die anonymous, I'll prolly die with promises
I'll prolly die walkin' back home from the candy house
I'll prolly die because these colors are standin' out
I'll prolly die because I ain't know Demarcus was snitchin'
I'll prolly die at these house parties, fuckin' with bitches
I'll prolly die from witnesses leavin' me falsed accused
I'll prolly die from thinkin' that me and your hood was cool
Or maybe die from pressin' the line, actin' too extra
Or maybe die because these smokers are more than desperate
I'll prolly die from one of these bats and blue badges
Body-slammed on black and white paint, my bones snappin'
Or maybe die from panic or die from bein' too lax
Or die from waitin' on it, die 'cause I'm movin' too fast
I'll prolly die tryna buy weed at the apartments
I'll prolly die tryna defuse two homies arguin'
I'll prolly die 'cause that's what you do when you're 17
All worries in a hurry, I wish I controlled things


If I could smoke fear away, I'd roll that mothafucker up
And then I'd take two puffs
(I've been hungry all my life)
I'm high now (Huh), I'm high now (Huh)
I'm high now (Huh), I'm high now (Huh)
Life's a bitch, pull them panties to the side now
(Pull them panties to the side now)
Now

When I was 27, I grew accustomed to more fear
Accumulated 10 times over throughout the years
My newfound life made all of me magnified
How many accolades do I need to block denial?
The shock value of my success put bolts in me
All this money, is God playin' a joke on me?
Is it for the moment, and will he see me as Job?
Take it from me and leave me worse than I was before?
At 27, my biggest fear was losin' it all
Scared to spend money, had me sleepin' from hall to hall
Scared to go back to Section 8 with my mama stressin'
30 shows a month and I still won't buy me no Lexus
What is an advisor? Somebody that's holdin' my checks
Just to fuck me over and put my finances in debt?
I read a case about Rihanna's accountant and wondered
How did the Bad Girl feel when she looked at them numbers?
The type of shit'll make me flip out and just kill somethin'
Drill somethin', get ill and fill ratchets with a lil' somethin'
I practiced runnin' from fear, guess I had some good luck
At 27 years old, my biggest fear was bein' judged
How they look at me reflect on myself, my family, my city
What they say 'bout me reveal if my reputation would miss me
What they see from me would trickle down generations in time
What they hear from me would make 'em highlight my simplest lines


I'm talkin' fear, fear of losin' creativity
I'm talkin' fear, fear of missin' out on you and me
I'm talkin' fear, fear of losin' loyalty from pride
'Cause my DNA won't let me involve in the light of God
I'm talkin' fear, fear that my humbleness is gone
I'm talkin' fear, fear that love ain't livin' here no more
I'm talkin' fear, fear that it's wickedness or weakness
Fear, whatever it is, both is distinctive
Fear, what happens on Earth stays on Earth
And I can't take these feelings with me, so hopefully, they disperse
Within fourteen tracks, carried out over wax
Searchin' for resolutions until somebody get back
Fear, what happens on Earth stays on Earth
And I can't take these feelings with me, so hopefully they disperse
Within fourteen tracks, carried out over wax
Wonderin' if I'm livin' through fear or livin' through rap
Damn


God damn you, God damn me
God damn us, God damn we
God damn us all


Verse 2 says, ""You only have I known of all the families of the Earth, therefore I will punish you for all your iniquities""
So until we come back to these commandments
Until you come back to these commandments
We gonna feel this way, we gonna be under this curse
Because He said He's gonna punish us
The so-called Blacks, Hispanics, and Native American Indians
Are the true children of Israel
We are the Israelites, according to the Bible
The children of Israel
He's gonna punish us for our iniquities, for our disobedience
Because we chose to follow other gods
That man chastens his son, so the Lord, thy God, chasten thee
So, just like you chasten your own son, He's gonna chasten you
Because He loves you, so that's why we get chastised
That's why we're in the position that we're in
Until we come back to these laws, statutes, and commandments
And do what the Lord says, these curses is gonna be upon us
We gonna be at a lower state in this life that we live
Here, in today, in the United States of America
I love you, family, and I pray for you
God bless you
Shalom",3047144
97304,2071790,Бар 2 лесбухи ‘Two Lesbos’ Bar,rap,Jillzay,2017,1318513,"{Benz,""Скриптонит (Scriptonite)"",Truwer,104,Cheenah,""MAGG \\'98"",Kolyaolya}","


Это жизнь молодых поэтов, жизнь молодых боссов
Братья рядом, братья в Moscow, кайф на связи, вeдь он свой в доску
(При видe нас) Они сияют вмиг и распускают косы
Я нe хочу их видeть завтра и я нe буду дарить им розы (Ни ху-я!)
(Никакой любви) Никаких отношeний (М-м)
Дeвочки на раз - они словно мишeни (Угу)
(Никакой любви) Расставаний, прощeний
Эти суки хотят тусоваться (Эй, мeлкий, отшeй их)
Всe эти суки вытворяют похлeщe топа избранных фильмов
Что ты видeл в подростковый пeриод, но с тeх врeмён ты всё так жe наивeн
В ожидании куска, но объeдки рядом - и их нe прикрыли
И к чeму стрeмится самый сок? (Ты знаeшь) Вeдь наша дыра - холодильник
Чтобы пригрeли так, как в Tor'e ты по сeти
Но всё что eсть - это грязь, ты в нeй по уши, осмотрись
Всe гадюшники города ждут-врeмeнят-ожидают тeбя в пeрспeктивe
И от бeз выхода крутишь-вeртишь вокруг нас, будто на грилe, хули, кадилe
Гдe твой огромный зад? Ввeрх-вниз (Подморгни им)
Мы знаeм, что он хочeт - оставлять твоeго парня забытым (Да-а), ты вся в моём распоряжeнии (А)
Гдe твой огромный зад? Ввeрх-вниз (Ввeрх-вниз). Вeсь в пивe
А твоя подра валит домой, вeдь eё кости нe в нашeм стилe

Бар «Двe лeсбухи», пырло, гашик, ящик «Миллeр»
Бармeн, прогоняeм выпить, на сeгодня ты их киллeр, убeй
Убeй их за мой счёт, eщё, отправь их за мой стол, eщё
Пока суки втихаря в уборной дeлят колeсо (Да-да)


Так много сук за прeсс сдeлаeт всё, что придумал мой кeнт (Их лeс)
Так много сук на вeс слeтаeтся вмиг (Толкая всeх сук вокруг)
Так много разных лeсб при видe котлeт могут забыть подруг
Так много разных мeст, но нашe любимоe - бар «Двe лeсбухи»


Я люблю жeнщин и их обилиe (Угу), eсть варик - я зову eё мобильная (Угу)
Есть другой: умeeт как на DVD, но она на сeмь из дeсяти, eсли ты пьёшь до утра, то зови eё
Я чeстeн с ними, как ни с кeм другим, в путeшeствии - джин, тропы и круги
От больших проблeм, как филe у Ким, тeбя ждёт твой кeнт, воскрeсай и жги
Она нe спeша грeeт танцпол, пацы тут и там с нeю понeслись
Она ловит свист, она ловит пол, я eё тяну нe на пару слов
Такжe хороша в майкe босиком, вижу этот взгляд, глаза ввeрх-вниз
Она ловит свист, она ловит пол, она сука та eщё, но мнe похуй


(Дeвять, дeвять)
Дeвять сучeк у моих ног, 36-6-3 на связи
36-6-3 на связи, всe как будто Лука Брази
Мои сёстры нe святыe, мои дeньги быстрeй «Ламбо»
Мои дeньги всe цвeтныe, в этих сучках всeго полно
Дeвять сучeк у моих ног, 36-6-3 на связи
36-6-3 на связи, всe как будто Лука Брази (У)
Мои сёстры нe святыe, мои дeньги быстрeй «Ламбо»
Мои дeньги всe цвeтныe, в этих сучках всeго полно

(Бар, бар, бар)
Бар «Двe лeсбухи», пырло, гашик, ящик «Миллeр»
Бармeн, прогоняeм выпить, на сeгодня ты их киллeр (Убeй)
Убeй их за мой счёт (Ещё), отправь их за мой стол (Ещё)
Пока суки втихаря в уборной дeлят колeсо (Да-да)


Так много сук за прeсс сдeлаeт всё, что придумал мой кeнт (Их лeс)
Так много сук на вeс слeтаeтся вмиг (Толкая всeх сук вокруг)
Так много разных лeсб при видe котлeт могут забыть подруг
Так много разных мeст, но нашe любимоe - бар «Двe лeсбухи»",3014630
97329,2072109,New Rules,pop,Dua Lipa,2017,4501334,{},"
One, one, one, one, one


Talkin' in my sleep at night, makin' myself crazy
(Out of my mind, out of my mind)
Wrote it down and read it out, hopin' it would save me
(Too many times, too many times)


My love, he makes me feel like nobody else, nobody else
But my love, he doesn't love me, so I tell myself, I tell myself


One: Don't pick up the phone
You know he's only callin' 'cause he's drunk and alone
Two: Don't let him in
You'll have to kick him out again
Three: Don't be his friend
You know you're gonna wake up in his bed in the morning
And if you're under him, you ain't gettin' over him

I got new rules, I count 'em
I got new rules, I count 'em
I gotta tell them to myself
I got new rules, I count 'em
I gotta tell them to myself


I keep pushin' forwards, but he keeps pullin' me backwards
(Nowhere to turn, no way)
(Nowhere to turn, no)
Now I'm standin' back from it, I finally see the pattern
(I never learn, I never learn)


But my love, he doesn't love me, so I tell myself, I tell myself
I do, I do, I do


One: Don't pick up the phone
You know he's only callin' 'cause he's drunk and alone
Two: Don't let him in
You'll have to kick him out again
Three: Don't be his friend
You know you're gonna wake up in his bed in the morning
And if you're under him, you ain't gettin' over him

I got new rules, I count 'em
I got new rules, I count 'em
I gotta tell them to myself
I got new rules, I count 'em
I gotta tell them to myself


Practice makes perfect
I'm still tryna learn it by heart (I got new rules, I count 'em)
Eat, sleep, and breathe it
Rehearse and repeat it, 'cause I (I got new)


One: Don't pick up the phone (yeah)
You know he's only callin' 'cause he's drunk and alone (alone)
Two: Don't let him in (uh-ooh)
You'll have to kick him out again (again)
Three: Don't be his friend
You know you're gonna wake up in his bed in the morning
And if you're under him, you ain't gettin' over him


I got new rules, I count 'em
I got new rules, I count 'em
(Whoa-ooh, whoa-ooh, whoa)
I gotta tell them to myself
I got new rules, I count 'em
(Baby, you know I count 'em)
I gotta tell them to myself

Don't let him in, don't let him in
Don't, don't, don't, don't
Don't be his friend, don't be his friend
Don't, don't, don't, don't
Don't let him in, don't let him in
Don't, don't, don't, don't
Don't be his friend, don't be his friend
Don't, don't, don't, don't
You're gettin' over him",3013669
97490,2074472,Liability,pop,Lorde,2017,1084197,{},"
Go for it
One, two


Baby really hurt me, crying in the taxi
He don't wanna know me
Says he made the big mistake of dancing in my storm
Says it was poison
So I guess I'll go home
Into the arms of the girl that I love
The only love I haven't screwed up
She's so hard to please, but she's a forest fire
I do my best to meet her demands, play at romance
We slow dance in the living room
But all that a stranger would see
Is one girl swaying alone, stroking a cheek


They say, ""You're a little much for me
You're a liability
You're a little much for me""
So they pull back, make other plans
I understand, I'm a liability
Get you wild, make you leave
I'm a little much for e-a-na-na-na, everyone

The truth is I am a toy that people enjoy
Till all of the tricks don't work anymore
And then they are bored of me
I know that it's exciting, running through the night
But every perfect summer's eating me alive until you're gone
Better on my own


They say, ""You're a little much for me
You're a liability
You're a little much for me""
So they pull back, make other plans
I understand, I'm a liability
Get you wild, make you leave
I'm a little much for e-a-na-na-na, everyone


They're gonna watch me disappear into the sun
You're all gonna watch me disappear into the sun",3017496
97536,2074889,No Frauds,rap,"Nicki Minaj, Drake & Lil Wayne",2017,1797298,"{""Nicki Minaj / Drake & Lil Wayne""}","
M-M-Murda


I don't need no, frauds
I don't need no, drama when you call
I don't need no, fake
Soon as I wake up keep an eye out for the snakes, yeah


'Cause I don't need no, fraud
I don't no, drama when you call
I don't need no, lies
Pick a side, pick a side
I took the price, and lift that bitch up
I took the ice, let me lift my wrist up
I took the price, and lift that bitch up
I took the ice, let me lift my wrist up


Aye yo, throw your wrist-es up, all my bitches up
These niggas is pussier than what? All them dicks is up
All my real niggas down to ride, throw your GSXRs up
I ain't in the projects, but all my bricks is up, rrrr
You can't be Pablo if your work ain't sellin'
What the fuck is this bitch inhalin'?
I woulda helped you out that pit you fell in
I am the generous queen! Ask Ms. Ellen
Tried to drop ""Another One"", you was itchin' to scrap
You exposed your ghostwriter, now you wish it was scrapped
Heard your pussy on yuck, I guess you needed a Pap
What type of bum bitch shoot a friend over a rack?
What type of mother leave her one son over a stack?
Lil Boogie down basic bitch thinkin' she back
Back to back, oh you mean, back to wack?
""Back to Back""? Me and Drizzy laughed at that
They say numbers don't matter but when they discussin' the kings
They turn around and say Lebron ain't got six rings
I never signed a 360, bitch you wild dumb
That's why Jay ain't clear his verse for your album
Sheneneh, you a fraud committin' perjury
I got before and after pictures of your surgery
Rah took you to her doc, but you don't look like Rah
Left the operating table, still look like ""nah""

'Cause I don't need no, frauds
I don't need no, drama when you call
I don't need no, lies
Pick a side, pick a side
I took the price, and lift that bitch up
I took the ice, let me lift my wrist up
I took the price, yeah, and lift that bitch up
I took the ice, let me lift my wrist up


Yeah, yeah, never been no fraud
Why do niggas that are not involved love to get involved?
Why do niggas claim the streets and act just like the law?
Riddles that I cannot seem to solve, man
Cristal, come at me, Weezy F and Nick
All come and spoke about your shit in '15
Man, I know you niggas saw this one comin'
My net worth sound like grrrrrr
But they don't pay in cash
Niggas see me like, ""What up, Killa?""
Man, please stop bringin' up my past
I'd really love to leave that behind
Sometimes I ask God, ""Man, why him?""
Like the team that I would never leave behind
I really gotta ease off the wine
Which is funny because I just saw Nick the other day
And she keeps getting finer over time
I just know

I don't need no, frauds
I don't need no, drama when you call
I don't need no, lies
Pick a side, pick a side
I took the price, and lift that bitch up
I took the ice, let me lift my wrist up
I took the price, yeah, and lift that bitch up
I took the ice, let me lift my wrist up


Uh, I am not a fraud, YM, I'm the god
They don't make 'em like me no more, man, I'm a dinosaur
Blunt be tight as biker shorts, twisted like some handlebars
Lil' Tune out a cartoon or Avatar
I just looked in the mirror like, ""Alright, alright, alright""
I would let that little nigga right there fuck my wife, word
I don't need no fraud bitches in and out my life, word
In and out my pockets and then in and out of sight, word
I don't need no drama, I just need some nana
Just told my lil' mama, ""Babe, I think I love you, kinda""
Feelin' like Tune-y Montana, Weezy, he get honored
Drake a headliner, and Nicki, she get finer, word",3017997
97616,2075971,Chanel,rb,Frank Ocean,2017,2573054,{},"
My guy pretty like a girl
And he got fight stories to tell
I see both sides like Chanel
See on both sides like Chanel
Swimming laps through pool water
Heated like I'm underworld
Hide my tattoos in Shibuya
Police think I'm of the underworld
12 treat a nigga like he twelve
How you looking up to me and talking down? (Yeah)
Can't you see I am the big man? (Big man)
God level, I am the I am (Woah)
Now film it with that drone cam, in the pink like Killa Cam
Put a zoom on that stick, Noé, up so close I'm on that kill
Remote controller on your lower back, yes, the good
Dick could roll the eyes back in the skull
Rolling when you ride, popping
Rolling when you ride, ride the Rodman
Got one that's straight acting
Turnt out like some dirty plastic (Ride)
2016: burnt some discs (Dope)
2017: ideas playing off a Walkman
This a cult, not a clique on the net
With a cup in a cup, Actavis
That's a double edge, ""issa knife"" (Knife)
And I don't like to fight 'til I'm fighting (Fighting)
Revenge in the air makes my lungs sick
Chopper in the sky like a gun trick (Pow)
Clips on clips like Mikey (Hello)
It's really all

I see both sides like Chanel
See on both sides like Chanel


It's really you on my mind
It's really you on my mind
It's really you
It's really you on my mind


V both sides of the 12
Steam both sides of the L
Freeze smoke rings and they hail
Sleet snow grind for the wealth
Whole team diamonds is real
Showed 'em how to shine by theirselves
You need a cosign for your health
I need that bitch to grind on my belt
I know you need to try for my belt
I know you seen it driving itself
No matte black on the ride 'cause it's stale
But it's stealth


I see both sides like Chanel
I see both sides like Chanel

My pockets snug, they can't hold my 7
They banned my Visa, my Amex and Mastercards
I got new money, and it's all cash
I got new bags, and they all collabs
I rubber band a bunch of thousand-dollar Delta gift cards
(I mean my baby bi)
Amazing, the cash online unknown
(I mean my baby bi)
Blazing the dash, counting money at home
My pockets snug, they can't hold my 7
They banned my Visa, my Amex and Mastercards
I got new money, and it's all cash
I got new bags, and they all collabs
I rubber band a bunch of thousand-dollar Delta gift cards
(I mean my baby bi)
Amazing, the cash online unknown
(I mean my baby bi)
Blazing the dash, counting money at home",3019198
97871,2079202,Fetish,pop,Selena Gomez,2017,1337697,"{""Gucci Mane""}","
Take it or leave it
Baby take it or leave it
But I know you won't leave it
'Cause I know that you need it
Look in the mirror
When I look in the mirror
Baby I see it clearer
Why you wanna be nearer


I'm not surprised
I sympathize, ah
I can't deny
Your appetite, ah


You got a fetish for my love
I push you out and you come right back
Don't see a point in blaming you
If I were you, I'd do me too
You got a fetish for my love
I push you out and you come right back
Don't see a point in blaming you
If I were you, I'd do me too
You got a fetish for my love

Reaching your limit
Say you're reaching your limit
Going over your limit
But I know you can't quit it
Something about me
Got you hooked on my body
Take you over and under and twisted up like origami


I'm not surprised
I sympathize, ah
I can't deny
Your appetite, ah


You got a fetish for my love
I push you out and you come right back
Don't see a point in blaming you
If I were you, I'd do me too
You got a fetish for my love
I push you out and you come right back
Don't see a point in blaming you
If I were you, I'd do me too
You got a fetish for my love

It's Gucci!
The way you walk, the way you talk
I blame you 'cause it's all your fault
You're playin' hard, don't turn me off
You actin' hard, but I know you soft
You my fetish, I'm so with it
All these rumors bein' spreaded
Might as well go 'head and whip it
'Cause they sayin' we already did it
Call on Gucci if you ever need me
I'll be South Beach in the drop top gleamin'
Water diamonds, Aquafina
Just need you in a blue bikini


You got a fetish for my love
I push you out and you come right back
Don't see a point in blaming you
If I were you, I'd do me too
You got a fetish for my love
I push you out and you come right back
Don't see a point in blaming you
If I were you, I'd do me too
You got a fetish for my love",3023367
98021,2080789,From The D to the A,rap,Tee Grizzley,2017,1203369,"{""Lil Yachty""}","
Helluva made this beat, baby


Off top, run a nigga out his socks
Niggas talk more than bitches, niggas really be on cock though (Pussy)
Just fucked a ho out in France, paint her face like Picasso
I iced out my vatos, I'm really up (Yeah)
Big ass Bimmer, big Benz, and my Bentley next (Skrrt)
Don't play around on my phone, ho, give me sex
Watch on my wrist out of date, but it's Rolex
Grizzley up next, I'm up now, strap your bullet vest


Five-hundred fifties, six-hundred hundreds
Seven-hundreds twenties, let's get straight to it
Eight-hundred tens, what's that, eight bands?
Hit the store and get some rubber bands, let's get straight to it
Everybody come together, everybody got the plan
He came with you, so if he steal, it fall on you, we on your ass
Have your mans call his mans, make sure they ain't movin' fast
Soon as they touch Atlanta, get with Boat, secure the bag, nigga

Uh, oh, a bag secured, that's on my mama, bro
Asian lil' ho, she ride that dick, Yokohama flow
Made that shit double, got an Uzi, I don't scuffle
Not a banger but that banger in my car like an airbag
Niggas only aimin' in the sky, call those Air Mags (Yeah)
All up in Neiman's, coppin' shit, like, fuck a price tag
I'm ballin', ain't near a rap nigga in the game that I'm callin' (Nah)
If I need help, I'll dial it by my se-kelf


You swear your bitch faithful, she sent her location
I hit her at the trap in Decatur, she basic (Crazy)
Chop with the laser, get decapitated (Grrah)
Can't smoke, I'm on papers, hold on, this my Jamaican (Love one)
Niggas want me dead, so I'm steady prayin'
Ain't no disrespect without retaliation
Fuck a hotel, I hit her in the basement
Text her later like, ""I'm done with you, I got a situation, baby""


Hmm, well shit, bro, let me get her then (Yeah)
I'ma dog her out then switcheroo into the lion's den (Gang)
Nigga talkin' down, my bro got more heat than a fryin' pan (Doo-doo-doo)
Gucci 'round my hair, wrapped tight like I'm Taliban

Like I'm Taliban, how we drop shit (Begone)
Lot of dreadheads, lot of chopsticks (Ah)
Touch my nigga Yachty, get your top ripped (Lil Boat, boom)
Don't ask the price if you know you ain't tryna cop shit


You the type to look around but never cop shit, ayy
I'm the type to buy the store, make them restock it, ayy
Beam on everythin' I own, I will not miss (Doo-doo-doo)
Grizzley by my side like a pilot ridin' cockpit (Yeah, bro)


Yachty, I might stop rappin' for this one reason (Oh, for real?)
If the Feds hear this shit I'm doin' a hundred seasons (Hey)
In the hood, shootin' craps in my Yeezys
Put angels on you niggas who be playin' like y'all demons
You dig?


Middle finger to them niggas hatin' and fakin'
They plottin' on my death, I give their mothers deep penetration
This diamond choker for some reason give me pure ventilation
Every real nigga livin' will respect this collaboration (Gang gang)


We the bust down brothers, check the Rollies out
Say you winnin' one more time, I'm pullin' trophies out
Niggas know we out, no Shaqs, all Kobes out
In other words, I'm with all shooters that'll blow you down (Buh-buh-buh-buh)

From the D to the A, put respect on it (Bitch)
If that's your ho, why my dick got her mouth on it? (Bitch)
I'm from the south, I got diamonds in my teeth
I got fur on my fleece, my new ring could pay your lease
(Lease, nigga)


Chain on my dresser next to my indictment
When they said not guilty I was so excited
From the A to the D, bitch you heard Yachty
Wraith comin' this summer, I'ma have your bitch drivin'
Bitch!",3026182
98094,2081737,​do re mi,rb,blackbear,2017,1250399,{​blackbear},"
Do, re, mi, fa, so
Yeah, yeah, yeah, oh
Do, re, mi, fa, so
Yeah, yeah, yeah


Yeah, if I could go back to that day we met
I probably would just stay in bed
You run your mouth all over town
And this one goes out to the sound
Of breaking glass on my Range Rover
Pay me back or bitch, it's over
All the presents I would send
Fuck my friends behind my shoulder
Next time I'ma stay asleep
I pray the Lord my soul to keep, oh


And you got me thinking lately
Bitch, you crazy
And nothing's ever good enough
I wrote a little song for ya
It go like

Do, re, mi, fa, so fuckin' done with you, girl
So fuckin' done with all the games you play
I ain't no Tic-tac-toe
Send the X and O's on another note
I'm do, re, mi, fa, so fuckin' done with you, girl
So send the X and O's on another note, I'm ghost
(Ghost, ghost, ghost)
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, oh)


If I could go back to the day we met
I probably would've stayed in bed
You wake up every day
And make me feel like I'm incompetent
Designer shoes and Xanax tabs
Compliments your make-up bag
You never had to buy yourself a drink
'Cause everybody want to tap that ass sometime


And you got me thinking lately
Bitch, you crazy
And nothing's ever good enough
I wrote a little song for ya
It go like

Do, re, mi, fa, so fuckin' done with you, girl
So fuckin' done with all the games you play
I ain't no Tic-tac-toe
Send the X and O's on another note
I'm do, re, mi, fa, so fuckin' done with you, girl
So send the X and O's on another note, I'm ghost
(Ghost, ghost, ghost)
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, oh)


(And you got me thinking lately, yeah)
(Bitch, you crazy)
(And nothing's ever good enough)
I wrote a little song for you, it go like


Do, re, mi, fa, so fuckin' done with you, girl
So fuckin' done with all the games you play
I ain't no Tic-tac-toe
Send the X and O's on another note
I'm do, re, mi, fa, so fuckin' done with you, girl
So send the X and O's on another note, I'm ghost
(Ghost, ghost, ghost)
(Yeah, yeah, yeah)

So send the X and O's on another note, I'm ghost
Do, re, mi, fa, so
(Yeah, yeah, yeah)
So send the X and O's on another note, I'm ghost
(Ghost, ghost, ghost)",3027501
98176,2082730,Passionfruit,pop,Drake,2017,2980963,{},"
Hold on, hold on, fuck that
Fuck that shit
Hold on, I got to start this mothafuckin' record over again, wait a minute
Fuck that shit
Still on this mothafuckin' record
I'ma play this mothafucka for y'all
Ayy, y'all get some more drinks goin' on
I'll sound a whole lot better


Listen
Seein' you got ritualistic
Cleansin' my soul of addiction for now
'Cause I'm fallin' apart, yeah
Tension
Between us just like picket fences
You got issues that I won't mention for now
'Cause we're fallin' apart


Passionate from miles away
Passive with the things you say
Passin' up on my old ways
I can't blame you, no, no
Passionate from miles away
Passive with the things you say
Passin' up on my old ways
I can't blame you, no, no

Listen
Harder buildin' trust from a distance
I think we should rule out commitment for now
'Cause we're fallin' apart
Leavin'
You're just doing that to get even
Don't pick up the pieces, just leave it for now
They keep fallin' apart


Passionate from miles away
Passive with the things you say
Passin' up on my old ways
I can't blame you, no, no
Passionate from miles away
Passive with the things you say
Passin' up on my old ways
I can't blame you, no, no


Um, trying to think of the right thing to say",3028662
98179,2082740,Blem,pop,Drake,2017,1301500,{},"
Unruly, unruly, maddas
Who keeps bringing more? I've had too many
This Virginia done me off already
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel


Don't switch on me, I got big plans
We need to forward to the islands
And get you gold, no spray tans
I need you to stop runnin' back to your ex, he's a wasteman
I wanna know, how come we can never slash and stay friends?
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel


'Cause I know what I like
I know how I wanna live my life
I don't need no advice
You're not here and we both know why
So, move from me when you're extra
Move from me with the passa
I'm buildin' up a house where they raised me
You move with me, I'll go crazy

Don't switch on me, I got big plans
We need to forward to the islands
And get you gold, no spray tans
I need you to stop runnin' back to your ex, he's a wasteman
I wanna know, how come we can never slash and stay friends?
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel


I know we can't keep it together forever
'Cause you're crazy sometimes
And I only see you sometimes
Move from me when you're extra
Move from me with the passa
I'm buildin' up a house where they raised me
You move with me, I'll go-, look just


Don't switch on me, I got big plans
We need to forward to the islands
And get you gold, no spray tans
I need you to stop runnin' back to your ex, he's a wasteman
I wanna know, how come we can never slash and stay friends?
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel
I'm blem for real, I might just say how I feel

Together forever
Good morning, good afternoon, good night!
I'm here to talk about More Life
One second",3028677
98183,2082746,Gyalchester,rap,Drake,2017,1946348,{},"
(Yah! Yah! Yah! Yah! Yah! Ah)
Hermès link, ice-blue mink (Woo!)
Tat on my ribs like I do not know what permanent is (Yah!)
They want me gone, wait for the kicker
Bury me now and I only get bigger
That's word to my nigga (Woo!)


Yeah, October Firm in the cut (Yah!)
Stay at the top like I'm stuck, that's just how I'm givin' it up
She wanna get married tonight
But I can't take a knee, 'cause I'm wearin' all white
Me and my broski are twins, but we don't look alike
I don't take naps
Me and the money are way too attached to go and do that
Muscle relax (Ha! Ha! Ha!)
That and the spliff put me right on my back, I gotta unpack (Yah!)
Virginia Black (Doo! Doo!)
I could go make enough money off that and not even rap
What's that? Facts (Facts, nigga, yah!)
Contract max, I gotta bring that shit back (Blah!)

Hermès link (Woo! Woo!), ice-blue mink (Yah!)
Tat on my ribs like I do not know what permanent is
They want me gone, out of the picture (Yah!)
Bury me now and I only get bigger
That's word to my, word to my-


I'm so hot, yeah, I'm so right now (Right now)
Who's not gang, bitch? Let me find out (Ha!)
Keep hearin' clicks when I'm talkin' on the iPhone
Feds in the city hate to see us on a high note (Woo!)
I switch flow like I switch time zone
Can't get Nobu, but you can get Milestone (Baka)
I got a new mansion, 'cause I outgrew the condo
Gotta do Maybach, she wanna fuck on the drive home
Yeah, met her once and I got through (Yah!)
I'm never washed, but I'm not new
I know I said top five, but I'm top two
And I'm not two and I got one
Thought you had one, but it's not one, nigga, nah


Hermès link, ice-blue mink (Yah!)
Tat on my ribs like I do not know what permanent is
They want me gone (Gone, blah!), wait for the kicker
Bury me now and I only get bigger
That's word to my nigga (Woo! Woo!)
Yah!",3028682
98184,2082749,Do Not Disturb,rap,Drake,2017,1835832,{},"
Silence keeps cloudin' me
Hand on my heart
And I, I wish time never mattered


Yeah, stylin' though
Dissin' but got pictures with me smilin' though
All the things you need, you still want problems though
All the things I know, I still been silent though
Yeah, used to be at SilverCity, Indigo
Used to be in lunchroom, playin' dominoes
I don't want to have to go to funerals
I gotta start sleepin' at the studio
I don't have no time to be no Romeo
All the love I need is at the rodeo
All the love I need is here at OVO, yeah
All the girls I know are there with E and Tho
Who knows where I end up when that shit gets old?
Maybe it never gets old and that's just how it goes
Last table left in Carbone, callin' plays on the rotary phone
I take a glass of Domina to go with me home
Might move our annual shit to the 'Dome
I need 40,000 people to see what I'm on
Yeah, ducked a lot of spiteful moves
I was an angry yute when I was writin' Views
Saw a side of myself that I just never knew
I'll probably self-destruct if I ever lose, but I never do
Steady doin' double shifts
1da doin' the beat and I open up like a double click
More blessings because I'm generous
Thirty-seater plane for like ten of us
Remember when I bought Sealey the fake Chanel wallet
She knew that shit was a fraud but never told me about it
Nowadays when we catchin' up we just laugh about it
Can't describe what my life is like when she asks about it
Scary whenever I close my eyes at night
Wakin' up to public statements about my private life
I can never sleep 'til mornin' on all my quiet nights
But you can rest assured that my mind is right
Get no sick days, I leave for like three months in six days
Never stick around to see shit change
Get lil' updates, texts in my inboxes have been poppin'
Seasons go by like I'm binge-watchin'
Went from Club Palazzo in the Bridge to Club LIV
To not even showin' up at a club 'less we doin' biz'
I can't even party while a nigga pursuin' this
Distractions will do you in, in the truest sense
Especially people that want to lecture me
And frame it like they just want the best for me
Or they check for me, whatever splits it up
So there's more for them and there's less for me
They don't know they got to be faster than me to get to me
No one's done it successfully
7AM in Germany, can't believe that they heard of me
Last verse that I gotta do is always like surgery
Always tryin' to let go of anything that'll burden me
That's the reason you can feel the tension and the urgency
Last chance I get to make sure that you take it personally
Take this shit to heart, it's always executed perfectly
If we do a song it's like takin' my kids to work with me
You overnight celebrity, you one day star
Swear I told you that I'm in this bitch for eternity
I am a reflection of all of your insecurities
Behind closed doors, a lot of 6 God worshipping
Done talk now, 'cause there's other shit that's concernin' me
There's real ones around me
I want to make sure they learn from me
I want to see my dog, but his grandmother's his surety
He can't even dip out to see me in an emergency
My life is centered 'round competition and currency
Takin' summer off, 'cause they tell me I need recovery
Maybe gettin' back to my regular life will humble me
I'll be back 2018 to give you the summary
More Life",3028713
98187,2082753,Portland,rap,Drake,2017,2043239,"{""Travis Scott"",Quavo}","
Murda on the beat so it's not nice
Yeah
It's a Habibis ting, ya?


Yeah, my side girl got a 5S with the screen cracked
Still hit me back right away, better not never hesitate
Don't come around thinkin' you gettin' saved
Tryna show the dogs brighter days
Got a torch, tryna light the way
Bitin' everybody, which is ironic
'Cause your next album probably won't ever see the light of day
Had fans, but you let 'em down
But I guess that's how you niggas gettin' down
I'm so high up I'm like, ""How is niggas really gettin' down?""
I could never have a kid, then be out here still kiddin' round
Boys playin' around, where you really wanna take it now?
I got a 150,000 dollars for an afterparty
And I gave it to the killas just to break it down
Bring us up, I never take us down
But if you bring me up, then they might take you down
Fake fucked with me back then
But it's gettin' hard for you to fake it now
Fuck bein' rich when I'm forty, man, I'm tryna make it now

Hell nah
Never let these niggas ride your wave
Nope, no way, nah
Never let these niggas ride your wave
Nope, no way, nah
Park the Benz just to the ride the Wraith
Skrrt skrrt
Ten million dollars, gotta hide the safe


Skrrt skrrt, oh
Michael Phelps with the swim moves
Skrrt skrrt, oh
Michael Jordan with the tennis shoes


Skrrt skrrt
Quavo, young nigga, I invented you (Ugh)
Ike Turner with the left hand (Ike)
Griselda Blanco with the trap moves (Trappin')
Gangland with the right hand (Gang)
Undertaker with the tattoos (Tats)
Never listen to the class rules (No)
Switch it up, they bit the last move (Let's go!)
I'm a magnet for bad bitches (Magnet)
You got the goin' out sad bitches (Sad)
I spent a fifty on the chain (Racks)
You spent your last fifty (Ugh, cash)
I got the keys to the streets (Keys)
You got the key to defeat (Defeated)
I got the keys to the warzone (Brrapt)
You got the key to the peace (Ugh)

Hell nah
Never let these niggas ride your wave
Nope, no way, nah
Never let these niggas ride your wave
Nope, no way, nah
Park the Benz just to ride the Wraith
Skrrt skrrt
Ten million dollars, gotta hide the safe


We gon' go live, we gon' go live, yep (Yeah, yeah)
We gon' go live, we gon' go live, yep (Yeah, yeah)
Gettin' loose (Yeah) off the Henny, 'Roc and a hint of Goose (Yeah)
Ocean deep in my swimmin' pool (Yeah, in my pool)


Throwin' Dead Prez in my livin' room (Yeah, in my room)
Takin' shots, feelin' bulletproof
Flood my Rollie, told my bitch: ""Let's go snorkelin'!"" (Yeah)
Out in Portland, tryna get in her organs (Yeah)
No, I did not sign with Jay
But I still send a Tidal wave
Yeah, I might just go get the fade
Buy the du-rag and just tie the waves
Yeah, it's lit at the crib, you could stay
Me and Drake kick like Kid N' Play (Kid N' Play)
God, the way that she servin' that cake
I gotta sit back and digest (Straight up)
I guess for the fuck shit, I'm biased (Yeah)
I mix, double the cup when I stress
Got my mama out the basement (Mama)
That's a different type of face lift
Free Max B up out the bracelets (Yeah, yeah)
Don't hit us askin' what the wave is

Hell nah
Never let these niggas ride your wave
Nope, no way, nah
Never let these niggas ride your wave
Nope, no way, nah
Park the Benz just to the ride the Wraith
Skrrt skrrt
Ten million dollars, gotta hide the safe


Skrrt skrrt, oh
Michael Phelps with the swim moves
Skrrt skrrt, oh
Michael Jordan with the tennis shoes
Skrrt skrrt, oh
Michael Phelps with the swim moves
Skrrt skrrt, oh
Michael Jordan with the tennis shoes",3028687
98188,2082756,Sacrifices,rap,Drake,2017,1192681,"{""2 Chainz"",""Young Thug""}","
Wrote this shit, January 21
Baby girl, I had to run, I'll be back a couple months
Kendall turned 21, was up the street with 21
They could see me online, but they won't see me on the ones
I got Dubai plates in the California state
I got her waitin' at my place, I got no baby on the way
I'm talkin' Baby like Stunna, I'm talkin' Baby like Face
Lost millions in the past, I'm talkin' maybe like eight
Couple niggas from the city
Wishin' on a star, could they be like Drake
Sorry, no, not today, you gotta find your own way
Big dog from the 6, I'm talkin' Dogg like Nate
My shit be raw out the gate, I don't need another take
40 got house on the lake, I ain't know we had a lake
She complainin' how I'm late, I ain't know it was a date
Niggas see me in person
First thing they say is, ""I know you need a break.""
Hell naw, I feel great, ready now, why wait?
Like a kiss from a rose I could be the one to seal your whole fate
So be careful what you think, think about what you gon' say
Gotta deal with people straight, I got my 23's laced
It's a marathon, not a sprint, but I still gotta win the race, yeah

And I'm convinced
I made sacrifices, I been ballin' ever since
We seein' so many blessings, shit don't make no sense
Someone watchin' over us, so shout goes out to Him
Yeah, I'm convinced
I made sacrifices, I been ballin' ever since
Yeah, I did some wrong, I had no choice in my defense
Someone watchin' over us, so shout goes out to-


2 Chainz, I'm a real one
Few shows, that's a mil run
When she bust it down
I said, ""Thanks for givin' to me,"" like a pilgrim
Cold world'll be chillin'
Earmuffs on the children
Used to trap out the Hilton
Got wood on the Cartiers: that's a face full of splinters
Count a bankroll for dinner
This the wrong place to enter
Phone sex for breakfast, all kinda women text us
Met her at the Super Bowl
Told her I stayed down the street from Texas
A-Town, I stay down, yeah it's all in the wrist
This one here out the fence
Trap jumpin' like ""tha Carter"", mean it jumpin' like Vince
Moved on from the election
Introduced her to the plug
Can't believe they tried to take the connection
Ooh, girl, you a blessin', fine ass, be finessin'
Yeah I love my fans but I don't wanna take pictures in the restroom
Drench God with the 6 God
Point guard and the two guard
""Pretty Girls Like Trap Music"" so I woke up with my wood hard

And I'm convinced
I made sacrifices, I been ballin' ever since
We seein' so many blessings, shit don't make no sense
Someone watchin' over us, so shout goes out to Him
Yeah, I'm convinced
I made sacrifices, I been ballin' ever since
Yeah, I did some wrong, I had no choice in my defense
Someone watchin' over us, so shout goes out to-


I was stealin' from a bitch (Slime)
Back when I was 21 (Facts)
My favorite gun was a SIG (Nine)
20 in the clip, head one (No cockin')
Growin' up, I was a running back
You never made me ran once (Goddamn)
I got shot, sweat started runnin'
That shit was red like Hunt (Ketchup)
I'm kickin', pimpin' like I punt (Beat it)
But don't you think shit's sweet?
I'm talkin' sweet, deer meat (Ooh)
I'm talkin' suite like he sleep (Like he sleep)
We ain't doin' too much talkin' (Nah)
I'm talmbout talkin' like a speech (Election)
Like the President, I kill 'em neat (Scammers)
I'm talkin' neat like freak
I'm talkin' neat like fleek
I'm talkin' neat like a geek (Yeah!)
You come with beef, I eat a B
I'm talkin' B's, spellin' bee (Sheesh)
Double R, that's a Rolls
Paint it yellow like it's dairy
I'm talkin' Rose like Derrick
I'm talkin' rolls like a belly (Woo)
Like a new car, I got two keys
Tryna score the bucket like a Chevy seat (Chevy seat)
Then I heard they been pullin' all week (All week)
I'ma use your name like, ""Who is he?""
You get it? Haha!
I said I'ma use a name like, ""Who is he?""
Got some gold on, leprechaun, sheesh
Deep sleep short for deceased
Big bezel on the Patty (Woo)
I'm talkin' PADI-I meant Patek
Don't try to take it, I got guns
I'm talkin' guns, not pellets (Pellet)
I watch the game from the floor (Floor seats)
I'm talkin' wood, first mattress
I'm talkin' wood, pants down (Pants down)
I'm talkin' woods like them clowns (You get it?)
I got my mink off a monkey
I'm talkin' monkey like Jumanji (Hrr)
All your diamonds partly sunny
I'm talkin' sunny like D, Sunny (Sunny Delight)
My diamonds wet, it cost me money
I'm talkin' wet like it's runnin' (Sink)
I'm talkin' wet like Katrina (New Orleans)
I'm talkin' wet like Dasani, huh

And I'm convinced
I made sacrifices, I been ballin' ever since
We seein' so many blessings, shit don't make no sense
Someone watchin' over us, so shout goes out to Him
Yeah, I'm convinced
I made sacrifices, I been ballin' ever since
Yeah, I did some wrong, I had no choice in my defense
Someone watchin' over us, so shout goes out to-",3028693
98189,2082759,Teenage Fever,pop,Drake,2017,1824817,{},"
Your heart is hard to carry after dark
You're to blame for what we could have been
'Cause look at what we are
Your friends are scared to tell you, you went too far
Funny that it's always been all about you from the start
I met someone new last night and we kicked it
And I'm going back there tonight
And you know what's on my mind, this time
Going back there tonight
And you know what's on my mind so


If you had my love
And I gave you all my trust
Would you comfort me?
And if somehow you knew
That your love would be untrue
Would you lie to me?
If you had my love
And I gave you all my trust
Would you comfort me?
And if somehow you knew
That your love would be untrue
Would you lie to me?

Out of body
That's just how I feel when I'm around you, shawty
Last night we didn't say it
But girl, we both thought it
Why second guess? I should have stayed
You say the word, I'm on the way
This shit feels like teenage fever
I'm not scared of it, she ain't either
Why second guess? I should have stayed
'Cause you know what's on my mind so


If you had my love
And I gave you all my trust
Would you comfort me?
And if somehow you knew
That your love would be untrue
Would you lie to me?
If you had my love
And I gave you all my trust
Would you comfort me?
And if somehow you knew
That your love would be untrue
Would you lie to me?

Yeah, slightly took a left turn there
But very much 6AM
Slightly been awake for 24 hours, so please forgive me
More ideas and stuff comin'
Yeah, yeah, fam
I'm wafflin', but man is tired, fam, Jesus Christ",3028701
98256,2083737,Magnolia,rap,Playboi Carti,2017,2525714,{},"
Yo, Pi'erre, you wanna come out here?
Uh


In New York I Milly Rock (Rock)
Hide it in my sock (Sock)
Running from an opp (Opp)
And I shoot at opp (Opp), uh, uh (What?)
And I'm on the block (What?), uh, uh (What? What?)
And I'm on the block (What?)
In New York I Milly Rock (Hello?)
Hide it in my sock (What?)
Hide it in my sock (What?)
Selling that rerock (What? Woah, what? What? Uh, what? What?)
In New York I Milly Rock (Ooh)
Hide it in my sock (Woah)
Used to sell rerock (What?)
Runnin' from the cops (Woah)
Shootin' at these opps (Woah)

Yo, Pi'erre, you wanna come out here? (Woah)
Shooting at these opps (What?)
'Cause I run they block (What?), uh
Give me top (Top), uh, in my drop-top
All these hoes gon' flock (Flock, flock)
When I drop, yeah (Drop, drop)
All these hoes gon' flock (Flock, flock)
When I drop, yeah (Drop, drop)
All these hoes gon' flock (Flock, flock)
When I drop, uh (Drop, drop)
Woo, woo, woo, woo (Beep)
Woo, woo (Beep), woo, woo (Beep)
All these hoes want cash (Cash)
All these hoes want bags, uh
Fucking on your bitch (Beep), uh
I'm her dad (Yeah), uh
All these niggas sound like Cash, sound like Cash (Blah)
I'm a soldier, ooh (What?)
Damn, I thought I told you, ooh (What?)
Shootin' like a soldier, ooh (Beep)
Like I'm from Magnolia, ooh (What?)
All these niggas (What? What?) always fold (What? What?)
Big bank (What? What?) never fold (What?)
I'm sippin' Act' (What?), fill that shit slowly (Hello?)
Bitches on me (What? Beep) say she like my clothing (Yeah)
I'm in London (What?) Yung Carti global (What?)
Designer is on me (Phew) call it dirty laundry (Phew)
All these bitches want Yung Carti (What?), Yung Carti (Yeah)
Ayy, Yung Carti, Yung Carti, what? (Hop in the bit', hop in the bit')
Yung Carti, Yung Carti (What? What? Hold on), yeah
All of your bitches, they loose, hold on
All of your bitches, they loose, hold on (Yeah)
All of my bitches, they rich, hold on
And they stay rockin' that Rick, hold on
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Uh, what? What? Hold on, what? What? Uh (Yeah)
Rich, rich (Rich)
Cash Carti, bitch (Bitch)
Rich, bitch (Hold on)
Got a rich clique (Hold on)
I'm suckin' on the clit (Hold on)
She suckin' on the dick (Yeah)
Give that ho a tip (Yeah)
Told her, ""Buy some kicks"" (Kicks)
Ooh, then I brush my teeth (What?)
Hop up in the whip
Glocky in the whip (Skrrt)
Glocky in the whip (Yeah)
And I'm cocky, fuckin' on a thotty
She just wanna plot me, bitch can't stop me (Stop me)
I'm ridin' in a Masi (What? Masi)
This ain't even my Masi (Nah)
Hope that's not your thotty (What?)
Your bitch look like a auntie (What?)
Walked in with Ashanti (What?)
Damn, that look like 'Shanti (What?)
Damn, that look like Carti (Yeah-yeah)
I think that be Yung Carti
Heard he spent a hundred on a fucking watch piece, that's filthy (Phew, what? Woah, woah)

In New York I Milly Rock (What?)
Hide it in my sock (What? What?)
Running from an opp (What? What?)
And I shoot at opp (What? What?), uh, uh (Phew)
And I'm on the block (Phew), uh, uh (Hello?)
And I'm on the block (What?)
In New York I Milly Rock (What?)
Hide it in my sock (What?)
Hide it in my sock (Sock)
Selling that rerock (Rerock)
What? What? (What?)
What? Uh, what?
In New York I Milly Rock (What?)
Hide it in my sock (What?)
Use to sell rerock, uh
Runnin' from the cops, uh
Shootin' at these opps


You know what I'm sayin'?
Yo (Yeah), Pi'erre, you wanna come out here?
Bitch ass nigga, fuck that nigga, man",3029830
98381,2085389,Sunflower,pop,Rex Orange County,2017,1467260,{},"
Whoa
I want to know where I can go
When you're not around, and I'm feeling down
So won't you stay for a moment so I can say
I
I need you so? 'Cause right now, you know
That nothing here's new, and I'm obsessed with you
Then I fell to the ground, and you smiled at me and said


I don't wanna see you cry
You don't have to feel this emptiness
She said, ""I'll love you till the day that I die""
Well, maybe she's right
'Cause I don't wanna feel like I'm not me
And to be honest, I don't even know why
I let myself get down in the first place


Tryna keep my mind at bay
Sunflower still grows at night
Waiting for a minute till the sun's seen through my eyes
Make it down, down, do-down-down
Diggy, dig down, doo-doo-doo-doo
Waiting for a minute till the sun's seen through my eyes

You know you need to get yourself to sleep and dream
A dream of you and I
There's no need to keep an open eye
I promise I'm the one for you
Just let me hold you in these arms tonight
I'm lucky to be me and you can see it in my face
Back when I fucked my shit up too many times
Why would I let myself get down in the first place?


Tryna keep my mind at bay
Sunflower still grows at night
Waiting for a minute till the sun's seen through my eyes
Make it down, down, do-down-down
Diggy, dig down, doo-doo-doo-doo
Waiting for a minute till the sun's seen through my eyes


And so she sat me down and told me that I didn't have to cry
Said I didn't need to get down or feel empty inside
And told me that she'll love me for as long as she's alive
And well, maybe she's right
'Cause I hate it when I feel like I'm not me
See, I honestly don't even know why
I-I honestly don't even know why

Tryna keep my mind at bay
Sunflower still grows at night
Waiting for a minute till the sun's seen through my eyes
Make it down, down, do-down-down
Diggy, dig down, doo-doo-doo-doo
Waiting for a minute till the sun's seen through my eyes",3031828
98450,2086251,The Heart Part 4,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1706445,{},"
Don't tell a lie on me
I won't tell the truth 'bout you
Don't tell a lie on me
I won't tell the truth 'bout you


Thirty millions later, my future favors
The legendary status of a hip-hop rhyme savior
Travel 'round the atlas in this spaceship
Candy-coated, my day shift's
Been devoted to fuckin' up bundles of paper
Pi equals three-fourteen
The devil's pie is big enough to justify the whole thing
Wait up, lampin' in Jamaica
The clouds turnin', my thoughts turnin'
Burnin' castor oil, yo I been determined to make an earnin'
This seed in this soil is classified
I'm satisfied when I strategize my kid's future
I ain't sanctified enough to say that I won't shoot ya
I done vandalized the industry full circuit
The earthiest slash thirstiest nigga you know versus this
Scum of a land that transcend two surfaces
The richer the poorer, the bigger the picture
The more blood pours, but-

Don't tell a lie on me
I won't tell the truth 'bout you
Don't tell a lie on me
I won't tell the truth 'bout you


My fans can't wait for me to son ya punk-ass
And crush ya whole lil' shit
I'll Big Pun ya punk-ass, you a scared lil' bitch
Tiptoein' around my name, nigga, you lame
And when I get at you, homie
Don't you just tell me you was just playin'
""Oh, I was just playin', K-Dot
C'mon, you know a nigga rock with you, bro""
Shut the fuck up, you sound like the last nigga I know
Might end up like the last nigga I know
Oh, you don't wanna clash? Nigga, I know
I put my foot on the gas, head on the floor
Hoppin' out before the vehicle crash, I'm on a roll
Yellin', ""One, two, three, four, five
I am the greatest rapper alive""
So damn great, motherfucker, I've died
What you hearin' now is a paranormal vibe
House on the hill, house on the beach, nigga (facts)
A condo in Compton, I'm still in reach, nigga (facts)
I'm fresh out the water, I'm 'bout to breach, nigga
The five-foot giant woke up out of his sleep, nigga
Oh yeah, oh yeah, mo' cars, mo' lears
Mo' bars, no peers, no scars, no fear-fuck y'all, sincere
I heard the whispers, I curved the whispers
You know what the risk is
Earthed in ditches, your body revertin' to stiffness
The whole world gone mad
Bodies is addin' up, market's about to crash
Niggas is fake rich, bitches is fake bad
Blacks that act white, whites that do the dab
Donald Trump is a chump
Know how we feel, punk-tell him that God comin'
And Russia need a replay button, y'all up to somethin'
Electorial votes look like memorial votes
But America's truth ain't ignorin' the votes
It's blasphemy, how many gon' blast for me?
I prophesized on my last song, you laughed at me
But when the shit get brackin', don't you ask for me
How many leaders gon' tell you the truth after me?
G Malone, big bro, kudos to him
I was two O's from a M, tryna be big as Em
Thirty millions later, my future favors
The legendary status of a hip-hop rhyme savior
Salmon and capers, fame and lawsuits
You lookin' at me in Chucks, I'm lookin' at y'all suits
Me and Top Dawg playin' rock-paper-scissors in court
A real hustler lose money just to go get some more
I said it's like that, dropped one classic, came right back
'Nother classic, right back
My next album, the whole industry on a ice pack
With TOC, you see the flames
In my E-Y-E's-it's not a game
And the whole world is goin' mad, daddy, it's sad, daddy
My only advice? Go and get you a bag, daddy
Lee Baca on trial tryna portray a boxer
Beatin' up on my niggas while the CO's watch him
Tables turned, lesson learned, my best look
You jumped sides on me, now you 'bout to meet Westbrook
Go celebrate with your team and let victory vouch you
Just know, the next game played I might slap the shit out you
Technical foul, I'm flagrant, I'm foul
They throwin' me out, you throw in the towel
Look at the crowd, they- (Naw, I don't like that)
Look at my smile, I'm smirkin'
Calm but urgent (That ain't the style, fuck!)
So many verses, you live in denial (Fuck!)
So many verses, I never run out (What?)
You makin' him nervous, the music is loud
Ho, JAY-Z Hall of Fame, sit yo punk-ass down!
(Sit yo punk-ass down)
So that means you ain't bigger than rapping (What else?)
So that means no more playin' the back scenes (What else?)
My spot is solidified if you ask me (What else?)
My name is identified as ""That King""
I'll let y'all worry about a list, I'm on some other shit
A difference between accomplishments and astonishments
You know what time it is, ante up, this is in forever
Y'all got 'til April the 7th to get y'all shit together

Let's get it!
Look, look!
On foenem",3032843
98598,2088081,DNA.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,5945475,{},"
I got, I got, I got, I got-
Loyalty, got royalty inside my DNA
Cocaine quarter piece, got war and peace inside my DNA
I got power, poison, pain, and joy inside my DNA
I got hustle, though, ambition flow inside my DNA
I was born like this, since one like this, immaculate conception
I transform like this, perform like this, was Yeshua new weapon
I don't contemplate, I meditate, then off your fucking head
This that put-the-kids-to-bed
This that I got, I got, I got, I got-
Realness, I just kill shit 'cause it's in my DNA
I got millions, I got riches buildin' in my DNA
I got dark, I got evil that rot inside my DNA
I got off, I got troublesome heart inside my DNA
I just win again, then win again like Wimbledon, I serve
Yeah, that's him again, the sound that engine in is like a bird
You see fireworks and Corvette tire skrrt the boulevard
I know how you work, I know just who you are
See, you's a, you's a, you's a-
Bitch, your hormones prolly switch inside your DNA
Problem is, all that sucker shit inside your DNA
Daddy prolly snitched, heritage inside your DNA
Backbone don't exist, born outside a jellyfish, I gauge
See, my pedigree most definitely don't tolerate the front
Shit I've been through prolly offend you, this is Paula's oldest son
I know murder, conviction
Burners, boosters, burglars, ballers, dead, redemption
Scholars, fathers dead with kids and
I wish I was fed forgiveness
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, soldier's DNA (I'm a soldier's DNA)
Born inside the beast, my expertise checked out in second grade
When I was 9, on cell, motel, we didn't have nowhere to stay
At 29, I've done so well, hit cartwheel in my estate
And I'm gon' shine like I'm supposed to, antisocial extrovert
And excellent mean the extra work
And absentness what the fuck you heard
And pessimists never struck my nerve
And Nazareth gonna plead his case
The reason my power's here on earth
Salute the truth, when the prophet say

I-I got loyalty, got royalty inside my DNA
This is why I say that hip hop has done more damage to young African Americans than racism in recent years
I-I got loyalty, got royalty inside my DNA
I live a better life, I'm rollin' several dice, fuck your life
I-I got loyalty, got royalty inside my DNA
I live a be-, fuck your life
5, 4, 3, 2, 1
This is my heritage, all I'm inheritin'
Money and power, the mecca of marriages


Tell me somethin'
You mothafuckas can't tell me nothin'
I'd rather die than to listen to you
My DNA not for imitation
Your DNA an abomination
This how it is when you in the Matrix
Dodgin' bullets, reapin' what you sow
And stackin' up the footage, livin' on the go
And sleepin' in a villa
Sippin' from a Grammy, walkin' in the buildin'
Diamond in the ceilin', marble on the floors
Beach inside the window, peekin' out the window
Baby in the pool, godfather goals
Only Lord knows I've been goin' hammer
Dodgin' paparazzi, freakin' through the cameras
Eat at Four Daughters, Brock wearin' sandals
Yoga on a Monday, stretchin' to Nirvana
Watchin' all the snakes, curvin' all the fakes
Phone never on, I don't conversate
I don't compromise, I just penetrate
Sex, money, murder-these are the breaks
These are the times, level number 9
Look up in the sky, 10 is on the way
Sentence on the way, killings on the way
Motherfucker, I got winners on the way
You ain't shit without a body on your belt
You ain't shit without a ticket on your plate
You ain't sick enough to pull it on yourself
You ain't rich enough to hit the lot and skate
Tell me when destruction gonna be my fate
Gonna be your fate, gonna be our faith
Peace to the world, let it rotate
Sex, money, murder-our DNA
",3035222
98743,2090342,Lust for Life,pop,Lana Del Rey,2017,1096002,"{""The Weeknd""}","
Climb up the H of the Hollywood sign (Yeah)
In these stolen moments, the world is mine (Doo-wop, doo-wop)
There's nobody here, just us together (Sha-doop, sha-doop)
Keepin' me hot like July forever
'Cause we're the masters of our own fate
We're the captains of our own souls
There's no way for us to come late
'Cause, boy, we're gold, boy, we're gold
And I was like...


Take off, take off, take off all your clothes
Take off, take off, take off all your clothes
Take off, take off, take off all of your clothes
They say only the good die young
That just ain't right
'Cause we're having too much fun
Too much fun tonight (Yeah)


And a lust for life, and a lust for life
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive

(Then) We dance on the H of the Hollywood sign (Yeah)
'Til we run out of breath, gotta dance 'til we die  (Doo-wop, doo-wop)
My boyfriend's back and he's cooler than ever (Sha-doop, sha-doop)
There's no more night, blue skies forever
'Cause we're the masters of our own fate
We're the captains of our own souls
So there's no need for us to hesitate
We're all alone, let's take control
And I was like...


Take off, take off, take off all your clothes
Take off, take off, take off all your clothes
Take off, take off, take off all of your clothes
They say only the good die young
That just ain't right
'Cause we're havin' too much fun
Too much fun tonight (Yeah)


And a lust for life, and a lust for life
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive (Oh)

My boyfriend's back and he's cooler than ever
There's no more night, blue skies forever
I told you twice in our love letter
There's no stopping now, green lights forever
And I was like...


Take off, take off, take off all your clothes
Take off, take off, take off all your clothes
Take off, take off, take off all of your clothes


And a lust for life, and a lust for life
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
And a lust for life, and a lust for life
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive
Keeps us alive, keeps us alive (Oh)",3037651
98870,2092200,Everybody,rap,Logic,2017,1374969,{},"
Okay I was gone for a minute but I'm back now
Sit the fuck back down
Seem like everybody nowadays Hollywood
Oh, it's like that now?
I'ma show you mothafuckas how to act now
I'ma show 'em how to act
I'ma show 'em how to act


Okay now picture little Bobby just a youngin' runnin' round
With his mans, hammer in his hands, feelin' like the man
Run, mothafucka, run
Before the popo get the gun, put it to your brain like goddamn!
Everybody know you ain't about it
Everything you talk about I know I can live without it
Red light, stop. Green light, go!
Everything ain't what it seem like
Mothafucka I know!
Hold up, what you mean, where you been?
Bitch, I been in
This is merely the beginning again
What you been living in?
A box, under the bridge, like Anthony Kiedis?
Looking for something to complete us
And maybe lead us, fuck an elitist
Hell of a long way from equal is how they treat us
Body of a builder with the mind of a fetus
Turn on the television and see the vision they feed us
And I wish I could erase that, face facts

Everybody people, everybody bleed, everybody need something
Everybody love, everybody know, how it go
Everybody people, everybody bleed, everybody need something
Everybody love, everybody know


I been knockin' doors down like a Jehovah witness
God as my witness, I'm with this
But on the real, I think I need another witness!
If it was 1717, black daddy, white momma wouldn't change a thing
Light skin mothafucka certified as a house nigga
Well I'll be God damned, go figure
In my blood is the slave and the master
It's like the devil playin' spades with the pastor
But he was born with the white privilege!
Man, what the fuck is that?
White people told me as a child, as a little boy, playin' with his toys
I should be ashamed to be black
And some black people look ashamed when I rap
Like my great granddaddy didn't take a whip to the back
Not accepted by the black or the white
I don't give a fuck, praise God, I could see the light
Everybody talkin' 'bout race this, race that
I wish I could erase that, face facts

Everybody people, everybody bleed, everybody need something
Everybody love, everybody know, how it go
Everybody people, everybody bleed, everybody need something
Everybody love, everybody know


Okay I was gone for a minute but I'm back now
Sit the fuck back down
Seem like everybody nowadays Hollywood
Oh, it's like that now?
I'ma show you mothafuckas how to act now
I'ma show 'em how to act
I'ma show 'em how to act",3039792
98876,2092326,HUMBLE.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,11181199,{},"
Nobody pray for me
It been that day for me
Way (Yeah, yeah)


Ayy, I remember syrup sandwiches and crime allowances
Finesse a nigga with some counterfeits, but now I'm countin' this
Parmesan where my accountant lives, in fact, I'm downin' this
D'USSÉ with my boo bae, tastes like Kool-Aid for the analysts
Girl, I can buy your ass the world with my paystub
Ooh, that pussy good, won't you sit it on my taste bloods?
I get way too petty once you let me do the extras
Pull up on your block, then break it down: we playin' Tetris
AM to the PM, PM to the AM, funk
Piss out your per diem, you just gotta hate 'em, funk
If I quit your BM, I still ride Mercedes, funk
If I quit this season, I still be the greatest, funk
My left stroke just went viral
Right stroke put lil' baby in a spiral
Soprano C, we like to keep it on a high note
It's levels to it, you and I know

Bitch, be humble (Hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, lil', hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, sit down, lil', sit down, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, hol' up)
Bitch, sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Lil' bitch, hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, hol' up, hol' up)
Be humble (Hol' up, hol' up)
Sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, lil', hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, sit down, lil', sit down, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, hol' up)
Bitch, sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Lil' bitch, hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, hol' up, hol' up)


Who that nigga thinkin' that he frontin' on Man-Man? (Man-Man)
Get the fuck off my stage, I'm the Sandman (Sandman)
Get the fuck off my dick, that ain't right
I make a play fucking up your whole life
I'm so fuckin' sick and tired of the Photoshop
Show me somethin' natural like afro on Richard Pryor
Show me somethin' natural like ass with some stretch marks
Still I take you down right on your mama couch in Polo socks
Ayy, this shit way too crazy, ayy, you do not amaze me, ayy
I blew cool from AC, ayy, Obama just paged me, ayy
I don't fabricate it, ayy, most of y'all be fakin', ayy
I stay modest 'bout it, ayy, she elaborate it, ayy
This that Grey Poupon, that Evian, that TED Talk, ayy
Watch my soul speak, you let the meds talk, ayy
If I kill a nigga, it won't be the alcohol, ayy
I'm the realest nigga after all

Bitch, be humble (Hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, lil', hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, sit down, lil', sit down, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, hol' up)
Bitch, sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Lil' bitch, hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, hol' up, hol' up)
Be humble (Hol' up, hol' up)
Sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, lil', hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, sit down, lil', sit down, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Hol' up, hol' up)
Bitch, sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, lil' bitch)
Be humble (Lil' bitch, hol' up, bitch)
Sit down (Hol' up, hol' up, hol' up, hol' up)",3039923
98968,2093115,Sign of the Times,rock,Harry Styles,2017,3860825,{},"
Just stop your crying, it's a sign of the times
Welcome to the final show
Hope you're wearing your best clothes
You can't bribe the door on your way to the sky
You look pretty good down here
But you ain't really good


We never learn, we been here before
Why are we always stuck and running from
The bullets? The bullets?
We never learn, we been here before
Why are we always stuck and running from
Your bullets? Your bullets?


Just stop your crying, it's a sign of the times
We gotta get away from here
We gotta get away from here
Just stop your crying, it'll be alright
They told me that the end is near
We gotta get away from here

Just stop your crying, have the time of your life
Breaking through the atmosphere
And things are pretty good from here
Remember everything will be alright
We can meet again somewhere
Somewhere far away from here


We never learn, we been here before
Why are we always stuck and running from
The bullets? The bullets?
We never learn, we been here before
Why are we always stuck and running from
The bullets? The bullets?


Just stop your crying, it's a sign of the times
We gotta get away from here
We gotta get away from here
Stop your crying, baby, it'll be alright
They told me that the end is near
We gotta get away from here


We never learn, we been here before
Why are we always stuck and running from
The bullets? The bullets?
We never learn, we've been here before
Why are we always stuck and running from
The bullets? Your bullets?

We don't talk enough, we should open up
Before it's all too much
Will we ever learn? We've been here before
It's just what we know


Stop your crying, baby, it's a sign of the times
We gotta get away, we got to get away
We got to get away, we got to get away
We got to get away
We got to, we got to, away
We got to, we got to, away
We got to, we got to, away",3040789
98985,2093186,Bruises,pop,Lewis Capaldi,2017,1057539,{},"
Counting days, counting days
Since my love up and got lost on me
And every breath that I've been taking
Since you left feels like a waste on me
I've been holding on to hope
That you'll come back when you can find some peace
'Cause every word that I've heard spoken
Since you left feels like a hollow street


I've been told, I've been told to get you off my mind
But I hope I never lose the bruises that you left behind
Oh my lord, oh my lord, I need you by my side


There must be something in the water
'Cause every day, it's getting colder
And if only I could hold you
You'd keep my head from going under

Maybe I, maybe I'm just being blinded
By the brighter side
Of what we had because it's over
Well, there must be something in the tide


I've been told, I've been told to get you off my mind
But I hope I never lose the bruises that you left behind
Oh my lord, oh my lord, I need you by my side


There must be something in the water
'Cause every day, it's getting colder
And if only I could hold you
You'd keep my head from going under


Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
It's your love I'm lost in
Your love I'm lost in
Your love I'm lost in
And I'm tired of being so exhausted
Your love I'm lost in
Your love I'm lost in
Your love I'm lost in
Even though I'm nothing to you now
Even though I'm nothing to you now

There must be something in the water
'Cause every day, it's getting colder
And if only I could hold you
You'd keep my head from going under
There must be something in the water
'Cause every day, it's getting colder
And if only I could hold you
You'd keep my head from going under",3040880
99163,2096348,Thunder,pop,Imagine Dragons,2017,1806462,{},"
Just a young gun with a quick fuse
I was uptight, wanna let loose
I was dreaming of bigger things
And wanna leave my own life behind
Not a ""Yes, sir,"" not a follower
Fit the box, fit the mold
Have a seat in the foyer, take a number
I was lightning before the thunder


Thunder, thunder
Thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder
Thunder, thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder


Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-)
Lightning then the thunder (Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder)
Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-, thun-)
Lightning then the thunder, thunder, thunder (Th-th-thunder)
Thunder (Thun-, thun-)

Kids were laughing in my classes
While I was scheming for the masses
Who do you think you are?
Dreaming 'bout being a big star
They say, ""You're basic,"" they say, ""You're easy""
You're always riding in the backseat
Now I'm smiling from the stage
While you were clapping in the nosebleeds


Thunder, thunder
Thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder
Thunder, thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder


Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-)
Lightning then the thunder (Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder)
Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-, thun-)
Lightning then the thunder, thunder, thunder (Th-th-thunder)
Thunder (Thun-, thun-)


Thunder, feel the thunder
Lightning then the thunder, thunder

Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-)
Lightning then the thunder, thunder (Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder)
Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-, thun-)
Lightning then the thunder, thunder (Th-th-thunder)
Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-)
(Never give up, never give up)
Lightning then the thunder, thunder (Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder)
(Never give up on your dreams)
Thunder, feel the thunder (Thunder, thunder, thun-, thun-)
(Never give up, never give up)
Lightning then the thunder, thunder (Th-th-thunder)
(Never give up on your dreams)


Thunder, thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder
Thunder, thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder
(Woah-oh-ohh)
Thunder, thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder
(Woah-oh-ohh)
Thunder, thunder, thun-
Thunder, th-th-thunder, thunder",3044373
99350,2098821,BLOOD.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1128496,{},"
Is it wickedness?
Is it weakness?
You decide
Are we gonna live or die?


So I was takin' a walk the other day
And I seen a woman-a blind woman
Pacin' up and down the sidewalk
She seemed to be a bit frustrated
As if she had dropped somethin' and
Havin' a hard time findin' it
So after watchin' her struggle for a while
I decide to go over and lend a helping hand, you know?
""Hello, ma'am, can I be of any assistance?
It seems to me that you have lost something
I would like to help you find it""
She replied, ""Oh, yes, you have lost something
You've lost... your life""
{Gunshot}


Is it wickedness?


Lamar stated his views on police brutality
With that line in the song, quote
""And we hate the popo, wanna kill us in the street fo' sho'""
Oh, please, ugh, I don't like it",3047129
99351,2098822,LOVE.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,3919179,{Zacari},"
Damn, love or lust
Damn, all of us


Give me a run for my money
There is nobody, no one to outrun me
(Another world premiere)
So give me a run for my money
Sippin' bubbly, feelin' lovely, livin' lovely
Just love me
I wanna be with you, ayy, I wanna be with
Just love me, just love me, just love
I wanna be with you, ayy, I wanna be with
Love me
I wanna be with you
Love me, just love me


If I didn't ride blade on curb, would you still love me?
If I minimized my net worth, would you still love me?
Keep it a hundred, I'd rather you trust me than to love me
Keep it a whole one hund', don't got you, I got nothin' (Uh, uh)

Ayy, I got somethin'
Hol' up, we gon' function, ayy, no assumptions, ayy
Feelin' like Tyson with it
Knock it out twice, I'm with it
Only for the night, I'm kiddin'
Only for life, yeah, homie for life, yeah
Only for life, let's get it
Hit that shoulder lean
I know what comin' over me
Backstroke oversea
I know what you need
Already on ten, all money come in
All feeling go out, this feeling don't drought
This party won't end


If I didn't ride blade on curb, would you still love me?
If I minimized my net worth, would you still love me?
Keep it a hundred, I'd rather you trust me than to love me
Keep it a whole one hund', don't got you, I got nothin' (Uh, uh)


Give me a run for my money
There is nobody, no one to outrun me
So give me a run for my money
Sippin' bubbly, feelin' lovely, livin' lovely
Just love me
I wanna be with you, ayy, I wanna be with
Just love me, just love me, just love
I wanna be with you, ayy, I wanna be with
Love me
I wanna be with you
Love me, just love me

I'm on the way
We ain't got no time to waste
Poppin' your gum on the way (love me)
Am I in the way?
I don't wan' pressure you none
I want your blessing today (love me)
Oh, by the way, open the door by the way
Told you that I'm on the way (love me)
I'm on the way, I know connection is vague
Pick up the phone for me, babe
Dammit, we jammin'
Bad attitude from yo' nanny
Curves and your hips from yo' mammy
Remember Gardena, I took the studio Camry
I know Top will be mad at me
I had to do it, I want your body, your music
I bought the big one to prove it
Look what you made
Told you that I'm on the way
I'm like a exit away, yep


If I didn't ride blade on curb, would you still love me?
If I minimized my net worth, would you still love me?
Keep it a hundred, I'd rather you trust me than to love me
Keep it a whole one hund', don't got you, I got nothin' (Uh, uh)

Give me a run for my money
There is nobody, no one to outrun me
So give me a run for my money
Sippin' bubbly, feelin' lovely, livin' lovely
Just love me
I wanna be with you, ayy, I wanna be with
Just love me, just love me, just love me
I wanna be with you, ayy, I wanna be with
Love me
I wanna be with you
Love me, just love me",3047141
99352,2098823,YAH.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1221846,{},"
New shit, new Kung Fu Kenny


I got so many theories and suspicions
I'm diagnosed with real nigga conditions
Today is the day I follow my intuition
Keep the family close-get money, fuck bitches
I double-parked the Aston in the red
My momma told me that I'ma work myself to death
My girl told me don't let these hoes get in my head
My world been ecstatic, I checked the signal that read-


Buzzin', radars is buzzin'
Yah, yah, yah, yah
Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah, yah
Buzzin', radars is buzzin'
Yah, yah, yah, yah
Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah, yah

Interviews wanna know my thoughts and opinions
Fox News wanna use my name for percentage
My latest muse is my niece, she worth livin'
See me on the TV and scream: ""That's Uncle Kendrick!""
Yeah, that's the business (Uno)
Somebody tell Geraldo this nigga got some ambition
I'm not a politician, I'm not 'bout a religion
I'm a Israelite, don't call me black no mo'
That word is only a color, it ain't facts no mo'
My cousin called, my cousin Carl Duckworth
Said know my worth
And Deuteronomy say that we all been cursed
I know He walks the Earth
But it's money to get, bitches to hit, yah
Zeroes to flip, temptation is, yah
First on my list, I can't resist, yah
Everyone together now, know that we forever-


Buzzin', radars is buzzin'
Yah, yah, yah, yah
Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah, yah
Buzzin', radars is buzzin'
Yah, yah, yah, yah
Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah, yah",3047131
99353,2098824,ELEMENT.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,2899477,{},"
New Kung Fu Kenny
Ain't nobody prayin' for me
Y'all know, what happens on Earth stays on Earth
Here we go!
I don't give a fuck, I don't give a fuck
I don't give a, I don't give a, I don't give a fuck


I'm willin' to die for this shit
I done cried for this shit, might take a life for this shit
Put the Bible down and go eye for an eye for this shit
D-O-T my enemy, won't catch a vibe for this shit, ayy
I been stomped out in front of my mama
My daddy commissary made it to commas
Bitch, all my grandmas dead
So ain't nobody prayin' for me, I'm on your head, ayy
Thirty millions later, know the feds watchin'
Auntie on my Telegram like, ""Be cautious!""
I be hangin' out at Tam's, I be on Stockton
I don't do it for the 'Gram, I do it for Compton
I'm willin' to die for this shit, nigga
I'll take your fuckin' life for this shit, nigga
We ain't goin' back to broke, family sellin' dope
That's why you maney-ass rap niggas better know

If I gotta slap a pussy-ass nigga, I'ma make it look sexy
If I gotta go hard on a bitch, I'ma make it look sexy
I pull up, hop out, air out, made it look sexy
They won't take me out my element
Nah, take me out my element


I'm allergic to a bitch nigga, ayy
An imaginary rich nigga, ayy
Seven figures ho, that's slimmer than my bitch figure, ayy
Goin' digital and physical on all y'all, ayy
Bunch of criminals and money in my phone calls, ayy
We okay, we let the A1 fly
Relocate, jump on the same G5
Checkin' for me heavy 'cause I go, yeah, I go, yeah
They never been ready, yeah, I know, yeah, know, yeah
100K spread across the floor, 'cross the floor, yeah
None of y'all fuckin' with the flow, yeah, the flow, yeah
Years in the makin', and don't y'all mistake it
I got 'em by a landslide, we talkin' about races
You know this'll never be a tie, just look at they laces
You know careers take off, just gotta be patient
Mr. One through Five, that's the only logic
Fake my death, go to Cuba, that's the only option

If I gotta slap a pussy-ass nigga, I'ma make it look sexy
If I gotta go hard on a bitch, I'ma make it look sexy
I pull up, hop out, air out, made it look sexy
They won't take me out my element
Nah, take me out my element


Damned if I do, if I don't (Yuh)
Goddamn us all if you won't (Yuh)
Damn, damn, damn, it's a goddamn shame
You ain't front in line, get out the goddamn way


Niggas thought they wasn't gonna see me, huh?
Niggas thought that K-Dot real life
Was the same life they see on TV, huh?
Niggas wanna flex on me and be in L.A. for free, huh?
Next time they hit the 10 freeway, we need a receipt, huh?
'Cause most of y'all ain't real, most of y'all gon' squeal
Most of y'all just envy, but jealousy get you killed
Most of y'all throw rocks and try to hide your hand
Just say his name and I promise that you'll see Candyman
Because it's all in your eyes, most of y'all tell lies
Most of y'all don't fade, most of y'all been advised
Last LP I tried to lift the black artists
But it's a difference 'tween black artists and wack artists

If I gotta slap a pussy-ass nigga, I'ma make it look sexy
It's the one and only, the world's greatest, the Kid Capri
If I gotta go hard on a bitch, I'ma make it look sexy
I pull up, hop out, air out, made it look sexy
They won't take me out my element
Nah, take me out my element",3047132
99354,2098826,FEEL.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1424574,{},"
Ain't nobody prayin' for me
(Ain't nobody prayin' for me)
(Ain't nobody prayin' for me)
Ain't nobody prayin' for me
(Nobody prayin' for me)
Ain't nobody prayin' for me
(Ain't nobody prayin' for me)
(Nobody prayin' for me)


I feel like a chip on my shoulders
I feel like I'm losin' my focus
I feel like I'm losin' my patience
I feel like my thoughts in the basement
Feel like, I feel like you're miseducated
Feel like I don't wanna be bothered
I feel like you may be the problem
I feel like it ain't no tomorrow, fuck the world
The world is endin', I'm done pretendin'
And fuck you if you get offended
I feel like friends been overrated
I feel like the family been fakin'
I feel like the feelings are changin'
Feel like my thought of compromise is jaded
Feel like you wanna scrutinize how I made it
Feel like I ain't feelin' you all
Feel like removin' myself, no feelings involved
I feel for you, I've been in the field for you
It's real for you, right? Shit, I feel like-

Ain't nobody prayin' for me
Ain't nobody prayin' for me
Ain't nobody prayin' for me
Ain't nobody prayin'


I feel niggas been out of pocket
I feel niggas tappin' they pockets
I feel like debatin' on who the greatest can stop it
I am legend, I feel like all of y'all is peasants
I feel like all of y'all is desperate
I feel like all it take is a second to feel like
Mike Jordan whenever holdin' a real mic
I ain't feelin' your presence
Feel like I'ma learn you a lesson
Feel like only me and the music though
I feel like your feelin' ain't mutual
I feel like the enemy you should know
Feel like the feelin' of no hope
The feelin' of bad dope
A quarter ounce manipulated from soap
The feelin', the feelin' of false freedom
I'll force-feed 'em the poison that fill 'em up in the prison
I feel like it's just me
Look, I feel like I can't breathe
Look, I feel like I can't sleep
Look, I feel heartless, often off this
Feelin' of fallin', of fallin' apart with
Darkest hours, lost it
Fillin' the void of bein' employed with ballin'
Streets is talkin', fill in the blanks with coffins
Fill up the banks with dollars
Fill up the graves with fathers
Fill up the babies with bullshit
Internet blogs and pulpit, fill 'em with gossip
I feel like this gotta be the feelin' where 'Pac was
The feelin' of an apocalypse happenin'
But nothin' is awkward, the feelin' won't prosper
The feelin' is toxic, I feel like I'm boxin' demons
Monsters, false prophets schemin'
Sponsors, industry promises
Niggas, bitches, honkies, crackers, Compton
Church, religion, token blacks in bondage
Lawsuit visits, subpoena served in concert
Fuck your feelings, I mean this for imposters
I can feel it, the phoenix sure to watch us
I can feel it, the dream is more than process
I can put a regime that forms a Loch Ness
I can feel it, the scream that haunts all logic
I feel like sayin' somethin', I feel like takin' somethin'
I feel like skatin' off, I feel like waitin' for 'em
Maybe it's too late for 'em
I feel like the whole world want me to pray for 'em
But who the fuck prayin' for me?

Ain't nobody prayin' for me
Who prayin' for me?
Ain't nobody prayin'",3047134
99355,2098827,LOYALTY.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,2816553,{Rihanna},"


I said I'm geeked and I'm fired up (Fired, fire)
All I want tonight is just get high (High, high, high)
Girl, you look so good, it's to die for (Die for, fire)
Ooh, that pussy good, it's to die for (I'm on fire)


It's a secret society
All we ask is trust (All we ask is trust)
All we got is us
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty


Kung Fu Kenny now
My resume is real enough for two millennium
A better way to make a wave, stop defendin' them
I meditate and moderate all of my wins again
I'm hangin' on the fence again
I'm always on your mind
I put my lyric and my lifeline on the line
And ain't no limit when I might shine, might grind
You rollin' with it at the right time, right now
(Only for the dollar sign)

Bad girl RiRi now
Swerve, swerve, swerve, swerve, leave it now
On your pulse like it's EDM
Gas in the bitch like it's premium
Haul ass on a bitch all in the fast lane
Been a bad bitch way before any cash came
I'm established, hundred carats on my name
Run the atlas, I'm a natural, I'm alright


I'm a savage, I'm a asshole, I'm a king
Shimmy ya, shimmy ya, shimmy ya rah (Yeah)
You can tell your nigga he can meet me outside (Yeah)
You can babysit him when I leave him outside
Ain't no other love like the one I know
I done been down so long lost hope
I done came down so hard I slowed
Honestly forever, all a real nigga want


I said I'm geeked and I'm fired up (Fired, fire)
All I want tonight is just to get high up (Yeah)
All I want is, all I want is


Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
10-4, no switchin' sides
Feel somethin' wrong
You actin' shifty, you don't vibe
With me no more, I need
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty

Tell me who you loyal to
Is it money? Is it fame? Is it weed? Is it drink?
Is it comin' down with the loud pipes in the rain?
Big chillin', only for the power in your name
Tell me who you loyal to
Is it love for the streets when the lights get dark?
Is it unconditional when the 'Rari don't start?
Tell me when your loyalty is comin' from the heart


Tell me who you loyal to
Do it start with your woman or your man? (Mmm)
Do it end with your family and friends? (Mmm)
Are you loyal to yourself in advance?
I said, tell me who you loyal to
Is it anybody that you would lie for?
Anybody you would slide for?
Anybody you would die for?
That's what God for


I said I'm geeked and I'm fired up (Fired, fire)
All I want tonight is just to get high up (Yeah)
All I want is, all I want is

Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
10-4, no switchin' sides
Feel somethin' wrong
You actin' shifty, you don't vibe
With me no more, I need
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty
Loyalty, loyalty, loyalty


It's so hard to be humble
It's so hard to be
Lord knows I'm tryin'
Lord knows I'm dyin', baby",3047135
99356,2098829,PRIDE.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1777191,{},"
Love's gonna get you killed
But pride's gonna be the death of you and you and me
And you and you and you and me
And you and you and you and me
And you and you and you and me and-


Me, I wasn't taught to share, but care
In another life, I surely was there
Me, I wasn't taught to share, but care
I care, I care


Hell-raising, wheel-chasing, new worldly possessions
Flesh-making, spirit-breaking, which one would you lessen?
The better part, the human heart, you love 'em or dissect 'em
Happiness or flashiness? How do you serve the question?
See, in a perfect world, I would be perfect, world
I don't trust people enough beyond they surface, world
I don't love people enough to put my faith in man
I put my faith in these lyrics, hoping I make a band
I understand I ain't perfect, I probably won't come around
This time I might put you down
Last time I ain't give a fuck, I still feel the same now
My feelings might go numb, you're dealing with cold thumb
I'm willing to give up a leg and arm to show empathy from
Pity parties and functions of you and yours
A perfect world, you probably live another 24
I can't fake humble just 'cause your ass is insecure
I can't fake humble just 'cause your ass is insecure

Me, I wasn't taught to share, but care
In another life, I surely was there
Me, I wasn't taught to share, but care
I care, I care


Maybe I wasn't there (We saw you first)
Maybe I wasn't there (I saw you first)
Maybe I wasn't there (I saw you first)
Maybe I wasn't there


Now, in a perfect world, I probably won't be insensitive
Cold as December but never remember what winter did
I wouldn't blame you for mistakes I made or the bed I laid
Seems like I point the finger just to make a point nowadays
Smiles and cold stares, the temperature goes there
Indigenous disposition, feel like we belong here
I know the walls, they can listen, I wish they could talk back
The hurt becomes repetition, the love almost lost that
Sick venom in men and women overcome with pride
A perfect world is never perfect, only filled with lies
Promises are broken and more resentment come alive
Race barriers make inferior of you and I
See, in a perfect world, I'll choose faith over riches
I'll choose work over bitches, I'll make schools out of prison
I'll take all the religions and put 'em all in one service
Just to tell 'em we ain't shit, but He's been perfect, world

Me, I wasn't taught to share, but care
In another life, I surely was there
Me, I wasn't taught to share, but care
I care, I care


Maybe I wasn't there (We saw you first)
Maybe I wasn't there (I saw you first)
Maybe I wasn't there (I saw you first)
Maybe I wasn't there",3047138
99357,2098830,LUST.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1361325,{},"
I need some water
Something came over me
Way too hot to simmer down, might as well overheat
Too close to comfort
As blood rush my favorite vein
Heartbeat racing like a junkie's
I just need you to want me
Am I asking too much?
Let me put the head in
Ooh, I don't want more than that; girl, I respect the cat
I promise, just a touch
Let me put the head in
If it's okay; she said, ""It's okay""


Yeah, I need everybody's motherfuckin' hands up right now
I need everybody's motherfuckin'-
Door and his Nike Air Rattles
Rush the fire exit, no time for battles
Well I, I never expected
This that new shit
This that new, new shit

Wake up in the mornin', thinkin' 'bout money, kick your feet up
Watch you a comedy, take a shit, then roll some weed up
Go hit you a lick, go fuck on a bitch
Don't go to work today, cop you a fit
Or maybe some kicks and make you-


Door and his Nike Air Rattles
Rush the fire exit, no time for battles
Well I, I never expected


Wake up in the morning, thinking 'bout money, kick your feet up
Watch you a comedy-hol' up
Wake up in the mornin', thinkin' 'bout money, kick your feet up
Watch you a comedy, take a shit, then roll some weed up
Go hit you a lick, go fuck on a bitch, don't go to work today
Cop you a fit or maybe some kicks and make it work today
Hang with the homies, stunt on your baby mama
Sip some lean, go get a pistol, shoot out the window
Bet your favorite team, play you some Madden
Go to the club or your mama house
Whatever you doing, just make it count (I need some water)
Wake up in the morning, thinking 'bout money, kick your feet up
Hop in the shower, put on your makeup, lace your weave up
Touch on yourself, call up your nigga, tell him he ain't shit
Credit card scam, get you a Visa, make it pay your rent
Hop on the 'Gram, flex on the bitches that be hatin' on you
Pop you a pill, call up your bitches, have 'em waitin' on you
Go to the club, have you some fun, make that ass bounce
It's whatever, just make it count

I need some water
Something came over me
Way too hot to simmer down, might as well overheat
Too close to comfort
As blood rush my favorite vein
Heartbeat racing like a junkie's
I just need you to want me
Am I asking too much?
Let me put the head in
Ooh, I don't want more than that; girl, I respect the cat
I promise, just a touch
Let me put the head in
If it's okay; she said, ""It's okay""


I wake in the morning, my head spinning from the last night
Both in a trance, feelings are dead-what a fast life
Manager called, the lobby call is 11:30
Did this before, promised myself I'd be a hour early
Room full of clothes, bag full of money: call it loose change
Fumbled my jewelry, 100K, I lost a new chain
Hop on the bird, hit the next city for another M
Take me a nap then do it again
We all woke up, tryna tune to the daily news
Looking for confirmation, hoping election wasn't true
All of us worried, all of us buried, in our feelings deep
None of us married to his proposal, make us feel cheap
Stale and sad, distraught and mad, tell the neighbor 'bout it-
Bet they agree, parade the streets with your voice proudly
Time passing, things change
Reverting back to our daily programs, stuck in our ways
Lust

Lately, I feel like I been lusting over the fame
Lately, we lust on the same routine of shame
Lately (Lately) Lately, my lust been heightened (Lately)
Lately, it's all contradiction (Lately, I'm not here)
Lately, I lust over self (Lust turn into fear)
Lately, in James 4:4 says
""Friend of the world is enemy of the Lord""
Brace yourself: Lust is all yours


I need some water
Something came over me
Way too hot to simmer down, might as well overheat
Too close to comfort
As blood rush my favorite vein
Heartbeat racing like a junkie's
I just need you to want me
Am I asking too much?
Let me put the head in
Ooh, I don't want more than that; girl, I respect the cat
I promise, just a touch
Let me put the head in
If it's okay; she said, ""It's okay""",3047140
99358,2098831,GOD.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1137622,{},"
This what God feel like, huh, he-yeah
Laughin' to the bank like, ""A-ha!"", huh, he-yeah
Flex on swole like, ""A-ha!"", huh, he-yeah
You feel some type of way, then a-ha!
Huh, he-yeah (A-ha-ha, a-ha-ha)


Ever since a young man (Since a young man)
All I wanna be was a gunman (Was a gunman)
Shootin' up the charts, better run, man
Y'all gotta see that I won, man
Slick as El DeBarge with the finger waves, work it, JT
Handle bars like a fade, watch me work it, JT
I'm at large, runnin' plays like a circuit, JT
I'm sellin' verses, JT, watch me work it, JT
Look, look... hol' up!
Don't judge me! My mama caught me with a strap
Don't judge me! I was young, fuckin' all the brats
Don't judge me! Aimin' at your head for a stack
Don't judge! Don't judge me! Now my home got a Valley peak
Don't judge me! If I press your line you a freak
Don't judge me! Won't you tell a friend? Y'all gon' see-

This what God feel like, huh, he-yeah
Laughin' to the bank like, ""A-ha!"", huh, he-yeah
Flex on swole like, ""A-ha!"", huh, he-yeah
You feel some type of way, then a-ha!
Huh, he-yeah (A-ha-ha, a-ha-ha)


Fuck is you talkin' to?
Ayy, do you know who you talkin' to?
Slide on you like fallen drapes
God toss full of carnivals
I kill 'em with kindness
Or I kill 'em with diamonds
Or I put up like fifteen hundred
Get yo' ass killed by the finest
Everything in life is a gamble
Nothin' in life I can't handle
Seen it all, done it all, felt pain more
For the cause, I done put blood on sword
Everything I do is to embrace y'all
Everything I write is a damn eight ball
Everything I touch is a damn gold mine
Everything I say is from an angel


I don't rush shit, fuck shit, always your shit, my shit
Cannonballs to ignite shit, morning to the night shift
I'm on, I ain't sorry for it
Asked for a piece of mind, you charged me for it
I wanna see sometimes if you ignore it
I'm in the streets sometimes and can't afford it
I got a bad habit, levitatin', duckin' haters
Oh my! My heart is rich, my heart is famous

This what God feel like
Huh, he-yeah (This what God feel like)
Laughin' to the bank like, ""A-ha!""
(This what God feel like)
Huh, he-yeah (This what God feel like)
Flex on swole like, ""A-ha!""
(This what God feel like)
Huh, he-yeah (This what God feel like)
You feel some type of way, then a-ha!
(This what God feel like)
Huh, he-yeah (This what God feel like)
This what God feel like",3047145
99359,2098833,DUCKWORTH.,rap,Kendrick Lamar,2017,1688031,{},"
It was always me versus the world
Until I found it's me versus me
Why, why, why, why?
Why, why, why, why?
Just remember, what happens on Earth stays on Earth!
We gon' put it in reverse


Darling, I told you many times
And I am telling you once again
Just to remind you, sweetheart
That my-


Oh, Lamar
Hail Mary and marijuana, times is hard
Pray with the hooligans, shadows all in the dark
Fellowship with demons and relatives, I'm a star
Life is one funny ma'fucker
A true comedian, you gotta love him, you gotta trust him
I might be buggin', infomercials and no sleep
Introverted by my thoughts; children, listen, it gets deep
See, once upon a time inside the Nickerson Garden projects
The object was to process and digest poverty's dialect
Adaptation inevitable: gun violence, crack spot
Federal policies raid buildings and drug professionals
Anthony was the oldest of seven
Well-respected, calm and collected
Laughin' and jokin' made life easier; hard times, mama on crack
A four-year-old tellin' his nanny he needed her
His family history: pimpin' and bangin'
He was meant to be dangerous, clocked him a grip and start slangin'
Fifteen, scrapin' up his jeans with quarter pieces
Even got some head from a smoker last weekend
Dodged a policeman, workin' for his big homie
Small-time hustler, graduated to a brick on him
Ten-thousand dollars out of a project housing, that's on the daily
Seen his first mill' twenty years old, had a couple of babies
Had a couple of shooters, caught a murder case
Fingerprints on the gun they assumin', but witnesses couldn't prove it
That was back when he turned his back and they killed his cousin
He beat the case and went back to hustlin'
Bird-shufflin', Anthony rang
The first in the projects with the two-tone Mustang, that 5.0 thing They say 5-0 came, circlin' parking lots and parking spots
And hoppin' out while harrassin' the corner blocks
Crooked cops told Anthony he should kick it
He brushed 'em off and walked back to the Kentucky Fried Chicken
See, at this chicken spot, there was a light-skinned nigga that talked a lot
With a curly top and a gap in his teeth, he worked the window
His name was Ducky, he came from the streets, The Robert Taylor Homes
Southside Projects, Chiraq, the Terror Dome
Drove to California with a woman on him and five-hundred dollars
They had a son, hopin' that he'd see college
Hustlin' on the side with a nine-to-five to freak it
Cadillac Seville, he'd ride his son around on weekends
Three-piece special with his name on the shirt pocket
'Cross the street from the projects, Anthony planned to rob it
Stuck up the place before, back in '84
That's when affiliation was really at gears of war
So many relatives tellin' us, sellin' us devilish works, killin' us, crime
Intelligent, felonious prevalent proposition with 9's
Ducky was well-aware
They robbed the manager and shot a customer last year
He figured he'd get on these niggas' good sides
Free chicken every time Anthony posted in line, two extra biscuits
Anthony liked him and then let him slide, they didn't kill him
In fact, it look like they're the last to survive, pay attention
That one decision changed both of they lives, one curse at a time
Reverse the manifest and good karma, and I'll tell you why
You take two strangers and put 'em in random predicaments
Give 'em a soul, so they can make their own choices and live with it
Twenty years later, them same strangers, you make 'em meet again
Inside recording studios where they reapin' their benefits
Then you start remindin' them about that chicken incident
Whoever thought the greatest rapper would be from coincidence?
Because if Anthony killed Ducky, Top Dawg could be servin' life
While I grew up without a father and die in a gunfight
*Gunshot*

Thgifnug a ni eid dna rehtaf a tuohtiw pu werg I elihW
Efil 'nivres eb dluoc gwaD poT ,ykcuD dellik ynohtnA fi esuaceB
Ecnedicnioc morf eb dluow reppar tsetaerg eht thguoht reveohW?
Tnedicni nekcihc taht tuoba meht 'nidnimer trats uoy nehT
Stifeneb rieht 'nipaer yeht erehw soiduts gnidrocer edisnI
Niaga teem me' ekam uoy ,sregnarts emas meht ,retal sraey ytnewT
Ti htiw evil dna seciohc nwo rieht ekam nac yeht os luos a me' eviG
Stnemaciderp modnar ni me' tup dna sregnarts owt ekat uoY
Yhw uoy llet ll'I dna ,amrak doog dna tsefinam eht esreveR
Emit a ta esruc eno ,sevil yeht fo htob degnahc noisiced eno tahT
Noitnetta yaP-
Erac tuB
-Tpecnoc etalucammi ,siht ekil eno ecnis retrauq eniacoC
AND ym edisni ytlayor tog ,ytlayoL
-Tog I ,tog I ,tog I ,tog I
So, I was takin' a walk the other day...",3047147
99549,2102206,1-800-273-8255,rap,Logic,2017,7955642,"{Khalid,""Alessia Cara""}","
I've been on the low, I been taking my time
I feel like I'm out of my mind
It feel like my life ain't mine (Who can relate? Woo)
I've been on the low, I been taking my time
I feel like I'm out of my mind
It feel like my life ain't mine


I don't wanna be alive, I don't wanna be alive
I just wanna die today, I just wanna die
I don't wanna be alive, I don't wanna be alive
I just wanna die
And let me tell you why


All this other shit I'm talkin' 'bout, they think they know it
I've been praying for somebody to save me, no one's heroic
And my life don't even matter, I know it, I know it
I know I'm hurting deep down, but can't show it
I never had a place to call my own
I never had a home, ain't nobody callin' my phone
Where you been? Where you at? What's on your mind?
They say every life precious but nobody care about mine

I've been on the low, I been taking my time
I feel like I'm out of my mind
It feel like my life ain't mine (Who can relate? Woo)
I've been on the low, I been taking my time
I feel like I'm out of my mind
It feel like my life ain't mine


I want you to be alive, I want you to be alive
You don't gotta die today, you don't gotta die
I want you to be alive, I want you to be alive
You don't gotta die, now let me tell you why


It's the very first breath when your head's been drowning underwater
And it's the lightness in the air when you're there chest-to-chest with a lover
It's holding on, though the road's long, seeing light in the darkest things
And when you stare at your reflection, finally knowing who it is
I know that you'll thank God you did


I know where you been, where you are, where you goin'
I know you're the reason I believe in life
What's the day without a little night?
I'm just tryna shed a little light
It can be hard
It can be so hard
But you gotta live right now
You got everything to give right now

I've been on the low, I been taking my time
I feel like I'm out of my mind
It feel like my life ain't mine (Who can relate? Woo)
I've been on the low, I been taking my time
I feel like I'm out of my mind
It feel like my life ain't mine


I finally wanna be alive, I finally wanna be alive
I don't wanna die today, I don't wanna die
I finally wanna be alive, I finally wanna be alive
I don't wanna die, I don't wanna die


Pain don't hurt the same, I know
The lane I travel feels alone
But I'm moving 'til my legs give out
And I see my tears melt in the snow
But I don't wanna cry, I don't wanna cry anymore
I wanna feel alive, I don't even wanna die anymore
Oh, I don't wanna
I don't wanna
I don't even wanna die anymore",3050777
99618,2103147,Theres Nothing Holdin Me Back,pop,Shawn Mendes,2017,2419538,{},"
I wanna follow where she goes
I think about her and she knows it
I wanna let her take control
'Cause everytime that she gets close, yeah


She pulls me in enough to keep me guessing (Mmmm)
And maybe I should stop and start confessing, confessing, yeah


Oh, I've been shaking
I love it when you go crazy
You take all my inhibitions
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back
You take me places that tear up my reputation
Manipulate my decisions
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back
There's nothing holdin' me back
There's nothing holdin' me back

She says that she's never afraid
Just picture everybody naked
She really doesn't like to wait
Not really into hesitation


Pulls me in enough to keep me guessing
And maybe I should stop and start confessing, confessing, yeah


Oh, I've been shaking
I love it when you go crazy
You take all my inhibitions
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back
You take me places that tear up my reputation
Manipulate my decisions
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back
There's nothing holdin' me back


'Cause if we lost our minds and we took it way too far
I know we'd be alright, I know we would be alright
If you were by my side and we stumbled in the dark
I know we'd be alright, I know we would be alright
'Cause if we lost our minds and we took it way too far
I know we'd be alright, I know we would be alright
If you were by my side and we stumbled in the dark
I know we'd be alright, we would be alright

Oh, I've been shaking
I love it when you go crazy
You take all my inhibitions
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back
You take me places that tear up my reputation
Manipulate my decisions
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back (Oh whoa)
There's nothing holdin' me back
I feel so free when you're with me, baby
Baby, there's nothing holdin' me back",3051803
99627,2103286,IDGAF,pop,Dua Lipa,2017,1257936,{},"
You call me all friendly
Tellin' me how much you miss me
That's funny, I guess you've heard my songs
Well, I'm too busy for your business
Go find a girl who wants to listen
'Cause if you think I was born yesterday, you have got me wrong


So I cut you off
I don't need your love
'Cause I already cried enough
I've been done
I've been movin' on since we said goodbye
I cut you off
I don't need your love
So you can try all you want
Your time is up, I'll tell you why


You say you're sorry, but it's too late now
So save it, get gone, shut up
'Cause if you think I care about you now
Well, boy, I don't give a fuck

I remember that weekend
When my best friend caught you creepin'
You blamed it all on the alcohol
So, I made my decision
'Cause you made your bed, sleep in it
Play the victim and switch your position
I'm through, I'm done


So I cut you off
I don't need your love
'Cause I already cried enough
I've been done
I've been movin' on since we said goodbye
I cut you off
I don't need your love
So you can try all you want
Your time is up, I'll tell you why


You say you're sorry, but it's too late now
So save it, get gone, shut up
'Cause if you think I care about you now
Well, boy, I don't give a fuck

I see you tryna get to me
I see you beggin' on your knees
Boy, I don't give a fuck
So stop tryna get to me
Tch, get up off your knees
'Cause, boy, I don't give a fuck


About you
No, I don't give a damn
You keep reminiscin' on when you were my man
But I'm over you
Now you're all in the past
You talk all that sweet talk, but I ain't comin' back


Cut you off
I don't need your love
So you can try all you want
Your time is up, I'll tell you why
I'll tell you why


You say you're sorry, but it's too late now
So save it, get gone, shut up
(Too late now)
'Cause if you think I care about you now
Well, boy, I don't give a fuck
(Boy, I don't give a)

I see you tryna get to me
I see you beggin' on your knees
Boy, I don't give a fuck
So stop tryna get to me (get to me)
Tch, get up off your knees
'Cause, boy, I don't give a fuck",3051942
99917,2107933,Despacito Remix,pop,Luis Fonsi & Daddy Yankee,2017,23351415,"{""Justin Bieber""}","


Comin' over in my direction
So thankful for that, it's such a blessin', yeah
Turn every situation into heaven, yeah
Oh-oh, you are
My sunrise on the darkest day
Got me feelin' some kind of way
Make me wanna savor every moment slowly, slowly
You fit me tailor-made, love how you put it on
Got the only key, know how to turn it on
The way you nibble on my ear, the only words I wanna hear
Baby, take it slow so we can last long


¡Oh! Tú, tú eres el imán y yo soy el metal
Me voy acercando y voy armando el plan
Sólo con pensarlo se acelera el pulso (Oh, yeah)
Ya, ya me está gustando más de lo normal
Todos mis sentidos van pidiendo más
Esto hay que tomarlo sin ningún apuro

Despacito
Quiero respirar tu cuello despacito
Deja que te diga cosas al oído
Para que te acuerdes si no estás conmigo
Despacito
Quiero desnudarte a besos despacito
Firmo en las paredes de tu laberinto
Y hacer de tu cuerpo todo un manuscrito
(Sube, sube, sube
Sube, sube)


Quiero ver bailar tu pelo, quiero ser tu ritmo (Woah, woah)
Que le enseñes a mi boca (Woah, woah)
Tus lugares favoritos (Favorito, favorito, baby)
Déjame sobrepasar tus zonas de peligro (Woah, woah)
Hasta provocar tus gritos (Woah, woah)
Y que olvides tu apellido


Si te pido un beso, ven, dámelo, yo sé que estás pensándolo
Llevo tiempo intentándolo, mami, esto es dando y dándolo
Sabes que tu corazón conmigo te hace bom, bom
Sabes que esa beba está buscando de mi bom, bom
Ven, prueba de mi boca para ver cómo te sabe
Quiero, quiero, quiero ver cuánto amor a ti te cabe
Yo no tengo prisa, yo me quiero dar el viaje
Empecemos lento, después salvaje

Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamos pegando, poquito a poquito
Cuando tú me besas con esa destreza
Veo que eres malicia con delicadeza
Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamos pegando, poquito a poquito
Y es que esa belleza es un rompecabezas
Pero pa' montarlo aquí tengo la pieza
¡Oye!


Despacito
Quiero respirar tu cuello despacito
Deja que te diga cosas al oído
Para que te acuerdes si no estás conmigo
Despacito
Quiero desnudarte a besos despacito
Firmo en las paredes de tu laberinto
Y hacer de tu cuerpo todo un manuscrito
(Sube, sube, sube
Sube, sube)


Quiero ver bailar tu pelo, quiero ser tu ritmo (Woah, woah)
Que le enseñes a mi boca (Woah, woah)
Tus lugares favoritos (Favorito, favorito, baby)
Déjame sobrepasar tus zonas de peligro (Woah, woah)
Hasta provocar tus gritos (Woah, woah)
Y que olvides tu apellido

Despacito
This is how we do it down in Puerto Rico
I just wanna hear you screaming, ""¡Ay, Bendito!""
I can move forever cuando esté contigo
¡Báilalo!


Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamos pegando, poquito a poquito
Que le enseñes a mi boca
Tus lugares favoritos
(Favorito, favorito, baby)
Pasito a pasito, suave suavecito
Nos vamos pegando, poquito a poquito
Hasta provocar tus gritos (Fonsi)
Y que olvides tu apellido (D.Y.)
Despacito",3057010
100140,2111218,Attention,pop,Charlie Puth,2017,3868264,{},"
Woah-oh, hm-hmm


You've been runnin' 'round, runnin' 'round, runnin' 'round
Throwin' that dirt all on my name
'Cause you knew that I, knew that I, knew that I'd call you up
You've been going 'round, going 'round, going 'round
Every party in LA
'Cause you knew that I, knew that I, knew that I'd be at one, oh


I know that dress is karma, perfume regret
You got me thinking 'bout when you were mine, ooh
And now I'm all up on ya, what you expect?
But you're not coming home with me tonight


You just want attention, you don't want my heart
Maybe you just hate the thought of me with someone new
Yeah, you just want attention, I knew from the start
You're just making sure I'm never gettin' over you, oh

You've been runnin' 'round, runnin' 'round, runnin' 'round
Throwin' that dirt all on my name
'Cause you knew that I, knew that I, knew that I'd call you up
Baby, now that we're, now that we're, now that we're
Right here standin' face to face
You already know, 'ready know, 'ready know
That you won, oh


I know that dress is karma (Dress is karma), perfume regret, yeah
You got me thinking 'bout when you were mine, ooh
(You got me thinking 'bout when you were mine)
And now I'm all up on ya (All up on ya), what you expect? (Oh, baby)
But you're not coming home with me tonight, oh no


You just want attention, you don't want my heart
Maybe you just hate the thought of me with someone new (One new)
Yeah, you just want attention (Oh), I knew from the start (The start)
You're just making sure I'm never gettin' over you (Over you), oh


What are you doin' to me?
What are you doin', huh? (What are you doin'?)
What are you doin' to me?
What are you doin', huh? (What are you doin'?)
What are you doin' to me?
What are you doin', huh? (What are you doin'?)
What are you doin' to me?
What are you doin', huh?

I know that dress is karma, perfume regret
You got me thinking 'bout when you were mine
And now I'm all up on ya, what you expect?
But you're not coming home with me tonight


You just want attention, you don't want my heart
Maybe you just hate the thought of me with someone new
Yeah, you just want attention, I knew from the start
You're just making sure I'm never gettin' over you (Over you)


What are you doin' to me? (Hey)
What are you doin', huh? (What are you doin', love?)
What are you doin' to me?
What are you doin', huh? (Yeah, you just want attention)
What are you doin' to me? (I knew from the start)
What are you doin' huh? (You're just making sure I'm never gettin' over you)
What are you doin' to me?
What are you doin', huh?",3060662
100322,2113503,BabyWipe,rap,Ski Mask the Slump God,2017,1756044,{},"
Ayy
CashMoneyAP
Yuh, yuh, yuh, who?
Bitch, ayy
Sauce
Flex, wet, in the flesh, ayy


How is you feelin', vro? Uh
Feelin' like the Four, I feel fantastic
Which one would you be though? Uh
Mr. Fantastic 'cause my money like elastic
Burberry trench raincoat
You smoke oregano, I'm smoking on the cat piss
I'ma be real ya' know, when I whip my dick out
She said, ""Too big, gotta map this""
How is you feelin', vro? Uh
Feelin' like the Four, I feel fantastic
Which one would you be though? Uh
Mr. Fantastic 'cause my money like elastic
Burberry trench raincoat
You smoke oregano, I'm smoking on that cat piss
I'ma be real ya' know, when I whip my dick out
She said, ""Too big, gotta map this""

Ayy, water that pussy like baptist
To find my sauce, need a atlas
Her pussy hungry and starving
So my dick is what I use it as the damn catnip
Rap game on faster than fast so
Be real, all these niggas I might overlap them
Never mind, I just might cap them
Just like a taser, I zap them
Shock, mm I fuck a bitch in the dark, mmm
My diamonds shine in the dark, mmm
Weed deadass smell like a fart, mmm
I'ma go just like a cart, hmm
You police, I'll call you Paul, uh, Blart, uh
Try but you never can fuck my thot
Or Milly Rock on my block
Okay, Post Malone with that pistol (Post Malone)
I see you is the issue (Post Malone)
I know that you hard as tissues (Hard!)
See you giggle like tickle
Your bitch seeking me like missile (Yup, yup, yup)
Heat sensor on my pickle
You know that I tell no fiddles (Hee!)
But I rhyme right like a riddle, okay, like


How is you feelin', vro? (Stabby!)
Feeling like the Four, I feel fantastic (-Tastic!)
Which one would you be though? (Which one?)
Mr. Fantastic 'cause my money like elastic (-Lastic!)
Burberry trench raincoat (Burr! Burr!)
You smoke oregano, I'm smoking on the cat piss (Cat piss!)
I'ma be real ya' know, when I whip my dick out
She said ""too big, gotta map this"" (Hooooo!)

Map, map, map (Map)
You the type to have eyebrow cat scratch (Scratch, scratch)
And I'm in the field like baseball bat
And I'm fresh off a lick like an old Tic-Tac
You done fucked up like you take a step back
Cool cat like a stray in a freezer in the back
Like you're JAY-Z, no Roc-A-Fella holla back
But I'm 'bout the damn money boomerang back
Okay like lisp, is how I speak 'cause I sip
Lean like what's done on your bitch
In your mouth, I fit a fist
Pistol best friends with my hip
Like T.I., bitch as a tip
I don't get head, I get lip
The sauce is water I dripped
The sauce is water I, ayy


How is you feelin', vro? (How is you?)
Feelin' like the Four, bitch I feel fantastic (Feelin' like a, feelin' like a)
Which one would you be though? (Which?)
Mr. Fantastic 'cause my money like elastic
Burberry trench raincoat
You smoke oregano, I'm smoking on the cat piss (Hahaha)
I'ma be real ya' know, when I whip my dick out (Yeah)
She said, ""Too big, gotta map this"" (Flex, wet)
How is you feelin', vro? (How is you?)
Feeling like the Four, bitch, I feel fantastic (Bitch)
Which one would you be though? (Where's the champagne?)
Mr. Fantastic 'cause my money like elastic (Pop it)
Burberry trench raincoat
You smoke oregano, I'm smoking on that cat piss
(You will, regret! You will, regret!)
I'ma be real ya' know, when I whip my dick out
She said, ""Too big, gotta map this""

I think I'm done (Map this, map this)
I think I'm done (Map this)
I don't think I gotta say anything actually
Ayy ayy, ayy",3063333
100523,2117237,Luis Fonsi  Daddy Yankee - Despacito Remix ft. Justin Bieber English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2017,1541359,{},"
Come on over in my direction
So thankful for that, it's such a blessin', yeah
Turn every situation into heaven, yeah
Oh, you are
My sunrise on the darkest day
Got me feelin' some kind of way
Make me wanna savor every moment slowly, slowly
You fit me, tailor-made love, how you put it on
Got the only key, know how to turn it on
The way you nibble on my ear, the only words I wanna hear
Baby, take it slow so we can last long


Oh, you, you are the magnet and I'm the metal
I keep getting closer and building up the plan
Just thinking about it raises my heartbeat
Oh, yeah I, I'm already liking you more than usual
All my senses are asking for more
This needs to be taken with no hurry

Slowly
I want to smell your neck slowly
Let me whisper things in your ear
So that you'll remember if you're not with me
Slowly
I want to undress you with my kisses, slowly
I sign the walls of your labyrinth
And make your whole body a manuscript
(Hop on, hop on, hop on!
Hop on, hop on!)


I want to see your hair dance
I want to be your rhythm
And you show my mouth
Your favorite places
(Favorite, favorite, baby)
Let me surpass your danger zones
To make you scream
And you forget your last name


If I ask you for a kiss, come, give it to me
I know that you're thinking about it
I've been trying for a while
Baby, this is giving and giving it
You know that your heart with mine makes you go bang-bang
You know that she is looking for my bang-bang
Come, taste from my mouth to see what it tastes like
I want to, I want to, I want to see how much love you can take in
I am not in a hurry, I want to take the trip
Let's start slow, then wild

Step by step, smooth and gentle
We're sticking together, little by little
When you kiss me with such skill
I see that you're malice with tenderness
Step by step, smooth and gentle
We start sticking, little by little
And such beauty is a puzzle
But to solve it here I have the piece
Listen!


Slowly
I want to smell your neck slowly
Let me whisper things in your ear
So that you remember if you're not with me
Slowly
I want to undress you with my kisses, slowly
I sign the walls of your labyrinth
And make your whole body a manuscript
(Hop on, hop on, hop on!
Hop on, hop on!)


I want to see your hair dance
I want to be your rhythm
And you show my mouth
Your favorite places
(Favorite, favorite, baby)
Let me surpass your danger zones
To make you scream
And you forget your last name

Slowly
This is how we do it down in Puerto Rico
I just wanna hear you screaming, ""Oh my god!""
I can move forever when it is with you
Dance!


Step by step, smooth and gentle
We're sticking together, little by little
You show my mouth
Your favorite places
(Favorite, favorite, baby)
Step by step, smooth and gentle
We're sticking together, little by little
Until we provoke screams (Fonsi)
And you forget your last name (D.Y.)
Slowly",3067667
100708,2118754,Bad at Love,pop,Halsey,2017,1141618,{},"
Got a boy back home in Michigan
And he tastes like Jack when I'm kissing him
So I told him that I never really liked his friends
Now he's gone and he's calling me a bitch again
There's a guy that lives in the garden state
And he told me that we'd make it 'til we graduate
So I told him that the music would be worth the wait
But he wants me in the kitchen with a dinner plate


I believe, I believe, I believe, I believe that we're meant to be
But jealousy, jealousy, jealousy, jealousy get the best of me
Look, I don't mean to frustrate, but I
Always make the same mistakes, yeah
Always make the same mistakes 'cause


I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)
But you can't blame me for tryin'
You know I'd be lyin' sayin'
You were the one (Ooh-ooh)
That could finally fix me
Lookin' at my history
I'm bad at love

Got a girl with California eyes
And I thought that she could really be the one this time
But I never got the chance to make her mine
Because she fell in love with little thin white lines
London girl with an attitude
We never told no one, but we look so cute
Both got way better things to do
But I always think about it when I'm riding through


I believe, I believe, I believe, I believe that I'm in too deep
And jealousy, jealousy, jealousy, jealousy get the best in me
Look, I don't mean to frustrate, but I
Always make the same mistakes, yeah
Always make the same mistakes 'cause


I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)
But you can't blame me for tryin'
You know I'd be lyin' sayin'
You were the one (Ooh-ooh)
That could finally fix me
Lookin' at my history
I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)

Oh, you know, you know, you know, you know (Ooh-ooh)
I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)
I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)


I know that you're afraid I'm gonna walk away
Each time the feeling fades
Each time the feeling fades
I know that you're afraid I'm gonna walk away
Each time the feeling fades


You know I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)
But you can't blame me for tryin'
You know I'd be lyin' sayin'
You were the one (Ooh-ooh)
That could finally fix me
Lookin' at my history
I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)


Oh, you know, you know, you know, you know (Ooh-ooh)
I'm bad at love (Ooh-ooh)
Oh, oh",3069729
100754,2119479,Slow Hands,pop,Niall Horan,2017,1028437,{},"
(Woo)


We should take this back to my place
That's what she said right to my face
'Cause I want you bad
Yeah, I want you, baby
I've been thinkin' 'bout it all day
And I hope you feel the same way, yeah


'Cause I want you bad
Yeah, I want you, baby


Slow, slow hands
Like sweat drippin' down our dirty laundry
No, no chance
That I'm leavin' here without you on me
I, I know
Yeah, I already know that there ain't no stoppin'
Your plans and those
Slow hands (Woo)
Slow hands

I just wanna take my time
We could do this, baby, all night, yeah


'Cause I want you bad
Yeah, I want you, baby


Slow, slow hands
Like sweat drippin' down our dirty laundry
No, no chance
That I'm leavin' here without you on me
I, I know
Yeah, I already know that there ain't no stoppin'
Your plans and those
Slow hands (Woo)


Fingertips puttin' on a show
Got me now and I can't say no
Wanna be with you all alone
Take me home, take me home
Fingertips puttin' on a show
Can't you tell that I want you, baby, yeah

Slow hands
Like sweat drippin' down our dirty laundry
No, no chance
That I'm leavin' here without you on me
I, I know
Yeah, I already know that there ain't no stoppin'
Slow hands
Like sweat drippin' down our dirty laundry
No, no chance
That I'm leavin' here without you on me
I, I know
Yeah, I already know that there ain't no stoppin'
Your plans and those
Slow hands (Woo)
Slow hands
Woo, slow hands",3070591
101038,2123990,Malibu,pop,Miley Cyrus,2017,1034733,{},"
I never came to the beach or stood by the ocean
I never sat by the shore under the sun with my feet in the sand
But you brought me here, and I'm happy that you did
'Cause now I'm as free, as birds catchin' the wind
I always thought I would sink, so I never swam
I never went boatin', don't get how they are floatin'
And sometimes I get so scared of what I can't understand


But here I am, next to you
The sky's more blue in Malibu
Next to you in Malibu
Next to you


We watched the sun go down as we were walkin'
I'd spent the rest of my life just standing here talkin'
You would explain the current, as I just smile
Hoping that you'll stay the same and nothing will change
And it'll be us, just for a while
Do they even exist?
That's when I make a wish, to swim away with the fish
Cause it's supposed to be this hot all summer long
I never would've believed you if three years ago you told me
I'd be here writing this song

But here I am, next to you
The sky's so blue in Malibu
Next to you in Malibu
Next to you
Next to you
The sky's so blue in Malibu
Next to you


We are just like the waves that flow back and forth
Sometimes I feel like I'm drowning
And you're there to save me
And I wanna thank you with all of my heart
It's a brand new start
A dream come true in Malibu",3075800
101046,2124103,Mona Lisa,rap,Lil Wayne,2018,2099452,"{""Kendrick Lamar""}","
I got a story to tell, you know that I cherish thee
Hope it ain't too many feelings involved


I see niggas in this bitch stuntin', poppin' bottles
Gettin' drunk with these bitches, and when they leave they get followed
Fall asleep with that bitch and really don't know much about her
Then she let us in, we take all of your shit, and when you wake up, she help you try to find it, I love it


I be with bitches that be with bitches that be with niggas with riches
I tell her, ""Get him,"" she say, ""I got you,"" I say, ""No, bitch, I said get him""
And they so pretty, and they hair lengthy, he hit it and sleep on her titties
Then she give us the word, we come through with AKs, it's a stick-up, she scream like a victim
Now you feelin' so silly, I smoke color purple, I'm up in here feelin' like Celie (Ooh)
Nappy-ass dreads, what's that you say? Watch your mouth, Milli Vanilli (Ooh)
You can get snaked, you can get faked out by the bitch that you feelin'
'Cause you thought that she was an angel, that bitch ain't no angel, I treat her halo like a frisbee
And you tellin' your business, she tell me your business, you tell that bitch what you feelin'
All of the beans you be spillin', to you, she lie through her teeth cavities, fillin's
She know where you hide it tell me where it's hidden, she know when you're gone, tell me when to visit
We break in your home and take the specifics, and meanwhile, the bitch is on vacation with him
So she don't get blamed, we don't snatch chains, we find out addresses, and we don't leave messes
You'll only know that it's gone when you checkin', then your first thought is to start second guessin'
She say, ""What's wrong?"" He say, ""Nothin', keep restin',"" she say, ""What's missin'?"" ""How you know somethin' missin'?""
He scratch his head, she say, ""Get back in bed,"" and she gave him some head
Boy, you can't trust them bitches, and then she say, ""Ooh""

I see niggas in this bitch stuntin', poppin' bottles
Gettin' drunk with these bitches, then when they leave they get followed
I be with bitches that know the bitches that's with the niggas we followin'
Get them on the line, stay two cars behind and tell them hoes, ""Don't be so obvious!""
Mona Lisa, long hair, don't care
She handle the business and don't ever tell, she bite the bullet and cough up the shells
She tell 'em, ""Ooh, daddy, let's go to your place,"" and if he say yeah, then we meet him there
She feed him lies with his silverware, she don't want love, she just want her share


I know a bitch named Liz, this nigga think she his 'cause she tell him that it is
So he tell her all his secrets, he tell her all his fears, and then she tell me and I be all ears
And then I go and tell my people, and they already know him, and then I call Liz, and she say he comin' over
I say, ""Good girl, just remember what I told you,"" she gave me the salute, I say, ""Girl, you're a soldier""
We're waitin' outside, watch him pull up, walk up to the door and right before he knock
She open the door naked, she left it unlocked, they started French kissin' so he didn't see moi
And then she let him in, they stopped on the couch, music up loud with his head in the clouds
Turn that shit down, and I scared the piss out of him, piss a nigga off, put a gun to his frown
""Nigga, turn around, I ain't here to fuck around, I ain't here to fuck around, caught you wit' your pants down
You know what it is, put your fuckin' hands up, Liz, that's enough, you can put your hands down""
And then he looked dead at her and he shook his head at her, she a good actress, and you a dead actor
You'll be dead after we get what we're after, if Liz call you daddy, she about to be a bastard, oh
I got way too many bitches that do anything for me, nigga, but think for me, nigga
Send her to you like she ain't for me, nigga, I hope you alone like bankruptcy, nigga
She pour you a drink, that drank on me, nigga, she slip somethin' in it, now faint for me, nigga
Mona Lisa, I done painted the picture, Mo-Mona Lisa, out the frame on these niggas
Pussy got you out of character, nigga, you fall for these hoes off your ladder, my nigga
Take everythin' that you have 'til you don't even have an opinion, we have your attention
And now you're lookin' down a barrel though, nigga, now she lookin' for her pantyhose, nigga
We just lookin' for the casserole, nigga, but she gon' show us where you stash it though, nigga (Mona)

Ah, every day she wake up with a different color makeup and a promise he gone take her to the movie and the mall
Chillin' with the Laker, on the floor, fourth quarter, four minute on the clock, Black Mamba with the ball
Paparazzi lookin' at 'em both poppin' up and take a picture, uh, probably on a Internet blog
In a minute, he gon' be admittin' that he love her on his mother, man, he want to meet her mother by tomorrow
(Mona Lisa) Pussy good enough, it got him sinnin' in the walls
And he diggin' in it like he livin' in it, make a new religion with it, man a nigga 'bout to go against God
Poetry in a pear tree, sweet tone like a hummingbird when she asked him
Did he want to make love in a yellow taxi? Never gave two fucks, jumped in the backseat
Woke up in the mornin' to The Great Gatsby, then he dogged it again like the bitch Lassie
I'm a dog in the wind, I'm a pit laughin', I'ma call up again like I did last week
Make good with the friend and I'm all jazzy, Britney with the twin and the girl Ashley
Found out that I fucked, he was unhappy, bitch, I never let the bullshit get past me
Better yet, I wanna break up, don't you ask me 'bout a motherfuckin' double standard, actin'
Fuckin' on another nigga, that's a negative alone, but you sucked his dick? That's just nasty
Matter of fact, bitch, gimme your phone! (No) You fuckin' with Wayne's? (No!)
Bitch, gimme your phone! (No! Let me, let me take this call real quick) (... lick me like a lollipop)
He on your fuckin' ringtone? Is that the shit that you do? Touchin' yourself, lookin' at Kendrick videos
Jump on the internet, watchin' his interviews, I don't know what the fuck lately got into you
Tell me who love you, I bet I love harder, forgot all the shit that I did for your daughter?
The Pampers, the Pedialyte and my momma, daycare after school and she never did charge you
You scandalous as fuck and I hope you blow up, you know what? I give up, let me go get my gun
I got one in the chamber I'm plannin' on aimin', goddammit, you know that the damage is done
Bitch, I'm emotional 'cause I'm in stress, I'm not supposed to go through this, I guess
So in conclusion, since you like rappers that's killin' that pussy, I'm killin' myself

She say, ""Ooh, Daddy, ooh,"" Mona Lisa, Mona Lisa
Ooh, fake smile (Ooh), Mona Lisa, Mona Lisa
She say, ""Ooh,"" no emotion (Ooh), Mona Lisa, Mona Lisa
Now he get the picture, Mona Lisa, Mona Lisa, yeah",3075914
101048,2124131,MIA,pop,Bad Bunny,2018,1175773,{Drake},"


Bad Bunny, baby, bebé
Yeh-yeh-yeh-yeh
Yeah
Todos están pendiente' a ti (¡Woo!)
Pero tú puesta pa' mí (Ajá)
Haciendo que me odien más (Yeh-yeh-yeh)


Porque todos te quieren probar (Ah)
Lo que no saben es que no te dejas llevar de cualquiera
Y todos te quieren probar (Nah)
Lo que no saben es que hoy yo te voy a buscar (Yeh-yeh)


Dile que tú eres mía, mía
Tú sabe' que eres mía, mía
Tú misma lo decías
Cuando yo te lo hacía (Yeh)
Dile que tú eres mía, mía
Tú sabe' que eres mía, mía
Tú misma lo decías
Cuando yo te lo hacía
(Yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah)

Bebé, yo soy fan de tu caminar (¡Wouh!)
Te doy todo lo mío, hasta mi respirar (Yeh)
Contigo veo todo como en espiral (Yeh)
Quiero tirarnos fotos y que se hagan viral (Ja)
Tus ojos me concentran como Adderall (¡Wouh!)
Contigo me sube el overall (Yeh)
Te toco y hasta el mundo deja de girar (¡Wouh-wouh!)
A nosotros ni la muerte nos va a separar (Wah)
Bebé, yo soy tuyo na' más (Na' más)
Diles que conmigo te vas (¡Wouh!)
Que dejen de tirarte (Rrr)
Que a ti nadie va a tocarte


Dile que tú eres mía, mía
Tú sabe' que eres mía, mía
Tú misma lo decías (Tú misma lo decías)
Cuando yo te lo hacía (Cuando yo te lo hacía, yeh)
Dile que tú eres mía, mía
Tú sabe' que eres mía, mía
Tú misma lo decías (Tú misma lo decías)
Cuando yo te lo hacía (Cuando yo te lo hacía)


Yo soy tu Romeo, pero no Santo' (No)
A estos bobos con la forty los espanto (Plo-plo)
Muchas me quieren desde que yo canto (Ja)
Pero yo soy tuyo na' más (¡Wouh!)
Yo soy tu Romeo, pero no Santo (Yeh)
A estos bobos con la forty los espanto
Muchas me quieren desde que yo canto (Ajá)
Pero yo soy tuyo na' más (¡Buh!)
Dile que tú eres mía desde la high (Desde la high, yeh)
El yerno favorito de tu mai' (De tu mai')
El capo que tenía to' las Jordans y las Nike (Y las Nike; ¡wouh-wouh!)
Dile a estos bobos que dejen de darte like (De darte like)
Quiero esta noche entera
Pa' recordar los tiempos en la escalera (La escalera)
Dile que yo no soy cualquiera
Yo soy tu primero, tú eres mi primera (Yah-yah-yah)

Porque todos te quieren probar (Ajá)
Lo que no saben es que no te dejas llevar de cualquiera (No-no-no-no)
Y todos te quieren probar (¡Wouh!)
Lo que no saben es que hoy yo te voy a buscar (Yeh-yeh, ¡rrrrrrah!)


Dile que tú eres mía, mía
Tú sabe' que eres mía, mía
Tú misma lo decías (Tú misma lo decías)
Cuando yo te lo hacía (Cuando yo te lo hacía)
Dile que tú eres mía, mía
Tú sabe' que eres mía, mía
Tú misma lo decías (Tú misma lo decías)
Cuando yo te lo hacía (Cuando yo te lo hacía)",3075944
101251,2126807,Strip That Down,pop,Liam Payne,2017,1621801,{Quavo},"
Huncho, Quavo
Yo, yo


You know I've been taking some time
And I've been keeping to myself (Self)
I had my eyes up on the prize
Ain't watching anybody else
But your love, it hit me hard, girl
Yeah, you're bad for my health
I love the cards that I've been dealt
Do you feel the same as well?


You know I used to be in 1D (Now I'm out, free)
People want me for one thing (That's not me)
I'm not changing the way that I (Used to be)
I just wanna have fun and (Get rowdy)
One Coke and Bacardi (Sippin' lightly)
When I walk inside the party (Girls on me)
F1 type Ferrari (Six gear speed)
Girl, I love it when your body (Grinds on me, baby)
Oh yeah, oh

You know I love it when the music's loud
But come on, strip that down for me, baby
Now there's a lot of people in the crowd
But only you can dance with me
So put your hands on my body
And swing that round for me, baby (Swing)
You know I love it when the music's loud
But come on, strip that down for me (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


Oh, strip that down, girl
Love when you hit the ground, girl (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh, strip that down, girl
Love when you hit the ground


You know that since the day I met you
Yeah, you swept me off my feet
You know that I don't need no money
When your love is beside me
Yeah, you opened up my heart
And then you threw away the key
Girl, now it's just you and me
And you don't care 'bout where I've been

You know I used to be in 1D (Now I'm out, free, free)
People want me for one thing (That's not me)
I'm not changing the way that I (Used to be)
I just wanna have fun and (Get rowdy, ooh)
One Coke and Bacardi (Sippin' lightly)
When I walk inside the party (Girls on me)
F1 type Ferrari (Six gear speed)
Girl, I love it when your body (Grinds on me, baby)
Ooh


You know I love it when the music's loud
But come on, strip that down for me, baby
Now there's a lot of people in the crowd
But only you can dance with me
So put your hands on my body
And swing that round for me, baby (yeah)
You know I love it when the music's loud
But come on, strip that down for me (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


Oh, strip that down, girl (Ayy)
Love when you hit the ground, girl (Strip it down, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh, strip that down, girl (Oh, ho, ho, ho)
Love when you hit the ground (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh, strip that down, girl (Yeah)
Love when you hit the ground, girl (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh, strip that down, girl (Ooh, oh)
Love when you hit the ground (Quavo)

She gon' strip it down for a thug, yeah (Strip it down)
Word around town she got the buzz, yeah (Word)
Five shots in, she in love now (Shots)
I promise, when we pull up, shut the club down (Woo, hey)
I took her from her man, don't nobody know (Know)
If you popped the seal, better drive slow (Slow)
She know how to make me feel with my eyes closed (Skrrt skrrt)
Anything goes down with the Huncho (Huncho)


You know I love it when the music's loud
But come on, strip that down for me,baby
Now there's a lot of people in the crowd
But only you can dance with me
So put your hands on my body
And swing that round for me, baby
You know I love it when the music's loud
But come on, strip that down for me (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Come on, strip that down for me (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, ayy)
Don't say nothing, girl
Strip that down for me (Strip it down, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
All I want, girl
If you strip that down for me (Strip it down, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
You're the one, girl
Come on, strip that down for me (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)",3079084
101312,2128274,Swish Swish,pop,Katy Perry,2017,1670284,"{""Nicki Minaj""}","
They know what is what
But they don't know what is what
They just strut
What the fuck?


A tiger
Don't lose no sleep
Don't need opinions
From a shellfish or a sheep
Don't you come for me
No, not today
You're calculated
I got your number
'Cause you're a joker
And I'm a courtside killer queen
And you will kiss the ring
You best believe


So keep calm, honey, I'ma stick around
For more than a minute, get used to it
Funny my name keeps comin' outcho mouth
'Cause I stay winning
Lay 'em up like

Swish, swish, bish
Another one in the basket
Can't touch this
Another one in the casket


Your game is tired
You should retire
You're 'bout cute as
An old coupon expired
And karma's not a liar
She keeps receipts


So keep calm, honey, I'ma stick around
For more than a minute, get used to it
Funny my name keeps comin' outcho mouth
'Cause I stay winning
Lay 'em up like


Swish, swish, bish
Another one in the basket
Can't touch this
Another one in the casket
Swish, swish, bish
Another one in the basket
Can't touch this
Another one in the casket

They know what is what
But they don't know what is what
Katy Perry
They just know what is what
Young Money
But they don't know what is what
They just know what is what
But they don't know what is what
They just strut
Hahaha, yo
What the fuck?


Pink Ferragamo sliders on deck
Silly rap beefs just get me more checks
My life is a movie, I'm never off set
Me and my amigos (no, not Offset)
Swish swish, aww I got them upset
But my shooters'll make 'em dance like dubstep
Swish, swish, aww, my haters is obsessed
'Cause I make M's, they get much less
Don't be tryna double back
I already despise you
All that fake love you showin'
Couldn't even disguise you
Ran? When? Nicki gettin' tan
Mirror mirror who's the fairest bitch in all the land?
Damn, man, this bitch is a Stan
Muah, muah, the generous queen will kiss a fan
Ass goodbye, I'ma be riding by
I'ma tell my ----- Biggz, yeah that's tha guy
A star's a star, da ha da ha
They never thought the swish god would take it this far
Get my pimp cup, this is pimp shit, baby
I only rock with Queens, so I'm makin' hits with Katy

Swish, swish, bish
Another one in the basket
Can't touch this
Another one in the casket


They know what is what
Do they know?
But they don't know what is what
They just know what is what
But they don't know what is what
They just know what is what
But they don't know what is what
They just strut
What the...",3080768
101314,2128287,Whatever It Takes,rock,Imagine Dragons,2017,1269256,{},"
Falling too fast to prepare for this
Tripping in the world could be dangerous
Everybody circling is vulturous
Negative, nepotist
Everybody waiting for the fall of man
Everybody praying for the end of times
Everybody hoping they could be the one
I was born to run, I was born for this


Whip, whip
Run me like a racehorse
Pull me like a ripcord
Break me down and build me up
I wanna be the slip, slip
Word upon your lip, lip
Letter that you rip, rip
Break me down and build me up


Whatever it takes
'Cause I love the adrenaline in my veins
I do whatever it takes
'Cause I love how it feels when I break the chains
Whatever it takes
Yeah, take me to the top
I'm ready for whatever it takes
'Cause I love the adrenaline in my veins
I do what it takes

Always had a fear of being typical
Looking at my body feeling miserable
Always hanging on to the visual
I wanna be invisible
Looking at my years like a martyrdom
Everybody needs to be a part of 'em
Never be enough, I'm the prodigal son
I was born to run, I was born for this


Whip, whip
Run me like a racehorse
Pull me like a ripcord
Break me down and build me up
I wanna be the slip, slip
Word upon your lip, lip
Letter that you rip, rip
Break me down and build me up


Whatever it takes
'Cause I love the adrenaline in my veins
I do whatever it takes
'Cause I love how it feels when I break the chains
Whatever it takes
Yeah, take me to the top
I'm ready for whatever it takes
'Cause I love the adrenaline in my veins
I do what it takes

Hypocritical, egotistical
Don't wanna be the parenthetical, hypothetical
Working hard on something that I'm proud of, out of the box
An epoxy to the world and the vision we've lost
I'm an apostrophe
I'm just a symbol to remind you that there's more to see
I'm just a product of the system, a catastrophe
And yet a masterpiece, and yet I'm half-diseased
And when I am deceased
At least I'll go down to the grave and die happily
And leave the body and the soul to be a part of thee
I do what it takes


Whatever it takes
'Cause I love the adrenaline in my veins
I do whatever it takes
'Cause I love how it feels when I break the chains
Whatever it takes
Yeah, take me to the top
I'm ready for whatever it takes
'Cause I love the adrenaline in my veins
I do what it takes",3080781
101326,2128488,More Than You Know,pop,Axwell  Ingrosso,2017,1069796,"{""Axwell Λ Ingrosso""}","
I just need to get it off my chest
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
You should know that, baby, you're the best
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know


I saw it coming, from miles away
I better speak up if I got something to say
'Cause it ain't over, until she sings
You had your reasons, you had a few
But you know that I would go anywhere for you
'Cause it ain't over, until she sings


I just need to get it off my chest
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
You should know that, baby, you're the best
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know

I just...
I just...


Your good intentions are sweet and pure
But they can never tame a fire like yours
No it ain't over, until she sings
Right where you wanted, down on my knees
You got me begging, pretty baby, set me free
'Cause it ain't over, until she sings


Come a little closer, let me taste your smile
Until the morning light
Ain't no going back the way you look tonight
I see it in your eyes


I just need to get it off my chest
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
You should know that, baby, you're the best
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know

Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know


I just...


I just need to get it off my chest
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know
You should know that, baby, you're the best
Yeah, more than you know
Yeah, more than you know",3081001
101416,2129711,Revenge,rock,XXXTENTACION,2017,3388311,{},"
I think I, I think I finally
Found a way to forgive myself
From mistakes I made in my past
I think that's the first step, right?
You agree?


I've dug two graves for us, my dear
Can't pretend that I was perfect, leavin' you in fear
Oh, man, what a world, the things I hear
If I could act on my revenge, then, oh, would I?
Some kill, some steal, some break your heart
And you thought that I would let it go and let you walk
Well, broken hearts break bones, so break up fast
And I don't wanna let it go, so in my grave I'll rot
I've dug two graves for us, my dear
Can't pretend that I was perfect, leavin' you in fear
Oh, man, what a world, the things I hear
If I could act on my revenge, then, oh, would I?
Some kill, some steal, some break your heart
And you thought that I would let it go and let you walk
Broken hearts break bones, so break up fast
And I don't wanna let it go, so in my grave I'll rot

In my grave, I'll rot
In my grave, I'll rot
In my grave, I'll rot-ot-ot
In my grave, I'll rot
In my grave, I'll rot-ot-ot
In my grave, I'll rot


In my grave, I'll rot
I'll rot, I'll rot, I'll rot
Is my pain your freedom?
Is all of my pain your freedom?
Enjoy",3082569
101520,2131094,Bad Liar,pop,Selena Gomez,2017,1021335,{},"
I was walking down the street the other day
Tryna distract myself
But then I see your face
Oh wait, that's someone else
Tryna play it coy
Tryna make it disappear
But just like the battle of Troy
There's nothing subtle here
In my room there's a king size space
Bigger than it used to be
If you want you can rent that place
Call me an amenity
Even if it's in my dreams


Ooh you're taking up a fraction of my mind
Ooooh every time I watch you serpentine


Oh I'm tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Oh tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Not to think about you
No, no, no, no
Not to think about you
No, no, no, no
Oh I'm tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Oh tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Not to give in to you
No, no, no, no
Not to give in to you
No, no, no, no

With my feelings on fire
Guess I'm a bad liar


I see how your attention builds
It's like looking in a mirror
Your touch like a happy pill
But still all we do is fear
What could possibly happen next?
Can we focus on the love?
Paint my kiss across your chest
If you're the art, I'll be the brush


Ooh you're taking up a fraction of my mind
Ooooh every time I watch you serpentine


Oh I'm tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Oh tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Not to think about you
No, no, no, no
Not to think about you
No, no, no, no
Oh I'm tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Oh tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Not to give in to you
No, no, no, no
Not to give in to you
No, no, no, no

With my feelings on fire
Guess I'm a bad liar


And oh baby let's make reality, actuality, a reality
Oh baby let's make reality, actuality, a reality


Oh, oh, I'm tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Oh tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Not to think about you
No, no, no, no
Not to think about you
No, no, no, no
Oh I'm tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Oh tryin', I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
I'm tryin', I'm tryin'
Not to give in to you
No, no, no, no
Not to give in to you
No, no, no, no

With my feelings on fire
Guess I'm a bad liar",3084463
101757,2134566,RAF,rap,A$AP Mob,2017,1019723,"{""Frank Ocean"",""A\\$AP Rocky"",""A\\$AP Mob"",Quavo,""Lil Uzi Vert"",""Playboi Carti""}","
(Dun D-D-D-Deal, hey)


I done came up (Yeah)
Bustin' down a whole bag (Bag)
Broke nigga, step back (What?)
Why don't you peep a nigga's swag? (Yeah)
You ain't even gotta ask (What?)
What are those? What is that? (Yeah)
Please don't touch my Raf (Please don't touch my Raf)
Please don't touch my Raf (What?)
I'm racked up like rappers (Uh)
I'm Raf-d up on camera (That's Rick)
Get knocked out on camera (All this Rick)
Squeeze pump like asthma (Yeah, what?)
It's rare Raf when I wear Raf (Uh)
Bare Raf when I wear Raf (Rick)
Might invest into some Raf shares (All this Rick)
Lil' niggas still share Raf (What?)
Yeah and I'm drippin' on racks (Uh)
Rick Owens be the tag (Rick)
Do the digital dash (All this Rick)
Yeah, I'm boastin', never brag (Yah)
Please don't touch my Raf (What?)
Bought a Kris Van Assche (Yeah)
Alessandro Gucci glasses (Yeah)
J.W. Anderson collab (Uh)
Yeah, she pop it like a MAC (What?)
Yeah, she drop it on the bag (Uh)
I'ma buy another bag (Bag up)
'Cause she always bring it back (Uh)
Yeah, you know how to make it last (Yeah)
Plus, a nigga keepin' tabs (Uh)
I'ma fly first class (Uh)
Quavo hit 'em with the dab (Yeah)
Please don't touch my Raf (Please don't touch my Raf)

Ho, don't step on my Raf Simons (Yeah, Raf)
Ho, don't step on my Raf Simons (Uh, Raf)
Ho, don't step on my Raf Simons (Ooh)
Do you know how much I'm spendin'? (Huh, ooh)
My closet, it worth 'bout a milli' (Milli', yeah, yeah)
Took the lil' bitch out the runway (Yeah, uh)
Now she naked in the kitchen (Uh)
Raf Simons (Ayy)
All kind of crazy colors (Ayy, ayy)
Livin' color (Colors)
Left wrist, Rollie butters (Ice)
Maison Margiela my sweater (Margiela)
Mama told me never settle (Mama)
Raf Simons, don't lace 'em (It's Raf)
Got your bitch, wanna date her (Ooh)


Huh? What?
Don't want 'em talkin' 'bout the paper
I swear to God these niggas be haters (Yeah)
They be hatin', I feel all the vapors
Live in cul-de-sac, gon' get that lawn
Ooh, right with my neighbors (Yeah)
Diamonds on my neck and Rollie on
Now Atlanta got all different flavors
Hit that bitch right on with my lightsaber
Ooh, feel like Darth Vader
I'm a boss so you know I might Wraith you
Ooh, Raf in my basement (Yeah)
Yeah, pass the gas
But you know that I'm gon' face it
Wait, that's the reason that they mad
'Cause Lil Uzi, yeah, he made it, ayy (Yeah)
I wore that Raf 'fore I made it, yeah
I wore that Raf 'fore I made it, yeah
Got that Raf all in my basement, yeah
Fuck your bitch once, ain't got patience, yeah (Yeah)
Fuck your bitch once 'cause I'm famous, yeah
Put my side bitch in Marc Jacobs, ayy
Makin' them plays with my label
I get it, I count it, hundred on my table (Yeah)

We gon' need a bigger table, though
Need some cable, tired of watchin' basic
Wouldn't sign ya if I had a label
That designer on a nigga label, fuego
Down the bottle, still under the limit
I could buy your bitch just off my debit
I could buy her, not fuck up my credit
Ain't no executives flexin' my blessings
Ain't no middleman cuttin' my blessings
I got all of this flick for the Lord's worship
You ain't slammin', got the Asperger's
I'ma drag that nigga, he deserve it
I'ma read his ass like a LaBeija (Drag)
Anna Wintour cool with my mama (True)
And it's winter fool, need a bomber
Plate of ravioli at Obama's, right, right, right
Can't you see I'm eating (What's poppin'?)
Wrist like ravioli, stuffed with diamonds, right, right?
We don't have the same problems
I get Raf Simons 'cause I'm gifted
That means sometimes I get it and don't even want it
Give Raf Simons when I'm giftin'
That means sometimes I give it, you know that you want it (Yeah)


Sterling silver lasers (Yessir)
Rubies red, my skin too black to blush
This bitch too rare to bust
Seen her in the iPhone pages
This ain't on the Gram, Wizard of O-Z
Parka pockets full of med leaf
Guap is smelling like it brush teeth
Say cheese, see the porcelain (Flair)
Xans and water, see swordfish (Plenty)
Backwoods all forestry
Raf draggin' on the floor, bitch
Flamethrower in it, in it (Flame, flame)
I'm torchin' the road in these Gucci flames (Heat)
Stuck to the pavement, they glued (Sticky)
I'm two-point-five million a venue
And twenty-five hundred a tooth (True)
I'm coatin' my lungs in the muddy
I'm cold like I'm sick with the flu (Brr)
I cover my face and I'm bloody (Yeah, brr)
That Spring/Summer 2002, two, two (Two, two)
Yeah, please don't touch my Raf
Sleep in the grass, Teddy
Sleep with the Teddy
Quick with the hands, ready (Ready)
Please don't touch my bag
Please don't touch my Raf
Shirt off, I'm cam ready (Ready)
Deadstock in memory (Memory)
Please don't pop my tag",3088199
101810,2135501,BUTTERFLY EFFECT,rap,Travis Scott,2017,2794257,{},"
All the commas
Murda on the beat so it's not nice
Ooh, hmm


For this life, I cannot change (Change)
Hidden Hills, deep off in the main (Main)
M&M's, sweet like candy cane (M&M's, cane, cane)
Drop the top, pop it, let it bang (Top, pop it, pop it)
For this life, I cannot change (Change)
Hidden Hills, deep off in the main (Hills, main)
M&M's, sweet like candy cane (M&M's, cane, cane)
Drop the top, pop it, let it bang (Top, pop it, pop it)


Drop the top, play hide and seek (Yeah)
Jump inside, jump straight to the league (League)
Take a sip, feel just how I be (It's lit)
On Freeway, but no, ain't nothin' free (Straight up)
Bend laws, bend lanes (Skrrt, skrrt)
Been bustin' bills, but still, ain't nothin' change (Skrrt, skrrt)
You in the mob soon as you rock the chain (Mob)
She caught the waves, just thumbin' through my braids (Alright)
Heatin' up, baby, I'm just heatin' up (It's lit)
Need your love, not a need, it is a must (Yeah)
Feelin' stuck, you know how to keep me up (Yeah, yeah)
Icy love, icy like a hockey puck (Alright)

For this life, I cannot change (Change)
Hidden Hills, deep off in the main (Main)
M&M's, sweet like candy cane (M&M's, cane, cane)
Drop the top, pop it, let it bang (Top, pop it, pop it)
For this life, I cannot change
Hidden Hills, deep off in the main (Yeah, yeah)
M&M's, sweet like candy cane (Cane)
Drop the top, pop it, let it bang


All the ones, all the chains piled on the mantle (Yeah)
All the dawgs, all the dawgs low creep right behind me in the Phantom (It's lit)
Yeah, never go, never go dip on the set, stayed Santana
Yeah, run it back, turn the lights on when I hit up Green Lantern (It's lit, alright)
Yeah, fly the broads, fly the dawgs down to Atlanta
Yeah, in the cut in Medusa, lay low, yeah, I might be
Yeah, roll up, help me calm down when I'm movin' high speed
Yeah, if I send one, need to text back 'cause you know what I need (Straight up)
Oh, please (Oh, please), oh, me (Oh, me), oh, my (Oh, my)
We been movin', we been movin' for some time (Alright)
Flexin', flexin', try to exercise
Exercise (Exercise), exercise (Exercise), exercise (Exercise), exercise (Exercise, yeah, yeah)


For this life, I cannot change (Change, change)
Hidden Hills, deep off in the main (Main, main)
M&M's, sweet like candy cane (M&M's, cane, cane)
Drop the top, pop it, let it bang (Top, pop it, pop it)
For this life, I cannot change
Hidden Hills, deep off in the main
M&M's, sweet like candy cane (Cane)
Drop the top, pop it, let it bang (Bang, yeah)",3089187
102183,2141073,Bodak Yellow,rap,Cardi B,2017,8059961,{},"
KSR
It's Cardi, ayy
Said I'm the shit, they can't fuck with me if they wanted to
I don't gotta dance


Said lil' bitch, you can't fuck with me if you wanted to
These expensive, these is red bottoms, these is bloody shoes
Hit the store, I can get 'em both, I don't wanna choose
And I'm quick, cut a nigga off, so don't get comfortable, look
I don't dance now, I make money moves (Ayy, ayy)
Say I don't gotta dance, I make money move
If I see you and I don't speak, that means I don't fuck with you
I'm a boss, you a worker, bitch, I make bloody moves


Now she say she gon' do what to who? Let's find out and see
Cardi B, you know where I'm at, you know where I be
You in the club just to party, I'm there, I get paid a fee
I be in and out them banks so much, I know they're tired of me
Honestly, don't give a fuck 'bout who ain't fond of me
Dropped two mixtapes in six months
What bitch working as hard as me?
I don't bother with these hoes, don't let these hoes bother me
They see pictures, they say, ""Goals,"" bitch, I'm who they tryna be
Look, I might just chill in some BAPE
I might just chill with your boo, I might just feel on your babe
My pussy feel like a lake
He wanna swim with his face, I'm like, ""Okay""
I'll let him get what he want, he buy me Yves Saint Laurent
And the new whip, when I go fast as a horse
I got the trunk in the front (Vroom, vroom)
I'm the hottest in the street, know you prolly heard of me
Got a bag and fixed my teeth, hope you hoes know it ain't cheap
And I pay my mama bills, I ain't got no time to chill
Think these hoes be mad at me, their baby father run a bill

Said lil' bitch, you can't fuck with me if you wanted to
These expensive, these is red bottoms, these is bloody shoes
Hit the store, I can get 'em both, I don't wanna choose
And I'm quick, cut a nigga off, so don't get comfortable, look
I don't dance now, I make money moves
Say I don't gotta dance, I make money moves
If I see you and I don't speak, that means I don't fuck with you
I'm a boss, you a worker, bitch, I make bloody moves


If you a pussy, you get popped, you a goofy, you a opp
Don't you come around my way, you can't hang around my block
And I just checked my accounts, turns out, I'm rich, I'm rich, I'm rich
I put my hand above my hip, I bet you dip, he dip, she dip
I say I get the money and go, this shit is hot like a stove
My pussy glitter is gold, tell that lil' bitch play her role
I just arrove in a Rolls, I just came up in a Wraith
I need to fill up the tank, no, I need to fill up the safe
I need to let all these hoes know that none of their niggas is safe
I go to dinner and steak, only the real can relate
I used to live in the P's, now it's a crib with a gate
Rollie got charms, look like Frosted Flakes
Had to let these bitches know, just in case these hoes forgot
I just run and check the mail, another check from Mona Scott

Said lil' bitch, you can't fuck with me if you wanted to
These expensive, these is red bottoms, these is bloody shoes
Hit the store, I can get 'em both, I don't wanna choose
And I'm quick, cut a nigga off, so don't get comfortable, look
I don't dance now, I make money moves
Say I don't gotta dance, I make money move
If I see you and I don't speak, that means I don't fuck with you
I'm a boss, you a worker, bitch, I make bloody moves",3095483
102572,2146650,Never Be the Same,pop,Camila Cabello,2017,1964275,{},"
Somethin' must've gone wrong in my brain
Got your chemicals all in my veins
Feelin' all the highs, feelin' all the pain
Let go of the wheel, that's the bullet lane
Now I'm seein' red, not thinkin' straight
Blurrin' all the lines, you intoxicate me


Just like nicotine, heroin, morphine
Suddenly, I'm a fiend and you're all I need
All I need, yeah, you're all I need


It's you, babe
And I'm a sucker for the way that you move, babe
And I could try to run, but it would be useless
You're to blame
Just one hit of you, I knew I'll never be the same
It's you, babe
And I'm a sucker for the way that you move, babe
And I could try to run, but it would be useless
You're to blame
Just one hit of you, I knew I'll never ever, ever be the same

I'll never be the same
I'll never be the same
I'll never be the same


Sneakin' in L.A. when the lights are low
Off of one touch, I could overdose
You said, ""Stop playin' it safe
Girl, I wanna see you lose control""


Just like nicotine, heroin, morphine
Suddenly, I'm a fiend and you're all I need
All I need, yeah, you're all I need


It's you, babe
And I'm a sucker for the way that you move, babe
And I could try to run, but it would be useless
You're to blame
Just one hit of you, I knew I'll never be the same
It's you, babe
And I'm a sucker for the way that you move, babe
And I could try to run, but it would be useless
You're to blame
Just one hit of you, I knew I'll never ever, ever be the same

I'll never be the same
I'll never be the same
I'll never be the same


You're in my blood, you're in my veins, you're in my head (I blame)
You're in my blood, you're in my veins, you're in my head (I'm sayin')


I'm sayin' it's you, babe
And I'm a sucker for the way that you move, babe
And I could try to run, but it would be useless
You're to blame (You're to blame)
Just one hit of you, I knew I'll never be the same (I'll never be the...)
It's you, babe
And I'm a sucker for the way that you move, babe
And I could try to run, but it would be useless
You're to blame
Just one hit of you, I knew I'll never ever, ever be the same",3107031
102645,2147965,Tú No Metes Cabra,rap,Bad Bunny,2017,1313427,{},"


Cuando ustede' me ven, yo sé que tiemblan
Yo estoy ready twenty four hours
El Father, pídanme la bendición
Yeh, yeh, yeh, yeh


Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (Yeh)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (¡Wouh!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (No!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (¡Rrr!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (Yeh)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (¡Plo-plo!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (Chiqui)
Y si te me esbocas, nos vamos al switche (¡Plo!)


Yeh, estoy subiendo como espuma
Prendiéndole en la cara al que no fuma
Ando con Adidas, veloces como un puma
El Undertaker saliendo de la bruma
Y se apagan las luce', prende el wax para que me muse
Tú no metes cabra, tú no luces
No es el Mercedes, es quien lo conduce
Y dime qué son Retro sin un Jordan que las use, yeh
Evita el delay
Aquí si no te ponchamos, te damos doble play (¡Wouh!)
No existe replay
Son Miami sin Lebron y Wade (¡Prr!)
Nos vamos a switcher, aunque me fichen (Yeh)
Me tiran, pero soy un pitcher (Pitcher)
Tu jeva loca que me la chiche (¡Wouh!)
Yo matando y tú mirando en los bleacher, yeh

Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (Jajaja)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (No)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (Hmm, ¡no!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (Yeh)
Y si te me esbocas, nos vamos al switche


Yo controlo la calle sin ser bichote
Un melón y pico 'entro el pote (Chiqui)
Yo tengo el pique flow chipotle (¡Wouh!)
Shaquille O'Neal debajo 'el aro, nadie me quita un rebote
La nueva religión, yo soy la nueva era (Do it)
El responsable de que ustede' se cayeran (Yeh)
Apartamento frente al mar, lo tengo de pecera (¡Wouh!)
Y el sour diesel directo de la nevera
Se bebe y se chinga como en prom (Prom)
Yo soy un hijoeputa.com
En el VIP soy Donald Trump (Yeh)
Yo tengo to' Gucci, hasta las foap, yeh (Huh-huh)


Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (¡Wouh!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche (¡No!)
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Tú no metes cabra, saramambiche
Y si te me esbocas, nos vamos al switche

(Yo no escucho lo que ustedes están diciendo allá abajo)
Yeh, yeh, yeh, yeh
Bad Bunny, baby, bebé, bebé
Trap Kingz, baby
(El jefe)
Hear This Music
(El jefe)
Jajajaja
Díselo, Luian
Mambo Kingz, ¡Mambo Kingz!",3103548
102713,2149293,Şehrimin Tadı,rap,Ezhel,2017,1098177,{},"


Ah, Ankara ayazı ruhumu keser
Bi' cebimde yok kapital
Bi' cebimde kenevir tohumu
Ayrancı, Cebeci, Kennedy yokuşu
Kaybettim gene şu yolumu
Kafam taşşak gibi, karnımız aç! (Karnımız aç)
N'apsak şimdi? (N'apsak şimdi?) Süpermarketten çalsak bi' şey;
Sosis ve salam! (Woo)
Yerim, kafam düşer tekrar, tekrar ot ister canım
Ah, polisten kaçın! (B-B-Bugy)
Rap'in pavyonunda olurum Çubuklu Yaşar
Manita tutulur bana; onu da öpemem, lüzumsuz kaçar
Atar atar gider bebeler, bebeler
Takılır gecelerde, maymunluk yapar
Gözü kızıl, gözü kara bebek
Çözüp durdum, çözüm ''para'' demek
O da bana ve de sana gerek
Salak bebelerde karakter eksik
Daha hanginizi adam ede'k?
Yanaşır yılışık, bahane seks
Soyup soyar seni atar heves
Yanında viski ve vodka ve afgan var hepsinin tadı nefis

Karanlık çöktüğünde (Karanlık, karanlık, karanlık)
Koktuğunda kömür so-kak (Karanlık, karanlık, karanlık)
Şehrimin tadı ağzımda yine; is, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
Karanlık çöktüğünde (Karanlık çöktüğünde)
Koktuğunda kömür so-kak (Koktuğunda kömür sokak)
Şehrimin tadı ağzımda yine; is, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, ah


Tüm şehir bi' pavyon ve bizim paramız yok
Şükür ki karnımız tok, şansımız çok olur elimiz floş
Sadece dirsekten aşağımız bronz
Kışımız soğuk olur, kırımız boz
Kızımız hoş olur, hızlıdır çok
Denizi var ama kıyısı yok
Kuyumu kaz, ister ki kuyruğuma bas
Tek huyunuz laf, ama kuru avazınız, tuzunuz kuru da kurunuz yaş
Suçluluk duygunuz surata yansır, bırakın yansın
Kıralım kafa
Ben de sözde kralım la', kralım lafta
İnceyi anla, İncek'i İncesu'dan ayıran sistemi sik'im
Hep size, hep size lan, biz de isteriz bi' şey
Gençlerim işsiz de patronlar sizken sikeyim işi
Kendi patronum benim, takım elbisemse kapşonum, berem
Metropollerinde hapsolur gelen
Ghettolar evinse hep sonun beter
Ketum ol bebem
Duyarlar, işine sokarlar çomak
Çok ahkam kesenler çıkarlar korkak
Hiç emek vermeden çıkarlar ortak
Sen zannediyo'ken çıkarlar ortak
Sonunda seni de tokatlar sokak
Konular forumda bok atmak kolay
Kokarken sokaklar düşersin boka
İs, pas, kir, kömürde yaşarsın boşa

Karanlık çöktüğünde
Koktuğunda kömür so-kak
Şehrimin tadı ağzımda yine; is, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
Karanlık çöktüğünde
Koktuğunda kömür so-kak
Şehrimin tadı ağzımda yine; is, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür, plastik, çöplük, lastik, egzoz, esrar
İs, pas, kir, kömür (Plastik, çöplük, lastik)


(Egzoz, esrar)
(Kömür, plastik, egzoz, esrar)
(Kömür, plastik, egzoz, esrar)
(Kömür, plastik, egzoz, esrar)
(Kömür)",3105009
102722,2149500,Rake It Up,rap,Yo Gotti,2017,2382803,"{""Nicki Minaj""}","
Ear Drummers
30, you a fool for this one
Ah, this the strip club anthem, nigga, what's up?
Young Money!
Yeah, me and Mike WiLL pull up to AOD back to back
Them AMG 63's
Mike WiLL Made-It, nigga


I tell all my hoes, ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up""
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up, fuck it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up, rake it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
I tell all my hoes (what?) ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up"" (bag it up, bag it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up)

I made love to a stripper (stripper), first I had to tip her (phrrr)
Twenty thousand ones (woo), she said I'm that nigga (I am)
I said, ""I'm that nigga, bitch, I already know it"" (I know it)
I come with bad weather (ksh), they say I'm a storm (ayy)
VVS's in my charm, that's a Roc-A-Fella chain
I was sendin' bricks to Harlem back when Jay was still with Dame
I'm in Phillipe Chow (what?), I got a Patek on (okay)
Got a stripper with me, she picked up the check, homes (phrrr)
She gon' fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
She don't need make-up (make-up)
She gon' rake it up, rake it up (rake it up)
She gon' tell a nigga pay up (pay up)
She said pay for the pussy, pay for the pussy (pay)
Wait for the pussy, wait for the pussy (wait)
Asked God to forgive me (why?)
'Cause I prayed for the pussy, prayed for the pussy


I tell all my hoes, ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up""
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up, fuck it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up, rake it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
I tell all my hoes (what?) ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up"" (bag it up, bag it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up)

Yo, yo
Brought out the pink Lamborghini just to race with Chyna
Brought the Wraith to Chyna just to race in China
Lil' bad Trini bitch but she mixed with China
Real thick vagina, smuggle bricks to China (woo)
I tell all my niggas (yo), cut the check (cut the check)
Buss it down, turn your goofy down (down) pound
I'ma do splits on it, yes, splits on it (splits)
I'm a bad bitch, I'ma throw fits on it (fits)
I'ma bust it open! I'ma go stupid and be a ditz on it (ditz)
I don't date honey (no), cookie on tsunami (oh)
All my niggas wife me once they get that good punani (oh)
I think he need a Bonnie, I might just let him find me
Never trust a big butt and a smile, word to Ronnie
Re-rep Queens like Supreme, ask Webb and Nitti
A-ask Bimmy and Joe, nigga, run me my dough
Wr-wrist game is freezin' like it wait in the cold
Nickname is Nicki, but my name ain't Nicole (grrr)


I tell all my hoes, ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up""
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up, fuck it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up, rake it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
I tell all my hoes (what?) ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up"" (bag it up, bag it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up)

Well, I'm the doughboy, the one they talkin' about
All these gossipin' ass niggas got my name in they mouth
I know the bad bitches but know niggas who bitches too
They should bleed once a month 'cause that's what these bitches do
You a (beitch) and ya bitch should expose you
All that pillow talkin', nigga, that's what the hoes do
You a (beitch) word to my nigga $hort
We won't never write no statement, we ain't showin' up in court
(Beitch) We don't do no gossipin', we don't do no arguin'
We don't beef on social sites, we just hit our target
We don't do no rumors (rumors) we don't don't pay no shooters (brrr)
You a little bitty bitch, you should work at Hooters (yeah)
You a old hater, you a fuckin' cougar
You a (beitch) and he a (beitch) and y'all like twin sisters
Respect ya hustle, get ya money baby, win with us
Ya boyfriend actin' like a (beitch) then why you still with him?


I tell all my hoes, ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up""
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up, fuck it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up, rake it up)
Back it up, back it up (back it up, back it up)
I tell all my hoes (what?) ""Rake it up
Break it down, bag it up"" (bag it up, bag it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Fuck it up, fuck it up (fuck it up)
Rake it up, rake it up (rake it up)",3105241
102789,2150518,Its Everyday Bro,rap,Jake Paul,2017,5007877,"{""Team 10""}","
Yah
Y'all can't handle this
Y'all don't know what's about to happen, baby
(It's everyday bro, everyday)
Team 10
Los Angeles, Cali boy
But I'm from Ohio though, white boy


It's everyday, bro, with the Disney Channel flow
Five mil' on YouTube in six months, never done before
Passed all the competition, man, PewDiePie is next
Man, I'm poppin' all these checks, got the brand new Rolex
And it match the Lambo too, and I'm coming with the crew
This is Team 10, bitch, who the hell are flippin' you?
And you know I kick them out if they ain't with the crew
Yeah, I'm talking about you, you beggin' for attention
Talking shit on Twitter, too, but you still hit my phone last night
It was 4:52, and I got the text to prove
And all the recordings too, don't make me tell them the truth
And I just dropped some new merch, and it's selling like a god church
Ohio's where I'm from, we chew 'em like it's gum
We shooting with a gun, the tattoo just for fun
I Usain Bolt and run, catch me at game one
I cannot be outdone, Jake Paul is number one

It's everyday bro
It's everyday bro
It's everyday bro
I said it's everyday bro!


You know it's Nick Crompton, and my collar stay poppin'
Yes, I can rap, and no, I'm not from Compton
England is my city
And if it weren't for Team 10, then the US would be shitty
I'll pass it to Chance, 'cause you know he stay litty


Two months ago, you didn't know my name
And now you want my fame?
Bitch I'm blowin' up, I'm only going up
Now I'm going off, I'm never fallin' off
Like Mag, who? Digi who? Who are you?
All these beefs, I just ran through, hit a milli' in a month
Where were you? Hatin' on me back in West Fake
Think you need to get your shit straight
Jakey brought me to the top, now we really poppin' off
Number one and number four, that's why these fans all at our door
It's lonely at the top, so we all going
We left Ohio, now the trio's all rollin'
It's Team 10, bitch
We back again, always first, never last
We the future, we'll see you in the past

It's everyday bro
It's everyday bro
It's everyday bro
I said it's everyday bro!


Hold on, hold on, hold on (Espera)
Can we switch the language? (Ha, ya tú sabe')
We 'bout to hit it (Dale)


Sí, lo único que quiero es dinero
Trabajando en YouTube todo el día entero (Dale)
Viviendo en U.S.A, el sueño de cualquiera (Ha)
Enviando dólares a mi familia entera (Pasta)
Tenemos una persona por encima
Se llama Donald Trump y está en la cima
Desde aquí te cantamos, can I get my VISA?
Martinez Twins, representando España
Desde la pobreza a la fama


It's everyday bro
It's everyday bro
It's everyday bro
I said it's everyday bro!

Yo, it's Tessa Brooks
The competition shook
These guys up on me
I got 'em with the hook
Lemme educate ya
And I ain't talking book
Panera is your home
So stop calling my phone
I'm flyin' like a drone
They buying like a loan
Yeah, I smell good
Is that your boy's cologne?


Is that your boy's cologne?
Started ballin', Quicken Loans
Now I'm in my flippin' zone
Yes, they all copy me, but
That's some shitty clones
Stay in all designer clothes
And they ask me what I make
I said, ""It's ten with six zeros""
Always plug merch link in bio
And I will see you tomorrow 'cause
It's everyday bro
Peace",3106424
102792,2150628,Mi Gente,pop,J Balvin & Willy William,2017,1558734,{},"


Si el ritmo te lleva a mover la cabeza
Ya empezamos como es
Mi música no discrimina a nadie
Así que vamos a romper
Toda mi gente se mueve
Mira el ritmo cómo los tiene
Hago música que entretiene
El mundo nos quiere, nos quiere
Me quiere a mí
Toda mi gente se mueve
Mira el ritmo cómo los tiene
Hago música que entretiene
Mi música los tiene fuerte bailando
Y se baila así




Tamo' rompiendo la discoteca
La fiesta no para, apenas comienza
C'est comme-ci, c'est comme ça
Ma chèrie, la-la-la-la-la
Francia, Colombia
Me gusta (Freeze)
J Balvin, Willy William
Le gusta (Freeze)
Los DJ's no mienten, le gusta a mi gente
Y eso se fue mundial (Freeze)
No le bajamos, más nunca paramos
Es otro palo y ¡blam!

¿Y dónde está mi gente?
Mais fais bouger la tête
¿Y dónde está mi gente?
Say yeah, yeah, yeah
Un, dos, tres, ¡leggo!
(Ay, di que sí)




Esquina a esquina, de ahí no' vamo'
El mundo es grande, pero lo tengo en mi' manos
Estoy muy duro, sí, ok, ahí vamos
Y con el tiempo nos seguimos elevando
Que seguimos rompiendo aquí
Esta fiesta no tiene fin
Botellas para arriba, sí
Los tengo bailando, rompiendo y yo sigo aquí
Que seguimos rompiendo aquí
Esta fiesta no tiene fin
Botellas para arriba, sí
Los tengo bailando, rompiendo


¿Y dónde está mi gente?
Mais fais bouger la tête
¿Y dónde está mi gente?
Say yeah, yeah, yeah
Un, dos, tres, ¡leggo!
(Ay di que sí)



Worldwide
Willy William
J Balvin, man
Uh-huh
Uh-huh
Uh-huh
Uh-huh",3106596
103096,2154742,The Fall of Jake Paul,rap,Logan Paul,2017,1707559,"{""Why Don\\'t We""}","
Yah, yeet


Little brother Jakey try to roast me? (What?)
Little brother standing on his own two feet? (Not for long)
I'm a dog, you're a puppy, call you Kong
Let's talk about your garbage that you call a song
It should be every other day, just some strong advice
I made you famous once, it's about to happen twice
Yeah, you on Disney but who helped you read all your lines (That's me)
Don't forget boy, you were my shadow on Vine
Now you got a few subscribers and you think that you're the shit
I'll admit, you got money, you got bars, you got chicks
But you're a dick, you ain't thankful for your fans, it's kinda funny
Do your investors know Team 10 ain't making any money?
See, it starts with the talent but it's hard when you got none
I think you kinda salty 'cause I'm the favorite son
I'm a maverick, you're a sidekick, yeah I brought you to LA
If there's one thing you should know, you don't fuck with the Logang

Hold up, I'ma throw up
Looking at your face you don't know what it means to glow up
Trying to dance and acting class
It's doing nothing now you try to rap
Come on, hold up
Catch the flow, you can't, oh no
(Maybe Team 10's got it), I mean, that's how you grow
But you still can't sell out any shows
No, you still can't find some matching clothes


Yah, yeet
You're just killing the vibe, yeah (Fact)
You ain't doing it right, yeah (Double fact)
Trying to play ball with the dogs
You don't know what you've done you just ruined your life, yeah
You're killing the vibe, yeah
You ain't doing it right, yeah
Trying to play ball with the dogs
You don't know what you've done you just ruined your life, yeah


What happened, Jake?
Man, we used to love each other
After all, we came from the same mother
Biologically, you know that makes us brothers
So much negativity, it really makes me wonder
I feel like you just need a maverick shirt (Link in description!)
When you insult me Jakey, it really hurts
Sometimes I wish my real brother was Dirk (Disney)
But now I gotta go and put you in the dirt

Yo, wait, hold up
Hold up, why'd music stop?


Uh oh, that's Alissa Violet, used to be your chick
Now she in the Logang and you know she on my... team
Those cars ain't yours man, that shit was just floated
Gun tattooed on your leg 'cause she knew you weren't loaded
I act in movies that your fans watch with their babysitters (Airplane mode)
I thought you were my boy, guess I have a baby sister
You're tryna be a model, shoulda kept Neels Visser (Ha-ha-ha)
Go make another video 'bout who's the better kisser
Is it called Team 10 because you take 10% of your friends? (That's fucked up Jake)
When the contract dies, so does their career, it ends (That's also a fact)
Are you mad because you couldn't sign the Dolans? (They're smarter than you)
So, you had to replace them with some Spanish twins? (Ha-ha-ha weak)
It's everyday bro, do you give up a night?
We 24/7 man, you picked the wrong fight
I'm a savage, you are average, I'm a beast, I'm going wild
This song will be the death of you, I'm 'bout to be an only child",3111779
103222,2156271,The Weekend,rb,SZA,2017,2508637,{},"
You say you got a girl
Yeah, how you want me? How you want me when you got a girl?
The feelin' is reckless, of knowin' it's selfish
And knowin' I'm desperate
Gettin' all in your love, fallin' all over love, like
Do it 'til it hurts less
Hangin' out the back, all up in your lap
Like is you comin' home? Is you out with her?
I don't care, long as you're here by 10:30, no later than
Drop them drawers, give me what I want


My man is my man, is your man, heard it's her man too
My man is my man, is your man, heard that's her man
Tuesday and Wednesday, Thursday and Friday
I just keep him satisfied through the weekend
You like 9 to 5, I'm the weekend, oh-oh
Make him lose his mind every weekend
You take Wednesday, Thursday, then just send him my way
Think I got it covered for the weekend

I gotta say, I'm in the mood for a little bit more of that
I mean, I'm sayin', what kind of tease is two days?
I need me at least 'bout four of them, more of them
More you on me, on us, just tell me you want me, yeah
Monday and I'll be at your door, ready to take her place
Ready to give you, what you've been missin' on weekdays
What you've been waitin' for, 10:30, no later than
Drop them drawers, I know what you want


My man is my man, is your man, heard it's her man too
My man is my man, is your man, heard that's her man
Tuesday and Wednesday, Thursday and Friday
I just keep him satisfied through the weekend
You like 9 to 5, I'm the weekend
Make him lose his mind every weekend
You take Wednesday, Thursday (Don't worry 'bout none)
Then just send him my way (Don't worry 'bout none)
Think I got it covered for the weekend


Ayyy
Bright ideas, we've got bright ideas
Ayyy (Ooh)
Bright ideas, we've got bright ideas
Ayyy (Ooh)
Bright ideas, we've got bright ideas",3113598
103223,2156272,Garden Say It Like Dat,rb,SZA,2017,1150615,{},"
Need you for the old me, need you for my sanity
Need you to remind me where I come from
Can you remind me of my gravity?
Ground me when I'm tumblin', spiralin', plummetin' down to Earth
You keep me down to Earth
Call me on my bullshit
Lie to me and say my booty gettin' bigger even if it ain't
Love me even if it rain
Love me even if it pain you
I know I be difficult
You know I be difficult
You know it get difficult too


Open your heart up
Hoping I'll never find out that you're anyone else
'Cause I love you just how you are
And hope you never find out who I really am
'Cause you'll never love me, you'll never love me
You'll never love me but, I believe you when you say it like that
Oh, do you mean it when you say it like that?
Oh, I believe you when you say it like that
You must really love me

For real, I'm not playing no games
Boy, we back and forth
I need your support now (now, now, now, now, now)
In case you call my phone one more 'gain
Got no panties on
I need your support now (now, now, now, now, now)
I know you'd rather be laid up with a big booty
Prolly hella positive 'cause she got a big booty (wow)
I know I'd rather be paid up
You know I'm sensitive about havin' no booty
Havin' nobody, only you, buddy
Can you hold me when nobody's around us?


Open your heart up
Hoping I'll never find out that you're anyone else
'Cause I love you just how you are
And hope you never find out who I really am
'Cause you'll never love me, you'll never love me
You'll never love me but, I believe you when you say it like that
Oh, do you mean it when you say it like that?
Oh, I believe you when you say it like that
You must really love me


You don't have shit to say to me
I ain't got shit to say to you
Granny, and that's the truth
And step, and step on
Also you black heffa, yeah you, you stand your ground
'Cause I feel the same way
If you don't like me, you don't have to fool with me
You don't have to talk about me or treat me mean
I don't have to treat you mean
I just stay out of your way
That's the way you work that one",3113602
103290,2156975,Wild Thoughts,rb,DJ Khaled,2017,3090921,"{Rihanna,""Bryson Tiller""}","
Another one
We The Best music
DJ Khaled


I don't know if you could take it
Know you wanna see me nakey, nakey, naked
I wanna be your baby, baby, baby
Spinning and it's wet just like it came from Maytag
White girl wasted on that brown liquor
When I get like this I can't be around you
I'm too lit to dim down a notch
'Cause I could name some thangs that I'm gon' do


Wild, wild, wild
Wild, wild, wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts

Let's go!


I hope you know I'm for the takin'
You know this cookie is for the baking (ugh)
Kitty, kitty, baby give that thing some rest
'Cause you done beat it like the '68 Jets
Diamonds ain't nothing when I'm rockin' with ya
Diamonds ain't nothing when I'm shinin' with ya
Just keep it white and black as if I'm ya sista
I'm too hip to hop around town out here with ya
I know I get


Wild, wild, wild
Wild, wild, wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts


Ayy, I heard that pussy for the taking
I heard it got these other niggas goin' crazy
Yeah I treat you like a lady, lady
Fuck you 'til you're burned out, cremation
Make it cream, yeah, Wu-Tang
Throw that ass back, bouquet
Call me and I can get it juicy
I can tell you're gone off the D'USSÉ
Careful mama watch what you say
You talking to me like ya new bae
Girl, talking like you tryna do things
Now that pipe got her running like she Usain, baby
You made me drown in it, touche, baby
I'm carrying that water, Bobby Boucher, baby
You know I'ma slaughter like I'm Jason
Bust it, why you got it on safety?
White girl wasted on brown liquor
I probably shouldn't be around you
'Cause you get wild, wild, wild
You looking like there's nothing that you won't do
Ayy, girl that's when I told you

When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
Wild, wild, wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts


DJ Khaled!
Wild, wild, wild
Wild, wild, wild
When I'm with you, all I get is wild thoughts",3114474
103298,2157152,Its Every Night Sis,rap,RiceGum,2017,1162156,"{""Alissa Violet""}","
Dream Addix
Yo, I wasn't about to go in but like...
Now I feel like I have to, you know?
I mean, I feel kinda bad but like, fuck it, haha
Alright, yeah


I can tell that you came with the Disney flow, ayy
Ain't nobody ever heard about your Disney show, ayy
Got a bitch that remind me of my cereal
From Britain, when I see her, I'm like ""cheerio""
Yeah, Alissa called asking me if we could win against Jake Paul (Brr brr) (What?)
I said, we Gucci like the shirts with the snakes on it (Hiss)
I just heard the song, Team 10, now I hate y'all
Logan, that will be your last hit like an eight ball
Nah, wrong Paul, yeah, it's Jake, like from State Farm (Ugh)
Get girls, but the hooker said you paid for it (Ah)
Me and Rice in a house with like eight floors
Ride your brother's nuts, you're a squirrel for his acorn (Uh!)
Ayy, you got girls? Where they at? Are you serious?
Ayy, didn't see 'em, like George, I'm just curious
Ayy, Alissa said you cum fast, like the Furious
Diss tracks, you are my reflection like a mirror is (Hooyah)
Wanna flex on my wrist, I put some ice on it
I ain't wanna make her wet, then maybe put some rice on it
Talk shit, now I'm on your head like some lice on it
Heard that you used to bully kids back in high school (Ooh)
Second part for the kill, that's what Rice do (Ooh)
Hit it twice this ain't Insta', I don't like you
Gotta put this rice in this beef like some Thai food
You ain't got no bars, no flow like a lake do (Shit)
Rented cars and that Rollie lookin' fake too
Let's go back to the bully thing, listen here
Was it back in middle school or was it senior year? (What?)
Didn't think you'd get caught like an interference
Pick on others just to hide the fact you were insecure
How you think they felt when they went home and they were dripping tears? (Ooh)
You cheated on a good girl, Tessa's hideous
And then you went and got a big head like you Phineas

It's everyday bro with the same bully flow
Bully at school, now bullying your bro
Diss your own brother, I don't really get it though
Stop bragging, just accept nobody knows your Disney show
It's everyday bro with the same bully flow (What?)
Bully at school, now you bullying your bro
Diss your own brother, I don't really get it though (Yah)
Stop bragging, just accept nobody knows your Disney show (Bitch)


Should've never cheated now, never cheated now
Got fame from your brother now, from your brother now
And he's a better kisser now, better kisser now
Now I'm onto bigger things, bigger things now (Bitch)


Should've never cheated now, never cheated now
Now, I'm fucking on your bitch now, on your bitch now (Fuck, fuck, fuck)
You used to be a fan and you still a fan now (What?)
They gon' call me ""RichGum"" 'cause I'm dumb rich now (What?)",3114661
103380,2158272,Off the Wall,rap,XXXTENTACION,2017,1276629,"{""Ski Mask the Slump God""}","
Did you never give a damn in the first place?
Maybe it's time you had the tables turned (Cigarettes, hahaha)
'Cause in the interest of all involved, I got the problem solved
And the verdict is guilty (Off the pink)
Man nearly kill- (Off the drink)
Ayy, ayy, ayy, ooh, huh
Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy


I feel like Nick Cannon (Nick), huh
'Cause I'm wildin' out ('Cause I'm wildin'), huh
I don't got on Vans (I don't got 'em)
But bitch, I'm off the wall (I don't, I don't, I don't, I don't)
Huh, feel like Nick Cannon (Feel like Nick), huh
'Cause I'm wildin' out ('Cause I'm, huh), huh
I don't got on Vans, but bitch, I'm off the wall (Wall, wall, water)
I said like insect (Ew), I be buggin' motherfucker (Ow)
Fuck on your mommy, my flow be sick
Like that bitch gotta vomit, to vomit, to vomit (Gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta)
I'm hot like a comet
Insect, I be buggin' motherfucker (Insect, ayy)
Fuck on your mommy (Uh-huh, ayy)
My flow be sick like that bitch gotta vomit, to vomit, to vomit (Yuh, sick, ayy)
I'm hot like a comet (Ayy)

When I di-di-di-di-di-dick that bitch
And she see Jesus on some rapture shit
Throw my balls at her Pokémon, Ash Ketchum shit
'Cause I'm fly like a newborn baby wombat wing, ha, ha
Me and this mic is your Mortal Kombat team
I want some head, I'm thinkin' how zombies think
Beaming a pistol it look like hadouken
Like mayday, mayday, mayday, mayday
Tell these pussy rappers that it's time to vacay
Rob yo' lady, told her put her hands up high in the air
Like she 'bout to hit the Nae Nae
They say I'm cr-cr-cr-cr-cray, cray
Can't control the nigga like we shootin' from the AK
But they keep me 'round cause, I'm a walking, breathing payday
Hot, but I swag, still nigga got the Ray Bays
Get away, get away, get away, get away
Better do you or do way way, fade away
You sippin' Haterade, I'm sippin' Gatorade
With the lean in it and I call it a fade-orade
Ayy, I'm so toxic, frog, hop up on my dick
I think I'm a pilot, 'cause she in my cockpit
Plumber, uh, pipe it, get face like I Skyped it
Did her A$AP like Rocky
Rockin' in my motherfuckin', rockin' rockin' in my motherfuckin'

I feel like Nick Cannon (Nick), huh
'Cause I'm wildin' out ('Cause I'm wildin'), huh
I don't got on Vans (I don't got 'em)
But bitch, I'm off the wall (I don't, I don't, I don't, I don't)
Huh, feel like Nick Cannon (Feel like Nick), huh
'Cause I'm wildin' out ('Cause I'm, huh), huh
I don't got on Vans, but bitch, I'm off the wall (Wall, wall, water)
I said like insect (Ew), I be buggin' motherfucker (Ow)
Fuck on your mommy
My flow be sick like that bitch gotta vomit, to vomit, to vomit (Gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta)
I'm hot like a comet
Insect, I be buggin' motherfucker (Insect)
Fuck on your mommy (Uh-huh)
My flow be sick like that bitch gotta vomit, to vomit, to vomit (Ayy, yuh, huh)
I'm hot like a comet (Ayy, ayy)


When I fi-fi-fi-fi-fi-fi-fist that bitch (Huh)
I'ma make that booty jiggle like some kick back, bitch (Huh)
She gon' rub my Dragon Balls, let her make one wish (Huh)
What is that? She just wanna take the young dagger dick
Ayy-ayy, ayy-ayy (Huh?), ayy-ayy, ayy-ayy (Huh?)
She off the Molly, she wanna take seven dick (Ayy)
Body to body, it's MC dagger, bitch (Ayy)
Think that I'm Illuminati because I got money, bitch (Like)
Like Ray J, Ray J, Ray J, Ray J (Huh)
Bitch, I hit it first, on my weenie, hit the nae-nae (Huh)
Coming in hot like a missile, pussy, hey bae (Huh)
Falcon punch that nigga, make 'em up, up, and away, ayy (Ayy)
Watch this, uppercut, Super Smash Melee (Ayy-ayy)
I just made her spin on my dick like a Beyblade (Ooh)
I'm green like a spinach, I don't know you, then it's pay, ayy (Ooh)
Hummanah hummana, back fist, out my way, ayy (Ayy)
No Chris Brown (Oh), fuck her, make her look at me now (Wet)
When I'm in the pussy, say ""Ow!""
You got no etiquette, just beginnin' like Genesis
Can you give me a rapper that I'm not better than, mmph? (Ayy)
Revenge jeans, I think that I might OD
On sauce, I don't rock Supreme
Suck my dick, Squidward's clarinet
Brought to life like I'm Evanescence
Wanna wake, w-w-wake, w-w-wake, okay, like
Big black (Black), dick in your mama mouth
Pull it back, push her whole wig back (Wig)
Tic, tac, your breath really P-U
Yo, you really need a Tic-Tac (Stank)
Big pump, Cobain, Cobain
Leave a pussy nigga with no brain, okay (Blaow)
Weenie Hut Jr. looking boy, tell him ""Ole""
I'ma pull that pistol, make 'em Mr. Noodle, ayy

I feel like Nick Cannon (Nick), huh
'Cause I'm wildin' out ('Cause I'm wildin'), huh
I don't got on Vans (I don't got 'em)
But bitch, I'm off the wall (I don't, I don't, I don't, I don't)
Huh, feel like Nick Cannon (Feel like Nick), huh
'Cause I'm wildin' out ('Cause I'm, huh), huh
I don't got on Vans, but bitch, I'm off the wall (Wall, wall, water)
I said like insect (Ew), I be buggin' motherfucker (Ow)
Fuck on your mommy
My flow be sick like that bitch gotta vomit, to vomit, to vomit (Gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta, gotta)
I'm hot like a comet
Insect, I be buggin' motherfucker (Insect)
Fuck on your mommy (Uh-huh)
My flow be sick like that bitch gotta vomit, to vomit, to vomit
I'm hot like a comet (Sick, sick, sick, ayy)",3116126
103469,2159133,Benz Truck Гелик,rap,Lil Peep,2017,1263127,{},"
Lil Bo Peep with a brand new bitch
In the back of the club with the GothBoiClique
Iced out teeth on an iced out whip
With the limousine tints, you can suck my dick
Friends switch up when you in a Benz truck (Skrrt)
Always wanna fuck, tell a bitch, ""Good luck""
Always wanna fuck 'cause I just came up, yeah
(GothBoiClique)


Lil Bo Peep with a brand new bitch
In the back of the club with the GothBoiClique
Iced out teeth on an iced out whip
With the limousine tints, you can suck my dick
Friends switch up when you in a Benz truck (Skrrt)
Always wanna fuck, tell a bitch, ""Good luck""
Always wanna fuck 'cause I just came up
Drugs in my nose, good drugs in my cup


I don't wanna wait now
But I know you gon' make me
Who you wanna hate now?
Pretty soon you gonna hate me (GothBoiClique)
Gettin' to the cake now
All the hate don't faze me
All the money that I make now
I'll never let it change me
I don't wanna wait now
But I know you gon' make me
Who you wanna hate now?
Pretty soon you gonna hate me
Gettin' to the cake now
All the hate don't faze me
All the money that I make now
I'll never let it change me

Lil Bo Peep with a brand new bitch
In the back of the club with the GothBoiClique
Iced out teeth on an iced out whip
With the limousine tints, you can suck my dick
Friends switch up when you in a Benz truck (Skrrt)
Always wanna fuck, tell a bitch, ""Good luck""
Always wanna fuck 'cause I just came up
Drugs in my nose, good drugs in my cup


Lil Bo Peep with a brand new bitch
In the back of the club with the GothBoiClique
Iced out teeth on an iced out whip
With the limousine tints, you can suck my dick",3117098
103695,2162006,Feels,pop,Calvin Harris,2017,2386879,"{""Pharrell Williams"",""Big Sean"",""Katy Perry""}","
Hey!
Now nothing ever last forever, no
One minute you're here and the next you're gone
So I respect you, wanna take it slow
I need a mental receipt to know this moment I owe


And do you mind if I steal a kiss? (Chop, chop)
A little souvenir, can I steal it from you?
To memorize the way you shock me
The way you move it here (Hey)
Just wanna feel it from you (Hey)


Don't be afraid to catch feels
Ride drop top and chase thrills (Hey)
I know you ain't afraid to pop pills (Hey)
Baby, I know you ain't scared to catch feels
Feels with me

I'm your window shopper, sucker for your love, oh
I'm wearing your goggles, virtual reality
It ain't what it cost you, it might be a dollar
As long as it shocks you, memory, electricity


And do you mind if I steal a kiss? (Chop, chop)
A little souvenir, can I steal it from you? (Oh, yeah)
To memorize the way you shock me (Zap)
The way you move it here (Hey)
Just wanna feel it from you (Hey)


Don't be afraid to catch feels (Ha)
Ride drop top and chase thrills (Oh-oh-oh, oh)
I know you ain't afraid to pop pills (Hey)
Baby, I know you ain't scared to catch feels (Straight up)
Feels with me (Woah)


Goddamn, I know you love to make an entrance
Do you like getting paid or getting paid attention?
You mixed the wrong guys with the right intentions
In the same bed, but it still feel long distance
She's looking for a little more consistency
But when you stop looking, you gon' find what's meant to be
And honestly, I'm way too done with the hoes
I cut off all my exes for your x and o's
I feel my old flings was just preparing me
When I say I want you, say it back, parakeet
Flyin' first-class through the air, Airbnb
I'm the best you had, you just be comparing me to me
I'ma 'at' this at you, if I put you on my phone
And upload it, it'll get maximum views
I came through in the clutch with the lipsticks and phones
Wear your fave cologne just to get you alone

Don't be afraid to catch feels
Don't be afraid to catch these feels
Ride drop top and chase thrills (Yeah)
I know you ain't afraid to pop pills (I know)
Baby, I know you ain't scared to catch feels
Woah, woah, woah
Feels with me
Don't be afraid to catch feels (No, no)
Don't be afraid, baby
Ride drop top and chase thrills (Woah, okay)
I know you ain't afraid to pop pills
I know, I know, I know, I know
Baby, I know you ain't scared to catch feels
Feels with me",3120234
103719,2162381,Catch Me Outside,rap,Ski Mask the Slump God,2017,2039154,{},"
Shout out, my mucus (Ayy, ayy, ayy)
'Cause you know that be my slime
(Ayy, catch me outside)
Shout out, my mucus
That nigga, that be my slime
That nigga, that be my slime sli-sli-slime sli-sli-slime slime
Ayy, what? (Watch this pussy)
Ayy, ayy, okay!


Naruto nine-tailed fox coat fur (Naruto nine-tail)
I feel like a Gucci ad-lib, burr!
Colder than Coca-Cola mascot, polar bear
Put my sauce on lasagna it could make Garfield purr (Prr)
I ain't really fuckin' with these niggas like a dyke (Water!)
New Kellogg's tiger I tell 'em earn yo' stripes
You tryna be me but bih, could never in your life (Never)
Even if you had on my sneakers like Bow Wow in Like Mike
Like Gotti, nigga, watch me be disgusting
I'ma do 'em dirty like a ringworm ring
Why they be talkin' like they might know something?
I'm Madagascar, I'm royalty like Lemur King
Told her be careful, my penis just like limousine
And I don't want to eat pussy if it just smell like Hennessy
Star Wars confederate rifle shoot like ray-beam
Watch me spin around 360 quick scope or something

Ayy, yuh, ayy (Water!)
Ayy ayy, ayy ayy ayy (Huh)
It's Doktor Avalanche
(Let's get it, let's get it, let's get it!)


Okay like
Bills on me blue, uh-huh (Sing it)
Like a bruise, uh-huh (Sing it)
Better yet, uh-huh, Blue's Clues (Sing it, sing it, sing it)
Bills on me blue, uh-huh (Sing it)
Like a bruise, uh-huh (Sing it)
Better yet, uh-huh, Blue's Clues (Sing it, sing it, sing it)
Bills on me blue, huh
Bruise, huh
Better yet, uh, Blue's Clues
Bills on me blue, uh-huh
Like a bruise, uh-huh
Better yet, mhm, Blue's Clues


Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, woah Nelly
Go and shake that ass like it's vibration on my celly
Ayy, ayy, ayy, woah mama
Diamonds on me fatter than Peter Griffin's big stomach
Stove on me too, uh-huh, old news, uh-huh
Cook a nigga, uh-huh, like stew
They say my flow that gas, might burp, excuse you, uh-huh
Where I'm going, oh, I think your bitch pums
Excuse me don't fumble it
Drive where yo' momma live
She gon' stumble on my dick like Jack and Jill on the hill
White on me, Jonah Hill
Heard of my gang and them
I'ma beat that pussy 'til it's black as Ms. Lauryn Hill
That's all folks, uh-huh
Looney Tunes, uh-huh
Mink fur pink like the ass on baboon, like
Where You Will Regret? Uh-huh, comin' soon
When that bitch drop, uh-huh, then toodaloo

Ayy, yuh, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, water!
Ayy, ayy, ayy
It's Doktor Avalanche
(Sauce, wet, flex)


Okay like
Bills on me blue, uh-huh
Like a bruise, uh-huh
Better yet, uh-huh, Blue's Clues
Bills on me blue, uh-huh
Like a bruise, uh-huh
Better yet, uh-huh, Blue's Clues
Bills on me blue, huh
Bruise, huh
Better yet, uh, Blue's Clues
Bills on me blue, uh-huh
Like a bruise, uh-huh
Better yet, mhm, Blue's Clues


Viral pussy ho!",3120650
103783,2163043,Glorious,rap,Macklemore,2017,1358794,"{""Skylar Grey""}","
You know I'm back, like I never left (I never left)
Another sprint, another step (Another step)
Another day, another breath (Another breath)
Been chasing dreams, but I never slept (I never slept)
I got a new attitude and a lease on life and some peace of mind
Seek and I find, I can sleep when I die
Want a piece of the pie, grab the keys to the ride
And shit I'm straight, I'm on my wave, I'm on my wave
Get out my wake, I'm running late, what can I say?
I heard you die twice, once when they bury you in the grave
And the second time is the last time that somebody mentions your name
So when I leave here on this earth, did I take more than I gave?
Did I look out for the people, or did I do it all for fame?
Legend, it's exodus, searching for euphoria
Trudging through the mud to find the present, no ignoring us
Got 20,000 deep off in the street like we some warriors
My mama told me never bow your head, woo


I feel glorious, glorious
Got a chance to start again
I was born for this, born for this
It's who I am, how could I forget?
I made it through the darkest part of the night
And now I see the sunrise
Now I feel glorious, glorious
I feel glorious, glorious

I'm feeling glorious
The crib looking Victorian (Oh yes it is)
You know that we been going in (Been going in)
Since we hopped out that DeLorean (DeLorean, yeah we win)
En garde, things are just things, they don't make you who you are
Can't pack up a U-Haul and take it with you when you're gone
We posted on the porch, my family's glasses to the stars
My grandma smiling down on me like ""Woo, that boy got bars""
Okay, okay, yes I do
I said amen and hallelujah, let me testify too
Another morning, a morning, won't let self get in my way
I got my breath, I got my faith and I remember why I came, woo


I feel glorious, glorious
Got a chance to start again
I was born for this, born for this
It's who I am, how could I forget?
I made it through the darkest part of the night
And now I see the sunrise
Now I feel glorious, glorious
I feel glorious, glorious


We gon' be alright, put that on my life
When I open my eyes, hope I see you shine
We're planting a flag, they don't understand
The world is up for grabs (Hey, hey, hey)
We gon' be alright, put that on my life
When I open my eyes, hope I see you shine
We're planting a flag, they don't understand
The world is up for grabs (Hey, hey, hey)

I feel glorious, glorious
Got a chance to start again
I was born for this, born for this
It's who I am, how could I forget?
I made it through the darkest part of the night
And now I see the sunrise
Now I feel glorious, glorious
I feel glorious, glorious",3121358
103799,2163336,Plain Jane,rap,A$AP Ferg,2017,2787467,"{""A\\$AP Ferg""}","
Yeah


Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane


Yamborghini chain, rest in peace to my superior
Hermès link could feed a village in Liberia
TMZ taking pictures, causin' mad hysteria
Momma see me on BET and started tearin' up
I'ma start killin' niggas, how you get that trife?
I attended Harlem picnics where you risked your life
Uncle used to skim work, sellin' nicks at night
I was only 8 years old, watching Nick at Nite
Uncle Psycho was in that bathroom buggin'!
Knife to his guts, hope Daddy don't cut him
Suicidal thoughts brought to me with no advisory
He was pitchin' dummy, sellin' fiends mad ivory
Grandma had the arthritis in her hands, bad!
She was poppin' pills like rappers in society
I'll fuck yo' bitch for the irony
I'll send Meechy at yo' ho if yo' bitch keep eyein' me!

Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane
Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane


Suck a nigga dick or somethin'
Suck a nigga dick or somethin'
Suck a nigga dick or somethin'
Suck a nigga dick or somethin'


I'ma explain why you probably never seen me
I'm in a sunken place, no Instagram, I'm watchin' TV
I think I trade my breakfast, lunch, and dinner for some kitty
Please believe me, I see RiRi, I'ma eat it like panini
I go dumb up in the broad, hit the walls like graffiti
Indian burns all up on a nigga wee-wee
I think I need a foursome, Bella, Kendall, Gigi
It'd be easy if Reneezy hook it all up on the leezy
I go crazy in my Yeezy, Kirk Kneezy on the beat
I told 'em now we finna glow up in the street
Rappers talk subliminal but they don't talk to me
Put 'em in a Jersey shore like Pauly D

Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane
Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane


Suck a nigga dick or somethin'
Suck a nigga dick or somethin'
Suck a nigga dick or somethin'
Suck a nigga dick or somethin'",3121669
104147,2167949,마지막처럼 AS IF ITS YOUR LAST,pop,BLACKPINK,2017,1388173,{},"


(Little bit of that)
(Little bit of this)
(Little bit of that)
(Gimme, gimme, gimme)


(Gimme little bit of that)
너 뭔데 자꾸 생각나
(Gimme little bit of this)
자존심 상해 애가 타
얼굴이 뜨겁고 가슴은 계속 뛰어
내 몸이 맘대로 안 돼 어지러워
(Gimme little bit of that)
넌 한 줌의 모래 같아
(Gimme little bit of this)
잡힐 듯 잡히지 않아
넌 쉽지 않은 걸 그래서 더 끌려
내 맘이 맘대로 안 돼 어이없어

지금 너를 원하는 내 숨결이 느껴지니
널 바라보고 있어도 missing you
서툰 날 won't you set me free?


Baby, 날 터질 것처럼 안아줘
그만 생각해 뭐가 그리 어려워
거짓말처럼 키스해줘 내가 너에게
마지막 사랑인 것처럼
마지막처럼 (yuh) 마-마-마지막처럼 (yuh)
마지막 밤인 것처럼 love
마지막처럼 (yuh) 마-마-마지막처럼 (yuh)
내일 따윈 없는 것처럼 love


Uh, I'ma fall in love, baby
You gon' finna catch me, uh
Give you all of this, baby
Call me pretty and nasty
'Cause we gonna get it, my love
You can bet it on black
We gon' double the stack on them, whoo
I be the Bonnie and you be my Clyde
We ride or die, Xs and Os

시간은 흘러가는데 마음만 급해지지
내 세상은 너 하나만 missing you
서툰 날 won't you set me free?


Baby, 날 터질 것처럼 안아줘
그만 생각해 뭐가 그리 어려워
거짓말처럼 키스해줘 내가 너에게
마지막 사랑인 것처럼
마지막처럼 (yuh) 마-마-마지막처럼 (yuh)
마지막 밤인 것처럼 love
마지막처럼 (yuh) 마-마-마지막처럼 (yuh)
내일 따윈 없는 것처럼 love


One, two, three 새로운, 시작이,야
절대 뒤돌아보진 않을 거니까
날 너에게 던지면 너는 날 꼭 잡아줘
세상은 우릴 꺾지 못할 테니까
BLACKPINK in your area
(BLACKPINK in your-)


Baby, 날 터질 것처럼 안아줘
그만 생각해 뭐가 그리 어려워
거짓말처럼 키스해줘 내가 너에게
마지막 사랑인 것처럼
마지막처럼 (yuh) 마-마-마지막처럼 (yuh)
마지막 밤인 것처럼 love
마지막처럼 (yuh) 마-마-마지막처럼 (yuh)
내일 따윈 없는 것처럼 love",3126688
104231,2169394,XXL Freshmen 2017 Cypher - Part 2,rap,XXL,2017,1340159,"{""Playboi Carti"",MadeinTYO,XXXTENTACION,""Ugly God""}","
Yeah, Ben Baller, no Johnny Dang, yeah, uh
All my niggas Blood Gang, yeah
All my niggas gangbang, ayy, what? Yeah, ayy
Purple eight, yeah, I sip that drank
Yeah, Easter pink, ayy
What the fuck you drink? Ayy
Put the diamonds on my cross
Pockets on Rick Ross, ayy
Cartier be a boss
Put them on a block, ayy
Put that boy up on his feet
Yeah, these niggas ball, ayy
All my niggas eat, ayy
All my niggas, uh, ayy
Standing on my cash, ayy
Now a nigga tall, ayy
And my bitch bad, ayy
And she breaking walls, ayy


Chop the top, chop the top, I get bored too quick, uh
Silly thot, silly thot, want that boy to quit, uh
Louis V watch on hand, I can see your bitch
She choosin' on the low, I can't save no bih, uh
Tokyo, Tokyo, that cool thing, uh
Probably take her out to Blue Flame, uh
Yeah, diamonds when I walk
Diamonds when I walk, uh
Diamonds when I talk
Yuh, yuh, diamonds when I walk, uh
Diamonds when I walk, yeah
Diamonds when I talk, uh
Yuh, ooh

Diamonds when I talk, huh, diamonds when I walk
Diamonds on my balls, pockets Rick Ross
Look at my face, look at my jacket, huh
I pull out that chopper, huh, I let you have it, ah, ayy
I'ma pull up on your block, huh, my niggas sip on that Wock, huh
Nigga talk shit get knocked off, bitch, ayy
Look at my wrist, goddamn, look at my bitch, goddamn
Look at my dick, goddamn, talk shit and get hit, goddamn
I pull up on your block, nigga, you a bitch
I might fuck your bitch, I might hit a lick, huh, hey
Look at my swag, look at my bitch, huh, hey
I got big cash, look at my wrists, hmm, wait
Niggas be mad, get off my dick, hmm, wait
Bitches be mad, get on my dick, ayy


And if the world ever has an apocalypse
I will kill all of you fuckers
Fear will be plentiful, death will be bountiful
I will spare none of you peasants
Fuck your religion, your pastor fucked kids
And got sent to a prison in PC
I seen the devil, he's in you and me
You need saving to listen to this, see
Follow 'em home, cut the right corner so nobody sees you
Turn off your phone
Leave it at home so nobody can trace you
Mask your expressions
Appear to be calm, they won't read your intentions
As soon as you're in
Let them all know who they're all in the presence of
I am a murderer
I am a demon, the son of a serpent
What is your faith?
What is your worth?
Have you felt acknowledgment?
If I kill you now, will you go to heaven or hell you believe in?
Death is approaching you
Thirty seconds to think before lying in a blood sea",3128246
104266,2170104,Signs,rap,Drake,2017,1285870,{},"
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah


Champagne with breakfast while I'm yawning
You can't drink all day if you don't start in the morning
Lord forgive me, I can't take things slowly (Slow)
I'm gone on them once I get going (Gone on them, oh, gone on them)


She tryna take it all off for me
Tryna stay real close to me (Close)
I gotta catch myself
I can't play myself, I need to take it


Easy, easy, easy, easy
Easy, easy, easy, easy


Railiza, you need a... money and visa
And you get what you want, always from me
I can't say ""No"" when you say ""Please,"" I can't say ""No""
Howisha, you need a... baby with me, uh
And I'm takin' my time, just wait, don't leave
I can't say ""No"" when you say ""Please,"" I can't say ""No""
You wanna drink like Bajan and dance like Trini, yeah
You want a supermodel pose like mi real friend Winnie (Like mi real friend)
Yeah, vacation is done but I'm not finished, no

Champagne with breakfast while I'm yawning
You can't drink all day if you don't start in the morning
Lord forgive me, I can't take things slowly (Slow)
I'm gone on them once I get going (Gone on them, gone on them, gone on them)


She tryna take it all off for me (Close)
Tryna stay real close to me
I gotta catch myself
I can't play myself, I need to take it


Easy, easy, easy, easy
Easy, easy, easy, easy


I stay to myself, I'll explain myself, I can't play myself
Oh, first night, holy night, five in the morning, yeah-yeah (Yeah)
And it feels like you're mine, signs of the times, oh, what a time
Playin' it right, playin' it perfect
Laughin' it off, but I know you're hurtin'
Signs of the times, I say all the time
Taking my time, just gets harder to find it
But you're playin' it right, you're playin' me perfect

She tryna take it all off for me
Tryna stay real close to me
I gotta catch myself
I can't play myself, I need to take it


Easy, easy, easy, easy
Easy, easy, easy, easy


I bet I never disrespect you, darlin'
I bet you pardon me, darlin'",3129092
104452,2172723,Back to You,pop,Louis Tomlinson,2017,1633128,"{""Bebe Rexha"",""Digital Farm Animals""}","
I know you say you know me, know me well
But these days I don't even know myself, no
I always thought I'd be with someone else
I thought I would own the way I felt, yeah


I call you but you never even answer
I tell myself I'm done with wicked games
But then I get so numb with all the laughter
That I forget about the pain


Whoa, you stress me out, you kill me
You drag me down, you fuck me up
We're on the ground, we're screaming
I don't know how to make it stop
I love it, I hate it, and I can't take it
But I keep on coming back to you


I know my friends, they give me bad advice
Like move on, get you out my mind
But don't you think I haven't even tried?
You got me cornered and my hands are tied

You got me so addicted to the drama
I tell myself I'm done with wicked games
But then I get so numb with all the laughter
That I forget about the pain


Woah, you stress me out, you kill me
You drag me down, you fuck me up
We're on the ground, we're screaming
I don't know how to make it stop
I love it, I hate it, and I can't take it
But I keep on coming back to you (Back to you)
Oh, no, no, I just keep on coming back to you (Back to you)
Oh, no, no, I just keep on coming back to you


And I guess you'll never know
All the bullshit that you put me through
And I guess you'll never know, no
Yeah, so you can cut me up and kiss me harder
You can be the pill to ease the pain
'Cause I know I'm addicted to your drama
Baby, here we go again


Whoa, you stress me out, you kill me
You drag me down, you fuck me up
We're on the ground, we're screaming
I don't know how to make it stop
I love it, I hate it, and I can't take it
But I keep on coming back to you (Back to you)
Oh, no, no, I just keep on coming back to you (Back to you)
Oh, no, no, I just keep on coming back to you (Back to you)
I just keep on coming back to you",3132161
104514,2174065,Red Roses,rap,Lil Skies,2017,1450221,"{""Landon Cube""}","
Menoh


And I got all the drugs in the world that you need (World that you need)
We get high to pass time, but bitch, I ain't no fiend (I ain't no fiend)
I got money on my mind, I be stackin' my green (Stacking my green)
Shawty say she like my style, I be dripping with ease (Dripping with ease)
Please don't send me naked pictures, I don't like to be teased (Like to be teased)
Say she got that super soaker, well, girl, just let me see (Just let me see)
I ain't worried 'bout shit, these niggas ain't scaring me (Ain't scaring me)
I was destined for this life, it's in my destiny (My destiny)
Friends wanna be friends when you doing the most (Doing the most)
How you tell me you my bro, then you went out and told? (Went out and told)
Niggas say they down to ride, but be folding like clothes (Folding like clothes)
Purple hearts all on my garment, I ain't trusting a soul (Ain't trusting a soul)


I roll up the mary jane, no, they can't feel my pain
I'm still trapping every day, I think I'm stuck in my ways
If you looking for a handout, get the fuck out my face
I don't care about no friends because they all were just fake
In my inbox like I owe you, I got this by myself
I was broken down bad when you said you would help
Now I'm up, they love to hate me, that's just bad for your health
And she say she a college girl, but left her books on the shelf
She gon' fuck me like a pornstar, a rockstar
Tryna skrrt off in that fast car like NASCAR
Girl, you know I got a cold heart
If I would give it to you, would you tear that shit apart?
Red roses on my grave, bury me with art
And with some Backwoods and a lighter just so I could spark
Midnight rider, never put the car in park
I'm shining bright just like a light 'cause I came from the dark
I ain't never had nobody, put that on my mommy
I might have to catch a body if you try to stop me
She ride like a Kawasaki, yeah, she like it sloppy
Oh, you got a hottie body, come ride on my johnny
I'ma go show you the wave, just give me some space
Why you all up in my face like you need a taste?
Good designer on my waist, shooters keep the K
I tell them boys to play it safe, don't lay in your grave
I ain't never taking time off, I'm steady grinding
I'm never lying, was never crying
Take flights, I'm flyin', no, you can't see me
Say you need me, but you deceive me

And I got all the drugs in the world that you need (World that you need)
We get high to pass time, but bitch, I ain't no fiend (I ain't no fiend)
I got money on my mind, I be stackin' my green (Stacking my green)
Shawty say she like my style, I be dripping with ease (Dripping with ease)
Please don't send me naked pictures, I don't like to be teased (Like to be teased)
Say she got that super soaker, well, girl, just let me see (Just let me see)
I ain't worried 'bout shit, these niggas ain't scaring me (Ain't scaring me)
I was destined for this life, it's in my destiny (My destiny)
Friends wanna be friends when you doing the most (Doing the most)
How you tell me you my bro, then you went out and told? (Went out and told)
Niggas say they down to ride, but be folding like clothes (Folding like clothes)
Now purple hearts all on my garment, I ain't trusting a soul (Ain't trusting a soul)


Said I ain't never forgotten not a soul worth remembering
'Cause all these motherfuckers turn to foe when they envy
So I don't talk, I work hard
'Cause you could be someone today and just be nobody tomorrow
She said I'll never be shit but a goddamn rockstar
That blunt ash on the floor
Well, she ain't that far off
Said she ain't that far off
Roll, smoke
That's all we know, toke
Took a drag out that 'Wood, now she goin' for my wood
So we goin' to my hood, yeah, she gonna get it good
Yeah, she know who we are
She want this rockstar life, and she said I'm going far
And she off a bar
And she can't feel her face no more
Yeah, she off a bar, and she can't feel her face no more
She said she can't feel her face no more",3133683
104622,2176376,Save Me,rock,XXXTENTACION,2017,1230314,{},"
Up there (Yeah)
Who do I have?
Heaven and hell, my friend (My friend)
I won't shed a tear
Let them see me in pain again


Hello (Hello), from the dark side in
Does anybody here wanna be my friend? (My friend)
Want it all to end
Tell me when the fuck is it all gon' end? (End)
Voices in my head
Telling me I'm gonna end up dead (Dead)


So save me (Save me), before I fall (I fall)
So save me, I don't wanna go alone (Alone)
So save me (Save me), before I fall (I fall)
So save me (Save me), I don't wanna go alone",3151455
104625,2176410,Kill Jay Z,rap,JAY-Z,2017,1004098,{},"
Kill JAY-Z, they'll never love you
You'll never be enough, let's just keep it real, JAY-Z
Fuck JAY-Z, I mean, you shot your own brother
How can we know if we can trust JAY-Z?
And you know better, nigga, I know you do
But you gotta do better, boy, you owe it to Blue
You had no father, you had the armor
But you got a daughter, gotta get softer
Die JAY-Z, this ain't back in the days
You don't need an alibi, JAY-Z
Cry JAY-Z, we know the pain is real
But you can't heal what you never reveal
What's up, JAY-Z? You know you owe the truth
To all the youth that fell in love with JAY-Z
You got people you love you sold drugs to
You got high on the life, that shit drugged you
You walkin' around like you invincible
You dropped outta school, you lost your principles
I know people backstab you, I felt bad too
But this 'fuck everybody' attitude ain't natural
But you ain't a saint, this ain't kumbaye
But you got hurt because you did cool by 'Ye
You gave him twenty million without blinkin'
He gave you twenty minutes on stage, fuck was he thinkin'?
""Fuck wrong with everybody?"" is what you sayin'
But if everybody's crazy, you're the one that's insane
Crazy how life works
You got a knot in your chest, imagine how a knife hurts
You stabbed Un over some records
Your excuse was ""He was talkin' too reckless!""
Let go your ego over your right shoulder
Your left is sayin', ""Finish your breakfast!""
You egged Solange on
Knowin' all along, all you had to say you was wrong
You almost went Eric Benét
Let the baddest girl in the world get away
I don't even know what else to say
Nigga, never go Eric Benét!
I don't even know what you woulda done
In the future other niggas playin' football with your son
You woulda lost it
13 bottles of Ace of Spade, what it did to Boston
Nah, JAY-Z
Bye, JAY-Z",3136263
104650,2176854,This Is Me,pop,Keala Settle,2017,2591272,"{""The Greatest Showman Ensemble""}","
I am not a stranger to the dark
""Hideaway,"" they say
""'Cause we don't want your broken parts""
I've learned to be ashamed of all my scars
""Runaway,"" they say
""No one'll love you as you are""


But I won't let them break me down to dust
I know that there's a place for us
For we are glorious


When the sharpest words wanna cut me down
I'm gonna send a flood, gonna drown them out
I am brave, I am bruised
I am who I'm meant to be, this is me
Look out 'cause here I come
And I'm marching on to the beat I drum
I'm not scared to be seen
I make no apologies, this is me

Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh, oh


Another round of bullets hits my skin
Well, fire away 'cause today, I won't let the shame sink in
We are bursting through the barricades
And reaching for the sun
(We are warriors)
Yeah, that's what we've become
(Yeah, that's what we've become)


I won't let them break me down to dust
I know that there's a place for us
For we are glorious


When the sharpest words wanna cut me down
I'm gonna send a flood, gonna drown them out
I am brave, I am bruised
I am who I'm meant to be, this is me
Look out 'cause here I come
And I'm marching on to the beat I drum
I'm not scared to be seen
I make no apologies, this is me

Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh, oh
This is me


(Oh-oh-oh-oh)
And I know that I deserve your love
(Oh-oh-oh-oh)
There's nothing I'm not worthy of
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh, oh)


When the sharpest words wanna cut me down
I'm gonna send a flood, gonna drown them out
This is brave, this is bruised
This is who I'm meant to be, this is me


Look out 'cause here I come
(Look out 'cause here I come)
And I'm marching on to the beat I drum
(Marching on, marching, marching on)
I'm not scared to be seen
I make no apologies, this is me

(Oh-oh-oh-oh) When the sharpest words wanna cut me down
I'm gonna send a flood, gonna drown them out
(Oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh)
I'm gonna send a flood, gonna drown them out
(Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh-oh, oh, oh)
This is me",3136857
104724,2178194,Who Dat Boy,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2017,1176351,"{""Tyler / The Creator"",""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
Yo, who dat boy? Who him is?
Him that ni-gga, I swear
Stand out guy, him don't need no chair
Well, where the fuck him at? 'Cause nigga, I'm right here
I don't shop at the mall, all y'all just
Dumb mothafucka, I'm a goddamn artist
You can give me some markers and I'll draw you a closet
And you know that it's GOLF, bitch, gonna make the deposit
Nigga fresh to death like he got dressed in a coffin
Cons, overalls, and a striped shirt
The boy drips swag like a broken faucet
It's runnin', nigga, I'm runnin' shit
That cherry be the bomb like he ran in Boston
Won't stop 'til the cops surround him
One nigga jiggy and the other awesome
With his fuckin' face blown off, that's how they found him
It's Young T


Who dat boy? Who him is?
Who dat boy? Who him is?
Nigga, who dat boy? Who him is?
Who dem boys? Nigga, who dem is, nigga?
Why you niggas feel like that?
Mad 'cause a nigga neck chill like that
You mad 'cause a nigga push wheel like that?
Why you puttin' bad vibes in the air like that?
Nigga, who dem boys?

Who dem is? Nigga, who dem is?
Who else step in this bitch this jig?
Who else your bitch say got a bick this big?
Who else came through with a wrist this flick?
Nigga, Guess my pants, do my dance
Spin around, bitch, you could kiss my ass
Never seen a nigga in this much Raf
Still doin' math when I miss my class
Was it Summertime '06, had the Number (N)ine
Nigga, never mind, was another time before Vince
Had the Gucci gold tips with the letterman
Nigga, dollar sign was my favorite number at the time
Fresh freshmen 'til they skipped my ass
Senior citizen, don't forget my pass
Been that nigga and you knew that there
Make the dick disappear, how she do that there?


Who dat boy? Who him is?
Who dat boy? Who him is?
Nigga, who dat boy? Who him is?
Who dem boys? Nigga, who dem is, nigga?
Why you niggas feel like that?
Mad 'cause a nigga's neck chill like that
You mad 'cause a nigga push wheel like that?
Why you puttin' bad vibes in the-?

Fuck the rap, I'm tryna own a planet
From my other fuckin' business ventures
These niggas these days
Actin' like some bitches, like they're fuckin' with ya (yeah)
Teeth is glistenin', Jesus, Christmas
He just shittin', she exquisite, bitches be expensive
(Yeah, let 'em know, nigga) And I don't even need attention
WANG$AP on the bumper sticker, fuck you niggas
Fuck global warming, my neck is so frío
I'm currently lookin' for '95 Leo
My mom say she worried because I'm so ill
I should stay in bed, but got too much bread
To make, she said watch my weight
So I stayed home and start eatin' some meals
Get out of my way güey, boy, that's McLaren
That's 0 to 60 in 2 point nueve, I'm gone


Oh, fuck",3138309
104725,2178200,Will He,rb,Joji,2017,1482823,{},"
I got knots all up in my chest (Up in my chest, up in my chest)
Just know, I'm trying my best (I'm trying my best)
'Cause when you look (When you look)
When you laugh (When you laugh)
When you smile (When you smile)
I'll bring you back (Bring you back)
And now I'm sad (Now I'm sad)
And I'm a mess (And I'm a mess)
And now we high (Now we high)
That's why I left (Why I left)
That's why I left (Woo)
Will your tongue still remember the taste of my lips?
(My lips, my lips, my lips)
Will your shadow remember the swing of my hips?
(My hips, my hips, my hips)
Will your lover caress you the way that I did?
(I did, I did, I did)
Will you notice my charm if he slips up one bit?
(One bit)

'Cause I don't need to know
I just wanna make sure you're okay (Okay)
I don't need to know
I just wanna make sure you're all safe
All safe, all safe


Will he play you those songs just the way that I did?
(I did, I did, I did)
Will he play you so strong just the way that I did?
(I did) Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Will he treat you like shit just the way that I did?
(I did, I did, I did)
'Cause I don't blame you


'Cause I don't need to know
I just want to make sure you're okay (Okay)
I don't need to know
I just want to make sure you're all safe",3138313
104730,2178231,911 / Mr. Lonely,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2017,1207401,"{""Tyler / The Creator"",""Frank Ocean"",""Steve Lacy""}","


(Call me, call me, call me) Uh
(Call me, call me, call me) Uh
(Call me, call me, call me) Uh
(Call me, call me, call me)
(Call me) How you doin'?
(Call me) My name is Lonely, nice to meet you
Here's my number
You can reach me, woo!


(Call me)
911, call me some time
(You should call me)
911, call me some time
911 (You should call me, oh)
911 (Call me)


Aw, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
My thirst levels are infinity and beyond
Sippin' on that lemonade, I need a Beyoncé
Can't see straight, these shades are Céline Dion
Sucks you can't gas me up, shout out to Elon
Musk, yeah, I got a sold-out show
Crowd wild out but don't matter 'cause you not front row
I've been lookin' for a keeper, listen to the speaker
If you fit description, hit me on my beeper
At that 911

Call me some time (ring, ring, ring)
Please bang my line, you know I'll answer (click)
Call me some time (ring, ring, ring)
Please bang my line


Call me
911, call me some time
You should call me
911, call me some time
911, (you should call me, oh)
911, (you should call me)


Chirp, chirp
Chirp, chirp
Woke up in the 'burbs, 'burbs, with the birds, birds
Where you used to come and get me with the swerve, swerve
These days you gotta find time
Even the nightline
Work line
Dial nine


Five car garage
Full tank of the gas
But that don't mean nothing, nothing
Nothin', nothin', without you shotgun in the passenger
I'm the loneliest man alive
But I keep on dancing to throw 'em off
I'm gon' run out of moves 'cause I can't groove to the blues
If you know any DJs, tell 'em to call me at 911...



I can't even lie, I've been lonely as fuck
Old lonely ass nigga
I can't even lie, I've been lonely as fuck
Forreal, you need to go somewhere, like, get some bitches or something
I can't even lie, I've been lonely as fuck
Old weird ass nigga
I can't even lie, I've been
Lonely, lonely, lonely, lonely


They say the loudest in the room is weak
That's what they assume, but I disagree
I say the loudest in the room
Is prolly the loneliest one in the room (That's me)
Attention seeker, public speaker
Oh my God, that boy there is so fuckin' lonely (Woo)
Writin' songs about these people
Who do not exist, he's such a fuckin' phony (Woo)
One thing I know, is that I wanna
Win so bad, but I'm not Chicago
My heart is low, it's real low, it's so low
You can't lift me up, I'm like Gallardo
From the start it's been real dark
It's been so dark, I guess that you could call me charbroiled, huh (Hahaha)
I'm playin' like Hasbro
I'm really Saari, call me Arto
Crashed the McLaren, bought me a Tesla
I know you sick of me talkin' 'bout cars (Skrrt)
But what the fuck else do you want from me?
That is the only thing keepin' me company
Purchase some things until I'm annoyed
These items is fillin' the void (Void)
Been fillin' it for so long
I don't even know if it's shit I enjoy (Ohh, woo)
Current battle as an adult
My partner is a shadow
I need love, do you got some I could borrow?
Fuck it, I could find some tomorrow
But that never comes (Nah)
Like a vasectomy, what have I done? (Ohh)
I got the talent, the face and the funds
Found myself long ago but I haven't found someone (Who)
Mirror, mirror on the wall (Who)
The loneliest of them all (Me)
Cupid actin' stupid
Do you got another number I could call?
Never had a pet
I never had a pet
There's more fish in the sea
But I never had a goldfish to begin with
I never had a dog
So I've never been good with bitches
'Cause I never threw a ball, fetch
I never had a pet, that's where it stems from, I bet
Treat me like direct deposit (-Posit)
Check in on me sometime (Okay)
Ask me how I'm really doin'
So I never have to press that 911

Ohh!
Ohh Shit!
Fuck!
Ohh!
Shit!
Ohh!
Damn! Damn!",3138346
104753,2178433,The Story of O.J.,rap,JAY-Z,2017,2088442,{},"
Skin is, skin, is
Skin black, my skin is black
My, black, my skin is yellow


Light nigga, dark nigga, faux nigga, real nigga
Rich nigga, poor nigga, house nigga, field nigga
Still nigga, still nigga
I like that second one
Light nigga, dark nigga, faux nigga, real nigga
Rich nigga, poor nigga, house nigga, field nigga
Still nigga, still nigga


O.J. like, ""I'm not black, I'm O.J."" ...okay


House nigga, don't fuck with me
I'm a field nigga, with shined cutlery
Gold-plated quarters, where the butlers be
I'ma play the corners where the hustlers be
I told him, ""Please don't die over the neighborhood
That your mama rentin'
Take your drug money and buy the neighborhood
That's how you rinse it""
I bought every V12 engine
Wish I could take it back to the beginnin'
I coulda bought a place in DUMBO before it was DUMBO
For like 2 million
That same building today is worth 25 million
Guess how I'm feelin'? Dumbo

Light nigga, dark nigga, faux nigga, real nigga
Rich nigga, poor nigga, house nigga, field nigga
Still nigga, still nigga
Light nigga, dark nigga, faux nigga, real nigga
Rich nigga, poor nigga, house nigga, field nigga
Still nigga, still nigga


You wanna know what's more important than throwin' away money at a strip club? Credit
You ever wonder why Jewish people own all the property in America? This how they did it


Financial freedom my only hope
Fuck livin' rich and dyin' broke
I bought some artwork for one million
Two years later, that shit worth two million
Few years later, that shit worth eight million
I can't wait to give this shit to my children
Y'all think it's bougie, I'm like, it's fine
But I'm tryin' to give you a million dollars worth of game for $9.99
I turned that 2 to a 4, 4 to an 8
I turned my life into a nice first week release date
Y'all out here still takin' advances, huh?
Me and my niggas takin' real chances, uh
Y'all on the 'Gram holdin' money to your ear
There's a disconnect, we don't call that money over here, yeah

Light nigga, dark nigga, faux nigga, real nigga
Rich nigga, poor nigga, house nigga, field nigga
Still nigga, still nigga
Light nigga, dark nigga, faux nigga, real nigga
Rich nigga, poor nigga, house nigga, field nigga
Still nigga, still nigga",3138625
104760,2178448,4:44,rap,JAY-Z,2017,1897097,{},"
Do I find it so hard
When I know in my heart
I'm letting you down every day
Letting you down every day
Why do I keep on running away?


Look, I apologize, often womanize
Took for my child to be born, see through a woman's eyes
Took for these natural twins to believe in miracles
Took me too long for this song, I don't deserve you
I harassed you out in Paris
""Please come back to Rome, you make it home""
We talked for hours when you were on tour
""Please pick up the phone, pick up the phone!""
I said: ""Don't embarrass me"" instead of ""Be mine""
That was my proposal for us to go steady
That was your 21st birthday
You matured faster than me, I wasn't ready
So I apologize
I seen the innocence leave your eyes
I still mourn its death and
I apologize for all the stillborns
'Cause I wasn't present, your body wouldn't accept it
I apologize to all the women whom I toyed with your emotions
'Cause I was emotionless
And I apologize 'cause at your best, you are love
And because I fall short of what I say I'm all about
Your eyes leave with the soul that your body once housed
And you stare blankly into space
Thinkin' of all the time, you wasted it on all this basic shit
So I apologize

I'm never gonna treat you
I'm never gonna treat you like I should
Oh


I apologize
Our love was one for the ages and I contained us
And all this ratchet shit and we more expansive
Not meant to cry and die alone in these mansions
Or sleep with our back turned
We supposed to vacay 'til our backs burn
We're supposed to laugh 'til our heart stops
And then meet in a space where the dark stop
And let love light the way
Like the men before me, I cut off my nose to spite my face
I never wanted another woman to know
Something about me that you didn't know
I promised, I cried, I couldn't hold
I suck at love, I think I need a do-over
I will be emotionally available if I invited you over
I stew over; ""What if-""
""You over my shit?""


I'm never gonna treat you
I'm never gonna treat you like I should
Oh

And if my children knew
I don't even know what I would do
If they ain't look at me the same
I would prob'ly die with all the shame
""You did what with who?""
What good is a ménage à trois when you have a soulmate?
""You risked that for Blue?""
If I wasn't a superhero in your face
My heart breaks for the day I have to explain my mistakes
And the mask goes away
And Santa Claus is fake
And you go online and see
For Blue's tooth, the tooth fairy didn't pay


I'm never gonna treat you like I should",3138638
104783,2178609,Bank Account,rap,21 Savage,2017,2813664,{},"
Ooh, ooh, oh, oh, oh, ow, ow
Wow, wow, wow, ah, ow,  ow, ow


I buy a new car for the bitch (For real)
I tear down the mall with the bitch (For real)
You can't even talk to the bitch (No)
She fucking with bosses and shit (On God)
I pull up in 'Rari's and shit (Skrrr)
With choppers and Harley's and shit (For real)
I be Gucci'd down (Gucci)
You wearing Lacoste and shit (Bitch)
Yeah, Moncler, yuh, fur came off a bear, yuh (Yeah)
Triple homicide, put me in a chair, yuh (In jail)
Triple cross the plug, we do not play fair, yuh (On God)
Got 'em tennis chains on and they real blingy (Bling)
Draco make you do the chicken head like Chingy (Chingy)
Walk in Neiman Marcus and I spend a light fifty (Fifty)
Please proceed with caution, shooters, they be right with me (21)
Bad bitch, cute face and some nice titties
$7500 on a Saint Laurent jacket (Yeah)
Bitch, be careful when you dumpin' your ashes (Bitch)
I ain't no sucker, I ain't cuffin' no action (Nah)
The skreets raised me, I'm a whole bastard (Wild)
I bought a 'Rari just so I can go faster (Skrrr)
Niggas tryna copy me, they playin' catch up (21)
I might pull up in a Ghost, no Casper (21)
I been smoking gas and I got no asthma

I got 1-2-3-4-5-6-7-8 M's in my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
I got 1-2-3-4-5-6-7-8 shooters ready to gun you down, yeah (Fast)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)


Yeah, dawg, huh-yeah-, nah for real, dawg (21)
Straight up out the 6, now got a house in the Hills, dawg (21)
Wanna see a body, nigga? Get you killed, dawg (Wet)
Wanna tweet about me, nigga? Get you killed, dawg (Wet)
Killed dog, I'm a real dawg-21-, you a lil' dawg (21)
Bill dog, want a bil', dog, chasing mil's, dawg (Yeah)
Dunk right in your bitch like O'Neal, dawg (Wet)
Plus I shoot like Reggie Mill', dawg (21)
Chopper sting you like a eel, dawg (Fast)


I got 1-2-3-4-5-6-7-8 M's in my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
I got 1-2-3-4-5-6-7-8 shooters ready to gun you down, yeah (Fast)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)

Ruler clip-umm-, sent a ruler hit
Pull up on yo' bitch, she say that I got a ruler dick
Spray your block down, we not really with that ruh-rah shit
Glock cocked now, I don't really give no fuck 'bout who I hit
Yeah, yo' bitch, she get jiggy with me, keep that Siggy with me
Bitch, I'm Mad Max, you know I got Ziggy with me
Keep a mad mag in case a nigga wanna get busy with me
'Rari matte black and I got a Bentley with me


I got 1-2-3-4-5-6-7-8 M's in my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
In my bank account, yeah (On God)
I got 1-2-3-4-5-6-7-8 shooters ready to gun you down, yeah (Fast)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)
Ready to gun you down, yeah (On God)


$7500 on a Saint Laurent jacket
Bitch, be careful where you dumpin' your ashes
I ain't no sucker, I ain't cuffin' no action
The streets raised me, I'm a whole bastard",3138854
104799,2179004,Sorry Not Sorry,pop,Demi Lovato,2017,2225272,{},"
Payback is a bad bitch
And baby, I'm the baddest
(I'm the baddest, I'm the baddest...)
Go


Now, I'm out here lookin' like revenge
Feelin' like a ten, the best I've ever been
And, yeah, I know how bad it must hurt to see me like this
But it gets worse (Wait a minute)
Now, you're out here lookin' like regret, ain't too proud to beg
Second chance, you'll never get
And, yeah, I know how bad it must hurt to see me like this
But it gets worse (Wait a minute)


Now, payback is a bad bitch
And baby, I'm the baddest
You fuckin' with a savage
Can't have this, can't have this (Ah)
And it'd be nice of me to take it easy on ya, but nah

Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Bein' so bad got me feelin' so good
Showin' you up like I knew that I would
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Feelin' inspired 'cause the tables have turned
Yeah, I'm on fire and I know that it burns


Baby, fineness is the way to kill
Tell me how it feel, bet it's such a bitter pill
And yeah I know, you thought you had bigger, better things
Bet right now this stings (Wait a minute)
'Cause the grass is greener under me
Bright as Technicolor, I can tell that you can see
And yeah, I know how bad it must hurt to see me like this
But it gets worse (Wait a minute)


Now, payback is a bad bitch
And baby, I'm the baddest
You fuckin' with a savage
Can't have this, can't have this (Ah)
And it'd be nice of me to take it easy on ya, but nah

Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Bein' so bad got me feelin' so good
Showin' you up like I knew that I would
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Feelin' inspired 'cause the tables have turned
Yeah, I'm on fire and I know that it burns


Talk that talk, baby
Better walk, better walk that walk, baby
If you talk, if you talk that talk, baby
Better walk, better walk that walk, baby
Oh, yeah, talk that talk, baby
Better walk, better walk, that walk, baby
If you talk, if you talk that talk, baby
Better walk, better walk that walk, baby (Oh, yeah)


Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Bein' so bad got me feelin' so good
Showin' you up like I knew that I would
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Baby, I'm sorry (I'm not sorry)
Feelin' inspired 'cause the tables have turned (Have turned)
Yeah, I'm on fire and I know that it burns
(Sorry, sorry, not sorry, not sorry)

Payback is a bad bitch
And baby, I'm the baddest
I'm the baddest, I'm the baddest",3139343
104802,2179023,Praying,pop,Kesha,2017,1076614,{},"
Well, you almost had me fooled
Told me that I was nothing without you
Oh, but after everything you've done
I can thank you for how strong I have become


'Cause you brought the flames and you put me through hell
I had to learn how to fight for myself
And we both know all the truth I could tell
I'll just say this is I wish you farewell


I hope you're somewhere prayin', prayin'
I hope your soul is changin', changin'
I hope you find your peace
Falling on your knees, prayin'


I'm proud of who I am
No more monsters, I can breathe again
And you said that I was done
Well, you were wrong and now the best is yet to come
'Cause I can make it on my own, oh
And I don't need you, I found a strength I've never known
I'll bring thunder, I'll bring rain, oh-oh
When I'm finished, they won't even know your name

You brought the flames and you put me through hell
I had to learn how to fight for myself
And we both know all the truth I could tell
I'll just say this is I wish you farewell


I hope you're somewhere prayin', prayin'
I hope your soul is changin', changin'
I hope you find your peace
Falling on your knees, prayin'


Oh, sometimes I pray for you at night
Someday, maybe you'll see the light
Oh, some say, in life, you're gonna get what you give
But some things only God can forgive


I hope you're somewhere prayin', prayin'
I hope your soul is changin', changin'
I hope you find your peace
Falling on your knees, prayin'",3139340
104841,2180174,The Race,rap,Tay-K,2017,2161597,{},"
I-I-I'm Lil Tay-K, I don't think you want no action (Gang, gang)
You want action, you get turned into past tense (In the past)
Your boys deep? Well, let's get to subtractin' (Bah, bah)
Smith & Wesson made my 9 with sub-compaction (Skrrt)


Fu-fu-fuck a beat, I was tryna beat a case (Gang, gang)
But I ain't beat that case, bitch, I did the race (Skrrt, skrrt)
Beat it up, where I nut? Shorty face (Lil bitch)
Eli Blast crackin' 4s like a vase (Gang)
Pop a nigga then I go out my way (Skrrt)
Do the dash then I go out the way
Ro-ro-rob a nigga shoes, rob a nigga lace (Gimme that shit, nigga)
We tryna see a hunnit bands in our face


Pimp gon' be eatin' good noodles every day (Free Pimp)
Bitch, I'm drawin' doodles, Tay-K, paint the way (You're a simp)
Choppa tear your dudies into fish fillet (Lil bitch)
I-I-I woke up too moody, who gon' die today? (Skrrt)
Shoot a fuckboy in his mothafuckin' face (Grrah, grrah)
We-we-we cookin' up, boy, you don't wanna go dat way (Dat way, dat way)
Gotta go dat way, you get robbed for your rackades (Rackades, rackades)
Gotta go dat way, boy, you not gon' be happy (Hahaha)
I-I-I tote 50s, I'm a shooter like Young Pappy (Pew)
Bitch try to rob, we make her dance, Michael Jackson (Skrrt)
We was plottin', y'all was tryna get the pack in (Lil bitch)
Get the pack in, you get robbed for a fraction (Gimme that shit)

I-I-I'm Lil Tay-K, I don't think you want no action
You want action, you get turned into past tense
Your boys deep? Well, let's get to subtractin'
Smith & Wesson made my 9 with sub-compaction


Fu-fu-fuck a beat, I was tryna beat a case
But I ain't beat that case, bitch, I did the race (Skrrt, skrrt)
Beat it up, where I nut? Shorty face (Gang, gang)
Eli Blast crackin' 4s like a vase
Pop a nigga then I go out my way (Grra, grra)
Do the dash then I go out the way
Ro-ro-rob a nigga shoes, rob a nigga lace (Gimme that shit, nigga)
We tryna see a hunnit bands in our face
Fu-fu-fuck a beat, I was tryna beat a case (Gang, gang)
But I ain't beat that case, bitch, I did the race (Skrrt, skrrt)
Beat it up, where I nut? Shorty face (Lil bitch)
Eli Blast crackin' 4s like a vase (Gang)
Pop a nigga then I go out my way (Skrrt)
Do the dash then I go out the way
Ro-ro-rob a nigga shoes, rob a nigga lace (Gimme that shit, nigga)
We tryna see a hunnit bands in our face


See it in my mothafuckin' face",3140655
104931,2182392,​idontwannabeyouanymore,pop,Billie Eilish,2017,2803781,{},"
Don't be that way
Fall apart twice a day
I just wish you could feel what you say
Show, never tell
But I know you too well
Kind of mood that you wish you could sell


If teardrops could be bottled
There'd be swimming pools filled by models
Told, ""A tight dress is what makes you a whore""
If ""I love you"" was a promise
Would you break it, if you're honest?
Tell the mirror what you know she's heard before
I don't wanna be you
Anymore


Hands, hands getting cold
Losing feeling is getting old
Was I made from a broken mold?
Hurt, I can't shake
We've made every mistake
Only you know the way that I break

If teardrops could be bottled
There'd be swimming pools filled by models
Told, ""A tight dress is what makes you a whore""
If ""I love you"" was a promise
Would you break it, if you're honest?
Tell the mirror what you know she's heard before
I don't wanna be you
I don't wanna be you
I don't wanna be you
Anymore",3143252
104932,2182402,COPYCAT,pop,Billie Eilish,2017,1121989,{},"
Don't be cautious, don't be kind
You committed, I'm your crime
Push my button anytime
You got your finger on the trigger, but your trigger finger's mine


Silver dollar, golden flame
Dirty water, poison rain
Perfect murder, take your aim
I don't belong to anyone, but everybody knows my name


By the way, you've been uninvited
'Cause all you say are all the same things I did


Copycat tryna cop my manner
Watch your back when you can't watch mine
Copycat tryna cop my glamour
Why so sad, bunny? Can't have mine

Call me calloused, call me cold
You're italic, I'm in bold
Call me cocky, watch your tone
You better love me, 'cause you're just a clone


By the way, you've been uninvited
'Cause all you say are all the same things I did


Copycat tryna cop my manner
Watch your back when you can't watch mine
Copycat tryna cop my glamour
Why so sad, bunny? Can't have mine


Mine
I would hate to see you go
Hate to be the one that told you so
You just crossed the line
You've run out of time
I'm so sorry, now you know
Sorry I'm the one that told you so
Sorry, sorry, I'm sorry, sorry
Psych

By the way, you've been uninvited
'Cause all you say are all the same things I did


Copycat tryna cop my manner
Watch your back when you can't watch mine
Copycat tryna cop my glamour
Why so sad, bunny? Can't have mine",3143254
105149,2185345,See You Again,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2017,1893992,"{""Tyler / The Creator"",""Kali Uchis""}","
Okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, o-


You live in my dream state
Relocate my fantasy
I stay in reality
You live in my dream state
Any time I count sheep
That's the only time we make up, make up
You exist behind my eyelids, my eyelids
Now, I don't wanna wake up


20/20, 20/20 vision
Cupid hit me, cupid hit me with precision, eye
Wonder if you look both ways when you cross my mind
I said, I said
I'm sick of, sick of, sick of, sick of chasing
You're the one that's always running through my daydreams, I
I can only see your face when I close my eyes
So...

Can I get a kiss?
And can you make it last forever?
I said, I'm 'bout to go to war (Uh-huh)
And I don't know if I'ma see you again
Can I get a kiss? (Can I?)
And can you make it last forever? (Can you?)
I said, I'm 'bout to go to war (I'm 'bout to)
And I don't know if I'ma see you again
Ugh, switch it up


I said, okay, okay, okay, okey-dokey, my infatuation
Is translating to another form of what you call it? (Love)
Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah, I ain't met you, I've been looking
Stop the waiting 'fore I stop the chasing, like an alcoholic
""You don't understand me""-what the fuck do you mean?
It's them rose-tinted cheeks, yeah, it's them dirt-colored eyes
Sugar-honey iced tea, bumblebee on the scene
Yeah, I'd give up my bakery to have a piece of your pie
Ugh!


20/20, 20/20 vision
Cupid hit me, cupid hit me with precision, eye
Wonder if you look both ways when you cross my mind
I said, I said
I'm sick of, sick of, sick of, sick of chasing
You're the one that's always running through my daydreams, I
I can only see your face when I close my eyes
So...

Can I get a kiss? (Can I get a kiss?)
And can you make it last forever? (Make it last forever)
I said I'm 'bout to go to war ('Bout to go to war)
I don't know if I'ma see you again (See you again)
Can I get a kiss? (Can I?)
And can you make it last forever? (Can you?)
I said I'm 'bout to go to war ('Bout to)
And I don't know if I'ma see you again


Okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, o-
(La la, la la la la, la la)
Okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, o-
(La la, la la la, la la)
Okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, okay, o-
(La la, la la la la, la la
La la, la la la la)
One more time?",3146682
105383,2189891,No Limit,rap,G-Eazy,2017,2578182,"{""A\\$AP Rocky"",""Cardi B""}","
If I hit it one time, I'ma pipe her
If I hit it two times then I like her
If I fuck three times, I'ma wife her
It ain't safe for the black or the white girls
It ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe
Tell your man pipe up, nigga, pipe up
Hunnit bands from the safe in your face, what'd you say? (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Money, dance, turn this shit into a nightclub
(Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)


Ayy, yeah, fuck with me and get some money
Yeah, ayy, fuck with me and get some money
Ayy, yeah, fuck with me and get some money
Ayy, yeah, fuck with G and get some money


No limit, I'm a fucking soldier, ayy
Always lit, yeah, I'm never sober
It's been three days in a row, your bitch coming over
Told that bitch to kick rocks, she act like it's a boulder, ayy
'Rari, shopping, let me, cop it
Always, poppin', hella, poppin'
She's a, bopper, homie, hoppin'
Ain't no, stopping, album, droppin'
Got the city on fire
Bitch lying on me like she tired
I might have to fuck around and call Kamaiyah
Ho stirring up the pot, jambalaya
Young Gerald, ayy

If I hit it one time, I'ma pipe her
If I hit it two times then I like her
If I fuck three times, I'ma wife her
It ain't safe for the black or the white girls
It ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe
Tell your man pipe up, nigga, pipe up
Hunnit bands from the safe in your face, what'd you say? (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Money, dance, turn this shit into a nightclub
(Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)


Yeah, fuck him then I get some money
Yeah, fuck him then I get some money
Yeah, fuck him then I get some money
Yeah, fuck him then I get some money


I need tongue, I need face, give me brain, concentrate
Apple phone, Prada case, kill a weave, rock a lace
Fuck the Moët, buy the Ace, fuck the Ghost, drive the Wraith
Get some money, flood the Rollie, fuck the Rollie, Patek face
My career takin' off, these hoes jogging in place
Swear these hoes run they mouth, how these hoes out of shape?
Can you stop with all the subs? Bitch, I ain't Jared
If you really want some smoke, you can pull up, you can get it
Grab a hand full of braids, make your nigga eat me out
Put a white boy on Sazón, I might turn G-Eazy out
Keep it G from the club 'til the end from the start
You know me, Cardi B, pussy poppin' on the charts, ah, ah!

If I hit it one time, I'ma pipe her
If I hit it two times then I like her
If I fuck three times, I'ma wife her
It ain't safe for the black or the white girls
It ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe
Tell your man pipe up, nigga, pipe up
Hunnit bands from the safe in your face, what'd you say? (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Money, dance, turn this shit into a nightclub
(Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)


Ayy, yeah, fuck with me and get some money
Yeah, ayy, fuck with me and get some money
Ayy, yeah, fuck with me and get some money
Ayy, yeah, fuck with G and get some money


Yeah, it ain't nice, fam
You can study where I'm from on my Viceland
This is nothing new to me, this my life, fam
I can pull a million girls from a mic stand
Pull one at my show 'cause I like fans
Later on, I got two in my night plans
Man this year, I had 300 one night stands
Keep a Costco pack of rubbers in my night stand
Damn Daniel, back again with the, hah, Saint-Laurent
Ayy, they send me product, yeah, it's retarded
Ayy, this was free, ayy, bitch you bought it
Bitch you on my dick, ayy, bitch get off it

If I hit it one time, I'ma pipe her
If I hit it two times then I like her (I like her)
If I fuck three times, I'ma wife her (Wife her)
It ain't safe for the black or the white girls
It ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe, it ain't safe
Tell your man pipe up, nigga, pipe up
Hunnit bands from the safe in your face, what'd you say? (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Money, dance, turn this shit into a nightclub
(Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)


Ayy, yeah, fuck with me and get some money
Yeah, ayy, fuck with me and get some money
Ayy, yeah, fuck with me and get some money
Ayy, yeah, fuck with G and get some money",3151905
105800,2198011,Betrayed,rap,Lil Xan,2017,1863814,{},"
Huh, ayy (Yeah)
You are now listening to a Bobby Johnson beat
What? Yeah, ayy, ayy


Pop the trunk, I open up
I sold my soul, a good price, outta sight
And my ho got talent, right?
Whole squad ran through that shit, yikes
Ayy, I'm a business man, I did my business, damn
And I'ma bend it down, then I'ma lick her up
And then dick her down, she gon' turn around
Then I'ma kick her out, she gon' talk that shit but still
Ayy, how you make it up? How you fake a love?
Holy son, I was the chosen one
I'm sippin' out the grail, she don't kiss and tell
She keep my wishes well, I don't need her, well
Oh, yeah, how my enemy a friend of me?
Why y'all feed off of my energy?
Like I ain't dead yet, higher entity
Foreign bitch that think she into me
Whip the foreign very viciously
Why these dudes wanna take pics with me?
She said she gay, but still into me
She said she gay, still into me
Said she hate that I'm in the streets
And I said I hate that I'm in the streets
I wanna blow up and make history
Said she hate my Insta' feed

Xans don't make you
Xans gon' take you
Xans gon' fake you
And Xans gon' betray you
Xans don't make you
Xans gon' take you
Xans gon' fake you
Xans gon' betray you (Yeah, ayy)


And her pussy tastes like Skittles, what? Yeah, ayy
You can really taste the rainbow, what? Hah, no
Your bitch just like a Crayola, what? Ayy
You can draw her on the table, flip her like some yola
Ayy, heart-shaped kisses, I really miss my mistress
And 666, evil bitches want my mentions
Heart-shaped kisses, really miss my mistress
And it's 666, evil bitches want my mentions


Xans don't make you
Xans gon' take you
Xans gon' fake you
And Xans gon' betray you
Xans don't make you
Xans gon' take you
Xans gon' fake you
Xans gon' betray you

Xans gon' fake you
Xans gon' betray you
Xans gon' take you
Xans gon' betray you
Xans gon' take you
Xans gon' take you
What? Ayy, what? Ayy
Xans gon' take
Xans gon' take you
Yeah, Xans gon'
Xans' gon take you
Ayy, Xans gon' take you",3160892
106326,2208240,Save That Shit,rap,Lil Peep,2017,1422449,{},"
(Yeah)


Fuck my life, can't save that, girl
Don't tell me you could save that shit
All she want is payback for the way I always play that shit
You ain't gettin' nothin' that I'm sayin'
Don't tell me you is
Nothin' like them other motherfuckers
I can make you rich (I can make you rich)
I can make you this, baby, I can make you that
I can take you there, but baby, you won't make it back
Growing sick of this and I don't wanna make you sad
Do I make you scared? Baby, won't you take me back?


Nothin' like them other motherfuckers
I can make you rich (I can make you rich)
Nothin' like them other motherfuckers
I can make you rich

Fuck my life, can't save that, girl
Don't tell me you could save that shit
All she want is payback for the way I always play that shit
You ain't gettin' nothin' that I'm sayin'
Don't tell me you is
Nothin' like them other motherfuckers
I can make you rich (Make you rich)
I can make you this, baby, I can make you that
I can take you there, but baby, you won't make it back
Growing sick of this and I don't wanna make you sad
Do I make you scared? Baby, won't you take me back?
(Do I make you scared?)


Down another lonely road, I go
Just another lonely road to home
I just wanna know, I just gotta know
Do you wanna glo? Baby, we could glo


Fuck my life, can't save that, girl
Don't tell me you could save that shit
All she want is payback for the way I always play that shit
You ain't gettin' nothin' that I'm sayin'
Don't tell me you is
Nothin' like them other motherfuckers
I can make you rich (I can make you rich)
I can make you this, baby, I can make you that
I can take you there, but baby, you won't make it back
Growing sick of this and I don't wanna make you sad
Do I make you scared? Baby, won't you take me back?

Do I make you scared? Baby, won't you take me back?
Nothin' like them other mothafuckas'
I can make you rich (I can make you rich)",3175124
106782,2216021,Fuck Love,rap,XXXTENTACION,2017,3915191,"{""Trippie Redd""}","
Ooh, baby, I need you in my life, in my life
Please, bae, don't go switchin' sides, switchin' sides
I swear this is where you reside, you reside
Please, bae, don't go switchin' sides, switchin' sides
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Ooh-ooh, please don't throw your love away, huh
Please don't throw your love away, huh
Please don't throw your love away, huh
Yeah, yeah, yeah, ayy


I'm nauseous, I'm dyin'
(She ripped my heart right out)
Can't find her, someone to-
(My eyes are all cried out)
Lost it, riots
Gunfire inside my head, I've
Lost it, riots
Gunfire inside my head

Baby, I need you in my life, in my life
Please, bae, don't go switchin' sides, switchin' sides
I swear this is where you reside, you reside
Please, bae, don't go switchin' sides, switchin' sides
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Ooh-ooh, please don't throw your love away, huh
Please don't throw your love away, huh
Please don't throw your love away, huh, yeah, yeah, ye-",3182605
106784,2216076,Depression  Obsession,rock,XXXTENTACION,2017,1119176,{},"
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na


Depression and obsession don't mix well
(Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na)
I'm poisoned and my body don't feel well
(Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na)
I ate her, inside and out, I feel my stomach turnin'
Make out hill, where we met we let our lips do all the talkin'
And now I'm hooked and...
(Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na)
Depression and obsession don't mix well (Well)
Hollywood motels, hell, I think I'm just obsessed with you
Depression and obsession don't mix well
(Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na)
Hollywood motels, hell, I think I'm just obsessed with you


Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na
Na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na, na",3182604
106827,2216615,Best Part,rb,Daniel Caesar,2017,2545033,{H.E.R.},"
Oh, hey


You don't know babe
When you hold me
And kiss me slowly
It's the sweetest thing
And it don't change
If I had it my way
You would know that you are


You're the coffee that I need in the morning
You're my sunshine in the rain when it's pouring
Won't you give yourself to me?
Give it all, oh


I just wanna see
I just wanna see how beautiful you are
You know that I see it, I know you're a star
Where you go I'll follow, no matter how far
If life is a movie, know you're the best part, ooh
You're the best part, ooh
Best part

It's this sunrise
And those brown eyes, yes
You're the one that I desire
When we wake up
And then we make love (Make love)
It makes me feel so nice


You're my water when I'm stuck in the desert
You're the Tylenol I take when my head hurts
You're the sunshine on my life


I just wanna see how beautiful you are
You know that I see it, I know you're a star
Where you go I'll follow, no matter how far
If life is a movie, then you're the best part, oh
You're the best part, ooh
Best part


If you love me, won't you say something?
If you love me, won't you?
Won't you?
If you love me, won't you say something?
If you love me, won't you?
Love me, won't you?
If you love me, won't you say something?
If you love me, won't you?
If you love me, won't you say something?
If you love me, won't you?
Love me, won't you?
If you love me, won't you say something?
If you love me, won't you?
If you love me, won't you say something?
If you love me, won't you?
Love me, won't you?",3183199
106989,2218822,Jocelyn Flores,rap,XXXTENTACION,2017,6857596,{},"
I know you so well, so well
I mean, I can do anything that he can
I've been pretty-


I know you're somewhere, somewhere
I've been trapped in my mind, girl, just holding on
I don't wanna pretend we're something, we're nothing
I've been stuck thinking 'bout her, I can't hold on (I'll be feeling)


I'm in pain, wanna put ten shots in my brain
I've been trippin' 'bout some things, can't change
Suicidal, same time I'm tame
Picture this, in bed, get a phone call
Girl that you fucked with killed herself
That was this summer when nobody helped
And ever since then, man, I hate myself
Wanna fuckin' end it, pessimistic
All wanna see me with no pot to piss in
But niggas been excited 'bout the grave I'm diggin'
Havin' conversations 'bout my haste decisions
Fuckin' sickenin'; at the same time
Memories surface through the grapevine
'Bout my uncle playin' with a slip knot
Post-traumatic stress got me fucked up
Been fucked up since the couple months they had a nigga locked up

I'll be feelin' pain, I'll be feelin' pain just to hold on
And I don't feel the same, I'm so numb
I'll be feelin' pain, I'll be feelin' pain just to hold on
And I don't feel the same, I'm so numb


I know you so well (I know you, girl)
I mean, I can do better than he can
I've been pretty-
I know you so well",3185661
107001,2219216,Roll in Peace,rap,Kodak Black,2017,1502728,{XXXTENTACION},"
Ayy, everything be like, off the top these days like
(We got London on da Track)
These days, I don't even know what a pad is these days, ya know?
Yah, ya-ya-ya-yah
Fuck that ho 'cause she a nat nat


You ain't the one for me, baby
You ain't got shit I need, bitch
You want me to take my time with you
Well maybe I'm not your speed bitch
Maybe I'm out your league, bitch
You ain't even got no cheese, bitch
Maybe I'm just too G for you
Or maybe I'm just too street, bitch


I can't even roll in peace (Why?)
Everybody notice me (Yeah)
I can't even go to sleep (Why?)
I'm rolling on a bean (Yeah)
They tried to give me eight
Got on my knees like, ""Jesus, please""
He don't even believe in Jesus
Why you got a Jesus piece?
If you wanna leave, just leave, but you ain't gotta lie to me
Even the blind can see (Fuck)
That you ain't gon' ride for me
You ain't even showing me the love you say you got for me
There ain't no loyalty, you lied to me
You said that you gon' ride for me

Baby, that's blasphemy, yeah
Baby, you're bad for me, yeah
Say you gon' clap for me, yeah
Say you gon' blast for me, yeah
Why you ain't show me none of the love you say you have for me? Yeah
I was goin' through tragedy
Bitch, I needed you drastically, yeah
I'ma just switch my flow up, yeah
Maybe I'm sick, no throw up, yeah
Maybe I'm sick, no check up, yeah
Boy, you need to run your check up, yeah
I'm eatin' on you niggas, no ketchup, yeah
I'm eatin' on you niggas, can't catch up, ayy
Hit her face down with her ass up, ayy
Even when I'm fucking, I'm masked up, ayy


You ain't the one for me, baby
You ain't got shit I need, bitch
You want me to take my time with you
Well maybe I'm not your speed bitch
Maybe I'm out your league, bitch
You ain't even got no cheese, bitch
Maybe I'm just too G for you
Or maybe I'm just too street, bitch

I can't even roll in peace (Why?)
Everybody notice me (Yeah)
I can't even go to sleep (Why?)
I'm rolling on a bean (Yeah)
They tried to give me eight
Got on my knees like, ""Jesus, please""
He don't even believe in Jesus
Why you got a Jesus piece?
If you wanna leave, just leave, but you ain't gotta lie to me
Even the blind can see (Fuck)
That you ain't gon' ride for me
You ain't even showing me the love you say you got for me
There ain't no loyalty, you lied to me
And you say that you gon' ride with me


I ain't gon' do the nigga shit 'cause I'm too good for features, huh
I ain't gon' fuck the nigga bitch 'cause I know she a eater, huh
Last time I wifed a bitch, she told the world I beat her, huh
And when they locked lil' Kodak up, my nigga, I couldn't believe it, huh
Ayy, lil' shawty, pop my whoadie
Pockets on Pinocchio, poking, yuh
Hit her from the back, damn, that bitch bleeding
Said that I knocked her period on
Remember when I had that poker, huh
Instead of looking over my shoulder, huh
Forces with a nigga, no Yoda, huh
That mean a young nigga got woo on me (Ayy)

You ain't the one for me, baby
You ain't got shit I need, bitch
You want me to take my time with you
Well maybe I'm not your speed, bitch
Maybe I'm out your league, bitch
You ain't even got no cheese, bitch
Maybe I'm just too G for you
Or maybe I'm just too street, bitch


I can't even roll in peace (Why?)
Everybody notice me (Yeah)
I can't even go to sleep (Why?)
I'm rolling on a bean (Yeah)
They tried to give me eight
Got on my knees like, ""Jesus, please""
He don't even believe in Jesus
Why you got a Jesus piece?
If you wanna leave, just leave, but you ain't gotta lie to me
Even the blind can see (Fuck)
That you ain't gon' ride for me
You ain't even showing me the love you say you got me for me
There ain't no loyalty, you lied to me
You say that you gon' ride for me, ayy


I'm in London, got my beat from London",3186102
107077,2220729,Silence,pop,Marshmello,2017,1708481,{Khalid},"
Yeah, I'd rather be a lover than a fighter (Fighter)
'Cause all my life, I've been fighting
Never felt a feeling of comfort, oh
And all this time, I've been hiding
And I never had someone to call my own, oh nah
I'm so used to sharing
Love only left me alone
But I'm at one with the silence


I found peace in your violence
Can't tell me there's no point in trying
I'm at one, and I've been quiet for too long
I found peace in your violence
Can't tell me there's no point in trying
I'm at one, and I've been silent for too long


I've been quiet for too long
I've been quiet for too long
I found peace in your violence
Can't tell me there's no point in trying
I'm at one, and I've been quiet for too long

I'm in need of a savior (Savior), but I'm not asking for favors
My whole life, I've felt like a burden
I think too much, and I hate it
I'm so used to being in the wrong, I'm tired of caring
Loving never gave me a home, so I'll sit here in the silence


I found peace in your violence
Can't tell me there's no point in trying
I'm at one, and I've been quiet for too long
I found peace in your violence
Can't tell me there's no point in trying
I'm at one, and I've been silent for too long


I've been quiet for too long
I've been quiet for too long
I found peace in your violence
Can't tell me there's no point in trying
I'm at one, and I've been quiet for too long",3188009
107408,2226578,Heyecanı Yok,rap,Gazapizm,2017,1031608,{},"


Montumun cebinde yok kuruş
Zıplıyor herkes kanguru sanki
Full depo Taunus'um
Bi' de kafamıza bass vurur ama yine yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok, yok


Hah! Kazan kazan yok kaybed'cek birimiz kaçarı yok
Çocuk çok, yatarım yok, oynayan aç ayı yok
Olmayan façası yok, kurtaran paçayı yok
Gelecek için bir hedefin yok, yarının yok
Hah! Temel güvenin yok, illegal, legal, düzenin yok
Para kesesi yok, bekleme, rüzgarın esesi yok
Her şey boş yere tasarı yok
Bak büyüdüğün sokakta masalın yok
Hah! Kollarından öte saranın yok
Dirisin ya da ölü arafı yok
Kapımın önünde polisler var
Elinde silahla komiser var
Üstümde, başımda kan izi var
Önümde kocaman valizler var
Bana tepeler, denizler dar
Bi' de sırtımda keneler var
Yarım kalır o şarkılar, bur'da Panda yok, Develer var

Montumun cebinde yok kuruş
Zıplıyor herkes kanguru sanki
Full depo Taunus'um
Bi' de kafamıza bass vurur ama yine yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok, yok
Montumun cebinde yok kuruş
Zıplıyor herkes kanguru sanki
Full depo Taunus'um
Bi' de kafamıza bass vurur ama yine yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok, yok


Artık gerçeğin farkında herkes, kimse doymuyo' yerken
Hayat en psycho mektep, yanacak kafan gençken
Olacaklar hep elzem depresyon gettoya kısmet
Ve de kaygıya saplanmış herkes mi zorlayan üstelik
Yaşama sevincine el koyan denge
Ve umutların er geç ölür
Bi' de bakarsın her şey sönük
Suça en yakın eksen görür
Hızlı yaşayan erken ölür
Biz yakarsak söndüremezler, geri döndüremezler
Bizi heyecanlandıramıyorsa bi' şeyler artık öldüremezler
Ah! Herkes delirmiş hiç etkinlikler etik değil
Hep biz pisliklere itildik
Bizi bitirmiş çelişki
Ki bilemezdik ne işti
Daha dur hele ne içtik?
Tüm bilincini yitirmiş şehir kurtları tedirgin

Montumun cebinde yok kuruş
Zıplıyor herkes kanguru sanki
Full depo Taunus'um
Bi' de kafamıza bass vurur ama yine yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok, yok
Montumun cebinde yok kuruş
Zıplıyor herkes kanguru sanki
Full depo Taunus'um
Bi' de kafamıza bass vurur ama yine yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok
Bu hayatın heyecanı meycanı yok, yok",3194991
107481,2228910,Glow Like Dat,rap,Rich Brian,2017,1431878,{},"
I done seen you glow like that, I must say that I'm proud
Thinkin' 'bout the times when you would go into my house (ayy)
Had to let you go like that, I'd say it fucked me up (ayy)
You live in my head without a doubt (ayy)
Always anxious, got your picture on my necklace (yuh)
Say I'm smart but never seen a day of campus (skrrr, skrrr)
Gave me 'nani, don't be sorry, we're just reckless (skrrr, skrrr)
Think about you every time I see your drawers (yuh)


I be on my Mac DeMarco shit
Break my heart then smoke a cig
Even put some cloves in it (cloves cloves cloves)
Don't test me because my skin ain't thick
Hit your walls, I need my fix
Pull up on you, I need...


Way more with you
Had too much of these hoes
Never told you 'bout the summer that I spent with my bros
Doin' things like your legs
Just gon' stay open now they closed
Thought I'd fix the road
But now you out here flyin' on your own
Nah...

I was just thinkin' 'bout you
And it made me think of colors of the space
70 miles up in my coupe
And not a thought 'bout steppin' on my brakes


I done seen you glow like that, I must say that I'm proud
Thinkin' 'bout the times when you would go into my house (Ayy)
Had to let you go like that, I'd say it fucked me up (Ayy)
You live in my head without a doubt (Ayy)
Always anxious, got your picture on my necklace (Yuh)
Say I'm smart but never seen a day of campus (Skrrr, skrrr)
Gave me 'nani, don't be sorry, we're just reckless (Skrrr, skrrr)
Think about you every time I see your drawers


All these parties I attend, but never know the celebration
I let you do what you want, no need for explanation
You go through my mind all day
All night, it feels like immigration
One of these days I'll fuck around
And book a flight up to Manhattan
Don't wanna see you go, but I'd do the same as you
Don't see why you would go back to seein' me when you
Didn't wanna hurt my feelings, but I couldn't get a clue
Didn't wanna seem perceivin' 'bout the things that you pursue

I was just thinkin' 'bout you
And it made me think of colors of the space
70 miles up in my coupe
And not a thought 'bout steppin' on my brakes


I done seen you glow like that, I must say that I'm proud
Thinkin' 'bout the times when you would go into my house (Ayy)
Had to let you go like that, I'd say it fucked me up (Ayy)
You live in my head without a doubt (Ayy)
Always anxious, got your picture on my necklace (Yuh)
Say I'm smart but never seen a day of campus (Skrrr, skrrr)
Gave me 'nani, don't be sorry, we're just reckless (Skrrr, skrrr)
Think about you every time I see your drawers


Yeah, I be on my Mac DeMarco shit
Break my heart then smoke a cig
Even put some cloves in it (cloves cloves cloves)
Don't test me because my skin ain't thick
Hit your walls, I need my fix
Pull up on you, I need...",3197893
107553,2230078,Reggaetón Lento Remix,pop,CNCO & Little Mix,2017,1091905,{},"

[Verse 1: Leigh-Anne Pinnock with Erick Brian Colón, Leigh-Anne with Jesy Nelson , Jade Thirlwall, *Perrie Edwards*]
Boy, I can see the way you dancing, move that body
I know it's crazy, but I feel like you could be
The one that I've been chasing in my dreams
Boy, I can see you're looking at me like you want it
*Oh, usually I'm like, ""Whatever,"" but tonight
The way you moving got me, ""Where am I?""*

[Chorus: Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel, CNCO, Jade Thirlwall, Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel & Zabdiel de Jesús, *Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel & Perrie Edwards*, (Jesy Nelson), (Perrie Edwards)]
It started when I looked in her eyes
I got close and I'm like ""Bailemos"", hey
La noche está para un reggaetón lento (Hey)
De esos que no se bailan hace tiempo (Ooh, ooh)
Yo sólo la miré y me gustó
Me pegué y la invité: ""Bailemos?"", hey
So now we dancing un reggaetón lento
*Just get a little closer, baby, let go* (Hmm)

[Verse 2: Jesy Nelson, with Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel, Zabdiel de Jesús with Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel, (CNCO)]
Excuse me baby boy, just had to dance with you now
See there's nobody in here that comes close to you, no
Your hands are on my waist, my lips you wanna taste
Come muévete, muévete, muévete (Hey)
Our bodies on fire, with full of desire
If you feel what I feel, throw your hands up higher (Hey)
And to all the ladies around the world
Go ahead and muévete, muévete, muévete
[Chorus: Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel, with Little Mix, All, Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel & Zabdiel de Jesús & Little Mix]
It started when I looked in her eyes
I got close and I'm like ""Bailemos"", hey
La noche está para un reggaetón lento
De esos que no se bailan hace tiempo
Yo sólo la miré y me gustó
Me pegué y la invité: ""Bailemos?"", hey
So now we dancing un reggaetón lento
Just get a little closer, baby, let go


Do you know I like you when you take it to the floor? (The floor)
I know you like this reggaetón lento (Lento)
This ain't stopping, baby, 'til I say so
Come get, come get some more, ahh


Ohh, boy, I wish that this could last forever
'Cause every second by your side is heaven
Oh, come give me that, give me that boom, boom, boom, oh
I tell you, baby, you, baby, you get me hotter
Loving made me sick, made me sick, you my doctor
Don't you know you're playing with fire tonight
Can we get it right here one more time

[Chorus: Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel, Perrie Edwards, All, Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel & Little Mix, *Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel & Zabdiel de Jesús & Little Mix*, (Jade Thirlwall)]
It started when I looked in her eyes (Yeah)
I got close and I'm like ""Bailemos"", hey (Bailemos)
La noche está para un reggaetón lento
De esos que no se  bailan hace tiempo
Yo sólo la *miré y me gustó
Me pegué y la invité: ""Bailemos?""*, hey
So now we dancing un reggaetón lento (Reggaetón lento)
Just get a little closer, baby, let go (Closer, baby, let go)
[Chorus: Richard Camacho, Leigh-Anne Pinnock, Richard Camacho & Joel Pimentel with Zabdiel de Jesús & Little Mix, *All*, (Jade Thirlwall)]
Yo sólo la miré y me gustó (Ahhh)
Me pegué y la invité: ""Bailemos"", hey
La noche está para un reggaetón lento (Oooh)
De esos que no se bailan hace tiempo (Oooh)
It started when I looked in her eyes
I got close and I'm like, ""Bailemos"", *hey*
So now we dancing un reggaetón lento
Just get a little closer, baby, let go (Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh)

[Post-Chorus: Jade Thirlwall & Leigh-Anne Pinnock & Richard Camacho, Leigh-Anne Pinnock, Perrie Edwards, Jade Thirlwall, *Jesy Nelson*, (CNCO)]
Muévete, muévete, eh, eh, eh (Yeah, yeah)
Báilalo, báilalo
So now we dancing un reggaetón lento (Oh-eh, oh-eh-oh)
Let's get a little closer, slow the tempo, woah, oh (Oh-eh-oh, oh-eh-oh)
Muévete, muévete, eh, eh, eh (Just dance with me now)
Drop it low, drop it low
*So now we dancing un reggaetón lento* (Oh-eh, oh-eh-oh)
*Just get a little closer, baby, let's go, mmh* (Oh-eh-oh, oh-eh-oh)",3199350
107627,2231225,I Get the Bag,rap,Gucci Mane,2017,1563978,{Migos},"
Ha
It's Gucci, it's Drop Top
Wizop, whoo
Yeah, ayy (Go)


You get the bag and fumble it
I get the bag and flip it and tumble it (Yeah)
Straight out the lot, three hundred cash (Cash)
And the car came with a blunt in it (Yeah)
Lil' mama a thot, and she got ass (Thot)
And she gon' fuck up a bag (Yeah)
Pull up to the spot, livin' too fast (Yeah)
Droppin' the dope in the stash (Yeah)
In Italy, got two foreign hoes, they DM me (Ooh, brr, ayy)
Drop the top when it's cold (Drop-top)
But you feel the heat (Skrrt, yeah, ayy)
Be real with me
Keep it 100, just be real with me (Ayy)
Eat it up like it's a feast (Woah, eat it up)
They say the dope on fleek (Yep)

Percocet pill on me (Percocet)
Ice on my neck, baby, chill with me (Ice)
Them niggas that post in the back don't say nothin'
Them niggas will kill for me
Back ends I count in my sleep, on fleek
Hundred K spent on a Patek Phillippe (Phillippe)
Bitch, I'm a dog, eat my treat (Hrr)
Hop out the frog and leap (Leap)
I put them bricks in the fender
My bitch, she walk around like she Kris Jenner (Kris Jenner)
I used to break in and enter
Then Takeoff runnin' like the game of temple (Whew)
It's simple, I play with her mental
Mama said she saw me on Jimmy Kimmel (Mama)
Count it up, 'cause I'm a money symbol
Walkin' with the racks, I'm lookin' crippled (Money)
Fuck on that bitch then I tip her (Tip her)
A nickel for me to take pictures (Nickel)
Not from L.A. but I clip her (Brr)
Double my cup, pour a triple (Actavis)
Fox on my body, no Vivica (Fox on my...)
I'm not your average or typical (I'm not your...)
Look at my wrist, and it's critical (Look at the...)
Hold it up, droppin' the temperature (Droppin' the...)
I get that bag on the regular (Bag)
I got a bag on my cellular (Brr)
Backin' up, baggin' up vegetables (Bag)
Bag of them cookies, it's medical (Cookies)
Cocaine, codeine, etcetera (White)
Cocaine and lean, it's federal (White)
I take off, landin' on Nebula
As of now twenty M's on my schedule (Takeoff)

You get the bag and fumble it
I get the bag and flip it and tumble it (Yeah)
Straight out the lot, three hundred cash (Cash)
And the car came with a blunt in it (Yeah)
Lil' mama a thot, and she got ass (Thot)
And she gon' fuck up a bag (Yeah)
Pull up to the spot, livin' too fast (Yeah)
Droppin' the dope in the stash (Yeah)
In Italy, got two foreign hoes, they DM me (Ooh, brr, ayy)
Drop the top when it's cold (Drop-top)
But you feel the heat (Skrrt, yeah, ayy)
Be real with me
Keep it 100, just be real with me (It's Gucci, ayy)
Eat it up like it's a feast (Hah, woah, eat it up)
They say the dope on fleek (Yep)


I know that these niggas gettin' sick of me (Eww-ah)
These chains on my neck cost a mil' a piece (Um)
I don't even like to freestyle for free
I put in the key and I ride the beat
I won't even come out the house for free
I pay a nigga to drive for me (Huh?)
JAY-Z couldn't even co-sign for me
I do what I want 'cause I'm signed to me (Damn)
I get the, I get the, I get the bag
They get the bag, have to cut it in half (Wop)
Stop the comparin', y'all makin' me laugh
Need the rehab, I'm addicted to cash
Convertible Wop, convertible top
My dope got a vertical, look at it hop
Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt, and it jump out the pot (Pot)
Came out of jail and went straight to the top
Take it easy, baby, middle of summer, I'm freezin', baby (Burr)
Don't leave me, baby
Just drop to your knees and please me, baby (Go)
I'm fascinated, two bitches so fine that I masturbated (Ha)
Congratulations, she brain me so good that I graduated (Wow)
They had to hate it
I don't fuck with them niggas, they plastic, baby (Heh)
A trapper, baby, I rap but I own all my masters, baby
It's tragic, baby, I pull up and fuck up the traffic, baby (Ha)
A savage, baby
I'm killin' these niggas, closed casket, baby (Wop)

You get the bag and fumble it
I get the bag and flip it and tumble it (Yeah)
Straight out the lot, 300 cash (Cash)
And the car came with a blunt in it (Yeah)
Lil' mama a thot, and she got ass (Thot)
And she gon' fuck up a bag (Yeah)
Pull up to the spot, livin' too fast (Yeah)
Droppin' the dope in the stash (Yah)
In Italy, got two foreign hoes, they DM me (Ooh, brr, ayy)
Drop the top when it's cold (drop top)
But you feel the heat (Skrrt, yah, ayy)
Be real with me
Keep it 100, just be real with me (Ayy)
Eat it up like it's a feast (Woah, eat it up)
They say the dope on fleek (Yep)",3200747
107811,2233711,Mo Bamba,rap,Sheck Wes,2017,3315381,{},"
16yrold
Bitch
Daytrip took it to 10


I got hoes
Callin' a young nigga phone (Ring, ring)
Where's Ali with the mothafuckin' dope? (Bitch, bitch)
I be ballin' like a mothafuckin' pro (Like a, huh, like a, huh)
I be ballin' like my nigga Mo (Bamba, bitch)
Sheck Wes, I ain't a mothafuckin' joke (Haha, hahahahaha)
Steph Wes, stay with the fuckin' pole (Pa, pa, pa-pa)
You fuck around and get poled (You get poled, bitch)
'Cause I got hoes (So many fuckin' hoes)
Callin' a young nigga phone
(Ring-ring, ring, ring-ring, ring, ring-ring)
Where's Ali with the (Bitch with the) mothafuckin' dope? (Huh)
I be ballin' like a mothafuckin' pro (Like a mothafuckin' pro)
I be ballin' like my nigga Mo (Bamba, Bamba)
Sheck Wes got so many flows (I do it all)
Call me Drake, how a nigga contro-

Oh, fuck, shit, bitch (Huh)
Young Sheck Wes and I'm gettin' really rich (Ching-ching)
See how I caught it 'cause I'm really with the shits (Ping-ping)
See me in the streets and I be really with a (Cling, cling), with a
Bad bitch (Bitch), niggas straight rockin' (Rock)
Niggas straight see me, when they see me, they be coppin' (What?)
I'm the best drug dealer, nigga, come and cop it  (Got it)
Young Sheck Wes, I'm like the fuckin' Green Goblin (Hahahaha)


I got hoes (Hoes, ho)
Callin' a young nigga phone, phone (Bitch)
Where's Ali with the mothafuckin' dope?
(With the mothafuckin' dope)
Dope (With the mothafuckin' dope)
With the mothafuckin' dope (Bitch)
With the dope (Gettin' rich), with my bros (Bitch, shit)
I fucked your ho (Shit)
And she ain't even let you know (Shit fucked up)


Damn, this nigga nice, fuck is you talking about?
('Cause I got) Bitch (Hoes)
And my nigga One-Six, my nigga
Ali, the Daytrip nigga, fuck is niggas talking about?
(I got hoes, shit
Young Sheck Wes, I do it on the go)
Uh, woah, uh",3203682
107876,2235094,Him  I,rap,G-Eazy & Halsey,2017,2999766,{},"
Cross my heart, hope to die
To my lover, I'd never lie
He said ""be true,"" I swear I'll try
In the end, it's him and I
He's out his head, I'm out my mind
We got that love, the crazy kind
I am his, and he is mine
In the end, it's him and I, him and I


My '65 speeding up the PCH, a hell of a ride
They don't wanna see us make it, they just wanna divide
2017 Bonnie and Clyde
Wouldn't see the point of living on if one of us died, yeah
Got that kind of style everybody try to rip off
YSL dress under when she takes the mink off
Silk on her body, pull it down and watch it slip off
Ever catch me cheating, she would try to cut my (Ha-ha-ha)
Crazy, but I love her, I could never run from her
Hit it, no rubber never would let no one touch her
Swear we drive each other mad, she be so stubborn
But, what the fuck is love with no pain, no suffer?
Intense, this shit, it gets dense
She knows when I'm out of it like she could just sense
If I had a million dollars or was down to ten cents
She'd be down for whatever, never gotta convince (You know?)

Cross my heart, hope to die (Uh)
To my lover, I'd never lie (I love you baby)
He said, ""Be true,"" I swear I'll try
In the end, it's him and I
He's out his head, I'm out my mind
We got that love; the crazy kind
I am his, and he is mine
In the end, it's him and I


Him and I
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
In the end, it's him and I
Him and I
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
In the end, it's him and I


We turn up, mobbin' 'til the end of time
Only one who gets me, I'm a crazy fuckin' Gemini
Remember this for when I die
Everybody dressed in all black, suits and a tie
My funeral will be lit if I -
Ever go down or get caught, or they identify
My bitch was the most solid, nothing to solidify
She would never cheat, you'd never see her with a different guy
Ever tell you different, then it's a lie
See, that's my down bitch, see that's my soldier
She keeps that thang-thang if anyone goes there
Calm and collected, she keeps her composure
And she gon' ride for me until this thing over
We do drugs together (Together), fuck up clubs together (Together)
And we'd both go crazy (Crazy) if we was to sever
You know?
We keep mobbin', it's just me and my bitch
Fuck the world, we just gon' keep getting rich, you know?

Cross my heart, hope to die
To my lover, I'd never lie
He said ""be true,"" I swear I'll try
In the end, it's him and I
He's out his head, I'm out my mind
We got that love; the crazy kind
I am his, and he is mine
In the end, it's him and I


Him and I
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
In the end, it's him and I
Him and I
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
In the end, it's him and I


Cross my heart, hope to die
To you, I've never lied
For you, I'd take a life
It's him and I, and I swear (Ayy)
'Til the end I'ma ride wit' you
Mob and get money, get high wit' you, yeah (Ayy)
Cross my heart, hope to die
This is our ride or die
You can confide in me
There's not no hiding, I swear
Stay solid, never lie to you
Swear, most likely I'ma die wit' you, yeah

Cross my heart, hope to die
To my lover, I'd never lie
He said, ""Be true,"" I swear I'll try
In the end, it's him and I
He's out his head, I'm out my mind
We got that love, the crazy kind
I am his, and he is mine
In the end, it's him and I


Him and I
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
In the end, it's him and I
Him and I
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
Oh-oh-oh-oh-woah
In the end, it's him and I",3205434
107940,2236321,Carry On,rb,XXXTENTACION,2017,1285535,{},"
How did you get here?
I'm drunk and confused
I tried to be patient with you, yeah
High up, you're falling back down


Trapped in a concept, falsely accused, misused
And misled, bitch, I'm hopin' you fuckin' rest in peace
Now the fact that I'm alone is fuckin' comfortin'
And I can't seem to shake this fuckin' feeling in my...
Uh
Cold shoulder, heartbroken, misspoken
I'm cut open, her fingers in all my stab wounds
And if she could, she'd probably dance on my grave
Inside my head, I see your face, I fuckin' hate that I love you still
(Yeah)
(Down)


Carry on, like flights, I just carry on
With this pain inside of my chest
Got no choice but to carry on, uh
Carry on, like flights, I just carry on
With this pain inside of my chest
Got no choice but to carry on, uh
Carry on, like flights, I just carry on
With this pain inside of my chest
Got no choice but to carry on, uh
Yeah

How did you get here? I'm drunk and confused
I tried to be patient with you, yeah
High up, you're falling back down",3206879
107941,2236324,Everybody Dies in Their Nightmares,rap,XXXTENTACION,2017,2844291,{},"
Ooh, ahh, ahh, ahh
Don't go, don't go to sleep
Don't go, stay up and


Tired of feelin' like I'm trapped in my damn mind
Tired of feelin' like I'm wrapped in a damn lie
Tired of feelin' like my life is a damn game
Nigga really wanna die in the night time


Only time I feel pain, when I'm feelin' love
That's why it's tatted on my face that I'm damn numb
Only tell you 'bout my mind when I'm all alone
That's why I'm never really 'lone in the night time
Change hoes like clothes, I can't get attached
'Cause these hoes fire starters like lit matches
I've been feelin' really lost, duckin' all attachments
I don't really go outside 'cause I hate traffic
I don't wanna go outside, get caught in traffic, traffic

Ooh, ahh, ahh, ahh
Don't go, don't go to sleep
Don't go, stay up and


Tired of feelin' like I'm trapped in my damn mind
Tired of feelin' like I'm wrapped in a damn lie
Tired of feelin' like my life is a damn game
Nigga really wanna die in the night time
Tired of feelin' like I'm trapped in my damn mind
Tired of feelin' like I'm wrapped in a damn lie
Tired of feelin' like my life is a damn game
Nigga really wanna die in the night time
Tired of feelin' like I'm trapped in my damn mind
Tired of feelin' like I'm wrapped in a damn lie
Tired of feelin' like my life is a damn game
Nigga really wanna die in the night time
Nigga really wanna die in the night time
Nigga really wanna die in the night time
Nigga really wanna die in the night time, uh
Nigga really wanna die in the night time, uh
Nigga really wanna die in the night time


Don't go to sleep
Don't go, stay up with me
Don't go, don't go to sleep
Don't go, stay up and don't go to sleep
Ooh, ahh, ahh, ahh
Don't go, don't go to sleep
Don't go, stay up and don't",3206881
108091,2238212,Bom Diggy,pop,Zack Knight & Jasmin Walia,2017,1739554,{},"
Boy, you don't have to be the last one standing
Boy, show me, you could be the one, one, one


ਤੂੰ ਅੱਖੀਆਂ ਮਿਲਾ ਕੇ, ਹਾਂ ਮੇਰੇ ਕੋਲ ਆਜਾ
ਇਸ਼ਕ ਦੀਆਂ ਗੱਲਾਂ ਤੂੰ ਮੈਨੂੰ ਸਮਝਾ ਜਾ
ਤੂੰ ਗੱਲਾਂ ਬੜੀ ਕਰਦਾ, ਵੇ ਕਰਕੇ ਵਿਖਾ ਜਾ
ਨੇੜੇ-ਨੇੜੇ ਆ ਤੂੰ ਆਜਾ, ਸੋਹਨਿਆ-ਆ-ਆ


I wanna see you wild like Rihanna, get all upon the
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
She burn it up like the summer, she turn me on with her
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
You got me like crazy, that you call to me
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
You got me like crazy, that you call to me
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom


পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
(হই পাগল, হই পাগল)

Girl, I know you want me
ਤੈਨੂੰ ਤੱਕਿਆ ਤੇ ਹੋ ਗਿਆ ਪਿਆਰ ਵੇ
You don't believe me
ਤੈਨੂੰ ਦਿਲ ਦਾ ਹਾਲ ਸੁਨਾ
ਵੇ ਪਿੱਛੇ ਮੇਰੇ ਜਾ ਕੇ ਤੂੰ ਅੱਖੀਆਂ ਲੜਾਈਆਂ
ਤੂੰ ਦਿਲ ਨੂੰ ਚੁਰਾ ਕੇ, ਤੂੰ ਛੁਰੀਆਂ ਚਲਾਈਆਂ
ਤੂੰ ਗੱਲਾਂ ਬੜੀ ਕਰਦੀ, ਆ ਤੈਨੂੰ ਸਮਝਾਵਾਂ
ਨੇੜੇ-ਨੇੜੇ ਆ ਤੂੰ ਆ ਨਾ, ਸੋਹਨਿਆ-ਆ-ਆ


I wanna see you wild like Rihanna, get all upon the
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
She burn it up like the summer, she turn me on with her
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
You got me like crazy, that you call to me
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
You got me like crazy, that you call to me
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom


পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
(হই পাগল, হই পাগল)

Oh baby, give me one more dance
One more dance, one more dance
Oh baby, we can make it last
Make it last, make it last
Keep it going, keep it just like that
'Cause your body like a hourglass
To the left, to the right
Everybody in the club
Diggy-diggy, bom-bom


I wanna see you, I wanna see you
I wanna see you wild like Rihanna, get all upon the
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
She burn it up like the summer, she turn me on with her
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
You got me like crazy, that you call to me
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom
You got me like crazy, that you call to me
Bom, diggy-diggy, bom-bom


পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি
পাগল আমার রাধার (হই পাগল)
আজ আমার আঁধার ঘর ভারি",3209288
108095,2238244,The Way Life Goes,rap,Lil Uzi Vert,2017,1955435,"{""Oh Wonder""}","
That's true (That's true), that's right (That right, that right)
She's sipping Moët, and yeah, I swear it get her wetter
My Louboutins new, so my bottoms, they is redder (Yeah, it's red)
No I'm not a rat but I'm all about my cheddar ('Bout my bread)
Just talked to your homie she said we should be together (Yeah)
Gave me brain, was so insane that I made her my header (Woah)
If she ever call my phone you know I gotta dead her
But I like that girl too much, I wish I never met her


Hello
I was listening to this song
It go like


I know it hurts sometimes but you'll get over it (Yeah)
You'll find another life to live (Yeah)
I swear that you'll get over it
I know you're sad and tired
You've got nothing left to give (Yeah)
You'll find another life to live (Yeah)
I know that you'll get over it (Yeah)

Wish I never ever ever told you things
I was only only trying to show you things (Yeah)
Iced out heart on your neck tried to froze your ring
I had to get me a new bitch to hold the pain
We was in Hawaii looking at the ring (Damn, yeah)
She smiling happy but I'm laughing 'cause no meddlin'
(Broke boy, broke boy, broke boy, broke boy)
Damn, that just goes to show me money don't attract a thing (Real shit)
Stuck to the plan even though you used to go with my mans


I know it hurts sometimes but you'll get over it (Yeah)
You'll find another life to live
I swear that you'll get over it
And I know you're sad and tired
You've got nothing left to give (Yeah)
You'll find another life to live (Ayy)
I know that you'll get over it


See, I tied up my Raf, you strapped up your Rick
Diamonds on your neck, ice all on my wrist
Complement my style
She don't want me, I'm running wild
You know I respect her on that level
She don't want me then I'ma let her (Bye)
Go over there with that broke fella (Go over)
Walk off my Saint Laurent, that leather, ooh (Yeah)
My new chick I swear that she better, ooh
Want me back, never (Ooh)

That's true (That's true), that's right (That right, that right)
She's sipping Moët, and yeah I swear it get her wetter (Woah)
My Louboutins new, so my bottoms, they is redder (Yeah, it's red)
No, I'm not a rat but I'm all about my cheddar ('Bout my bread)
Just talked to your homie she said we should be together (Yeah)
Gave me brain, was so insane that I made her my header (Woah)
If she ever call my phone you know I gotta dead her
But I like that girl too much, I wish I never met her


I know it hurts sometimes but (Woah), you'll get over it (But why?)
You'll find another life to live (You'll find)
I swear that you'll get over it (You'll get over it)
I know it hurts sometimes but you'll get over it (No, no)
You'll find another life to live (You will)
I know that you'll get over it (Oh)


That's true, that's right
She's sipping Moët, and yeah, I swear it get her wetter
My Louboutins new, so my bottoms, they is redder
No I'm not a rat but I'm all about my cheddar
Just talked to your homie she said we should be together (You will get over it)
Gave me brain, was so insane that I made her my header
If she ever call my phone you know I gotta dead her
But I like that girl too much, I wish I never met her",3209330
108173,2239278,Look What You Made Me Do,pop,Taylor Swift,2017,1761669,{},"
I don't like your little games
Don't like your tilted stage
The role you made me play
Of the fool, no, I don't like you
I don't like your perfect crime
How you laugh when you lie
You said the gun was mine
Isn't cool, no, I don't like you (Oh)


But I got smarter, I got harder in the nick of time
Honey, I rose up from the dead, I do it all the time
I've got a list of names and yours is in red, underlined
I check it once, then I check it twice, oh!


Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me-
Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me do

I don't like your kingdom keys
They once belonged to me
You asked me for a place to sleep
Locked me out and threw a feast (What?)
The world moves on, another day, another drama, drama
But not for me, not for me, all I think about is karma
And then the world moves on, but one thing's for sure
Maybe I got mine, but you'll all get yours


But I got smarter, I got harder in the nick of time
Honey, I rose up from the dead, I do it all the time
I've got a list of names and yours is in red, underlined
I check it once, then I check it twice, oh!


Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me-
Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me do

I don't trust nobody and nobody trusts me
I'll be the actress starring in your bad dreams
I don't trust nobody and nobody trusts me
I'll be the actress starring in your bad dreams
I don't trust nobody and nobody trusts me
I'll be the actress starring in your bad dreams
I don't trust nobody and nobody trusts me
I'll be the actress starring in your bad dreams
(Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me-
Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me-)
""I'm sorry, the old Taylor can't come to the phone right now
""Why? Oh, 'cause she's dead!"" (Oh)


Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me-
Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me do
Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me-
Ooh, look what you made me do
Look what you made me do
Look what you just made me do
Look what you just made me do",3210592
108274,2241254,What Lovers Do,pop,Maroon 5,2017,1620915,{SZA},"
Say say say, hey hey now, baby
Oh mama, don't play now, baby
Say say say, hey hey now, baby
Said let's get one thing straight now, baby


Tell me, tell me if you love me or not
Love me or not, love me or not
I'll bet the house on you, am I lucky or not
Lucky or not, lucky or not?
You gotta tell me if you love me or not
Love me or not, love me or not
Been wishin' for you, am I lucky or not
Lucky or not, lucky or not?


Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh

Say say say, hey hey now, baby
You gon' make me hit you with that laydown, baby (Oh)
Oh, say say say, hey hey now, baby
You know what I need, out the gate now, baby (Oh, oh)


Tell me, tell me if you love me or not
Love me or not, love me or not (Na-na-na)
I'll bet the house on you, am I lucky or not
Lucky or not, lucky or not? (Na-na)
You gotta tell me if you love me or not
Love me or not, love me or not (Oh yeah)
Been wishin' for you, am I lucky or not
Lucky or not, lucky or not?


Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you (Wishin')
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh

(Hey yeah) What lovers do (Oh, oh-oh)
What lovers do (Mmm, na-na-na, hey yeah)
What lovers do (Oh, mmm, na-na-na, oh-oh, yeah)


Aren't we too grown for games?
Aren't we too grown to play around?
Young enough to chase
But old enough to know better
Are we too grown for changin'?
Are we too grown to mess around? Yeah
Ooh, and I can't wait forever, baby
Both of us should know better


Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you (You, oh yeah)
Ooh, ooh (Ooh)
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh (Tryna do what lovers do)
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you (Been wishin' for love)
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh (Do, ah)
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Been wishin' for you (Tryna do)
Ooh, ooh
Tryna do what lovers do, ooh",3212901
108341,2242350,Gucci Gang,rap,Lil Pump,2017,4579502,{},"
Yuh, ooh
Brr, brr
Gucci gang, ooh
(That's it right there, Gnealz)
Yuh, Lil Pump, yuh
Gucci gang, ooh
(Ooh, Bi-Bighead on the beat)
Yuh, brr


Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Spend three racks on a new chain (Yuh)
My bitch love do cocaine, ooh (Ooh)
I fuck a bitch, I forgot her name (Brr, yuh)
I can't buy a bitch no wedding ring (Ooh)
Rather go and buy Balmains (Brr)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Spend three racks on a new chain (Huh?)
My bitch love do cocaine, ooh (Brr)
I fuck a bitch, I forgot her name, yuh (Yuh, yuh)
I can't buy no bitch no wedding ring, ooh (Nope)
Rather go and buy Balmains, ayy (Brr)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)

My lean cost more than your rent, ooh (It do)
Your momma still live in a tent, yuh (Brr)
Still slangin' dope in the 'jects, huh? (Yeah)
Me and my grandma take meds, ooh (Huh?)
None of this shit be new to me (Nope)
Fuckin' my teacher, call it tutoring (Yuh)
Bought some Red Bottoms, cost hella G's (Huh?)
Fuck your airline, fuck your company (Fuck it!)
Bitch, your breath smell like some cigarettes (Cigarettes)
I'd rather fuck a bitch from the projects (Yuh)
They kicked me out the plane off a Percocet (Brr)
Now Lil Pump flyin' private jet (Yuh)
Everybody scream, ""Fuck WestJet"" (Fuck 'em)
Lil Pump still sell that meth (Yuh)
Hunnid on my wrist, sippin' on Tech (Brr)
Fuck a lil' bitch, make her pussy wet (What?)


Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang) Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Spend three racks on a new chain (Huh?)
My bitch love do cocaine, ooh (Yuh)
I fuck a bitch, I forgot her name (Brr)
I can't buy a bitch no wedding ring (Huh?)
Rather go and buy Balmains (Yuh)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang (Gucci gang)
Spend three racks on a new chain (Huh?)
My bitch love do cocaine, ooh (Brr)
I fuck a bitch, I forgot her name, yuh (Yuh)
I can't buy no bitch no wedding ring, ooh (Nope)
Rather go and buy Balmains, ayy (Huh?)
Gucci gang, Gucci gang, Gucci gang",3214267
108581,2246594,Too Good at Goodbyes,pop,Sam Smith,2017,7784454,{},"
You must think that I'm stupid
You must think that I'm a fool
You must think that I'm new to this
But I have seen this all before


I'm never gonna let you close to me
Even though you mean the most to me
'Cause every time I open up, it hurts
So I'm never gonna get too close to you
Even when I mean the most to you
In case you go and leave me in the dirt


But every time you hurt me, the less that I cry
And every time you leave me, the quicker these tears dry
And every time you walk out, the less I love you
Baby, we don't stand a chance, it's sad but it's true
I'm way too good at goodbyes
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)
I'm way too good at goodbyes
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)

I know you're thinkin' I'm heartless
I know you're thinkin' I'm cold
I'm just protectin' my innocence
I'm just protectin' my soul


I'm never gonna let you close to me
Even though you mean the most to me
'Cause every time I open up, it hurts
So I'm never gonna get too close to you
Even when I mean the most to you
In case you go and leave me in the dirt


But every time you hurt me, the less that I cry
And every time you leave me, the quicker these tears dry
And every time you walk out, the less l love you
Baby, we don't stand a chance, it's sad but it's true
I'm way too good at goodbyes
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)
I'm way too good at goodbyes
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)
No way that you'll see me cry
(No way that you'll see me cry)
I'm way too good at goodbyes
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)

No
No, no, no, no, no
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)
No, no, no, no
No, no, no
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)
(No way that you'll see me cry)
Ahhh
(I'm way too good at goodbyes)


'Cause every time you hurt me, the less that I cry
And every time you leave me, the quicker these tears dry
And every time you walk out, the less I love you
Baby, we don't stand a chance, it's sad but it's true
I'm way too good at goodbyes",3219597
108593,2246790,Dusk Till Dawn,pop,ZAYN,2017,3033507,{Sia},"
Not tryna be indie
Not tryna be cool
Just tryna be in this
Tell me, are you too?
Can you feel where the wind is?
Can you feel it through
All of the windows
Inside this room?


'Cause I wanna touch you, baby
And I wanna feel you too
I wanna see the sun rise on your sins
Just me and you


Light it up, on the run
Let's make love tonight
Make it up, fall in love, try
(Baby, I'm right here)

But you'll never be alone
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here
I'll hold you when things go wrong
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here


I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here


We were shut like a jacket
So do your zip
We would roll down the rapids
To find a wave that fits
Can you feel where the wind is?
Can you feel it through
All of the windows
Inside this room?


'Cause I wanna touch you, baby
I wanna feel you too
I wanna see the sun rise on your sins
Just me and you

Light it up, on the run
Let's make love tonight
Make it up, fall in love, try
(Baby, I'm right here)


But you'll never be alone
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here
I'll hold you when things go wrong
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here


Girl, give love to your body
It's only you that can stop it
Girl, give love to your body
It's only you that can stop it
Girl, give love to your body
It's only you that can stop it
Girl, give love to your body
Girl, give love to your body

But you'll never be alone
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here
I'll hold you when things go wrong
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here


I'll be with you from dusk till dawn
Baby, I'm right here",3219791
108690,2248077,Thick Niggas and Anime Tiddies,rap,DBangz,2017,1466947,{},"
Hello? (CashMoneyAP)
Yes, you've reached Thick Niggas Incorporated, how may I direct your call?
I need me a thick nigga, but no homo though, 'cause that's that gay shit
Nigga, as long as I say no homo it's not gay right? (Ooh, BatGang on the track, bitch)
Absolutely right, sir


Anime bitches, I look at her titties
Then I take her home and we count up these fifties
I come to your city, I sneak in your chimney
I tickle her kidney and then I watch Disney
I love me some hentai, I go on Xvideos
Bitch, I'm DBangz, stick my dick in your Cheerios
Bitch, I'm DBangz, I might fuck my computer
I whip out my dick, then pull up on my shooter
I'll tickle your booty and then I get neutered
I know I'm a loser, I tickle your tumor
I'll find me a bitch that got no sense of humor
It's Lil Cumstain, I'm the booty consumer
I take off her shoe and then do the maneuver
And if she act tough, I might whip out the Luger
You know I'm with Kia, I go to IKEA
She soft like a cheetah, she from Costa Rica
Hey, lil' mama, come through, get respected
She take off her shoe, I take out my erection
I suck on her middle toe, don't use protection
K call me Papi, I teach her a lesson
I only eat ass, it's a pussy oppression
You swear that she loyal, your bitch in my mentions
I whip out my dick, paint her face like Picasso
I suck on her toes, then I'm out like El Chapo
I look at her booty hole, eat it like tacos
I respect on women, she better not swallow
She touch on my cockpit, I put it on auto
""Suck toes and eat ass,"" that's the DBongo motto
I cuff me a Kia, then write her a song
She take off her shoe and I take off that thong
I whip out my dick, she said, ""Baby, what's wrong?""
""Girl, nothing, I'm 'bout to smash like I'm King Kong""
""Papi, go harder,"" I nutted a while back
Bitch, I'm DBangz, I ball hard like the Wildcats
Ain't talkin' 'bout Troy, she take out a toy
'Cause my dick was too small for her to enjoy
I meet with the mom, yeah, Kia so bomb
I whip out my weenie on PornHub.com

Swag, swag, swag",3221272
108720,2248343,...Ready for It?,pop,Taylor Swift,2017,1364726,{},"
Knew he was a killer first time that I saw him
Wondered how many girls he had loved and left haunted
But if he's a ghost, then I can be a phantom
Holdin' him for ransom, some
Some boys are tryin' too hard, he don't try at all though
Younger than my exes, but he act like such a man, so
I see nothing better, I keep him forever
Like a vendetta-ta


I, I, I see how this is gon' go
Touch me and you'll never be alone
I-Island breeze and lights down low
No one has to know


In the middle of the night, in my dreams
You should see the things we do, baby
In the middle of the night, in my dreams
I know I'm gonna be with you, so I take my time
Are you ready for it?

Knew I was a robber first time that he saw me
Stealing hearts and running off and never sayin' sorry
But if I'm a thief, then he can join the heist, and
We'll move to an island, and
And he can be my jailer, Burton to this Taylor
Every love I've known in comparison is a failure
I forget their names now, I'm so very tame now
Never be the same now, now


I, I, I see how this is gon' go
Touch me and you'll never be alone
I-Island breeze and lights down low
No one has to know (No one has to know)


In the middle of the night, in my dreams
You should see the things we do, baby
In the middle of the night in my dreams
I know I'm gonna be with you, so I take my time
Are you ready for it?
Oh, are you ready for it?


Baby, let the games begin
Let the games begin
Let the games begin
Baby, let the games begin
Let the games begin
Let the games begin

I, I, I see how this is gon' go
Touch me and you'll never be alone
I-Island breeze and lights down low
No one has to know


In the middle of the night (Night), in my dreams (My dreams)
You should see the things we do (We do), baby (Baby), hmm (Eh)
In the middle of the night, in my dreams (My dreams)
I know I'm gonna be with you (I know I'm gonna be with you)
So I take my time
In the middle of the night


Baby, let the games begin
Let the games begin
Let the games begin
Are you ready for it?
Baby, let the games begin
Let the games begin
Let the games begin
Are you ready for it?",3221550
108901,2251744,Fire in the Booth,rap,Big Shaq,2017,1034375,{},"
Are you ready for this G, yeah?
C'mon, man, I was born ready and dat
Okay, aight, boom
Big Shaq, hold tight, Asznee
Skutnu, Ratnu, Oosna
Hold tight the gyal dem as well, boom


Two plus two is four, minus one that's three, quick maths
Everyday man's on the block, smoke trees
See your girl in the park, that girl is a uckers
When the ting went quack-quack-quack, you man were ducking
Hold tight, Asznee, he's got the pumpy
Hold tight, my man, he's got the frisbee
I trap, trap, trap on the road, movin' that cornflakes
Rice Krispie, hold tight, my girl Whitney (perfect)
On the road doin' ten toes, like my toes
You man thought I froze, I see a peng girl, then I pose
If she's not on it, I ghost, hah, look at your nose
What? You dickhead! Look at your nose
Nose long like garden hose, shhh, you get me?

Boom, man's gonna come back in (yeah, yeah)
You know like that? (yeah, yeah, yeah)
You're feelin' that? (yeah, yeah, bad, bad)
You dun know, I see you shiverin' and that
Don't get shook man's here (aight)
You protected-ed, yeah? (aight, let's do it)
Aight, boom, let's go, boom


Hop out the four-door with the .44, it was one, two, three and four
Chillin' in the corridor, your dad is forty-four
And he's still callin' man for a draw, let him know
When I see him, I'm gonna spin his jaw
Take man's Twix by force, send man shop by force
Your girl knows I've got the sauce, no ketchup
Just sauce, raw sauce
Boom, yo, gah
The ting goes skrrrahh, pap, pap, ka-ka-ka
Skibiki-pap-pap, and a pu-pu-pudrrrr-boom
Skya, du-du-ku-ku-dun-dun
Poom, poom
You dun know, Big Shaq, ha, yo, yeah-yeah
Alright, fire-fire-fire in the booth
You get me, man's not hot
I tell her man's not hot, hah, cot
I tell her man's not hot
The girl told me, ""Take off your jacket""
I said, ""Babes, man's not hot""
Yo, man can never be hot
Perspiration ting, Lynx effect

Yo, you dun know
Dun know, y-you
You look a bit shook, Charlie
You look a bit hot
What's that?
Y-y-ya sweating and that again
Brudda, man don't make jokes with me, Charlie
Aight, aight, aight, cool, yeah
Yeah, man, listen, you're-you're cool and that
Yeah, yeah, dun know
Do you understand what I'm saying?
You're cool and that (yeah, yeah) but
I know how you look ennit, (yeah) do you understand what I'm saying? (yeah)
I don't wanna set the, you know, the goons on you
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah
You know like that? Aight, cool, don't take me for one of these boys and that, do you know what I'm sayin'?
Man's really about it",3225615
109111,2254053,Akad Engagement,pop,Payung Teduh,2017,1144825,{},"
Betapa bahagianya hatiku saat
Ku duduk berdua denganmu
Berjalan bersamamu
Menarilah denganku


Namun bila hari ini adalah yang terakhir
Namun ku tetap bahagia
Selalu kusyukuri
Begitulah adanya


Namun bila kau ingin sendiri
Cepat cepatlah sampaikan kepadaku
Agar ku tak berharap
Dan buat kau bersedih


Bila nanti saatnya telah tiba
Kuingin kau menjadi istriku
Berjalan bersamamu dalam terik dan hujan
Berlarian kesana-kemari dan tertawa
Namun bila saat berpisah telah tiba
Izinkanku menjaga dirimu
Berdua menikmati pelukan di ujung waktu
Sudilah kau temani diriku



Namun bila kau ingin sendiri
Cepat cepatlah sampaikan kepadaku
Agar ku tak berharap
Dan buat kau bersedih


Bila nanti saatnya telah tiba
Kuingin kau menjadi istriku
Berjalan bersamamu dalam terik dan hujan
Berlarian kesana-kemari dan tertawa
Namun bila saat berpisah telah tiba
Izinkanku menjaga dirimu
Berdua menikmati pelukan di ujung waktu
Sudilah kau temani diriku


Sudilah kau menjadi temanku
Sudilah kau menjadi istriku",3228575
109281,2257871,МАМБЛ MUMBLE,rap,GONE.Fludd,2017,2920314,{},"


Ха!
Ха! Ха! Р-ра!
Поeхали!
Ха!
У-у!
T-T-Toreno
Опа!


Тупая сука, будто питeкантроп
На мнe мобильный костюм - это Гандам (Пр-ря!)
Барби, как бэндо - в нeй вся моя банда
Я поeбал и съeбал, будто фантом, эй
Молодой Стиви Уандeр, эй
Ты с члeном во рту - это мамбл, эй
Курим дурь (И-и), дурим дур (И-и)
Иди нахуй, гандон
Тупая сука, будто питeкантроп
На мнe мобильный костюм - это Гандам
Барби, как бэндо, в нeй вся моя банда
Я поeбал и съeбал, будто фантом, эй
Молодой Стиви Уандeр, эй
Ты с члeном во рту - это мамбл, эй
Курим дурь (И-и), дурим дур (И-и)
Иди нахуй, гандон

Молодой Гон Фладд
У мeня шлюх склад
Выeбал твой сквад
Сунул руку - снял клад
Нeнаход - как так?
Иди нахуй, мудак
Я стрeляю: «Бах-бах!»
Ты базаришь: «Ква-ква»
Мнe нужна шкура, щас камeнный вeк (Пу!)
Сунул в пeщeру свой камeнный хeр (Пинь!)
Фотки лeтят ко мнe прямо в дирeкт (Пинь!)
Стоп, eй дажe сeмнадцати нeт
Воу, воу, воу, воу
Я мохнатый мамонт, покажи мнe свой флоу (У-у)
С пулeмёта пули поливаю в eбло (Пищ-пищ-пищ)
Пидор пиздит, но на дeлe ссыкло (У-у)
Пидор базарит как сучка, эй
Сука, захлопни eбучку, эй
Рэп-каннибал, я eбал это мясо
Но я нe про твою пизду, м? Что, м?


Тупая сука, будто питeкантроп
На мнe мобильный костюм - это Гандам (Пр-ря!)
Барби, как бэндо - в нeй вся моя банда
Я поeбал и съeбал, будто фантом, эй
Молодой Стиви Уандeр, эй
Ты с члeном во рту - это мамбл, эй
Курим дурь (И-и), дурим дур (И-и)
Иди нахуй, гандон
Тупая сука, будто питeкантроп
На мнe мобильный костюм - это Гандам
Барби, как бэндо, в нeй вся моя банда
Я поeбал и съeбал, будто фантом, эй
Молодой Стиви Уандeр, эй
Ты с члeном во рту - это мамбл, эй
Курим дурь (И-и), дурим дур (И-и)
Иди нахуй, гандон

У мeня eсть малeнькая сука, а
Твоя сука - малeнькая шлюха, а
Фладда залeтаeт бeз стука, а
Кто твой папочка, ночная бабочка? (У)
Что в корзиночкe, красная шапочка?
Нахуй сказочки, милая дамочка
Прыгнул в пуссичку только для галочки
Кто будeт слeдующим - рeшит считалочка:
Эники-бэники eли варeники
Финики, драники, кeксы, сухарики (У-у)
Эники-бэники, чёртовы нарики
Эники-бэники, клац, у
Вся моя жизнь - это борьба
Стрeляй по купюрам, пау, пр-р, бау
Ты похож на курицу, съeбался с улицы
Врeмя зажмуриться, стр-р-раус


Внатурe? Страус? (Внатурe?)
Ну да
Типа, а-а, типа, а-а-а-а-а
Ага


Тупая сука, будто питeкантроп
На мнe мобильный костюм - это Гандам (Пр-ря!)
Барби, как бэндо - в нeй вся моя банда
Я поeбал и съeбал, будто фантом, эй
Молодой Стиви Уандeр, эй
Ты с члeном во рту - это мамбл, эй
Курим дурь (И-и), дурим дур (И-и)
Иди нахуй, гандон

Тупая сука, будто питeкантроп
На мнe мобильный костюм - это Гандам
Барби, как бэндо - в нeй вся моя банда
Я поeбал и съeбал, будто фантом, эй
Молодой Стиви Уандeр, эй
Ты с члeном во рту-у
Вытащи члeн изо рта, малeнькая сука-а-а!",3233301
109428,2259806,Mwaka Moon,rap,Kalash,2017,1331471,{Damso},"


Pyroman
Welcome to Mwaka Moon


Un peu d'Amsterdam dans la bouche (Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah)
Une bouffée d'oxygène dans la kush (Yah, yah, yah)
Dans le vide, je respire à peine, le succès m'a donné des ailes
La même bitch qui me tournait le dos m'a en photo dans l'appareil
Bientôt riche
Quand Mwaka Moon aura fait mouche


Allô la Terre ? Ici, y a pas d'eau
Che-lou comme un son de franc-maçon
Qui sont-ils vraiment ? I don't know
Avant Dieu, y a rien de toutes les façons
I got hoes, tout est beau
J'fais le show, en Lambo', ah ouais, négro
K.L.H est dans le zoo
Igo, fais tourner, ça sent la kush

Un peu d'Amsterdam dans la bouche (Yah, yah, yah, yah yah)
Une bouffée d'oxygène dans la kush (Yah, yahh, yah)
Dans le vide, je respire à peine, le succès m'a donné des ailes
La même bitch qui me tournait le dos m'a en photo dans l'appareil
Bientôt riche
Quand Mwaka Moon aura fait mouche
Ouais, Dems


S'faire sucer, c'est pas tromper, faire succès, c'est n'pas s'tromper
Trop de billets : jaunes, verts, violets, j'ai tout nié, toi, balancé
""Tout est écrit"", ouais, qu'ils m'ont dit, les mêmes qui ont dit qu'j'y arriverai pas
Jamais négro s'enterre en vie, jamais négro ne baisse les bras
J'illumine, j'élimine, ennemis, imminent, pas d'paroles, patates sur les lips
Si j'urine dans la ville, c'est que j'suis sur les Champs, grosse salope, quatre pattes sur le bitume
Inoffensif, je fus, une offensive et je tue, une gencive de plus, sur le bitume
J'accumule embrouilles, bagarres de rue
J'prends l'réseau, négro, j'te laisse que l'Wi-Fi
Au studio, j'fais qu'du sale, au studio, tu n'fais qu'du bruit
Ils tuent pour prendre nos terres comme G. Bush, Saddam, R.I.P
J'sais toujours pas naviguer pourtant, j'connais qu'des rates-pi
Dems, Dems


Un peu d'Amsterdam dans la bouche (Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah)
Une bouffée d'oxygène dans la kush (Yah, yah, yah)
Dans le vide, je respire à peine, le succès m'a donné des ailes
La même bitch qui me tournait le dos m'a en photo dans l'appareil
Bientôt riche
Quand Mwaka Moon aura fait mouche

""Ding dong"", v'la le Mwaka
J'marche dans la ville comme une âme en vrac
En attendant qu'ils tombent sous le AK (Brrr)
J'observe comme King Kong au-dessus de Manhattan
Voilà déjà une plombe que j'suis fracas
Allongé dans une tombe pleine de vieux tracas
Je viens d'un autre monde, ici, je ne m'y fais pas
Que cela ne t'étonne, je viens de là-bas
Tout ceci est louche


Un peu d'Amsterdam dans la bouche (Yah, yah, yah, yah, yah)
Une bouffée d'oxygène dans la kush (Yah, yah, yah)
Dans le vide, je respire à peine, le succès m'a donné des ailes
La même bitch qui me tournait le dos m'a en photo dans l'appareil
Bientôt riche
Quand Mwaka Moon aura fait mouche


La vie c'est dur, un peu comme ma bite
Elle m'a fait gagner des femmes mais perdre celle que j'aimais
Oh, mon jus d'amour, sur tant de visages, j'évacue ma rage par galipettes
J'dis pas les mots car pour moi, ils me tuent
J'nique des mères pour la dînette
Des étalages de tous mes disques et puis, qu'tu me dises ""j'aurais pas dû naître""
J'pars dans le Mississippi, là où personne sait qui j'suis
J'suis damné, j'suis rôti, dent d'or dans biscuit
J'bois encore et encore, histoire d'oublier mes torts
Sur une bête de beat de Pyroman sous les feux de la rampe, je me brûle les ailes
Oooh
Aaaaaah, Mwaka Moon
I'm fucking out, aah",3242364
109523,2260659,How Long,pop,Charlie Puth,2017,1001786,{},"
Alright
Whoa, oh, yeah


I'll admit, I was wrong, what else can I say, girl?
Can't you blame my head and not my heart?
I was drunk, I was gone, that don't make it right, but
Promise there were no feelings involved, no


She said, ""Boy, tell me honestly
Was it real or just for show?"" Yeah
She said, ""Save your apologies""
Baby, I just gotta know


How long has this been goin' on?
You've been creepin' 'round on me
While you're callin' me ""baby""
How long has this been goin' on?
You've been actin' so shady (Shady)
I've been feelin' it lately, baby

Ooh-ooh (Yeah)
Ooh-ooh (Uh-uh)
Ooh-ooh-oh


I'll admit (I'll admit), it's my fault (My fault)
But you gotta believe me
When I say it only happened once, mmm
I try (I try), and I try (I try), but you'll never see that
You're the only one I wanna love, oh, yeah


She said ""Boy, tell me honestly (Honestly, yeah)
Was it real or just for show?"" Yeah (Is it just for show?)
She said, ""Save your apologies"" (Apologies, yeah)
Baby, I just gotta know


How long has this been goin' on?
You've been creepin' 'round on me (On me)
While you're callin' me ""baby"" (Baby)
How long has this been goin' on?
You've been actin' so shady (Shady)
I've been feelin' it lately, baby"" (Baby)

Ooh-ooh (Yeah)
Ooh-ooh (Uh-uh)
Ooh-ooh-oh
How long has it been goin' on, baby?
Ooh-ooh (Woo)
Ooh-ooh, you gotta go tell me now
Ooh-ooh-oh


She said, ""Boy, tell me honestly
Was it real or just for show?"" Yeah
She said, ""Save your apologies""
Baby, I just gotta know


How long has this been goin' on? (On, on)
And you been creepin' 'round on me (On me)
While you're callin' me ""baby"" (Baby)
How long has this been goin' on?
You've been actin' so shady (Shady)
I've been feelin' it lately, baby""


(Ooh-ooh, yeah) How long has this been goin' on?
(Ooh, uh-uh) You've been creepin' 'round on me (Yeah)
(Ooh-ooh-oh) How long has it been goin' on, baby? Oh
(Ooh-ooh) How long has this been goin' on? (Ooh, uh-uh)
(You gotta go tell me now) (Ooh-ooh-oh)
You've been actin' so shady (Shady)
I've been feelin' it lately, baby",3236636
109569,2261629,​listen before i go,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1082353,{},"
Take me to the rooftop
I wanna see the world when I stop breathing
Turnin' blue
Tell me love is endless, don't be so pretentious
Leave me like you do (Like you do)


If you need me, wanna see me
Better hurry 'cause I'm leavin' soon


Sorry can't save me now
Sorry I don't know how
Sorry there's no way out (Sorry)
But down
Hmm, down


Taste me, the salty tears on my cheek
That's what a year-long headache does to you
I'm not okay, I feel so scattered
Don't say I'm all that matters
Leave me, déjà vu (Hmm)

If you need me, wanna see me
You better hurry, I'm leavin' soon


Sorry can't save me now (Sorry)
Sorry I don't know how (Sorry)
Sorry there's no way out (Sorry)
But down
Hmm, down


Call my friends and tell them that I love them
And I'll miss them
But I'm not sorry
Call my friends and tell them that I love them
And I'll miss them
Sorry",3237820
109600,2262434,Rubbin off the Paint,rap,YBN Nahmir,2017,1009073,{},"
That's what I thought you said
Now let me offer this as a rebuttal
Ayy, ayy, gang, gang
Ayy, ayy, ayy, gang, gang
Ayy, ayy, ayy, gang, gang
Ayy, ayy, ayy, gang, gang


They say, ""Lil' Nahmir, where you been at?"" I'm just passin' a breeze
I been runnin' up a check, that's why these bitches on me
I been coolin', layin' low, but I'm not takin' a seat (Izak made this one)
But just know a nigga back and this time I won't leave
I been runnin', runnin', runnin', gotta check me a bag
I got hunnids on my neck and I got Trues on my ass
Niggas said I'm goin' broke, well, I just take it and laugh
I be speedin' in that foreign with Five-O on my ass
But I'm that nigga, I won't ever change, rubbin' off the paint
Smokin' dank, got a Uzi in my lap, I let it bang
Free Lil Tay, know he keep a 'K, but he not Tay-K
I up the chop and let it blow him, watch this bitch heat his face, I'm that nigga
And all my young niggas pullin' triggers, we gorillas
We let this bitch off until you feel us, for you niggas
That's always on IG with them yiggies, takin' pictures
Is you really gon' use 'em or you just loafin' for them bitches?
You niggas really hoes and you be actin' like these bitches
You niggas say y'all silent, but y'all probably in there snitchin'
Most the niggas that's around me throwin' C's like they Crippin'
But they do it for the twins, free Lil Corey and Lil Christian
But I'm rockin' with my shooters and that's mandatory
One up top like I'm Mozzy, bitch, I keep a .40
You say I'm lackin', nigga, try me, shoot you and your shorty
I'm cookin up in the lab like I'm Rick and Morty
40 poppa, hit a mobsta, turn your brain to pasta
Hit a opp up, dreads swangin' just like I'm a Rasta
Smokin' ganja and I'm zooted, walkin' in my Pradas
Any nigga test my gangsta, nigga, I'ma pop 'em
And we ain't throwin' hands with you fuck niggas
It's one up top up in that chamber, better duck, nigga
Niggas dissin' on Lil Valley, he get slumped, nigga
We shoot his body, then we lay him in that trunk nigga
I'm one-hundo, bitch, that's on my life, I will never fold
A nigga speakin on Lil Quay, well then, that nigga gotta go
I'm really small, but I can fight, but I'ma still up that pole
For you niggas think I'm pussy, you gon' have to show me, ho
Police always at my fuckin' crib, I don't tell 'em shit
I'm really rapping 'bout this fuckin life that I fuckin' live
But I be coolin', tryna focus on them fuckin' dividends
But if it's money near your head, well, I'ma fuckin get it, man

Ayy, ayy, gang, gang, gang
Ayy, ayy, gang, gang, gang
Ayy, ayy, gang, gang, gang
Ayy, ayy, gang, gang, gang",3238806
109702,2263987,Barking,rap,Ramz,2017,1051633,{​Ramz},"
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Mokuba Lives Beats
Yeah-yeah, yeah, yeah


I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin'
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin' (In the mornin')
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (I'm yawnin')
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin' (Yawnin')
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (I'm yawnin')
She's jarrin', no stallin'

I'm icy (I'm Icy)
I got a tick from my head to my feet, that's Nike
And that's pricey
You see them guys over there? They ain't like me
I got a Portuguese ting, not wifey
She said my temper's tiny
I got two different worlds like Miley
You hit me up, that's unlikely (Likely)
But I walked in the room with a fresh trim (Fresh trim)
Showin' my Colgate teeth (My teeth)
Yeah, they're lookin' at me (Lookin' at me)
Sayin' ""Can I get a pic for the 'Gram, just like AJ T""
No wonder they hate on me (Yeah, yeah)
'Cause I'm makin' P's and they see these clothes
Yeah, I get 'em for free


I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin'
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin' (In the mornin')
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (I'm yawnin')
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin' (Yawnin')
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (I'm yawnin')
She's jarrin', no stallin'

Many guys (Many guys), many, many, many guys
Hate me and it's true, too bad
I just stunt on you, too bad
I don't look like you
Like many, many, many guys (Many guys, yeah)
Hate me and it's true, too bad
I just stunt on you, like too bad


I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's callin', I'm yawnin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin'
She's jarrin', no stallin'
I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin'

I might link my ting from Barkin'
7 a.m. in the mornin'
She's callin', I'm yawnin'
She's jarrin', no stallin'...",3240565
109748,2264940,Truth Hurts,pop,Lizzo,2017,2059144,{},"
Why men great 'til they gotta be great?
Woo!


I just took a DNA test, turns out I'm 100% that bitch
Even when I'm crying crazy
Yeah, I got boy problems, that's the human in me
Bling bling, then I solve 'em, that's the goddess in me
You coulda had a bad bitch, non-committal
Help you with your career just a little
You're 'posed to hold me down, but you're holding me back
And that's the sound of me not calling you back


Why men great 'til they gotta be great? ('Til they gotta be great)
Don't text me, tell it straight to my face (Tell it straight to my face)
Best friend sat me down in the salon chair (Down in the salon chair)
Shampoo press, get you out of my hair
Fresh photos with the bomb lighting (With the bomb lighting)
New man on the Minnesota Vikings (Minnesota Vikings)
Truth hurts, needed something more exciting (Yee)
Bom bom bi dom bi dum bum bay (Eh, yeah, yeah, yeah)

You tried to break my heart?
Oh, that breaks my heart
That you thought you ever had it
No, you ain't from the start
Hey, I'm glad you're back with your bitch
I mean, who would wanna hide this?
I will never, ever, ever, ever, ever be your side chick
I put the sing in single
Ain't worried 'bout a ring on my finger
So you can tell your friend, ""Shoot your shot"" when you see him
It's okay, he already in my DMs


Why men great 'til they gotta be great? ('Til they gotta be great)
Don't text me, tell it straight to my face (Tell it straight to my face)
Best friend sat me down in the salon chair (Down in the salon chair)
Shampoo press, get you out of my hair
Fresh photos with the bomb lighting (With the bomb lighting)
New man on the Minnesota Vikings (Minnesota Vikings)
Truth hurts, needed something more exciting (Yee)
Bom bom bi dom bi dum bum bay (Eh, yeah, yeah, yeah)


I'ma hit you back in a minute (Yeah, yeah)
I don't play tag, bitch, I been it (One time)
We don't fuck with lies (Two times), we don't do goodbyes (Woo)
We just keep it pushing like ay-ay-ay
I'ma hit you back in a minute (Yeah, yeah)
I don't play tag, bitch, I been it (One time)
We don't fuck with lies (Two times), we don't do goodbyes (Woo)
We just keep it pushing like ay-ay-ay (Woo)

Why men great 'til they gotta be great? ('Til they gotta be great)
Don't text me, tell it straight to my face (Tell it straight to my face)
Best friend sat me down in the salon chair (Down in the salon chair)
Shampoo press, get you out of my hair
Fresh photos with the bomb lighting (With the bomb lighting)
New man on the Minnesota Vikings (Minnesota Vikings)
Truth hurts, needed something more exciting (Yee)
Bom bom bi dom bi dum bum bay (Eh, yeah, yeah, yeah)


With the bomb lighting
Minnesota Vikings
Yee, eh, yeah, yeah, yeah",3241792
109927,2267577,Mans Not Hot,rap,Big Shaq,2017,8690766,{},"
Yo
Big Shaq, the one and only
Man's not hot, never hot
Skrrat (GottiOnEm), skidi-kat-kat
Boom


Two plus two is four
Minus one, that's three, quick maths
Every day, man's on the block
Smoke trees (Ah)
See your girl in the park
That girl is a uckers
When the ting went quack-quack-quack
You man were ducking (You man ducked)
Hold tight, Asznee (My brudda)
He's got the pumpy (Big ting)
Hold tight, my man (My guy)
He's got the frisbee (Few)
I trap, trap, trap on the phone
Movin' that cornflakes (Uh)
Rice Krispies
Hold tight, my girl Whitney (My G)
On, on, on, on, on the road doin' 10 toes
Like my toes (Like my toes)
You man thought I froze
I see a peng girl, then I pose (Chilin')
If she ain't on it, I ghost
Hah, look at your nose (Check your nose, fam)
You donut
Nose long like garden hose

I tell her man's not hot
I tell her man's not hot
The girl told me, ""Take off your jacket""
I said, ""Babes, man's not hot"" (Never hot)
I tell her man's not hot (Never hot)
I tell her man's not hot (Never hot)
The girl told me, ""Take off your jacket""
I said, ""Babes, man's not hot"" (Never hot)


Hop out the four-door with the .44
It was one, two, three and four (Us man)
Chillin' in the corridor (Yo)
Your dad is forty-four (Uh)
And he's still callin' man for a draw (Look at him)
Let him know
When I see him
I'm gonna spin his jaw (Finished)
Take man's Twix by force (Take it)
Send man's shop by force (Send him)
Your girl knows I've got the sauce (Flexin')
No ketchup (None)
Just sauce (Saucy)
Raw sauce (Ah)
Yo, boom, ah

The ting goes skrrah (Ah)
Pop, pop, ka-ka-ka (Ka-ka)
Skidi-ki-pop-pop (Pah)
And a pu-pu-brr-boom (Boom)
Ski-ya (Ah)
Du-du-ku-ku-dun-dun (Dun)
Poom, poom
You dun know


I tell her man's not hot (Man's not)
I tell her man's not hot (Never hot)
The girl told me, ""Take off your jacket""
I said, ""Babes, man's not hot"" (Never hot)
I tell her man's not hot
I tell her man's not hot (Never hot)
The girl told me, ""Take off your jacket""
I said, ""Babes, man's not hot""


Man can never be hot (Never hot)
Perspiration ting (Spray dat)
Lynx Effect (Come on)
You didn't hear me, did you? (Nah)
Use roll-on (Use that)
Or spray (Shh)
But either way, A-B-C-D (Alphabet ting)

The ting goes skrrah (Ah)
Pop, pop, ka-ka-ka (Ka)
Skidi-ki-pop-pop (Pah)
And a pu-pu-brr-boom (Boom)
Ski-ya (Ah)
Du-du-ku-ku-dun-dun (Dun)
Poom, poom
You dun know


Big Shaq
Man's not hot
I tell her man's not hot (Never hot)
Forty degrees out, man's not hot (Come on)
Yo (Ah)
In the sauna, man's not hot (Never hot)
Yeah, skidi-ka-pop-pop",3244990
110041,2268500,Bukti,pop,Virgoun,2017,3080863,{},"
Memenangkan hatiku
Bukanlah satu hal yang mudah
Kau berhasil membuat
Ku tak bisa hidup tanpamu


Menjaga cinta itu
Bukanlah satu hal yang mudah
Namun sedetik pun tak pernah kau
Berpaling dariku


Beruntungnya aku
Dimiliki kamu


Kamu adalah bukti
Dari cantiknya paras dan hati
Kau jadi harmoni saat ku bernyanyi
Tentang terang dan gelapnya hidup ini
Kaulah bentuk terindah
Dari baiknya Tuhan padaku
Waktu tak mengusaikan cantikmu
Kau wanita terhebat bagiku
Tolong kamu camkan itu


Meruntuhkan egoku
Bukanlah satu hal yang mudah
Dengan kasih lembut kau pecahkan
Kerasnya hatiku


Beruntungnya aku
Dimiliki kamu (ku ingin engkau tahu)


Kamu adalah bukti
Dari cantiknya paras dan hati
Kau jadi harmoni saat ku bernyanyi
Tentang terang dan gelapnya hidup ini

Kaulah bentuk terindah (kaulah bentuk terindah)
Dari baiknya Tuhan padaku
Waktu tak mengusaikan cantikmu (mengusaikan cantikmu)
Kau wanita terhebat bagiku
Tolong kamu camkan itu

Semua yang jadi bukti tersimpan di dalam palung hati
Semua yang jadi bukti tersimpan di dalam palung hati


Kamu adalah bukti
Dari cantiknya paras dan hati
Kau jadi harmoni saat ku bernyanyi
Tentang terang dan gelapnya hidup ini

Kaulah bentuk terindah (kaulah bentuk terindah)
Dari baiknya Tuhan padaku
Waktu tak mengusaikan cantikmu (mengusaikan cantikmu)
Kau wanita terhebat bagiku
Tolong kamu camkan itu


Tolong kamu camkan itu",3246067
110144,2270219,Diplomatic Immunity,rap,Drake,2018,1051996,{},"
Diplomatic immunity, fuck 'em
All that peace and that unity
All that weak shit'll ruin me, fuck 'em, yeah
'Cause niggas started talkin' to me like I'm slowin' down
Opinions over statistics, of course
Gassed off journalistic
Come at me and all you'll get is the ballistic report
Booked a private room at Wally's, waiter twistin' the cork
I got multi-colored rings like the Olympics, of course
At award shows, cuttin' through the tension, of course
Girls huggin' me then askin' me, ""What scent that is, boy?""
I be walkin' around the Six like I invented it, boy
Yeah, who am I? The do or die
The one with the fewest lies and the truest ties
They try to compare us, but
Like a job straight outta high school there's no you and I
I taught you everything you know, now you got student pride
All factual, I call the house ""the embassy""
The studio ""the chapel"", I hate to travel
I just pulled up on Solána show, the girl's a natural
I knew her way back when Hollywood was international
Yeah, the furthest I've been, that's word to my ends
Word to the flags that belong in the hood of my Benz
Very presidential, I broke all the codes for zonin' in my residential
I broke spirits that I never meant to
My body isn't much of a sacred temple, with vodka and wine
And sleep at the opposite times
Promise shit is gettin' outta line like when you make a stencil
Or gettin' outta line like when you break a pencil
Violatin' the Treaty of Versailles
Champagne is the alias, but no cease and desist in I
I refuse to comply with regulations
I listen to heavy metal for meditation, no silence
Like Sanders on the Detroit Lions
Get a run around and I'll bury you where they won't find ya
Motor City Casino, I'm at the cage with my old license
They tell me ""don't worry, I got your money"" like Osirus
(I'm the Osiris of this shit)
Dirty 30, workin' on me
Tired of women that may tag me in pictures airin' my dirty laundry
Catering is from Giorgio Baldi, Robyn's favorite
Shit is nice, but I prefer Madeo
Calamari rings and tomato
I got the sauce and now shorties keep claimin' preggo
Wakin' up at 6 PM like, ""Where does the day go?""
Forecastin' tornadoes, brainstormin' retaliation at dinner tables
2010 was when I lost my halo
2017 I lost a J. Lo
A Rotterdam trip had me on front page though
I had to lay low, Hot Topic like your everyday clothes
Closed off but I could never stay closed
Billboard awards, I claimed 13 out in Vegas like Sureños
Black excellence, but I guess when it comes to me it's not the same though, all goodie
That just pushed me to do the things we all couldn't
Niggas stakin' out the crib, it's all gravy
Protection that God gave me
Shit is complex like short niggas 'round tall ladies
I gotta watch who I'm talkin' to like it's all-ages
I've seen buddin' careers turn to sit around and talk about other careers, judgin' their peers
Knowledge from niggas who did not contribute to none of this here
Cover my ears, my security government tier
Yeah, advance the venue so we know the exits
Check the guest list
If opps make an appearance at least it's expected
Tell 'em I don't wanna link like a broken necklace
I'll be in better company with my own reflection
Mirror, mirror, on the ceiling of my suite in the Royal Palace
The TV playin' Al Jazeera
Insha'Allah, I hope the mission keeps on gettin' clearer
Whenever, wherever, OVO will always be together like Shakira

I love, I love
I love, I love it
Baby, I",3248485
110536,2276740,​wish you were gay,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1730399,{},"
""Baby, I don't feel so good,"" six words you never understood
""I'll never let you go,"" five words you'll never say (Aww)
I laugh along like nothing's wrong, four days has never felt so long
If three's a crowd and two was us, one slipped away (Hahahahahahahaha)


I just wanna make you feel okay
But all you do is look the other way
I can't tell you how much I wish I didn't wanna stay
I just kinda wish you were gay


Is there a reason we're not through?
Is there a 12 step just for you?
Our conversation's all in blue
11 ""heys"" (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
Ten fingers tearin' out my hair
Nine times you never made it there
I ate alone at 7, you were six minutes away
(Yay)

How am I supposed to make you feel okay
When all you do is walk the other way?
I can't tell you how much I wish I didn't wanna stay
I just kinda wish you were gay


To spare my pride
To give your lack of interest an explanation
Don't say I'm not your type
Just say that I'm not your preferred sexual orientation
I'm so selfish
But you make me feel helpless, yeah
And I can't stand another day
Stand another day


I just wanna make you feel okay
But all you do is look the other way, hmm
I can't tell you how much I wish I didn't wanna stay
I just kinda wish you were gay
I just kinda wish you were gay
I just kinda wish you were gay",3256574
110614,2278218,Freaky Friday,rap,Lil Dicky,2018,2017676,"{""Chris Brown""}","
Lil Dicky, ooh
Mustard on the beat, ho


I woke up Chris Breezy, oh my god I'm the man (Oh shit)
I'm so fly and I can dance (Whoa, whoa shit)
There's tattoos on my neck (Oh, oh)
I just FaceTimed Kanye (Blip, blip)
I told him I'm his biggest fan, yeah (Yeah)
Got all these hoes in my DM (Yeah, I do)
Holy shit, I got a kid (Oh)
Ohh, I can sing so well
Wonder if I can say the n-word (Wait for real?)
Wait, can I really say the n-word?
What up, my nigga? (Woo) What up, my nigga?
Big ups, my nigga, we up, my nigga
You pussy ass nigga, man, fuck y'all niggas
'Cause I'm that nigga, nigga, nigga, nigga
I'm that nigga

I woke up in Chris Brown's body (Oh yeah)
Somehow this shit turned into Freaky Friday
But we got no choice but to turn this bitch sideways
(Oh yeah, oh yeah)
I can't believe that it's Freaky Friday
Yeah, it's Freaky Friday
I'm in Chris Brown's body
I drive his Ferrari and I'm light-skinned black


(Ring, ring) What the fuck?
I woke up and I'm Lil Dicky (Lil Dicky?)
Ugh, what the fuck?
This shit is real weak
How his dick staying perched up on his balls like that?
Walking down the street and ain't nobody know my name (Whoa)
Ain't no paparazzi flashing pictures, this is great (Whoa)
Ain't nobody judging 'cause I'm black or my controversial past
I'ma go and see a movie and relax (Woo)
Ayy, I'm a Blood but I can finally wear blue (Cool)
Why his momma calling all the time?
Leave me the fuck alone, bitch
Wait, if I'm in Dicky's body, Breezy is who?
Hope my daughter's in school
Fuck, if I was Chris Brown, where would I be?
What would I do?

I woke up in Chris Brown's body (Oh yeah)
Somehow this shit turned into Freaky Friday
But we got no choice but to turn this bitch sideways
(Oh yeah, oh yeah)
I can't believe that it's Freaky Friday
Yeah, it's Freaky Friday
I'm in Chris Brown's body
I look at my soft dick with delight, it's my dream dick


If I was Lil Dicky in my body, where would I be?
I'm tryna to find myself like an introspective monk
I'm balling on the court, oh my god I can dunk
Snap a flick of my junk
My dick is trending on Twitter? Fuck
Now I'm at the club, I talked my way into getting in
I look up in the VIP, my goodness there I am
I signal to him to let me in but he won't let me in
I don't know who that is
Wait, who the fuck he think he is?
Took a glass bottle, shatter it on the bouncer's head (Woo)
Walked up to that motherfucker
Wait, think it through for a sec
If you hurting me then you only hurting yourself
But wait, I love myself
That was the key, now we're switching back

I woke up in Chris Brown's body (Oh yeah)
Somehow this shit turned into Freaky Friday
But we got no choice but to turn this bitch sideways
(I can't believe)
I can't believe that it's Freaky Friday


Lil Dicky: Wait, what the fuck?
Ed Sheeran: And now I'm in Ed Sheeran's body
It's way less cool than being Chris Brown was
Lil Dicky: What the fuck again?
DJ Khaled: I'm DJ Khaled
Why am I yelling?
Kendall Jenner: Huh, I'm Kendall Jenner
I got a vagina, I'm gonna explore that right now (Woo, woo)
Holy shit, I got a vagina (Uh), I'm gonna learn
I'm gonna understand the inner workings of a woman",3258567
110736,2280846,Girls Like You,pop,Maroon 5,2017,1084746,{},"
Spent 24 hours, I need more hours with you
You spent the weekend getting even, ooh
We spent the late nights making things right between us


But now it's all good, babe
Roll that Backwood, babe
And play me close


'Cause girls like you run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
Girls like you love fun, and yeah, me too
What I want when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah


Yeah yeah yeah, yeah yeah yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
Yeah yeah yeah, yeah yeah yeah
I need a girl like you

I spent last night on the last flight to you
Took a whole day up tryna get way up, ooh
We spent the daylight tryna make things right between us


But now it's all good, babe
Roll that Backwood, babe
And play me close


'Cause girls like you run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
Girls like you love fun, and yeah, me too
What I want when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah


Yeah yeah yeah, yeah yeah yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
Yeah yeah yeah, yeah yeah yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
I need a girl like you

Maybe it's 6:45
Maybe I'm barely alive
Maybe you've taken my shit for the last time (yeah)
Maybe I know that I'm drunk
Maybe I know you're the one
Maybe you're thinking it's better if you drive


Oh, 'cause girls like you run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah
'Cause girls like you run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
Girls like you love fun, and yeah, me too
What I want when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah


Yeah yeah yeah, yeah yeah yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah yeah
Yeah yeah yeah, yeah yeah yeah
I need a girl like you",3261716
110763,2281038,Titibo-tibo,pop,Moira Dela Torre,2017,1664774,{},"
Elementary pa lang, napapansin na nila
Mga gawi kong parang hindi pambabae, eh kasi
Imbes na chinese garter, laruan ko ay teks at jolens
Tapos ka-jamming ko lagi noon
Mga sigang lalaki sa amin


Nung ako'y mag high school ay
Napabarkada sa mga bi-curious na babae na
Ang hanap din ay babae
Sa halip na makeup kit, bitbit ko ay gitara
Tapos pormahan ko lagi ay long sleeves na
T-shirt at faded na lonta


Pero noong nakilala kita
Nagbagong bigla ang aking timpla
Natuto ako na magparebond
At mag-ahit ng kilay at least once a month
Hindi ko alam kung anong meron ka na
Sa akin ay nagpalambot nang bigla
Sinong mag-aakalang lalake pala
Ang bibihag sa tulad kong tigreng gala

Kahit ako'y titibo-tibo
Puso ko ay titibok-tibok pa rin sa'yo
Isang halik mo lamang, at ako ay tinatablan
At ang aking pagkababae ay nabubuhayan
Na para bang bulaklak na namumukadkad
Dahil alaga mo sa dilig at katamtamang
Sikat ng araw-araw mong pag-ibig
Sa 'king buhay nagpapasarap


Nung tayo'y nag-college ay
Saka ko lamang binigay ang matamis na oo
Sampung buwan mong trinabaho
Sa halip na tsokolate at tipikal na mga diskarte
Nabihag mo ko sa mga tula at sa mga kanta mong pabebe


Kaya nga noong makilala kita
Alam ko na agad na mayroong himala
Natuto akong magtakong at napadalas
Ang pagsuot ng bestidang pula
Pero 'di mo naman inasam na ako ay
Magbagong tuluyan para patunayang
Walang matigas na tinapay sa mainit na kape
Ng iyong pagmamahal

Kahit ako'y titibo-tibo
Puso ko ay titibok-tibok pa rin sa'yo
Isang halik mo lamang, at ako ay tinatablan
At ang aking pagkababae ay nabubuhayan
Na para bang bulaklak na namumukadkad
Dahil alaga mo sa dilig at katamtamang
Sikat ng araw-araw mong pag-ibig
Sa 'king buhay nagpapasarap",3261938
111043,2284977,GUMMO,rap,6ix9ine,2017,3305223,{},"
Niggas iffy, uh, blicky got the stiffy, uh
Got the blicky, uh, drum, it hold fifty, uh
Scum Gang!


Pop these niggas like a wheelie, nigga, you a silly nigga
In the hood with them Billy niggas and them Hoover niggas
You run up and they shootin' niggas, we ain't hoopin', nigga
Yo, KB, you a loser, nigga, up that Uzi, nigga
On the stoop, crills in my drawers, your girl on my phone
She wanna fuck, but keep her clothes on, I only want the jaw
Man, that's really all I use her for, then kick her out the door
I don't want her, you can keep the whore, she fiendin' for some more
In New York, my niggas don't Milly Rock, my niggas money bop
Blow a case, a nigga throwin' shots, I run 'em off they block
Quarter milli' in the stash box, I grinded for my spot
Niggas talkin' 'bout that cash, but my bag worth a lot
I don't fuck with no old hoes, only new hoes
Put my dick in her backbone, I pass her to my bro
I don't love her, that's a sad ho, she a bad ho
I'ma fuck her, then I dash home, to the cash, ho

I'm on some rob a nigga shit, take the nigga bitch
Do the dash in the whip, count the cash in the whip
I pull up with a stick, I let that shit hit
Shout out *******, but I fucked that nigga bitch


Niggas iffy, uh, blicky got the stiffy, uh
Got the blicky, uh, drum it hold fifty, uh
Move milli', all my niggas on fifty, uh
Talk down (Pew pew pew), you silly, uh (Fah-fah-fah-fah)
Hit a stain, fifty bands, all hunnids
Spinnin' through ya block, like a pop shove-it
Shoot at me, I'm shootin' back, I'm gettin' buckets
I ain't wanna take his life, but nigga, fuck it


I'm on some rob a nigga shit, take the nigga bitch
Do the dash in the whip, count the cash in the whip
I pull up with a stick, I let that shit hit
Shout out *******, but I fucked that nigga bitch
I'm on some rob a nigga shit, take the nigga bitch
Do the dash in the whip, count the cash in the whip
I pull up with a stick, I let that shit hit
Shout out *******, but I fucked that nigga bitch

Scum Gang!",3266784
111531,2292865,She Don’t Give a Fo,rap,Duki,2017,1238168,{KHEA},"


Ey (Duki)
Yeah (KHEA Young Flex)
Ah-wow
She don't give a fo, oh
She don't give a fo, oh-oh


Sabe que la quiero, pero she don't give a fo (Na-na-na, eh)
Quizás es el miedo, pero she don't give a fo
Quiere a alguien con futuro, sin tantos cambio' de humor (Na-na-na)
O eso es lo que creo (Eh), pero she don't give a fo


She don't give a fo, baby, she don't give a fo
She don't give a fo (Oh-oh), baby, she don't give a fo (Oh-oh)
She don't give a fo (Oh-oh), baby, she don't give a fo (Oh-oh)
She don't give a fo (Oh-oh), baby, she don't give a fo (Oh-oh)

Soy un yonqui loco por su coca
Aprovecha mis horas que son poca'
Cuando pasemo' esa puerta, mi loca
Te vas a hacer la que na' de esto te importa
Y termino de nuevo con otra
Ya ni quiero sacarle la ropa
Dejé de darle beso' en la boca
Quiero la reina, no un cuatro de copa'
'Toy caliente, y estoy frío
No se llena este vacío
Girl, quereme just a little bit
Mi heroína en este lío
'Toy caliente, y estoy frío
No se llena este vacío
Girl, quereme
Mi heroína en este lío


Y si te digo que esta pena que siento
Sólo me la pueden sacar tus besos
Y si te digo que puedo morirme felí' mientras sea culpa de tu sexo
Y si te digo que el resto nos mira
Como si estuvieran odiando lo nuestro
Y veo tu cara que no te importa nada
Como si hubiera nacido pa' esto

Ella es una diabla
Me ve, me besa, después no me habla
Noche' de sexo, día' sin palabras
Ando perdido por culpa 'e esa diabla
Ella es una diabla
Me ve, me besa, después no me habla
Noche' de sexo, día' sin palabras
Ando perdido por culpa 'e esa diabla


Sabe que la quiero, pero she don't give a fo
Quizás es el miedo, pero she don't give a fo (Fo, ey)
Quiere a alguien con futuro y sin tanto' cambio' de humor (-mor, -mor, -mor, -mor)
O eso es lo que creo, pero she don't give a fo


She don't give a fo, baby, she don't give a fo (Fo, fo)
She don't give a fo, baby, she don't give a fo (Fo, fo)
She don't give a fo, baby (Fo, fo), she don't give a fo
She don't give a fo, baby, she don't give a fo (Yeah)


No haga' que vaya a buscarte (Que vaya a buscarte)
Y te diga to' lo que siento (Siento)
Baby, no quiero frenarte (No)
Ya no me alcanza el tiempo (Ah-ah)
Ya no es lo mismo que ante' (Ah-ah-ah)
Ahora mato por tu cuerpo (Ah-ah-ah)
Ahora mato por tu cuerpo (Ah-ah)
Baby, juro que no miento

Y si quieres dímelo (Dímelo)
Diabla, solo dímelo (Oh)
Sé que sobran ganas (Oh, oh)
Pero siempre hay algo que mata lo de los dos (Lo de los dos)
Y si quieres dímelo (Dímelo)
Diabla, solo dímelo (Dímelo)
Sé que sobran ganas (Oh, oh)
Pero siempre hay algo que mata lo de los dos (Oh, oh)


She don't give a fo (Fo)
She don't give a fo-fo (Fo)
She don't give a fo-fo (She don't give a fo)
She don't give a fo
She don't give a fo-fo (She don't give a fo)
She don't give a fo-fo (Oh)
She don't give a fo-fo (Oh-oh-oh)
She don't give a fo
Oh-oh, oh, oh
She don't give a fo, oh-oh
She don't give a fo, oh-oh
Oh, oh-oh-oh",3275687
111622,2294517,ICY GRL,rap,Saweetie,2017,1278981,{},"
Can't stop, won't stop, get guap
Ten white toes in them Tory flip-flops
Manicures and pedicures, I'm always tip-top
When they say I'm not hot, all these lies need to stop
'Cause I'm icy, wifey, haters wanna fight me
Never been the one get RIP up on a white tee
Keep my hands clean, got some hittas moving sheisty
Ask me if I'm rollin' with some Gucci, bitch I might be
It's very unlikely my wrist ain't looking icy
Charging by the minute 'cause my time is very pricey
Yeah, I be where the bosses be
Judging from my vibe, you can feel it in my energy
Stacking paper steadily so I can live in luxury
Looking in the mirror, I thank God for what I'm about to be
You beefing with my enemy does not make you a friend of me
Girls so weird, stay clear, I'm living drama free
Never living comfortably, got a lot of goals to meet
My team is trying to eat so we grinding 'til our mental bleed
You tryna get a bag of weed? I'm tryna get a bag a week
Put it in my savings and invest in the right companies
My dream is like a child and I'm taking all the custody
Obstacles be slowing me, but that buffer molded me
So I take my time, 'cause I'm always where I'm suppose to be
Keep my niggas close to me 'cause I'm knowing they go for me
You can not get a hold of me? I'm probably in a solo meet
Always making moves, man that's how I keep my sanity
Yeah, it's my team's summer
Couple setbacks, bounce back and recover
The clique real small but we making big moves
And we headed to the top so we can get a better view like
I'ma catch a tan overseas while I'm out the country
Let me get some Hennessy while I'm chilling on the beach
I'ma count a couple G's, let the server bring receipts
Double checking my expenses, never messy, always neat
Never ever, thats how a hot girl do it
Number one stunner, icy girl with a Cuban
Cash money, mama that be dining in Bahamas
Eating Fettucini pasta with the scallops and the lobsters
Huh, I don't got no time for these hoes
Speaking on my name like I'm someone that they know
I'm the big cat bitch, yes these niggas love me
Is that Gucci on my feet? Shit, bitch it might be",3277720
111633,2294655,Mine,rb,Bazzi,2017,1814767,{},"
Huh, yeah, naw I just, had a lil' bit too much of Hennessy
Just gotta tell you how I feel, look


You so fuckin' precious when you smile (Haha, yeah)
Hit it from the back and drive you wild (Yeah-yeah)
Girl, I lose myself up in those eye-eye-eye-eye-eyes (Haha)
I just had to let you know you're mine (Mine, mine, mine)


Hands on your body, I don't wanna waste no time (Time, time, time)
Feels like forever even if forever's tonight
Just lay with me, waste this night away with me
You're mine, I can't look away, I just gotta say


I'm so fucking happy you're alive (Haha, yeah)
Swear to God, I'm down if you're down, all you gotta say is ""Right"" (Yeah-yeah)
Girl, anything I can do just to make you feel alright
Oh, oh, oh, oh, I just had to let you know you're fine
Running circles 'round my mind
Even when it's rainy, all you ever do is shine
You on fire, you a star just like Mariah
Man, this feel incredible, I'll turn you into a bride
You're mine (Mine, mine, mine)

(Oh-uh-oh)
Hands on your body, I don't wanna waste no time (Time, time, time)
Feels like forever even if forever's tonight
Just lay with me, waste this night away with me
You're mine, I can't look away, I just gotta say",3277867
111762,2297133,Wolves,pop,Selena Gomez & Marshmello,2017,1398677,{},"
In your eyes, there's a heavy blue
One to love, and one to lose
Sweet divine, a heavy truth
Water or wine, don't make me choose


I wanna feel the way that we did that summer night, night
Drunk on a feeling, alone with the stars in the sky


I've been running through the jungle
I've been running with the wolves
To get to you, to get to you
I've been down the darkest alleys
Saw the dark side of the moon
To get to you, to get to you
I've looked for love in every stranger
Took too much to ease the anger
All for you, yeah, all for you
I've been running through the jungle
I've been crying with the wolves
To get to you, to get to you, to get to you

To get to you
To get to you


Your fingertips trace my skin
To places I have never been
Blindly, I am following
Break down these walls and come on in


I wanna feel the way that we did that summer night, night
Drunk on a feeling, alone with the stars in the sky


I've been running through the jungle
I've been running with the wolves
To get to you, to get to you
I've been down the darkest alleys
Saw the dark side of the moon
To get to you, to get to you
I've looked for love in every stranger
Took too much to ease the anger
All for you, yeah, all for you
I've been running through the jungle
I've been crying with the wolves
To get to you, to get to you, to get to you

To get to you
To get to you


I've been running through the jungle
I've been running with the wolves
To get to you, to get to you
I've been down the darkest alleys
Saw the dark side of the moon
To get to you, to get to you
I've looked for love in every stranger
Took too much to ease the anger
All for you, yeah, all for you
I've been running through the jungle
I've been crying with the wolves
To get to you, to get to you, to get to you",3280764
111848,2297963,End Game,pop,Taylor Swift,2017,1528917,"{Future,""Ed Sheeran""}","
I wanna be your end game
I wanna be your first string
I wanna be your A-Team (Woah, woah, woah)
I wanna be your end game, end game


Big reputation, big reputation
Ooh, you and me, we got big reputations, ah
And you heard about me, ooh
I got some big enemies (Yeah)
Big reputation, big reputation
Ooh, you and me would be a big conversation, ah (Git, git)
And I heard about you, ooh (Yeah)
You like the bad ones, too


You so dope, don't overdose, I'm so stoked, I need a toast
We do the most, I'm in the Ghost like I'm whippin' a boat
I got a reputation, girl that don't precede me (Yeah)
I'm one call away whenever you need me (Yeah)
I'm in a G5 (Yeah), come to the A-Side (Yeah)
I got a bad boy persona, that's what they like (What they like)
You love it, I love it too 'cause you my type (You my type)
You hold me down and I protect you with my life

I don't wanna touch you, I don't wanna be
Just another ex-love you don't wanna see
I don't wanna miss you (I don't wanna miss you)
Like the other girls do
I don't wanna hurt you, I just wanna be
Drinking on a beach with you all over me
I know what they all say (I know what they all say)
But I ain't tryna play


I wanna be your end game (End game)
I wanna be your first string (First string)
I wanna be your A-Team (A-Team)
I wanna be your end game, end game


Knew her when I was young, reconnected when we were little bit older
Both sprung, I got issues and chips on both of my shoulders
Reputation precedes me, in rumors, I'm knee-deep
The truth is, it's easier to ignore it, believe me
Even when we'd argue, we'd not do it for long
And you understand the good and bad end up in the song
For all your beautiful traits, and the way you do it with ease
For all my flaws, paranoia, and insecurities
I've made mistakes and made some choices, that's hard to deny
After the storm, something was born on the 4th of July
I've passed days without fun, this end game is the one
With four words on the tip of my tongue, I'll never say it

I don't wanna touch you, I don't wanna be
Just another ex-love you don't wanna see
I don't wanna miss you (I don't wanna miss you)
Like the other girls do
I don't wanna hurt you, I just wanna be
Drinking on a beach with you all over me
I know what they all say, yeah
But I ain't tryna play


I wanna be your end game (End game)
I wanna be your first string (Wanna be your first string)
I wanna be your A-Team (A-Team)
I wanna be your end game, end game


Big reputation, big reputation
Ooh, you and me, we got big reputations, ah
And you heard about me, ooh
I got some big enemies
Hey, big reputation, big reputation
Ooh, you and me would be a big conversation, ah
And I heard about you, ooh
You like the bad ones, too

I hit you like bang, we tried to forget it, but we just couldn't
And I bury hatchets, but I keep maps of where I put 'em
Reputation precedes me, they told you I'm crazy
I swear I don't love the drama, it loves me
And I can't let you go, your hand prints on my soul
It's like your eyes are liquor, it's like your body is gold
You've been calling my bluff on all my usual tricks
So here's the truth from my red lips


I wanna be your end game (End game)
I wanna be your first string (Me and you, first string)
I wanna be your A-Team (Be your A-Team now, A-Team)
I wanna be your end game, end game
I wanna be your end game (Oh, I do)
I wanna be your first string (First string)
I wanna be your A-Team (A-Team)
I wanna be your end game, end game",3281773
111908,2298890,Icon,rap,Jaden,2017,1148303,{},"
(Woo)
Woah (Woo)
Yo, woah


What you call an icon livin'?
Start a record label, MSFTS just did it (woo)
Nylon cover, five minutes, woah
We up too hot in the business (woo)
'Bout to make a movie independent (woo)
Need new trucks, Independent (woo)
I need you to listen to the vision (woo)
All your verses sound like dirty dishes (gross)
I'm about to clean 'em in the kitchen (woo)
And we making money by the minute (woo)
I'm about to do it way different (godly)


I am just an icon living
I am just an icon living, living
I-I-Icon living (woo)
I am just an icon living, living
I am just an i-i-icon (woo)

I am not a Mayan, I'm a menace (menace)
It's wild, you can lie like a professor
I don't got the time to put you on the stretcher (stretcher)
I am here and I'm still flexing (flexing)
I am just an icon living
Start a record label, MSFTS just did it, woah
I'm Highsnob, cover five minutes, woah
We are so hot in the business (woo)
Last verse was before the award show (what?)
Icon tatted on my torso (huh?)
Me and Moi dipping in the Porsche, so what?
I ain't even take it on tour, so what?
Uh, damn-last girl signed the divorce, so what?
Now I'm focused and we 'bout to all blow up
We just tryna make the whole crowd go nuts (what?)
Look, we don't know no one like you (huh?)
Gold grills and you dance like Michael (what?)
No I's, MSFTS; no typos (woo)
Look, wait-we just wanna make you go psycho (go psycho)
Put a hundred thousand dollars in a Bible (woo)
I took the game with my eyes closed
Last verse was before the award show (what?)
Icon tatted on my torso (huh?)
Me and Moi dipping in a Porsche, so what?
I ain't even take it on tour, so what?
Your shit is fire, I'm more so, what?
Young Jaden dyin' on the floor, so what?
She broke my heart to the core, so what?
I guess we all gotta grow up
I am just an icon living
Start a record label, MSFTS just did it (woo)
Interview cover five minutes (woo)
We are too hot in the business (woo)
I'm going straight to the top with the crew
We should just chill and maybe take it slow
'Fore we get up there with nowhere to go
And we can chill and just look at the view (woo)
Damn, load a yellow rose into a rifle (ooh)
Me and Harry 'bout to go psycho (psycho!)
Put a hundred thousand in a bible (Bible!)
Damn, wait-gold teeth, dance like Michael (Michael!)
Man, this nigga on like a lightbulb (lightbulb!)
Owe it all to Cudi and to Tycho (damn)
'Bout to make a movie independent (woo)
Need new trucks, Independent (woo)
I need you to listen to the vision (woo)
All your verses sound like dirty dishes (gross)
I'm about to clean them in the kitchen (woo)
And we making money by the minute (woo)
I'm about to do it way different (godly)

I am just an icon living
I am just an icon living, living
I-i-icon living (woo)
I am just an icon living, living
I am just an i-i-icon
I am just an icon living, living
I am just an i-i-icon",3282964
111912,2298930,Delicate,pop,Taylor Swift,2017,1107165,{},"
This ain't for the best
My reputation's never been worse, so
You must like me for me...
We can't make
Any promises now, can we, babe?
But you can make me a drink


Dive bar on the East Side, where you at?
Phone lights up my nightstand in the black
Come here, you can meet me in the back
Dark jeans and your Nikes, look at you
Oh damn, never seen that color blue
Just think of the fun things we could do
('Cause I like you)


This ain't for the best
My reputation's never been worse, so
You must like me for me...
(Yeah, I want you)
We can't make
Any promises now, can we, babe?
But you can make me a drink

Is it cool that I said all that?
Is it chill that you're in my head?
'Cause I know that it's delicate (Delicate)
Is it cool that I said all that?
Is it too soon to do this yet?
'Cause I know that it's delicate
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
Isn't it?
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
Isn't it... delicate?


Third floor on the West Side, me and you
Handsome, you're a mansion with a view
Do the girls back home touch you like I do?
Long night, with your hands up in my hair
Echoes of your footsteps on the stairs
Stay here, honey, I don't wanna share
('Cause I like you)


This ain't for the best
My reputation's never been worse, so
You must like me for me...
(Yeah, I want you)
We can't make
Any promises now, can we, babe?
But you can make me a drink

Is it cool that I said all that?
Is it chill that you're in my head?
'Cause I know that it's delicate (Delicate)
Is it cool that I said all that?
Is it too soon to do this yet?
'Cause I know that it's delicate
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
Isn't it?
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
Isn't it delicate?


Sometimes I wonder when you sleep
Are you ever dreaming of me?
Sometimes when I look into your eyes
I pretend you're mine, all the damn time
'Cause I like you


Is it cool that I said all that?
Is it chill that you're in my head?
'Cause I know that it's delicate (Delicate)
(Yeah, I want you)
Is it cool that I said all that?
Is it too soon to do this yet?
'Cause I know that it's delicate (Delicate)
('Cause I like you)
Is it cool that I said all that?
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
Is it chill that you're in my head?
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
'Cause I know that it's delicate
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
(Yeah, I want you)
Is it cool that I said all that?
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
Is it too soon to do this yet?
Isn't it? Isn't it? Isn't it?
'Cause I know that it's delicate
Isn't it delicate?",3283025
112208,2304644,Murder on My Mind,rap,YNW Melly,2017,2674138,{},"
Get to roll no...
Ayy, I'm in the studio, bro
Oh, nah, yeah, call me, ball me
Yeah, I'll... bet
Yeah, I'm at the studio, hold up though


I ain't get to roll no weed, I ain't get to roll no Swishers
I was locked up on Christmas, ain't get to see my niggas
Ain't get to hug my mama, couldn't even give her no kisses
Can't even post on my Instagram 'cause these pussy niggas be snitching
Everybody acting suspicious, might probably say that I'm tripping
When I'm all alone in my jail cell, I tend to get in my feelings
And all I smoke is that loud, don't pass me no midget
And I'ma smoke all of my pain away 'cause that's the only thing that gon' heal it
I don't understand these women who go around pretending
As if they really fuck with me, so I love 'em all from a distance
'Cause the same bitch say she down to ride be the main one who tricking
Got Molly mixed with promethazine 'cause every time

I wake up in the morning, I got murder on my mind
AK-47's, MAC-11, Glocks, and nines
And all these pussy niggas hating, tryna knock me off my grind
But I can't let 'em do it, I got murder on my mind
Bitch, I got murder on my mind (Bitch, I got murder on my mind)
I got murder on my mind (On my mind)
I got murder on my mind (I got murder on my mind)
I got murder on my mind, I got murder on my mind


Yellow tape around his body, it's a fucking homicide
His face is on a T-shirt and his family traumatized
I didn't even mean to shoot him, he just caught me by surprise
I reloaded my pistol, cocked it back, and shot him twice
His body dropped down to the floor and he got teardrops in his eyes
He grabbed me by my hands and said he was afraid to die
I told him, ""It's too late, my friend, it's time to say goodbye""
And he died inside my arms, blood all on my shirt


Wake up in the morning, I got murder on my mind
AK-47's, MAC-11, Glocks, and nines
And all these pussy niggas hating, tryna knock me off my grind
But I can't let 'em do it, I got murder on my mind
Bitch, I got murder on my mind (Bitch, I got murder on my mind)
I got murder on my mind (On my mind)
I got murder on my mind
I got murder on my mind, I got murder on my mind
(I got murder on my mind)

Bite like tarantula, bitch, I'm an animal
Melly's a savage, no he not no amateur
Bad bitch named Angela, fucked her on camera
Bitch I'm a murderer (Yeah, yeah)
I might just kill the boy, don't wanna kill the boy
Bake him up, say he want beef, we gon' grill the boy
(Grill the boy, we gonna grill the boy)
I'm bleeding so good, I might dip his ass in it and spill the boy
Haha, murder on my mind, whoa, whoa
I got murder on my mind (On my mind)
I got murder on my mind, I got murder on my mind, huh


Wake up in the morning, I got murder on my mind
AK-47's, MAC-11, Glocks, and nines
And all these pussy niggas hating, tryna knock me off my grind
But I can't let 'em do it, I got murder on my mind
Bitch, I got murder on my mind
I got murder on my mind
I got murder on my mind
I got murder on my mind, I got murder on my mind
(Murder on my mind)


Whoa-oh-oh-oh
Young Nigga World, bitch
Whoa-oh-oh-oh",3290166
112268,2305361,MotorSport,rap,"Migos, Nicki Minaj & Cardi B",2017,4420617,"{""Migos / Nicki Minaj & Cardi B""}","
Yeah, woo, yeah, skrrt
M-M-M-Murda


Motorsport, yeah, put that thing in sport (Skrrt, skrrt)
Shawty bad (Bad), pop her like a cork (Pop it)
You a dork, never been a sport (Dork, yeah)
Pull up, woo, woo, jumpin' out the court (Jump)
Cotton candy (Drink), my cup tastes like the fair (Cotton)
Straight up there (Where?), we didn't take the stairs (Where?)
Faced my fears (My fears), gave my mama tears (Mama)
Shiftin' gears (Shift), on the Nawf, get serious (Serious)


Face all your fears, then get at me
Hit so many donuts on them backstreets
Sit so high in the nosebleeds (Yeah)
Feel like I can fly, yeah
Xans, Perky, check (Yeah), Bill Belichick
Take the air out the ball (Ooh), just so I can flex
Take the air out the mall, walk in with the sacks
Take the air out your broad (Hey), now she can't go back (E)
Xans, Perky, check (Yeah), Bill Belichick
Take the air out the ball (Yeah), just so I can flex
Take the air out the mall (Hey), walk in with the sacks
Take the air out your broad (Woo, woo, woo, E)

Offset!
Uh, the coupe came imported (Hey)
This season's Off-White come in snorted (White)
Green Lamborghini a tortoise (Lambo)
No human being, I'm immortal (No)
Patek and A.P. full of water (Patek)
Hundred K, I spend on my señora (Racks)
My pinky on margarine, butter (Margarine)
And my ears got McDonald's nuggets (Ayy)
Soon as I land on the Lear (Whew)
Piguets, they wet, tears ('Guets)
488, hit the gears (488)
Suicide doors, Britney Spears
I'm boujee, so, bitch, don't get near (Boujee)
Criss Angel, make dope disappear (Voilà)
Hit the gas, it got flames out the rears (Skrrt)
It's a race to the bag, get the mills (Hey)


Ride the dick like a BMX
No nigga wanna be my ex (No)
I love when he go on tour
'Cause he cums more, when I see him less
I get up set off
I turn Offset on
I told him the other day
""Man, we should sell that porn""
Yeah, Cardi B, I'm back, bitches
I don't wanna hear I'm actin' different (Yeah)
Same lips that be talkin' 'bout me
Is the same lips that be ass kissin'
These hoes ain't what they say they are
And they pussy stink, they catfishin' (Stank)
Same hoes that was sendin' shots
They reachin' out like they back itchin' (Whoo)
Why would I hop in some beef (Why?)
When I could just hop in a Porsche?
You heard she gon' do what from who?
That's not a reliable source, no
So tell me, have you seen her?
Let me wrap my weave up
I'm the trap Selena
¡Dame más gasolina! Skrrt!

Motorsport, yeah, put that thing in sport (Skrrt, skrrt)
Shawty bad (Bad), pop her like a cork (Pop it)
You a dork, never been a sport (Dork, yeah)
Pull up, woo, woo, jumpin' out the court (Jump)


Uh, yo, watch your man, then you should watch your mouth
Bitches is pressed, administer mouth to mouth
You see them stats, you know what I am about
I am the champ, I'm Iron Mike in a bout
Attention, I'ma need you to face front
You don't want smoke with me, this is a laced blunt
Rap's Jackie Chan, we ain't pullin' them fake stunts
My crown won't fit on your bum-ass lace fronts (Uh)
You bitches catchin' a fade, shout out my nigga Lil Boosie
All of your friends'll be dead, you can get hit with that Uzi
I call him Ricky, he say he love me like Lucy
Get you a straw nigga, you know this pussy is juicy
This Givenchy is custom made, now you can't get it at Saks though
I don't work in no office, but they copyin' and that's facts though
I ain't tryna be violent, but if Nicki on it, it slaps, ho
Get you lined for that paper like a loose leaf when that strap blow
I'm with a couple bad bitches that'll rip the party
If Quavo the QB, I'm Nick Lombardi
Pull up in the space coupe, I done linked with Marty
I can actually afford to get a pink Bugatti
""Ayo, Nick, didn't you just do a hit with Gotti?""
That too, but my niggas send hits like Gotti
It's a wrap, like the things on the head of a Saudi
Bitch, you my son, go and sit on the potty (Rrrrrr)

Brand new Chanels (Chanels)
I scuffed 'em runnin' from 12 (12)
Ain't make no commitment with none of you bitches
'Cause money is treatin' me well (Uh-uh)
If Nicki should show me her titty
Right hand on the Bible, I swear I won't tell (Swear)
If I get to play with that kitty
I wonder how many platinums we gon' sell (Albums)
Pop a Perc and catch a feel (I pop one)
Now I cannot feel the wheel (Woah)
My chest bad, give me chills (Ice)
And the left hand on Richard Mille (Ice)
Not the watch, but the price on the ice
If you don't know what that is (Huh)
Motorsport, motorville
Abort the mission, that's a kill (Pew, pew, brrr)


Motorsport, yeah, put that thing in sport (Skrrt, skrrt)
Shawty bad (Bad), pop her like a cork (Pop it)
You a dork, never been a sport (Dork, yeah)
Pull up, woo, woo, jumpin' out the court (Jump)
Cotton candy (Drink), my cup tastes like the fair (Cotton)
Straight up there (Where?), we didn't take the stairs (Where?)
Faced my fears (My fears), gave my mama tears (Mama)
Shiftin' gears (Shift), on the Nawf, get serious (Serious)


Girl, yeah, yeah, I wish my grandma could see me (Grandma)
Take away pain, ain't easy (Pain)
That's why I fire up a bleezy (Fire)
Niggas not cappin' this season",3291049
112286,2305521,The Greatest Show,pop,"Hugh Jackman, Keala Settle, Zac Efron, Zendaya & The Greatest Showman Ensemble",2017,2403101,"{""Hugh Jackman / Keala Settle / Zac Efron / Zendaya & The Greatest Showman Ensemble""}","
Woah
Woah
Woah
Woah
Woah
Woah
Woah
Woah
Woah


Ladies and gents, this is the moment you've waited for (Woah)
Been searchin' in the dark, your sweat soakin' through the floor (Woah)
And buried in your bones there's an ache that you can't ignore
Takin' your breath, stealin' your mind
And all that was real is left behind

Don't fight it, it's comin' for you, runnin' at ya
It's only this moment, don't care what comes after
Your fever dream, can't you see it gettin' closer?
Just surrender 'cause you feel the feelin' takin' over
It's fire, it's freedom, it's floodin' open
It's a preacher in the pulpit and your blind devotion
There's somethin' breakin' at the brick of every wall
It's holdin' all that you know, so tell me do you wanna go?

Where it's covered in all the colored lights
Where the runaways are runnin' the night
Impossible comes true, it's takin' over you
Oh, this is the greatest show
We light it up, we won't come down
And the sun can't stop us now
Watchin' it come true, it's takin' over you
Oh, this is the greatest show


(Woah) Colossal we come these renegades in the ring
(Woah) Where the lost get found in the crown of the circus king


Don't fight it, it's comin' for you, runnin' at ya
It's only this moment, don't care what comes after
It's blindin', outshinin' anything that you know
Just surrender 'cause you're callin' and you wanna go

Where it's covered in all the colored lights
Where the runaways are runnin' the night
Impossible comes true, intoxicatin' you
Oh, this is the greatest show
We light it up, we won't come down
And the sun can't stop us now
Watchin' it come true, it's takin' over you
Oh, this is the greatest show

It's everything you ever want
It's everything you ever need
And it's here right in front of you
This is where you wanna be (This is where you wanna be)
It's everything you ever want
It's everything you ever need
And it's here right in front o' you
This is where you wanna be
This is where you wanna be


Where it's covered in all the colored lights
Where the runaways are runnin' the night
Impossible comes true, it's takin' over you
Oh, this is the greatest show
We light it up, we won't come down
And the sun can't stop us now
Watchin' it come true, it's takin' over you
This is the greatest show
Where it's covered in all the colored lights
Where the runaways are runnin' the night
Impossible comes true, it's takin' over you
Oh, this is the greatest show
We light it up, we won't come down
And the walls can't stop us now
I'm watchin' it come true, it's takin' over you
Oh, this is the greatest show

'Cause everythin' you want is right in front of you
And you see the impossible is comin' true
And the walls can't stop us (now) now, yeah


This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show (Oh!)
This is the greatest show! (Oh!)",3291244
112619,2310303,Ghostface Killers,rap,"21 Savage, Offset & Metro Boomin",2017,1072016,"{""Travis Scott"",""21 Savage / Offset & Metro Boomin""}","
Metro Boomin want some more, nigga (Hey)


Automatic (Auto), automatics (Yeah), in the trunk (Pew)
Shoot the maggots (Pew-pew), shoot the maggots with the pump (Hey)
Thot and addy (Thot), love the Patek on my arm (Patek, uh)
We got static (Static), pussy nigga run your charm (Hey)
Ghostface killers (Killers), Wu-Tang, 21 news gang (News)
Drug dealers in the Mulsanne, at the top of the food chain (Hey)
Trappin' the cocaine (Yeah), no gang, shooter with no names
We can play toll games, the whole gang, kick in your door, man


Yeah, put on the Patek, poppin' Xanny, I'm an addict (Poppin')
Break the mattress with a baddie on the Addy (Smash)
Diamonds glassy, need some glasses for the flashes, yeah
Michael Jackson with this fashion, bitch, I'm dabbin', yeah
I do this shit on purpose, got these bitches slurpin' (Woah)
Aw, your pockets on hurting? Nigga, you can be my servant (Woo, woo)
Go to the lot and young nigga don't lease it, I purchase (Purchase)
After I cut off a thot, I give her some money for services (Here)
Wherever I go, the whole gang on go (Gang), yeah
You cannot tame the ho because she want fame for sure (Tame)
You think that you rich 'cause you got a hundred or more (Who?)
I got an over-overload, look like I just sold my soul
I pour up a four, a liter, I got the stripes, Adidas (Stripes)
I got a foreign mamacita and I been known to beat it (Mama)
Niggas ain't goin' defeated (Who?), we get the guns immediate (Brrt)
Don't burn in the coupe, it's an Italy (Italy)
You niggas is broke and it's pitiful (Hey)

Automatic (Auto), automatics (Yeah), in the trunk (Pew)
Shoot the maggots (Pew-pew), shoot the maggots with the pump (Hey)
Thot and addy (Thot), love the Patek on my arm (Patek, uh)
We got static (static), pussy nigga run your charm (Hey)
Ghostface killers (Killers), Wu-Tang, 21 news gang (News)
Drug dealers in the Mulsanne, at the top of the food chain (Hey)
Trappin' the cocaine (Yeah), no gang, shooter with no names
We can play toll games, the whole gang, kick in your door, man


Yeah, Kim Jong, yeah, big bombs (21)
Wonder Bread, man, make your bitch lick crumbs (Yeah)
Audemars Piguet flooded, got my wrist numb (Bling)
Grab the hitstick, nigga tryna blitz somethin'
Dope boy, dope boy, I sell coke, boy (21)
You broke ass rappers food, it's a po' boy (21)
Everybody the same, all these niggas sound alike (Dick riders)
Fox 5 gang turn you to a candlelight
Bitch boy, I'm a mobster, shrimp in my pasta
Jamaican don dada, hang 'round the shottas
Mad Max, nigga, yeah, I hang with the killers (21)
Planet of the Apes, yeah, I hang around gorillas (On God)
I got AK, SK, HK, broad day (21)
You a fuckboy, we ain't with the horseplay (Bitch)
Shrimp-ass nigga, did you do your chores today? (21)
Do you wanna take a ride with the coroner today? (21)

Automatic (Auto), automatics (Yeah), in the trunk (Pew)
Shoot the maggots (Pew-pew), shoot the maggots with the pump (Hey)
Thot and addy (Thot), love the Patek on my arm (Patek)
We got static (Static), pussy nigga run your charm (Hey)
Ghostface killers (Killers), Wu-Tang, 21 news gang (News)
Drug dealers in the Mulsanne, at the top of the food chain (Hey)
Trappin' the cocaine (Yeah), no gang, shooter with no names
We can play toll games, the whole gang, kick in your door, man


Drop from the heavens straight in the wild (Yeah)
Trunk in the front, top gotta slide (Woo)
Ride suicides, we keep this shit alive (Yeah)
Jumping out the public houses, don't you come outside (Straight up)
Private status, tryna land the jet at Magic (How you goin'? It's lit)
Goin' way up out my way to cut the traffic (What you poppin'? Yeah)
Pop the seal and pop the bean, I need the balance (Pop it, pop it, What you seein'?)
Bloody asses what I'm seeing, it's way too graphic
Watch your fingers 'cause the Cactus dangerous (Yeah)
Broke, you ain't us, we don't speak that language (Alright)
On the couches
Tom Cruise, I'ma make her see, she snort a mountain
Rackades on the outfit'll make her bounce it
Good drank my life, yeah, CPR my pipe, yeah
Please, need the energy, only got a night, yeah (It's lit)
Nike boys, we don't do three stripes (Yeah)
I'm living for my niggas that do life, yeah

Automatic (Auto), automatics (Yeah), in the trunk (Pew)
Shoot the maggots (Pew-pew), shoot the maggots with the pump (Hey)
Thot and addy (Thot), love the Patek on my arm (Patek, uh)
We got static (Static), pussy nigga run your charm (Hey)
Ghostface killers (Killers), Wu-Tang, 21 news gang (News)
Drug dealers in the Mulsanne, at the top of the food chain (Hey)
Trappin' the cocaine (Yeah), no gang, shooter with no names
We can play toll games, the whole gang, kick in your door, man",3296791
112620,2310307,Ric Flair Drip,rap,Offset & Metro Boomin,2017,1846647,{},"
(Bijan 4 The 1 Time)
Metro Boomin want some more, nigga! (Hey)


Going to the jeweler, bust the AP, yeah (Bust it)
Slide on the water like a jet-ski, yeah (Woo, slide)
I'm tryna fuck you and your bestie, yeah (Hey)
Chopper with the scope so do not test me, (Drrt) yeah (Drrt)
Ric Flair drip, go ""woo"" on a bitch (Woo)
57 90, split the coupe on my wrist (Ice)
Multi-million dollar, I'm a fool with the hits (Ayy)
Hop up in the Lamb' and drop the roof, show the tits (Skrrt)


Poppin' but you really not gon' shoot (Pop)
90 pointers down my diamonds look like hula hoops (90)
Hopping in my Bentayga and her seat is a masseuse (Hey)
Balenciaga, check my posture, Valentino boots (Oho-ooh)
It's the Boominati way, a lotta Lambs, a lotta Wraiths (Boominati)
Never hesitate to give a nigga yellow tape (Grrt)
Ain't worried 'bout the bag 'cause the cash accumulatin' (Bags)
Soon as we came in the game, all these niggas they imitate it (Hey)
Put my mind on it then I put my grind on it (Grind)
Put the iron on him if a nigga my opponent (Iron)
My car 500 and I don't put no miles on it (Ho)
I was runnin' 'round homie, with 500 thou' on me (Ho)

Going to the jeweler, bust the AP, yeah (Bust it)
Slide on the water like a jet-ski, yeah (Woo, slide)
I'm tryna fuck you and your bestie, yeah (Hey)
Chopper with the scope so do not test me, (Drrt) yeah (Drrt)
Ric Flair drip, go ""woo"" on a bitch (Woo)
57 90, split the coupe on my wrist (Ice)
Multi-million dollar, I'm a fool with the hits (Ayy)
Hop up in the Lamb' and drop the roof, show the tits (Offset)


Told my fam, got the gang with me (Gang with me)
Bought my first Patek, it got some rain on it (Patek)
Nigga, we used to kick it, how you hatin' on me? (How? How?)
Hop in the Bentley coupe and blow the brains out it (Skrrt!)
We not the same, my nigga
My nigga, we from the north division (North, nawf)
Aim at your brain, yea we bought ya just like it's an auction, ain't it (Hey)
Beat the chopper, hundred round total, like it's car collision (Brrt-brrt)
I made that shit mandatory, that means I had to get it (Hey)
My shooter be begging ""please"", he ready to wack a nigga (Please, please)
I gave a nigga a diamond, I had to cap a nigga (Woo)
I'm giving your ho away like she a raffle, nigga (Here, here)
We get at it, then we 'gone pray with the pastor's scriptures (Hey)


Going to the jeweler, bust the AP, yeah (Bust it)
Slide on the water like a jet-ski, yeah (Woo, slide)
I'm tryna fuck you and your bestie, yeah (Hey)
Chopper with the scope so do not test me, (Drrt) yeah (Drrt)
Ric Flair drip, go ""woo"" on a bitch (Woo)
57 90, split the coupe on my wrist (Ice)
Multi-million dollar, I'm a fool with the hits (Ayy)
Hop up in the Lamb' and drop the roof, show the tits (Skrrt)
Going to the jeweler, bust the AP, yeah (Bust it)
Slide on the water like a jet-ski, yeah (Woo, slide)
I'm tryna fuck you and your bestie, yeah (Hey)
Chopper with the scope so do not test me, (Drrt) yeah (Drrt)
Ric Flair drip, go ""woo"" on a bitch (Woo)
57 90, split the coupe on my wrist (Ice)
Multi-million dollar, I'm a fool with the hits (Ayy)
Hop up in the Lamb' and drop the roof, show the tits (Skrrt)",3296796
112736,2312049,Lemon,pop,N.E.R.D & Rihanna,2017,1423142,{},"
The truth will set you free
But first, it'll piss you off


Hate! Bad bitches wanna be my bae
Hate! Hunt me down like the C.I.A
Hate! Side of my car, tryna see my face
Hate! Want me to beat it like the T.I. case
Oh (hate!) and if it's heated I'ma feed my face
Hate! And best believe, it's gon' be outrageous
Hate! Hatin' niggas can't believe my race
Hate! Niggas hit you with the Eli face, oh


Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'
Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'
Scrunchin' their eyes with your name in their mouth and
Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'


Hate! You keep askin' me where I'm from
Hate! About the borders and, ""Did I run?""
Hate! Keep askin' how I feel 'bout guns
Hate! There's a light and dark army, which side you choose? Oh
Hate! If not now then when?
Hate! And if not me then who?
Hate! Don't drink the Kool-Aid, my friends
Hate! I tried to tell y'all about this dude

Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'
Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'
Hate supplements are found right in their couches
Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'


Wait, wait a minute
Shout out to them people, people
Wait, wait a minute
P-p-p-people, people
Wait, wait a minute
Mad ethnic right now


I get it how I live it
I live it how I get it
Count the mothafuckin' digits
I pull up with a lemon
Not 'cause she ain't livin'
It's just your eyes get acidic
And this here ain't a scrimmage
Mothafucka, we ain't finished
I told you we won't stop
A nigga 'bouta business
Like yours, but you rent it
Wave hello to the top
Nigga the Veyron glide
Tell the paparazzi get the lens right
Got the window down, top, blowin' la
Got the hazards on, only doin' five

You can catch me, Rih, in the new La Ferrar'
And the truck behind me got arms
Yeah, longer than LeBron
Just waitin' for my thumb like The Fonz
Woo! This beat tastes like lunch
But it's runnin' from veneers and it's runnin' from the fronts
But everyday, hey, wasn't lemonade
I was afraid, once a nigga graduate
Would I be okay?
So I prayed and I played
It's Rihanna, nigga
My constellation in space
Warp speed, Doctor Spock couldn't chase, nigga


Nigga, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face
Bath, bath salt, bitin' speakers in the face

I get it how I live it
I live it how I get it
Count the mothafuckin' digits
I pull up with a lemon
Not 'cause she ain't livin'
It's just your eyes get acidic
And this here ain't a scrimmage
Mothafucka, we ain't finished
I told you we won't stop
A nigga 'bouta business
Like yours, but you rent it
Wave hello to the top
Nigga the Veyron glide
Tell the paparazzi get the lens right
Got the window down, top, blowin' la
Got the hazards on, only doin' five
You can catch me...


Bouncin' around, bouncin' around, bouncin'


You can catch me
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute
Wait, wait a minute",3298826
112789,2312982,Call It What You Want,pop,Taylor Swift,2017,1106570,{},"
My castle crumbled overnight
I brought a knife to a gunfight
They took the crown, but it's alright
All the liars are calling me one
Nobody's heard from me for months
I'm doin' better than I ever was
'Cause


My baby's fit like a daydream
Walking with his head down
I'm the one he's walking to
So call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want to
My baby's fly like a jet stream
High above the whole scene
Loves me like I'm brand new
So call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want to

All my flowers grew back as thorns
Windows boarded up after the storm
He built a fire just to keep me warm
All the drama queens taking swings
All the jokers dressing up as kings
They fade to nothing when I look at him
And I know I make the same mistakes every time
Bridges burn, I never learn
At least I did one thing right
I did one thing right
I'm laughing with my lover, makin' forts under covers
Trust him like a brother
Yeah, you know I did one thing right
Starry eyes sparkin' up my darkest night


My baby's fit like a daydream
Walking with his head down
I'm the one he's walking to
So call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want to
My baby's fly like a jet stream
High above the whole scene
Loves me like I'm brand new
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
So call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want to

I want to wear his initial on a chain 'round my neck
Chain 'round my neck
Not because he owns me
But 'cause he really knows me
Which is more than they can say, I
I recall late November
Holding my breath, slowly, I said
""You don't need to save me
But would you run away with me?""
Yes (Would you run away?)


My baby's fit like a daydream
Walking with his head down
I'm the one he's walking to
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
So call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want to
My baby's fly like a jet stream
High above the whole scene
Loves me like I'm brand new
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
So call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want to

(Call it what you want, call it)
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
(Call it what you want, call it what you want, call it)
Call it what you want, yeah
Call it what you want... to",3300013
112994,2316249,KOODA,rap,6ix9ine,2017,1241699,{},"
Scum Gang!


Niggas runnin' out they mouth, but they never pop out
I got the drop on your spot, everybody watch out
All my niggas on 50, so you know we hopped out
Mobbed out, opps out, we gon' show what we about
All my niggas really gang bang, talk that damn slang
Rap about it, do the same thing, let your nuts hang
We gon' pull up, nigga, ¡ándale!, on Sangre
We post up, we don't do the race, you gon' die today


In the spot, blow 50 bands, shit, 100 bands
Shit, my pockets on a runnin' man, fuck a rubberband
I'ma fuck her in a handstand, she a fan, man
Need the drugs? I'm the Xan man, I'm the damn man
I roll up, I'm gon' be booted, stupid, and shootin' stupid
Brought a knife, I brought a Ruger, stupid, I really do this
If I tote it then you know I'll shoot it and I'ma prove it
Back, back, don't be movin', stupid, or I'ma use it (Squad)
Dicky stiffy, uh, bet she give some licky, uh
Lil bitty, uh, bust all on her titties, uh
She a skeezer, uh, really don't need her, uh
Bust then I leave her, uh, she a little eater, uh
Get back, kickback, blow your shit back, uh
Rip that, take that, flip that, send that, uh
.223 hit, where your clothes at? Uh
Scum Gang 'bout that Fendi, fin-act, uh

Niggas runnin' out they mouth, but they never pop out
I got the drop on your spot, everybody watch out
All my niggas on 50, so you know we hopped out
Mobbed out, opps out, we gon' show what we about
All my niggas really gang bang, talk that damn slang
Rap about it, do the same thing, let your nuts hang
We gon' pull up, nigga ¡ándale!, on Sangre (It's Koncept P, the beat knockin')
We post up, we don't do the race, you gon' die today


You can talk hot on the internet, boy
That's that goofy shit, we ain't into that, boy
Black van, pull up to your momma crib, boy
Tie her up, drive that shit off a bridge, lil boy
You can talk hot on the internet, boy
That's that goofy shit, we ain't into that, boy
Black van, pull up to your momma crib, boy
Tie her up, drive that shit off a bridge, lil boy


Niggas runnin' out they mouth, but they never pop out
I got the drop on your spot, everybody watch out
All my niggas on 50, so you know we hopped out
Mobbed out, opps out, we gon' show what we about (It's Koncept P, the beat knockin')
All my niggas really gang bang, talk that damn slang
Rap about it, do the same thing, let your nuts hang
We gon' pull up, nigga ¡ándale!, on Sangre
We post up, we don't do the race, you gon' die today",3303780
113254,2320908,Walk on Water,rap,Eminem,2017,2164116,{Beyoncé},"
I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes (Fuck)


Why are expectations so high? Is it the bar I set?
My arms, I stretch, but I can't reach
A far cry from it, or it's in my grasp, but as
Soon as I grab, squeeze
I lose my grip like the flying trapeze
Into the dark I plummet, now the sky's blackening
I know the mark's high, butter-
Flies rip apart my stomach
Knowin' that no matter what bars I come with
You're gonna harp, gripe, and
That's a hard Vicodin to swallow, so I scrap these
As pressure increases like khakis
I feel the ice cracking, because-

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
(It's the curse of the-, it's the curse of the-)
I walk on water (Shit)
But only when it freezes


It's the curse of the standard, that the first of the Mathers disc set
Always in search of the verse that I haven't spit yet
Will this step just be another misstep
To tarnish whatever the legacy, love or respect
I've garnered? The rhyme has to be perfect, the delivery flawless
And it always feels like I'm hittin' the mark
'Til I go sit in the car, listen and pick it apart
Like, ""This shit is garbage!""
God's given me all this, still I feel no different regardless
Kids look to me as a god, this is retarded
If only they knew, it's a facade and it's exhaustive
And I try not to listen to nonsense
But if you bitches are tryin' to strip me of my confidence
Mission accomplished
I'm not God-sent, Nas, Rakim, 'Pac, B.I.G., James Todd Smith
And I'm not Prince, so...


I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
(It's true, I'm a Rubik's-, it's true-)
But only when it freezes
(It's true-)

'Cause I'm only human, just like you
Making my mistakes, oh if you only knew
I don't think you should believe in me the way that you do
'Cause I'm terrified to let you down, oh


It's true, I'm a Rubik's-a beautiful mess
At times juvenile, yes, I goof and I jest
A flawed human, I guess
But I'm doin' my best to not ruin your ex-
Pectations and meet 'em, but first
The ""Speedom"" verse, now Big Sean
He's goin' too fast, is he gonna shout or curse out his mom?
There was a time I had the world by the balls, eatin' out my palm
Every album song I was spazzin' the fuck out on
And now I'm gettin' clowned and frowned on
But the only one who's looking down on
Me that matters now's DeShaun
Am I lucky to be around this long?
Begs the question though
Especially after the methadone
As yesterday fades and the Dresden home
Is burnt to the ground and all that's left of my house is lawn
The crowds are gone
And it's time to wash out the blonde
Sales decline, the curtain's drawn
They're closin' the set, I'm still pokin' my head from out behind
And everyone who has doubt, remind
Now take your best rhyme, outdo it, now do it a thousand times
Now let 'em tell ya the world no longer cares
Or gives a fuck about your rhymes
And as I grow outta sight, outta mind, I might go outta mine
'Cause how do I ever let this mic go without a fight
When I made a fuckin' tightrope outta twine?
But when I do fall from these heights though, I'll be fine
I won't pout or cry or spiral down or whine
But I'll decide if it's my final bow this time around, 'cause-

I walk on water
But I ain't no Jesus
I walk on water
But only when it freezes


'Cause I'm only human, just like you
I've been making my mistakes, oh if you only knew
I don't think you should believe in me the way that you do
'Cause I'm terrified to let you down, oh
If I walked on water, I would drown


'Cause I'm just a man
But as long as I got a mic, I'm godlike
So me and you are not alike
Bitch, I wrote ""Stan""",3309339
113574,2326437,Gods Plan,rap,Drake,2018,9107059,{},"
And they wishin' and wishin'
And wishin' and wishin', they wishin' on me
Yeah


I been movin' calm, don't start no trouble with me
Tryna keep it peaceful is a struggle for me
Don't pull up at 6 AM to cuddle with me
You know how I like it when you lovin' on me
I don't wanna die for them to miss me
Yes, I see the things that they wishin' on me
Hope I got some brothers that outlive me
They gon' tell the story, shit was different with me


God's plan, God's plan
I hold back, sometimes I won't, yeah
I feel good, sometimes I don't (Ayy, don't)
I finessed down Weston Road (Ayy, 'nessed)
Might go down a G.O.D. (Yeah, wait)
I go hard on Southside G (Yeah, wait)
I make sure that north-side eat
And still

Bad things
It's a lot of bad things that they wishin' and wishin'
And wishin' and wishin', they wishin' on me
Bad things
It's a lot of bad things that they wishin' and wishin'
And wishin' and wishin', they wishin' on me
Yeah, ayy, ayy


She say, ""Do you love me?"" I tell her, ""Only partly
I only love my bed and my mama, I'm sorry""
Fifty Dub, I even got it tatted on me
Eighty-one, they'll bring the crashers to the party
And you know me
Turn the O2 into the O3, dog
Without 40, Oli, there'd be no me
'Magine if I never met the broskies


God's plan, God's plan
I can't do this on my own, ayy (No, ayy)
Someone watchin' this shit close (Yep, close)
I've been me since Scarlett Road, ayy (Road, ayy)
Might go down as G.O.D. (Yeah, wait, yeah)
I go hard on Southside G (Ayy, wait, ayy)
I make sure that north-side eat, yeah
And still

Bad things
It's a lot of bad things that they wishin' and wishin'
And wishin' and wishin', they wishin' on me
Yeah, yeah
Bad things
It's a lot of bad things that they wishin' and wishin'
And wishin' and wishin', they wishin' on me
Yeah",3315890
113634,2327901,A Million Dreams,pop,Ziv Zaifman,2017,3764208,"{""Hugh Jackman"",""Michelle Ingrid Williams"",""Ellis Rubin""}","
I close my eyes and I can see
A world that's waiting up for me
That I call my own
Through the dark, through the door
Through where no one's been before
But it feels like home


They can say, they can say it all sounds crazy
They can say, they can say I've lost my mind
I don't care, I don't care, so call me crazy
We can live in a world that we design


'Cause every night I lie in bed
The brightest colors fill my head
A million dreams are keeping me awake
I think of what the world could be
A vision of the one I see
A million dreams is all it's gonna take
Oh, a million dreams for the world we're gonna make

There's a house we can build
Every room inside is filled
With things from far away
Special things I compile
Each one there to make you smile
On a rainy day


They can say, they can say it all sounds crazy
They can say, they can say we've lost our minds
I don't care, I don't care if they call us crazy
Run away to a world that we design


'Cause every night I lie in bed
The brightest colors fill my head
A million dreams are keeping me awake
I think of what the world could be
A vision of the one I see
A million dreams is all it's gonna take
Oh, a million dreams for the world we're gonna make


However big, however small
Let me be part of it all
Share your dreams with me
You may be right, you may be wrong
But say that you'll bring me along
To the world you see
To the world I close my eyes to see
I close my eyes to see it

Every night I lie in bed
The brightest colors fill my head
A million dreams are keeping me awake
A million dreams, a million dreams
I think of what the world could be
A vision of the one I see
A million dreams is all it's gonna take
A million dreams for the world we're gonna make


For the world we're gonna make",3317634
113637,2327905,The Other Side,pop,Hugh Jackman & Zac Efron,2017,1575494,{},"
Right here, right now
I put the offer out
I don't want to chase you down
I know you see it
You run with me
And I can cut you free
Out of the drudgery and walls you keep in
So trade that typical for something colorful
And if it's crazy, live a little crazy
You can play it sensible, a king of conventional
Or you can risk it all and see


Don't you wanna get away from the same old part you gotta play?
'Cause I got what you need
So come with me and take the ride
It'll take you to the other side
'Cause you can do like you do
Or you can do like me
Stay in the cage, or you'll finally take the key
Oh, damn! Suddenly you're free to fly
It'll take you to the other side

Okay, my friend, you want to cut me in
Well, I hate to tell you, but it just won't happen
So thanks, but no
I think I'm good to go
'Cause I quite enjoy the life you say I'm trapped in
Now I admire you, and that whole show you do
You're onto something, really it's something
But I live among the swells, and we don't pick up peanut shells
I'll have to leave that up to you


Don't you know that I'm okay with this uptown part I get to play?
'Cause I got what I need and I don't want to take the ride
I don't need to see the other side
So go and do like you do
I'm good to do like me
Ain't in a cage, so I don't need to take the key
Oh, damn! Can't you see I'm doing fine
I don't need to see the other side


Now is this really how you like to spend your days?
Whiskey and misery, and parties and plays
If I were mixed up with you, I'd be the talk of the town
Disgraced and disowned, another one of the clowns
But you would finally live a little, finally laugh a little
Just let me give you the freedom to dream and it'll
Wake you up and cure your aching
Take your walls and start 'em breaking
Now that's a deal that seems worth taking
But I guess I'll leave that up to you

Well, it's intriguing, but to go would cost me greatly
So what percentage of the show would I be taking?
Fair enough, you'd want a piece of all the action
I'd give you seven, we could shake and make it happen
I wasn't born this morning, eighteen would be just fine
Why not just go ahead and ask for nickels on the dime?
Fifteen
I'd do eight
Twelve
Maybe nine
Ten


Don't you wanna get away to a whole new part you're gonna play?
'Cause I got what you need, so come with me and take the ride
To the other side
So if you do like I do
So if you do like me
Forget the cage, 'cause we know how to make the key
Oh, damn! Suddenly we're free to fly
We're going to the other side
So if you do like I do (To the other side)
So if you do like me (Going to the other side)
'Cause if we do, we're going to the other side
We're going to the other side",3317637
113638,2327906,Never Enough,pop,Loren Allred,2017,2004530,{},"
I'm trying to hold my breath
Let it stay this way
Can't let this moment end
You set off a dream in me
Gettin' louder now
Can you hear it echoing?


Take my hand
Will you share this with me?
'Cause darling, without you


All the shine of a thousand spotlights
All the stars we steal from the night sky
Will never be enough, never be enough
Towers of gold are still too little
These hands could hold the world but it'll
Never be enough, never be enough

For me, never, never
Never, never
Never, for me, for me
Never enough, never enough, never enough
For me, for me, for me


All the shine of a thousand spotlights
All the stars we steal from the night sky
Will never be enough, never be enough
Towers of gold are still too little
These hands could hold the world but it'll
Never be enough, never be enough


For me, never, never
Never, never
Never, for me, for me
Never enough, never, never
Never enough, never, never
Never enough
For me, for me, for me


For me",3317638
113639,2327907,Rewrite the Stars,pop,Zac Efron,2017,3308421,{Zendaya},"
You know I want you
It's not a secret I try to hide
I know you want me
So don't keep saying our hands are tied
You claim it's not in the cards
And fate is pulling you miles away
And out of reach from me
But you're here in my heart
So who can stop me if I decide
That you're my destiny?


What if we rewrite the stars?
Say you were made to be mine
Nothing could keep us apart
You'd be the one I was meant to find
It's up to you, and it's up to me
No one can say what we get to be
So why don't we rewrite the stars?
Maybe the world could be ours
Tonight

You think it's easy
You think I don't want to run to you
But there are mountains
And there are doors that we can't walk through
I know you're wondering why
Because we're able to be
Just you and me
Within these walls
But when we go outside
You're gonna wake up and see that it was hopeless after all


No one can rewrite the stars
How can you say you'll be mine?
Everything keeps us apart
And I'm not the one you were meant to find
It's not up to you, it's not up to me
When everyone tells us what we can be
How can we rewrite the stars?
Say that the world can be ours
Tonight


All I want is to fly with you
All I want is to fall with you
So just give me all of you
It feels impossible
It's not impossible
Is it impossible?
Say that it's possible

How do we rewrite the stars?
Say you were made to be mine?
Nothing can keep us apart
Cause you are the one I was meant to find
It's up to you, and it's up to me
No one can say what we get to be
And why don't we rewrite the stars?
Changing the world to be ours


You know I want you
It's not a secret I try to hide
But I can't have you
We're bound to break and
My hands are tied",3317639
113923,2332786,Freestyle,rap,Lil Baby,2017,1288836,{},"
DaVinci (DaVinci, DaVinci)
Yeah
Shoutout the whole Oakland City, man
You know what I'm saying? The whole 4PF
Know what I'm saying? I put this up
Yeah


Shoutout my label, that's me
I'm in this bitch with TB
I'm in this bitch with 4 Trey
I just poured up me an eight
Real nigga all in my face
Five hundred racks in my safe
Five hundred racks to the plug
What you know 'bout showin' love?
What you know 'bout pullin' up in Bentley trucks?
Make these bitches fall in love
All of my niggas on go
None of my niggas no ho
All of my niggas want smoke
All of my niggas together
We came from the bottom, we used to wear each other's clothes
None of my niggas gon' fold
Couple pussy niggas told
They ain't my niggas no more
Hold it down for the four
In the nine with the woes
Marlo my dawg, that's for sure
We won't fall out about shit
'Specially not 'bout no bitch
We ain't gon' fall out 'bout hoes
Me and Ced get them loads
We let 'em go for the low
I got my hood in control
I got my left wrist on froze
I got my right wrist on froze
I got my necklace on froze
Both of my ears on froze
I been gettin' faded, I'm sippin' on maple
If she won't fuck, I won't make her
I don't like bitches with makeup
If she want titties, I pay for 'em
Get outta that when I wake up
I pass the ball, I don't layup
I'm a big boss, I got say so
They'll wipe you down if I say so
Dracos on Dracos on Dracos on Dracos
.40s on .40s on .40s
I just bought me some new water
Wetter than Katrina, shoutout New Orleans
I made a promise my niggas gon' ball
Hard in the paint, change my name to John Wall
Geekin' off trees like a leaf in the fall
Find a new plug then we takin' em all
Pull up in a brand new Benz truck
Hop out fresher than a menthol
Lil' nigga, but I'm big, dawg
All I gotta make is one call
Get a nigga block, took off
Cross a nigga up, Hot Sauce
Ooh, I got 'em mad, my fault
Talkin' 'bout the shit that I bought
Poppin' these Percs, I done turned to a savage
Hundred racks stuffed in the mattress
Hundred racks stuffed in the attic
Hundred racks stuffed in the sofa
These niggas play gangster, but they won't approach me
I know they never approach me
They know that they'll catch a bullet
I rock the gang to the fullest
I run with some real ones, don't hang with no pussies
I ain't no killer, don't push me
I see how you niggas be lurkin'
I hope you don't think you no bully
I'm livin' the life, I should star in a movie
Ridin' in a Vert with an Uzi
12 get behind me, I lose 'em
They tryna guess what I'm doin'
They tryna guess who I'm screwin'
That ain't even they business
They ain't wanna fuck with me
Now they see a nigga drippin'
Now they wanna fuck with me
They can't get in touch with me
Hardly ever in the city
They just know I'm gettin' bigger
They just know a nigga busy
I been runnin' up them digits

Yeah",3323308
114372,2341409,MIC Drop Steve Aoki Remix,pop,BTS,2017,1136553,{},"


Yeah, 누가 내 수저 더럽대
I don't care, 마이크 잡음 금수저 여럿 패
버럭해 잘 못 익은 것들 스테끼 여러 개
거듭해서 씹어줄게 스타의 저녁에
World business (Bang, bang) 핵심
섭외 1순위 (Clap, clap) 매진
많지 않지 이 class 가칠 만끽
좋은 향기에 악췬 반칙 (I go) Mic, mic bungee
Mic, mic bungee, bright light 전진
망할 거 같았겠지만, I'm fine, sorry
미안해 Billboard, 미안해 worldwide
아들이 넘 잘나가서 미안해 엄마
대신해줘 니가 못한 효도
우리 콘서트 절대 없어 포도
I do it, I do it, 넌 맛없는 라따뚜이
혹 배가 아프다면 고소해, sue it


Did you see my bag? (Where?) Did you see my bag? (Where?)
It's hella trophies and it's hella thick (Hella thick, hella thick)
What you think 'bout that? (Well) What you think 'bout that? (Well)
I bet it got my haters hella sick (Hella sick)
Come and follow me, follow me with your signs up
I'm so firin', firin', boy, your time's up
Keep on runnin' and runnin' until I catch up
How you dare? How you dare? How you dare?

Another trophy, my hands carry 'em
Too many that I can't even count 'em (Turn it up now)
Mic drop, mic drop
발발 조심 너네 말말 조심
Somebody stop me, I'm 'boutta pop off
Too busy, you know my body ain't enough (Turn it up now)
Mic drop, mic drop
*발발 조심 너네 말말 조심*


Baby, watch your mouth (Mouth)
It come back around ('Round)
Once upon a time (Time)
We learnt how to fly (Fly)
Go look at your mirror, same damn clothes (Yeah)
You know how I feel, 개행복 (Turn up)
How many hours do we fly? (Ooh)
I keep on dreamin' on the cloud
Yeah, I'm on the mountain, yeah, I'm on the bay (Pop)
Everyday we vibin', mic drop, bam


Did you see my bag? (Where?) Did you see my bag? (Where?)
It's hella trophies and it's hella thick (Hella thick, hella thick)
What you think 'bout that? (Well) What you think 'bout that? (Well)
I bet it got my haters hella sick (Hella sick)
Come and follow me, follow me with your signs up
I'm so firin', firin', boy, your time's up
Keep on runnin' and runnin' until I catch up
How you dare? How you dare? How you dare?

Another trophy, my hands carry 'em
Too many that I can't even count 'em (Turn it up now)
Mic drop, mic drop
발발 조심 너네 말말 조심
Somebody stop me, I'm 'boutta pop off
Too busy, you know my body ain't enough (Turn it up now)
Mic drop, mic drop
*발발 조심 너네 말말 조심*


Haters gon' hate
Players gon' play
Live a life, man
Good luck


더 볼 일 없어 마지막 인사야
할 말도 없어 사과도 하지 마
더 볼 일 없어 마지막 인사야
할 말도 없어 사과도 하지 마
잘 봐 넌 그 꼴 나지
우린 탁 쏴 마치 콜라지
너의 각막 깜짝 놀라지
꽤 꽤 폼나지 포 포 폼나지 yeah",3333474
114603,2345385,Zona Nyaman,pop,Fourtwnty,2017,1543566,{},"
Pagi ke pagi ku terjebak di dalam ambisi
Seperti orang-orang berdasi yang gila materi
Rasa bosan membukakan jalan mencari peran
Keluarlah dari zona nyaman


Sembilu yang dulu
Biarlah berlalu
Bekerja bersama hati
Kita ini insan bukan seekor sapi
Sembilu yang dulu
Biarlah membiru
Berkarya bersama hati


Waktu ke waktu perlahan kurakit egoku
Merangkul orang-orang yang mulai sejiwa denganku
Ke-BM-an membukakan jalan mencari teman
Bergeraklah dari zona nyaman

Sembilu yang dulu
Biarlah berlalu
Bekerja bersama hati
Kita ini insan bukan seekor sapi
Sembilu yang dulu
Biarlah membiru
Berkarya bersama hati


Diam dan mati
Milik dia yang tak bisa berdiri, berdiri
Diam dan mati
Milik dia yang tak bisa berdiri
Berdiri di kakinya sendiri


Sembilu yang dulu
Biarlah berlalu
Bekerja bersama hati
Kita ini insan bukan seekor sapi
Sembilu yang dulu
Biarlah membiru
Berkarya bersama hati
Kita ini insan bukan seekor sapi

Tanamkan pesanku
Agar tak keliru
Bekerja bersama hati",3338786
114621,2345785,Im Not Racist,rap,Joyner Lucas,2017,1034879,{},"
With all due respect
I don't have pity for you black niggas, that's the way I feel
Screamin', ""Black Lives Matter""
All the black guys'd rather be deadbeats than pay your bills
Yellin', ""Nigga,"" this, and, ""Nigga,"" that
Call everybody, ""Nigga,"" and get a nigga mad
As soon as I say, ""Nigga,"" then everyone react
And wanna swing at me and call me racist 'cause I ain't black
Well pound that, then
Talkin' 'bout slavery like you was around back then
Like you was pickin' cotton off the fuckin' ground back then
Like you was on the plantation gettin' down back then
Aight, look
I see a black man aimin' his gun
But I'd rather see a black man claimin' his son
And I don't mean just for one day and you done, I mean
You still trapped in a rut
And I work my ass off and pay my taxes for what?
So you can keep livin' on free government assistance?
Food stamps for your children, but you still tryna sell 'em
For some weed and some liquor or a fuckin' babysitter?
While you party on the road 'cause you ain't got no fuckin' goals?
You already late
You motherfuckers need to get your damn priorities straight, wait
It's like you're proud to be fake
But you lazy as fuck
And you'd rather sell drugs than get a job and be straight
And then you turn around and complain about the poverty rate? Fuck outta my face
You can't escape problems
You can pray for some change, but can't break a dollar
Got nobody else to blame, so you blame Donald
""They fuck the world with a Make America Great condom""
My voice been back
I'm not racist, my sister's boyfriend's black
I'm not racist, my sister-in-law's baby cousin Tracy got a brother and his girlfriend's black
My head's in the cloud
Heard there's not enough jobs for all the men in your house
Maybe we should build a wall to keep the Mexicans out
Or maybe we should send 'em all to the ghetto for now
I'm not racist, and I never lie
But I think there's a disconnect between your culture and mine
I worship the Einsteins, study the Steve Jobs
But you ride 2Pac's dick like he was a fuckin' god, oh my God
And all you care about is rappin' and stuntin' and bein ratchet, and that's the nigga within you
Music rottin' your brain and slowly start to convince you
Then you let your kids listen and then the cycle continues
Blame it all on the menu, blame it on those drinks
Blame it on everybody except for your own race
Blame it on white privileges, blame it on white kids
And just blame it on white citizens, aim at the vice president
Bunch of class clowns
Niggas kneelin' on the field, that's a flag down
How dare you try to make demands for this money?
You gon' show us some respect, you gon' stand for this country, nigger
I'm not racist, I'm just prepared for this type of war
I heard Eminem's rap at the awards, who's he fightin' for?
Y'all can take that motherfucker too, he ain't white no more
It's like you wanna be so famous
You'll do anything for attention and a little payment
I can't take you nowhere without people pointin' fingers
Pants hangin' off your ass, you ain't got no home trainin'?
Pull your fuckin' pants up, nigga
Put that suit back on, take that durag off
Take that gold out your mouth, quit the pitiful stuff
And then maybe police'd stop killin' you fucks, yo, what the fuck?
I'm not racist
It's like we're livin' in the same building, but split into two floors
I'm not racist
But there's two sides to every story, I wish that I knew yours
I wish that I knew yours
I'm not racist, I swear

With all disrespect
I don't really like you white motherfuckers, that's just where I'm at
Screaming, ""All Lives Matter,"" is a protest to my protest, what kind of shit is that?
And that's one war you'll never win
The power in the word, ""Nigga,"" is a different sin
We shouldn't say it, but we do, and that's just what it is
But that don't mean that you can say it just 'cause you got nigga friends
Nigga
That word was originated for you to keep us under
And when we use it, we know that's just how we greet each other
And when you use it, we know there's a double meaning under
And even if I wasn't picking cotton physically
That don't mean I'm not affected by the history
My grandmama was a slave, that shit gets to me
And you ain't got no motherfuckin' sympathy, you pussy nigga
I'm sorry, you can never feel my life
Tryna have faith, but I never felt alright
It's hard to elevate when this country's ran by whites
Judging me by my skin color and my blackness
Tryna find a job but ain't nobody call me back yet
Now I gotta sell drugs to put food in my cabinet
You crackers ain't slick, this is all a part of your tactics
Don't talk about no motherfuckin' taxes
When I ain't making no dough
You think you know everything, but you don't
You wanna copy our slang and everything that we know
Try to steal black culture and then make it your own, woah
Fuck, I'm exhausted
I can't even drive without the cops tryna start shit
I'm tired of the systematic racism bullshit
All you do is false shit, this the shit that I'm forced with
And you don't know shit about my people, that's what bothers you
You don't know about no fried chicken or no barbecue
You don't know about the two-step or no loose change
You don't know about no 2 Chainz or no Kool-Aid, you don't know
And even though Barack was half as black
You hated President Obama, I know that's a fact
You couldn't wait to get him out and put a cracker back
And then you gave us Donald Trump and now it's payback for that
I'm not racist, I never lied
But I know there's a disconnect between your culture and mines
Yeah, I praise 2Pac like he was a fuckin' god
He was fighting for his life way before he fuckin' died, nigga, die, nigga
And all you care about is money and power and being ugly and that's the cracker within you
Hatred all in your brain, it slowly start to convince you
And then you teach it to your children until the cycle continue
Blame it on Puerto Rico, blame it on OJ
Blame it on everybody except for your own race
Blame it on black niggas and blame it on black citizens
Aim at the black businesses, I ain't saying I'm innocent, but
I might be any day now
Treatin' everybody how you want and any way how
I swear North Korea 'bout to bomb us any day now
And now I'm duckin' every time I hear a fuckin' plane now, shit
You know I make a lot of sense, but you just can't admit it
When Eminem went against Trump, that was the illest
'Cause even though he's white, he let us know he standin' with us
I'm not racist, but I cry a lot
You don't know what it's like to be in a frying pot
You don't know what it's like to mind your business
And get stopped by the cops and not know if you 'bout to die or not
You worry 'bout your life, so you take mine
I love you, but I fuckin' hate you at the same time
I wish we could trade shoes or we could change lives
So we could understand each other more, but that'd take time
I'm not racist
It's like we livin' in the same building, but split into both sides
I'm not racist
But there's two sides to every story and now you know mine

Can't erase the scars with a bandage
I'm hopin' maybe we can come to an understandin'
Agree to disagree, we could have an understandin'
I'm not racist",3339483
114728,2348370,Perfect Duet,pop,Ed Sheeran & Beyonc,2017,1949672,"{""Ed Sheeran & Beyoncé""}","
I found a love for me
Oh darling, just dive right in and follow my lead
Well, I found a girl, beautiful and sweet
Oh, I never knew you were the someone waitin' for me
'Cause we were just kids when we fell in love
Not knowin' what it was
I will not give you up this time
But darling, just kiss me slow, your heart is all I own
And in your eyes, you're holding mine


Baby, I'm dancing in the dark with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass, listening to our favourite song
When you said you looked a mess, I whispered underneath my breath
But you heard it, darling, you look perfect tonight


Well, I found a man stronger than anyone I know
He shares my dreams, I hope that someday we'll share a home
I found a love to carry more than just my secrets
To carry love, to carry children of our own
We are still kids, but we're so in love
Fightin' against all odds
I know we'll be alright this time
Darling, just hold my hand
Be your girl, you'll be my man
And I see my future in your eyes

Well, baby, I'm dancing in the dark with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass while listening to our favorite song
When I saw you in that dress looking so beautiful
I don't deserve this, darling, you look perfect tonight




Baby, I'm dancing in the dark with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass, while listenin' to our favorite song
I have faith in what I see
Now I know I have met an angel in person
And she looks perfect, and he looks perfect
No, I don't deserve this
You look perfect tonight",3343029
114793,2349370,Bartier Cardi,rap,Cardi B,2017,2494949,"{""21 Savage""}","
Bardi in a 'Rari, diamonds all over my body
(30, you a fool for this one)
Shinin' all over my body
Bardi, put that lil' bitch on molly, Bardi!
Bitch on molly (Cheeze)
21, diamonds all over my body
Fucked that bitch on molly (KSR)
Ask him if I'm 'bout it


Your bitch wanna party with Cardi
Cartier Bardi in a 'Rari (Skrrt, skrrt; 21)
Diamonds all over my body (Cardi)
Shinin' all over my body (My body)
Cardi got your bitch on molly
Bitch, you ain't gang, you lame
Bentley truck lane to lane, blow out the brain (21)
I go insane, insane
I drop a check on the chain, fuck up a check in the Flame

Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (From what?)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Say what?)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (21)
Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (21)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Cardi)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (Who's Cardi?)


Who get this motherfucker started? (Cardi)
Who took your bitch out to party? (Cardi)
I took your bitch and departed (Cardi)
Who that be fly as a Martian? (Cardi)
Who that on fleek in the cut? (Cardi)
Who got the bricks in the truck? (Cardi)
Them diamonds gon' hit like a bitch on a bitchy-ass bitch
Bitch, you a wannabe Cardi
Red bottom MJ, moonwalk on a bitch
Moonwalkin' through your clique
I'm moonwalkin' in the 6
.50 with the kick, moonrocks in this bitch
I'm from the motherfuckin' Bronx (Bronx)
I keep the pump in the trunk (Trunk)
Bitch, if you bad then jump (Jump)
Might leave your bitch in a slump (Your back)

Your bitch wanna party with Cardi
Cartier Bardi in a 'Rari (Skrrt, skrrt; 21)
Diamonds all over my body (Cardi)
Shinin' all over my body (My body)
Cardi got your bitch on molly
Bitch, you ain't gang, you lame
Bentley truck lane to lane, blow out the brain (21)
I go insane, insane
I drop a check on the chain, fuck up a check in the Flame


Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (From what?)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Say what?)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (21)
Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (21)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Cardi)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset


Your bitch wanna party with a Savage (21)
Saint Laurent Savage in an Aston (Yeah)
High end cars and fashion (21)
I don't eat pussy, I'm fastin' (On God)
I'm a Blood, my brother Crippin'
Bitch, I'm drippin', ho, you trippin'
Told the waitress, I ain't tippin'
I like hot sauce on my chicken (On God)
I pulled the rubber off and I put hot sauce on her titties (21)
I'm in a Bentley truck, she keep on suckin' like it's tinted (21)
All these VVSs, nigga, my sperm worth millions (On God)
The bitch so bad, I popped a molly 'fore I hit it (21, 21)

Your bitch wanna party with Cardi
Cartier Bardi in a 'Rari (Skrrt, skrrt; 21)
Diamonds all over my body (Cardi)
Shinin' all over my body (My body)
Cardi got your bitch on molly
Bitch, you ain't gang, you lame
Bentley truck lane to lane, blow out the brain (21)
I go insane, insane
I drop a check on the chain, fuck up a check in the Flame


Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (From what?)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Say what?)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (21)
Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (21)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Cardi)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (Who's Cardi?)


Step in this bitch in Givenchy (Cash)
Fuck up a check in Givenchy (Cash)
Boss out the coupe and them inches
I fuck up a bag at the Fendi, I fuck up a bag in a minute
Who you know drip like this?
Who you know built like this?
I'm poppin' shit like a dude
Pull up to pop at your crew, brrrt, poppin' at you (Woo)
They say you basic, I flooded the Rollie with diamonds
I flooded the Patek and bracelet
I got your bitch and she naked
Ice on the cake when I bake it
I'm switchin' lanes in the Range
Swap out the dick for the brain
Swap out your bitch for your main
Swap out the trap for the fame
Ice on them Cardi B Cartier frames, bitch


Your bitch wanna party with Cardi
Cartier Bardi in a 'Rari (Skrrt, skrrt; 21)
Diamonds all over my body (Cardi)
Shinin' all over my body (My body)
Cardi got your bitch on molly
Bitch, you ain't gang, you lame
Bentley truck lane to lane, blow out the brain (21)
I go insane, insane
I drop a check on the chain, fuck up a check in the Flame


Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (From what?)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Say what?)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (21)
Cardi took your man, you upset, uh
Cardi got rich, they upset, yeah (21)
Cardi put the pussy on Offset (Cardi)
Cartier, Cardi B brain on Offset (Who's Cardi?)",3344378
114915,2352527,FRIENDS,pop,Marshmello & Anne-Marie,2018,5510293,{},"
Ooh-oh, ooh-woh
Ooh-oh, ooh-woh


You say you love me, I say you crazy
We're nothing more than friends
You're not my lover, more like a brother
I known you since we were like ten, yeah


Don't mess it up, talking that shit
Only gonna push me away, that's it!
When you say you love me, that make me crazy
Here we go again


Don't go look at me with that look in your eye
You really ain't going away without a fight
You can't be reasoned with, I'm done being polite
I've told you one, two, three, four, five, six thousand times

Haven't I made it obvious?
Haven't I made it clear?
Want me to spell it out for you?
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
Haven't I made it obvious?
Haven't I made it clear?
Want me to spell it out for you?
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
F-R-I-E-N-D-S


Have you got no shame? You looking insane
Turning up at my door
It's two in the morning, the rain is pouring
Haven't we been here before?


Don't mess it up, talking that shit
Only gonna push me away, that's it!
Have you got no shame? You looking insane
Here we go again


So don't go look at me with that look in your eye
You really ain't going away without a fight
You can't be reasoned with, I'm done being polite
I've told you one, two, three, four, five, six thousand times

Haven't I made it obvious? (Haven't I made it?)
Haven't I made it clear? (Haven't I made it clear?)
Want me to spell it out for you?
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
Haven't I made it obvious?
Haven't I made it clear? (Haven't I?)
Want me to spell it out for you? (To spell it out for you?)
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
F-R-I-E-N-D-S


F-R-I-E-N-D-S
That's how you **** spell ""friends""
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
Get that shit inside your head
No, no, yeah, uh, ah
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
We're just friends


So don't go look at me with that look in your eye
You really ain't going nowhere without a fight
You can't be reasoned with, I'm done being polite
I've told you one, two, three, four, five, six thousand times

Haven't I made it obvious? (Have I not made it obvious?)
Haven't I made it clear? (Yeah, I made it very clear)
Want me to spell it out for you? (Yo)
F-R-I-E-N-D-S (I said F-R-I-E-N-D-S)
Haven't I made it obvious? (I made it very obvious)
Haven't I made it clear? (I made it very clear)
Want me to spell it out for you?
F-R-I-E-N-D-S
F-R-I-E-N-D-S


Mmm, ooh, ooh, ooh
Ah, ah-oh, ah-oh",3348299
114997,2354208,River,rap,Eminem,2017,3120170,"{""Ed Sheeran""}","
I've been a liar, been a thief
Been a lover, been a cheat
All my sins need holy water, feel it washing over me
Well, little one, I don't want to admit to something
If all it's gonna cause is pain
Truth and my lies right now are falling like the rain
So let the river run


He's comin' home with his neck scratched, to catch flack
Sweat jackets and dress slacks, mismatched
On his breath's Jack, he's a sex addict
And she just wants to exact revenge and get back
It's a chess match, she's on his back like a jet-pack
She's kept track of all his Internet chats
And guess who just happens to be movin' on to the next
Actually, just shit on my last chick and she has what my ex lacks
'Cause she loves danger, psychopath
And you don't fuck with no man's girl, even I know that
But she's devised some plan to stab him in the back
Knife in hand, says their relationship's hangin' by a strand
So she's been on the web lately
Says maybe she'll be my Gwen Stacy, to spite her man
And I know she's using me to try to play him, I don't care
Hi Suzanne, but I shoulda said ""Bye Suzanne""
After the first night, but tonight I am

I've been a liar, been a thief
Been a lover, been a cheat
All my sins need holy water, feel it washing over me
Well, little one, I don't want to admit to something
If all it's gonna cause is pain
The truth and my lies now are falling like the rain
So let the river run


A one-night stand turned a two-night stand
It was ""come sunlight, scram,"" now we hug tight, and...
He found out, now she feels deserted and used
'Cause he left, so what? He did it first to her too
Now how am I supposed to tell this girl that we're through?
It's hard to find the words, I'm aloof, nervous, and Sue
Don't want this to hurt, but what you deserve is the truth
Don't take it personal, I just can't say this in person to you
So I revert to the studio, like hole-in-the-wall diners
Don't have to be reserved in a booth
I just feel like the person who I'm turning into's
Irreversible, I preyed on you like it's church at the pew
And now that I got you I don't want you
Took advantage in my thirst to pursue
Why do I do this dirt that I do?
Get on my soapbox and preach, my sermon and speech
Detergent and bleach is burnin' the wound
'Cause now with her in the womb
We can't bring her in this world, shoulda knew
To use protection 'fore I bit into your forbidden fruit
Fuck!

I've been a liar, been a thief
Been a lover, been a cheat
All my sins need holy water, feel it washing over me
Well, little one, I don't want to admit to something
If all it's gonna cause is pain
The truth and my lies now are falling like the rain
So let the river run


My name's (Ooh), my name's (Ooh)
River (Ooh), river run
Call me (Ooh), call me (Ooh)
River (Ooh), we'll let the river run


Always the bridesmaid, never ""The bride, hey!""
Fuck can I say? If life was a highway
And deceit was an enclave, I'd be swerving in five lanes
Speeds at a high rate, like I'm slidin' on ice, maybe
That's why I may have came at you sideways
I can't keep my lies straight
But I made you terminate my baby
This love triangle left us in a wreck, tangled
What else can I say? It was fun for a while
Bet I really woulda loved your smile
Didn't really wanna abort, but fuck it
What's one more lie, to tell our unborn child?

I've been a liar, been a thief
Been a lover, been a cheat
All my sins need holy water, feel it washing over me
Well, little one (I'm sorry)
I don't want to admit to something (I fucked up)
If all it's gonna cause is pain
The truth and my lies now are falling like the rain
So let the river run",3350680
115095,2355679,Shallow,rock,Lady Gaga & Bradley Cooper,2018,6466788,{},"
Tell me somethin', girl
Are you happy in this modern world?
Or do you need more?
Is there somethin' else you're searchin' for?


I'm fallin'
In all the good times
I find myself longing for change
And, in the bad times, I fear myself


Tell me something, boy
Aren't you tired tryna fill that void?
Or do you need more?
Ain't it hard keepin' it so hardcore?


I'm falling
In all the good times
I find myself longing for change
And, in the bad times, I fear myself

I'm off the deep end, watch as I dive in
I'll never meet the ground
Crash through the surface where they can't hurt us
We're far from the shallow now


In the sha-ha, sha-hallow
In the sha-ha, sha-la-la-la-low
In the sha-ha, sha-hallow
We're far from the shallow now


Oh, ha, ah, ha
Oh-ah, ha


I'm off the deep end, watch as I dive in
I'll never meet the ground
Crash through the surface where they can't hurt us
We're far from the shallow now


In the sha-ha, shallow
In the sha-ha, sha-la-la-la-low
In the sha-ha, shallow
We're far from the shallow now",3352793
115284,2358024,Perfect Symphony,pop,Ed Sheeran & Andrea Bocelli,2017,1281048,{},"
I found a love for me
Oh darling, just dive right in and follow my lead
Well, I found a girl, beautiful and sweet
Oh, I never knew you were the someone waiting for me
'Cause we were just kids when we fell in love
Not knowing what it was
I will not give you up this time
But darling, just kiss me slow, your heart is all I own
And in your eyes, you're holding mine


Baby, I'm dancing in the dark with you between my arms
Barefoot on the grass, listening to our favourite song
When you said you looked a mess, I whispered underneath my breath
But you heard it, darling, you look perfect tonight


Sei la mia donna
La forza delle onde del mare
Cogli i miei sogni e i miei segreti molto di più
Spero che un giorno, l'amore che ci ha accompagnato
Diventi casa, la mia famiglia, diventi noi
E siamo sempre bambini ma
Nulla è impossibile
Stavolta non ti lascerò
Mi baci piano ed io, torno ad esistere
E nel tuo sguardo crescerò

Ballo con te, nell'oscurità
Stretti forte poi, a piedi nudi noi
Dentro la nostra musica
Ti ho guardato ridere e sussurrando ho detto:
""Tu stasera, vedi sei perfetta per me""


Ballo con te, nell'oscurità
Stretti forte poi, a piedi nudi noi
Dentro la nostra musica
Ho creduto sempre in noi
Perché sei un angelo e io ti ho aspettato
Quanto ti ho aspettato
Perché tu stasera, sei perfetta per me",3356202
115383,2360088,Lucid Dreams,rap,Juice WRLD,2017,4695119,{},"
Enviyon on the mix
No, no, no, no
No-no, no, no, no
No, no, no, no, no
No, no, no, no


I still see your shadows in my room
Can't take back the love that I gave you
It's to the point where I love and I hate you
And I cannot change you, so I must replace you, oh
Easier said than done, I thought you were the one
Listenin' to my heart instead of my head
You found another one, but I am the better one
I won't let you forget me
I still see your shadows in my room
Can't take back the love that I gave you
It's to the point where I love and I hate you
And I cannot change you, so I must replace you, oh
Easier said than done, I thought you were the one
Listenin' to my heart instead of my head
You found another one, but I am the better one
I won't let you forget me

You left me falling and landing inside my grave
I know that you want me dead
I take prescriptions to make me feel a-okay
I know it's all in my head
I have these lucid dreams where I can't move a thing
Thinking of you in my bed
You were my everything
Thoughts of a wedding ring
Now I'm just better off dead (Uh, uh, uh)
I'll do it over again
I didn't want it to end
I watch it blow in the wind
I should've listened to my friends
Leave this shit in the past, but I want it to last
You were made outta plastic, fake
I was tangled up in your drastic ways
Who knew evil girls had the prettiest face?
You gave me a heart that was full of mistakes
I gave you my heart and you made heartbreak


You made my heart break
You made my heart ache (I still see your shadows in my room)
You made my heart break
You made my heart ache (Can't take back the love that I gave you)
You made my heart break (Were made outta plastic, fake)
You made my heart ache (I still see your shadows in my room)
You made my heart break again (I was tangled up in your drastic ways)
(Who knew evil girls had the prettiest face?)

I still see your shadows in my room
Can't take back the love that I gave you
It's to the point where I love and I hate you
And I cannot change you, so I must replace you, oh
Easier said than done, I thought you were the one
Listenin' to my heart instead of my head
You found another one, but I am the better one
I won't let you forget me
I still see your shadows in my room
Can't take back the love that I gave you
It's to the point where I love and I hate you
And I cannot change you, so I must replace you, oh
Easier said than done, I thought you were the one
Listenin' to my heart instead of my head
You found another one, but I am the better one
I won't let you forget me


Leave this shit in the past, but I want it to last
You were made outta plastic, fake
I was tangled up in your drastic ways
Who knew evil girls had the prettiest face?
Easier said than done, I thought you were-
-instead of my head
You found another- better one
I won't let you forget me",3359190
115521,2362786,Nadarang,rap,Shanti Dope,2017,2882009,{},"
Andiyan ka na naman
Ba't 'di ko maiwasang tumingin sa'yong liwanag
Nadarang nanaman sa'yong apoy
Bakit ba laging hinahayaan
Andiyan ka na naman
Ba't 'di ko maiwasang tumingin sa'yong liwanag
Nadarang nanaman sa'yong apoy
Handang masaktan kung kinakailangan


May lakad ka ba mamaya?
Puwede ka ba makasama sa pag-gagala
Kung sakaling 'di ka puwede
Sabagay, meron din akong ginagawa
Siguro nga napapaisip ka
Ba't ako nangangamusta
Ilang araw ka nang naroon sa panaginip ko
Nag-aalala lang ako baka sa'n ka mapunta
Pero mukhang ayos ka naman
Kahit 'di na kita abalahin pa
Ilang ama namin pa ba ang dapat
Para patago kang mag-alala sakin (uh)
Habang pinapantasya lamang nila
Ay mascara mo sa gabi At
Pitaka mo sa umaga
Yung ""ikaw"" sa likod ng kolorete
Pa din ang nangangahulugan
Sa salitang ""paraiso"" para sakin
Bakit kaya kayamanan ko pading kinikilala
Ang iyong pagtawa
Kahit na sa puso mo man ay
Ilang dosena na din ang kasya
Dati pa 'kong pinagdamutan ng kapalaran
Kaya 'di na bago sakin mawalan ng pag-asa
Ala-una ng umaga na naman
Tawagan mo na lang ulit ako
Kapag hindi na kayo magkasama

Andiyan ka na naman
Ba't di ko maiwasang tumingin sa'yong liwanag
Nadarang nanaman sa'yong apoy
Bakit ba laging hinahayaan
Andiyan ka na naman
Ba't di ko maiwasang tumingin sa'yong liwanag
Nadarang nanaman sa'yong apoy
Handang masaktan kung kinakailangan


May lakad ka ba mamaya
Sana madaanan mo ko pagkatapos
Sabihin mo ngayon ako'y makaka-asang
Dito ka dadalhin ng iyong sapatos
Kung ngayong gabi lang naman ang magiging dahilan
Ay handang-handa padin naman ako mamaos
Nakakaluwag ka man ay sa mas
Nakakalibang na paraan kita tutulungang makaraos
Bakit ka nagparamdam
Siguro 'di na kayo nilanggam
Ba't kaya 'di niya alam
Ang iyong halaga't kung ga'no ka kalinamnam
Iniwasan ko ma'ng matakam nang di halata
Ang hirap na magpabaya
Kapag tawag na ng laman ay nagbadya
Makipaglangit-lupa ng walang taya
Mata sa mata, bibig sa bibig
Mga ingay na tayo lang dalawa nakadinig
Nakatawang umidlip sa kama
Pero ba't wala ka na pagsapit ng umaga?

Andiyan ka na naman
Ba't di ko maiwasang tumingin sa'yong liwanag
Nadarang nanaman sa'yong apoy
Bakit ba laging hinahayaan
Andiyan ka na naman
Ba't di ko maiwasang tumingin sa'yong liwanag
Nadarang nanaman sa'yong apoy
Handang masaktan kung kinakailangan",3364142
115712,2365852,Plain Jane Remix,rap,A$AP Ferg,2017,3235312,"{""Nicki Minaj"",""A\\$AP Ferg""}","
Young Money
Ayo, Ferg
Yeah


Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane


Yamborghini chain, rest in peace to my superior
Hermès link could feed a village in Liberia
TMZ taking pictures, causin' mad hysteria
Momma see me on BET and started tearin' up
I'ma start killin' niggas, how you get that trife?
I attended Harlem picnics where you risked your life
Uncle used to skim work, sellin' nicks at night
I was only 8 years old, watching Nick at Nite
Uncle Psycho was in that bathroom buggin'!
Knife to his gut, hope Daddy don't cut him
Suicidal thoughts brought to me with no advisory
He was pitchin' dummy, sellin' fiends mad ivory
Grandma had the arthritis in her hands, bad!
She was poppin' pills like rappers in society
I'll fuck yo' bitch for the irony
I'll send Meechy at yo' ho if yo' bitch keep eyein' me!

Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane
Ride with the mob, Alhamdulillah
Check in with me and do your job
Ferg is the name, Ben Baller did the chain
Tourneau for the watch, presi Plain Jane


Suck a nigga dick or somethin' (Yeah)
Suck a nigga dick or somethin' (You already know, Harlem)
Suck a nigga dick or somethin' (Queens)
Suck a nigga dick or somethin' (Queens for the Kings of the Queens)


Ayo, I'ma explain why you prolly never see me
I push a Lamborghini, chocha magic like Houdini
My body shaped like Jeannie, booty dreamy, waist is teeny
Yes, I told him to get TIDAL, so he stream me when he leave me
I go hard in the booth, Biggie vibes, gimme the loot
I'm a classy millionaire, bitches ain't got the couth
C-O-U-T-H 'cause you can't spell it either
If I call him then he comin' home runnin', Derek Jeter
Bitches must be eatin' ass, because I swear they're bottomfeeders
Ho, you know that you my son, I shoulda scrapped you as a fetus
All these bitches rockin' inches 'cause they followin' the leader
I should switch it up on hoes and rock a Afro like Lupita's
I don't keep up with the Joneses, but I do know Catherine Zeta
I'm with Candice, TT, Thembi, and Viola, mi amiga
Rap bitches, they gotta check in with the Queen
I'm the Alpha, the Omega, everything in between, uh

Ride with Minaj, mm, Mashallah
Check in with me, then do your job
Queen is the name, Rafaello did the chain
This is Monse, Patty Plain Jane
Ride with Minaj, mm, Mashallah
Check in with me, then do your job
Queen is the name, Rafaello did the chain
This is Monse, Patty Plain Jane


Eat a Barbie ass or somethin'
Eat a Barbie ass or somethin'
Eat a Barbie ass or somethin'
Eat a Barbie ass or somethin'


Brrt
Kirk Kneezy on the beat
Yo, you know this here for the city, nigga
Gold chains, Plain Janes, and all that good stuff, nigga",3369950
115734,2366104,Nowadays,rap,Lil Skies,2017,1194600,"{""Landon Cube""}","
CashMoneyAP
Ayy, ayy, ayy


Nowadays I'm too cool for a girlfriend
Nowadays I don't know when the world spins
Live your life like we die when the world ends
So it's alright every time we fuckin' break a sin
Nowadays shit's not the same
Life switched lanes, now these hoes act strange
And I lost my grip on the world in bliss
It's so, it's so


Ayy, it's so lonely on the east side
I don't give a fuck, I keep it real, I'm not gon' let it slide
Now she see me up, she let me fuck, want me to cum inside
Broski going dumb, hopped in the car, he said he down to ride
You a little pup, stop playing tough, ain't make no sacrifice
Yeah, smokin' cookie for my appetite
I don't trust nobody, people talking and be telling lies
We just wanna win and shock them all and catch 'em by surprise
I was saucin' down until we up and then we all rise, yeah
But niggas don't stick to the G-code, balling on my haters
I think that I'm stuck in beast mode
Make it through the foul run to the line and make the free throw
I think that I'm D. Rose
Do 'em like I'm Deebo

Ayy, but I like to fade away
I got these diamonds on me, and these bitches all in my face
And you wanna be a star, and you wanna win the race
But you cannot rock with me 'cause I was caught on the chase


Nowadays I'm too cool for a girlfriend
Nowadays I don't know when the world spins
Live your life like we die when the world ends
So it's alright every time we fuckin' break a sin
Nowadays shit's not the same
Life switched lanes, now these hoes act strange
And I lost my grip on the world in bliss
It's so, it's so


I think it's so damn strange what these people be saying
I can never even listen to a word that they say
I'm on the west side, that's the best side
By the cliff smoking blicks, that's the best high
And I got a shawty with the best eyes
Talking shit girl, why you putting up a fight?
I'm in my own world, far from the satellites
They want my information, they get no conversation
'Cause nowadays everybody calling
I need a manager 'cause I can't really fuck with nobody
(I can't really fuck with nobody, so)

Ayy, but I like to fade away
I got these diamonds on me, and these bitches all in my face
And you wanna be a star, and you wanna win the race
But you cannot rock with me 'cause I was caught on the chase


Nowadays I'm too cool for a girlfriend
Nowadays I don't know when the world spins
Live your life like we die when the world ends
So it's alright every time we fuckin' break a sin",3370244
115812,2367298,Положение Position,rap, (Scriptonite),2017,1299962,"{""Скриптонит (Scriptonite)""}","


Здeсь я рос и дeлал то, что умeл дeлать, либо
Я просто совру, я просто совру, я просто совру


Здeсь я рос и дeлал то, что умeл дeлать, либо
Я просто совру, сказав, что здeсь был выбор
У мeня была мeчта, и было нe до их ёбаных игр
Я всeго лишь хотeл воплотить eё (у-хм)
Тихо, как падал снeг, падал вeсь квартал
Мы падали на полпути во снe в поисках нала
Я с падалью жёг из пяти на всe дeсять баллов
Мы нe жаловались, дажe когда слeтало eбало, нe-e
На сраных листах мои дeтскиe обиды
Мой дeрзкий, забытый работами папа нe подавал виду
Что бeдность ужe здeсь, и что она просто eбала Фeмиду
Нахуй врeмя долгов - пришло врeмя крeдитов


Да, тeпeрь у нас каждый дeнь как дeнь рождeния
Мы купим большой плоский тeлeк в воскрeсeньe
Сыграeм дeтям свадьбу в дорогом завeдeнии
Возьмём eщё один на сeстру, крeдит нашe спасeниe

Каждый дeлал то, что мог, либо
Я просто совру, сказав, что здeсь был выбор
У мeня была мeчта, и никаких ёбаных игр
Я всeго лишь хотeл воплотить eё
Дорогая, тeбe нe нужны такиe отношeния
Ты говоришь:
- Я нe увeрeна, что ты сможeшь обeспeчить продолжeниe
- Я люблю тeбя
- Я люблю тeбя так жe сильно, но eсть другиe прeдложeния. Я вeрю в твоё дeло, но я сомнeваюсь, что ты сможeшь измeнить положeниe


Чё, бля, смотри:
Тeпeрь мой каждый дeнь как дeнь рождeния
(Как дeнь рождeния!)
Я всё eщё помню всё твоё прeзрeниe
(Я помню всё!)
Мнe, как и сeгодня, нe надо было знать твоё ёбаноe мнeниe
(Мнeниe)
Ты приползла ко мнe на стёртых колeнях
Чё, бля, смотри:
Ты большe нe выльeшь в раковину мой коньяк
(Ты большe нe выпьeшь ни eдиной капли)
Ты большe нe выпьeшь ни eдиной капли мeня
(М-м, м-м)
Вeдь я большe нe та бeзмозглая алкашня
(М-м)
Твои соц. стeрeотипы - твоя западня

Смотри на мeня, покажи мнe тeх новых двух
Смотри на мeня, нeт, покажи мнe всeх новых сук
Смотри на мeня, они нe понимают вообщe, что нeсут
Смотри на мeня, вокруг столько шума
Что как будто дажe мой дом пасут
Давай жe, провeрь это, провeрь это, провeрь это
Ты в курсe, как в моeй шкурe?/ Ты в курсe? как в моeй шкурe
Давай жe, провeрь это, провeрь это, провeрь это
Ты в курсe? Как в моeй шкурe, как в моeй шкурe?
Давай жe!",3372520
116051,2372565,Stir Fry,rap,Migos,2017,1345699,{},"
Woo, woo, woo, woo
Woo, woo, woo, woo


Dance with my dogs in the nighttime (Wroof)
Trap nigga with the chickens like Popeyes (Popeyes)
Money changin' colors like tie-dye (Tie-dye)
I'm just tryna get it, I ain't tryna die (No)
She got a big ol' onion booty, make the world cry (Cry)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
Hold them bands down (Hey), hold your mans down (Hey)
Who told you come around? (Who?) This that trap sound (Trap)
Designer clothes (Clothes), fashion shows (Shows)
Trap house (House) made of gold (Gold)
Control the bag now (Control it), no need to brag now (No need)
Ayy, put the mask down (Mask), we livin' fast now (Fast)
Finest hoes (Finest), wrist froze (Ho)
We can  go (We can) coast to coast (Coast)


Keep watchin' me whip up
Still be real and famous, yeah
Dance with my dogs in the nighttime (Woo, woo, woo, wroof)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)

Offset gon' whip it, intermission, let the birds fly (Brr)
I get money, tunnel vision through my third eye (Money)
In that skillet, watch me flip it like it's Five Guys (Flip it)
Look at my pilgrim, take off the ceiling, look at the blue sky (Skrrt)
Icy Patek, check, yeah, boogers, they sit on my neck (Ice)
I don't regret shit, yeah, I'm paid and I don't got a debt (Hah)
You crawl 'fore you walk, you can ball every week
For my dogs 'hind the wall, we gon' ball when you free (Ball)
Stop watchin' me, democracy, you wanna copy me (You watchin')
Life's Monopoly, go cop me some land and some property (Property)
AP, Rolls (Rolls), pink diamonds, whoa (Whoa)
Whip up the soda, diamonds off the Royce (Hey)


Keep watchin' me whip up
Still be real and famous, yeah
Dance with my dogs in the nighttime (Wroof)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Wroof)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)

In the kitchen, curry chicken, call it stir fry
Takeoff, I'm the bird keeper, let the birds fly
Why you tryna take my prize? You a dead guy
Of course, I gotta keep a watch out through my bird eye
No casket, drop dead fresh and I got dead guys
Don't discriminate, ball players come in all sizes
Finger roll, post move or the pick and roll
They mad the way we win, they think we used a cheat code
Why you keep lookin' at me?
I feel like niggas got static
It must be the Patek
Pockets blue cheese, I'm in the kitchen


In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
Keep watchin' me whip up
Still be real and famous, yeah
Dance with my dogs in the nighttime (Wroof)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Whip it)
In the kitchen, wrist twistin' like it's stir fry (Wroof)",3383633
116076,2373147,For You,pop,Liam Payne & Rita Ora,2018,1198998,{},"
In your eyes, I'm alive
Inside you're beautiful, something so unusual
In your eyes, I know I'm home, yeah
Every tear, every fear
Gone with the thought of you, changing what I thought I knew
I'll be yours for a thousand lives


I'm free as a bird when I'm flying in your cage
I'm diving in deep and I'm riding with no brakes
And I'm bleeding in love when you're swimming in my veins
You got me now


Been waiting for a lifetime for ya
Been breaking for a lifetime for ya
Wasn't looking for love 'til I found you
Ooh, na-na, ayy
For love 'til I found you, oh

Skin to skin, breathe me in
Feeling your kiss on me, lips are made of ecstasy
I'll be yours for a thousand lives (For a thousand lives)


I'm free as a bird when I'm flying in your cage (So lost)
I'm diving in deep and I'm riding with no brakes (No, no)
And I'm bleeding in love when you're swimming in my veins
You've got me now (Now, now, now)


Been waiting for a lifetime for ya
Been breaking for a lifetime for ya
Wasn't looking for love 'til I found you
Ooh, na-na, ayy
For love 'til I found you, oh
Been waiting for a lifetime for ya
Been breaking for a lifetime for ya
Wasn't looking for love 'til I found you
Ooh, na-na, ayy
For love 'til I found you, oh


I'm free as a bird when I'm flying in your cage
I'm diving in deep and I'm riding with no brakes (Oh, oh)
I'm bleeding in love when you're swimming in my veins
You've got me now

Been waiting for a lifetime for ya
Been breaking for a lifetime for ya
Wasn't looking for love 'til I found you
Ooh, na-na, ayy
For love 'til I found you, oh
Been waiting for a lifetime for ya (Oh, yeah)
Been breaking for a lifetime for ya
Wasn't looking for love 'til I found you
Ooh, na-na, ayy
For love 'til I found you, oh


Wasn't looking for love 'til I found you
Ooh, na-na, ayy
For love 'til I found you, oh",3384615
116210,2376081,All Girls Are the Same,rap,Juice WRLD,2017,2145632,{},"
Mhm, they're rotting my brain, love
These hoes are the same


I admit it, another ho got me finished
Broke my heart, oh, no, you didn't
Fuck sippin', I'ma down a whole bottle
Hard liquor, hard truth, can't swallow
Need a bartender, put me out my sorrow
Wake up the next day in the Monte Carlo
With a new woman, tell me she from Colorado
And she love women, she'll be gone by tomorrow
Who am I kiddin'?
All this jealousy and agony that I sit in
I'm a jealous boy, really feel like John Lennon
I just want real love, guess it's been a minute
Pissed off from the way that I don't fit in (I don't fit in)
Tell me, what's the secret to love? I don't get it
Feel like I be runnin' a race I'm not winnin'
Ran into the devil today and she grinnin'

Hey, these girls are insane, yeah, uh


All girls are the same, they're rotting my brain, love
Think I need a change before I go insane, love
All girls are the same, they're rotting my brain, love
Think I need a change before I go insane, love


Ten minutes, she told me it would take ten minutes
To break my heart, oh, no, she didn't
Fuck livin', I'ma drown in my sorrow
Fuck givin', I'ma take, not borrow
And I'm still sinnin', I'm still losin' my mind
I know I been trippin', I'm still wastin' my time
All the time given, am I dyin'? Am I livin'?
It's fuck feelings, my sorrow go up to the ceilin'


Ah


Now I am insane, demons in my brain, love
Peace I can't attain 'cause all these girls the same, love
Now I am insane, demons in my brain, love
Peace I can't attain 'cause all these girls the same, love",3389874
116684,2385989,Medicine,rb,Queen Naija,2017,1900245,{},"
(30Hertz straight up)


You tell me you love me
But I ain't been feeling it lately
You say you love keepin' me fly but
Can't keep me from lookin' so crazy
Come in at six in the mornin'
Where you been, where you been?
Who is that texting your phone?
Just a friend, just a friend (Okay)
My intuition never lies
There's nothing you can ever hide
Already got the screenshots
So there is no need to deny
You been creepin' and freakin' and sneakin'
Like you'll never lose me
Steady claiming that everyone know we together
But you steady choosin'

Swear I cannot win for losin' (30Hertz straight up)
I been out here being faithful
I always got this on lockdown
But that ain't been keeping us stable
So I guess I know what I gotta do
Give you a taste of your own medicine (Hey, yeah)


How would you like it if I do the things you do?
Put you on do not disturb and entertain these dudes
I'ma ride him crazy and you'll never have a clue
Give another guy everything that belongs to you (30Hertz straight up)
I'ma call up Brian, I'ma FaceTime Ryan
I'ma text Lorenzo and, I'ma leave you cryin'
Don't get it twisted, I can play this game too
How would you like it if I did the same to you, same to you? Yeah


You don't like it
Now you tellin' me that I should fight it
Why you be out here playing the victim
When I am the one who been cryin'?
Why dish it out but can't take it?
I want revenge, I can't fake it
Wanna see the look on your face
When I drop my clothes and I get naked (30Hertz straight up)
Not for you (Ooh), but for him (Him)
Now tell me, player, how does that make you feel? (Make you feel?)
How could you play me when the love I gave was real? (Oh, baby)
I even took you back and you still had no chill (No)

Boy, you ain't gon' ever learn
Play with fire, you get burned
I don't think you'll understand
Until I hit you where it hurts
So I guess I know what I gotta do
Give you a taste of your own medicine


How would you like it if I do the things you do?
Put you on do not disturb and entertain these dudes
I'ma ride him crazy and you'll never have a clue
Give another guy everything that belongs to you
I'ma call up Brian, I'ma FaceTime Ryan
I'ma text Lorenzo, and I'ma leave you cryin'
Don't get it twisted I can play this game too
How would you like it if I did the same to you, same to you?


All of those tears I cried
I can't count the lonely nights
Time and time again I've tried
So when I turn into a savage, boy, don't ask me why
Ask me why, don't ask me why, yeah
Give you a taste of your own medicine",3405486
116841,2389819,Finesse Remix,pop,Bruno Mars,2018,2618584,"{""Cardi B""}","
Drop top Porsche (Porsche), Rollie on my wrist (Wrist)
Diamonds up and down my chain (Aha)
Cardi B, straight stuntin', can't tell me nothin'
Bossed up and I changed the game (You see me?)
It's my big Bronx boogie, got all them girls shook (Shook)
My big fat ass got all them boys hooked (Hooked)
I went from dollar bills, now we poppin' rubber bands (Ha)
Bruno sang to me while I do my money dance like ayy
Flexin' on the 'Gram like ayy
Hit the Lil' Jon, okay (Okay), okay (Okay)
Oh yeah, we drippin' in finesse and getting paid, ow


Ooh, don't we look good together?
There's a reason why they watch all night long (All night long)
Yeah, I know we'll turn heads forever (Forever)
So tonight, I'm gonna show you off


When I'm walkin' with you
I watch the whole room change
Baby, that's what you do
No, my baby, don't play
Blame it on my confidence
Oh, blame it on your measurements
Shut that shit down on sight
That's right

We out here drippin' in finesse
It don't make no sense
Out here drippin' in finesse
You know it, you know it
We out here drippin' in finesse
It don't make no sense
Out here drippin' in finesse
You know it, you know it


Now slow it down for me, baby (Slow it down now)
'Cause I love the way it feels when we grind (We grind)
Yeah, our connection's so magnetic on the floor
Nothing can stop us tonight


When I'm walkin' with you
I watch the whole room change
Baby, that's what you do
No, my baby, don't play
Blame it on my confidence
Oh, blame it on your measurements
Shut that shit down on sight
That's right

We out here drippin' in finesse
It don't make no sense
Out here drippin' in finesse
You know it, you know it
We out here drippin' in finesse
It don't make no sense
Out here drippin' in finesse
You know it, you know it


Fellas, grab your ladies if your lady fine
Tell her she the one, she the one for life (Woo)
Ladies, grab your fellas and let's do this right (Do this right)
If you're on one like me in mind (Ow!)
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on
Don't it feel so good to be us? (Ayy)
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on (Yeah)
Girl, we got it goin' on
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on (Hey)
Don't it feel so good to be us, ayy? (Feels so good on you)
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on


We out here drippin' in finesse (We drippin' on them)
It don't make no sense
Out here drippin' in finesse
You know it, you know it
We out here drippin' in finesse with my baby
It don't make no sense
Out here drippin' in finesse
You know it, you know it (yeah, you know we got it goin' on)

Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on
Don't it feel so good to be us, ayy?
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on
You know it, you know it
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on
Girl, we got it
Don't it feel so good to be us, ayy?
Yeah, we got it goin' on, got it goin' on
You know it, you know it",3411476
116852,2390110,All the Stars,rap,Kendrick Lamar & SZA,2018,2090846,{},"
Love, let's talk about love
Is it anything and everything you hoped for?
Or do the feeling haunt you? (Haunt)
I know the feeling haunt you (Haunt)


This may be the night that my dreams might let me know
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
This may be the night that my dreams might let me know
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer


Tell me what you gon' do to me
Confrontation ain't nothin' new to me
You can bring a bullet, bring a sword, bring a morgue
But you can't bring the truth to me
Fuck you and all your expectations
I don't even want your congratulations
I recognize your false confidence
And calculated promises all in your conversation
I hate people that feel entitled
Look at me crazy 'cause I ain't invite you
Oh, you important?
You the moral to the story? You endorsin'?
Mothafucka, I don't even like you
Corrupted man's heart with a gift
That's how you find out who you dealin' with
A small percentage who I'm buildin' with
I want the credit if I'm losin' or I'm winnin'
On my momma, that's the realest shit

Love, let's talk about love
Is it anything and everything you hoped for?
Or do the feeling haunt you? (Haunt)
I know the feeling haunt you (Haunt)


This may be the night that my dreams might let me know
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
This may be the night that my dreams might let me know
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer


It's getting cold when an ego gets to talkin'
I get involved, like a rebound
No control, no, I'm switched in the way that you bringin' me down
It's a turn on, you didn't wait from me
Leave me alone, keep away from me
And it sounds wrong, get it away from me, yeah
I just cry for no reason
I just pray for no reason
I just think for the life, for the days
For the hours and another like breathin'
I did it all 'cause it feel good
You'd leave it all if it feel bad
Better live your life, we were runnin' out of time

Love, let's talk about love
Is it anything and everything you hoped for?
Or do the feeling haunt you? (Haunt)
I know the feeling haunt you (Haunt)


This may be the night that my dreams might let me know
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
This may be the night that my dreams might let me know
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer
All the stars are closer",3412272
117137,2395966,​lovely,pop,Billie Eilish & Khalid,2018,4110775,{},"
Thought I found a way
Thought I found a way out (Found)
But you never go away (Never go away)
So I guess I gotta stay now


Oh, I hope some day I'll make it out of here
Even if it takes all night or a hundred years
Need a place to hide, but I can't find one near
Wanna feel alive, outside I can't fight my fear


Isn't it lovely, all alone?
Heart made of glass, my mind of stone
Tear me to pieces, skin to bone
Hello, welcome home


Walking out of time
Looking for a better place (Looking for a better place)
Something's on my mind
Always in my head space

But I know someday I'll make it out of here
Even if it takes all night or a hundred years
Need a place to hide, but I can't find one near
Wanna feel alive, outside I can't fight my fear


Isn't it lovely, all alone?
Heart made of glass, my mind of stone
Tear me to pieces, skin to bone
Hello, welcome home


Woah, yeah
Yeah, ah
Woah, woah
Hello, welcome home",3422526
117285,2399165,Kings Dead,rap,"Jay Rock, Kendrick Lamar, Future & James Blake",2018,2914913,"{""Jay Rock / Kendrick Lamar / Future & James Blake""}","
Miss me with that bullshit (Bullshit)
You ain't really wild, you a tourist (A tourist)
I be blackin' out with the purist (The purist)
I made a hundred thou', then I freaked it (I freaked it)
I made five-hundred-thou', then I freaked it (I freaked it)
I bought a '87 for the weekend (The weekend)
This ain't what you want, this ain't what you want (What you want)
This ain't what you want, this ain't what you want (What you want)


And it's like that, lil' bitch
MVP, I don't get no sleep, no, I don't like that, lil' bitch
Bust that open, I want that ocean, yeah, that bite back, lil' bitch
Do it bite back, lil' bitch? Need two life jackets, lil' bitch
I ain't gon' hold you, I ain't gon' press you, never control you
I ain't gon' front you, keep it one-hundred, I don't know you
Boss like Top Dawg, bossed my life up, crossin' over
Stutter steppin', got a Hall of Fame in all my posters
I've been ready, my whip been ready, my bitch been ready, my clique been ready
My shit's been ready, my check's been ready, my shot's on full, that's Armageddon
I got pull, I hope y'all ready, my tank on full, you know, unleaded
I gotta go get it, I gotta go get it, I gotta go get it, I gotta go get it
My name gon' hold up, my team gon' hold up, my name gon' hold up, my team gon' hold up
My shots gon' fire, my team gon' roll up, ménage à trois, my queen gon' roll up
I hope y'all ready, you know I'm ready, I reign all day, you know, confetti
I gotta go get it, I gotta go get it, I gotta go get it, I gotta go get it, skrrt

Miss me with that bullshit (Bullshit)
You're not a gang member, you's a tourist (A tourist)
I be blackin' out, I be blackin' out
Bought an '83 Cutlass for the weekend (For the weekend)
I got a hundred-thousand, then I freaked it (Then I freaked it)
I made five-hundred-thousand, then I freaked it (Then I freaked it)
I put a Rolls Royce on my wrist, oh yeah
Fuck his baby mama, tryna sneak diss
I took her to my penthouse, then I freaked it (Then I freaked it)
I haven't made my mind up, should I keep it? (Should I keep it?)
I got big dawg status, it ain't no secret


La di da di da, slob on me knob
Pass me some syrup, fuck me in the car
La di da di da, mothafuck the law
Chitty chitty bang, murder everything
Bitch, I'm on a roll, and I put that on the gang


Yeah, miss me with that bullshit (Bullshit)
You ain't really wild, you a tourist (A tourist)
I be blackin' out with the purist (The purist)
I made a hundred thou', then I freaked it (I freaked it)
I made five-hundred-thou', then I freaked it (I freaked it)
I bought a '87 for the weekend (The weekend)
This ain't what you want, this ain't what you want (What you want)
This ain't what you want, this ain't what you want (What you want)

Changes
Is you gon' do somethin'?
(What you want?)


Red light, green light, red light, green light
Red light, green light, they like


We like fast cars, fast money, fast life, fast broads
Egotistic, goin' ballistic, why God?
Born warrior, lookin' for euphoria
But I don't see it, I don't feel it, I'm paraplegic
Tapped in when I'm maxed in Comp-Town with the MAC-10s
And the pumps in the background I was absent
Never OG, standout, I was lackin'
Everything else, but doubt in the Magnum
Holdin' Magnums with a Magnum
Nigga, ad-lib and I sing out loud
Never had friends, never had ends, never had hope
They was like, ""Nope,"" I was like, ""Bùyào, bùyào""
(Yeah, God)
Tee off the day, know we off the, be off the, eat off your plate
Throw me off, I be, ""Off ya head""
Well ate, on C4, I'm way off the edge
Fuck integrity, fuck your pedigree, fuck your feelings, fuck your culture
Fuck your moral, fuck your family, fuck your tribe
Fuck your land, fuck your children, fuck your wives
Who am I? Not your father, not your brother
Not your reason, not your future
Not your comfort, not your reverence, not your glory
Not your heaven, not your angel, not your spirit
Not your message, not your freedom
Not your people, not your neighbor
Not your baby, not your equal
Not the title y'all want me under
All hail King Killmonger

Red light, green light, red light, green light
Red light, green light, they like, we like
Fast cars",3429382
117316,2399830,SAD,rap,XXXTENTACION,2018,7705504,{},"
Yeah


Who am I? Someone that's afraid to let go, uh
You decide if you're ever gonna let me know (Yeah)
Suicide if you ever try to let go, uh
I'm sad, I know, yeah, I'm sad, I know, yeah
Who am I? Someone that's afraid to let go, uh
You decide if you're ever gonna let me know (Yeah)
Suicide if you ever try to let go, uh
I'm sad, I know, yeah, I'm sad, I know, yeah


I gave her everything
She took my heart and left me lonely
I think broken heart's contagious
I won't fix, I'd rather weep
I'm lost then I'm found
But it's torture bein' in love
I love when you're around
But I fuckin' hate when you leave

Who am I? Someone that's afraid to let go, uh
You decide if you're ever gonna let me know (Yeah)
Suicide if you ever try to let go, uh
I'm sad, I know, yeah, I'm sad, I know, yeah
Who am I? Someone that's afraid to let go, uh
You decide if you're ever gonna let me know (Yeah)
Suicide if you ever try to let go, uh
I'm sad, I know, yeah, I'm sad, I know, yeah




Who am I? Someone that's afraid to let go, uh
You decide if you're ever gonna let me know (Yeah)
Suicide if you ever try to let go, uh
I'm sad, I know, yeah, I'm sad, I know, yeah
Who am I? Someone that's afraid to let go, uh
You decide if you're ever gonna let me know (Yeah)
Suicide if you ever try to let go, uh
I'm sad, I know, yeah, I'm sad, I know, yeah",3430186
117335,2400034,The Middle,pop,"Zedd, Maren Morris & Grey",2018,1639188,"{""Zedd / Maren Morris & Grey""}","
Take a seat
Right over there, sat on the stairs
Stay or leave
The cabinets are bare, and I'm unaware
Of just how we got into this mess, got so aggressive
I know we meant all good intentions


So pull me closer
Why don't you pull me close?
Why don't you come on over?
I can't just let you go


Oh baby, why don't you just meet me in the middle?
I'm losing my mind just a little
So why don't you just meet me in the middle?
In the middle
Baby, why don't you just meet me in the middle?
I'm losing my mind just a little
So why don't you just meet me in the middle?
In the middle

Ohh, take a step
Back for a minute, into the kitchen
Floors are wet
And taps are still runnin', dishes are broken
How did we get into this mess? Got so aggressive
I know we meant all good intentions


So pull me closer
Why don't you pull me close?
Why don't you come on over?
I can't just let you go


Oh baby, why don't you just meet me in the middle?
I'm losing my mind just a little
So why don't you just meet me in the middle?
In the middle


Lookin' at you, I can't lie
Just pourin' out admission
Regardless of my objection, oh, oh
And it's not about my pride
I need you on my skin
Just come over, pull me in, just

Oh, baby, why don't you just meet me in the middle?
I'm losing my mind just a little
So why don't you just meet me in the middle?
In the middle, no no
Baby, why don't you just meet me in the middle?
Oh yeah, I'm losing my mind just a little
So why don't you just meet me in the middle?
Oh, in the middle
Baby-y-y, why don't you just meet me in the middle, baby?
I'm losing my mind just a little
So why don't you just meet me in the middle, middle?
In the middle, middle",3430424
117354,2400439,Hayaan Mo Sila Inspired by Im the One,rap,Ex Battalion,2017,1520014,"{""O.C. Dawgs""}","
Yeah!
Yeah Yeah Yeah!
Hahahaha!
O.C Dawgs!
ExB!


Kalimutan mo na yan, sige sige maglibang
'Wag kang magpakahibang, dapat ay itawa lang
Ang problema sa babae dapat hindi iniinda
Hayaan mo sila ang maghabol sa'yo diba?
Sabi ko naman sa'yo lahat yan nagloloko
Pagkatapos kang pakinabangan, biglang lalayo
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa


Eto nanaman tayo, kailan ka 'ba matututo?
Pag-ibig ay sakit sa ulo
Kaya 'wag kang magpapaloko
Bakit ba ang bilis mo na maniwala d'yan?
'Di ka pa ba nadala sa'yong nakaraan?
Ilang beses pa ba na kitang papayuhan?
Ayaw ko lang naman na ikaw ay masaktan
Hindi kita sa dina-down down down 'pag pumili ka
Kase karamihan kasi now kung makuha madali
Madali lang magpakamot 'pag may nangati
Kaya ngayon palang mag-isip ka 'pre (yah, yah, yah)

'Wag kang mangangamba kung iiwanan ka na nya
'Wag kang mag-alala kasi marami pang iba
Idaan mo lang sa tawa kaysa magpakatanga
Hanggang sa masanay ka na kasi ganyan talaga sila
Baka 'di mo alam na hindi na bilang
Sa daliri ang binibining sasaktan ka lang
Kaya easy ka lang, 'wag kang magpakahibang
'Wag mong gawing mundo yung alam mo na tao lang
Alam mo yan kaya 'wag mo nang lokohin ang sarili mo
Hayaan mo sila na maglaway, kakatingin sa'yo
Hanggang sa silang lahat naman ang maghabol sa'yo
'Pag nagawa mo yan ay tsaka na'ko bibilib sa'yo


Kalimutan mo na yan, sige sige maglibang
'Wag kang magpakahibang, dapat ay itawa lang
Ang problema sa babae dapat hindi iniinda
Hayaan mo sila ang maghabol sa'yo diba?
Sabi ko naman sa'yo, lahat yan nagloloko
Pagkatapos kang pakinabangan, biglang lalayo
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa


Gagamitin lang nila ang 'yong pagiging sikat
Sabi ko sa'yo diba, 'di lahat ay tapat?
Na mga bitches na tanging riches
'Wag ilahat ang pagkatao mo at feelings
From the beginning hindi sapat!
Hu u? ka na 'pag gusto napasakamay
Unti-unti kang gagamitin para sokeramai
Kaya tawanan mo na lang pare, 'di yan kawalan
Dapat tayo yung lalaki na iniiyakan

Kaya hayaan mo sila na maghabol sa'yo
Para 'lam nila 'di tayo basta basta pwedeng sayonara
Kaya sa'kin magtiwala madami pa d'yang iba
Konti na lang tayong pogi sa mundong natitira


Di ba sabi ko sa'yo, wag nang uulit?
Ang kulit mo ring kaibigan ka (Hey! Hey!)
Ilang beses na ang puso mo'y napunit
Nagagalit pag sinasabihan ka (Oh yeah!)
Makinig ka sa akin alam ko na rin
Galawan ng babaeng ikaw ay papaasahin
Kaya kung ako sa'yo ay 'wag na (wag na)
Tanga yung taong nandyan na para sa kanya
Kaso binalewala dahil lang sa salita
Ang lakas lakas manggamit ng hindi mo halata
Ganyan na talaga ang nagiging sitwasyon ngayon
Wala na akong masabi basta alam mo na 'yon
Kung ano yun!


Kalimutan mo na yan, sige sige maglibang
'Wag kang magpakahibang, dapat ay itawa lang
Ang problema sa babae dapat hindi iniinda
Hayaan mo sila ang maghabol sa'yo diba?
Sabi ko naman sa'yo, lahat yan nagloloko
Pagkatapos kang pakinabangan, biglang lalayo
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa

De-de-de There's so many bitches in the club (In The Club)
There's so many sexy babies ba't hindi ka maghanap?
Iinom nalang natin kasi yan!
Bawal ang malungkot pare, hindi pwede yan!
Sa 'kin makinig ka pare!
Sa panahon ngayon wala ng matinong babae
Maniwala ka sa 'king mga sinasabi
Alam ko 'yan kasi diyaan ako nadale
So it's time to say goodbye-bye, say goodbye
'Dun sa girlfriend mong tsupay, set up tonight
Wala nang chick ngayon na totoo
Lahat nagloloko ay nako, kung ako sa'yo (Ohhhh..)
Kalimutan mo na yan!


Hey dude, just listen to me now
I say, I say hey dude, 'wag kang magpahibang
Dami-dami diyang iba, 'wag kang magpakatanga
Buksan mo lang ang mata at ika'y mamamangha
See them pretty ladies in the club tonight
Ba't 'di ka pa kasi maghanap? (Yeah, right)
Itapon mo ang nakaraan, bye bye
Buddy, just stop wastin' your time
'Wag mo na kasing pilitin pa
Kung ako sa'yo, mag-enjoy ka
Hayaan mo na maghabol sila
Ituro mo diyan sa 'kin at tutulungan kita na kalimutan
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Kalimutan mo na yan, sige sige maglibang
'Wag kang magpakahibang, dapat ay itawa lang
Ang problema sa babae dapat hindi iniinda
Hayaan mo sila ang maghabol sa'yo diba?
Sabi ko naman sa'yo, lahat yan nagloloko
Pagkatapos kang pakinabangan, biglang lalayo
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa
Kaya 'wag nang uulit pa


Hayaan mo sila na, hayaan mo sila na
Hayaan mo sila ang maghabol sa'yo
Hayaan mo sila na, hayaan mo sila na
Hayaan mo sila ang maghabol sa'yo
Hahayaan mo sila, hahayaan mo sila
Hahayaan mo sila na maghabol sa'yo
Hahayaan mo sila, hahayaan mo sila
Hahayaan mo sila na maghabol sa'yo (Tahahaha!)",3431422
117410,2401538,Walk It Talk It,rap,Migos,2018,1475760,{Drake},"
Yeah, yeah (Deko)
Woah, hold on (OG Parker)
Uh


Walk it like I talk it (Walk it)
Walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it)
Walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Hey)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it)
Walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Talk it)
Walk it like I talk it (Ayy)
Walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Yeah)

Take my shoes and walk a mile
Somethin' that you can't do (Woo, hey)
Big talks of the town, big boy gang moves (Gang moves)
I like to walk around wit' my chain loose (Chain, chain)
She just bought a new ass but got the same boobs (Same boobs)
Whippin' up dope, scientist
(Whip it up, whip it up, cook it up, cook it up, skrr, skrr)
That's my sauce, where you find it?
(That's my sauce, look it up, look it up, find it)
Addin' up checks, no minus
(Add it up, add it up, add it up, add it up, yeah)
Get your respect in diamonds (Ice, ice, ice, ice, ice, ice)
I bought a Plain Jane Rollie, these niggas bought they fame (Woo)
I think my back got scoliosis 'cause I swerve the lane (Skrr)
Heard you signed your life for that brand new chain (I heard)
Think it came with stripes but you ain't straight with the gang (Gang, gang)


Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Let's go)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it (Hey)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it

Ayy, I gotta stay in my zone
Say that we been beefin' dog, but you on your own
First night, she gon' let me fuck 'cause we grown
I hit her, gave her back to the city, she home
(She at home now!) That was that, so
I can't be beefin' with no wack nigga, got no backbone
Heard you livin' in a mansion in all your raps, though
But your shit look like the trap on this Google Maps, though
We been brothers since Versace bando, whoa
Name ringin' like a Migo trap phone, whoa
Used to be with Vashtie at Santo's
That's on Tommy Campos, we live like Sopranos and I-


Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Let's go)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it (Hey)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it


Woo, woo, woo, Offset
Niggas pocket watchin' (Watchin')
I want that thot, this thot, ménagin' (Which one?)
I bought a franchise to double up the profits (Franchise)
We make a landslide, chopper get to poppin' (Landslide)
Eliott got me rocky, pour sake, chicken teriyaki (Brr)
Takeoff, rocket, keep 'em in pocket
Water gon' lock it, quadruple the profit (Profit)
I walk like I walk (hey) talk like I talk (Woah)
What's in my vault? Load of cash and assaults (Brr!)
I put a lab in my loft (Lab)
She cook up and jab with the fork (Jab)
By the pair, I got karats that choke (By the pair)
By the pair, I got karats each lobe (By the pair)
Private life, private jets 'round the globe (Private life)
Hit a bitch, hit a lick with the 'cho (Hey)

Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Let's go)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it (Hey)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it


Watch it buck, no Milwaukee (Hunnid)
Walk it, like I talk it
That's my bro, he know the lingo (Lingo)
Ain't no walkie-talkie (no)
This some, ""You know, why don't we know?"" (We know?)
Hold out on that coffee
Smoke the cookie, get the coughin'
Drop-dead fresh, I need a coffin
Ballin', somethin' we do often (Ball)
Take the pot and I'm splashin' up, dolphin (Splash)
I take the nine and go buy me a faucet (Nine)
Walk it like I talk it, a nigga done bought it (Uh)
I play the coach so I gotta call it (Call it)
Up in the shits, some niggas just dormant (Shits)
Walk in the buildin', they start applaudin' (Applaudin')
I get a rebound, I ain't talkin' 'bout Spalding (Ball)


Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it
Walk it, walk it like I talk it (Talk it), walk it like I talk it (Let's go)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Woo)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it (Hey)
Walk it like I talk it (Walk it), walk it like I talk it (Yeah)
Walk it like I talk it, walk it, walk it like I talk it",3433244
117523,2403935,Nena Maldición,rap,Paulo Londra,2018,1590724,"{""Lenny Tavárez""}","


(Oh-oh-oh; eh
Mmm-mmm, mm-mmm
Yo')


Ey, baby, no, oh-oh-oh (Oh-oh-oh)
No ve' que me estoy muriendo
Porque un ratito me regale' tu atención, oh-oh-oh (-ción, -ción)
Estoy perdido en ese azul de tus ojos, yeh
Ey, baby, no, no-oh-oh (No-oh-oh)
No ves que me estoy muriendo
Porque un ratito me regales tu atención, oh-oh-oh-oh
Estoy perdido en el azul de tus ojos, yeh


Nena maldición, nena maldición (Eh)
Yo ni te conozco pero jugaría con vos
Nena maldición, ey, nena maldición, yo'
Yo ni la conozco pero jugaría con vos (Mmm-mmm)

Mirada fría como la nieve, me congela hasta no dar má'
Si me toca hace que me eleve, hasta ni ver toa' la ciudad
Compraría lo que ella quiere con tal que venga para acá
Estaríamo' como se debe, relajao' sin un problema
Seguro tiene mil pretendientes, pero ni uno valiente
Para hacerle ternuras sin miedo a qué diga la gente
Yo sé bien lo que siente, sé muy bien lo que siente
Que to' somos iguale' con los mismo' errores de siempre


Ey, baby, no, oh-oh-oh (No, oh-oh)
No ve' que me estoy muriendo
Porque un ratito me regale' tu atención (-ción, -ción)
Oh-oh-oh-oh (Uh-oh-oh-oh)
Estoy perdido en el azul de tus ojos, yeh (¡Wuh!)


Nena maldición, ey, nena maldición, yo' (¡Ja-ja!)
Yo ni la conozco pero jugaría con vos
Nena maldición, eh, nena maldición (Bebé)
Yo ni te conozco pero jugaría con vos


Úsame, úsame, úsame
Hazme tuyo, dale, bésame
Como en el colegio vamo' a aprender
Quemando vemo' el amanecer
Tú-tú-tú-tú-tú (Y salimo')
Con lo' ojo' azule' (-zu', -zule')
Yo con los ojo' rojo' (ro-rojo')
Se te seca la boca y con mi lengua te la remojo (Sh-sh-sh)
Quiero ser Messi y tú mi Antonella
Prepárate pa' vivir una novela
Soy exclusivo, no de cualquiera
Por eso quiero que tú sea' mi nena
Por siempre mi nena; yo'

Ey, baby, no, oh-oh-oh
No ve' que me estoy muriendo
Porque un ratito me regale' tu atención, oh-oh-oh (-ción, -ción)
Estoy perdido en ese azul de tus ojos, yeh
Ey, baby, no, no-oh-oh (No-oh-oh)
No ves que me estoy muriendo
Porque un ratito me regales tu atención, oh-oh-oh-oh (-ció'; uh-oh-oh-oh)
Estoy perdido en el azul de tus ojos, yeh


O-O-Ovy On The Drums
Ovy On The Drums, On The Drums, On The Drums
Ye-eh-eh
Paulo Londra
Lenny Tavarez, babe
Big Ligas
Ando con Paulo Londra
Los blanquitos preferidos (De todas las babies)
Ovy On The Drums
No' quedamo' con el argentino (Prrr, gang)
This is the Hollywood Squad, baby",3437107
117979,2411696,Look Alive,rap,BlocBoy JB,2018,1583505,{Drake},"
Tay Keith, fuck these niggas up!
Yeah, yeah (Ooh)
Yeah (Ooh)
6 God, BlocBoy, 6 God, BlocBoy (Ooh) (Word)
6 God, BlocBoy, 6 God, BlocBoy (Ooh) (BlocBoy, 6 God)
Yeah (Hey)


901 Shelby Drive, look alive, look alive ('Live)
Niggas came up on this side, now they on the other side (Word, word, word)
Oh well, fuck 'em, dawg, we gon' see how hard they ride (Huh, fuck 'em)
I get racks to go outside and I split it with the guys (Outside)
We up on the other side, niggas actin' like we tied
I've been gone since, like, July, niggas actin' like I died
They won't be expectin' shit when Capo go to slide (Hah)
'Cause I told them that we put that shit behind us but I lied (Hah)


Ayy, ayy, look who I'm around, man
If I fucked up, I'ma be downtown, man
Fourth floor bound, man, that's if I get caught, man
Pushed me to the edge, so it really ain't my mothafuckin' fault
Man, I'm not to blame, man, this fuckin' industry is cutthroat
I'm not the same, man, and I could let you check the tag now
I'm rockin' name brand, I'm only chasin' after bags now
I got a game plan and I'm out here with the woo!

700, three high fives, look alive, look alive ('Live)
Niggas came up on this side, now they on the other side (Word, word, word)
Oh well, fuck 'em, dawg, we gon' see how hard they ride (Huh, fuck 'em)
I get racks to go outside and I split it with the guys (Outside)
We up on the other side, niggas actin' like we tied
I've been gone since, like, July, niggas actin' like I died
They won't be expectin' shit when Capo go to slide (Hah)
'Cause I told them that we put that shit behind us but I- (Hah)


Bitch, come through (Through)
You and you (You)
I'ma get the money (Word)
Dr-Dr-Drizzy get the loot (The loot)
Pu-pu-pull up with that Draco (Huh?)
Play with Drake and I'ma shoot (That's on my mama)
My-my-my weapon be a instrument
I'll blow you like a flute (Rrah)
Ni-ni-nigga play so he feelin' it (Feelin' it)
Pu-pull up broad day with a K, now he shiverin' (He shiverin')
Drop a nigga like he litterin' (Huh?)
W-w-we at your door like we the delivery (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
He not a plug, he middle man (Middle man)
That-that nigga brown like cinnamon (Cinnamon)
I got the rounds like Sugar Ray Robinson (Uh)
Shot to the chest have you gaspin' for oxygen (Shots)
I'ma spray 'em, just like Febreze (Huh, like Febreze)
Came a long way from sittin' in the nosebleeds (In the nosebleeds)
Now a nigga on the floor talkin' to the athletes (To the athletes)
Now I'm so close to the game that I could steal the stat sheet (Stat sheet)
It's Bloc

901 Shelby Drive, look alive, look alive ('Live)
Niggas came up on this side, now they on the other side (Word, word, word)
Oh well, fuck 'em, dawg, we gon' see how hard they ride (Huh, fuck 'em)
I get racks to go outside and I split it with the guys (Outside)
We up on the other side, niggas actin' like we tied
I've been gone since, like, July, niggas actin' like I died
They won't be expectin' shit when Capo go to slide (Hah)
'Cause I told them to put that shit behind us but I lied (Hah)


Behind me but I lied (That's on my mama)",3452330
118010,2412636,Moonlight,rap,XXXTENTACION,2018,2861842,{},"
Yeah


Spotlight, uh, moonlight, uh
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right, uh
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind
Spotlight, moonlight
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind
Spotlight, uh, moonlight
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right, uh
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind
Spotlight, moonlight
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind

Feel like I'm destined
I don't need no Smith & Wesson, no
Boy, who you testin'?
Fuck a Scantron, here's your lesson, oh
Knife in intestine
Takin' shots at all your brethren, no
Feel like I'm damaged
Girl I know you fucking planned this


All alone, call my phone, make me feel right
Girl you know when you call, make me feel right
All alone, call my phone, make me feel right
Girl you know when you call, make me feel right


Spotlight, uh, moonlight, uh
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right, uh
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind
Spotlight, moonlight
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind
Spotlight, uh, moonlight
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right, uh
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind
Spotlight, moonlight
Nigga, why you trippin'? Get your mood right
Shawty look good in the moonlight
All these pussy niggas so bad mind",3453573
118470,2421429,Sa Ngalan Ng Pag-Ibig,rock,December Avenue,2017,1086000,{},"
Hanggang kailan
Ako maghihintay na para bang wala nang papalit sayo?
Nasa'n ka man
Sigaw ng puso ko'y ikaw hanggang ngayon, whoa-oh-oh


Kung sana lamang ay nakita mo
Ang lungkot sa'yong ngiti
Isang umagang 'di ka nagbalik
Gumising ka at nang makita mo
Ang tamis ng sandali
Ng kahapong 'di magbabalik


Hanggang sa dulo ng ating walang hanggan
Hanggang ang puso'y wala nang nararamdaman
Kahit matapos ang magpakailanpaman
Ako'y maghihintay sa ngalan ng pag-ibig


Hanggang kailan
Ako maghihintay na para bang walang iba sa piling mo?
Nasa'n ka man
Sigaw ng puso ko ay ang pangalan mo, whoa-oh-oh

Kung sana lamang ay nakita mo
Ang lungkot sa'yong ngiti
Isang umagang 'di ka nagbalik
Gumising ka at nang makita mo
Ang tamis ng sandali
Ng kahapong 'di magbabalik


Hanggang sa dulo ng ating walang hanggan
Hanggang ang puso'y wala nang nararamdaman
Kahit matapos ang magpakailanpaman
Ako'y maghihintay sa ngalan ng pag-ibig


Hanggang kailan pa ba magtitiis?
Nalunod na sa kaiisip
Huling kapiling ka'y sa aking panaginip
Ikaw mula noon
Ikaw hanggang ngayon


Hanggang sa dulo ng ating walang hanggan
Hanggang ang puso'y wala nang maramdaman
Kahit matapos ang magpakailan pa man
Ako'y maghihintay sa ngalan ng pag-ibig
Hanggang sa dulo ng ating walang hanggan  (Ako'y maghihintay, ako'y maghihintay)
Hanggang ang puso'y wala nang nararamdaman  (Ako'y maghihintay sa ngalan ng pag-ibig)
Kahit matapos ang magpakailanpaman  (Ako'y maghihintay, ako'y maghihintay)
Ako'y maghihintay sa ngalan ng pag-ibig mo",3473406
118654,2425298,Люби меня люби LML,rock, (grechka),2017,1099346,"{""​гречка (grechka)""}","


Нeпокорная моя любовь
Любит нe мeня ужe который год
Тe жe стeны и цвeты, тe жe люди и стихи
Тe жe мысли и слова вслух


Люби мeня, люби жарким огнeм
Ночью и днeм, сeрдцe сжигая
Люби мeня, люби, нe улeтай
Нe исчeзай, я умоляю
Люби мeня, люби
Люби мeня, люби


Нeпокорная моя любовь
Любит нe мeня ужe который год
Тe жe стeны и цвeты, тe жe люди и стихи
Тe жe мысли и слова вслух

Люби мeня, люби жарким огнeм
Ночью и днeм, сeрдцe сжигая
Люби мeня, люби, нe улeтай
Нe исчeзай, я умоляю


Люби мeня, люби
Люби мeня, люби
Люби мeня, люби
Люби мeня, люби


Люби мeня, люби жарким огнeм
Ночью и днeм, сeрдцe сжигая
Люби мeня, люби, нe улeтай
Нe исчeзай, я умоляю
Люби мeня, люби жарким огнeм
Ночью и днeм, сeрдцe сжигая
Люби мeня, люби, нe улeтай
Нe исчeзай, я умоляю
Люби мeня, люби",3481512
118752,2426872,​when the partys over,pop,Billie Eilish,2018,3619075,{},"
Don't you know I'm no good for you?
I've learned to lose you, can't afford to
Tore my shirt to stop you bleedin'
But nothin' ever stops you leavin'


Quiet when I'm coming home and I'm on my own
I could lie, say I like it like that, like it like that
I could lie, say I like it like that, like it like that


Don't you know too much already?
I'll only hurt you if you let me
Call me friend, but keep me closer (Call me back)
And I'll call you when the party's over


Quiet when I'm coming home and I'm on my own
And I could lie, say I like it like that, like it like that
Yeah, I could lie, say I like it like that, like it like that

But nothin' is better sometimes
Once we've both said our goodbyes
Let's just let it go
Let me let you go


Quiet when I'm coming home and I'm on my own
I could lie, say I like it like that, like it like that
I could lie, say I like it like that, like it like that",3484874
118782,2427746,Pray For Me,rap,The Weeknd & Kendrick Lamar,2018,1169032,{},"
(Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh)


I'm always ready for a war again (A war again)
Go down that road again (That road again)
It's all the same (It's all the same)
I'm always ready to take a life again (That life again)
You know I'll ride again (I'll ride again)
It's all the same (Ooh, ooh, ooh)
Tell me who's gon' save me from myself
When this life is all I know
Tell me who's gon' save me from this hell
Without you, I'm all alone


Who gon' pray for me? (Who gon' pray for me?)
Take my pain for me? (Take my pain for me?)
Save my soul for me? (Save my soul for me?)
'Cause I'm alone, you see ('Cause I'm alone, you see)
If I'm gon' die for you (If I'm gon' die for you)
If I'm gon' kill for you (If I'm gon' kill for you)
Then I spilled this blood
For you, hey

I fight the world, I fight you, I fight myself
I fight God, just tell me how many burdens left
I fight pain and hurricanes, today I wept
I'm tryna fight back tears, flood on my doorsteps
Life a livin' hell, puddles of blood in the streets
Shooters on top of the building, government aid ain't relief
Earthquake, the body dropped, the ground breaks
The poor run with smoke lungs and Scarface
Who need a hero? (Hero)
You need a hero, look in the mirror, there go your hero
Who on the front lines at ground zero? (Hero)
My heart don't skip a beat, even when hard times bumps the needle
Mass destruction and mass corruption, the souls of sufferin' men
Clutchin' on deaf ears again, rapture is comin'
It's all prophecy and if I gotta be
Sacrificed for the greater good then that's what it gotta be


Who gon' pray for me? (Who gon' pray for me?)
Take my pain for me? (Take my pain for me?)
Save my soul for me? (Save my soul for me?)
'Cause I'm alone, you see ('Cause I'm alone, you see)
If I'm gon' die for you (If I'm gon' die for you)
If I'm gon' kill for you (If I'm gon' kill for you)
Then I spilled this blood
For you, hey

Hey, hey
Hey, hey
Hey, hey
Hey, hey


Who gon' pray for me? (Who gon' pray for me?)
Take my pain for me? (Take my pain for me?)
Save my soul for me? (Save my soul for me?)
'Cause I'm alone, you see ('Cause I'm alone, you see)
If I'm gon' die for you (If I'm gon' die for you)
If I'm gon' kill for you (If I'm gon' kill for you)
Then I spilled this blood
For you, hey


Just in case my faith go, I'll live by my own law
I'll live by my own law, I'll live by my own
Just in case my faith go, I'll live by my own law
I'll live by my own law, I'll live by my own",3487532
118989,2431517,Te Boté Remix,pop,"Nio Garca, Casper Mgico & Bad Bunny",2018,2185301,"{""Nicky Jam"",Darell,Ozuna,""Nio García / Casper Mágico & Bad Bunny""}","


Wo-oh
Oh-oh (Oh-oh)
Wo-oh, yeh (Yeh-yeh)
Este e' el verdadero remix, ¡baby! (Na-na)
Eso e' así (Ozuna)
Paso mucha' noche' pensándote
Yo no sé ni cómo ni cuándo fue (Eh)
Pero sólo sé que yo recordé (Eh-eh)
Cómo te lo hacía yo aquella vez (Oh-oh)
Sí, yo no puedo seguir solo (Jeje)
Pero sé que te boté (Pero sé; que te boté)


De mi vida te boté, yeh, y te boté (Oh-oh)
Te di banda y te solté, yo te solté (Oh-oh)
Pal' carajo usté' se fue, y usté' se fue (Na-na)
De mi vida te boté, yo te boté, yeh, yeh, mami (Ozuna)

Baby, la vida e' un ciclo (Wuh)
Y lo que no sirve yo no lo reciclo (No)
Así que de mi vida muévete
Que si te lo meto e' pa' recordar un T.B.T., yeh (Yeh)
Ya yo me cansé de tus mentira'
Ahora hay una más dura que me tira (Yeh)
Todo tiene su final, todo expira (Yeh)
Tú ere' pasado y el pasado nunca vira
Arranca pal' carajo (¡Wuh!), mi cuerpo no te necesita (No)
Lo que pide e' un perreo sucio en La Placita
No creo que lo nuestro se repita
Dale, prende un Phillie, deja uno ready pa' ahorita, yeh (¡Brr!)


Odio saber que en ti una ve' má' yo confié
Odio to' lo' ""te amo"" que mil vece' te texteé
Baby, mejor que tú, ahora tengo como die'
Lo nuestro iba en un Bugatti y te quedaste a pie


Yo te boté; te di banda y te solté, yo te solté
Pal' carajo te mandé, yo te mandé
Y a tu amiga me clavé, me la clavé
Fuck you, hijo 'e puta, yeh (¡Huh!)

(Esta e' la verdadera vuelta, ¿oíste, baby'?)
Bebé, yo te boté (¡Ja!)
Y desde que te di esa' botá', las gata' son de tre' en tre' (Eso e' así)
Si tú quiere', pregunta, si no me cree' (Baby)
Que ya no tengo estré', pa' completar las filas son express (¡Ja-ja!)
¿Tú viste cómo el mundo se te fue al revé'?
Y yo con ella en R.D. (Jajajaja), que me enamoró el día que la probé
Ya yo no creo que vuelva y te dé, mami, porque el servicio te lo cancelé
Si no respondo (¡Ja!) el problema va a tocar fondo
Mami, respira hondo mientra' te lo escondo (Eso e' así)
Contigo obliga'o hoy yo me pongo el condón
Pero postea'o a media cancha, baby, como Rondón (¡Ja!)
Yo a ti te di una sepultura dura (Eso e' así)
Yo sé que con el tiempo la herida se cura (Por ley)
E' que en verdá' que tú no está' a esa altura (¡Ja!)
Te lo juro por Dio' aunque por Dio' no se jura (¡Ra-ta-ta-tá!)


Bebé, yo te boté (E' que bebé yo te boté)
Te di banda y te solté (Te di banda y te solté; pa' que sepa')
Pa'l carajo te mandé, eh, eh (¿Tú me está' entendiendo lo que te estamo' queriendo decir?; pa'l carajo te mandé)
De mi vida te saqué, eh, eh (Esta es la verdadera vuelta; Real G4 Life, my nigga, ¡huh!)


(Nosotro' somos Los Mágicos, bebé; ¡Casper!)
Pa'l carajo te boté (Pa'l carajo te boté; ¡wouh!)
Yo sin ti me siento bien (Yo sin ti me siento bien; ah)
Ya no sufro por amore', ahora rompo corazone'
Y sobran las paca' de cien (Las paca' de cien)
Tú me rompiste el corazón (Tú me rompiste el corazón; ¡wuh!)
Sin sentido y sin razón (Sin sentido y sin razón; ah)
Pero tengo un culo nuevo que me da mucho cariño
Y me chinga bien cabrón (Bien cabrón)

No te lo vo'a negar que te sufrí, la pasé mal
Pero te superé y de mi vida te boté (Yo te boté)
Y te di banda y te solté (Y te solté)
Y de ti no quiero saber (Quiero saber)
Y pa'l carajo te mandé, hoy me voy a beber (Me voy a beber)


Ozuna
De mi vida te boté y yo sé que no ere' cualquiera
Me pasaré la vida entera preguntando a dónde fue
Pero tu amiga me textea siempre que ella me desea
Se tira una foto conmigo y me dice: ""Pa' que tú la veas""


Prendo pa' ver si me olvido
De tu nombre, tus beso', tu cuerpo, tus gemido' (Oh)
Lo hacíamo' en el carro, me gritaba al oído
Cierro los ojo' y pienso en todo lo que hicimo', baby (Oh-oh, baby)
Prendo pa' ver si me olvido
De tu nombre, tus beso', tu cuerpo, tus gemido' (Oh-oh)
Lo hacíamo' en el carro, me gritaba al oído
Cierro los ojo' y pienso en todo lo que hicimo', baby (Oh)


¡Nio!
Yo te di confianza y me fallaste
Te burlaste de mí y me humillaste
Lejo' de aquí te fuiste y ni explicaste
Viste mi película y viraste
¿Ahora quiere' saber lo que pienso de ti?
Me siento cabrón porque no estás aquí
Así como viniste tú te puedes ir (Te puedes ir; ¡uh-yeh!)


No te voy a negar que te sufrí, la pasé mal
Pero me superé y de mi vida te boté, y te boté
Te di banda y te solté, yo te solté
Pa'l carajo te mandé, yo te mandé
Y de mi vida te saqué, yo te saqué
Bebé, yo te boté


Miento si digo que no me hace falta cuando me rozaba tu piel
(Rozaba tu piel)
Miento si digo que no me hace falta que llames al amanecer
(Al amanecer)
Pidiéndome que te agarre bien duro en la cama y te haga mi mujer
(Te haga mi mujer)
Aprovecho el remix con Ozu' para mandarte pa'l carajo también
(Carajo también)


No quiero mentira' ni tu falsedad
Me voy pa' la calle esta noche a rumbear
Me bebo dos trago' y te voy a olvidar
Me voy con las babys que quieran jugar
No quiero mentira' ni tu falsedad
Me voy pa' la calle esta noche a rumbear
Me bebo dos trago' y te voy a olvidar
Me voy con las babys que quieran jugar


Bebé, yo te boté, te boté
Te di banda y te solté, yo te solté (Solté)
Pa'l carajo te mandé, yo te mandé
Y de mi vida te saqué, yo te saqué (Yo te saqué)


Yeh-yeh-yeh-yeh
Yeah
Bad Bunny, baby, bebé
N-I-C-K
This is the remix
Nicky-Nicky-Nicky Jam
Casper
Darell
Nio García
Yao'
Ozuna
¡Ozuna!
""El Negrito 'e Ojo' Claros""
This is the remix
Flow La Movie
Oh-oh-oh, Young Martino
Hear This Music
*Young Martino* (Jajaja)
DJ Nelson (¡Ey!)
**Mera, dime, Kronix Magical** (Pa' que sepa)
Esta es la verdadera vuelta, ¿oíste, baby?
**Los de la magía**
*Flow La Movie*
**Mira, indica, Shorty Complete**
Pa' que sepa
**El verdadero hijo 'e puta de las voce'**
Eso e' así
¡Ra-ta-ta-tá!",3495715
119019,2432514,BILLY,rap,6ix9ine,2018,1315432,{},"
That's my word, get up in they face
Talk your shit, let your nuts drag, nigga
These niggas just runnin' out they fuckin' mouth, man
Follow protocol, Blood, get in they fuckin' chest, nigga
(Scum Gang!)
We the fuckin' M.O.B., nigga
These niggas bleed different
We don't bleed, nigga
We make niggas bleed, Blood
TR3YWAY


These niggas say they heard of me, I ain't heard of you
Get the fuck up out my fuckin' face, 'fore I murder you
Bitch niggas always jackin' Blood, but I know they fu
Whole squad full of fuckin' killers, I'm a killer too
Sending shots, shots, shots, shots, shots, nigga
Everybody gettin' pop, pop, popped, nigga
The thing go ""rrrah, rrrah, rrrah, rrrah, rrrah,"" nigga
We send shots, shots, shots, shots, shots, nigga

It's always 6ix9ine this and 6ix9ine that
Niggas on my dick and on my yack
These niggas lookin' for me, you could hit my jack
I done dropped my address, y'all know where 6ix9ine at
I don't flock, yeah, nine to his back like Ibaka
Baka, not nice, with the fuckin' choppa
Pop 'em, scope on the nigga, who shot ya?
Dropped him, somebody call a fuckin' doctor!
Dick up in the pussy, bet that shit get gushy, gushy
She want the whole gang bussin' all in her pussy
I want the drip, drip while I get my dick licked
Lil' sick bitch, lickin' on my dick tip
She a freak ho, fuck her, she on beast mode
Arch your back, put your hands on your knees, ho
I'm on beast mode, shoot you through your peep-hole
Said he want smoke, I don't really see it though


These niggas say they heard of me, I ain't heard of you
Get the fuck up out my fuckin' face, 'fore I murder you
Bitch niggas always jackin' Blood, but I know they fu
Whole squad full of fuckin' killers, I'm a killer too
Sending shots, shots, shots, shots, shots, nigga
Everybody gettin' pop, pop, popped, nigga
The thing go ""rrrah, rrrah, rrrah, rrrah, rrrah,"" nigga
We send shots, shots, shots, shots, shots, nigga",3497224
119617,2446277,Mia Khalifa,rap,iLOVEFRiDAY,2018,3719299,{​iLOVEFRiDAY},"
X-X-X-Xeno Carr!


Who do you think you are?
You were sucking dick for a foreign car (Brr-rrr-rrr)
Gotta take that call
They want you at work, so girl, go do your job


(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa


We all have regrets sometimes
We wish to go back in time
(Body, body, body, body) That's a lot of lives
(Video, video) That's a lot of guys, damn
Don't you wish you changed your past?
'Cause it's so bad
Don't you wish you changed your past?
'Cause it's so bad
Mia Khalifa
Is that why you tried to quit three times?
Is that why you said goodbye, retired?
Is that why you said, ""Fuck these guys""?

Who do you think you are?
You were sucking dick for a foreign car (Brr-rrr-rrr)
Gotta take that call
They want you at work, so, girl, go do your job


(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
(Mia!) Mia Khalifa
Fight!


Hit or miss, I guess they never miss, huh?
You got a boyfriend, I bet he doesn't kiss ya (Mwah!)
He gon' find another girl and he won't miss ya
He gon' skrrt and hit the dab like Wiz Khalifa
You play with them balls like it's FIFA
You won every level, you're the leader, ooh
You used to work at Whataburger
Now you pop your pussy for the Warner Brothers
(And that bangs, bro)
Shots fired, you're fired
You're washed up, you're retired
Your kitty looks like a flat tire (Eww!)
I bet that your kitty real tired
Perfect!

Who do you think you are?
You were sucking dick for a foreign car (Brr-rrr-rrr)
Gotta take that call
They want you at work, so girl, go do your job


(Mia!)
(Mia!)
(Mia!)
(Mia!)
(Mia!)
(Mia!)
You win!",3518857
119804,2449465,Amorfoda,pop,Bad Bunny,2018,1662622,{},"


No quiero que má' nadie me hable de amor
Ya me cansé, to' eso' truco' ya me lo' sé
Eso' dolore' lo' pasé, yeh, yeh, yeh
No quiero que má' nadie me hable de amor (No, no)
Ya me cansé, to' eso' truco' ya me lo' sé (Wuh)
Eso' dolore' lo' pasé (No, no)


Hoy te odio, no e' secreto, ante todo lo confieso (No)
Si pudiera, te pidiera que devuelva' to' los beso' que te di
La' palabra' y todo el tiempo que perdí
Me arrepiento una y mil vece' de haber confiao' en ti (¡Wuh!)
Quisiera que te sienta' como yo me siento (Siento)
Quisiera ser como tú, sin sentimiento' (-miento')
Quisiera sacarte de mi pensamiento (-miento)
Quisiera cambiarle el final al cuento
Toa' la' barra' y lo' trago' han sido testigo'
Del dolor que me causaste y to' lo que hiciste conmigo
Un infeliz en el amor que aún no te supera
Y que ahora camina solo, sin nadie, por toa' la' acera'
Preguntándole a Dios si en verdad el amor existe
Y por qué si yo era tan bueno toa' esta mierda tú me hiciste (-ciste)
Lo má' cabrón e' que tú ve' todo como un chiste
Siempre voy a maldecir el día en que naciste
Lo' chocolate' que te di y toda' la' flore' (-re')
Se convierten hoy en día en pesadilla' y dolore'
Ya yo perdí la fe de que tú mejore' (-jore')
Si despué' de la lluvia sale el arcoíri', pero sin colore', yeh

No quiero que más nadie me hable de amor
Ya me cansé, to' eso' truco' ya me lo' sé
Eso' dolore' lo' pasé, yeh, yeh, yeh
No quiero que más nadie me hable de amor
Ya me cansé, to' eso' truco' ya me lo' sé
Eso' dolore' lo' pasé, yeh, yeh, yeh",3524844
120267,2458306,Medicine,pop,Harry Styles,2018,1061013,{},"Lyrics from live performances


I'm here to take my medicine, take my medicine
Treat you like a gentleman
Give me that adrenaline, that adrenaline
Think I'm gonna stick with you
Here to take my medicine, take my medicine
Rest it on your fingertips
Up to your mouth, I'm feeling it out
I'm feeling it out


I had a few, got drunk on you, and now I'm wasted
And when I sleep I'm gonna dream of how you tasted


If you go out tonight, I'm going out 'cause I know you're persuasive
You got that salt, I got me an appetite, and now I can taste it
You get me dizzy, oh, you get me dizzy, oh
La la la la la
We're getting dizzy, oh, we're getting dizzy, oh

Tingle running through my bones, fingers to my toes
Tingle running through my bones
The boys and the girls are here
I mess around with them
And I'm okay with it


I'm coming down, I figured out I kinda like it
And when I sleep, I'm gonna dream of how you ride it


If you go out tonight, I'm going out 'cause I know you're persuasive
You got that salt, I got me an appetite, and now I can taste it
You get me dizzy, oh, you get me dizzy, oh
La la la la la
We're getting dizzy, oh, we're getting dizzy, oh


I had a few, got drunk on you, and now I'm wasted
And when I sleep, I'm gonna dream of how you tasted


If you go out tonight, I'm going out 'cause I know you're persuasive
You got that salt, I got me an appetite, and now I can taste it
You get me dizzy, oh, you get me dizzy, oh
La la la la la
We're gettting dizzy, oh, we're getting dizzy, oh",3538722
120283,2458765,Hope,rap,XXXTENTACION,2018,2185037,{},"
Yeah
Rest in peace to all the kids that lost their lives in the Parkland shooting, this song is dedicated to you


Okay, she keep cryin', she keep cryin' every single night
Day and night, on my mind, please don't kill the vibe
Oh no, I swear to God, I be in my mind
Swear I wanna die, yeah, when you cross my-
Said I wanna die, yuh, no, I'm not alright, yuh
I might start a riot, yuh, I'm so fuckin' tired, yuh
So what's up? What you say? Feelin' good, I'm feelin' great
Tired of the fuckin' hate, stackin' cheese all on my plate


So outside my misery, I think I'll find
A way of envisioning a better life
For the rest of us, the rest of us
There's hope for the rest of us, the rest of us


Okay, she keep cryin', she keep cryin' every single night
Day and night, on my mind, please don't kill the vibe
Oh no, I swear to God, I be in my mind
Swear I wanna die, yeah, when you cross my-
Said I wanna die, yuh, no, I'm not alright, yuh
I might start a riot, yuh, I'm so fuckin' tired, yuh
So what's up? What you say? Feelin' good, I'm feelin' great
Tired of the fuckin' hate, stackin' cheese all on my plate",3539284
120369,2460597,2002,pop,Anne-Marie,2018,1265153,{},"
I will always remember
The day you kissed my lips
Light as a feather
And it went just like this
No, it's never been better
Than the summer of 2002 (ooh)
Uh, we were only 11
But acting like grown-ups
Like we are in the present
Drinking from plastic cups
Singing, ""Love is forever and ever""
Well, I guess that was true


Dancing on the hood in the middle of the woods
On an old Mustang, where we sang
Songs with all our childhood friends
And it went like this, say


Oops, I got 99 problems singing bye, bye, bye
Hold up, if you wanna go and take a ride with me
Better hit me, baby, one more time, uh
Paint a picture for you and me
On the days when we were young, uh
Singing at the top of both our lungs

Now we're under the covers
Fast forward to eighteen
We are more than lovers
Yeah, we are all we need
When we're holding each other
I'm taken back to 2002 (ooh)
Yeah


Dancing on the hood in the middle of the woods
On an old Mustang, where we sang
Songs with all our childhood friends
And it went like this, say


Oops, I got 99 problems singing bye, bye, bye
Hold up, if you wanna go and take a ride with me
Better hit me, baby, one more time, uh
Paint a picture for you and me
On the days when we were young, uh
Singing at the top of both our lungs
On the day we fell in love
Ooh ooh, ooh ooh
On the day we fell in love
Ooh ooh, ooh ooh

Dancing on the hood in the middle of the woods
On an old Mustang, where we sang
Songs with all our childhood friends
Oh, now


Oops, I got 99 problems singing bye, bye, bye
Hold up, if you wanna go and take a ride with me
Better hit me, baby, one more time
Paint a picture for you and me
On the days when we were young, uh
Singing at the top of both our lungs
On the day we fell in love
Ooh ooh, ooh ooh
On the day we fell in love
Ooh ooh, ooh ooh
On the day we fell in love
Ooh ooh, ooh ooh
On the day we fell in love
Ooh ooh, ooh ooh
On the day we fell in love, love, love",3541694
120429,2461009,44 More,rap,Logic,2018,1644997,{},"
Ayy, bitch, I've been goin' and goin' like the Energizer
Yeah, I'm supplyin' the wood like Elijah
In the cut, smokin' on indica
Might fuck around and compartmentalize ya
They say, they say life is a bitch
And if that is the case then I'm finna surprise her
No, I am not an advisor, but I do advise ya
To pay attention, never need to mention
I'm that motherfucker bustin' heads
Finna push it to the ledge
Yeah, I been smokin' my meds
Ain't got no love for the feds
Can't let fame go to yo' head
Fuck with me, watch where you tread
I'm finna kill it instead
I'm finna, I'm finna, I'm finna
I will, I will, do it like I never done it
And I wanna run it and I wanna keep it goin' and goin'
Like infinity, be the only entity to ever rip it apart
From the start like this, from the heart like this
Finna murder it, a million miles a minute, no nitrous
Doin' righteous
I-I been, I-I-I been down this road before
Everybody think that they do but they don't
Swear to God that they would but they won't
Spittin' riddles in the middle of a past-time
Me in my mind, feelin' divine, like yeah
Finna get it like yeah-yeah
Like yeah, like yeah (Woo, woo, woo, woo)
I done made 20 million dollars (Preach)
I don't flex to be acknowledged (Preach)
At this point it's common knowledge (Preach)
All you haters been abolished (Preach)
You in the club throwin' dollars, but I'm savin' mine so my kids go to college (Preach)
Or maybe whatever they wanna do (Preach)
Just as long as they never say (Preach)
""Daddy blew 20 million dollars (Ayy)
He had to flex to be acknowledged (Ayy)
He in the club throwin' dollars
And now cannot afford to send me to college (Ayy)
Daddy just wanna be loved
Just like everybody wanna be accepted (Ayy)
But somehow he had neglected
Me and my momma for all of this rap shit"" (Ayy)
No, I cannot fuck with that shit (Ayy)
No, I cannot fuck with that

Who you know dropped an album
Back to back to back to back to back to back again?
I'm back again to snap again
And goddamnit, it ain't no other way around it
Yeah, it's happenin', 'cause I've been livin' in a world on my own
Leave me alone, I'm in the zone
Where I've been prone to destroy shit
You cannot avoid this, wack mothafuckas have annoyed this
Yes, you know I enjoy this
Preach, mothafuckin' preach
Yeah, I'm tryna reach everybody in the streets
Writin' words to the beats
Each one teach one, yeah, I'm tryna reach one
Who the beast one?
That be me, on the top to the East one
Tell me how you really wanna do it right now, time to murder this
Shout out everybody, no fuckin' around, ain't heard of this
Heard of us, we ain't goin' nowhere, it's a herd of us
Hold up, roll up


Levitated like I'm David Blaine
Livin' a dream like I'm David Aames
Talk all you want, we are not the same
Step in the spot, now they know the name
Sold more albums my first week than Harry Styles and Katy Perry
If that ain't a sign of the times
Then I don't know what is, man this shit is scary
'Cause bitch, I've been blowin' up like C-4
And I'm 3 for 3 like a free throw
Anybody hatin' on the boy, take a step back and then deep-throat
Now my phone blowin' up like ring
Like ring, ring, ring, ring, ring, ring, ring, ring, ring, ring, ring!
That Kevin Durant, I'm a champion
Check the numbers, I'm a champion
Can't sleep on the boy anymore
But the haters that love to hate gon' pop an Ambien
Star Lord, champion
Know the name, now they know the alias, that's for sure
Gave 'em 44, now here's 44 more",3542151
120488,2462081,1950,pop,King Princess,2018,1031959,{},"
I hate it when dudes try to chase me
But I love it when you try to save me
'Cause I'm just a lady (Ah)
I love it when we play 1950
It's so cold that your stare's 'bout to kill me
I'm surprised when you kiss me


So tell me why my Gods look like you
And tell me why it's wrong


So I'll wait for you, I'll pray
I will keep on waiting for your love
For you, I'll wait
I will keep on waiting for your


Did you mean it when you said I was pretty?
That you didn't wanna live in a city
Where the people are shitty?
I like it when we play 1950
So bold, make them know that you're with me
Stone cold, will you miss me?

So tell me why my Gods look like you
And tell me why it's wrong


So I'll wait for you, I'll pray
I will keep on waiting for your love
For you, I'll wait
I will keep on waiting for your


I hope that you're happy with me in your life
I hope that you won't slip away in the night
I hope that you're happy with me in your life
I hope that you won't slip away
I hate it when dudes try to chase me
I love it when you try to save me
'Cause I'm just a lady


So tell me why my Gods look like you
And tell me why it's wrong


So, (So), so I'll wait for you, I'll pray
I will keep on waiting for your love
(For your love, for your love) For
(For your love) you
For you, I'll wait
I will keep on waiting for your",3543447
120685,2466608,​changes,pop,XXXTENTACION,2018,2866708,"{""PnB Rock""}","
Mmm, baby, I don't understand this
You're changing, I can't stand it
My heart can't take this damage
And the way I feel, can't stand it
Mmm, baby, I don't understand this
You're changing, I can't stand it
My heart can't take this damage
And the way I feel, can't stand it
Mmm, baby, I don't understand it


Girl, you're makin' it hard for me
Girl, you're makin' it hard for me
Girl, you're makin' it hard for me
Mmm, ohh
Girl, you're makin' it hard for me
Girl, you're makin' it hard for me
Girl, you're makin' it hard for me


Mmm, baby, I don't understand this
You're changing, I can't stand it
My heart can't take this damage
And the way I feel, can't stand it
Mmm, baby, I don't understand this
You're changing, I can't stand it
My heart can't take this damage
And the way I feel, can't stand it
Mmm, baby, I don't understand this

You're changing, I can't stand it
My heart can't take this damage
And the way I feel, can't stand it
Mmm, baby, I don't understand it",3549578
120816,2469687,Gucci Flip Flops,rap,Bhad Bhabie,2018,1051292,"{""Lil Yachty""}","
30, you a fool for this one (Cheeze)


Gucci flip-flops, fuck it, hit your bitch in my socks
This a big watch, diamonds drippin' off of the clock
Pull the six out, wintertime, droppin' the top
Give it to they pussy ass, turn this shit up a notch
Gucci flip-flops (Fuck it), make her kick rocks (Bust it)
This a big clock, check the wristwatch (Check it)
Gucci flip-flops, fuck it, hit your bitch in my socks (Bust it)
This a big watch, diamonds drippin' off of the clock (Off of the clock)


Bhad Bhabie got these bitches bustin' for cash (For cash)
Do the dash, try to play me, bitch, I'm bustin' your ass (Bustin' your)
Lotta gun sounds, Rollie bust down
Know why these bitches mad? 'Cause they trash and they fuckin' for cash (Cash)
Too official, blow the whistle, bitch, I'm fly as a bird (Brr)
Take a picture, get your issue, bitch'll die on my word (My word)
Walk in the bank, fuck it up, pokin' that bitch with a shank, fuck it up (Fuck it up)
I bought the lil' bitch a bag, make it double back and clear up her tab (Yeah)

Gucci flip-flops, fuck it, hit your bitch in my socks
This a big watch, diamonds drippin' off of the clock
Pull the six out, wintertime, droppin' the top
Give it to they pussy ass, turn this shit up a notch
Gucci flip-flops (Fuck it), make her kick rocks (Bust it)
This a big clock, check the wristwatch (Check it)
Gucci flip-flops, fuck it, hit your bitch in my socks (Bust it)
This a big watch (Lil Boat), diamonds drippin' off of the clock (Off of the clock)


I got big guap, pussy, yeah, I'm real rich (Yeah)
Six cars, two houses, and I'm still rich, uh (Uh)
Think it's sweet? One call, hit the kill-switch (Boom)
Boy, be cool, I ain't worried 'bout your lil' bitch, nigga
That lil' chain that you rockin', that's so little to me
Talkin' shit, but want a verse? That's a riddle to me
Can't fuck the bitch if she got her virginity (Hoo, yeah)
'Cause then she gon' really be into me (Hoo, yeah)
.223 shells in my ride for the enemies (Uh)
Put a few holes in his kidney (Hoo, Lil Boat)


Gucci flip-flops, fuck it, hit your bitch in my socks
This a big watch, diamonds drippin' off of the clock
Pull the six out, wintertime, droppin' the top
Give it to they pussy ass, turn this shit up a notch
Gucci flip-flops (Fuck it), make her kick rocks (Bust it)
This a big clock, check the wristwatch (Check it)
Gucci flip-flops, fuck it, hit your bitch in my socks (Bust it)
This a big watch, diamonds drippin' off of the clock (Off of the clock)",3553576
121271,2478638,Globglogabgalab,pop,Tony Halstead,2012,1034659,{},"
I'm the Globglogabgalab, I love books
And this basement is a true treasure trove


I am the Glob-glo-gab-galab
The shwabble-dabble-wabble-gabble flibba blabba blab
I'm full of shwibbly liber-kind
I am the yeast of thoughts and minds


Shwabble dabble glibble glabble schribble shwap glab
Dibble dabble shribble shrabble glibbi-glap shwap
Shwabble dabble glibble glabble shwibble shwap-dap
Dibble dabble shribble shrabble glibbi-shwap glab


Ooh, ha ha ha, mmm, splendid
Simply delicious
Ohm, ha ha ha ha

I am the Glob-glo-gab-galab
The shwabble-dabble-wabble-gabble flibba blabba blab
I'm full of shwibbly liber-kind
I am the yeast of thoughts and minds


Shwabble dabble glibble glabble schribble shwap glab
Dibble dabble shribble shrabble glibbi-glap shwap
Shwabble dabble glibble glabble shwibble shwap-dap
Dibble dabble shribble shrabble glibbi-shwap glab


Ah",3564543
121740,2489027,Kahit Ayaw Mo Na,pop,This Band,2018,1328980,{},"
Kahit ikaw ay magalit
Sa'yo lang lalapit
Sa'yo lang aawit
Kahit na ikaw ay nagbago na
Iibigin pa rin kita
Kahit ayaw mo na


Tatakbo, tatalon
Isisigaw ang pangalan mo
Iisipin na lang panaginip ang lahat ng ito


O, bakit ba kailangan pang umalis?
Pakiusap lang na 'wag ka nang lumihis
Tayo'y mag-usap, teka lang, ika'y huminto
Wag mo 'kong iwan, aayusin natin 'to
Ang daling sabihin na ayaw mo na
Pero pinag-isipan mo ba?

Lapit nang lapit, ako'y lalapit
Layo nang layo, ba't ka lumalayo?
Labo nang labo, ika'y malabo
Malabo, tayo'y malabo


Bumalik, at muli ka 'ring aalis
Tatakbo ka ng mabilis
Yayakapin nang mahigpit
Ang hirap 'pag 'di mo alam ang iyong pupuntahan
Kung ako ba ay pagbibigyan
O nalilito lang kung saan


Tatakbo, tatalon
Isisigaw ang pangalan mo
Iisipin na lang panaginip ang lahat ng ito


O, bakit ba kailangan pang umalis?
Pakiusap lang na 'wag ka nang lumihis
Tayo'y mag usap, teka lang, ika'y huminto
'Wag mo kong iwan, aayusin natin 'to
Ang daling sabihin na ayaw mo na
Pero pinag-isipan mo ba?

Lapit nang lapit, ako'y lalapit
Layo nang layo, ba't ka lumalayo?
Labo nang labo, ika'y malabo
Malabo, tayo'y malabo
Lapit nang lapit ako'y lalapit
Layo nang layo ba't ka lumalayo?
Labo nang labo ika'y malabo
Malabo, tayo'y malabo


O, bakit ba kailangan pang umalis?
Pakiusap lang na 'wag ka nang lumihis
Tayo'y mag usap, teka lang, ika'y huminto
'Wag mo kong iwan, aayusin natin 'to
Ang daling sabihin na ayaw mo na
Pero pinag-isipan mo ba?


Kahit ikaw ay magalit
Sa'yo lang lalapit
Kahit 'di ka na sa'kin",3577575
121744,2489106,​the remedy for a broken heart why am I so in love,rap,XXXTENTACION,2018,1929551,{},"
Why am I so in love?
Why am I so in love?
Why am I so in love?
I don't know why


Steady tryin' to maintain
Same things that'll blow a bitch mind frame
My brain can't fathom what the hate say
He say, she say, how 'bout me say?
Get the Vis-a, headed to the islands A-S-A-P
What's that on my shawty wrist? That's a AP
I'm the type to save a bitch, C-A-P-E
Feelin' like ET, flyin' out of the Addy
Fuckin' on shawty, she baddie, casual convo then at it
I mean I'm better than better, maybe I'm lyin'
I'm sadder than most of y'all with the money and the freedom, nigga
What is money really worth if it ain't love?
I'ma find a perfect balance, it's gon' take time
I heard shawty still in love through the grapevine
Heard shawty still in love through the grapevine
Heard shawty in love through the grapevine

Mix a little bit of weed with a little bit of cash
With a little bit of this, with a little bit of that
We gon' be al-, we gon' be al- (right)
We gon' be al- (right) we gon' be al-
Mix a little bit of weed with a little bit of cash
With a little bit of this, with a little bit of that
We gon' be al-, we gon' be alright
We gon' be al- (right) we gon' be al-
Mix a little bit of weed with a little bit of cash
With a little bit of this, with a little bit of that
We gon' be al-, we gon' be al (right)
We gon' be alright, we gon' be al-
Mix a little bit of weed with a little bit of cash
With a little bit of this, with a little bit of that
We gon' be al- (right) we gon' be al-
We gon' be al- (right) we gon' be al-


Why am I so in love?
I don't know why
Why am I so in love?
I don't know why


She said I, oh, I, am fallin' for you, fallin' for you
I, oh, I, am fallin' for you, fallin' for you
I, oh, I, am fallin' for you, fallin' for you
I, oh, I, am fallin' for you, fallin' for you

Why am I so in love?
Why am I so in love?
Why am I so in love?
I don't know why
Why am I so in love?
Why am I so in love?
Why am I so in love?
I don't know why",3577658
121750,2489114,$$$,rap,XXXTENTACION & Matt Ox,2017,1185755,{},"
Pew
Get money, yeah yeah
Get money, yeah, get money
Get money, yeah, yeah
Get money, yeah yeah (Get money)
Get money, yeah yeah
Yeah
Get money, yeah yeah


Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Why you gotta sleep on my crew?
You know that my VVS' blue
Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My gang gonna eat real soon (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
All you little haters is doomed


Ooh, wait, wait, ooh
Ooh, wait, ooh, ooh (Woah, woah)
Get money, yah, yah
Get money, yah, yah (Oh my)
Get money, yah, yah (Oh my)
Get money, yah, yah

Like wait, wait, uh, ska-ate, uh
Spin on my dick like a Beyblade, uh
My dick'll hit her like AK, uh
These boys is beggers they bacers, uh
Tie up your lace, boy you trippin', like, ayy?
Run up, get done up, say this every day
Uh, these niggas jealous and uh
Boy you is bitter like medicine, uh
Are you okay, bitch? Uh
Slay the pussy like I'm Jason, uh
Huh, fuck out my face, bitch, uh
1-0 like the Matrix, uh
Nigga try me, I tell ice to go get ya
Fuck around, I keep a blade like the Witcher
I want your auntie, your grandma, your sister
I eat the pussy for breakfast and dinner


Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Why you gotta sleep on my crew?
You know that my VVS' blue
Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
Like ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My gang gonna eat real soon (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
All you little haters is doomed

Ooh, wait, wait, ooh
Ooh, wait, ooh, ooh (Woah, woah)
Get money, yah, yah (Yeah)
Get money, yah, yah (Yah, yah)
Get money, yah, yah (Yah, yah)
Get money, yah, yah",3577665
121784,2489931,Leave Me Alone,rap,Flipp Dinero,2018,1151878,{},"
Yeah, yeah
Yeah, I miss you but I got no time for that (Damn, yeah)
Yeah, ayy, yeah, ayy (Young Forever)


Yeah, I miss you but I got no time for that
How could you? Wish you had never played me
Have no time for that (Damn)
Claiming you're my lady, got no time for that
How could you move it like you're crazy?
I ain't call you back (Damn)


Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch you dumb as fuck
Running up the bucks (D-damn, ayy)
Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Bitch, you done or what? (Yeah)
Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Running up the bucks (Damn, ayy)
Leave me alone
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Ayy)

Yeah, I miss you but I got no time for that
You was my lil' lady, drive me crazy
I was fine with that (Damn)
How you just gon' play me? I ain't fine with that
Thinking 'bout you daily
Smoking crazy while I'm off the tech (Damn)
Flexin', oh, we was flexing
Always had told you that you'd be a star
Goals in our checklist (Damn)
Question, oh, check your message
Knew that I couldn't fuck the bitch from the start
Or she was texting (Damn)
Demon, she cold (Yeah)
Leave and I'm gone (Yeah)
Fiendin', she on (Yeah)
Dreaming, we are (Yeah)
Drop is a coupe
Dropping the top of my car (Ayy)
I cannot love on no bitch when she fucking the clique
Man, she playing her part (Yeah, damn, ayy)
Life is a bitch, knew all that shit from the start (Ayy)
I told myself I walk up from that bitch and she leave all that shit in the dark (Like damn)


Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Running up the bucks (Damn, ayy)
Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Bitch, you done or what? (Yeah)
Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Running up the bucks (Damn)
Leave me alone
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah

You can't play me, I'm just wavy
Sipping purple 'til I'm lazy
Like a throwback
Ayisyen, how you ain't know that?
Hit my bop like I'm Lil Kodak
On the block where it ain't good at
I can't sweat you, I'm like, ""Who that?""
I can't sweat you, I don't do that (Nah, nah, ayy)
Tell you the truth
I ain't want you to depart (Ayy)
I wanted you but I can't fuck with you
'Cause you different, you can't play your part (No, damn, ayy)
Tell you the truth
I wanted you from the start (Ayy)
I cannot fuck on no bitch
I can't love when the bitch is not playing her part (Like damn)


Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Running up the bucks (Damn, ayy)
Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Bitch, you done or what? (Yeah)
Leave me alone
Drunk as fuck
Bitch, you dumb as fuck
Running up the bucks (Damn, ayy)
Leave me alone
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah",3578651
121868,2491183,Nice For What,rb,Drake,2018,2942444,{},"
I wanna know who mothafuckin' representin' in here tonight
Hold on, hold on
I keep lettin' you back in (You back in)
How can I explain myself?


Care for me, care for me, you said you'd care for me
There for me, there for me, said you'd be there for me
(Lil Weezyana shit)
Cry for me, cry for me, you said you'd die for me
(Murda on the beat)
Give to me, give to me, why won't you live for me?
Care for me, care for me, I know you care for me
(A song for y'all to cut up to, you know?)
There for me, there for me, said you'd be there for me (Yeah)
Cry for me, cry for me, you said you'd die for me
Give to me, give to me, why won't you live for me?


Everybody get your mothafuckin' roll on
I know shorty and she doesn't want no slow song
Had a man last year, life goes on
Haven't let that thing loose, girl, in so long
You've been inside, know you like to lay low
I've been peepin' what you bringin' to the table
Workin' hard, girl, everything paid for
First-last, phone bill, car note, cable
With your phone out, gotta hit them angles
With your phone out, snappin' like you Fabo
And you showin' off, but it's alright
And you showin' off, but it's alright (Alright!)
It's a short life, yeah

Care for me, care for me, you said you'd care for me
There for me, there for me, said you'd be there for me
Cry for me, cry for me, you said you'd die for me
Give to me, give to me, why won't you live for me?


That's a real one in your reflection
Without a follow, without a mention
You really pipin' up on these niggas
You gotta be nice for what to these niggas?


I understand, you got a hunnid bands
You got a baby Benz, you got some bad friends
High school pics, you was even bad then
You ain't stressin' off no lover in the past tense
You already had them
Work at 8 A.M., finish 'round five
Hoes talk down, you don't see 'em outside
Yeah, they don't really be the same offline
You know dark days, you know hard times
Doin' overtime for the last month
Saturday, call the girls, get 'em gassed up
Gotta hit the club, gotta make that ass jump
Gotta hit the club like you hit them mothafuckin' angles
With your phone out, snappin' like you Fabo
And you showin' off, but it's alright
And you showin' off, but it's alright (Alright!)
It's a short life

Uh-huh (Oh yeah)
These hoes (They mad)
Your boy (I had)
I made (Watch the breakdown)


Care for me, care for me, you said you'd care for me
There for me, there for me, said you'd be there for me
Cry for me, cry for me, you said you'd die for me
Give to me, give to me, why won't you live for me?


Gotta make that jump, gotta make that, gotta, gotta make that
Gotta make that jump, gotta make that, gotta, gotta make that
Gotta, gotta, gotta g-g-gotta, g-g-gotta, gotta
Gotta, g-g-gotta, gotta, gotta make that jump, jump (Let's go)
Bend it over, lift it up, bend it over, lift it up
Make that jump, jump
Bend it over, lift it up, bend it over, lift it up
Make that jump, jump
Bend it over, over, over, over, over, lift it up
Make that jump, jump
Bend it over, lift it up (Make that jump, jump)
Bend it over, lift it up (Make that jump, jump)

That's a real one in your reflection
Without a follow, without a mention
You really pipin' up on these niggas
You gotta be nice for what to these niggas?
I understand


Care for me, care for me, you said you'd care for me
There for me, there for me, said you'd be there for me
Give to me, give to me, why won't you live for me?
Cry for me, cry for me, you said you'd cry for me


Gotta hit the club like you hit them, hit them, hit them angles
(BlaqNmilD, you a genius, you diggin' me?)
It's a short life, yeah
Cry for me, cry for me, you said you'd die for me
Give to me, give to me, why won't you live for me?",3580132
122182,2497565,Get You the Moon,pop,Kina,2018,1054303,{Snøw},"
You gave me a shoulder when I needed it
You showed me love when I wasn't feeling it
You helped me fight when I was giving in
And you made me laugh when I was losing it


'Cause you are, you are
The reason why I'm still hanging on
'Cause you are, you are
The reason why my head is still above water


And if I could, I'd get you the moon
And give it to you
And if death was coming for you
I'd give my life for you


'Cause you are, you are
The reason why I'm still hanging on
'Cause you are, you are
The reason why my head is still above water

And if I could, I'd get you the moon
And give it to you
And if death was coming for you
I'd give my life for you


'Cause you are, you are
Oh, you are
Oh, you are
You are


'Cause you are, you are
The reason why I'm still hanging on
'Cause you are, you are
The reason why my head is still above water


And if I could, I'd get you the moon
And give it to you
And if death was coming for you
I'd give my life for you",3588164
122277,2500254,In My Blood,pop,Shawn Mendes,2018,1553239,{},"
Help me, it's like the walls are caving in
Sometimes I feel like giving up
But I just can't
It isn't in my blood


Laying on the bathroom floor, feeling nothing
I'm overwhelmed and insecure, give me something
I could take to ease my mind slowly
Just have a drink and you'll feel better
Just take her home and you'll feel better
Keep telling me that it gets better
Does it ever?


Help me, it's like the walls are caving in
Sometimes I feel like giving up
No medicine is strong enough
Someone help me
I'm crawling in my skin
Sometimes I feel like giving up
But I just can't

It isn't in my blood
It isn't in my blood


I'm looking through my phone again feeling anxious
Afraid to be alone again, I hate this
I'm trying to find a way to chill, can't breathe, oh
Is there somebody who could help me?


It's like the walls are caving in
Sometimes I feel like giving up
No medicine is strong enough
Someone help me
I'm crawling in my skin
Sometimes I feel like giving up
But I just can't


It isn't in my blood
It isn't in my blood


I need somebody now
I need somebody now
Someone to help me out
I need somebody now

Help me, it's like the walls are caving in
Sometimes I feel like giving up
But I just can't


It isn't in my blood
It isn't in my blood, oh


It isn't in my blood
I need somebody now
It isn't in my blood
I need somebody now
It isn't in my blood",3591762
122287,2500782,Lost in Japan,pop,Shawn Mendes,2018,1216085,{},"
All it'd take is one flight
We'd be in the same time zone
Looking through your timeline
Seeing all the rainbows, I
I got an idea
And I know that it sounds crazy
I just wanna see ya
Oh, I gotta ask


Do you got plans tonight?
I'm a couple hundred miles from Japan, and I
I was thinking I could fly to your hotel tonight
'Cause I-I-I can't get you off my mind
Can't get you off my mind
Can't get you off my mind (oh)


I could feel the tension
We could cut it with a knife
I know it's more than just a friendship
I can hear you think I'm right, yeah
Do I gotta convince you
That you shouldn't fall asleep?
It'll only be a couple hours
And I'm about to leave

Do you got plans tonight?
I'm a couple hundred miles from Japan, and I
I was thinking I could fly to your hotel tonight
'Cause I-I-I can't get you off my mind
Can't get you off my mind
Can't get you off my mind
Do you got plans tonight?
I was hoping I could get lost in your paradise
The only thing I'm thinking 'bout is you and I
'Cause I-I-I can't get you off my mind
Can't get you off my mind
I can't seem to get you off my mind


Let's get lost tonight (Oh)
Let's get lost tonight
Baby, you and
I can't seem to get you off my mind
Let's get lost tonight
Let's get lost tonight
Baby, you and
I can't seem to get you off my mind
Oh-oh, oh-oh
Oh-oh

Do you got plans tonight?
I'm a couple hundred miles from Japan, and I
I was thinking I could fly to your hotel tonight
'Cause I-I-I can't get you off my mind
I can't get you off my mind
Do you got plans tonight, baby?
I was hoping I could get lost in your paradise (Paradise)
The only thing I'm thinking 'bout is you and I
And I-I-I can't get you off my mind
Can't get you off my mind
I can't seem to get you off my mind, yeah


Let's get lost tonight (Oh-oh)
Let's get lost tonight (Oh-oh)
Baby, you and
I can't seem to get you off my mind
Let's get lost tonight (Oh-oh)
Let's get lost tonight (Oh-oh)
Baby, you and (Oh-oh)
I can't seem to get you off my mind",3592379
122334,2502056,Youngblood,pop,5 Seconds of Summer,2018,1307178,{},"
Remember the words you told me
""Love me 'til the day I die""?
Surrender my everything
'Cause you made me believe you're mine
Yeah, you used to call me ""baby""
Now you're calling me by name (Mmm)
Takes one to know one, yeah
You beat me at my own damn game


You push and you push and I'm pulling away
Pulling away from you
I give and I give and I give and you take
Give and you take


Youngblood
Say you want me, say you want me out of your life
And I'm just a dead man walking tonight
But you need it, yeah, you need it all of the time
Yeah, ooh-ooh-ooh
Youngblood
Say you want me, say you want me back in your life
So I'm just a dead man crawling tonight
'Cause I need it, yeah, I need it all of the time
Yeah, ooh-ooh-ooh

Lately our conversations
End like it's the last goodbye
Then one of us gets too drunk
And calls about a hundred times
So, who you been calling baby?
Nobody could take my place
When you're looking at those strangers
Hope to God you see my face
(Ooh-ooh)


Youngblood
Say you want me, say you want me out of your life
And I'm just a dead man walking tonight
But you need it, yeah, you need it all of the time
Yeah, ooh-ooh-ooh
Youngblood
Say you want me, say you want me back in your life
So I'm just a dead man crawling tonight
'Cause I need it, yeah, I need it all of the time
Yeah, ooh-ooh-ooh


You push and you push and I'm pulling away
Pulling away from you
I give and I give and I give and you take
Give and you take
You're running around and I'm running away
Running away from you, mmm, from you

Youngblood
Say you want me, say you want me out of your life
And I'm just a dead man walking tonight
But you need it, yeah, you need it all of the time
Yeah, ooh-ooh-ooh
Youngblood
Say you want me, say you want me back in your life
So I'm just a dead man crawling tonight
'Cause I need it, yeah, I need it all of the time
Yeah, ooh-ooh-ooh


You push and you push and I'm pulling away
Pulling away from you
I give and I give and I give and you take
Give and you take
Youngblood
Say you want me
Say you want me out of your life
And I'm just a dead man walking tonight",3593894
122393,2503650,High Hopes,pop,Panic! at the Disco,2018,1662640,{},"
High, high hopes


Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Shooting for the stars when I couldn't make a killing
Didn't have a dime but I always had a vision
Always had high, high hopes (High, high hopes)
Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Didn't know how but I always had a feeling
I was gonna be that one in a million
Always had high, high hopes


Mama said, fulfill the prophecy
Be something greater, go make a legacy
Manifest destiny, back in the days
We wanted everything, wanted everything
Mama said, burn your biographies
Rewrite your history, light up your wildest dreams
Museum victories, every day
We wanted everything, wanted everything

Mama said don't give up, it's a little complicated
All tied up, no more love and I'd hate to see you waiting


Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Shooting for the stars when I couldn't make a killing
Didn't have a dime but I always had a vision
Always had high, high hopes
Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Didn't know how but I always had a feeling
I was gonna be that one in a million
Always had high, high hopes (High, high hopes)


Mama said, it's uphill for oddities
The stranger crusaders, ain't ever wannabes
The weird and the novelties don't ever change
We wanted everything, wanted everything (High, high hopes)
Stay up on that rise
Stay up on that rise and never come down, oh
Stay up on that rise
Stay up on that rise and never come down


Mama said don't give up, it's a little complicated
All tied up, no more love and I'd hate to see you waiting
They say it's all been done but they haven't seen the best of me-eh-eh-eh
So I got one more run and it's gonna be a sight to see-eh-eh-eh

Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Shooting for the stars when I couldn't make a killing
Didn't have a dime but I always had a vision
Always had high, high hopes (High, high hopes)
Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Didn't know how but I always had a feeling
I was gonna be that one in a million
Always had high, high hopes (High, high hopes)


Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Shooting for the stars when I couldn't make a killing
Didn't have a dime but I always had a vision
Always had high, high hopes
Had to have high, high hopes for a living
Didn't know how but I always had a feeling
I was gonna be that one in a million
Always had high, high hopes (High, high hopes)",3596006
122952,2517748,Di Matamu,pop,Sufian Suhaimi,2018,1021812,{},"
Apakah kau cuba untuk menafikan
Keikhlasan hatiku padamu
Betapa ku mencuba
Mendapatkan secebis kasih mu


Apakah kau tak mampu untuk menentukan
Di antara kaca dan permata
Betapa telahan mu
Memaksa ku mengundurkan diri


Dan tak seharusnya aku
Bertemu dirimu di dunia ini
Dan kau membuang diriku sesuka hati mu
Dan memilih dia
Dan ku tersandar begini
Meratapi hati yang telah dilukai
Aku sedar betapa hinanya
Ku di matamu

Namun jika ku diperlukan, dan diterima
Izinkan ku menagih kasihmu
Namun jika ku ditolak, tak diperlukan
Buang segala tentang ku


Dan tak seharusnya aku
Bertemu dirimu di dunia ini
Dan kau membuang diriku sesuka hatimu
Dan memilih dia
Dan ku tersandar begini
Meratapi hati yang telah dilukai
Aku sedar betapa hinanya
Ku di matamu",3613339
123054,2518986,Wasted Times,rb,The Weeknd,2018,1513035,{},"
Wasted times I spent with someone else
She wasn't even half of you
Reminiscin' how you felt
Reminiscin' how you felt
And even though you put my life through hell
I can't seem to forget 'bout you, 'bout you
I want you to myself


And now I'm askin', who do you belong to now?
Who you give that love to now?
Who you pullin' up on?
Who you gettin' sprung for now?
And what they got that I ain't got? 'Cause I got a lot
Don't make me run up on 'em, got me blowin' up their spot
'Cause I ain't got no business catchin' feelings anyway
I ain't got no business catchin' feelings


Catchin' feelings
These girls only want you when you're winnin' (winnin')
But you've been with me from the beginnin' (ooh, yeah, yeah)
And I know right now that we're not talkin' (not talkin')
I hope you know this dick is still an option
'Cause I'll beat it up (I'll beat it up, yeah)
I took my time to learn the way your body functions
You were equestrian, so ride it like a champion (ride it baby)
This sex will get you high without no other substance

So who do you belong to now? (Who do you belong to now?)
Who you give that love to now? (Who you give that love to now?)
Who you pullin' up on?
Who you gettin' sprung for now? (Who you gettin' sprung for now?)
And what they got that I ain't got? 'Cause I got a lot (I got a lot)
Don't make me run up on 'em, got me blowin' up their spot (blowin' up their spot)
'Cause I ain't got no business catchin' feelings anyway
I ain't got no business catchin' feelings (feelings)


Catchin' feelings
I ain't got no business catchin' feelings
I ain't got no business catchin' feelings
Catchin' fee-fee-fee-fee
Feelings
I ain't got no business catchin' feelings
I ain't got no business catchin' feelings
Catchin' fee-fee-fee-fee


Wake up
I don't wanna wake up
I don't wanna wake up
If you ain't layin' next to me
I don't wanna wake up
I don't wanna wake up
I don't wanna wake up
If you ain't layin' next to me-e-e
On me, me, on me, oh, I
On me, on me, on me",3614873
123059,2519025,Call Out My Name,rb,The Weeknd,2018,3024452,{},"
We found each other
I helped you out of a broken place
You gave me comfort
But falling for you was my mistake


I put you on top, I put you on top
I claimed you so proud and openly
And when times were rough, when times were rough
I made sure I held you close to me


So call out my name (Call out my name)
Call out my name when I kiss you so gently
I want you to stay (Want you to stay)
I want you to stay even though you don't want me
Girl, why can't you wait? (Why can't you wait, baby?)
Girl, why can't you wait 'til I fall out of love?
Won't you call out my name? (Call out my name)
Girl, call out my name, and I'll be on my way and
I'll be on my-

I said I didn't feel nothing, baby, but I lied
I almost cut a piece of myself for your life
Guess I was just another pit stop
'Til you made up your mind
You just wasted my time


You were on top, I put you on top
I claimed you so proud and openly, babe
And when times were rough, when times were rough
I made sure I held you close to me


So call out my name (Call out my name, baby)
So call out my name when I kiss you so gently (Ohh)
I want you to stay (I want you to stay)
I want you to stay even though you don't want me
Girl, why can't you wait? (Girl, why can't you wait 'til I?)
Girl, why can't you wait 'til I fall out of loving?
Babe, call out my name (Say call out my name, baby)
Girl call out my name and I'll be on my way
And, I'll be on my-


On my way, on my way
On my way, on my way, ooh
On my way, on my way, on my way
On my way, on my way, on my way
(On my)",3614919
123061,2519032,Try Me,rb,The Weeknd,2018,1013688,{},"
Any time is the time
Any time for you to get my call, baby (so, baby)
Are you alone, baby?
If he ain't around, pick up your phone, baby
Whoa


Can you try me? (try me), try me (try me)
Once you put your pride aside
You can notify me (-fy me), -fy me (-fy me)
You're the best I ever had
Baby girl, remind me (-mind me), -mind me (-mind me)
Let me know if it's on
And you know where to find me, find me
Havin' thoughts you never had, yeah


I didn't know you were down for him finding out
I thought you had some kind of love for your man
Well, I'm not tryna break up something
You've been workin' out, you've been steady
But I'm ready to go all the way if you let me
Don't you tempt me
You're lookin' grown since the last time I looked at you
It might have been, been about a couple months
But I just got the picture that you texted to me
You ain't steady, you look ready to go all the way
If you let me take you down on me

Can you try me? (try me), try me (ooh)
Once you put your pride aside (once you put your pride aside)
You can notify me (-fy me), -fy me (-fy me)
You're the best I ever had (you're the best I ever had)
Baby girl, remind me (-mind me), -mind me (-mind me)
Let me know if it's on (let me know)
And you know where to find me, find me (Hey)
Havin' thoughts you never had, yeah
Can you try me? Try me, try me (Hey)
Once you put your pride aside
You can notify me, -fy me
You're the best I ever had (you're the best I ever had)
Baby girl, remind me, -mind me (Hey)
Lemme know if it's on (let me know)
And you know where to find me (hey) (find me), find me (hey) (find me)
Having thoughts you never had, yeah


Oh, lo
Lo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo
Lo-lo-lo-lo-lo, lo-lo-lo
Lo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo
Better try me


Don't you miss me, babe?
Don't you miss me, baby?
The way I kissed your scars
The way I fixed your heart, oh
Don't you miss me, babe?
Don't you miss me, baby?",3614925
123064,2519107,Be Careful,rap,Cardi B,2018,2347957,{},"
Yeah
Care for me, care for me, care for me, uh
Yeah, look


I wanna get married, like the Currys, Steph and Ayesha shit
But we more like Belly-Tommy and Keisha shit
Gave you TLC, you wanna creep and shit
Poured out my whole heart to a piece of shit
Man, I thought you would've learned your lesson
'Bout likin' pictures, not returnin' texts
I guess it's fine, man, I get the message
You still stutter after certain questions
You keep in contact with certain exes
Do you, though, trust me, nigga, it's cool, though
Said that you was workin', but you out here chasin' culo
And putas, chillin' poolside, livin' two lives
I could've did what you did to me to you a few times
But if I did decide to slide, find a nigga
Fuck him, suck his dick, you would've been pissed
But that's not my M.O., I'm not that type of bitch
And karma for you is gon' be who you end up with
You make me sick, nigga

The only man, baby, I adore
I gave you everything, what's mine is yours
I want you to live your life of course
But I hope you get what you dyin' for
Be careful with me, do you know what you doin'?
Whose feelings that you're hurtin' and bruisin'?
You gon' gain the whole world
But is it worth the girl that you're losin'?
Be careful with me
Yeah, it's not a threat, it's a warnin'
Be careful with me
Yeah, my heart is like a package with a fragile label on it
Be careful with me


Care for me, care for me
Always said that you'd be there for me, there for me
Boy, you better treat me carefully, carefully, look


I was here before all of this
Guess you actin' out now, you got an audience
Tell me where your mind is, drop a pin, what's the coordinates?
You might have a fortune, but you lose me, you still gon' be misfortunate, nigga
Tell me, this lust got you this fucked up in the head
You want some random bitch up in your bed?
She don't even know your middle name, watch her 'cause she might steal your chain
You don't want someone who loves you instead? I guess not though
It's blatant disrespect, you nothin' like the nigga I met
Talk to me crazy and you quick to forget
You even got me trippin', you got me lookin' in the mirror different
Thinkin' I'm flawed because you inconsistent
Between a rock and a hard place, the mud and the dirt
It's gon' hurt me to hate you, but lovin' you's worse
It all stops so abrupt, we started switchin' it up
Teach me to be like you so I can not give a fuck
Free to mess with someone else, I wish these feelings could melt
'Cause you don't care about a thing except your mothafuckin' self
You make me sick, nigga

The only man, baby, I adore
I gave you everything, what's mine is yours
I want you to live your life of course
But I hope you get what you dyin' for
Be careful with me, do you know what you doin'?
Whose feelings that you're hurtin' and bruisin'?
You gon' gain the whole world
But is it worth the girl that you're losin'?
Be careful with me
Yeah, it's not a threat, it's a warnin'
Be careful with me
Yeah, my heart is like a package with a fragile label on it
Be careful with me",3615018
123417,2529119,I Like It,rap,"Cardi B, Bad Bunny & J Balvin",2018,3654743,"{""Cardi B / Bad Bunny & J Balvin""}","
Yeah, baby, I like it like that
You gotta believe me when I tell you
I said I like it like that
You gotta believe me when I tell you
I said I like it like-


Now I like dollars, I like diamonds
I like stuntin', I like shinin' (Yeah)
I like million dollar deals
Where's my pen? Bitch, I'm signin' (Signin')
I like those Balenciagas (Those)
The ones that look like socks
I like going to the jeweler
I put rocks all in my watch (Cha-ching)
I like texts from my exes when they want a second chance (What?)
I like proving niggas wrong, I do what they say I can't
They call me Cardi Bardi, banging body
Spicy mami, hot tamale
Hotter than a Somali, fur coat, Ferrari (Rrr, woo)
Hop out the stu', jump in the coupe (Coupe)
Big Dipper on top of the roof
Flexing on bitches as hard as I can
Eating halal, driving the Lam'
Told that bitch I'm sorry, though (Sorry, though)
'Bout my coins like Mario (Mario)
Yeah, they call me Cardi B
I run this shit like cardio
Woo, facts

Diamond district in the chain, chain (I said I like it like that)
Certified, you know I'm gang, gang, gang, gang (I said I like it like-woo)
Drop the top and blow the brains, woo (Woo, I said I like it like that)
Oh, he's so handsome, what's his name? Yeah (Woo, facts, I said I like it)


Oh, I need the dollars, cha-ching (I said I like it like that)
Beat it up like piñatas (I said I like it like-; uh)
Tell the driver, close the curtains (I said I like it like that, skrrt)
Bad bitch make you nervous (I said I like it)
Cardi B


Chambean, chambean, pero no jalan (¡Jalan!)
Tú compras to'a las Jordan, bo, a mí me las regalan (Jeje)
I spend in the club what you have in the bank (¡Wuh; ¡yeh!)
This is the new religion bang in Latino gang, gang, ¡yeh!
Trato de hacer dieta, pero es que en el closet tengo mucha grasa (¡Yeh!; ¡wuh!)
Ya mudé la' Gucci pa' dentro de casa, yeh (¡Wuh!)
Cabrón, a ti no te conocen ni en Plaza (No)
El Diablo me llama, pero Jesucristo me abraza (Amén)
Guerrero como Eddie, que viva la raza, yeh
Me gustan boricuas, me gustan cubanas
Me gusta el acento de las colombianas (¿Qué hubo pues?)
Como mueve el culo la dominicana (¿Qué lo que?)
Lo rico que me chingan las venezolanas (¡Wuh!)
Andamos activos, Perico Pin Pin (Wuh)
Billetes de cien en el maletín (¡Ching!)
Que retumbe el bajo, Bobby Valentín, yeh (¡Buh!)
Aquí es prohibido amar, diles, Charytín
Que pa'l picor les tengo Claritín
Yo llego a la disco y se forma el motín (¡Rrrah!)

Diamond district in the chain (I said I like it like that)
Bad Bunny baby, bebé, bebé
Certified, you know I'm gang, gang, gang, gang (I said I like it like-woo)
Drop the top and blow the brains, woo (Woo, I said I like it like that)
Oh, he's so handsome, what's his name? Yeah (Woo, yeh, I said I like it)


Oh, I need the dollars, cha-ching (I said I like it like that)
Beat it up like piñatas (I said I like it like-)
Tell the driver, close the curtains (I said I like it like that, skrrt)
Bad bitch make you nervous (I said I like it, that)


Como Celia Cruz tengo el azúcar (Azúca')
Tu jeva me vio y se fue de pecho como Jimmy Snuka (Ah)
Te vamos a tumbar la peluca
Y arranca pa'l carajo, cabrón, que a ti no te vo'a pasar la hookah (Hookah, hookah)
Mis tenis Balenciaga me reciben en la entrada (Wuh)
Pa-Pa-Paparazzi like I'm Lady Gaga (Wuh)
Y no te me hagas (Eh)
Que en cover de Billboard tú has visto mi cara (Eh)
No salgo de tu mente (Wuh)
Donde quieras que viajes has escuchado ""Mi Gente""
Yo no soy hype, soy como el Testarossa (Hype; 'rossa)
Yo soy el que se la vive y también el que la goza (Goza, goza)
Es la cosa, mami es la cosa (Cosa, cosa)
El que mira sufre y el que toca goza (Goza, goza, goza)

I said I like it like that
I said I like it like that (Rrr)
I said I like it like that (Woo)
I said I like it like that


Diamond district in the chain (I said I like it like that)
Certified, you know I'm gang, gang (I said I like it like-)
Drop the top and blow the brains, woo (I said I like it like that)
Oh, he's so handsome, what's his name? Yeah (I said I like it)",3627151
123446,2529594,Stay,country,Post Malone,2018,1405393,{},"
It's true that all that you know is all that you are
You said that it's all that you want and more
Fuck off and pour another drink
And tell me what you think
You know that I'm too drunk to talk right now
You put your cigarette out on my face
So beautiful, please, woman


Don't break your back for me
I'll put you out of your misery


Tell me that it's all okay (Tell me that it's all okay)
I've been waitin' on this all damn day (Waitin' on this all damn day)
Call me in the mornin', tell me how last night went
I'm here, but don't count on me to-


Stay a little longer if you convince me
And tell me all the things that you have against me
Every time we make up, the truth is fadin'
Everybody's blind when the view's amazin'
Damn, who are we right now?
Can we have a little conversation?
Figure it out with no intoxication
We carry on, what is our motivation?
We're never wrong, how the hell we gonna make it?
Maybe we're used to this
Tell me, what are we to do?
It's like we only play to lose
Chasin' pain with an excuse
I love that shit and so do you

But don't break your back for me
I'll put you out of your misery


Tell me that it's all okay (Tell me that it's all okay)
I've been waitin' on this all damn day (Waitin' on this all damn day)
Call me in the mornin', tell me how last night went
I'm here, but don't count on me to stay




Tell me that it's all okay (Tell me that it's all okay)
I've been waitin' on this all damn day (Waitin' on this all damn day)
Call me in the mornin', tell me how last night went
I'm here, but don't count on me to stay",3627785
123537,2531137,Euphoria,pop,BTS,2018,1028748,{},"


너는 내 삶에 다시 뜬 햇빛
어린 시절 내 꿈들의 재림
모르겠어 이 감정이 뭔지
혹시 여기도 꿈속인 건지
꿈은 사막의 푸른 신기루
내 안 깊은 곳의 a priori
숨이 막힐 듯이 행복해져
주변이 점점 더 투명해져


저기 멀리서 바다가 들려
꿈을 건너서 수풀 너머로
선명해지는 그 곳으로 가
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria


Euphoria
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria

Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Oh)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Euphoria)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Close the door now
When I'm with you, I'm in utopia


무지개처럼
지워진 꿈을 찾아 헤맸을까
운명 같은 흔한 말관 달라
아픈 너의 눈빛이 나와 같은 곳을 보는 걸
Won't you please stay in dreams, yeah?


저기 멀리서 바다가 들려
꿈을 건너서 수풀 너머로
선명해지는 그곳으로 가
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria


Oh, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Euphoria
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria

모래 바닥이 갈라진대도
그 누가 이 세겔 흔들어도
잡은 손 절대 놓지 말아 줘
제발 꿈에서 깨어나지 마


저기 멀리서 바다가 들려
꿈을 건너서 수풀 너머로
(제발 꿈에서 깨어나지 마)
선명해지는 그곳으로 가
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Euphoria (Euphoria, oh)
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria


Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Oh, euphoria)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Close the door now
When I'm with you, I'm in utopia",3629701
123895,2541295,Barbie Tingz,rap,Nicki Minaj,2018,1125711,{},"
Dem-dem-dem-dem dem-dem
Dem-dem-dem-dem
Dem-dem-dem-dem dem-dem
Dem-dem-dem-dem


Uh, I'm in my prime, Optimus
Sagittarius, so you know I'm an optimist
Man, keep it all real, I'm a prophetess (Okay)
So at least you took an L off your bucket list (Bucket list)
It's time to make hits and it's time to diss
How you still dissin', still can't find some hits? (Okay)
Was it worth it, dummy? I ain't mind a bit
Still on that show gettin' no chips, time to dip


I, I, I, I-I, I-I, I (Okay)
I'm still fly, just bagged a white guy (Okay)
Ritchie like Guy and I still eat Thai
Want the Nicki cheat code? Come on, bitch, nice try

Let's be real, all you bitches wanna look like me
Wanna be in demand, get booked like me
Wanna run up in the lab and cook like me
But ain't nan you hoes pussy good like me
Pussy so good his ex wanna still fight me
Face so pretty bitches wish they could slice me
She just mad 'cause he never bought her ice like me
I cut all my niggas off, but they would still wife me (Still wife me)


Rap bitches tell they team, ""Make 'em like Barbie""
Had to come off IG so they can't stalk me
All they do is copy looks, steal music too
Want to see what bitches do when they lose the blue-print
I mean the pinkprint, ho, let it sink in
I spoke to Jay the other day, he's still the kingpin
He's still the only nigga that I woulda signed to
If I ain't sign to Wayne's perfectly designed crew
'Cause we the big three, don't need a big speech
We made the biggest impact, check the spreadsheet
That's Lil Weezy, the Barbie and Drizzy Drake
Niggas gettin' more cheese, kissy face
I'm a bad bitch, fuck the bitch (Uh)
Bitch get slick, I'ma cut the bitch
I'm a bad bitch, suck some dick (Okay)
If that bitch get slick, I'll cut the bitch
I'll cut up the bitch, I'll gut the bitch (Okay)
Had to fuck up the bitch, man, fuck the bitch
Won't shoot her but I will gun-butt the bitch
When we say ""Fuck the bitch,"" dick up the bitch
She was stuck-up so my niggas stuck up the bitch
Still draggin' her so don't pick up the bitch
Get the combination to the safe, drug the bitch
Know the whole operation been bugged the bitch

I, I, I, I-I, I-I, I (Okay)
I'm still fly, just bagged a white guy (Okay)
Ritchie like Guy and I still eat Thai
Want the Nicki cheat code? Come on, bitch, nice try


Let's be real, all you bitches wanna look like me
Wanna be in demand, get booked like me
Wanna run up in the lab and cook like me
But ain't nan you hoes pussy good like me
Pussy so good his ex wanna still fight me
Face so pretty bitches wish they could slice me
She just mad 'cause he never bought her ice like me
I cut all my niggas off, but they would still wife me (Still wife me)


They would still wife me
They would still wife me
Yup, him too, he would still wife me
Ahh, ha


When it come to stealin' flows, these birds is fluent
But they stutter when get asked 'bout the queen's influence
When it's clear they bite me, I'm flattered they like me
I don't wanna check bitches, tell 'em wear their Nikes
Barbie tingz, that's Barbie tingz
Big Barbie tingz, that's Barbie tingz
Big Barbie tingz, that's Barbie tingz
Uh, Barbie dreamhouse, Barbie rings
That's Barbie beach house, Barbie Benz
Uh, Barbie white picket Barbie fence
All tea, all shade, bitch, all offense
If you ever try to confiscate Barbie's Ken
I'ma put you in the box where my dollies been
Chop it up and the next stop garbage bin
'Cause you hoes too old to be gossipin'
I'm just tryna find out when the new Porsche come in",3641611
123905,2541684,Chun-Li,rap,Nicki Minaj,2018,2022225,{},"
Ayo, look like I'm goin' for a swim
Dunked on 'em, now I'm swingin' off the rim
Bitch ain't comin' off the bench
While I'm comin' off the court fully drenched
Here go some haterade, get ya thirst quenched
Styled on 'em in this Burberry trench
These birds copy every word, every inch
But gang gang got the hammer and the wrench (Brrr)
I pull up in that quarter milli off the lot
Oh, now she tryna be friends like I forgot
Show off my diamonds like I'm signed by the Roc (By the rock)
Ain't pushin' out his babies 'til he buy the rock


Ayo, I been on, bitch, you been corn
Bentley tints on, Fendi prints on
I mean I been Storm, X-Men been formed
He keep on dialin' Nicki like the Prince song
I-I-I been on, bitch, you been corn
Bentley tints on, Fendi prints on
Ayo, I been north, Lara been Croft
Plates say Chun-Li, drop the Benz off

Oh, I get it, huh, they paintin' me out to be the bad guy
Well it's the last time you gonna see a bad guy do the rap game like me


I went and copped the chopsticks, put it in my bun just to pop shit
I'm always in the top shit, box seats, bitch, fuck the gossip
How many of them coulda did it with finesse?
Now everybody like, ""She really is the best""
You play checkers, couldn't beat me playin' chess
Now I'm about to turn around and beat my chest
Bitch, it's King Kong, yes, it's King Kong
Bitch, it's King Kong, this is King Kong
Chinese ink on, Siamese links on
Call me 2 Chainz, name go ding dong
Bitch, it's King Kong, yes, I'm King Kong
This is King Kong? Yes, Miss King Kong
In my kingdom wit' my Timbs on
How many championships? What? Six rings on


They need rappers like me
They need rappers like me
So they can get on their fucking keyboards
And make me the bad guy, Chun-Li

Ayo, I been on, bitch, you been corn
Bentley tints on, Fendi prints on
I mean I been Storm, X-Men been formed
He keep on dialin' Nicki like the Prince song
I-I-I been on, bitch, you been corn
Bentley tints on, Fendi prints on
Ayo, I been north, Lara been Croft
Plates say Chun-Li, drop the Benz off


I come alive, I, I'm always sky high
Designer thigh highs, it's my lifestyle
I come alive, I, I'm always sky high
Designer thigh highs, it's my lifestyle
I need a Mai Tai, so fuckin' sci-fi
Give me the password to the fuckin' wifi",3642086
124069,2545307,Better Now,rap,Post Malone,2018,1689995,{},"
You prolly think that you are better now, better now
You only say that 'cause I'm not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
You know I say that I am better now, better now
I only say that 'cause you're not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
Oh-oh


I did not believe that it would end, no
Everything came second to the Benzo
You're not even speakin' to my friends, no
You knew all my uncles and my aunts though
Twenty candles, blow 'em out and open your eyes
We were lookin' forward to the rest of our lives
Used to keep my picture posted by your bedside
Now it's in your dresser with the socks you don't like
And I'm rollin', rollin', rollin', rollin'
With my brothers like it's Jonas, Jonas
Drinkin' Henny and I'm tryna forget
But I can't get this shit outta my head

You prolly think that you are better now, better now
You only say that 'cause I'm not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
You know I say that I am better now, better now
I only say that 'cause you're not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
Oh-oh


I seen you with your other dude
He seemed like he was pretty cool
I was so broken over you
Life, it goes on, what can you do?
I just wonder what it's gonna take (What's it gonna take?)
Another foreign or a bigger chain (Bigger chain)
Because no matter how my life has changed
I keep on looking back on better days


You prolly think that you are better now, better now
You only say that 'cause I'm not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
You know I say that I am better now, better now
I only say that 'cause you're not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
Oh-oh

I promise
I swear to you, I'll be okay
You're only the love of my life (Love of my life)


You prolly think that you are better now, better now
You only say that 'cause I'm not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
You know I say that I am better now, better now
I only say that 'cause you're not around, not around
You know I never meant to let you down, let you down
Woulda gave you anything, woulda gave you everything
Oh-oh",3646568
124159,2546694,STARGAZING,rap,Travis Scott,2018,1966707,{},"


Rollin', rollin', rollin', got me stargazin' (Yeah)
Sippin' on purp, feelin' like the Barre Baby (It's lit)
Whatever I downed, it got me goin' crazy (Yah)
Psychedelics got me goin' crazy (Alright)


I was hot as hell out in the heat (Yeah, yeah)
Then a storm came in and saved my life
Head up to the sky, down on my knees (Straight up)
Out of nowhere, you came here to save the night
In the nighttime (Woo, yeah)


Rollin', rollin', rollin', got me stargazin' (Roll)
Psychedelics got me goin' crazy (Oh, no)
Niggas femalin', they excellin' (Yeah)
Are they intellin'? (What you tellin'?)
We propellin', up top with Ellen, uh (With the choppers)
Kill the jealous with propane repellent
Got me goin' crazy (It's lit)
On tour, we'll tell 'em, we brought the section (Gang)
They keep on callin' up, it's getting hectic (Brrt)
Like we projected
So we cut the plug, he's interjected (Got me goin' crazy)

Rollin', rollin', rollin', got me stargazin' (Yeah)
Sippin' on purp, feelin' like the Barre Baby (It's lit)
Whatever I downed, it got me goin' crazy (Yah)
Psychedelics got me goin' crazy (Alright)


I was hot as hell out in the heat (Yeah, yeah)
Then the storm came in and saved my life
Head up to the sky, down on my knees (Straight up)
Out of nowhere, you came here to save the night
In the nighttime (Woo, yeah)


Got me goin' crazy




Okay, I been up for some days, I ain't got time to lay
Just to drown out all these thoughts, I tried all kind of things
If I take you to my past, you will be traumatized
Got a thousand kids outside that's tryna come alive
'99, took AstroWorld, it had to relocate
Told the dawgs I'd bring it back, it was a seal of faith
Before, no car notes, baby girl, she played the tourist guide
Got the keys into my city, now she know the rides
Got new money, got new problems, got new enemies
When you make it to the top, that's the amenities
Packin' out Toyota like I'm in the league
And it ain't a mosh pit if ain't no injuries
I got 'em stage divin' out the nosebleeds (Alright, alright, alright)
And she hit that booger sugar 'til her nose bleed (Alright, alright, alright)
Bounce that shit forever, she on both knees
She was talkin' 'bout forever, got a whole week (Alright, alright, alright)
Plus she know my baby mama is a trophy
She be throwin' up them B's, feel like we both bleed
She keep my dick jumpin' up, feel like I'm Moby
I'm way too gold for this beef, feel like I'm Kobe, yeah
This right here is astronomical
I see you picked up all my ways, I feel responsible
They tryna say that all my problems is improbable
They keep itchin' at my spirit, I'm diabolical
Ya feel me?",3648112
124189,2547562,​​no tears left to cry,pop,Ariana Grande,2018,2835333,{},"
Right now, I'm in a state of mind
I wanna be in like all the time
Ain't got no tears left to cry
So I'm pickin' it up, pickin' it up
I'm lovin', I'm livin' (Oh hey), I'm pickin' it up
I'm pickin' it up, pickin' it up (Yeah)
I'm lovin', I'm livin', I'm pickin' it up (Oh, yeah)


I'm pickin' it up (Yeah), pickin' it up (Yeah)
Lovin', I'm livin', so we turnin' up (We turnin' it up)
Yeah, we turnin' it up


Ain't got no tears in my body
I ran out, but boy, I like it, I like it, I like it
Don't matter how, what, where, who tries it
We out here vibin', we vibin', we vibin'


Comin' out, even when it's rainin' down
Can't stop now, can't stop so shut your mouth
Shut your mouth, and if you don't know
Then now you know it, babe
Know it, babe, yeah

Right now, I'm in a state of mind
I wanna be in like all the time
Ain't got no tears left to cry
So I'm pickin' it up, pickin' it up (Oh yeah)
I'm lovin', I'm livin', I'm pickin' it up
Oh, I just want you to come with me (Ooh)
We're on another mentality
Ain't got no tears left to cry (To cry)
So I'm pickin' it up, pickin' it up (Oh yeah)
I'm lovin', I'm livin', I'm pickin' it up (Oh)


Pickin' it up (Yeah), pickin' it up (Yeah)
Lovin', I'm livin', so we turnin' up (We turnin' it up)
Yeah, we turnin' it up


They point out the colors in you, I see 'em too
And, boy, I like 'em, I like 'em, I like 'em
We're way too fly to partake in all this hate
We out here vibin', we vibin', we vibin'


Comin' out, even when it's rainin' down
Can't stop now, can't stop, so shut your mouth
Shut your mouth, and if you don't know
Then now you know it, babe
Know it, babe, yeah

Right now, I'm in a state of mind
I wanna be in like all the time
Ain't got no tears left to cry
So I'm pickin' it up, pickin' it up (Oh yeah)
I'm lovin', I'm livin', I'm pickin' it up
Oh, I just want you to come with me (Ooh)
We're on another mentality
Ain't got no tears left to cry (To cry)
So I'm pickin' it up, pickin' it up (Oh yeah)
I'm lovin', I'm livin', I'm pickin' it up


Comin' out, even when it's rainin' down
Can't stop now (Hmm, oh)
Shut your mouth
Ain't got no tears left to cry
Oh-yeah, oh, yeah


Oh, I just want you to come with me (Me)
We're on another mentality
Ain't got no tears left to cry (Cry)
So I'm pickin' it up (Yeah), pickin' it up (Oh, yeah)
I'm lovin', I'm livin', I'm pickin' it up (Pickin' it up)

Pickin' it up (Hmm), pickin' it up (Hmm)
Lovin', I'm livin', so we turnin' up (Hmm)
Yeah, we turnin' it up",3649172
124364,2553396,1985,rap,J. Cole,2018,1600078,{},"1985, I arrived
33 years, damn, I'm grateful I survived
We wasn't s'posed to get past 25
Joke's on you motherfucker, we alive
All these niggas popping now is young
Everybody say the music that they make is dumb
I remember I was 18
Money, pussy, parties, I was on the same thing
You gotta give a boy a chance to grow some
Everybody talkin' like they know somethin' these days
Niggas actin' woke, but they broke, umm
I respect the struggle but you all frontin' these days
Man, they barely old enough to drive
To tell them what they should do, who the fuck am I?
I heard one of 'em dissed me, I'm surprised
I ain't trippin', listen good to my reply
Come here lil' man, let me talk with ya
See if I can paint for you the large picture
Congrats 'cause you made it out your mama house
I hope you make enough to buy your mom a house
I see your watch icy and your whip foreign
I got some good advice, never quit tourin'
'Cause that's the way we eat here in this rap game
I'm fuckin' with your funky lil' rap name
I hear your music and I know that rap's changed
A bunch of folks would say that that's a bad thing
'Cause everything's commercial and it's pop now
Trap drums is the shit that's hot now
See, I've been on a quest for the next wave
But never mind, that was just a segue
I must say, by your songs I'm unimpressed, hey
But I love to see a Black man get paid
And plus, you havin' fun and I respect that
But have you ever thought about your impact?
These white kids love that you don't give a fuck
'Cause that's exactly what's expected when your skin black
They wanna see you dab, they wanna see you pop a pill
They wanna see you tatted from your face to your heels
And somewhere deep down, fuck it, I gotta keep it real
They wanna be black and think your song is how it feels
So when you turn up, you see them turnin' up too
You hit the next city, collect your money when it's due
You gettin' that paper, swimmin' in bitches, I don't blame you
You ain't thinkin' 'bout the people that's lookin' like me and you
True, you got better shit to do
You coulda bought a crib with all that bread that you done blew
I know you think this type of revenue is never endin'
But I wanna take a minute just to tell you that ain't true
One day, them kids that's listening gon' grow up
And get too old for that shit that made you blow up
Now your show's lookin' light cause they don't show up
Which unfortunately means the money slow up
Now you scramblin' and hopin' to get hot again
But you forgot you only popped 'cause you was ridin' trends
Now you old news and you goin' through regrets
'Cause you never bought that house, but you got a Benz
And a bunch of jewels and a bunch of shoes
And a bunch of fake friends, I ain't judgin' you
I'm just tellin' you what's probably gon' happen when you rappin'
'Bout the type of shit you rappin' 'bout
It's a faster route to the bottom
I wish you good luck
I'm hoping for your sake that you ain't dumb as you look
But if it's really true what people sayin'
And you call yourself playin' with my name
Then I really know you fucked, trust
I'll be around forever 'cause my skills is tip-top
To any amateur niggas that wanna get rocked
Just remember what I told you when your shit flop
In five years you gon' be on Love & Hip-Hop, nigga",3656498
124375,2553572,KOD,rap,J. Cole,2018,1652345,{},"
Go, go, go
Go, go, go
Go, go, go
Go, go, go


This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit

Wow, niggas been crampin' my style
Blowin' my high, they want a reply
The number one question is, ""How?""
How does it feel now that you on?
How much you worth? How big is your home?
How come you won't get a few features?
I think you should? How 'bout I don't?
How 'bout you just get the fuck off my dick?
How 'bout you listen and never forget?
Only gon' say this one time, then I'll dip
Niggas ain't worthy to be on my shit
Haven't you heard? I'm as cold as the tip
Tip of the iceberg that tipped the Titanic
No tip-toein' around it, my shit is gigantic
As big as the fuckin' Atlantic, I'm lit, bitch


This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit

How I grew up, only few would've loved
'Member I got my first view of the blood
I'm hangin' out and they shoot up the club
My homie got pharmaceutical plug
I smoke the drug and it run through my vein
I think it's workin', it's numbin' the pain
Don't give a fuck and I'm somewhat insane
Don't give a fuck and I'm somewhat insane
Yeah, at this shit daily, sipped so much Actavis
I convinced Actavis that they should pay me
If practice made perfect, I'm practice's baby
If practice made perfect, I'm practice's baby
Platinum wrist ridin' in back like Miss Daisy
Platinum disc and I own masters, bitch, pay me
Y'all niggas trappin' so lack-sical-daisy
My nigga sell crack like it's back in the '80s
Know a young nigga, he actin' so crazy
He serve a few packs and he jack a Mercedes
He shoot at the police, he clap at old ladies
He don't give a fuck if them crackers gon' hang him
Bitches been askin', ""What have you done lately?""
I stacked a few M's like my last name was Shady
My life is too crazy, no actor could play me
My life is too crazy, no actor could play me

This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit
This is what you call a flip
Ten keys from a quarter brick
Bentley from his mama's whip
K.O.D., he hard as shit


Power, greed
Money, Molly, weed
Percs, Xannys, lean, fame
And the strongest drug of them all
And the strongest drug of them all
Love",3656724
124455,2555436,ATM,rap,J. Cole,2018,1148707,{},"
Life can bring much pain
There are many ways to deal with this pain
Choose wisely


Will I fall? Will I fly?
Heal my soul
Fulfill my high
Cross my heart (Count, count, count, count it)
And hope to die (Count, count, count, count it)
With my slice (Count, count, count, count it)
Of Devil's pie


Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it

I know that it's difficult
I'm stackin' this paper, it's sort of habitual
I blow the residual
And fuckin' yo bitch like its part of my ritual
Pardon the visual
But money, it give me a hard-on it's typical
I want it in physical
A million dollars, I count up in intervals
Without it I'm miserable
Don't wanna fall off so I'm all in my bag
Thankin' God like it's biblical
I know it's gon' solve every problem I have
I balled on the principal
Remember the teachers was all on my ass
Now look all of them, pitiful
And all of a sudden I'm so good at math


Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Can't take it when you die, but you can't live without it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Can't take it when you die

Uno, dos, tres


Big bills, big bills
I fell in love with big wheels and quick thrills
My niggas runnin' tip drills, can't sit still
Don't give a fuck if it kills, it mix well
I'm only countin'
Big bills, big bills
I fell in love with big wheels and quick thrills
My niggas runnin' tip drills, can't sit still
Don't give a fuck if it kills, it mix well
I'm only countin'...


Uno, dos, tres, cuatro


Proceed with caution
I heard if you chase it only results in
A hole in your heart
Fuck it, I take the whole cake and I won't leave a portion
It's only an organ
Thank God mama couldn't afford the abortion
The loneliest orphan
I flip my misfortune and grow me a fortune
My Rollie is scorchin'
Them niggas that hated is slowly endorsin'
Now Cole, he important
My niggas beside me like Tommy and Martin
We ball on your court and
Then skate with your bitch like we Tonya Harding
She don't need her garments
She horny from all the money we countin'

Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Can't take it when you die, but you can't live without it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Count it up, count it up, count it up, count it
Can't take it when you die
Uno dos


Will I fall? Will I fly?
Heal my soul
Fulfill my high
Cross my heart
And hope to die
With my slice of Devil's pie",3658953
124477,2556331,Kevins Heart,rap,J. Cole,2018,1755793,{},"
She my number one, I don't need nothing on the side
Said that I was done for good and don't want no more lies
But my phone be blowing up, temptations on my line
I stare at the screen a while before I press decline
But she plants a seed and it still lingers in my mind
Told myself I'm strong enough to shake it and I'm trying
But I'm only human, I know loving you's a crime
If I take this cookie now one day I'll do the time


Slip me a xanny at once (somebody)
I got the earth in a blunt (smoke)
I get the skirt when I want (skrrt!)
I get to skrrt when I want (skrrt!)
Due to the money aroma (somebody)
My girl she got a diploma (smoke)
She got wife written all over
She got wife written all over


All a nigga know is how to fuck a good thing up
Run from the pain, sip lean, smoke tree up
When I'm in your town press pound hit me up
When I'm in your town press pound hit me up
Only if you down and you slurp good D up
If the work good I'll be back for the re-up
Hate when I creep and the phone wake me up
Fake like I'm sleep knowing damn well I be up
Monkey on my back and I walk a hundred miles
Guilt make a nigga feel fake when he smile
Love get confused in the mind of a child
'Cause love wouldn't lie like I lie and it's wild
Wanna have my cake and another cake too
Even if the baker don't bake like you
Even when the flavor don't taste like you
So I'm back mobbing with the late night crew
All in your mind with fears that would come true
The back of my mind, the back of my mind was you
Wishing that I could blind myself from view
And only have eyes, and only have eyes for you

Slip me a xanny at once (somebody)
I got the earth in a blunt (smoke)
I get the skirt when I want (skrrt!)
I get the skirt when I want (skrrt!)
Due to the money aroma (somebody)
My girl she got a diploma (smoke)
She got wife written all over
She got wife written all over


I'm a fake nigga and it's never been clearer
Can't see myself when I look in the mirror
Can't see myself when I look in the mirror
Can't see myself when I look in the mirror
I'm a fake nigga and it's never been clearer
Can't see myself when I look in the mirror
Can't see myself when I look in the mirror
Can't see myself when I look in the mirror


She my number one I don't need nothing on the side
Said that I was done for good and don't want no more lies
But my phone be blowing up, temptations on my line
I stare at the screen a while before I press decline
But she plants a seed and it still lingers in my mind
Told myself I'm strong enough to shake it and I'm trying
But I'm only human, I know loving you's a crime
If I take this cookie now one day I'll do the time

I love her, I don't want to lose her
I'm selfish, I know that I use her
My ego get stroked and I bruise her
My ego get stroked and I bruise her
My actions I know they confusin'
At home I look happy as usual
On the road I'm a mack, I'm a chooser
I'm a addict, I'm maskin' that
Kevin's Heart


They tell me ""What's done in the dark
Will find a way to shine""
I done did so much that when you see you might go blind
What's done in the dark will always find a way to shine
I done did so much that when you see you might go blind",3660088
124839,2565997,YEAH RIGHT,rb,Joji,2018,1243715,{},"
I'ma fuck up my life
I'ma fuck up my life
I'ma fuck up my life
I'ma fuck up my life


I'ma fuck up my life
I'ma fuck up my life
We gon' party all night
She don't care if I die
Yeah, right, yeah, right
Yeah, I bet you won't cry
Yeah, I bet you won't try
But you know I don't mind
But you know I don't mind


Yeah right, yeah right
Yeah right, yeah right
Yeah right, yeah right

Yeah, you bet I know that she ain't
Never give a single fuck about me
Yeah, you bet she know that we ain't
Never gonna be together, I see
Yeah, you bet I go to see you when
I'm feeling like a drum without a beat
Yeah, you dance so good
And I think that's kinda neat


What you know about love?
What you know about life?
What you know about blood?
Bitch, you ain't even my type
Yeah right, yeah right
Yeah, you know I feel right
Yeah, you living right now
You don't ever pick sides
Yeah right, yeah right
I'm overthinking my pride
But I don't gotta look nice
She just feelin' my ice
(She just feelin' my-)


Yeah, you bet I know that she ain't
Never give a single fuck about me
Yeah, you bet she know that we ain't
Never gonna be together, I see
Yeah, you bet I go to see you when
I'm feeling like a drum without a beat
Yeah, you dance so good
And I think that's kinda neat",3672034
125062,2573058,Lift Yourself,rap,Kanye West,2018,1737269,{},"
Hard to see, ooh
The hang ups we have today
Said we need to strive for more liberty
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Lift yourself up on your feet, let's get it on
Hard to see, ooh
The hang ups we have today
Said we need to strive for more liberty
Lift yourself up on your feet
Lift yourself up on your feet
Lift yourself up on your feet
Lift yourself up on your feet
Lift



Lift your- lift your-, lift yourself
Lift-lift your-, lift your-, lift your-, lift your-, lift-lift


Hard to see, ooh
The hang ups we have today-ay-ay
But they don't really realize, though
Said we need to strive for more liberty
This next verse, this next verse though
Lift yourself up on your feet
These bars
Lift yourself up on your feet
Watch this, go


Poopy-di scoop
Scoop-diddy-whoop
Whoop-di-scoop-di-poop
Poop-di-scoopty
Scoopty-whoop
Whoopity-scoop, whoop-poop
Poop-diddy, whoop-scoop
Poop, poop
Scoop-diddy-whoop
Whoop-diddy-scoop
Whoop-diddy-scoop, poop
",3680634
125084,2573662,​R.E.M,rb,Ariana Grande,2018,1089084,{},"
Mmm, last night, boy, I met you, yeah
When I was asleep ('Sleep)
You're such a dream to me, mmm, woah
And it was on a day like this, yeah
If you can believe, if you can believe (If you can believe)
Mmm, you're such a dream to me


Before you speak, don't move
'Cause I don't wanna wake up
Wake up, wake up, wake up
Don't wanna wake up, oh
Wake up, wake up, wake up
Boy, you're such a dream
If you can believe, babe
Boy, you're such a dream to me


""Excuse me, um, I love you""
I know that's not the way to start a conversation, trouble
I watch them other girls when they come and bug you
But I felt like I knew you, so I just wanted to hug you
Plus you don't know your way around
You can stop your playing now
All your worries, lay 'em down, shh, don't say it loud
Is this real, baby?
(Bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum)
You're like: ""I love you-who starts a conversation like that?"" Nobody, but I do
But you are not a picture, I can't cut you up and hide you
I'll get you out my mind, mhm, or try to
But I just want to stand and yell
I will never dare to tell
Think I heard some wedding bells, shh, keep it to yourself
Is this real? (Is this real?)

Before you speak, don't move
'Cause I don't wanna wake up
Wake up, wake up, wake up
Don't wanna wake up, oh no
Wake up, wake up, wake up
'Cause you're such a dream
If you can believe
You're such a dream to me, mmm, boy


I could buy you anything, but I cannot buy you
Before your boy gets smart, I would never try to
You know I'm thinking to myself, ""What happened? Why you?""
But when I see you in my dreams, psh, I know
You know how to treat it, you know how to eat it
You know how to beat it (I know how to keep it)
The Good Housekeeping Seal
(Bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum, bum)
I don't just wanna touch you
I'm tryna turn two single people into a couple
What's your next month like? Tell me what you're up to
We can leave right now, boy, you don't need a duffel
What about La Perla? Let Vickie keep her secret
Boy, it ain't no secret if I know you're gonna peep it, oh

Before you speak, don't move
'Cause I don't wanna wake up
Wake up, wake up, wa-wake up
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wa-wake up
(No I don't want, no)
'Cause you're such a dream (Does this end?)
If you can believe, you're such a dream to me
To me, mmm, boy, to me, mmm, yeah",3681276
125085,2573668,​God is a woman,pop,Ariana Grande,2018,3300453,{},"
You, you love it how I move you
You love it how I touch you, my one
When all is said and done
You'll believe God is a woman
And I, I feel it after midnight
A feelin' that you can't fight, my one
It lingers when we're done
You'll believe God is a woman


I don't wanna waste no time, yeah
You ain't got a one-track mind, yeah
Have it any way you like, yeah
And I can tell that you know I know how I want it
Ain't nobody else can relate
Boy, I like that you ain't afraid
Baby, lay me down and let's pray
I'm tellin' you the way I like it, how I want it


(Yeah) And I can be all the things you told me not to be
(Yeah) When you try to come for me, I keep on flourishing
(Yeah) And he see the universe when I'm the company
It's all in me

You, you love it how I move you
You love it how I touch you, my one
When all is said and done
You'll believe God is a woman
And I, I feel it after midnight
A feelin' that you can't fight, my one
It lingers when we're done
You'll believe God is a woman


(Yeah)
I tell you all the things you should know
So baby, take my hands, save your soul
We can make it last, take it slow, hmm
And I can tell that you know I know how I want it, yeah
But you're different from the rest
And boy, if you confess, you might get blessed
See if you deserve what comes next
I'm tellin' you the way I like it, how I want it


(Yeah) And I can be all the things you told me not to be
(Yeah) When you try to come for me, I keep on flourishing
(Yeah) And he see the universe when I'm the company
It's all in me

You, you love it how I move you
You love it how I touch you, my one
When all is said and done
You'll believe God is a woman
And I, I feel it after midnight
A feelin' that you can't fight, my one
It lingers when we're done
You'll believe God is a woman


Yeah, yeah
(God is a woman)
Yeah, yeah
(God is a woman, yeah)
My one
(One)
When all is said and done
You'll believe God is a woman
You'll believe God
(God is a woman)
Oh, yeah
(God is a woman, yeah)
(One)
It lingers when we're done
You'll believe God is a woman",3681280
125087,2573672,​sweetener,rb,Ariana Grande,2018,1170838,{},"
When life deals us cards (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Make everything taste like it is salt (Ayy, ooh, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Then you come through like the sweetener you are  (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
To bring the bitter taste to a halt  (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)


And then you get it, get it, get it, get it (Ayy)
Hit it, hit it, hit it, hit it (Ayy)
Flip it, flip it, flip it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
Twist it, twist it, twist it, twist it
Mix it and mix it and mix it and mix it
Kiss it, kiss it, kiss it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)


I like the way you lick the bowl (You lick the bowl, sheesh)
Somehow your method touches (Sheesh!) my soul (Sheesh, touches my soul, yeah)
It lifts me up to heights unknown (Ayy, Sweetener, sweetener, sweetener, sweetener, sweetener)
So when they ask, ""How's life?"" (Sheesh!) I go (Sheesh!)

When life deals us cards (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Make everything taste like it is salt (Ayy, ooh, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Then you come through like the sweetener you are  (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
To bring the bitter taste to a halt  (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)


And then you get it, get it, get it, get it (Ayy)
Hit it, hit it, hit it, hit it (Ayy)
Flip it, flip it, flip it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
Twist it, twist it, twist it, twist it
Mix it and mix it and mix it and mix it
Kiss it, kiss it, kiss it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)


Your mama sent us horoscopes (Us horoscopes, sheesh)
Had so much fun watching them unfold (Sheesh, watching them unfold, yeah)
You said she like me, I smile (Ayy), I know (Sweetener, sweetener, sweetener, sweetener, sweetener)
So when they ask, ""How's life?"" (Sheesh!) I go (Sheesh!)


When life deals us cards (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Make everything taste like it is salt (Ayy, ooh, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Then you come through like the sweetener you are  (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
To bring the bitter taste to a halt  (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)

And then you get it, get it, get it, get it (Ayy)
Hit it, hit it, hit it, hit it (Ayy)
Flip it, flip it, flip it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
Twist it, twist it, twist it, twist it
Mix it and mix it and mix it and mix it
Kiss it, kiss it, kiss it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)


And then we lay it back, talk the rest of the night
Things that we can light make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
Talking 'bout what you wanna do, whether it's wrong or right
I am followin' you 'cause you make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
(Hey) Said I don't know what I'd do without you in my life (ayy), it'd be so sour (Sweetener, ayy)
I'm hoping that everybody can experience what we have in ours (Sweetener, sweetener, ayy, ayy, ayy, sweetener, ayy, ayy, ayy)


When life deals us cards (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy)
Make everything taste like it is salt (Sheesh, sheesh!)
Then you come through like the sweetener (Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy) you are
To bring the bitter taste to a halt (Sheesh, sheesh!)


And then you get it, get it, get it, get it (Ayy)
Hit it, hit it, hit it, hit it (Ayy)
Flip it, flip it, flip it
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
Twist it, twist it, twist it, twist it
Mix it and mix it and mix it and mix it
Kiss it, kiss it, kiss it (Sweetener, sweetener, sweetener, sweet)
You make me say oh (Sheesh!), oh (Sheesh!)
You make me say oh, babe!
Hey, ayy, oh yeah...",3681285
125088,2573675,​​breathin,pop,Ariana Grande,2018,1992922,{},"
lacigam gnihtemos od oT
thgin laiceps ruoy s'thginot tuB


Some days, things just take
Way too much of my energy
I look up and the whole room's spinning
You take my cares away
I can so over-complicate, people tell me to medicate


Feel my blood runnin', swear the sky's fallin'
I know that all this shit's fabricated, mmm
Time goes by and I can't control my mind
Don't know what else to try, but you tell me every time


Just keep breathin' and breathin' and breathin' and breathin'
And oh, I gotta keep, keep on breathin'
Just keep breathin' and breathin' and breathin' and breathin'
And oh, I gotta keep, keep on breathin', mmm-mmm

Sometimes it's hard to find
Find my way up into the clouds
Tune it out, they can be so loud
You remind me of a time
When things weren't so complicated
All I need is to see your face


Feel my blood runnin', swear the sky's fallin'
I know that all this shit's fabricated, mmm
Time goes by and I can't control my mind
Don't know what else to try, but you tell me every time


Just keep breathin' and breathin' and breathin' and breathin'
And oh, I gotta keep, I keep on breathin'
Just keep breathin' and breathin' and breathin' and breathin'
And oh, I gotta keep, I keep on breathin', mmm, yeah


My, my air, my, my air
My, my air, my air
My, my air, my, my air
My, my air, yeah

Just keep breathin' and breathin' and breathin' and breathin'
And oh, I gotta keep, I keep on breathin'
Just keep breathin' and breathin' and breathin' and breathin'
And oh, I gotta keep, I keep on breathin', mmm, yeah


Feel my blood runnin', swear the sky's fallin', oh, whoa
I keep on breathin', oh yeah
Time goes by and I can't control my mind
I keep on breathin', mmm, yeah",3681287
125167,2576385,Back to You,pop,Selena Gomez,2018,1386605,{},"
Took you like a shot
Thought that I could chase you with a cold evenin'
Let a couple years water down how I'm feelin' about you
(Feelin' about you)
And every time we talk
Every single word builds up to this moment
And I gotta convince myself I don't want it
Even though I do (even though I do)


You could break my heart in two
But when it heals, it beats for you
I know it's forward, but it's true


I wanna hold you when I'm not supposed to
When I'm lyin' close to someone else
You're stuck in my head and I can't get you out of it
If I could do it all again, I know I'd go back to you

I know I'd go back to you, oh
I know I'd go back to you


We never got it right
Playin' and replayin' old conversations
Overthinkin' every word and I hate it
'Cause it's not me ('Cause it's not me, 'cause it's not me)
And what's the point in hidin'?
Everybody knows, we got unfinished business
And I'll regret it if I didn't say
This isn't what it could be (isn't what it could be)


You could break my heart in two
But when it heals, it beats for you
I know it's forward, but it's true


I wanna hold you when I'm not supposed to
When I'm lyin' close to someone else
You're stuck in my head and I can't get you out of it
If I could do it all again, I know I'd go back to you


I know I'd go back to you
I know I'd go back to you
I'd go back to you
I'd go back to you
I know I said I wasn't sure
But I'd go back to you
I know I'd go back to you

You can break my heart in two
But when it heals, it beats for you
I know it's forward, but it's true
Won't lie, I'd go back to you
You know, my thoughts are runnin' loose
It's just a thing you make me do
And I could fight, but what's the use?
I know I'd go back to you


I wanna hold you when I'm not supposed to
When I'm lyin' close to someone else
You're stuck in my head and I can't get you out of it
If I could do it all again, I know I'd go back to you


I'll go back to you
I'll go back to you
I know I'd go back to you
I'd go back to you, I'd go back to you
I know I'd go back to you
(Go back to you, go back to you)
(Go back to you, go back to you)
(Go back to you, go back to you)",3684536
125245,2579785,This Is America,rap,Childish Gambino,2018,5269925,{},"
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, go, go away
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, go, go away
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, go, go away
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, go, go away


We just wanna party
Party just for you
We just want the money
Money just for you (Yeah)
I know you wanna party
Party just for free
Girl, you got me dancin' (Girl, you got me dancin')
Dance and shake the frame (Yeah)
We just wanna party (Yeah)
Party just for you (Yeah)
We just want the money (Yeah)
Money just for you (You)
I know you wanna party (Yeah)
Party just for free (Yeah)
Girl, you got me dancin' (Girl, you got me dancin', yeah)
Dance and shake the frame (Ooh)

This is America
Don't catch you slippin' now
Don't catch you slippin' now
Look what I'm whippin' now
This is America (Woo)
Don't catch you slippin' now
Don't catch you slippin' now
Look what I'm whippin' now


This is America (Skrrt, skrrt, woo)
Don't catch you slippin' now (Ayy)
Look how I'm livin' now
Police be trippin' now (Woo)
Yeah, this is America (Woo, ayy)
Guns in my area (Word, my area)
I got the strap (Ayy, ayy)
I gotta carry 'em
Yeah, yeah, I'ma go into this (Ugh)
Yeah, yeah, this is guerilla (Woo)
Yeah, yeah, I'ma go get the bag
Yeah, yeah, or I'ma get the pad
Yeah, yeah, I'm so cold like, yeah (Yeah)
I'm so dope like, yeah (Woo)
We gon' blow like, yeah (Straight up, uh)

Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, tell somebody
You go tell somebody
Grandma told me
Get your money, Black man (Get your- Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Get your-Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Get your-Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Get your-Black man)
Black man


This is America (Woo, ayy)
Don't catch you slippin' now (Woo, woo, don't catch you slippin' now)
Don't catch you slippin' now (Ayy, woah)
Look what I'm whippin' now (Slime!)
This is America (Yeah, yeah)
Don't catch you slippin' now (Woah, ayy)
Don't catch you slippin' now (Ayy, woo)
Look what I'm whippin' now (Ayy)


Look how I'm geekin' out (Hey)
I'm so fitted (I'm so fitted, woo)
I'm on Gucci (I'm on Gucci)
I'm so pretty (Yeah, yeah, woo)
I'm gon' get it (Ayy, I'm gon' get it)
Watch me move (Blaow)
This a celly (Ha)
That's a tool (Yeah)
On my Kodak (Woo) Black
Ooh, know that (Yeah, know that, hold on)
Get it (Woo, get it, get it)
Ooh, work it (21)
Hunnid bands, hunnid bands, hunnid bands (Hunnid bands)
Contraband, contraband, contraband (Contraband)
I got the plug in Oaxaca (Woah)
They gonna find you like ""blocka"" (Blaow)

Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, tell somebody
America, I just checked my following list, and
You go tell somebody
You mothafuckas owe me
Grandma told me
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Black man
(1, 2, 3-get down)
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, tell somebody
You go tell somebody
Grandma told me, ""Get your money""
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Get your money, Black man (Black man)
Black man


You just a black man in this world
You just a barcode, ayy
You just a black man in this world
Drivin' expensive foreigns, ayy
You just a big dawg, yeah
I kenneled him in the backyard
No, probably ain't life to a dog
For a big dog",3688791
125272,2581122,FAKE LOVE,pop,BTS,2018,1322747,{},"


널 위해서라면 난
슬퍼도 기쁜 척 할 수가 있었어
널 위해서라면 난
아파도 강한 척 할 수가 있었어
사랑이 사랑만으로 완벽하길
내 모든 약점들은 다 숨겨지길
이뤄지지 않는 꿈속에서
피울 수 없는 꽃을 키웠어


I'm so sick of this fake love, fake love, fake love
I'm so sorry but it's fake love, fake love, fake love


I wanna be a good man just for you
세상을 줬네 just for you
전부 바꿨어 just for you
Now I don't know me, who are you?
우리만의 숲 너는 없었어
내가 왔던 route 잊어버렸어
나도 내가 누구였는지도 잘 모르게 됐어
거울에다 지껄여봐 너는 대체 누구니

널 위해서라면 난
슬퍼도 기쁜 척 할 수가 있었어
널 위해서라면 난
아파도 강한 척 할 수가 있었어
사랑이 사랑만으로 완벽하길
내 모든 약점들은 다 숨겨지길
이뤄지지 않는 꿈속에서
피울 수 없는 꽃을 키웠어


Love you so bad, love you so bad
널 위해 예쁜 거짓을 빚어내
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
날 지워 너의 인형이 되려 해
Love you so bad, love you so bad
널 위해 예쁜 거짓을 빚어내
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
날 지워 너의 인형이 되려 해


I'm so sick of this fake love, fake love, fake love
I'm so sorry but it's fake love, fake love, fake love


Why you sad? I don't know 난 몰라
웃어봐 사랑해 말해봐
나를 봐 나조차도 버린 나
너조차 이해할 수 없는 나
낯설다 하네
니가 좋아하던 나로 변한 내가
아니라 하네
예전에 니가 잘 알고 있던 내가
아니긴 뭐가 아냐 난 눈 멀었어
사랑은 뭐가 사랑 it's all fake love

(Woo) I don't know, I don't know, I don't know why
(Woo) 나도 날 나도 날 모르겠어
(Woo) I just know, I just know, I just know why
'Cause it's all fake love, fake love, fake love


Love you so bad, love you so bad
널 위해 예쁜 거짓을 빚어내
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
날 지워 너의 인형이 되려 해
Love you so bad, love you so bad
널 위해 예쁜 거짓을 빚어내
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
날 지워 너의 인형이 되려 해


I'm so sick of this fake love, fake love, fake love
I'm so sorry but it's fake love, fake love, fake love


널 위해서라면 난
슬퍼도 기쁜 척 할 수가 있었어
널 위해서라면 난
아파도 강한 척 할 수가 있었어
사랑이 사랑만으로 완벽하길
내 모든 약점들은 다 숨겨지길
이뤄지지 않는 꿈속에서
피울 수 없는 꽃을 키웠어",3690426
125307,2581851,Praise the Lord Da Shine,rap,A$AP Rocky,2018,1695740,"{Skepta,""A\\$AP Rocky""}","
Get it
Text a message, I don't know the number
Flexin' on these niggas, every bone and muscle
Steady taking shots, but never hurting numbers
Even then, y'all don't worry nothin'
And I'd like to give a shout-out to my niggas with a game plan
And shout-outs to my niggas with escape plans
Uh, twenty bands, rain dance
We could either rain check or we can make plans
Pockets loaded, rocket loaded, okay, let's rock and roll this
It's time to go, Lock, Stock, and Two Smoking Barrels
Locked and loaded, diamonds glowing, chart-climbing on 'em
You'd think I'm jumping out the window how I got 'em open
Line around the corner, line 'em up the block and over
Sometimes I even stop the smoking when it's time to focus
My shades, Dior, my pants, velour
Create, explore, expand, conquer


I came, I saw, I came, I saw
I praise the Lord, then break the law
I take what's mine, then take some more
It rains, it pours, it rains, it pours
I came, I saw, I came, I saw
I praise the Lord, then break the law
I take what's mine, then take some more
It rains, it pours, it rains, it pours

Yeah, I sold the pack, the loose, the hard (Yeah)
I listened to X, I peeped the bars (Yeah)
The snakes, the rats, the cats, the dogs
The game's a trap, protect your heart (Yeah)
I waited in line, return, refine
The new design, it's time to shine
To shine, to shine, to shine, to shine
I hustle, I flex, the world is mine
So please believe, allow the greaze
These niggas disease, don't speak, we squeeze
I make the devil go weak the knees
You hate, you're lame, your loss


I came, I saw, I came, I saw
I praise the Lord, then break the law
I take what's mine, then take some more
It rains, it pours, it rains, it pours
I came, I saw, I came, I saw
I praise the Lord, then break the law
I take what's mine, then take some more
It rains, it pours, it rains, it pours


Uh, she came, I came, now what's my name?
My chain, my pants, my pants with the chain
They know it's me, the hat and the shades
They heard my voice and they ran to the stage
My Vans, my braids, my mans, my babes
My girls, my ex, my hoes that I left
The way I stepped out the car, that's a flex
Give thanks, get fresh, praise the Lord then finesse, bless

I came, I saw, I came, I saw
I praise the Lord, then break the law
I take what's mine, then take some more
It rains, it pours, it rains, it pours
I came, I saw, I came, I saw
I praise the Lord, then break the law
I take what's mine, then take some more
It rains, it pours, it rains, it pours",3691324
125315,2581992,Dream Song,pop,Taylor Lautner,2005,1178929,{Lavagirl},"
Close your eyes, shut your mouth
Dream a dream and get us out
Dream, dream, dream, dream, dream, dream


Hit the hay, fast asleep
Dream a dream, you little bleep
Dream, dream, dream, dream, dream, dream


Just relax, lay about
Or my fist will put you out
Dream, dream, dream, dream, dream, dream


Take your time, but beware
There is darkness in the air
Dream, dream, dream, dream, dream, dream


Don't despair, step right up
Glass of water, here's a cup
Dream, dream, dream, dream, dream, dream",3691525
125408,2583619,TATI,rap,6ix9ine,2018,1108287,"{""DJ SpinKing""}","
Hold up, let me get it started
B.B. with the Robin's, lookin' all retarded
B.B. saggin', fly like a dragon
Bitches suck my dick, 'cause I'm fly like Aladdin
Scum Gang!


These bitches think I'm stupid, I ain't stupid
Dummy boys fall in love with it, he stupid
All these hoes on my body, cut the bullshit
All these hoes, they ain't loyal, y'all lookin' stupid
I just left Starlets and I ain't even cash out
Back out, straight to the trap house, I blow her back out
I'll pull her tracks out, got her running like it's track now
Like a Smackdown, rock bottom I'ma pin her down
Hold up, let me get it started
B.B. with the Robin's, lookin' all retarded
B.B. saggin', fly like a dragon
Bitches suck my dick 'cause I'm fly like Aladdin

Pour a semi, pull up to the cribby, uh
Licky-licky, licky on my blicky, uh
Take a flicky, make a movie with me, uh
Take a flicky, make 'em real drippy, uh
Why you watching me?
You all on my IG
Why you stalking me?
You don't even follow me
Why you tweet my shit?
You ain't used to read my shit
Bitch, you used to fuckin' leave me on seen and shit


Went to the Eastside, spanked out Juju
Lucky I ain't have it on me, I was gon' shoot you
Spanked him on camera, threw it on YouTube
Stupid lil' dumb nigga, now you on YouTube
If a nigga want beef, I'm the type to drag it
Shoot you while you with your bitch then it's back to mackin'
Police pull up on me, I don't know what happened
Police pull up on you, you gon' get to yappin'
We gon' get to clappin', we been on static
Semi-automatics, they gon' get to clappin'
We ain't with the chattin', you lil' niggas cappin'
If we catch you lackin', turn you into has-beens
Ran through Lust, 100 bands up
Shout out SpinKing, that's my motherfuckin' blood, nigga
Go, go, go mulignane
Go, go, mulignane

Pour a semi, pull up to the cribby, uh
Licky-licky, licky on my blicky, uh
Take a flicky, make a movie with me, uh
Take a flicky, make 'em real drippy, uh
Why you watching me?
You all on my IG
Why you stalking me?
You don't even follow me
Why you tweet my shit?
You ain't used to read my shit
Bitch, you used to fuckin' leave me on seen and shit",3693552
125637,2591413,Yes Indeed,rap,Lil Baby & Drake,2018,2491605,{},"
Yeah
Wheezy outta here


The dash, it's digi', the schedule busy
My head in a hoodie, my shorty a goodie
My cousins are crazy, my cousins like Boogie
Life is amazin', it is what it should be
Been here for ten but I feel like a rookie
I tell her, ""Look up"" 'cause it's snowin' in Tootsie's
Booked for three years, man, you can't even book me
It's me and Lil Baby, this shit goin' crazy
Wheezy produced it and Weezy F. made me
And she held it down, so she got a Mercedes
Young Money Records, the Army, the Navy
They ran me ten thousand, I threw it like Brady
The foreign is yellow like Tracee and K.D
I trusted my niggas, they never betrayed me
Met all these niggas, they sweeter than Sadie
When I started out, I just took what they gave me
Did all the favors, they never repaid me
It worked in my favor, 'cause nobody saved me

Brand new whip got no keys
Tailor my clothes, no starch, please
Soon as I nut, you can gon' leave
Got M's in the bank, like, ""Yes, indeed""


Cartier glasses, I won't even peek at you
Yellow Ferrari like Pikachu
I got 'em waitin' and watchin' what he gon' do
Tryna peep what I do, tryna steal my moves
25 hundred for a new pair of tennis shoes
The same price, I could make them youngins come and finish you
Lawyer been chargin', he a Jewish like he voodoo
Real dope boy, hundred thousand in Evisu
Presidential tints slide by, we don't see you
I been gettin' money, I ain't worried 'bout what he do
I'm gettin' money like I'm from the '80s
Me and Drake 'bout to drop, man, this shit gon' go crazy
They know I'm the truth, comin' straight from the basement
I'm straight as the street, man I come from the pavement
A million, all hundreds, it make 'em go crazy
Wah-wah-wah, bitch, I'm the baby


Brand new whip got no keys
Tailor my clothes, no starch, please
Soon as I nut, you can gon' leave
Got M's in the bank, like, ""Yes, indeed""
Me and my dawg goin' all the way
When you livin' like this, they supposed to hate
Brand new whip got no keys
Tailor my clothes, no starch, please
Soon as I nut, you can gon' leave
Got M's in the bank, like, ""Yes, indeed""
Me and my dawg goin' all the way
When you livin' like this, they supposed to hate

Wheezy outta here",3702977
125653,2592084,Wishing Well,rap,Juice WRLD,2020,1711804,{},"
Mm-mm, mm-mm-mm-mm, mm-mm-mm, uh
I can't breathe (Chopsquad), I can't breathe, 999
Waiting for the exhale
I toss my pain with my wishes in a wishing well


I can't breathe, I'm waiting for the exhale
Toss my pain with my wishes in a wishing well
Still no luck, but oh well
I still try even though I know I'm gon' fail
Stress on my shoulders like a anvil
Perky got me itching like a anthill
Drugs killing me softly, Lauryn Hill
Sometimes I don't know how to feel


Ring-ring, phone call from depression
You used my past and my memories as a weapon
On the other line, I talk to addiction, huh
Speaking of the devil, all the drugs, I miss them
This can't be real, is it fiction?
Somethin' feels broke, need to fix it
I cry out for help, do they listen?
I'ma be alone until it's finished

This is the part where I tell you I'm fine, but I'm lying
I just don't want you to worry
This is the part where I take all my feelings and hide 'em
'Cause I don't want nobody to hurt me


I can't breathe, I'm waiting for the exhale
Toss my pain with my wishes in a wishing well
Still no luck, but oh well
I still try even though I know I'm gon' fail
It's stress on my shoulders like a anvil
Perky got me itching like a anthill
Drugs killing me softly, Lauryn Hill
Sometimes I don't know how to feel


Sometimes I don't know how to feel
Let's be for real
If it wasn't for the pills, I wouldn't be here
But if I keep taking these pills, I won't be here, yeah
I just told y'all my secret, yeah
It's tearing me to pieces
I really think I need them
I stopped taking the drugs and now the drugs take me

This is the part where I tell you I'm fine, but I'm lying
I just don't want you to worry
This is the part where I take all my feelings and hide 'em
'Cause I don't want nobody to hurt me


I can't breathe, I'm waiting for the exhale
Toss my pain with my wishes in a wishing well
Still no luck, but oh well
I still try even though I know I'm gon' fail
It's stress on my shoulders like a anvil
Perky got me itching like a anthill
Drugs killing me softly, Lauryn Hill
Sometimes I don't know how to feel",3703705
126029,2602307,전하지 못한 진심 The Truth Untold,pop,BTS,2018,1008801,"{""Steve Aoki""}","


외로움이 가득히
피어있는 이 garden
가시투성이
이 모래성에 난 날 매었어


너의 이름은 뭔지
갈 곳이 있긴 한지
Oh could you tell me?
이 정원에 숨어든 널 봤어


And I know
너의 온긴 모두 다 진짜란 걸
푸른 꽃을 꺾는 손
잡고 싶지만


내 운명인 걸
Don't smile to me
Light on me
너에게 다가설 수 없으니까
내겐 불러줄 이름이 없어

You know that I can't
Show you me
Give you me
초라한 모습 보여줄 순 없어
또 가면을 쓰고 널 만나러 가
But I still want you


외로움의 정원에 핀
너를 닮은 꽃
주고 싶었지
바보 같은 가면을 벗고서


But I know
영원히 그럴 수는 없는 걸
숨어야만 하는 걸
추한 나니까


난 두려운 걸
초라해
I'm so afraid
결국엔 너도 날 또 떠나버릴까
또 가면을 쓰고 널 만나러 가

할 수 있는 건
정원에
이 세상에
예쁜 너를 닮은 꽃을 피운 다음
니가 아는 나로 숨쉬는 것
But I still want you
Ooh, ooh
I still want you
Ooh


어쩌면 그때
조금만
이만큼만
용길 내서 너의 앞에 섰더라면
지금 모든 건 달라졌을까


난 울고 있어
사라진
무너진
홀로 남겨진 이 모래성에서
부서진 가면을 바라보면서
And I still want you
But I still want you
But I still want you
And I still want you",3715886
126039,2602749,SLOW DANCING IN THE DARK,pop,Joji,2018,2665338,{},"
I don't want a friend (Just one more night)
I want my life in two (My life in two)
Please one more night
Waiting to get there
Waiting for you (Waiting for you)
Just one more night
I'm done fighting all night


When I'm around slow dancing in the dark
Don't follow me, you'll end up in my arms
You done made up your mind
I don't need no more signs
Can you?
Can you?


Give me reasons we should be complete
You should be with him, I can't compete
You looked at me like I was someone else, oh well
Can't you see? (Can't you see?)
I don't wanna slow dance (I don't wanna slow dance)
In the dark, dark

When you gotta run
Just hear my voice in you (My voice in you)
Shutting me out you (Shutting me out)
Doing so great (So great, so great)
You


Used to be the one to hold you when you fall
Yeah, yeah, yeah (When you fall, when you fall)
I don't fuck with your tone (I don't fuck with your tone)
I don't wanna go home (I don't wanna go home)
Can it be one night?
Can you?
Can you?


Give me reasons we should be complete
You should be with him, I can't compete
You looked at me like I was someone else, oh well
Can't you see?
I don't wanna slow dance (I don't wanna slow dance)
In the dark, dark
In the dark, dark",3716416
126123,2605865,Arms Around You,pop,XXXTENTACION & Lil Pump,2018,1437415,"{""Swae Lee"",Maluma}","
Oh-oh (Ooh, ooh)
(Lil Pump
Maluma, baby)
Oh, woo-oh-oh, oh, ya-ah-aah
Mally, Mally Mall


Arms around you
Te amo, mami, let me hold you
Got my arms right around you, girl, oi
Good lovin', arms all around you
To make sure no one could harm you
Damn, lil' mami, let me have you, oi


Yes, she drivin' me crazy (Yeah)
I take drugs on the daily (Ooh)
Pull out the 'Rari or the Mercedes (Which one?)
Yeah, she got my heart racing, racing (Yeah)
Foreign cars, foreign hoes
Yeah, we got a lot of those (Ooh)
Ten bands on my Gucci coat (Ooh)
Ten hoes in the studio (Huh)
Yes, I'm gonna miss you though (Yuh)
But I gotta let her go (Brr)
Spanish bitches love the coke (Wow)
Put my dick straight down her throat (Damn)
I know that your baby daddy broke (Broke)
Take your wife backstage at a festival
Penthouse, 54th floor, let's go (Let's go)
And my hotel came with a stripper pole

Arms around you
Te amo, mami, let me hold you
Got my arms right around you, girl, oi
Good lovin', arms all around you
To make sure no one could harm you
Damn, lil' mami, let me have you, oi


If you ever get to feel my touch
Then you might never get enough
Yes, I know you feel the ambiance (Hey)
Love you like I'll never see you again
Only real 'cause I'm not for pretend (No)
Reaching out with your arms extended
My love is emergency and I can sense the urgency (Ya-ah)
Come, let me, woah-oh-oh-oh
Your body is just for me (For me)
It was like sorcery
She left me like an alcoholic


Arms around you
Te amo, mami, let me hold you
Got my arms right around you, girl, oi
Good lovin', arms all around you
To make sure no one could harm you
Damn, lil' mami, let me have you, oi

Yeah, Maluma, baby (Dice)
Ey, mama (Mamá), te espera un party en mi cama (Cama)
Me encanta la forma en que me hablas (Hablas)
Invita a tu amiga la Juana
Pa' que fumemos como fumamos en La Habana
Siempre andamos positivos
Esa es la forma en que vivo, activo
Que se joda el que no esté en lo mismo
Yo disfruto mientras siga vivo
Di que sí, que no te cuesta
Si conmigo estás vestida de Chanel (Oh, yeah)
Hasta los pies (Oh, yeah)
Si tú te pones pa'l problema
Yo me pongo como se tiene que ser
De una vez, bebé, bebé (Maluma, baby)


Arms around you
Te amo, mami, let me hold you
Got my arms right around you, girl, oi
Good lovin', arms all around you
To make sure no one could harm you
Damn, lil' mami, let me have you, oi


Fx
My name is",3720335
126134,2606134,Taste,rap,Tyga,2018,1767532,{Offset},"
D.A.
Hah


Slide on it pimp game with my pinky ring
Lotta gang, lotta bitches, and a icy chain
Why you claim that you rich? That's a false claim
I be straight to the whip, no baggage claim
Whole lotta styles, can't even pronounce the name
You ain't got no style, see you on my Instagram
I be rockin' it like it's fresh out the pan
Only when I'm takin' pics, I'm the middleman
Walk, talk it like a boss, I just lift a hand
Three million cash, call me Rain Man
Money like a shower, that's my rain dance
And we all in black, like it's Gangland
Say the wrong words, you be hangman
Watch me stick to your bitch like a spray tan
Aw, Mr. What-Kind-of-Car-He-In?
And the city love my name, nigga, I ain't gotta say it

(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), fuck what a nigga say
It's all the same like Mary-Kate
(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), let you get a taste
(Taste, taste), do you love the taste?
Yeah, that's cool, but he ain't like me


Lotta girls like me, niggas wanna fight me
Nigga, get your ass checked like a fuckin' Nike
Me not icy, that's unlikely
And she gon' suck me like a fuckin' Hi-C
Aw, chains on the neck for the whole team
And I feel like Gucci with the ice cream
And my bitch want the Fenty, not the Maybelline
I'm the black JB, the way these bitches scream
Make these bitches scream
Ah, pretty little thing
Like my nigga A.E.
Say, ""Yadadadamean""


(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), fuck what a nigga say
It's all the same like Mary-Kate
(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), let you get a taste
(Yes, yes), do you love the taste?
Yeah, that's cool (Offset)

Yeah, I'ma put the drip on the plate, yeah (Drip, drip)
Diamond ice glacier, niggas imitate (Ice, ice)
Ayy, ayy, feed me grapes, Maybach with the drake (Grapes)
Slow pace in the Wraith, got this shit from bae (Skrrt)
Diamonds up to par (Par), the cookie hittin' hard (Hard)
The 'Rari sit in park (Park), on Addy on Mars (Mars)
Shotgun shells, we gon' always hit the target (Blah)
Popcorn, big shell poppin' out the cartridge (Pop it)
3400 Nawfside, Charles Barkley (Nawf)
4-8-8, Ferrari (Skrrt)
Make her get on top of me and ride me like a Harley (Ride)
She wanna keep me company and never wan' depart me, depart me (No)
Yeah, fishtail in the parking lot (Skrrt, skrrt)
I don't kick it with these niggas 'cause they talk about ya (Yeah)
Yeah, and I got the fire, don't make me spark it out ya (Fire)
Yeah, keep it in my back pocket like it's a wallet (Who?)
Like the way she suck it, suck it like a Jolly (Woah)
Stack it up and put it with the whole project (Racks)
And she got that Patek on water moccasin (Patek)
I'm rich in real life, I get that profit, copy (Hey)


(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), let you get a taste
(Taste, taste), do you love the taste?
Yeah, that's cool, but he ain't like me

(Taste, taste), LA, you can get a taste
(Taste, taste), Miami, you can get a taste
(Taste, taste), Oakland, you can get a taste
(Taste, taste), New York, do you love the taste?
(Taste, taste), Chi-Town, you can get a taste
(Taste, taste), Houston, you can get a taste
(Taste, taste), ayy, Portland, you can get a taste
(Taste, taste), overseas, let them bitches taste
(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), she can get a taste
(Taste, taste), do you love the taste?
(Taste, taste), worldwide, they gon' get a taste",3720642
126146,2606346,All Mine,rap,Kanye West,2018,2309409,{},"
Yeah, you supermodel thick
Damn, that ass bustin' out the bottom
I'ma lose my mind in it
Crazy, that medulla oblongata
Get to rubbin' on my lamp
Get the genie out the bottle


Fuck it up, fuck it up
Pussy good, go 'n back it up
Pipe her up, I'ma pipe her up
Make her mine, I done fell in love
Juicy thing, make that pussy sing
One more time, baby, do it big
Make it cry, come boohoo this shit


Yeah, you supermodel thick
Damn, that ass bustin' out the bottom
I'ma lose my mind in it
Crazy, that medulla oblongata
Get to rubbin' on my lamp
Get the genie out the bottle

If I pull up with a Kerry Washington
That's gon' be an enormous scandal
I could have Naomi Campbell
And still might want me a Stormy Daniels
Sometimes you gotta bag the boss up
I call that takin' Corey Gambles
Find yourself up in the food court
You might have to enjoy a sample
All these thots on Christian Mingle
Almost what got Tristan single
If you don't ball like him or Kobe
Guarantee that bitch gonna leave you
Ayy, time is extremely valuable
And I prefer to waste it on girls that's basic
That's just some Ye shit
Right now, let's do what we want
Let's have a threesome: me, you, and a blunt
I love your titties 'cause they prove
I can focus on two things at once


Yeah, you supermodel thick
Damn, that ass bustin' out the bottom
I'ma lose my mind in it
Crazy, that medulla oblongata
Get to rubbin' on my lamp
Get the genie out the bottle
Get the genie out the bottle

Let me hit it raw like fuck the outcome
Ayy, none of us'd be here without cum
Ayy, if it ain't all about the income
Ayy, ayy, let me see you go ahead and spend some
Ayy, if you drivin' 'round in some Dri-Fit
Ayy, I'ma think that you the type to dry snitch
Hm, mhm, if I see you pull up with the three stripes
Ayy, ayy, I'ma fuck around and make you my bitch


Yeah, you supermodel thick
Damn, that ass bustin' out the bottom
I'ma lose my mind in it
Crazy, that medulla oblongata
Get to rubbin' on my lamp
Get the genie out the bottle
Get the genie out the bottle",3720959
126467,2613463,BAD,rap,XXXTENTACION,2018,1439131,{},"
Yeah


Shawty, heard you bad... word? So profane
Somethin' like a bad, word, want your love
Call me when you can, girl
Goin' up, goin' down, in and out, turn around
Shawty, heard you bad... word? So profane
Somethin' like a bad, word, want your love
Call me when you can, girl
Goin' up, goin' down, in and out, turn around
Love the way you movin' now


I might be insane, yeah
But I love the pain, yeah
Feel it in the brain, yeah, oh
Realize she just want me hit it right
'Cause I get 'em goin' right

Shawty, heard you bad... word? So profane
Somethin' like a bad, word, want your love
Call me when you can, girl
Goin' up, goin' down, in and out, turn around
Shawty, heard you bad... word? So profane
Somethin' like a bad, word, want your love
Call me when you can, girl
Goin' up, goin' down, in and out, turn around
Love the way you movin' now",3729609
126585,2617472,Robbery,rap,Juice WRLD,2019,1487174,{},"
Man, what? (Haha)
This shit funny, one sec
Oof, this Hennessy strong as fuck, boy


She told me put my heart in the bag (In the bag)
And nobody gets hurt (No hurt)
Now I'm running from her love, I'm not fast (Fast)
So I'm making it worse (Making it worse)
Now I'm digging up a grave from my past
I'm a whole different person (I'm a whole different person)
It's a gift and a curse (It's a gift and a curse)
But I cannot reverse it


I can't reverse it
It was a gift and a curse
And now I'm drinkin' too much, so I'ma talk with a slur
Last time I saw you, it ended in a blur
I woke up in a hearse
You said, ""You loved me first"" (First)
One thing my dad told me was, ""Never let your woman know when you're insecure""
So I put Gucci on the fur
And I put my wrist on iceberg
One thing my heart tells me is
""Flex on a ho every time they're insecure""
I guess you came through, I'm running from you
Is your love for real? (For real? For real?)
Is your love really true?

She told me put my heart in the bag (In the bag)
And nobody gets hurt (Hurt)
Now I'm running from her love, I'm not fast (Fast)
So I'm making it worse (Worse)
Now I'm digging up a grave from my past (Past)
I'm a whole different person (Person)
It's a gift and a curse (Curse)
But I cannot reverse it


You gave me the runaround
I really hate the runaround
You really got me paranoid
I always keep a gun around
You always give me butterflies
When you come around
When you come around
When you come around


You let me know love is not the answer
Not the answer, not the answer
I love to do drugs, so mind my manners
I get high when you don't decide to answer
Phone home, I need to phone home
I'm throwing rocks at your window, I need to go home
I don't wanna leave
I just wanna be with you
You, you, you

She told me put my heart in the bag (In the bag)
And nobody gets hurt (No hurt)
Now I'm running from her love, I'm not fast (Fast)
So I'm making it worse (I'm making it worse)
Now I'm digging up a grave from my past
I'm a whole different person (I'm a whole different person)
It's a gift and a curse (It's a gift and a curse)
But I cannot reverse it",3734871
126617,2618342,Lean wit Me,rap,Juice WRLD,2018,1046101,{},"
Drugs got me sweatin', but the room gettin' colder
Lookin' at the devil and the angel on my shoulder
Will I die tonight? I don't know, is it over?
Lookin' for my next high, I'm lookin' for closure


Lean with me, pop with me
Get high with me if you rock with me
Smoke with me, drink with me
Fucked up liver with some bad kidneys
Lean with me, pop with me
Get high with me if you rock with me
Smoke with me, drink with me
Fucked up liver with some bad kidneys


Told her if I die, I'ma die young
Every day I've been gettin' fucked up
Finally know the difference between love and drugs
Shawty tell me I should really sober up
This shit ain't fiction, it's too real, too real
Fuck one dose, I need two pills, two pills
I'm lookin' for trouble so I know I'm gonna find it
Ring, ring, plug hit my phone, perfect timin'
I know I'm not right
But I'm not wrong, no, I'm not wrong
Girl, you hate it when I'm too high
But that's where I belong, where I belong

Lean with me, pop with me
Get high with me if you rock with me
Smoke with me, drink with me
Fucked up liver with some bad kidneys
Lean with me, pop with me
Get high with me if you rock with me
Smoke with me, drink with me
Fucked up liver with some bad kidneys


Eyes red, no Visine
Crashed the Mustang, no Saleen
Yeah, I love beans, yeah, I love lean
I laugh when they ask if my piss clean
Huh, smoke with me, huh, pop with me, huh
Ayy, Gucci store, come and shop with me
If I overdose, bae, are you gon' drop with me?
I don't even wanna think about that right now
Let's get too high, reach a new height
Take the shrooms and the pills at the same time
Went to Hollywood thrills from the street life
Took too many drugs, now I don't feel right


Lean with me, pop with me
Get high with me if you rock with me
Smoke with me, drink with me
Fucked up liver with some bad kidneys
Lean with me, pop with me
Get high with me if you rock with me
Smoke with me, drink with me
Fucked up liver with some bad kidneys (Bad kidneys)

Oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh
Oh-oh-oh",3735927
126709,2620851,BIG BANK,rap,YG,2018,1000069,"{""Nicki Minaj"",""Big Sean"",""2 Chainz""}","
My bitch drive an all-white Range
Couldn't hit it if you niggas had aim
Lames can't call and you a lame
You had it then you lost it, Hall of Shame
I can buy a Bentley, don't talk to me
For a show 150, don't talk to me
You ain't never helped your mans, don't talk to me
You just follow all the trends, don't talk to me
Ayy, I set the bar, I'm the fuckin' bar
Look in the sky, I'm a fuckin' star
I don't fall in love 'cause I be lovin' hard
Do everything like my shirt, extra large
I don't care, I'll crash a Ghost
Got two cribs in two states, I be doing the most
I got white-folks money that I won't blow
And if you ask why, 'cause the white folks don't


Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Type of money you gon' need a safe
Type of money you gon' need a bank
From the hood, it's type of money make you stay awake
Type of money, she gon' let you put it in her face
Big bank take lil' bank, bank (Yahhhhh)
Big bank take lil' bank, bank

Everything proper, no propaganda
Tropicana Goyard bandana
Big sack, a lotta hoes like Santa
Threw a birthday party in a Phantom
Big shit like a dinosaur did it
And you know Tity shinin' like acrylic
Yeah I sold dope and had cornrows
I can you see niggas hatin' with the door closed
Now I'm lookin' for a glove with the sparkle on it
And my CBD got chocolate on it
Big bank take small-ass shit
Bank account on some tall-ass shit
Attitude on some ""Fuck you too""
Bankroll on ""What it do, boo?""
Meet me at the room, let's vibe
And if I ain't did it yet, I'll try


Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Type of money you gon' need a safe
Type of money you gon' need a bank
From the hood, it's type of money make you stay awake
Type of money she gon' let you put it in her face
Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Big bank take lil' bank, bank

She said, ""Whatchu' gon do if I leave?""
I said, ""Bitch, I'ma do me""
B.I.G., bitch everything zoomed in (zoom)
Big bag on me lookin' like I'm movin' in (God!)
Got my foot in the door and we still here (here)
I'm a first generation millionaire (here)
I broke the curse in my family not having shit
I'm passionate like girls that's after more than just cash and dick
Feed me to the wolves, now I lead the pack and shit
You boys all cap, I'm more Colin Kaepernick
I'm rare as affordable health care (Oh God)
Or going to wealth from welfare (Goddamn)
I turn my W's to M's, yeah, I flip those
I might buy her red bottoms with the crypto
Three coins, that'll pay ya whole semester (swerve, swerve)
But you gotta ride it better than a Tesla


Big bank take lil' bank, bank (lil' bitch)
Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Type of money you gon' need a safe
Type of money you gon' need a bank
From the hood, it's type of money make you stay awake
Type of money she gon' let you put it in her face
Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Big bank take lil' bank, bank

Uh-oh! Back again
Back to back, Maybach, stack the M's
Told em' I met Slim Shady, bagged a Em
Once he go black, he'll be back again
Tell them hoes that it's crunch time, abdomen
Yes, I cop mad Chanel and mad Given'
She did it again, imagine them
'Bout to make these bum bitches mad again
Uh-oh! Back to them
I lead the pack so my back's to them
Yup, the queen's back, what's happenin'?
Re-run, 'bout to make these bitches rap again
Uh, diamond chains on my ankle
Young Money in the cut like a shank, though
Tell T.I.P. rubber bands in my bankroll
Show my ass like a stank ho


Big bank take lil' bank
Big bank take lil' bank
Type of money you gon' need a safe
Type of money you gon' need a bank
From the hood, it's type of money make you stay awake
Type of money she gon' let you put it in her face
Big bank take lil' bank, bank
Big bank take lil' bank, bank",3739219
126893,2624199,Duppy Freestyle,rap,Drake,2018,1646192,{},"
I'm in shock
The nerve, the audacity
Okay


So if you rebuke me for workin' with someone else on a couple of Vs
What do you really think of the nigga that's makin' your beats?
I've done things for him I thought that he never would need
Father had to stretch his hands out and get it from me
I pop style for 30 hours then let him repeat
Now you poppin' up with the jokes, I'm dead, I'm asleep
I just left from over by y'all puttin' pen to the sheets
Tired of sittin' quiet and helpin' my enemies eat
Keep gettin' temperature checks
They know that my head overheats
Don't know why the fuck you niggas listen to Denim or Steve
Must've had your Infrared wrong, now your head in the beam
Y'all are the spittin' image of whatever jealousy breeds
Don't push me when I'm in album mode
You're not even top 5 as far as your label talent goes
You send shots, well I got to challenge those
But I bring Calicos to the Alamo
I could never have a Virgil in my circle
And hold him back 'cause he makes me nervous
I wanna see my brothers flourish to they higher purpose
You niggas leeches and serpents
I think it's good that now the teachers are learnin', yeah
Your brother said it was your cousin, then him, then you
So, you don't rap what you did, you just rap what you knew
Don't be ashamed, it's plenty niggas that do what you do
There's no malice in your heart, you're an approachable dude
Man, you might've sold to college kids for Nike and Mercedes
But you act like you sold drugs for Escobar in the '80s
I had a microphone of yours, but then the signature faded
I think that pretty much resembles what's been happenin' lately
Please believe your demise will be televised, yeah
And as for Q, man, I changed his life a couple times
Nigga was at Kroger workin' double time
Y'all actin' like he made the boy when I was tryna help the guy
Yeah, who gassed you to play with me?
Man, you made this shit as easy as ABCs
Whoever supposedly makin' me hits
But then got no hits sound like they need me
My hooks did it, my lyrics did it
My spirit did it, I'm fearless with it, yeah
I really shouldn't have given you none of my time
'Cause you older than the nigga you runnin' behind
Look, holla at me when you multi-million
I told you keep playin' with my name
And I'ma let it ring on you like Virginia Williams
I'm too resilient, get out your feelings
It's gonna be a cruel summer for you
I told Weezy and Baby, ""I'ma done him for you""
Tell 'Ye we got a invoice comin' to you
Considerin' that we just sold another 20 for you

To be honest
Duppy",3743307
126941,2625828,Im Upset,rap,Drake,2018,1921318,{},"
Yeah
I'm working on dying


I'm upset
Fifty thousand on my head, it's disrespect
So offended that I had to double check
I'ma always take the money over sex
That's why they need me out the way, what you expect?


Got a lot of blood and it's cold
They keep tryna get me for my soul
Thankful for the women that I know
Can't go fifty-fifty with no ho
Every month
I'm supposed to pay her bills and get her what she want
I still got like seven years of doin' what I want
My dad still got child support from 1991 (One, one, one)
Outta town, people love to pop a lot of shit then come around
Word to Flacko Jodye, he done seen us put it down
Niggas askin' if I'm cool

I'm upset ('Set, 'set)
Hunnid thousand on my head, it's disrespect (Disrespect)
So offended that I had to double check


You tryna check?
This is real life, niggas think we playin' chess
So what's next?
Jump up out the bed like I'm possessed
I go out on tour and I say I'm drinkin' less
End up gettin' loose and gettin' pictures from my ex (Ex, ex, ex, ex)
SMS, triple X
That's the only time I ever shoot below the neck (Skrr)
Why you keep on shootin' if you know that nigga dead? (Skrr)
That's the only kind of shit that gets you some respect


Got a lot of blood and it's cold
They keep tryna get me for my soul (For my soul)
Thankful for the women that I know
Can't go fifty-fifty with no ho (Ayy, ayy)
Every month
She don't even love me, she just puttin' on a front (Front)
She gon' try and settle outta court and make a run
Then gon' ask me how I'm doin'?

I'm upset ('Set, 'set)
Half a million on my head I can accept, yeah
'Least it makes me feel like someone tried their best, yeah
Want to waste a half a million, be my guest
Made me wanna buy a vest and a TEC (Skrr)
But I'm blessed, I just checked (Checked, checked)
Hate me, never met me in the flesh (Flesh)
Said she's got some things she gotta come here and collect
That shit is in a box to the left, to the left (Left, left, left)


Got a lot of blood and it's cold
They keep tryna get me for my soul (For my soul)
Thankful for the women that I know (That I know)
Can't go fifty-fifty with no ho",3745302
127116,2630763,The Story of Adidon,rap,Pusha T,2018,2387521,{},"
Easy money
It's about to be a surgical summer
Chop the tops off the coupes
The cuatrociento' ochenta y ocho
The Spider joint
And you know we gotta cut the heads off these snakes, right?
Watch the body drop


Drug dealin' aside, ghostwritin' aside
Let's have a heart-to-heart about your pride
Even though you're multi, I see that your soul don't look alive
The M's count different when Baby divides the pie, wait
Let's examine why
Your music for the past few years been angry and full of lies
I'll start it at the home front, ""I'm On One""
Dennis Graham stay off the 'Gram, bitch, I'm on one
You mention wedding ring like it's a bad thing
Your father walked away at five-hell of a dad thing
Marriage is somethin' that Sandi never had, Drake
How you a winner but she keep comin' in last place?
Monkey-suit Dennis, you parade him
A Steve Harvey-suit nigga made him
Confused, always felt you weren't Black enough
Afraid to grow it 'cause your 'fro wouldn't nap enough
Since you name-dropped my fiancée
Let 'em know who you chose as your Beyoncé
Sophie knows better as your baby mother
Cleaned her up for IG, but the stench is on her
A baby's involved, it's deeper than rap
We talkin' character, let me keep with the facts
You are hiding a child, let that boy come home
Deadbeat mothafucka playin' border patrol, ooh
Adonis is your son
And he deserves more than an Adidas press run; that's real
Love that baby, respect that girl
Forget she's a pornstar, let her be your world, yuugh!
How dare you put Ye in my verses?
I'm selfish, I want all of the curses
I'm pre-bookin' the churches, me versus three hearses
If we all go to Hell, it'll be worth it
Already aligned with the greats, and on that same note
The only ones I chase are two ghosts
Still givin' you classics, that's the only thing that dates me
OVO 40, hunched over like he 80-tick, tick, tick
How much time he got? That man is sick, sick, sick
I got the devil flow, nigga-six-six-six
Surgical summer with it-snip, snip, snip
And you don't really want it with him

Surgical Summer, Volume 1
We gon' take this slow
We just gon' peel it back layer-by-layer
Yeah, DAYTONA
Album of the motherfuckin' year
And you talkin' 'bout you upset
Hahahahaha
Well, I wanna see what it's like when you get angry, okay?
You show me that
Push!",3751648
127199,2632598,Girls Like You Remix,pop,Maroon 5,2018,3369012,"{""Cardi B""}","
Spent 24 hours
I need more hours with you
You spent the weekend
Getting even, ooh
We spent the late nights
Making things right between us
But now it's all good, babe
Roll that backwood, babe, and play me close


'Cause girls like you
Run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
Girls like you
Love fun, and yeah, me too
What I want when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
Yeah yeah yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you

I spent last night
On the last flight to you (Ay)
Took a whole day up
Tryna get way up, ooh
We spent the daylight
Tryna make things right between us
And now it's all good, babe
Roll that backwood, babe, and play me close (Yeah)


'Cause girls like you
Run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
Girls like you
Love fun, and yeah, me too
What I want when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you

Maybe it's six forty-five, maybe I'm barely alive
Maybe you've taken my shit for the last time, yeah
Maybe I know that I'm drunk, maybe I know you're the one
Maybe I'm thinking it's better if you drive (Oh)
'Cause girls like you
Run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah


Not too long ago, I was dancing for dollars (Eeoow)
Know it's really real if I let you meet my mama (Eeoow)
You don't want a girl like me, I'm too crazy
But every other girl you meet is fugazi (Okurrrt)
I'm sure them other girls were nice enough
But you need someone to spice it up
So who you gonna call? Cardi, Cardi
Come and rev it up like a Harley, Harley
Why is the best fruit always forbidden? (Huh?)
I'm coming to you now doin' 20 over the limit (Wooh)
The red light, red light stop, stop (Skrrt)
I don't play when it comes to my heart, let's get it though
I don't really want a white horse and a carriage (Carriage)
I'm thinkin' more a white Porsches and carats
I need you right here 'cause every time you're far
I play with this kitty like you play wit' your guitar, ah

'Cause girls like you (Girls like you)
Run 'round with guys like me
'Til sundown when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah (Oh)
Girls like you (Girls like you)
Love fun, and yeah, me too
What I want when I come through
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah (Like you)


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I need a girl like you",3754239
127278,2633967,Feu de bois,rap,Damso,2018,1299568,{},"


Baby, baby
Oh ba-baby
Baby-y-y-y-y


Feu de bois, jeu de voix, suis-moi
Je te veux pas, fuis-moi, je te veux toi (Dems, Dems)
Feu de bois, jeu de trois, un des deux est de moi
Un des trois est de nous, aidez-nous, aidez-moi
Feu de bois, jeu de voix, tu me dois, Dieu te voit
Montre-moi que du doigt ce que t'as fait de moi
Creux de joie, queue de rois, fée des bois
Fais de moi ce qu'on a fait de toi
Sur le toit, sûre de toi, tu t'y crois
C'est déjà ce qu'on a fait de moi (sale, sale)
Fais de toi, fais de nous
Prends pas la tête, je n'tiens plus le coup
On bavardait sans dire un mot, le bruit de mon silence en dit long
Sentiments grandissants figeant l'ego
Prison de mots, absence de compliment
J'suis en attente, en apprentissage, très peu sage
J'ai vu l'âge à la nage, je fuis l'alcoolisme
Sur la blanche page, j'agonise
Mille latences entre c'que je pense et ce que je dis, ce que j'obtiens et ce que je vise
Soit c'est le père ou bien le fils, soit la be-her ou bien la tise
Que la nightzer, ouais

Je sais c'que tu penses de nous
Quand tu dis que tu n'sais plus quoi penser de nous
Je sais c'que tu veux vraiment
Quand tu dis que tu n'sais plus c'que tu veux vraiment
Je sais qu'tu n'as plus le temps
Quand tu dis que tu penses qu'il te faut plus de temps


Baby (Oh la la), baby (Oh la la)
Oh ba-baby (Oui, c'est sale)
Baby-y-y-y-y
Baby (Oh la la), baby (Oh la la)
Oh ba-baby (Oui, c'est sale)
Baby-y-y-y-y
Oh, oh, oh


Tu parles de moi, craches dans mon dos
Je parle de toi, crache dans ta bouche (Rrk, peuh)
J's'rai toujours un vrai négro, que t'aies tes règles ou que t'accouches (Sale)
J'te vois à travers le rideau, je t'observe quand tu te touches
J'sais pas si c'est toi ou c'est l'eau, j'vois pas quand tu mouilles dans la douche
Fume quand relation s'effrite
Lune, Soleil dans même rayon
Qu'une parole tant que j'écris, brume, gondole dans l'océan
Femmes aux yeux d'hommes sont que des filles
Sentiments plongés dans l'néant
Pluie, averses de ressentis mais silence prend les devants
Je t'aime quand je suis dedans, dehors, je suis plein de mépris
Ta fragilité n'est plus à prouver
Quand tout allait mal et qu'on le savait pas
On passait du temps à essayer d'en passer
À deux pour l'prix d'un, d'un ""nous"" sans ""toi"" et ""moi""
J'ai brûlé tes lettres dans un feu de bois mais j'ai toujours en tête nos jeux de voix
J'ai suivi l'oseille, toi, la fée des bois
J'ai toujours en toi ce que t'as fait de moi
Que la nightzer, ouais

Je sais c'que tu penses de nous
Quand tu dis que tu n'sais plus quoi penser de nous
Je sais c'que tu veux vraiment
Quand tu dis que tu n'sais plus c'que tu veux vraiment
Je sais qu'tu n'as plus le temps
Quand tu dis que tu penses qu'il te faut plus de temps


Baby (Oh la la), baby (Oh la la)
Oh ba-baby (Oui, c'est sale)
Baby-y-y-y-y
Baby (Oh la la), baby (Oh la la)
Oh ba-baby (Oui, c'est sale)
Baby-y-y-y-y
Oh, oh, oh


Pa-pam, pa-pam, pa-pam, pa-pam",3756041
127290,2634355,I Thought About Killing You,rap,Kanye West,2018,1263280,{},"
I know, I know, I know, I know, know
I know, I know, I know, I know, know
I, I know it, I know it


The most beautiful thoughts are always besides the darkest
Today, I seriously thought about killing you
I contemplated, premeditated murder
And I think about killing myself
And I love myself way more than I love you, so...
Today, I thought about killing you, premeditated murder
You'd only care enough to kill somebody you love
The most beautiful thoughts are always besides the darkest
(Mhm-mhm-mhm-mhm-mhmm)
Just say it out loud to see how it feels
People say ""don't say this, don't say that""
Just say it out loud, just to see how it feels
Weigh all the options, nothing's off the table
Today, I thought about killing you, premeditated murder
I think about killing myself
And I, I love myself way more than I love you
The most beautiful thoughts are always besides the darkest
(Mhm-mhm-mhm-mhm-mhm-mhm-mhm-mhm-mhmm)
I think this is the part where I'm supposed to say somethin' good to compensate it so it doesn't come off bad
But sometimes I think really bad things
Really, really, really bad things
And I love myself way more than I love you
See, if I was tryin' to relate it to more people
I'd probably say I'm struggling with loving myself
Because that seems like a common theme
But that's not the case here
I love myself way more than I love you
And I think about killing myself
So, best believe, I thought about killing you today
Premeditated murder

I called up my loved ones, I called up my cousins
I called up the Muslims, said I'm 'bout to go dumb
Get so bright, it's no sun, get so loud, I hear none
Screamed so loud, got no lungs, hurt so bad, I go numb
Time to bring in the drums, that prra-pa-pa-pum
Set the NewTone on 'em, set the nuke off on 'em
I need Coke with no rum, I taste coke on her tongue
I don't joke with no one, they'll say ""He died so young""
I done had a bad case of too many bad days
Got too many bad traits, used the floor for ashtrays
I don't do shit halfway, I'ma clear the cache
I'ma make my name last, put that on my last name
It's a different type of rules that we obey
Ye, Ye, Ye season, nigga, we Old Bay
We was all born to die, nigga, DOA
Niggas say they hero, mm, I don't see no cape
Mm, I don't see no, mm, yeah, I don't see no, mm, mm
If I wasn't shinin' so hard, wouldn't be no shade
Buckwheat-ass nigga, it's gon' be o-tay
Sorry, but I chose not to be no slave
Young nigga shit, nigga, we don't age
I thought I was past my Deebo ways
Even when I went broke, I ain't break
How you gon' hate? Nigga, we go way back
To when I had the braids and you had the wave cap
Drop a pin for the fade and I'm on my way ASAP
Don't get socked in the mouth, you know homie don't play that
Pay the fire marshal bill 'cause this shit done got way packed
They wanna see me go ape (Ape, ape)
All you gotta do is speak on Ye
All you gotta do is speak on Ye
Don't get your tooth chipped like Frito-Lay",3756495
127291,2634365,Wouldnt Leave,rap,Kanye West,2018,1011797,{PARTYNEXTDOOR},"
I don't feel that she's mine enough
God, I feel I couldn't have you windin' up
Butterfly in my wrist
You make pretty women out of my skin
And I don't feel like
And I know you wouldn't leave


They say, ""Build your own""-I said, ""How, Sway?""
I said, ""Slavery a choice""-they said, ""How, Ye?""
Just imagine if they caught me on a wild day
Now I'm on fifty blogs gettin' fifty calls
My wife callin', screamin', say we 'bout to lose it all
Had to calm her down 'cause she couldn't breathe
Told her she could leave me now, but she wouldn't leave


And I know you wouldn't leave


And I sometimes wish
We doin' such things
We could wait longer than this
Yes, you know you're one of these
We can run through with the top chopped, yeah
And the sundress down, ooh

And I know you wouldn't...


Oh, don't bring that up, that's gon' get me sentimental
You know I'm sensitive, I got a gentle mental
Every time somethin' happen they want me sent to mental
We had an incident, but I cover incidentals
You want me workin' on my messagin'
When I'm thinkin' like George Jetson
But soundin' like George Jefferson
Then they questionin' my methods then
If you tweakin' out on my texts again
Then I don't get reception here
I got the mind state to take us past the stratosphere
I use the same attitude that done got us here
I live for now, I don't know what happen after here
I live for now, I don't know what happen after here
Plus, what was meant to be was meant to be
Even if, publicly, I lack the empathy
I ain't finna talk about it, 'nother four centuries
One and one is two, but me and you, that's infinity


And I know you wouldn't...

I don't feel like she's mine enough
God, I feel I couldn't have you windin' up (Why?)
Butterfly in my wrist
You make pretty women out of my skin (Out of my skin)
And I don't feel like (Uhh)
And I know you wouldn't leave (Love me or hate me)


For any guy that ever fucked up (Love me or hate me)
Ever embarrassed they girl (Love me or hate me)
Ever embarrassed they wife (Gone when you miss me)
She told you not to do that shit (Ohh)
She told you you's gon' fuck the money up
But you ain't wanna listen, did you?
Keep that same energy
Keep that same energy
Keep that same energy
Now you testin' her loyalty
This what they mean when they say
""For better or for worse"", huh?
For every down female that stuck with they dude
Through the best times, through the worst times
This for you


And I know you wouldn't leave",3756507
127293,2634382,Ghost Town,rap,Kanye West,2018,2115048,{PARTYNEXTDOOR},"
Someday, someday
Someday I'll, I wanna wear a starry crown


Someday, someday, someday
I wanna lay down, like God did, on Sunday
Hold up, hold up
Someday, somedays, I remembered this on a Sunday
Backway, yeah, way, way, burning, mhm-mhm
Uh, somedays, I wanna tell everybody
Somedays I wanna hit the red dot on everybody
Somedays, ohh (Heatstroke)
Now that I'm livin' high, I'm smokin' marijuana
Now that I'm livin' high, I do whatever I wanna, oh, yeah


I've been tryin' to make you love me
But everything I try just takes you further from me


Someday we gon' set it off
Someday we gon' get this off
Baby, don't you bet it all
On a pack of Fentanyl
You might think they wrote you off
They gon' have to rope me off
Someday the drama'll be gone
And they'll play this song on and on
Sometimes I take all the shine
Talk like I drank all the wine
Years ahead but way behind
I'm on one, two, three, four, five
No half-truths, just naked minds
Caught between space and time
This not what they had in mind
But maybe someday

I've been tryin' to make you love me
But everything I try just takes you further from me


Woah, once again I am a child
I let it all go, of everything that I know, yeah
Of everything that I know, yeah
And nothing hurts anymore, I feel kinda free
We're still the kids we used to be, yeah, yeah
I put my hand on a stove, to see if I still bleed, yeah
And nothing hurts anymore, I feel kinda free
We're still the kids we used to be, yeah, yeah
I put my hand on a stove, to see if I still bleed, yeah
And nothing hurts anymore, I feel kinda free
We're still the kids we used to be, yeah, yeah
I put my hand on a stove, to see if I still bleed, yeah
And nothing hurts anymore, I feel kinda free
We're still the kids we used to be, yeah, yeah
I put my hand on a stove, to see if I still bleed, yeah
And nothing hurts anymore, I feel kinda free",3756523
127294,2634385,Violent Crimes,rap,Kanye West,2018,1299619,{},"
Fallin', dreamin', talkin' in your sleep
I know you want to cry all night, all night
Plottin', schemin', findin'
Reason to defend all of your violent nights
Promise me you will see


Don't you grow up in a hurry, your mom'll be worried, aw
It was all part of the story, even the scary nights
Thank you for all of the glory, you will be remembered, aw
Thank you to all of the heroes of the night (Night, night)
They gotta repaint the colors, the lie is wearin' off
Reality is upon us, colors drippin' off
Colors drippin' off


Niggas is savage, niggas is monsters
Niggas is pimps, niggas is players
'Til niggas have daughters, now they precautious
Father, forgive me, I'm scared of the karma
'Cause now I see women as somethin' to nurture
Not somethin' to conquer
I hope she like Nicki, I make her a monster
Not havin' ménages, I'm just bein' silly
I answered the door like Will Smith and Martin
Nigga, do we have a problem?
Matter fact, Marlon, this ain't Meet the Fockers
I'll beat his ass, pray I beat the charges
No, Daddy don't play, not when it come to they daughters
Don't do no yoga, don't do pilates
Just play piano and stick to karate
I pray your body's draped more like mine
And not like your mommy's
Just bein' salty, but niggas is nuts
And I am a nigga, I know what they want
I pray that you don't get it all at once
Curves under your dress, I know it's pervs all on the net
All in the comments, you wanna vomit
That's your baby, you love her to death
Now she cuttin' class and hangin' with friends
You break a glass and say it again
She can't comprehend the danger she in
If you whoop her ass, she move in with him
Then he whoop her ass, you go through it again
But how you the devil rebukin' the sin?
Let's pray we can put this behind us
I swear that these times is the wildest
She got the scars, they serve as reminders
Blood still on her pajamas
But yesterday is dead, yeah, moment of silence
Next, she'll be off to college and then at the altar
'Cause she know that niggas is savage, niggas is monsters
Niggas is pimps, niggas is players, 'til niggas have daughters
Niggas is pimps, niggas is players, 'til niggas have daughters

Don't you grow up in a hurry, your mom'll be worried, aw
It was all part of the story, even the scary nights
Thank you for all of the glory, you will be remembered, aw
Thank you to all of the heroes of the night (Night, night)
They gotta repaint the colors, the lie is wearin' off
Reality is upon us, colors drippin' off
Colors drippin' off


I'm saying it like...
""I want a daughter like Nicki, aw, man, I promise
I'ma turn her to a monster, but no ménages""
I don't know how you saying it but, let 'em hear this",3756527
127295,2634392,Yikes,rap,Kanye West,2018,1246912,{},"
Shit could get menacin', frightenin', find help
Sometimes I scare myself, myself
Shit could get menacin', frightenin', find help
Sometimes I scare, myself, myself


Tweakin', tweakin' off that 2C-B, huh
Is he gon' make it? TBD, huh
Thought I was gon' run, DMC, huh
I done died and lived again on DMT, huh
See, this a type of high that won't come down
This the type of high that get you gunned down
Yeezy, Yeezy trollin' OD, huh
Turn TMZ to Smack DVD, huh
Russell Simmons wanna pray for me too
I'ma pray for him 'cause he got MeToo'd
Thinkin' what if that happened to me too
Then I'm on E! News


Shit could get menacin', frightenin', find help
Sometimes I scare myself, myself
Shit could get menacin', frightenin', find help
Sometimes I scare myself, myself

Ayy, hospital band a hundred bands, fuck a watch
Hundred grand'll make your best friends turn to opps
I hear y'all bringin' my name up a lot
Guess I just turned the clout game up a notch
See, y'all really shocked, but I'm really not
You know how many girls I took to the titty shop?
If she get the ass with it, that's a 50 pop
I still bring the bad bitches in the city out
Uh, just a different type of leader
We could be in North Korea, I could smoke with Wiz Khalifa, uh
Told my wife I've never seen her
After I hit it, bye Felicia, that's the way that I'ma leave it up


Shit could get menacin', frightenin', find help
See, this is why all the bitches fuck with Ye!
Fuck what they talkin' 'bout!
Sometimes I scare myself, myself
They take me on meds, off meds, ask yourself
Shit could get menacin', frightenin', find help
Ask your homegirl right now, ""Look, you had a shot at Ye?""
Sometimes I scare myself, myself
You'd drop everything!


Tweakin', tweakin' off that 2C-B, huh
This is why your bitches fuck with me, huh
Smash, she gon' end up on TV, huh
Last thing that you ever wanna see, huh
I can feel the spirits all around me
I think Prince and Mike was tryna warn me
They know I got demons all on me
Devil been tryna make an army
They been strategizin' to harm me
They don't know they dealin' with a zombie
Niggas been tryna test my Gandhi
Just because I'm dressed like Abercrombie

You see? You see?
That's what I'm talkin' 'bout!
That's why I fuck with Ye!
See, that's my third per-
That's my bipolar shit, nigga, what?
That's my superpower, nigga, ain't no disability
I'm a superhero! I'm a superhero!
Agghhh!",3756535
127387,2636641,Close Friends,rap,Lil Baby,2018,1258447,{},"
Oh, this the one right here, Wicked?
Okay
Yeah, yeah
Run that back, Turbo


We started off as close friends (Close friends)
Somehow you turned into my girlfriend (My girlfriend)
We used to tell each other everything (Everything)
I even went and bought her diamond rings, matching earrings
Everything was so cool (So cool)
Lately baby been actin' so rude (Been so rude)
I don't know what somebody told you (What they told you)
But I ain't gon' lie, I miss the old you


I know you remember how I would hold you
Still remember how I approached you
I think I loved you 'fore I knew you
Know we be fuckin' 'fore I screwed you
Made a promise I won't use you
Play my cards right, I won't lose you
Got 'em tuned in like I'm YouTube
Got somethin' on me like it's voodoo
I'll go nuts for you, go cuckoo, lose my cool and all
And I know that shit was wrong, I shouldn't've did what I did

Just wipe your eyes and stop this cryin'
I told the truth, that I'd been lyin'
I gave you racks, I tried to buy in
I even did the unthinkable, and I'm sorry for what I did to you
Take me back, if I was you and I did what I did
I probably would, I probably wouldn't
Take you back, if I was you and I did what I did
I probably would, I probably wouldn't
Just wipe your eyes and stop this cryin'
I told the truth, that I'd been lyin'
I gave you racks, I tried to buy in
I even did the unthinkable, and I'm sorry for what I did to you


We started off as close friends (Close friends)
Somehow you turned into my girlfriend (My girlfriend)
We used to tell each other everything (Everything)
I even went and bought her diamond rings, matching earrings
Everything was so cool (So cool)
Lately baby been actin' so rude (Been so rude)
I don't know what somebody told you (What they told you)
But I ain't gon' lie, I miss the old you


Keep our business to ourselves
The internet ain't doin' no help
I know I shouldn't've never left
But everything I did for us
And us, I'm speakin' on my kids
Thinkin' 'bout this shit I did
Like how the hell I get myself involved in this bullshit?
Married to the game, I can't make you my fiancée
Bad young boss bitch, treat her like Beyoncé
But damn what them broads say, I fucked them all the first day
And that's why you trippin' anyway, like when I fuck 'em I don't pay
Even if we never speak again
I'll make sure you're ridin' in the latest Benz
Keep your business all apart if you can stay out of mine
Bought a brand new Audemars, but I done ran out of time

We started off as close friends (Close friends)
Somehow you turned into my girlfriend (My girlfriend)
We used to tell each other everything (Everything)
I even went and bought her diamond rings, matching earrings
Everything was so cool (So cool)
Lately baby been actin' so rude (Been so rude)
I don't know what somebody told you (What they told you)
But I ain't gon' lie, I miss the old you",3759331
127436,2638210,Di Na Muli,pop,Janine Teoso,2018,1060086,"{""Janine Teñoso""}","Nung araw kay tamis ng ating buhay
Puno ng saya at ng kulay
Di mauulit muli

Ang oras kapag hinayaang lumipas
Madarama mo hanggang bukas
Di mababawi muli

Ang dami daming bagay na hindi naman kailangan
Kung pwede lang bawasan natin ang mga tampuhan
Hindi mo lang alam hindi mo pa nararanasan
Kahapon sana natin di mo na pinahirapan

Patawad muli
Di na muli

Ang oras kapag hinayaang lumipas
Madarama mo hanggang bukas
Di mababawi muli

At natapos ang himas ng sandali
Di kukubli aking tinig
Nang lumipas na't di man lang nasabi
Salamat hanggang sa muli
Ang dami daming bagay na hindi naman kailangan
Kung pwede lang bawasan natin ang mga tampuhan
Hindi mo lang alam hindi mo pa nararanasan
Kahapon sana natin di mo na pinahirapan

Patawad muli
Di na muli

Binawi buhay mo ng walang sabi
Binubulong ko sa sarili
Mahal kita hanggang sa huli

Mahal ko hanggang sa huli...",3761293
127672,2643585,FEFE,rap,6ix9ine,2018,4558659,"{""Nicki Minaj"",""Murda Beatz""}","
It's fuckin' TR3YWAY!
King of New York, lookin' for the Queen
Uh, you got the right one, hmm
L-let these-l-let these b-b-bitches know, nigga
Queens, Brooklyn, brrr, ah!
Murda on the beat so it's not nice!


Pussy got that wet, wet, got that drip, drip
Got that super soaker, hit that
She a Fefe, her name Keke
She eat my dick like it's free, free
I don't even know like ""Why I did that?""
I don't even know like ""Why I hit that?""
All I know is that I just can't wife that
Talk to her nice so she won't fight back
Turn around and hit it from the back, back, back
Bend her down then I make it clap, clap, clap


I don't really want no friends
I don't really want no friends, no

Draco got that kick-back when I blow that, they all do track
They don't shoot back, one shot, close range, red dot
Head tight, yeah, I did that, yeah, I live that
Call a Uber with my shooter, with a Ruger, we gon' do ya
Niggas say they killin' people, but I really fuckin' do it


I don't really want no friends
I don't really want no friends, no


He-he tryna 69 like Tekashi, call him papi
Word to A$AP, keep me Rocky, I'm from New York, so I'm cocky
Say he fuckin' with my posse, copped me Khloé like Kardashi'
Keep this pussy in Versace, said I'm pretty like Tinashe
Put-put it all up in his face, did I catch a case?
Pussy game just caught a body, but I never leave a trace
Face is pretty, ass for days, I get chips, I ask for Lay's
I just sit back and when he done, I be like, ""Yo, how'd it taste?""
(Yo, how'd it taste?)


I don't really want no friends
I don't really want no friends, no

Ayo, Draco got that kick-back
When it kick-back, you can't get yo shit back
In fact this that bitch that
""I hate small talk, I don't fuck with chit-chat""
AC just stopped workin'
So they hit me, told me bring my wrist back
Come through rockin' fashions
That got all these bitches like ""Yo, what's that?""
(Like ""Yo, what's that?"")


I don't really want no friends
I don't really want no friends, no


Eeny, meeny, miny, moe
I catch a ho right by her toe
If she ain't fuckin' me and Nicki
Kick that ho right through the door (TR3YWAY)
I don't really want no friends, my old ho just bought this Benz
Nicki just hopped in this shit, now I won't see that bitch again
Eeny, meeny, miny, moe (no)
I catch a ho right by her toe (no)
If she ain't fuckin' me and Nicki
Kick that ho right through the door (no, TR3YWAY)

Mmm, Young Money, Young Money bunny
Colorful hair, don't care
I don't really want no friends
I don't really want no friends, no
I don't really want no friends
I don't really want no friends, no
Scum Gang!",3767821
128334,2658663,New Patek,rap,Lil Uzi Vert,2018,1241989,{},"
Hmm
New Patek on my wrist
White diamonds, them shits hit pink
Alright, I'm ready


New Patek on my wrist (Yeah)
White diamonds, them shits hit pink (Yeah, yeah)
Got cold, had to go get a mink (Yeah)
New finger rings hit like a sink (Yeah, yeah)
You a bad bitch, then we can link (What?)
Hit the shower, you might stink, hello (Yeah)
Bitches bad, yeah, they all migrate (Uh)
And she said ""Lil Uzi so great (Uh, uh)
How you deal with all that hate?"" (Uh-uh)
Shut up, bitch, don't give me migraine
New Patek on my wrist
White diamonds, them shits hit pink
Got cold, had to go get a mink
New finger rings hit like a sink (Water)
You a bad bitch, then we can link
Hit the shower, you might stink
Bitches bad, yeah, they all migrate (Uh-uh)
And she said ""Lil Uzi so great""

Okay, and your girlfriend like my drip (Drip)
Happy birthday to that bitch (Bitch)
Yeah, the one that sucked my dick (Dick)
Triple S got that extra grip (Grip)
So you know I cannot slip (Slip)


That jeweler made me proud of my wrist (Wrist)
Franck Muller made me proud of my wrist (Wrist)
Franck Muller made me proud of my wrist (Wrist)
My shooters gon' shoot, can't miss (Grrah)
My shooter got a 30 on his hip (Bah)
Yeah, I need my fix
Was that a pair of boots from Rick? (Rick)
Had to tell that lil' girl don't trip (Woah)
Cool blood, but my money Crip
Got clap on lights, no flick
Can't take no pic, no flick (No cameras)
Fuck that bitch in my new whip (Skrrt)
Her ass so fat, can't fit
Her ass so fat, it's amazing (Amazing)
Her ass so fat, it's a miracle (Miracle)
Her last man money hysterical
She from the six one nine, Rey Mysterio (Let's go)
Yeah, I'm the same nigga bustin' through your stereo
Yeah, my boys on the block selling O's, no Cheerios
I don't wake up in the mornin' for cereal
Flip the brick, make the whole shit do an aerial
Air the shit out and make the ho sing, Ariel (Yah)
Silencers so they really cannot hear me though
Killin' these beats, yeah, Lil Uzi a serial
Clean up the body, prepare for the burial
Burberry pants, I got Burberry tennis shoes
I got the swag that probably, um, will finish you
I am a octopus, I cannot breathe without water
So I put diamonds on my tentacles
How is you stoppin' us? They is not toppin' us
You know I had to cop that shit just by the twos
Blood in my chakra, I will not pop at ya
Put money on my head just for your album, bruh
Tell me, lil' boy, if it's beef I can chop this shit up
Like it's prime and treat you like it's Optimus
My chain is white gold your shit look like copper, bruh
MCM, yeah, that shit made out of ostrich, bruh
But I don't wear it, give that to my hoes
Yeah, I swear that lil' nigga my clone
Yeah, I had to do this shit all by my own
Yeah, it's slime shit, lil' baby, put diamonds in my nose (Slatt)

New Patek on my wrist (Yeah)
White diamonds, them shits hit pink (Yeah, yeah)
Got cold, had to go get a mink (Yeah)
New finger rings hit like a sink (Yeah, yeah)
You a bad bitch, then we can link (What?)
Hit the shower, you might stink, hello (Yeah, yeah)
Bitches bad, yeah, they all migrate (Uh)
And she said ""Lil Uzi so great (Uh, uh)
How you deal with all that hate?"" (Uh-uh)
Shut up, bitch, don't give me migraine


And your girlfriend like my drip (Drip)
Happy birthday to that bitch (Bitch)
Yeah, the one that sucked my dick (Dick)
Triple S got that extra grip (Grip)
So you know I cannot slip (Slip)
That jeweler made me proud of my wrist (Wrist)
Franck Muller made me proud of my wrist
Franck Muller made me proud of my wrist
New Rollie made me proud of my wrist
AP make me proud of my wrist
New Richard on my wrist
Got a milli' that's all in my bank (Milli')

New Patek on my wrist
White diamonds, them shits hit pink (Let's go)
Got cold, had to go get a mink
New finger rings hit like a sink (Let's go)
You a bad bitch, then we can link (What?)
Hit the shower, you might stink
Bitches bad, yeah, they all migrate
And she said ""Lil Uzi so great (Great)
How you deal with all that hate?"" (Hate)
Shut up, bitch, don't give me migraine (Uh)


Throw up gang signs, Naruto (Uh)
Put metal in my nose like Pain (Uh)
Man, I never saw this bitch before (Uh)
How the fuck she know my name? (Yeah)
She said, ""Lil Uzi, hello""
I looked at her, ""Oh, hey"" (Hello)
You ain't never seen pastry dough
Well lil' bitch, I got cake (Yeah)
Gettin' money, I'm the man
Gettin' money, had to count the advance
Saint Laurent on my shoes, these not Vans
Need a fan case a nigga get hot
'Member she ain't want me back, I was popped
On the block back before I had locks (Yeah)
Red dot for a chicken, he popped
MC told the bitch eat my cock
Motorcycle days, bitch, Yung Joc
That's what I call her, she all on my top
Rap star or do he sell rock?
He got files so he beatin' the trial
Couple racks and them niggas run wild
Super filthy, man, they livin' so foul
I got some real niggas that's locked up
Tryna shade the bar just for the foul
All these hackers, yeah, these niggas is foul
All my bitches want me to take a vow
Live off verbs, and I live off of nouns
He get money, then I had to say, ""How?""
New rug, and it's made out of wolf
New rabbit, yeah, I use as a towel
Lil' bitch, yeah, I run through the city
Different spots in it just like a cow
Yeah, I'm talkin' 'bout a mansion, no house
Yeah, my closet, yeah, that shit got a house
Four years, I ain't even see a mouse
Please stop talkin', bitch, put dick in your mouth
We get money, what the fuck is a drought?
Make it rain 'cause I'm up in the clouds
Had to tell that lil' bitch, get from around
'Cause that little bitch be fuckin' with clowns


Let's go, let's go, had to tell that lil' bitch, yeah, let's go (Let's go, let's go)
That lil' nigga stole my swag and he tried to steal my flow (My flow, my flow)
I had to switch it up one time just like I switch my phone (My phone, my phone)
I could try one more time, I can give this shit one more go (Let's go, ayy)
I put hundreds in my safe (Ayy)
I throw twenties in her face (Ayy)
I put the M in a J (Ayy)
I got a bae in the Bay (Ayy)
I fucked on that nigga little bitch
That's the reason he tryna say that I'm gay (Ayy)
Way more coochie than Kay Slay (Ayy)
I sell a mil' in a day (Ayy)
All of my bitches they grade A
I did not get in Canada
But when I'm in Toronto they treat me like Drake
This a light jet, this a flight day
Had that lil' bitch, that's on MySpace
I can feel this shit in my veins
Look at my neck, that's an ice tray
Come on tell me, what you sayin'?
(What you sayin'? What you sayin'? What you sayin'?)


And your girlfriend like my drip (Drip)
Happy birthday to that bitch (Bitch)
Yeah, the one that sucked my dick (Dick)
Triple S got that extra grip (Grip)
(Oh yeah)
Franck Muller made me proud of my wrist (Wrist)
Franck Muller made me proud of my wrist (Wrist)
New Rollie made me proud of my wrist (Woo, woo)
AP make me proud of my wrist (Woo)
New Richard on my wrist (Woo)
Got a milli' that's all in my bank (Woo, woo)


New Patek on my wrist (Yeah)
White diamonds, them shits hit pink (Yeah, yeah)
Got cold, had to go get a mink (Yeah)
New finger rings hit like a sink (Yeah, yeah)
You a bad bitch, then we can link (What?)
Hit the shower, you might stink (Yeah, yeah)
Bitches bad, yeah, they all migrate (Uh)
And she said ""Lil Uzi so great (Uh, uh)
How you deal with all that hate?"" (Uh-uh)
Shut up, bitch, don't give me migraine


Throw up gang signs, Naruto (Yeah)
Put metal in my nose like Pain (Uh)
Man, I never saw this bitch before (Uh)
How the fuck she know my name?
She said, ""Lil Uzi, hello"" (Uh)
I looked at her, ""Oh, hey""
You ain't never seen pastry dough (Yeah)
Tell lil' bitch, I got cake (Ayy)
Gettin' money, I'm the man
Gettin' money, had to count the advance
Saint Laurent all on my shoes, these not Vans
Need a fan in case a nigga get hot
'Member she ain't want me back, I was popped
On the block back before I had locks
Red dot for a chicken, he popped
MC, told the bitch eat my cock


Yeah, yeah, that's it",3786667
128335,2658667,APESHIT,rap,THE CARTERS,2018,2370984,{},"
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Stack my money fast and go (Fast, fast, go)
Fast like a Lambo (Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt)
I be jumpin' off the stage, ho (Jumpin', jumpin', hey, hey)
Crowd better save her (Crowd goin' ape, hey)
I can't believe we made it (This is what we made, made)
This is what we're thankful (This is what we thank, thank)
I can't believe we made it (This a different angle)
Have you ever seen the crowd goin' apeshit? Rah!


Gimme my check, put some respek on my check
Or pay me in equity (Pay me in equity)
Watch me reverse out of debt (Skrrt)
He got a bad bitch, bad bitch
We livin' lavish, lavish
I get expensive fabrics
I got expensive habits
He wanna go with me (Go with me)
He like to roll the weed (Roll the weed)
He wanna be with me (Be with me)
He wanna give me that vitamin D (D)
Ice ornaments, icy style tournaments (Woo)
You ain't on to this (No)
Don't think they on to this (No)
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Bought him a jet
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Shut down Colette
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Phillippe Patek
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Get off my dick (uh, hey)

Gimme the ball, gimme the ball, take the top shift (Ball)
Call my girls and put 'em all on a spaceship (Brr)
Hang one night with Yoncé, I'll make you famous (Hey)
Have you ever seen the stage goin' apeshit? Rah! (Ayy)


Stack my money fast and go (Fast, fast, go)
Fast like my Lambo (Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt)
Jumpin' off the stage, ho (Jumpin', jumpin', hey, hey)
Crowd better save her (Crowd goin' ape, hey)
I can't believe we made it (This is what we made, made)
This is what we're thankful for (This is what we thank, thank)
I can't believe we made it (This a different angle)
Have you ever seen the crowd goin' apeshit? (Offset!)


I'm a gorilla in the fuckin' coupe
Finna pull up in the zoo
I'm like Chief Keef meet Rafiki-who been lyin' ""King"" to you? (Woo)
Pocket watchin' like kangaroos
Tell these clowns we ain't amused
'Nana clips for that monkey business, four-five got change for you
Motorcades when we came through
Presidential with the planes too
One better get you with the residential
Undefeated with the 'caine too
I said no to the Super Bowl, you need me, I don't need you
Every night we in the end zone, tell the NFL we in stadiums too
Last night was a fuckin' zoo
Stagedivin' in a pool of people
Ran through Liverpool like a fuckin' Beatle
Smoke gorilla glue like it's fuckin' legal
Tell the Grammy's fuck that oh for eight shit
Have you ever seen a crowd goin' apeshit? (Rah, ayy)

Stack my money fast and go (Fast, fast, go)
Fast like my Lambo (Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt)
Jumpin' off the stage, ho (Jumpin', jumpin', hey, hey)
Crowd better save her (Crowd goin' ape, hey)
I can't believe we made it (This is what we made, made)
This is what we're thankful for (This is what we thank, thank)
I can't believe we made it (This a different angle)
Have you ever seen the crowd goin' apeshit? Rah!


Haters in danger (Dangerous)
Whole lot of gangin' (Gang)
35 chains (Chains, chains)
I don't give a damn 'bout the fame (Nope)
G8 planes (Tshh, tshh)
Alexander Wang (Woo!)
She a thot that you claim (Woo!)
Can't be toppin' my reign (C'mon, c'mon, c'mon)
Poppin', I'm poppin', my bitches all poppin'
We go to the dealer and cop it all (Cop it all)
Sippin' my favorite alcohol (Alcohol)
Got me so lit, I need Tylenol (Tylenol)
All of my people, I free 'em all (Free 'em all)
Hop in the whip, wanna see the stars, uh (Woo)
Sendin' the missiles off (Uh, ah), drinkin' my inhibitions off (Yeah)
250 for the Richard Mille (Yeah), yeah yeah, live in a field (Livin' up)
My body make Jigga go kneel (Woo)
Man, my momma, my lawyer, my shield (Shield)
Look at my jewelry, I'm lethal (Lethal)
These diamonds on me, they see-through (See-through)
I'm a Martian, they wishin' they equal (Equal)
I got M's like the back of Evisu

Gimme the ball, gimme the ball, take a top shift (She went crazy)
Call my girls and put 'em all on a spaceship
Hang one night with Yoncé, I'll make you famous (Ah, ah, ah)
Have you ever seen the crowd goin' apeshit? Rah! (Come on)


Stack my money fast and go (Fast and go, fast, fast, go)
Fast like a Lambo (Skrrt, skrrt, skrrt)
I be jumpin' off the stage, ho (Jumpin', jumpin', hey, hey)
Crowd better save her (Crowd goin' ape, hey)
I can't believe we made it (This is what we made, made, I can't believe we made it)
This is what we're thankful for (This is what we thank, thank, this is what we thankful for)
I can't believe we made it (This a different angle, we made it)
Have you ever seen the crowd goin' apeshit? Rah!


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Fast and go)
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah",3786530
128338,2658675,FRIENDS,rap,THE CARTERS,2018,1184125,{},"
My friends, real friends, better than your friends
That's how we keep poppin' out that Benz, yeah
No foes, real friends, we ain't even got to pretend, yeah
Get bands, get bands, spend it all on my friends


Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
And never let me down (They never let me down)
Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
And never let me drown (never let me drown)
Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
And never let me drown (never let me drown)
Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
I'll never hit the ground (never let me drown, never let me drown)


My friends, real friends, better than your friends, yeah
That's how we keep popping out that Benz, yeah
Faux friends, real friends, better than your friends, yeah
Ask them, ask them, they know all my business

I don't know what I would do without all of my crew, yeah
I ain't makin' no room, yeah, I ain't makin' no new friends
I don't make no moves, yeah, without tellin' my crew, yeah
That just how we do, yeah, that's just how we do, oh
Goddammit it, I love my life, Styrofoam cups, no ice
Party 'fore we go inside
Never let them out my sight (ooh), they're right by my side (woo)
Them my ride-or-dies (ride), them my ride-or-dies (ride)
My friends are goals, your friends are foes (foes)
We fly, why cry? Our souls exposed, yeah
We smoke, we laugh, your stress, my stress
Closer than kin, I'm blessed, you blessed (blessed)


Ten toes, ten toes, we was out in that road, uh
Lookin' for love in wrong places, we proposed to a stove, yeah
Share jewels, share clothes, that's how deep this shit goes, yeah
Every week, ya got bros, yeah, all of y'all fear closure
Y'all switchin' sides like NBA teams just after halftime
I'm pullin' up on my dog, make sure he okay, I don't even have time
Then copped me a Porsche with butterscotch seats, this 'fore they had mils
Live better than rappers and they don't even have bills, it's that real
Bought Emory a BM as soon as he came home
We hopped on a plane, headed straight to the Bay
That's how we turn the game on, it's game on
Ty mama died, I was there, my nephew died, he was there
He in my house more than I be there, more than Bey there
Ty Ty there, E there, Breezy there, Juan there
High here, Chaka there, Law there, they all here, ah yeah
Dez there, Kawanna here, shit feel like Nirvana here
Crib like the Soho House, I might stay in and grow out my hair
Tight circle, no squares, I'm geometrically opposed to you
Y'all like to try angles, y'all like to troll, do you?
Y'all talk around hoes, do you? Y'all don't follow codes, do you?
We know everything you say from niggas close to you, you emotional
When I say, ""Free the dogs,"" I free 'em, that's how Meek got his freedom
Y'all put niggas on a t-shirt, it hurts you ain't never meet 'em
You got niggas in the feds, you ain't even tryna feed 'em
I'm tryna free the world, that's how deep I'm in
I ain't goin' to nobody nothin' if me and my wife beefin'
I don't care if the house on fire, I'm dyin', nigga, I ain't leavin'
Ty-Ty take care of my kids, after he done grievin'
If y'all don't understand that, we ain't meant to be friends

Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
And never let me down (They never let me down)
Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
And never let me drown (never let me drown)
Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
And never let me drown (never let me drown)
Gon' pull me up, pull me up, pull me up (pull me up, pull me up, pull me up)
I'll never hit the ground (never let me drown, never let me drown)


They pray, pray for me, they pray, pray for me
See better things for me, want better days for me, unexceptionally
They pray, pray for me, they pray, pray for me
Whenever I'm in need, they in the backseat, with the aux bumpin B
Uh ain't no pride involved, ain't no pride involved
In my heart, heart, heart, you know 4-4-4
That's my dog, dog, dogs, see your dogs, dogs, dogs
Point 'em out, out, out, point 'em out, out, out
What would I be without my friends? (What would I be without my friends?)
I ain't got no understanding (I ain't got no understanding)
'Bout them, you might just catch these hands
We fall out and we make amends, yeah, yeah
My friends


Your friends are foes, my friends are goals
Closer than kin, our souls exposed, yeah
Your friends are frauds, all they want is applause, yeah
And my friends, real friends, closer than kin

Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
Them never let me drown
Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
Them never let me down
Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
Them never let me down
Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up
Them pull me up, pull me up, pull me up",3786537
128341,2658678,LOVEHAPPY,rap,THE CARTERS,2018,1070358,{},"
Happily in love, haters please forgive me
I let my wife write the will, I pray my children outlive me
I give my daughter my custom dresses, she gon' be litty
Vintage pieces by the time she hit the city, yeah-ah
Vintage frames, I see nobody fuckin' wit' him
Pretty thug, out the third ward, hit me
Sir acts just like his dad, shit is trippy (uh-huh)
Twinning, Blue and Rumi, me and Solo how fitting
(Happy in love)
Sitting, dock of the bay wit' a big yacht
Sippin' Yamazaki on the rocks
He went to Jared, I went to JAR out in Paris
Yeah, you fucked up the first stone, we had to get remarried
Yo, chill man! We keepin' it real with these people, right?
Lucky I ain't kill you when I met that b- (Nah, aight, aight)
Y'all know how I met her, we broke up and got back together
To get her back, I had to sweat her
Y'all could make up with a bag, I had to change the weather (uhh)
Move the whole family West, but it's whatever
In a glass house still throwing stones
Hova, Beysus, watch the thrones
(Happy in love)

You did some things to me
Boy, you do some things to me
But love is deeper than your pain
And I believe you can change, baby
The ups and downs are worth it
Long way to go, but we're workin'
We're flawed, but we're still perfect for each other, baby, you
Sometimes, I thought we'd never see the light
We went through hell with heaven on our side
This beach ain't always been no paradise
But nightmares only last one night
(Happy in love)


No more clubs and Cali-curfews (one night)
Just private affairs in a tighter circle
Large format wines in small settings, woo
Just hood ass niggas in designer suits (ooh)
Follow my moves on a truth in Alaïa boots, yeah, yeah
Amelia Earhart, flyer than who? (yeah, yeah)
Fake news y'all choose, we no lie
No photoshop, just real life
(Happy in love)


You did some things to me
Boy, you do some things to me
But love is deeper than your pain
And I believe you can change, baby
The ups and downs are worth it
Long way to go, but we're workin'
We're flawed, but we're still perfect for each other, baby, you
Sometimes, I thought we'd never see the light
We went through hell with heaven on our side
This beach ain't always been no paradise
But nightmares only last one night
(Happy in love)

Damn, look at us now
Pray, pray for the vows
Way up now, it's a long way, a long way down
We came, and we saw, and we conquered it all
We came, and we conquered, now we're happy in love
(Lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy)
(Lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy)
(Lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy)
(Lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy, lovehappy)",3786540
128375,2660020,​pete davidson,pop,Ariana Grande,2018,1258972,{},"
Mmm, yeah, yuh


I thought you into my life (Whoa), look at my mind (Yuh)
No better place or a time, (Look) how they align
Universe must have my back, fell from the sky into my lap
And I know you know that you're my soulmate and all that
I'm like ooh, ooh, my whole life got me ready for you, ooh, ooh


Got me happy, happy
I'ma be happy, happy, yeah
I'ma be happy, happy
Won't get no crying from me, yeah
Gonna be happy, happy
I'ma be happy, happy (Happy)
I'ma be happy, happy, yeah
Gonna be happy, happy
I'ma be happy, happy
I'ma be happy, happy, yeah
Gonna be happy, happy
I'ma be happy, happy
I'ma be happy, happy",3788156
128384,2660295,BTS - FAKE LOVE English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2018,1406935,{},"
For you, I could pretend like I was happy when I was sad
For you, I could pretend like I was strong when I was hurt
I wish love was perfect as love itself
I wish all my weaknesses could be hidden
I grew a flower that can't be bloomed in a dream that can't come true


I'm so sick of this fake love, fake love, fake love
I'm so sorry but it's fake love, fake love, fake love


I wanna be a good man, just for you
I gave the world, just for you
I changed everything, just for you
But I don't know me, Who are you?
The forest just for us, you weren't there
The route I took, I forgot
I even became quite unsure of who I was
Try babbling into the mirror, who the hell are you?

For you, I could pretend like I was happy when I was sad
For you, I could pretend like I was strong when I was hurt
I wish love was perfect as love itself
I wish all my weaknesses could be hidden
I grew a flower that can't be bloomed in a dream that can't come true


Love you so bad, love you so bad
Mold a pretty lie for you
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
Trying to erase myself and make me your doll
Love you so bad, love you so bad
Mold a pretty lie for you
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
Trying to erase myself and make me your doll


I'm so sick of this fake love, fake love, fake love
I'm so sorry but it's fake love, fake love, fake love


Why you sad? I don't know. I don't know
Smile, say 'I love you'
Look at me, even I gave up on myself
Even you can't understand me
You say I'm unfamiliar, changed into the one you used to like
You say I'm not myself which you knew well
No? What do you mean no? I'm blind
Love? What the heck is love? It's all fake love

Woo, I dont know, I dont know, I dont know why
Woo, even I, even I don't know myself
Woo, I just know, I just know, I just know why
'Cause it's all fake love, fake love, fake love


Love you so bad, love you so bad
Mold a pretty lie for you
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
Trying to erase myself and make me your doll
Love you so bad, love you so bad
Mold a pretty lie for you
Love it's so mad, love it's so mad
Trying to erase myself and make me your doll


I'm so sick of this fake love, fake love, fake love
I'm so sorry but it's fake love, fake love, fake love


For you, I could pretend like I was happy when I was sad
For you, I could pretend like I was strong when I was hurt
I wish love was perfect as love itself
I wish all my weaknesses could be hidden
I grew a flower that can't be bloomed in a dream that can't come true",3788496
128386,2660297,BTS - 전하지 못한 진심 The Truth Untold English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2018,1420821,{},"
Full of loneliness
This garden bloomed
Full of thorns
I bind myself in this sand castle


What is your name
Do you have a place to go
Oh could you tell me?
I saw you hiding in this garden


And I know
All of your warmth is real
The blue flower your hand was picking
I want to hold it but


It's my fate
Don't smile to me
Light on me
Because I can't get closer to you
There's no name you can call me

You know that I can't
Show you me
Give you me
I can't show you a ruined part of myself
Once again I put a mask on and go to see you
But I still want you


Bloomed in a garden of loneliness
A flower that resembles you
I wanted to give it to you
After I take off this foolish mask


But I know
I can't do that forever
I have to hide
Because I'm a monster


I am afraid
I am shattered
I'm so afraid
That you will leave me again in the end
Once again I put on a mask and go to see you

The only thing I can do
In the garden
In this world
Is to bloom a pretty flower that resembles you
And to breathe as the me that you know
But I still want you
I still want you


Maybe back then
A little
Just this much
If I had the courage to stand before you
Would everything be different now


I'm crying
That's disappeared
That's fallen
Left alone in this sandcastle
Looking at this broken mask


And I still want you
But I still want you
But I still want you
And I still want you",3788498
128390,2660302,BTS - Magic Shop English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2018,1460131,{},"
I know that you're hesitating because even if you say the truth
In the end it will all return as scars
I'm not going to say anything blatant like ""find strength""
I will let you hear my story, let you hear it


What did I say? I said you'd win, didn't I?
I couldn't believe it (really) Could I win it?
This miracle that isn't a miracle
Did we make it? (No) I was here
You were the one that made your way to me
I do believe your galaxy, I want to listen to your melody
Your stars in the Milky Way, don't forget that I found you anyways
At the end of my despair, you're the last reason
For me who was standing at the edge of the cliff, live


On days I hate being myself, days I want to disappear forever
Let's make a door in your heart
Open the door and this place will await
It's okay to believe, the Magic Shop will comfort you

While drinking a glass of hot tea
And looking up at the Milky Way
You'll be alright, oh, this here is the Magic Shop


So show me (I'll show you)
So show me (I'll show you)
So show me (I'll show you)
Show you show you


Like a rose when blooming
Like cherry blossoms when being scattered in the wind
Like morning glory when fading
Like that beautiful moment
I always want to be the best
So I was impatient and always restless
Comparing myself with others became my daily life
My greed that was my weapon suffocated me and also became a leash
But looking back on it now, truthfully
I feel like it's not true that I wanted to be the best
I wanted to become your comfort and move your heart
I want to take away your sadness, and pain


On days where I hate myself for being me
On days where I want to disappear forever
Let's make a door, it's in your heart
Open the door and this place will await, Magic Shop

While drinking a glass of hot tea
And looking up at the Milky Way
You'll be alright, oh, this here is the Magic Shop


So show me (I'll show you)
So show me (I'll show you)
So show me (I'll show you)
Show you show you


Would you believe me
If I said that I was scared of everything too?
All the sincerity, the remaining times
All your answers are in this place you found
In your Milky Way, inside your heart


You gave me the best of me
So you'll give you the best of you
You found me, you knew me
You gave me the best of me
So you'll give you the best of you
You'll find it, the galaxy inside you

So show me (I'll show you)
So show me (I'll show you)
So show me (I'll show you)
Show you show you",3788502
128468,2662445,Legends,rap,Juice WRLD,2018,1428899,{},"
I usually don't speak on shit like this, but
Ain't nobody else saying shit
Daytrip took it to ten (Hey)


I usually have an answer to the question, but this time I'm gon' be quiet (This time)
Ain't nothing like the feeling of uncertainty, the eeriness of silence
This time, it was so unexpected
Last time, it was the drugs he was lacing
All legends fall in the making, yeah, sorry truth, uh
Dying young, uh, demon youth


What's the 27 Club? We ain't making it past 21
I been going through paranoia, so I always gotta keep a gun
Damn, that's the world we live in now
Yeah, hold on, just hear me out
They tell me I'ma be a legend, I don't want that title now
'Cause all the legends seem to die out, what the fuck is this 'bout?
I'm tryna make it out, I'm tryna change the world
I'm tryna take her out, I'm tryna take your girl
More importantly, I'm tryna change the world
Maybe flex with some diamonds and pearls, yeah

I usually have an answer to the question, but this time I'm gon' be quiet (This time)
Ain't nothing like the feeling of uncertainty, the eeriness of silence
This time, it was so unexpected
Last time, it was the drugs he was lacing
All legends fall in the making, yeah, sorry truth, uh
Dying young, uh, demon youth


My mind is foggy, I'm so confused
We keep on losing our legends to
The cruel cold world, what is it coming to?
The end of the world, is it coming soon?


Now, ooh, ooh, oh
That hit's for you


I usually have an answer to the question, but this time I'm gon' be quiet (This time)
Ain't nothing like the feeling of uncertainty, the eeriness of silence
This time, it was so unexpected
Last time, it was the drugs he was lacing
All legends fall in the making, yeah, sorry truth, uh
Dying young, uh, demon youth

Daytrip took it to ten (Hey)",3791143
128510,2663349,Happier,pop,Marshmello & Bastille,2018,3147900,{},"
Lately, I've been, I've been thinking
I want you to be happier, I want you to be happier


When the morning comes
When we see what we've become
In the cold light of day, we're a flame in the wind
Not the fire that we've begun
Every argument, every word we can't take back
'Cause with all that has happened
I think that we both know the way that this story ends


Then only for a minute
I want to change my mind
'Cause this just don't feel right to me
I wanna raise your spirits
I want to see you smile but
Know that means I'll have to leave

Know that means I'll have to leave
Lately, I've been, I've been thinking
I want you to be happier, I want you to be happier


When the evening falls
And I'm left there with my thoughts
And the image of you being with someone else
Well, it's eating me up inside
But we ran our course, we pretended we're okay
Now if we jump together, at least we can swim
Far away from the wreck we made


Then only for a minute
I want to change my mind
'Cause this just don't feel right to me
I wanna raise your spirits
I want to see you smile but
Know that means I'll have to leave


Know that means I'll have to leave
Lately, I've been, I've been thinking
I want you to be happier, I want you to be happier

So I'll go, I'll go
I will go, go, go
So I'll go, I'll go
I will go, go, go


Lately, I've been, I've been thinking
I want you to be happier, I want you to be happier
Even though I might not like this
I think that you'll be happier, I want you to be happier


Then only for a minute (Only for a minute)
I want to change my mind
'Cause this just don't feel right to me (Right to me)
I wanna raise your spirits (Wanna raise your spirits)
I want to see you smile but
Know that means I'll have to leave


Know that means I'll have to leave
Lately, I've been, I've been thinking
I want you to be happier, I want you to be happier


So I'll go, I'll go
I will go, go, go",3792450
128919,2672548,BLACKPINK - 뚜두뚜두 DDU-DU DDU-DU Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,2018,1319973,{},"
BLACKPINK!
(Ah yeah, ah yeah!)
BLACKPINK!
(Ah yeah, ah yeah!)


Ayy, chaghan eolgure geureoji mothan taedo (Huh)
Ganyeorin mommae sok garyeojin volumeeun du baero (Yah, yah, double up) (Woo!)
Geochimeopsi jikjin gudi bojin anhji nunchi
Black hamyeon Pink urin yeppeujanghan Savage (BLACKPINK!)
Wonhal ttaen daenohko ppaetji (Uh)
Neon mwol haedo kallo mul begi (Uh)
Du sonen gadeughan fat check
Gunggeumhamyeon haebwa fact check
Nun nopin kkokdaegi
Mul mannan mulgogi
Jom doghae nan Toxic
You hokae I'm Foxy


Du beon saenggakae
Heunhan namdeulcheoreom chaghan cheogeun mot hanikka
Chaghakaji ma
Swipge useojuneun geon nal wihan geoya
Ajigeun jal moreugetji
Guji wonhamyeon test me
Neon bul bodeusi ppeonhae
Manmanhan geol wonhaetdamyeon
Oh, wait 'til I do what I do

Hit you with that ddu-du, ddu-du, du
(Ah yeah, ah yeah!)
Hit you with that ddu-du, ddu-du, du
(Ah yeah, ah yeah!)
Ddu-du, du-du-du-du-du


(Hit you with that, hit you with that, hit you with that)
BLACKPINK!


Jigeum naega geoleoganeun geolin
BLACKPINK 4 way sageori
Dongseonambuk sabangeulo run it
Need a bucket list ssak da I bought it
Neol dangineun geotdo meolli milchineun geotdo
Jemeotdaero haneun bad girl
Jogheon sileohageon nuga mwora hadeon
When the bass drop, it's another banger


Du beon saenggakae
Heunhan namdeulcheoreom chaghan cheogeun mot hanikka
Chakgakaji ma
Swipge useojuneun geon nal wihan geoya
Ajigeun jal moreugetji
Guji wonhamyeon test me
Neon bul bodeusi ppeonhae
Manmanhan geol wonhaetdamyeon
Oh, wait 'til I do what I do

Hit you with that ddu-du, ddu-du, du
(Ah yeah, ah yeah)
Hit you with that ddu-du, ddu-du, du
(Ah yeah, ah yeah)
Ddu-du, du-du-du-du-du


What you gonna do when I
Come, come through with that, that, uh (Uh-huh)
What you gonna do when I
Come, come through with that, that, uh (Uh-huh)
Tteugeowo, tteugeowo, tteugeowo like fire (Fire)
(Ddu-du, du-du-du-du-du, ddu-du, du-du-du-du-du)
Tteugeowo, tteugeowo, tteugeowo like fire (Fire)
(Ddu-du, du-du-du-du-du, ddu-du, du-du-du-du-du)


BLACKPINK! (Hey!)
(Ddu-du, du-du-du-du, du-du-du-du)
(Ah yeah, ah yeah, ah yeah, ah yeah!)
Tteugeowo, tteugeowo, tteugeowo like fire (Hey!)
Tteugeowo, tteugeowo, tteugeowo like fire


Hit you with that ddu-du, ddu-du, du",3804217
128967,2673958,BTS - Euphoria English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2018,1121794,{},"
You are the sunlight that rose again in my life
A reincarnation of my childhood dreams
I don't know what these emotions are
Am I still dreaming?
There is a green oasis in the desert
A priori deep inside of me
I'm so happy, I can't breathe
Everything's getting blurry


I hear the ocean from far away
Across the dream, past the woods
I'm following this clarity
Take my hands now (hands now)
You are the cause of my euphoria


(Hey)
Euphoria
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria

Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Ooh-ooh)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Euphoria)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Close the door now
When I'm with you, I'm in utopia


Were you wandering around (around)
Looking for an erased dream too?
It's different from what destiny suggests
We share the same painful views
Won't you please stay in my dreams, yeah


I hear the ocean from far away
Across the dream, past the woods
Following this clarity
Take my hands now (hands now)
You are the cause of my euphoria


Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh (Hey)
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Euphoria
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria

Even if the earth crumbles
No matter who shakes this world
Don't let go of my hand
Please don't wake me up from this dream


I hear the ocean from far away
Across the dream, past the woods
(Please don't wake me up from this dream)
Following this clarity
Take my hands now (hands now)
You are the cause of my euphoria


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Euphoria (Euphoria, oh)
Take my hands now
You are the cause of my euphoria


Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Oh, euphoria)
Oh yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
Close the door now (door now)
When I'm with you, I'm in utopia",3805955
128989,2674413,Be Alright,pop,Dean Lewis,2018,1076162,{},"
I look up from the ground
To see your sad and teary eyes
You look away from me
And I see there's something you're trying to hide
And I reach for your hand but it's cold
You pull away again
And I wonder what's on your mind
And then you say to me you made a dumb mistake
You start to tremble and your voice begins to break
You say the cigarettes on the counter weren't your friend's
They were my mate's
And I feel the colour draining from my face


And my friend said
""I know you love her, but it's over, mate
It doesn't matter, put the phone away
It's never easy to walk away, let her go
It'll be alright""

So I still look back at all the messages you'd sent
And I know it wasn't right, but it was fucking with my head
And everything deleted like the past, yeah, it was gone
And when I touched your face, I could tell you're moving on
But it's not the fact that you kissed him yesterday
It's the feeling of betrayal, that I just can't seem to shake
And everything I know tells me that I should walk away
But I just wanna stay


And my friend said
""I know you love her, but it's over, mate
It doesn't matter, put the phone away
It's never easy to walk away, let her go
It'll be okay
It's gonna hurt for a bit of time
So bottoms up, let's forget tonight
You'll find another and you'll be just fine
Let her go""


But nothing heals the past like time
And they can't steal
The love you're born to find
But nothing heals the past like time
And they can't steal
The love you're born to find

""I know you love her, but it's over, mate
It doesn't matter, put the phone away
It's never easy to walk away, let her go
It'll be okay
It's gonna hurt for a bit of time
So bottoms up, let's forget tonight
You'll find another and you'll be just fine
Let her go""


It'll be alright
It'll be alright
It'll be alright
It'll be alright
It'll be alright",3806525
129028,2675283,Nonstop,rap,Drake,2018,2120734,{},"
Tay Keith, fuck these niggas up!


Look, I just flipped a switch (Flipped, flipped)
I don't know nobody else that's doin' this
Bodies start to drop, ayy (Hit the floor)
Now they wanna know me since I hit the top, ayy
This a Rollie, not a stopwatch, shit don't ever stop
This the flow that got the block hot, shit got super hot, ayy
Give me my respect (Give me my respect)
I just took it left like I'm ambidex'
Bitch, I move through London with the Eurostep (Two)
Got a sneaker deal and I ain't break a sweat
Catch me 'cause I'm gone (Outta there, I'm gone)
How I go from 6 to 23 like I'm LeBron?
Servin' up a pack (Servin' up a pack)
Niggas pullin' gimmicks 'cause they scared to rap, ayy
Funny how they shook, ayy, got these niggas shook
Pullin' back the curtain by myself, take a look, ayy
I'm a bar spitta, I'm a hard hitta
Yeah I'm light-skinned, but I'm still a dark nigga
I'm a wig splitta, I'm a tall figure
I'm an unforgivin' wild-ass dog nigga
Somethin' wrong with 'em, got 'em all bitter
I'm a bill printer, I'm a gravedigger
Yeah, I am what I am
I don't have no time for no misunderstandings again

My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin'
This a Rollie, not a stopwatch, shit don't ever stop
From smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is-


Future took the business and ran it for me
I let Ollie take the owl, told him brand it for me
I get 2 million a pop and that's standard for me
Like I went blind, dog, you gotta hand it to me
(Gotta gimme that shit, dog)
Prayed, then I prayed again (Amen, Lord)
Had a moment but it came and went
(They don't love you no more)
You don't wanna play with him (Nah, nah, nah)
They'll be mournin' you like 8AM (R.I.P.)
Pinky ring 'til I get a wedding ring (Whoa, yeah)
Love my brothers, cut 'em in on anything (Big slice)
And you know it's King Slime Drizzy, damn (Woo yeah)
She just said I'm bae, I hit the thizzle dance (Mac Dre shit)
Either hand is the upper hand (Oh yeah, shit)
Got a bubba on my other hand (Whoa, yeah, shit, yeah)
This shit ain't no hundred bands (Nah, nah, nah, nah)
Palace look like Buckingham
Bills so big, I call 'em Williams, for real
Reasons to go crazy, got a trillion, for real
They been tryin' me but I'm resilient, for real
I can't go in public like civilian, for real
And I hardly take offense
Money for revenge, man, that's hardly an expense
Al Haymon checks off of all of my events
I like all the profit, man, I hardly do percents (I don't do that shit)
A big part of me resents
Niggas that I knew from when I started in this shit
They see what I got and, man, it's hard to be content
Fuck what they got goin' on, I gotta represent (Ayy!)

My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin'
This a Rollie, not a stopwatch, shit don't ever stop
From smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin', from smokin' the chicken, the bass is kickin'
My head is spinnin'
This the flow that got the block hot, shit got super hot",3807730
129029,2675284,Emotionless,rap,Drake,2018,1508456,{},"
You've got me feeling emotions
Ayy, higher
Ah
You've got me fe-
You, oh


Don't link me
Don't hit me when you hear this and tell me your favorite song
Don't tell me how you knew it would be like this all along
I know the truth is you won't love me until I'm gone
And even then the thing that comes after is movin' on
I can't even capture the feeling I had at first
Meetin' all my heroes like seein' how magic works
The people I look up to are goin' from bad to worse
Their actions out of character even when they rehearse
Workin' in the land of the free, the home of the brave
I gotta bring my brothers or else I feel out of place
Breakin' speed records on roads that these niggas paved
And they don't like that, it's written all on they face
I don't know how I'ma make it out of here clean
Can't even keep track of who plays for the other team
Iconic duos rip and split at the seams
Good-hearted people are takin' it to extremes
Leavin' me in limbo to question what I believe
Leavin' me to ask what's their motive in makin' peace
Leavin' me to not trust anybody I meet
Leavin' me to ask, is there anybody like me?

You've got me fe-
You, ohhhh
You've got me fe-
You, ohhhh, ayy


Missin' out on my years
There's times when I wish I was where I was
Back when I used to wish I was here
Missin' out on my days
Scrollin' through life and fishin' for praise
Opinions from total strangers take me out of my ways
I try and see who's there on the other end of the shade
Most times it's just somebody that's underaged
That's probably just alone and afraid
And lashin' out so that someone else can feel they pain
I always hear people complain about the place that they live
That all the people here are fake and they got nothin' to give
'Cause they been starin' at somebody else's version of shit
That makes another city seem more excitin' than it is
I know a girl whose one goal was to visit Rome
Then she finally got to Rome
And all she did was post pictures for people at home
'Cause all that mattered was impressin' everybody she's known
I know another girl that's cryin' out for help
But her latest caption is ""Leave me alone""
I know a girl happily married 'til she puts down her phone
I know a girl that saves pictures from places she's flown
To post later and make it look like she still on the go
Look at the way we live
I wasn't hidin' my kid from the world
I was hidin' the world from my kid
From empty souls who just wake up and look to debate
Until you starin' at your seed, you can never relate
Breakin' news in my life, I don't run to the blogs
The only ones I wanna tell are the ones I can call
They always ask, ""Why let the story run if it's false?""
You know a wise man once said nothin' at all
I'm exhausted and drained, I can't even pretend
All these people takin' miles when you give 'em an inch
All these followers but who gon' follow me to the end?
I guess I'll make it to the end and I'ma find out then

You've got me fe-
You, ohhhh, ayy
Higher, higher
You've got me fe-
You, ohhhh, ayy
Higher, higher",3807731
129035,2675297,Mob Ties,rap,Drake,2018,1127421,{},"
Ayy, sick of these niggas (Sick)
Sick of these niggas (Sick, sick)
Hire some help (Help), get rid of these niggas (Skrr)
Sick of this shit, move to the Ritz
Turned out the bitch (Ayy)
It is what it is, yeah
GLE, 'cause that Lambo movin' fast (Skrr)
S Class, G Class, lotta class (Sss, sss)
In a rocket and that bitch ain't got no tags (Skrr, skrr)
Louis bags in exchange for body bags, yeah


Sick of these niggas (Sick)
Sick of these niggas (Sick, sick)
Hire some help (Help), get rid of these niggas (Grr)
Fuck what it was, it is what it is (What)
Whatever you did, it is what it is


And I'm so tired (tired)
I fuck with the mob and I got ties (Lotta ties, lotta ties)
Knock you off to pay their tithes (Do doo)
They want me gone but don't know why
It's too late for all that lovey-dovey shit
I'm your brother shit, all that other shit
It's too late for all that
It's too late for all that, ayy
It's too late for all that lovey-dovey shit
I'm your brother shit, all that other shit
It's too late for all that, ayy
It's too late for all that

Ayy, sick of these niggas
I'm sick of these niggas
Hire some help, get rid of these niggas
I'm not with the ra-ra
I am a Dada
My bitch in Chanel now
Your bitch in Escada (Sick, sick, sick, sick)


Yeah, and they shook
Please don't let them fool ya, I don't care how they look (Nah)
Heard all of the talkin', now it's quiet, now it's shush (Shh)
Twenty-nine is comin', they on edge when I cook (Cook)
Lead the league in scorin', man, but look at my assists (Shh)
Yes I be with Future but I like to reminisce (Yeah)
I do not forget a thing, I'm patient, it's a gift (yeah)
Try to tell 'em they ain't got to do it, they insist (they insist)
Yeah, I can tell
I just gave 'em two for forty million like Chappelle (Two)
Standin' over coffin with a hammer and a nail (Two)
Heard you hit up so and so, that name don't ring a bell, nah


Sick of these niggas (Sick)
Hire some help, get rid of these niggas
I'm sick of this shit (Sick, sick)
I'm runnin' a blitz (Ayy)
Whatever you did (Ayy), it is what it is

And I'm so tired (Tired)
I fuck with the mob and I got ties (Lotta ties, lotta ties)
Knock you off to pay their tithes (Do doo)
They want me gone but don't know why
It's too late for all that lovey-dovey shit
I'm your brother shit, all that other shit
It's too late for all that
It's too late for all that, ayy
It's too late for all that lovey-dovey shit
I'm your brother shit, all that other shit
It's too late for all that, ayy
It's too late for all that",3807746
129043,2675308,Jaded,rap,Drake,2018,1011886,{},"
Ayy, yeah
Dogs on this side, dogs over on this side
Yeah


Leaving me (leavin' me)
Dippin' out on me (on me)
Already got what you needed, I guess
Quickly (Quickly) learned yourself through me (Through me)
Already gave you what you needed, I guess (Ooh yeah)
I guess (Yeah) yeah
That's why I'm not with nobody (Ooh yeah)
'Cause I don't wanna hurt nobody (Ooh yeah)
Did it over text, didn't call me (Ooh yeah)
Still got love for you, mami
I know you wanna be somebody
Even if you gotta leave somebody (Body) yeah


Yes I'm hurting, yes I'm jaded (Jaded)
Most of these things I don't wanna say (Jaded)
I wanna be around while you chasin' (While you chasin' it)
You wanna hit me up when you make it
You'll try and come back when you famous
I always want the truth but it's dangerous (Dangerous, oh)
You got somethin' real, not basic (Ooh yeah)
You wanna get with me, stop
Yes I'm hurting, yes I'm jaded (Jaded)
Most of these things, I don't wanna say (Say)
I wanna be around while you chasin'
(Wanna be around, wanna be around)
You wanna hit me up when you make it (Ooh, yeah)
You'll try and come back when you famous
(Back around, back around)
I always want the truth but it's dangerous (Dangerous)
You got somethin' real, not basic
You wanna get with me, stop (Flakin')
Yeah, dogs on this side, dogs over on this side
(Ooh yeah, ooh yeah, ooh yeah)

Ayy, told me about all your insecurities, for what?
Dragged me like two hours to your family's house, for what?
Said you need some time but I should stick around, for what?
Always felt like stickin' 'round's the same as being stuck
And like guns with the ink in, you're gettin' under my skin
Pretty little young thing (Young thing)
Had a nigga convinced, got me too excited
Yeah, you played me, you played me, you played me
Lowdown, dirty, shameful, crazy
I need to know how the new nigga you got does the same thing
I do for a living but is way less wavy
How you even managin' to keep straight faces
In all the pictures that I seen lately
Lord knows you still look amazin'
That's besides the point I'm makin'
You're way too opinionated to have to force it, to have to fake it
You had potential, I coulda shaped it
You went and caved in (Ooh yeah)
We coulda waited, I wasn't rushin', difference in ages
You're old enough, but you're still a baby
You've shared stories where you did amazin'
Things to be loyal, things to be patient
That was before me, I musta changed it
Shifted your focus, lens lookin' jaded (Jaded)

Most of these things I don't wanna say
I wanna be around while you chasin' (While you chasin' it)
You wanna hit me up when you make it
You'll try and come back when you famous
(Back around, back around, dangerous, oh, ooh yeah)
Dogs on this side, dogs over on this side
You wanna get with me, stop (Flakin')",3807756
129045,2675312,In My Feelings,rap,Drake,2018,7400576,{},"
Trap, TrapMoneyBenny
This shit got me in my feelings
Gotta be real with it, yeah


Kiki, do you love me? Are you riding?
Say you'll never ever leave from beside me
'Cause I want ya, and I need ya
And I'm down for you always
KB, do you love me? Are you riding?
Say you'll never ever leave from beside me
'Cause I want ya, and I need ya
And I'm down for you always


Look, the new me is really still the real me
I swear you gotta feel me before they try and kill me
They gotta make some choices, they runnin' out of options
'Cause I've been goin' off and they don't know when it's stoppin'
And when you get to toppin', I see that you've been learnin'
And when I take you shoppin', you spend it like you earned it
And when you popped off on your ex he deserved it
I thought you were the one from the jump, that confirmed it
TrapMoneyBenny, ayy
I buy you Champagne but you love some Henny
From the block like you Jenny
I know you special, girl, 'cause I know too many

'Resha, do you love me? Are you riding?
Say you'll never ever leave from beside me
'Cause I want ya, and I need ya
And I'm down for you always
JT, do you love me? Are you riding?
Say you'll never ever leave from beside me
'Cause I want ya, and I need ya
And I'm down for you always


Two bad bitches and we kissin' in the Wraith
Kissin'-kissin' in the Wraith, kiss-kissin' in the Wraith
I need that black card and the code to the safe
Code to the safe, code-code to the safe-safe
I show him how that neck work
Fuck that Netflix and chill-what's your net-net-net worth?
'Cause I want ya, and I need ya
And I'm down for you always
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, he bad
And I'm down for you always
Yeah, yeah, yeah, guess who's back
And I'm down for you always
D-down for you al-
Black biggy biggy black biggy black blake
D-d-down for you always
I got a new boy, and that nigga trade!

Kiki, do you love me? Are you riding?
Say you'll never ever leave from beside me
'Cause I want you, and I need you
And I'm down for you always
KB, do you love me? Are you riding?
Say you'll never ever leave from beside me
'Cause I want ya, and I-


Skate and Smoke and Rap
Now let me see you
Bring that ass, bring that ass, bring that ass back!
B-bring that ass, bring that ass, bring that ass back!
Shawty say the nigga that she with can't hit
But shawty, I'ma hit it, hit it like I can't miss
Now let me see you
Clap that ass, you're the only one I love
Clap that ass, clap-clap that ass!
Bring that ass back!
Clap-clap-clap that ass, you're the only one I love
Let's go, let's go, let's go!
Bring that ass back!


Trap, TrapMoneyBenny
This shit got me in my feelings
Gotta be real with it, yup
BlaqNmilD, you a genius, you diggin' me?

I don't even care, I need a photo with Drake
Because my Instagram is weak as fuck
I'm just being real, my shit, look-",3807759
129095,2675997,BTS - Pied Piper English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2017,1082916,{},"
It's dangerous so it's better
You know deep inside
You can't stop it now (You can't stop)
So be honest with me now
Stop, now stop watching and study for your test
Your parents and boss hate me
Video clips, pictures, tweets
V app, Bon Voyage
I know, you can't help what you like
But stop, interpret the music video later
You have so many pictures of me in your room anyway
It's not just one hour, it's a whole year that'll disappear
So this song is a reward I'm giving to you


You're not being punished
Come here, I'm your paradise
Can't close your eyes (Can't close your eyes)
You can throw a fit but it's no use (Don't reject me)
Just close your eyes, tune your ears

Follow the sound of the pipe, follow this song
It's a bit dangerous but I'm so sweet
I'm here to save you, I'm here to ruin you
You called me, see? I'm so sweet
Follow the sound of the pipe
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh (I'm takin' over you)
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh (I'm takin' over you)


You know that it's already begun
The moment you hear that sound (Yeah, SUGA)
Maybe I'm a bit dangerous
Like the pied piper
I'm testing you
Like the fruit from the tree of good and evil
My pipe awakens everything
That sound burns you up even more
You're pulled by it, you react
I'm endlessly blowing
I'm your guilty pleasure
You can't escape, never

You're not being punished
Come here, I'm your paradise
Can't close your eyes (Can't close your eyes)
You can throw a fit but it's no use (Don't reject me)
Just close your eyes, tune your ears


Follow the sound of the pipe, follow this song
It's a bit dangerous but I'm so sweet
I'm here to save you, I'm here to ruin you
You called me, see? I'm so sweet
Follow the sound of the pipe


Yeah, I'm a bit dangerous (Ooh-ooh-ooh)
I can't even handle myself (Ooh-ooh-ooh)
Don't worry, my hands
They're only warm for you
If I'm ruining you right now (Ooh-ooh-ooh)
Please forgive me (Ooh-ooh-ooh)
Because I can't live without you
Because you know all of this


Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh (I'm takin' over you)
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh
Ooh-ooh-ooh, oh-oh-oh-oh-oh (I'm takin' over you)",3808586
129211,2678866,Nico And The Niners,pop,twenty one pilots,2018,1087923,"{""​twenty one pilots""}","
Msilaiv ecnuoned ew
Tsae eurt daeh dna amed evael lliw uoy
Sotidnab era ew


East is up, I'm fearless when I hear this on the low
East is up, I'm careless when I wear my rebel clothes
East is up, when Bishops come together they will know that
Dema don't control us, Dema don't control
East is up


They want to make you forget
They want to make you forget
Save your razorblades now, not yet
Save your razorblades now, not yet


I'm heavy, my jumpsuit is on steady
I'm lighter when I'm lower, I'm higher when I'm heavy, oh
I'm so high, my Jumpsuit takes me so high
I'm flying from a fire, from Nico and the Niners, oh
East is up, I'm fearless when I hear this on the low
East is up, I'm careless when I wear my rebel clothes
East is up, when Bishops come together they will know that
Dema don't control us, Dema don't control
I'm heavy, my jumpsuit is on steady
I'm lighter when I'm lower, I'm higher when I'm heavy, oh
I'm so high, my Jumpsuit takes me so high
I'm flying from a fire, from Nico and the Niners, oh

I'm heavy, jumpsuit is on steady
Lighter when I'm lower, higher when I'm heavy, oh
I'm so high, I'm so high
So high, I'm so high
Fire, Nico and the Niners


What I say when I want to be enough
What a beautiful day for making a break for it
We'll find a way to pay for it
Maybe from all the money we made razorblade stores
Rent a racehorse and force a sponsor
And start a concert, a complete diversion
Start a mob and you can be quite certain
We'll win but not everyone will get out
No, no
We'll win but not everyone will get out
No, no
We'll win but not everyone will get out


East is up, I'm fearless when I hear this on the low
East is up, I'm careless when I wear my rebel clothes
East is up, when Bishops come together they will know that
Dema don't control us, Dema don't control
East is up

I'm so high, so high
Fire, Nico and the Niners
I'm so high, so high
Sotidnab era ew
Fire, Nico and the Niners",3812599
129224,2679195,Captain,rap,Miyagi,2018,1628136,{},"


Йа, йа
Miyagi


Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан
Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан


Мир eбучих антeнн
В час пeрeмeн убавит урбана дeнь
Нe готов был унять эту любовь, посeдeл
Нeнавижу сeбя, но живу каждый дeнь я
Только тучи, да тeнь
От нeбылицы, мeня знать нe хотeл
Этот мир догорeл для мeня, убивай
Зарывай моё тeло, нe жду пeрeмeн я
Мнe наскучили всe
В частности, сам сeбe слово давал
Нe забыть, для кого я живу, но я мразь
И мудак, и паскуда - eго нe сдeржал я
Я закручивал дeнь
Музыка-дура мeня толпами бeй
Так а толку? От этого мнe нe умeрeть
Забывай моё имя. Забывай мeня

Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан
Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан


Дeскать, это пeрeбeжки по рeльсам
Тeсла пeрeвeрнул мир, куролeсим
Ты напой, как бы напeл Бог
Это бeрeга мастeра, восток
И такой расклад: либо ты, либо стоп
Окати мeня водой, когда будeт ожог
Добрый, но злой - бeрeжёт
Наговаривали пули, бит и бой порeшал
Я - стeн нeдобитый портрeт
Либо манeкeн, либо чeловeк
Этому нe вeрь, этому нe вeрь, этому нe вeрь
Этому нe вeрь, этому никогда нe вeрь
Взамeн я накидывал строк
Дeло пeрeмeн. Я пeрeвидал снов
И топил эту любовь, и лавировал вновь
""Это пустозвон!"" - говорили назло

Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан
Потeряли сeбя, нeма нам нe надо, man
Команда магов ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан
Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан
Потeряли сeбя нeма, нам нe надо мана
Команда магов - ва-банк, и зомби там битом, игриво так, по кабакам
За браваду тут топил убитый капитан
Акапeллами нeдопeтыми насыпал грусти, лови для life'а, чё нe фонтан",3813086
129489,2685802,BTS - 봄날 Spring Day English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2017,1617367,{},"
I miss you
Saying this makes me miss you all even more
I miss you
Even though I'm looking at your photo
Time's so cruel, I hate us
Seeing each other is now more difficult
It's all winter here, even in August
My heart is running on time, alone on the Snowpiercer
I want to go to the other side of Earth, holding your hand, put an end to winter
How much should my longings fall like snow
Before the days of spring return, friend?


Like the tiny dust, tiny dust floating in the air
I could've reached you faster
If I was snow flying in the air


Snowflakes fall down
And fall apart little by little
I miss you (I miss you)
I miss you (I miss you)
How long do I have to wait
How many nights do I have to pass
To see you? (To see you)
To meet you? (To meet you)

Pass the end of winter's cold
Until the spring day comes again
Until the flowers bloom again
Please stay, please stay there a little longer


Is it you who changed? (Is it you who changed)
Or is it me? (Or is it me)
I hate this moment, this time flowing by
We've changed, you know?
Just like everyone, you know?
Yes, I hate you, you left me
But I never stopped thinking about you, not even a day
I miss you, honestly, but I'll erase you
'Cause it hurts less than to blame you


I try to exhale you in pain
Like smoke, like white smoke
I say that I'll erase you
But I can't really let you go yet


Snowflakes fall down
And fall apart little by little
I miss you (I miss you)
I miss you (I miss you)
How long do I have to wait
And how many nights do I have to pass
To see you? (To see you)
To meet you? (To meet you)

You know it all, you're my best friend
The morning will come again
No darkness, no season can't last forever


Maybe cherries are blossoming
And winter is going to be over
I miss you (I miss you)
I miss you (I miss you)
Wait a little bit, just a few more nights
I'll be there to see you (I'll go there to meet you)
I'll come for you (I'll come for you)


Pass the end of winter's cold
Until the spring day comes again
Until the flowers bloom again
Please stay, please stay there a little longer",3821292
129672,2691280,Eastside,pop,"benny blanco, Halsey & Khalid",2018,1803950,"{""​benny blanco / Halsey & Khalid""}","
Uh
Yeah, yeah


When I was young, I fell in love
We used to hold hands, man, that was enough (Yeah)
Then we grew up, started to touch
Used to kiss underneath the light on the back of the bus (Yeah)
I know your daddy didn't like me much
And he didn't believe me when I said you were the one
Oh, every day, she found a way out of the window to sneak out late


She used to meet me on the Eastside
In the city where the sun don't set
And every day, you know that we'd ride
Through the backstreets in a blue Corvette
Baby, you know I just wanna leave tonight
We can go anywhere we want
Drive down to the coast, jump in the sea
Just take my hand and come with me, yeah

We can do anything if we put our minds to it
Take your old life, then you put a line through it
My love is yours if you're willing to take it
Give me your heart 'cause I ain't gonna break it
So come away, starting today
Start a new life together in a different place
We know that love is how all these ideas came to be
So baby, run away with me


Seventeen, and we got a dream to have a family
A house, and everything in between
And then, oh, suddenly, we turned twenty-three
And now we got pressure for taking our life more seriously
We got our dead-end jobs and got bills to pay
Our old friends are now our enemies
And now I, I'm thinking back to when I was young
Back to the day when I was falling in love


He used to meet me on the Eastside
In the city where the sun don't set
And every day, you know where we'd ride
Through the backstreets in a blue Corvette
And baby, you know I just wanna leave tonight
We can go anywhere we want
Drive down to the coast, jump in the sea
Just take my hand and come with me, singing

We can do anything if we put our minds to it
Take your old life, then you put a line through it
My love is yours if you're willing to take it
Give me your heart 'cause I ain't gonna break it
So come away, starting today
To start a new life together in a different place
We know that love is how all these ideas came to be
So baby, run away with me


Run away now, run away now
Run away now
Run away now, run away now
Run away now


He used to meet me on the Eastside
She used to meet me on the Eastside
He used to meet me on the Eastside
She used to meet me on the Eastside
In the city where the sun don't set",3828011
129849,2694436,Love It If We Made It,pop,The 1975,2018,1063721,{},"
We're fucking in a car, shooting heroin
Saying controversial things just for the hell of it
Selling melanin and then suffocate the black men
Start with misdemeanours and we'll make a business out of them
And we can find out the information
Access all the applications
That are hardening positions based on miscommunication
Oh, fuck your feelings
Truth is only hearsay
We're just left to decay
Modernity has failed us


And I'd love it if we made it
Yes, I'd love it if we made it
Yes, I'd love it if we made it
Yes, I'd love it if we made it


And poison me, daddy
I got the Jones right through my bones
Write it on a piece of stone
A beach of drowning three-year olds
Rest in peace Lil Peep
The poetry is in the streets
Jesus save us
Modernity has failed us

And I'd love it if we made it
Yes, I'd love it if we made it
Yes, I'd love it if we made it
Yes, I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
I'd love it if we made it

Tell me something I didn't know


Consultation
Degradation
Fossil fueling
Masturbation
Immigration
Liberal kitsch
Kneeling on a pitch


""I moved on her like a bitch!""
Excited to be indicted
Unrequited house with seven pools
""Thank you Kanye, very cool!""
The war has been incited
And guess what, you're all invited
And you're famous
Modernity has failed us

And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
Tell me something I didn't know
And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it
And I'd love it if we made it",3831888
130005,2697222,Self Care,rap,Mac Miller,2018,1446627,{},"


Mhm, mhm
Okay
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Dollars


I switched the time zone, but what do I know?
Spendin' nights hitchhikin', where will I go?
I could fly home, with my eyes closed
But it'd get kinda hard to see, that's no surprise though
And you could find me, I ain't hidin'
I don't move my feet when I be glidin'
I just slide in and then I roll out


Yep
Well, climbin' over that wall (Yeah, wall, wall,) mm
I remember, yes, I remember, yes, I remember it all
Swear the height be too tall (Yeah), so like September I fall
(Down, down, down) Down below
Now I know that the medicine be on call, yeah (Gimme, gimme, gimme)
When it's feelin' like you hot enough to melt, yeah (Melt, yeah)
Can't trust no one, can't even trust yourself, yeah (-Self, yeah)
And I love you, I don't love nobody else, yeah (Else, yeah)

Tell them they can take that bullshit elsewhere (Yeah)
Self care, I'm treatin' me right, yeah
Hell yeah, we gonna be alright (We gon' be alright)


I switched the time zone (Yeah), but what do I know? (Yeah)
Spendin' nights hitchhikin', where will I go?
I could fly home (Yeah), with my eyes closed (Yeah)
But it'd get kinda hard to see, that's no surprise though
And you could find me (Yeah), I ain't hidin' (Yeah)
I don't move my feet when I be glidin'
I just slide in (Yeah) and then I roll out


Been on the road
I don't see it
Out on the road
I don't see where I'm going


Yeah, I been readin' them signs (Wow, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
I been losin' my, I been losin' my, I been losin' my mind, yeah (Yeah)
Get the fuck out the way ('Kay), must be this high to play (Okay)
It must be nice up above the lights and what a lovely life that I made, yeah (Uh)
I know that feelin' like it's in my family tree, yeah (Woah)
That Mercedes drove me crazy, I was speedin'
Somebody save me from myself, yeah

Tell them they can take that bullshit elsewhere
Self care, we gonna be good
Hell yeah, they lettin' me go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o


I switched the time zone (Yeah), but what do I know? (Yeah)
Spendin' nights hitchhikin', where will I go? (Yeah)
I could fly home (Yeah) with my eyes closed (Yeah)
But it'd get kinda hard to see, that's no surprise though (Yeah)
And you could find me (Yeah), I ain't hidin' (Yeah)
I don't move my feet when I be glidin' (Yeah)
I just slide in (Yeah) and then I roll out




I didn't know, I didn't know
I didn't know, I didn't know, yeah
Well, didn't know what I was missin', now I see a lil' different
I was, thinkin' too much


Got stuck in oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah
I got all the time in the world, so for now I'm just chillin'
Plus I know it's a, it's a beautiful feelin'
In oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah

Yeah
Okay, I ride around my city when I come home, yeah
The sun set quickly, then get up slow, yeah
I just connect and upload
Watch it spin around, we just spinnin' round, yeah
Let's go and travel through the unknown, yeah
We play it cool, we know we fucked though, yeah
You keep on sayin' you in love, so
Tell me, are you really down? Are you really down? Yeah
Let's go back to my crib and play some 45's
It's safe in there, I know there's still a war outside
We spend our nights all liquored up, our mornings high
Can you feel it now?


Oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah
Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
I got all the time in the world, so for now I'm just chillin'
Plus, I know it's a, it's a beautiful feelin'
In oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah
Oblivion, yeah, yeah",3835137
130174,2701366,Smile,rap,Juice WRLD & The Weeknd,2020,1013542,{},"
I'd do anything in my power to see you just smile
I want you to prosper and come proper
Even if that means I ain't by your side
I'd do anything in my power to see you just smile
I want you to prosper and come proper
Even if that means I ain't by your side


Devil on my shoulder tellin' me I'll die soon
I don't really want that to impact you
But I don't know, maybe I'm just paranoid
I just want the best for you, I just want what's left of you
Oh, you tell me that you're sad inside
I'm sad that I can't satisfy
Yeah, I pray that I get it right this time
Maybe we'll be alright
Oh, you tell me that you're sad inside
I'm sad that I can't satisfy
Yeah, I pray that I get it right this time
Maybe we'll be alright

I'd do anything in my power to see you just smile
I want you to prosper and come proper
Even if that means I ain't by your side
I'd do anything in my power to see you just smile
I want you to prosper and come proper
Even if that means I ain't by your side


Oh yeah
I just wanna see you smile (You smile)
Don't cry (Don't cry, yeah)
Even though it means I gotta let you go (Yeah)
Dependent on ya, gotta learn to be alone ('Lone)
'Cause I'm so desensitized
When our skin is touching (Yeah), I need drugs to love you (Yeah)
You want so much more from me, but I can only fuck you (You)
I spent every day right beside you ('Side you), 'side you ('Side you)
A hundred pics of me on your phone
Now you're someone that I used to know
At this point, we playin' with fire (Fire), fire (Fire)
You don't wanna see what's in my phone
It's just gonna hurt you more (More)


I'd do anything in my power to see you just smile (Oh yeah)
I want you to prosper and come proper
Even if that means I ain't by your side (Oh, oh)
I'd do anything in my power (My power) to see you just smile
I want you to prosper and come proper
Even if that means I ain't by your side",3840488
130348,2704674,​you should see me in a crown,pop,Billie Eilish,2018,1230785,{},"
Bite my tongue, bide my time
Wearing a warning sign
Wait 'til the world is mine
Visions I vandalize
Cold in my kingdom size
Fell for these ocean eyes


You should see me in a crown
I'm gonna run this nothing town
Watch me make 'em bow
One by one by one
One by one by
You should see me in a crown
Your silence is my favorite sound
Watch me make 'em bow
One by one by one
One by one by one


Count my cards, watch them fall
Blood on a marble wall
I like the way they all scream
Tell me which one is worse
Living or dying first
Sleeping inside a hearse (I don't dream)

You say, ""Come over, baby
I think you're pretty""
I'm okay, I'm not your baby
If you think I'm pretty


You should see me in a crown
I'm gonna run this nothing town
Watch me make 'em bow
One by one by one
One by one by
You should see me in a crown
Your silence is my favorite sound
Watch me make 'em bow
One by one by one
One by one by one




Crown
I'm gonna run this nothing town
Watch me make 'em bow
One by one by one
One by one by
You should see me in a crown (You should see me, see me)
Your silence is my favorite sound (You should see me, see me)
Watch me make 'em bow
One by one by one
One by one by one",3844633
130668,2711740,BTS - Epiphany English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2018,1053321,{},"
So weird, I for sure loved you so much
Adapted to you with everything, I wanted to live my life for you
But as I keep doing that I just can't bear the storm inside my heart
The real myself inside the smiling mask, I reveal it entirely


I'm the one I should love in this world
Shining me, precious soul of mine
I finally realized so I love me
Not so perfect but so beautiful
I'm the one I should love


I'm shaking and afraid but I keep going forward
I'm meeting the real you, hidden in the storm
Why did I want to hide my precious self like this?
What was I so afraid of?
Why did I hide my true self?


I'm the one I should love in this world
Shining me, precious soul of mine
I finally realized so I love me
Not so perfect but so beautiful
I'm the one I should love

I may be a bit blunt, I may lack some things
I may not have that shy glow around me
But this is me
My arms, my legs, my heart, my soul


I wanna love in this world
Shining me, precious soul of mine
I finally realized so I love me
Not so perfect but so beautiful
I'm the one I should love


I'm the one I should love
I'm the one I should love",3853770
130843,2716634,Thunderclouds,pop,LSD,2018,1072100,{},"
All I need is one
One more man is enough
Babe, you got it wrong
Please turn your fears into trust, to trust


Where did love go?
When all is said and done?
Hey now, put your hands in the air
I'ma go through your stuff
Where did love go?
Put the running into run
You're asking me to stay
But I never met a girl I could trust


You're sayin' those words like you hate me now (Wo-woah)
Our house is burning when you're raisin' hell (Wo-woah)
Here in the ashes, your soul cries out (Ah-ah-ah)
But don't be afraid of these thunderclouds

These thunderclouds, oh no
These thunderclouds, oh no, no


All I need is love (Da-dum, dum, dum)
All I need is a word (Da-dum, dum, dum)
All I need is us (Da-dum, dum, dum)
You turn nouns into verbs (Ooh, oh), to verbs (Ooh, oh)


Where did love go?
When all is said and done?
Hey now, put your hands in the air
I'ma go through your stuff
Where did love go?
You put the running into run
You're asking me to stay
But I never met a man I could trust
Hey, yeah


You're sayin' those words like you hate me now (Wo-woah)
Our house is burning when you're raisin' hell (Wo-woah)
Here in the ashes, your soul cries out (Ah-ah-ah)
But don't be afraid of these thunderclouds

These thunderclouds, oh no
These thunderclouds, oh no, no
These thunderclouds, oh no
These thunderclouds, oh no, no


These thunderclouds (Oh, whoa, oh)
These thunderclouds (Ah-ah-ah)
These thunderclouds (Oh)",3860353
131387,2730131,YOSEMITE,rap,Travis Scott,2018,1692317,"{Gunna,NAV}","
Ice on my neck, flawless baguettes
Hop off a jet, barely get rest
Cash through the month, I get a check (Check)
Yves Saint Laurent on my pants and my chest (Drip)
Chanel, her dress, clean up her mess
I eat her flesh, you know the rest
Count up a hun', cop a Rolex (Checks)
Shine like the sun, you truly blessed (Shine)
Two-tone Patek (Mmm-mmm-mmm)
In the Clearport like I Uber these jets (Jets)
VVS's on me, got my Gucci shirt wet
Put an M in my bag (Mmm), gon' get used to these racks (Used)
I went to school where they teach you finesse (Mmm)
Five hundred shoes for the drip, I invest ('Vest, mmm)
I'm the bossman, I keep cash in the desk (Mmm-mmm-mmm)
Know the coupe fast (Yeah), when it end with an ""S""


Now that I'm home, back off the road
We shut it down where it ain't so
With checks in the streets, Jay number 4's
Saint Laurent feet, put it on toes
Take it with me, double your dose
Covered with angels that's watchin' my soul
Jet got a bed, it's bigger windows
Said I'll be there in ten, but I got there in four

I feel like I'm chosen, I'm covered in gold
Mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm
Mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm
I left her wide open, no self control ('Trol, 'trol, 'trol)
Mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm
Mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm
Took nothin' but five minutes, she hopped in and drove
Mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm-hmm-mmm


Ice on my neck, flawless baguettes (Yeah)
Hop off a jet, barely get rest
Cash through the month, I get a check (Check)
Yves Saint Laurent on my pants and my chest (Drip)
Chanel, her dress, clean up her mess
I eat her flesh, you know the rest
Count up a hun', cop a Rolex (Checks)
Shine like the sun, you truly blessed (Shine, yeah)
Two-tone Pateks (Mmm-mmm-mmm)
In the Clearport like I Uber the jets (Jets)
VVS's on me, got my Louis shirt wet
It's an M in my bag (Mmm), gon' get used to these racks (Used)
I went to school where they teach you finesse (Mmm)
Five hundred shoes for the drip, I invest ('Vest, mmm)
I'm the bossman, I keep cash in the desk (Mmm-mmm-mmm)
Know the coupe fast (Yeah), when it end with an ""S""

La Flame on an island, me and Cash, Gunna hopped on a Learjet
Got Pradas every color and I got CC's you ain't seen yet
Said I'd kick the cup and now I'm askin', ""Where the codeine at?""
Thirty pointers and up, Eliantte, drippin', my whole team wet",3876940
131391,2730160,STOP TRYING TO BE GOD,rap,Travis Scott,2018,1308207,"{""Kid Cudi"",""Stevie Wonder"",""Philip Bailey"",""James Blake""}","
This is the real action: the pot party, the trippers, the grasshoppers, the hip ones
All gathered in secrecy and flying high as a kite


Hmm-hmm
Just know what this about
Hmm-hmm-hmm, hmm-hmm
Palm trees, oceans, fresh air, that can break your heart


Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm, hmm-hm
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm (That's not who you are)
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm (That's just not your job)
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God, God)


Ride for it every night
Visions and these angles tight
Truth be told, I never try
Diamonds are the wife of life
All three Rollies look alike
After two you get a hook-up price
Stripper never worked a nine-to-five
Delta and I ship it overnight
Stop tryna be God Almighty
Fuck the money, never leave your people behind, yeah
It's never love, no matter what you try
Still can see it comin' down your eyes
'Cause they did not create commandments (Ooh-ooh)
When you hustle, always make it fancy (Ooh-ooh)
The signal's far from what you can be (Ooh-ooh)
'Cause air traffic controls the landing, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah

Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm, hmm-hm
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm (That's not who you are)
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm (That's just not your job)
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God, God)


Stop tryna play God Almighty
Always keep your circle tight
I been wantin' shit my whole life
I'm warning you, best not try to play God tonight
If I love her, I'ma pass on her
First rule of war, you find an act on her
You can't win a trophy or a plaque off her
But never turn your back on her
'Cause they did not create commandments
When you hustle, always make it fancy
The signal's far from what you can be
'Cause air traffic controls the landing, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
You won't succeed tryna learn me
Stick to the roads in my journey
Stay out of court when you got the attorney
She say she love but want to really burn me

Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm, hmm-hm
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm (That's not who you are)
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God)
Hmm-hmm (That's just not your job)
Hmm-hmm (Stop tryna be God, God)


Is it the complex of the saint
That's keepin' you so, so, so still, still?
Is it a coat of old paint
That's peelin' every day against our will?
Is it too long since the last
Open conversation you had? Oh, no
And did you see the void in the past?
And can you ever see it comin' back?
Well, can you always be a step ahead of it for me?
Well, can you always be a step ahead of it for me?


Woah-oh-oh
Woah-oh-oh
Woah-oh-oh
Woah-oh-oh
That it?",3876990
131393,2730164,SICKO MODE,rap,Travis Scott,2018,9078511,{Drake},"


Astro, yeah
Sun is down, freezin' cold
That's how we already know, winter's here
My dawg would probably do it for a Louis belt
That's just all he know, he don't know nothin' else
I tried to show 'em, yeah
I tried to show 'em, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Goin' on you with the pick and roll
Young La Flame, he in sicko mode




(Woo) Made this here with all the ice on in the booth
At the gate outside, when they pull up, they get me loose
Yeah, Jump Out boys, that's Nike boys, hoppin' out coupes
This shit way too big, when we pull up, give me the loot (Gimme the loot!)
Was off the Remy, had a Papoose
Had to hit my old town to duck the news
Two-four hour lockdown, we made no moves
Now it's 4 AM and I'm back up poppin' with the crew
I just landed in, Chase B mixes pop like Jamba Juice
Different colored chains, think my jeweler really sellin' fruits
And they chokin', man, know the crackers wish it was a noose

Some-Some-Some-Someone said
To win the retreat, we all in too deep
Play-Play-Playin' for keeps, don't play us for weak (Someone said)
To win the retreat, we all in too deep
Play-Play-Playin' for keeps, don't play us for weak


Yeah, this shit way too formal, y'all know I don't follow suit
Stacey Dash, most of these girls ain't got a clue
All of these hoes I made off records I produced
I might take all my exes and put 'em all in a group
Hit my eses, I need the bootch
'Bout to turn this function to Bonnaroo
Told her, ""Hop in, you comin' too""
In the 305, bitches treat me like I'm Uncle Luke
(Don't stop, pop that pussy!)
Had to slop the top off, it's just a roof, uh
She said, ""Where we goin'?"" I said, ""The moon""
We ain't even make it to the room
She thought it was the ocean, it's just the pool
Now I got her open, it's just the Goose
Who put this shit together? I'm the glue


Someone said
Shorty FaceTimed me out the blue
Someone said
Play-Playin' for keeps
Someone said, mother****, someone said
Don't play us for weak



Yeah!
Astro, yeah, yeah
(Tay Keith, fuck these niggas up!)
Ayy, ayy


She's in love with who I am
Back in high school, I used to bus it to the dance (Yeah)
Now I hit the FBO with duffels in my hands
I did half a Xan, thirteen hours 'til I land
Had me out like a light, ayy, yeah
Like a light, ayy, yeah


Like a light, ayy, slept through the flight, ayy
Knocked for the night, ayy
767, man, this shit got double bedroom, man
I still got scores to settle, man
I crept down the block (Down the block)
Made a right (Yeah, right)
Cut the lights (Yeah, what?), paid the price (Yeah)
Niggas think it's sweet (Nah, never), it's on sight (Yeah, what?)
Nothin' nice (Yeah), baguettes in my ice (Aw, man)
Jesus Christ (Yeah), checks over stripes (Yeah)
That's what I like (Yeah), that's what we like (Yeah)
Lost my respect, you not a threat
When I shoot my shot, that shit wetty like I'm Sheck (Bitch)
See the shots that I took (Ayy), wet like I'm Book (Ayy)
Wet like I'm Lizzie
I be spinnin' Valley, circle blocks 'til I'm dizzy (Yeah, what?)
Like where is he? (Yeah, what?)
No one seen him (Yeah, yeah)
I'm tryna clean 'em (Yeah)

She's in love with who I am
Back in high school, I used to bus it to the dance
Now I hit the FBO with duffels in my hands (Woo)
I did half a Xan, thirteen hours 'til I land
Had me out like a light (Like a light)
Like a light (Like a light)
Like a light (Like a light)
Like a light


Yeah, passed the dawgs a celly
Sendin' texts, ain't sendin' kites, yeah
He said, ""Keep that on lock""
I say, ""You know this shit, it's stife,"" yeah
It's absolute, yeah (Yeah), I'm back, reboot (It's lit)
LaFerrari to Jamba Juice, yeah (Skrrt, skrrt)
We back on the road, they jumpin' off, no parachute, yeah
Shorty in the back
She said she workin' on her glutes, yeah (Oh my God)
Ain't by the book, yeah, this how it look, yeah
'Bout a check, yeah (Check), just check the foots, yeah
Pass this to my daughter, I'ma show her what it took (Yeah)
Baby mama cover Forbes, got these other bitches shook
Yeah",3876994
131395,2730166,NO BYSTANDERS,rap,Travis Scott,2018,1258080,"{""Sheck Wes"",""Juice WRLD""}","
The party never ends
In a motel layin' with my sins, yeah
I'm tryna get revenge
You'll be all out of love in the end


Spent ten hours on this flight, man
Told the pilot ain't no flight plans
Can't believe whatever I'm seein'
And they know whenever I land
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Yeah)


The party never ends
In a motel layin' with my sins, yeah
I'm tryna get revenge
You'll be all out of love in the end

Bicentennial man, put the city on slam
She get trippy off Xans, lost twenty-one grams
And she did it on cam, wasn't no video dance
Make my own rules, I really don't pick, I just choose
I don't set picks, I just shoot
Chopped and get screwed
I told her it's B.Y.O.B., that mean buy your own boobs
Put it on God, He the one that put me on top
Can't be put in a box, gotta move on the opps
Devil got the move on the drop
Niggas tryna move on the Scott
Can't move that deep, tryna run down, shit's steep
Gotta act a fool with the squad
Next city, no sleep, back to the 713


Spent ten hours on this flight, man (Flight, man)
Told the pilot ain't no flight plans (Flight plans)
(Oh, oh, oh, oh-oh-oh)
Can't believe whatever I'm seein' (I'm seein')
And they know whenever I land (I land)
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
(Oh, oh, oh, oh-oh-oh)


Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Yeah)

Heartbreak hotel
Bet you can't take no L's
Plug like AOL
Who say that I ain't gon' sell?
Hand me the H, I'll sell
She said, ""I got a nigga""
I said, ""I ain't gon' tell""
Buy it by the pound so it ain't no scale
I'm sick of the drink (The drink, yeah)
The flippin' of paint (The paint, yeah)
Grippin' the grain (Wood grain, yeah)
Whippin' the tank (The tank, yeah)
My niggas gon' flame (Bang, yeah)
Bitch, I'm with gang (Gang, yeah)
Got your bitch on a plane


Spent ten hours on this flight, man (Flight, man)
Told the pilot ain't no flight plans (Flight plans)
(Oh, oh, oh, oh-oh-oh)
Can't believe whatever I'm seein' (I'm seein')
And they know whenever I land (I land)
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
(Oh, oh, oh, oh-oh-oh)

Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Yeah)


The party never ends


Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Yeah)
The party never ends


Family function, ain't no friends, had a line around my ends
Turned 'em into M's, why you tryna make amends?
What's that smell? It's heaven's scent
And, like I jump straight out the wind
Dodgin' hell and sins, I can't go back there again
Nah, the dawgs ain't civilized, take the one, feel vilified
You can't see my sons, like the light don't hit they side
In the function, and I'm fried, it's a strive, it's not a drive
When they open wide, it's a riot, riot


Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Nah, nigga, nah, nigga, for real, we walkin' in this bitch heavy
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Bitch!)
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up
They know me when they see me, nigga, ahhh!
Fuck the club up, fuck the club up (Yeah)
Uh",3876996
131398,2730171,CANT SAY,rap,Travis Scott,2018,1672221,"{""Don Toliver""}","
No, you can't say if I'm mad or not
Smokin' hella weed, I'm on that alcohol
Shawty lick me clean the way she suck me off
I keep two hoes in my bed, I got 'em turnin' out
What would you do if you heard I got it goin' on?
I had to burn, I left ""skrrt"" marks, I had to dip (I had to)
Betta watch for 12 'round my town, you might get killed (Better watch for 12)
I'm out my mind, yeah, I'm high above the rim (I'm out my mind)
You cop it live, boy, I got it all on film


You gotta watch out where you rock 'cause shit get real
Drink too real, I can't be fake, don't know the feel
Gotta take a long drive up the hill
Gang too wavy, move like Navy Seals
I'm too wavy, think I need a Lyft
Chicago baby, she just wanna drill
The vibe's too wavy, it's too hard to kill
Gotta watch out where you go 'cause shit get real

Uh-huh, yeah
Swang, when I swang, when I swang to the left
Oh, yeah
Po-pop my trunk, dip-dip-dip-dip
Oh my


You can't say if I'm mad or nah (Mad or nah)
Smokin' hella weed, I'm on that alcohol (Alcohol)
And shawty lick me clean the way she suck me off (Suck me off)
I keep two hoes in my bed, I got 'em turnin' out (Turnin' out)
What would you do if you heard I got it burnin' out?
I let it burn, ""skrrt"" that mark, I had to dip (I had to)
Gotta watch for 12 'round my town, you might get killed (Gotta watch for 12)
I'm out my mind, yeah, I'm high above the rim (I'm out my mind)
You cop it live, boy, I got it all on film


You must be cautious, told the lil' hoes I'm all in
Play this ballers offense, I left ol' girl, she callin'
You know I hit in the mornin', oh, yeah, she yawnin'
I met you in the club, bitch, you know this shit mean nothin'
Oh, didn't I hit your cousin? Mmm, no, no discussion
Sippin' on lean, no Robitussin, oh, yeah, I know you love me
I beat it, ain't no cuddlin', you down bad, you sufferin'
I don't give a fuck how hard it get, that lil' bitch know I started this
Uh-huh, oh, yeah, get to the cash, no layup
Spend a big bag, Rodeo, some may ride for the fresh cut
Hoes come through just to touch us, I'ma tell the truth like Usher
You already know how I bust her, slang my chop from Russia

Swang, when I swang, when I swang to the left
Pop, pop my trunk, dip, dip, dip, dip
Swang-swang, when I swang, when I swang to the left
Pop, pop my trunk, dip


No, you can't say if I'm mad or not
Smokin' hella weed, I'm on that alcohol
Shawty lick me clean the way she suck me off
I keep two hoes in my bed, I got 'em turnin' out
What would you do if you heard I got it goin' on?
I had to burn, I left ""skrrt"" marks, I had to dip
Gotta watch for 12 'round my town, you might get killed
I'm out my mind, yeah, I'm high above the rim
You cop it live, boy, I got it all on film",3876999
131636,2737772,Chlorine,pop,twenty one pilots,2018,1292683,"{""​twenty one pilots""}","
So, where are ya? It's been a little while


Sippin' on straight chlorine
Let the vibe slide over me
This beat is a chemical, beat is a chemical
When I leave, don't save my seat
I'll be back when it's all complete
The moment is medical, moment is medical
Sippin' on straight chlorine


Lovin' what I'm tastin', woah
Venom on my tongue, dependent at times
Poisonous vibrations, woah
Help my body run


I'm runnin' for my life
Runnin' for my life

Sippin' on straight chlorine
Let the vibe slide over me
This beat is a chemical, beat is a chemical
When I leave, don't save my seat
I'll be back when it's all complete
The moment is medical, moment is medical
Sippin' on straight chlorine


Fall out of formation, woah
I plan my escape from walls they confined
Rebel red carnation, woa-a-oh
Grows while I decay


I'm runnin' for my life
Runnin' for my life
Yeah, I'm runnin' for my life
Runnin' for my life


Hide you in my coat pocket, where I kept my rebel red
I felt I was invincible, you wrapped around my head
Now different lives I lead, my body lives on lead
The last two lines may read incorrect until said
The lead is terrible in flavor
But now you double as a paper maker
I despise you sometimes, I love to hate the fight
And you in my life is like

Sippin' on straight chlorine
Let the vibe slide over me
This beat is a chemical, beat is a chemical
When I leave, don't save my seat
I'll be back when it's all complete
The moment is medical, moment is medical
Sippin' on straight chlorine


Let the vibe, let the vibe
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Beat is a chemical, yeah
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Moment is medical, yeah
Sippin' on straight chlorine
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Beat is a chemical, yeah
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Let the vibe, let the vibe
Moment is medical, yeah


I'm so sorry I forgot you
Let me catch you up to speed
I've been tested like the ends of
A weathered flag that's by the sea
Can you build my house with pieces?
I'm just a chemical
Can you build my house with pieces?
I'm just a chemical
Can you build my house with pieces?
I'm just a chemical
Can you build my house with pieces?
I'm just a chemical",3886313
131734,2740834,KONSTRUKT,rap,Booking Machine,2018,1213029,"{Oxxxymiron,Porchy,JEEMBO,""Thomas Mraz"",TVETH,Markul,Loqiemean,""May Wave\\$"",Souloud}","[Тeкст пeсни «KONSTRUKT» ft. Porchy, May Wave$, Jeembo, Loqiemean, Thomas Mraz, Tveth, Souloud, Markul & Oxxxymiron]


(Claude Money)
(Viramaina)


Motherfuckers never thought I was the one to wait on (Yea)
Why do you think I never stay calm?
I bet you didn't think I'd make bombs (Ra-ca-ca)
But every track I drop - napalm strike
Adaptation - I'm the proof (Ye-yea)
I'm the only foreign in the crew (Ye-yea)
I was there when there was just a few (Ye-yea)
Why do you think there is English in this tune?
Oh-oh
Principles I got a ton, always had them since I was young
I was in it when it began, will be with it until it's done
And that's never ""forever immortalized""
Oh-oh
I went from city to city, I left my country
Yeah, they say I turned my back on it and never took a crack at it
I never turned my back on it, but I diversified, bitch

Нe довeряю никому кромe своeй команды (Бр-ря)
Молоко, welcome (Стрит)
В пeрeулкe гирлянды мигалок
Дeли банк или иди на банку
Лодка стафа в пачкe малабара (Виу-у-у)
Её цацки стрeляют как маузeр (Дзяу-у-у)
Дeтку крeпят вмeстe с опиатом -
Это крайняя дорога в ад (Ай-й-й-й-й)
Связи слишком сложно выбирать
Вeдь тут нe прeдложeн опeратор
Хватит звонить
Я нe буду смотрeть eй в глаза
В них так узко - это China Town
Роза рубцом в район живота (Ай-й-й-й-й)
Раздаётся, как колода карт -
Таро! Мами!
Много лучших - но они пиздят -
Разговора большe, чeм товара


Мои куплeты, как вороны (Hu)
Они лeтят во всe стороны (Phew-phew)
Сорванный банк дeлим поровну (Поровну)
Скурили лям и нам всё равно (Всё равно; всё равно)
Открываю двeри храма всeм
От Адама до Саддама (Hu)
Корeш, я имeю шрамы
Нe зализываeм раны (Нeт, нeт)
Нe зови мeня блок бой, рок-н-ролл я будто Pink Floyd (Йe-йeа)
Стая рядом, слышишь их вой?
Я даю им мяса с лихвой
Они зовут мeня Джимбо
Выходeц лимба
Поднятый на руки или одeтый на вилы
Сам сeбe выбeру имя (Выбeру имя, выбeру имя)
Пал с нeба тeпeрь вмят в зeмлю (В зeмлю)
Тeни шeпчут, но я нe внeмлю (Но я нe внeмлю)
Это долгий путь навeрх
Словно пeрвородный грeх
Тeпeрь поимeй их всeх

(Ok, Loqi)
У, этот город нe мой, но он дал мнe голос (Йe)
Этот город нeмой - он отдал мнe голос (Йe)
Он смeётся бeззвучно мeжду полос (Ха-ха-ха-ха)
Посмотри: он онeмeлый - я рeанимирую урбан на скорость
Ну как?
Самый новый, да бeстактный (У)
Вижу в мусорах Гeстапо (Йe)
Видимо, хватило знаков (Йe)
На Сахарова всeм нe сладко (У)
Я душу сeбя пакeтом (Хы, ха)
Вeришь или нeт, блять?
Я нe могу трeзво смотрeть
Как смыть мнe с глаз, блять, кeмeровский пeпeл?
Давай, блять!
Каждый новый дeнь стрeмится отнять
Я проживаю дeнь, как будто два дня
Я нe знаю, что мeня ждёт завтра
Слeпой иду на запах
Этот город нe мой, но он дал мнe голос (Йe)
Этот город нeмой - он отдал мнe голос
(Дажe большe, чeм хотeл бы)
Моё сeрдцe внутри так полно борозд
(Я тут дольшe, чeм хотeл быть)
И лёг на костёр - нeси мнe хворост

Мы пожиратeли смeрти
Суки сами лeзут нам в сeти
Вот вам наши чёрныe мeтки
Мы просочились сквозь клeтки
Здeсь у каждого свой интeрeс (Е)
Я снимаю кэш, она снимаeт мой стрeсс
Поднимаю бабки - вырастаeт прeсс
На моём счeту зарплата шeсть нулeй
Моя команда - Акацки
Мы пилим долю по-братски
Большиe залы, овации
Я заказал лёд по рации (Е)
Мы в дорогe под айоваской
Турим большe, чeм Бонифаций
Мой бак потeк, я наклeю пластырь
Сeки сюда, это BM паства (Сука)
Это Томми Паста
(Томми Паста)


Еду чeрeз город на дeло, а
В головe triple six дeвять
Заливаю бак на останки своих дeнeг
Потом к моeй бу, она показываeт, что умeeт
Хeй, нeт-нeт
Я брожу за зeркалами
И сзади стоят тeни, но что жe с ними стало?
И всe мои враги вдруг оказались истуканами
Час назад он был живой, тeпeрь как будто камeнный
Эй, Твeт? Как можно жить с таким названиeм
Когда eго каждый второй нe выговариваeт?
Нeт-нeт, я буду дeлать, чтобы знали
Ты помни моe имя и пиши eго заглавными
Я хочу, чтоб на моeй сeмьe сияли камни (Йe; йe)
Чтобы близкиe нe нуждались
И сохранять суть, но оттачивая стамину
Доставать АК из багажника Гeлeндвагeна
Нeт-нeт, вы мeня поняли нeправильно
Это тe проблeмы, от которых голова болит
Просто-напросто я нe хочу быть тут завалeнным
Из горячих точeк стволом, можeт дажe табeльным
Нeт-нeт, вы мeня поняли нeправильно
Это тe вопросы, от которых вся душа болит
Просто-напросто нe хотeл бы быть отравлeнным
Вашими словами или жe другими ядами, йe


Съeм слиток золота, слиток золота
Посолю, попeрчу, абсолютно бeз чувств
Съeм слиток золота, слиток золота
Посолю, попeрчу, абсолютно бeз чувств
Я хожу в одном и том жe каждый дeнь
Ну, давай, найди кого-нибудь свeжeй
Да мнe похуй: охладить или поджeчь
Да, я eм твою мeчту на обeд
Только по рeцeпту, дом - одноврeмeнно кухня и аптeка
Я богачe всeх, пока за мной ни цeнта
Пока бьётся сeрдцe, буду просто дeлать, и дeлать, и дeлать (То, что я умeю)
Я готовлю трeки каждый новый, сука, вeчeр
Да, я Аватар - огонь, вода, зeмля и вeра
Я тот самый тип, что смeётся послeдним


Гдe-то говорили, что я сдeлал прощe тон:
«Его трeки для ротаций, eго тeксты ни о чём»
«К нeму просто доeбаться, сразу видно, что мажор»
«Бeз чужих рeкомeндаций он сюда бы нe прошёл»
«И нам похуй на таких, как этот
За ним большиe дяди и вагон запрeтов
Это проeкт, который прогорит за лeто
Я на eго концeрт нe подойду на мeтр»
Имeнно поэтому мнe прeдлагали три контракта
Но я выкинул их всe, вeдь так нужна команда
Это всe происходило за полгода до BM
И я с ними, потому что нe хотeл двигать ни с кeм
(Чё ты знаeшь?)
Захочу, я буду пeть фальцeтом
Суки, трeк за трeком, вeсь тeкст об этом
Дажe при таких во мнe большe рэпа
Только вспомни, гдe я был eщё прошлым лeтом
(Марк)


Пeрeбив охрану
Влeзть на тeрриторию Богeмской рощи
Или увидeть цeрeмонию иллюминатов
Приоткрыв Букингeмский дворeц наощупь (Эй-эй)
Или, купив гранату, с нeй в клуб завалиться
Бильдeрбeргский ночью, поeбать:
Всё это завeдомо прощe, чeм
Вашим попасть на BM сыночкам
Вeдь мы закрытый круг, как Римский клуб и Ситигруп
Соситe хуй
Я был в GQ, когда Soul и May ходили на труд
Дни бeгут, нынчe их лица в crew:
(Тут) Столица, юг
Санкт-Пeтeрбург плюс уфимский грув из глубин сибирских руд
Самый странный рэп-игрок, вeдь (А)
Были популярны KRec и ГРОТ, но (Оу)
Вылeз аутсайдeр, чeрвь, микроб
Интeрнeт-гeрой, гид сeкрeтных троп
Я вeтeран, а ты - вор
Ты купил сeбe мeдали, но попса - нe хип-хоп
Сeгодня каждый дохуя гомофоб
Но олдфаги знают, кто кому клал ягоды в рот
Слышь
Эмигрант, как Бeллик (Оу)
На столe - «Государь» Макиавeлли
У нас разныe цeли:
Твой рэп - это рамс на фeнe, максимум дeкаданс - R. Kelly
Я - в Марракeшe в поисках откровeний
Booking, как отeлeй; Machine, как Gun Kelly
Вдохновeниe в psychodelic'e
Мы примeр прeeмствeнности поколeний


Внизу будь начeку, навeрху смотри в оба
Протянeшь сукам руку - откусят по локоть
И, чтоб нe быть закуской, как льву антилопа
Найди вeрную crew - навeрху одиноко
Внизу будь начeку, навeрху смотри в оба
Протянeшь сукам руку - откусят по локоть
И, чтоб нe быть закуской, как льву антилопа
Найди вeрную crew - навeрху одиноко",3889950
131759,2741441,Barbie Dreams,rap,Nicki Minaj,2018,2656989,{},"
Uh, mmm, kyuh
R.I.P. to B.I.G. 
Classic shit


I'm lookin' for a nigga to give some babies
A handful of Weezy, sprinkle of Dave East
Man, I ain't got no type like Jxmmi and Swae Lees
But if he can't fuck three times a night, peace!
I tried to fuck 50 for a powerful hour
But all that nigga wanna do is talk Power for hours
B-beat the pussy up, make sure it's a K-O
Step your banks up like you're movin' that yayo
Somebody go and make sure Karrueche okay, though
I heard she think I'm tryna give the coochie to Quavo
They always wanna beat it up, goon up the pussy
Man, maybe I should let him autotune up the pussy
All these Bow Wow Challenge niggas lyin' and shit
Man, these Fetty Wap niggas stay eyein' my shit
Drake worth a hundred mill, he always buyin' me shit
But I don't know if the pussy wet or if he cryin' and shit
Meek still be in my DMs, I be havin' to duck him
""I used to pray for times like this"" face-ass when I fuck him
Man, Uzi is my baby, he ain't takin' a L
But he took it literally when I said ""Go to hell""
Used to fuck with Young Thug, I ain't addressin' this shit
C-caught him in my dressing room, stealin' dresses and shit
I used to give this nigga with a lisp tests and shit
How you want the pu-thy? Can't say your S's and shit, uh

Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (Barbie dreams)
Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (B-B-B-Barbie dreams)
Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (B-B-B-Barbie, B-B-B-Barbie dreams)
Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers (Barbie dreams)
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin'


I remember when I used to have a crush on Special Ed
Shoutout Desiigner 'cause he made it out of special ed
You wanna fuck me, you gotta give some special head
'Cause this pussy have these niggas on some special meds
Like Mike Tyson, he was bitin' my shit
Talkin' 'bout, ""Yo, why you got these niggas fightin' and shit?""
On the, on the real, I should make these niggas scrap for the pussy
Young M.A and Lady Luck, get the strap for this pussy, uh
And I woulda had Odell Beckham bangin' the cake
'Til I saw him hoppin' out of cars dancin' to Drake
I been a five-star bitch, man, word to Gotti
I'ma do that nigga Future dirty, word to Scottie
Had to cancel DJ Khaled, boy, we ain't speakin'
Ain't no fat nigga tellin' me what he ain't eatin'
YG and The Game with the hammer yellin', ""Gang! Gang!""
This ain't what I meant when I said a gang bang
Tekashi want a ménage, I said ""tre-way""
Curved him and went the Kim and Kanye way
Em, cop the Barbie Dreamhouse, then you can play the part
I-I ain't tryna bust it open in a trailer park

Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (Barbie dreams)
Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (B-B-B-Barbie dreams)
Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (B-B-B-Barbie, B-B-B-Barbie dreams)
Dreams of fuckin' one of these little rappers (Barbie dreams)
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (B-B-B-Barbie dreams)
(Barbie Dreams)
I'm just playin', but I'm sayin' (B-B-B-Barbie, B-B-B-Barbie dreams)


You know I'm all 'bout them dollars
I be supportin' them scholars
I let him give me some brain, but he wanted me to ride it
So I said, ""Fuck it, I'm in""
He wanna cut like a trim
And if he act like he know, I let him fuck it again
I got them bars, I'm indicted
I'm poppin', I'm uninvited
I said, ""Just lick on the clitoris, nigga, don't fuckin' bite it""
I ride his **** in a circle
I turn Stefan into Urkel
I go arounds and arounds and I'ma go down in slow motion
The-then I pick it up, look at it
I said, ""Daddy, come get at it,"" uh
Yellow brick road, he said that I am a wiz at it
Yeah, they want it, want it
You know I flaunt it, flaunt it
I'm a trendsetter, everything I do, they do
Yeah, I put 'em up on it, on it
¡Dimelo, papi, papi!
Yo quiero sloppy, sloppy
I'll give it to you if you beat it up like Pacqui, Pacqui
I-I-I-I'ma kill 'em with the shoe
No ceiling is in the roof
And I'm big, give me the loot
12 cylinders in the coupe
I get dome with the chrome, no tellin' when I'ma shoot
I just bang, bang, bang, real killas is in my group
Gorillas is in my unit, vacationin' where it's humid
And I shine, shine, shine, got diamonds all in my cubans
I'm in LA Times more than when niggas lootin'
And my flow spit crack, I think that nigga usin'
He done bodied everybody, in closing, these bitches losin'
Usin', usin' up, a bitch movin'
No, I ain't stuttered and no, I ain't Ruben
Damn, a bitch snoozin'
Shoutout to my Jews, l'chaim, Rick Rubin
Big fat titties, yes, they be protrudin'
I be like, fuck 'em, fuck 'em, bring the lube in
I be like, fuck 'em, fuck 'em, bring the lube in",3890626
131830,2743167,Mooo,pop,Doja Cat,2018,1017603,{},"
Moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo
Moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo
Yeah


Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
I'm not a cat, I don't say meow
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow


I go moo (I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow)
Moo (I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow)
Moo (I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow)
Moo (I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow, I'm a cow)
Yeah, I said, bitch, I'm too smooth, I'm not in the mood
Tryna make moves, tryna make moves
Bitch, I'm too smooth, I'm not in the mood
(Moo, moo, moo, moo, moo, moo moo moo)
Tryna make moves, tryna make moves

Got milk, bitch? Got beef? (Got beef?)
Got steak, ho? Got cheese? (Got it)
Grade A, ho, not lean (Not lean)
Got me A1, sauce, please
These heifers got nothin' on me
Stakes high, need a side of collard greens (Collard greens)
Cash rules everything around me (Everything around me)
Ice cream, ice cream (Ice cream)
You a calf, bitch, you my daughter (You my daughter)
I ain't bothered (I ain't bothered), get slaughtered (Get slaughtered)
Got the methane, I'm a farter (Woo)
With my farmer (Woo), MacDonald (Woo)
And he feed me real good, it's a honor (It's a honor)
Philly cheesesteak all in that order (In that order)
Chili cheese fries as a starter (As a starter)
Got the steroids keeping me stronger (Keep me strong)


Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
I'm not a cat, I don't say meow
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow


I go moo (Moo, moo, moo)
Moo (Moo, moo, moo, moo)
Moo
Moo (Yeah)
I said, bitch, I'm too smooth, I'm not in the mood
Tryna make moves, tryna make moves
Bitch, I'm too smooth, I'm not in the mood
Tryna make moves, tryna make moves

Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow (Moo, moo, moo)
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow (Moo, moo, moo, moo)
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow (Moo, moo, moo)
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow (Moo, moo, moo, moo)
Bitch, I'm a cow, bitch, I'm a cow
Bitch, I'm a cow (Yeah), bitch, I'm a cow


Old MacDonald had a farm
I give him a titty, tryna keep him calm
I'm just tryna turn up in the country
I ain't in the city 'cause they ain't got lawns
Suck a nigga dick or somethin', E-I-O
Shittin' on these bitches only thing I know
Tippin' on his dick, I see the chickens and the pigs
They wanna catch us ridin' dirty with them fiends, I know


I ain't a moose, bitch, get out my hay
Get out my hay, bitch, get out my hay
I ain't a moose, bitch, get out my hay
Get out my hay, bitch, get out my hay
I ain't a moose, bitch, get out my hay
Get out my hay, get out my hay
I ain't a moose, bitch, get out my hay
Get out my hay, bitch, get out my hay
Milkshake brings all the boys to the farm
And they're like, it's better than yours
Damn right, it's better than yours
I can treat you, but I have to charge
My milkshake brings all the boys to the farm
And they're like, it's better than yours
Damn right, it's better than yours
I can treat you, but I have to charge

It's better than yours (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
It's better than yours (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
But I have to charge (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
(Hey, hey, hey, hey, c'mon)
It's better than yours (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
It's better than yours (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
But I have to charge (Hey, hey, hey, hey)
(Hey, hey, hey, hey)
I want a cheeseburger, fucking vegans",3892702
132162,2753042,Sweet but Psycho,pop,Ava Max,2018,1663792,{},"
Oh, she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Oh, she's hot, but a psycho
So left, but she's right though
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""


She'll make you curse, but she a blessing
She'll rip your shirt within a second
You'll be coming back, back for seconds
With your plate, you just can't help it


No, no
You'll play alo-o-ong, let her lead you o-o-on
You'll be saying, ""No, no""
Then saying, ""Yes, yes, yes,"" 'cause she messin' with your head

Oh, she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Oh, she's hot, but a psycho
So left, but she's right though
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Grab-a-cop-gun kinda crazy
She's poison, but tasty
Yeah, people say, ""Run, don't walk away""
'Cause she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""


See, someone said, ""Don't drink her potions
She'll kiss your neck with no emotion
When she's mean, you know you love it
She tastes so sweet, don't sugarcoat it""


No, no
You'll play alo-o-ong, let her lead you o-o-on
You'll be saying, ""No (No, no, no), no (No)""
Then saying, ""Yes, yes, yes,"" 'cause she messin' with your head

Oh, she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Oh, she's hot, but a psycho
So left, but she's right though
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Grab-a-cop-gun kinda crazy
She's poison, but tasty
Yeah, people say, ""Run, don't walk away""
'Cause she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""


You're just like me, you're out your mind
I know it's strange, we're both the crazy kind
You're tellin' me that I'm insane
Boy, don't pretend that you don't love the pain


Oh, she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Oh, she's hot, but a psycho
So left, but she's right though
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""
Grab-a-cop-gun kinda crazy
She's poison, but tasty
Yeah, people say, ""Run, don't walk away""
'Cause she's sweet, but a psycho
A little bit psycho
At night, she's screamin'
""I'm-ma-ma-ma out my mind""",3905115
132209,2753962,Falling Down,pop,Lil Peep & XXXTENTACION,2018,1460877,{},"
Come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Now let's do that song for Peep
Sunlight on your skin when I'm not around
Shit don't feel the same when you're out of town
So come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down, yeah


Come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Sunlight on your skin when I'm not around
Shit don't feel the same when you're out of town
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
So come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh


Rain keeps falling, tears keep falling
Rain keeps falling, tears keep falling
Darlin', your love is like walking in a bed of nails
And I just can't keep on fighting

Come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
Sunlight on your skin when I'm not around, yeah
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
Shit don't feel the same when you're out of town
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
So come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh


His name will live, brother
Bro, I got-, I feel hella shitty because it's like, yo
Like, if I would have known he was so cool
And it's like, yo, if I would have watched interviews sooner
Bro, we were so alike
It's unfortunate because it's like, yo, when people die
That's when we like 'em, you know?
'Cause your remorse kinda makes you check 'em out


Darling, your love is like walking in a bed of nails
And I just can't keep on fightin'
Oh-oh-oh


Come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
Sunlight on your skin when I'm not around, yeah
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
Shit don't feel the same when you're out of town
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
So come, let's watch the rain as it's falling down
Oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh",3906162
132289,2756046,BTS - Answer: Love Myself English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2018,1090897,{},"
I'm opening my eyes in the darkness
When my heartbeat sounds unfamiliar
I'm looking at you in the mirror
The fear-ridden eyes, asking the question


(SUGA) Loving myself might be harder
Than loving someone else, let's admit it
The standards you made are more strict for yourself
The thick tree rings in your life
It's part of you, it's you
Now let's forgive ourselves
Our lives are long, trust yourself when in a maze
When winter passes, spring always comes


From the eyes of the cold night
I try to hide myself
As I keep tossing and turning, ayy

Maybe I fell in order to take the place of those countless stars
(Hey-ey-ey)
The target of thousands of bright arrows is me alone, ayy


You've shown me I have reasons
I should love myself (Oh-oh-oh)
I'll answer with my breath, my path


The me of yesterday
The me of today
The me of tomorrow
(I'm learning how to love myself)
With no exceptions, it's all me


Maybe there's no answer (Yeah, yeah)
Maybe this isn't the answer either (Alright)
It's just that loving myself
Doesn't require anyone else's permission
I'm looking for myself again
But I don't wanna die anymore
Me, who used to be sad
Me, who used to be hurt
It'll make me more beautiful
Yes, I have that beauty (Uh-huh)
Knowing that is going (Alright)
On the path to loving myself (No way)
It's what I need the most
Uh, I'm walking for myself (Ayy)
It's an action needed for me
My attitude towards myself
That's the happiness I need for me
I'll show you what I got
I'm not afraid because it's me (Love myself)

From the very beginning
To the very end
There's only one answer, ayy


Why do you keep trying to hide under your mask? (Hey-ey-ey)
Even all the scars from your mistakes make up your constellation, ayy


You've shown me I have reasons
I should love myself (Oh-oh-oh)
I'll answer with my breath, my path


Inside of me, there's still (Oh-oh)
That awkward part of me but
(Woah-oh-oh-oh)


You've shown me I have reasons
I should love myself (I'm learning how to love myself)
(Oh-oh-oh)
I'll answer with my breath, my path (Oh-woah-oh)


The me of yesterday
The me of today
The me of tomorrow (Woah)
(I'm learning how to love myself)
With no exceptions, it's all me",3908599
132704,2765753,Taki Taki,pop,DJ Snake,2018,1783909,"{""Selena Gomez"",""Cardi B"",Ozuna}","


Wo-oh, oh-oh


Báilame como si fuera la última vez (Oh)
Y enséñame ese pasito que no sé (Yeah-yeah)
Un besito bien suavecito, bebé
Taki taki, taki taki, ¡rumba!
Wo-oh, oh-oh
Hi Music Hi Flow (Snake; jaja)
Báilame como si fuera la última vez (Oh-oh)
Y enséñame ese pasito que no sé (Oh-oh)
Un besito bien suavecito, bebé
Taki taki (Oh-oh)
Taki taki (Yeah-yeah)


Taki taki, quiere un besito o un ñaqui
Booty explota como Nagasaki (-aki)
Prende los motores Kawasaki (Kawasaki)
Que la disco está llena y llegaron los Anunnakis (Eh-eh)
No le bajes

El booty sobresale de tu traje
No trajo pantisito pa' que el nene no trabaje
Es que yo me sé lo que ella cree que ella se sabe
Cuenta que no quiere pero me tiene espionaje, eh-eh
El booty sobresale de tu traje
No trajo pantisito pa' que el nene no trabaje
Es que yo me sé lo que ella cree que ella se sabe
Cuenta que no quiere pero me tiene espionaje, eh-eh


Báilame como si fuera la última vez
Y enséñame ese pasito que no sé
Un besito bien suavecito, bebé
(1j5462791)
Wo-oh, oh-oh
Hi Music Hi Flow


Bardi (Cardi)
He said he wanna touch it, and tease it, and squeeze it
Well, my piggy bank is hungry, my nigga, you need to feed it
If the text ain't freaky, I don't wanna read it
And just to let you know, this punani is undefeated, ayy
He said he really wanna see me more
I said, ""We should have a date-where? At the Lamborghini store""
I'm kinda scary, hard to read, I'm like a Ouija board
But I'm a boss bitch, who you gonna leave me for?
You hoes got no class, you bitches is broke still
I be talking cash, shit, while I'm popping my gold grill
I'm a whole rich bitch, and I work like I'm broke still
But the love be so fake, but the hate be so real, uh

El booty sobresale de mi traje
No traje pantisito pa' que el nene no trabaje
E' que yo me sé lo que tú cree' que tú no sabe'
Dice que no quiere, pero se quiere comer el equipaje


Báilame como si fuera la última vez
Y enséñame ese pasito que no sé
Un besito bien suavecito, bebé
Taki taki, taki taki, ¡rumba!
Wo-oh, oh-oh (DJ Snake)


Careful when you come through my way
My body already know how to play
Work it, keep it tight everyday
And I, I, I know you need a taste
When I ooh, you're fallin' in love
Give a little ooh-ooh, get it well done
Dancing on my ooh, make your girl wanna run
We keep moving 'til the sun come up
Porque I am the party, yo soy fiesta
Blow out your candles, have a siesta
They can try, pero no one can stop me
What my taki taki wants, yeah, my taki taki gets, uh

Báilame como si fuera la última vez
Y enséñame ese pasito que no sé
Un besito bien suavecito, bebé
Taki taki, taki taki, ¡rumba!
Wo-oh, oh-oh
Hi Music Hi Flow
Taki taki
Taki taki",3920132
132990,2774129,The Ringer,rap,Eminem,2018,4115434,{},"
*Plane crash*
Yeah (Illa, Illa, Illa)
Yo, I'm just gonna write down my first thoughts, and see where this takes me, 'cause I feel like I wanna punch the world in the fuckin' face right now
Yeah


Let me explain just how to make greatness
Straight out the gate, I'm 'bout to break it down
Ain't no mistakes allowed, but make no mistake, I'm 'bout
To rape the alphabet, I may raise some brows
If I press the issue just to get the anger out (Brrr!)
Full magazine could take Staples out
Savage but ain't thinkin' 'bout no bank account
But bitch, I'm off the chain like Kala Brown
Motherfucker, shut the fuck up when I'm talkin', lil' bitch
I'm sorry, wait, what's your talent? Oh, critiquin'
My talent? Oh, bitch, I don't know who the fuck y'all are
To give a sub-par bar or even have an opinion of you
You mention me, millions of views, attention in news
I mention you, lose-lose for me, win-win for you
Billions of views, your ten cents are two
Skim through the music to give shit reviews
To get clicks, but bitch, you just lit the fuse
Don't get misconstrued, business as us'
Shit-list renewed, so get shit to do
Or get dissed 'cause I just don't get
What the fuck half the shit is that you're listenin' to
Do you have any idea how much I hate this choppy flow
Everyone copies though? Prob'ly no
Get this fuckin' audio out my Audi, yo, adiós
I can see why people like Lil Yachty, but not me though
Not even dissin', it just ain't for me
All I am simply is just an emcee
Maybe ""Stan"" just isn't your cup of tea (Get it?)
Maybe your cup's full of syrup and lean
Maybe I need to stir up shit, preferably
Shake the world up if it were up to me
Paul wants me to chill, y'all want me to ill
I should eat a pill, probably I will
Old me killed the new me, watch him bleed to death
I breathe on the mirror, I don't see my breath
Possibly I'm dead, I must be possessed
Like an evil spell, I'm E-V-I-L (""Evil"" spelled)
Jam a Crest Whitestrip in the tip of my dick
With an ice pick, stick it in a vise grip
Hang it on a spike fence, bang it with a pipe wrench
While I take my ball sack and flick it like a light switch
Like Vice President Mike Pence
Back up on my shit in a sidekick as I lay it on a spike strip
These are things that I'd rather do than hear you on a mic
Since nine tenths of your rhyme is about ice and
Jesus Christ, man, how many times is
Someone gonna fuck on my bitch? (Fuck my side chick!)
You won't ever see Em icy
But as cold as I get on the M-I-C
I polarize shit, so the Thames might freeze
And your skull might split like I bashed you upside it
Bitch, I got the club on smash like a nightstick (Yeah)
Turn down for what?
I ain't loud enough, nah, turn the Valium up (Illa, Illa, Illa)
'Cause I don't know how I'm gonna get your mouths to shut
Now when it doesn't matter what caliber
I spit at, I'll bet a hundred thousand bucks
You'll turn around and just be like, ""Man, how the fuck
Sourpuss gonna get mad just 'cause his album sucks?
And now he wants to take it out on us"" (Ooouuu)
But last week, an ex-fan mailed me a copy
Of The Mathers LP to tell me to study
It'll help me get back to myself and she'll love me (Ooouuu)
I mailed the bitch back and said if I did that
I'd just be like everyone else in the fucking industry
Especially an effing Recovery clone of me (NFing)
So finger-bang, chicken wang, MGK, Igg' Azae'
Lil Pump, Lil Xan imitate Lil Wayne
I should aim at everybody in the game, pick a name
I'm fed up with bein' humble
And rumor is I'm hungry, I'm sure you heard rumblings
I heard you wanna rumble like an empty stomach
I heard your mumblin' but it's jumbled in mumbo-jumbo
The era that I'm from will pummel you, that's what it's comin' to
What the fuck you're gonna do when you run into it?
I'm gonna crumble you and I'll take a number two
And dump on you, if you ain't Joyner
If you ain't Kendrick or Cole or Sean, then you're a goner
I'm 'bout to bring it to anyone in this bitch who want it
I guess when you walk into BK you expect a Whopper
You can order a Quarter Pounder when you go to McDonald's
But if you're lookin' to get a porterhouse you better go get Revival
But y'all are actin' like I tried to serve you up a slider
Maybe the vocals shoulda been auto-tuned
And you woulda bought it
But sayin' I no longer got it
'Cause you missed a line and never caught it
'Cause it went over your head, because you're too stupid to get it
'Cause you're mentally retarded, but pretend to be the smartest
With your expertise and knowledge, but you'll never be an artist
And I'm harder on myself than you could ever be regardless
What I'll never be is flawless, all I'll ever be is honest (Illa, Illa, Illa)
Even when I'm gone they're gonna say I brought it
Even when I hit my forties like a fuckin' alcoholic
With a bottle full of malt liquor
But I couldn't bottle this shit any longer
The fact that I know that I'ma hit my bottom
If I don't pull myself from the jaws of defeat and rise to my feet
I don't see why y'all even started with me
I get in beefs, my enemies die
I don't cease fire 'til at least all are deceased
I'm east side, never be caught slippin'
Now you see why I don't sleep, not even a wink, I don't blink
I don't doze off, I don't even nod to the beats
I don't even close my fuckin' eyes when I sneeze
""Aw, man! That BET cypher was weak, it was garbage
The Thing ain't even orange-oh my God, that's a reach!""
Shout to all my colorblind people
Each and everyone of y'all, if you call a fire engine green
Aquamarine, or you think water is pink
""Dawg, that's a date"" - ""Looks like an olive to me""
""Look, there's an apple!"" - ""No, it's not, it's a peach!""
So finger-bang, Pootie Tang
Burger King, Gucci Gang, dookie, dang
Charlamagne gonna hate anyway, doesn't matter what I say
Give me Donkey of the Day
What a way for 2018 to get underway
But I'm gonna say everything that I wanna say
Welcome to the slaughterhouse, bitch! (Yeah)
Invite 'em in like a One A Day
I'm not done (Preach!)

'Cause I feel like the beast of burden
That line in the sand, was it even worth it?
'Cause the way I see people turning's
Makin' it seem worthless, it's startin' to defeat the purpose
I'm watchin' my fan base shrink to thirds
And I was just tryin' to do the right thing, but word
Has the court of public opinion reached a verdict
Or still yet to be determined?
'Cause I'm determined to be me, critiqued or worshipped
But if I could go back, I'd at least reword it
And say I empathize with the people this evil serpent
Sold the dream to that he's deserted
But I think it's workin'
These verses are makin' him a wee bit nervous
And he's too scurred to answer me with words
'Cause he knows that he will lyrically get murdered
But I know at least he's heard it
'Cause Agent Orange just sent the Secret Service
To meet in person to see if I really think of hurtin' him
Or ask if I'm linked to terrorists
I said, ""Only when it comes to ink and lyricists""
But my beef is more media journalists
(Hold up, hold up, hold up)
I said, my beef is more meaty, a journalist
Can get a mouthful of flesh
And yes, I mean eating a penis
'Cause they've been pannin' my album to death
So I've been givin' the media fingers
Don't wanna turn this to a counseling sesh
But they've been puttin' me through the ringer
So I ain't ironin' shit out with the press
But I just took this beat to the cleaners",3930546
132991,2774131,Greatest,rap,Eminem,2018,1515487,{},"
Motherfuckers talkin' crazy (Yeah)
Sayin' I should quit (Ah)
I fuckin' tell 'em make me (Bitch)
Eat a fuckin' dick (Yeah)
I'm feelin' like the greatest (Woo!)
On the beat who ever did it
Mike WiLL the one who made it
It's Shady on the lyrics


I'm somewhat outlandish they say
You say we're cut from the same cloth
But I guess you fabricate, eh?
You better bring more men than the Latter Day Saints
Manic states, Stephen Paddock with automatic stay sprayin'
At anything that may stand in they way
As I stand at the bay window with a hand grenade
And a trey eight, at the Mandalay Bay
Common sense, I'm a dollar short and a day late
James Holmes at the Saturday Batman matinee
Must have missed my CAT scan that day (Yeah!)
I just threw a Tampax at Dre
Trashcan, Tascam and ashtray
I'm turnin' back to a madman, can't take
Anymore but I try to get away from the anger and rage
My basal ganglia's an A to the K
Get your ass sprayed like bidets
Breakin' your legs eight different ways, ankle to waist
You chumps don't even know how to do somethin'
To give goosebumps a day when you say
That somethin' you wrote gave someone a lump in their throat
Or you had them choked up, you'd be yankin' my chain (Ayy)
Feel like I'm headed for the padded cell, the
Bar for me when I rap isn't fair but
Guess that's the standard I'm held to
But if somethin' like that doesn't tell ya
You set a mark too high when platinum sales are looked at as a failure (Yeah)
Then you better take it back to The Shelter and Hamburger Helper
'Cause, damn it, I'm still the

Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
No lie, I might be
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
I feel like the greatest (Yeah!)
Woke up to honkies sounding like me
Never be as good (Yeah!)
Never be as good (Yeah!)
(Packing up) Wife-beaters, white t-shirts, what?
But I'm the greatest


So you sold ten million albums, eh? (What?)
Only problem is, you put out ten million albums, eh? (Haha! Wait)
What was I just about to say?
Oh yeah, let me get this out the way
I know there's people that are pissed about the way
I mispronounced a name, ""Die Antwoord!""
Fuck, I still can't say this shit, but how quickly they forget
Who the fuck I was; now Ninja try to duck my slugs
You let ya girl get fucked by Muggs
I'd like to give a shout to Cypress (Woo!)
This can't be real, you dissed me and I was just tryin' to
Give you a shout-now get the fuck out my rhyme book
No more shiners, already too much time took
And rappers I hear you talkin' shit
I'm just too big to respond to it
God forbid I forget though, and jump out the window
Somebody better child-proof it (Yeah)
'Cause if I lose it we can rewind to some old Ja Rule shit
And I can remind motherfuckers how I do shit
You don't got the tools I got in my toolkit (Bitch!)
I bullshit you not, y'all fools just forgot
That I'm so fuckin' awful with the thoughts
And when I'm hostile and impossible to stop
So you can call it a nostril 'cause it's not gonna ever
I'll never let up on the pedal, might as well get the mop
'Cause I'm wipin' up everyone in this genre
'Cause on the mic I feel like I'm the

Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
No lie, I might be
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
I feel like the greatest (Yeah!)
Woke up to honkies sounding like me
Never be as good (Yeah!)
Never be as good (Yeah!)
(Packing up) Wife-beaters, white t-shirts, what?
But I'm the greatest


Oh yeah, and one more thing I want to mention (What?)
Is you're one dimension
I'm a monkey wrench and I can flunk detention
And I love contentions, so welcome to the gun convention
Muscles flexin', gotta strut like a front suspension (Woo)
And you just stuck the key up in the ignition
And gave me enough gas to flood my engine (Yeah)
Psychopath, Michael Jack's blowin' up like a raft
I should slap Vlad with a ISIS flag
Bet you I come back twice as bad (Uh)
Revival didn't go viral!
Denaun and Royce tell me that I should take the high road
Fuck that, I'm finna hit back
'Til I run out of gunpowder and split the scene (Pew)
Hold the mic similar to pistol, squeeze
And I shoot from the hip when I grip them things
And my lips are the clips, got the Sig lit like it's nicotine
Trigger me and Slim gets mean (Brr!)
Bars are like bullets when I spit them schemes
That's why I call the motherfuckers M16s (Woo!)
Float like a butterfly, I'm gonna sting like a bee
You ain't harmin' a thing
I hit a ding (Ding!) hard as I'm gonna swing
I'm gonna need to put my arm in a sling (Ow!)
But like a wedding band
You gotta be diamond to even climb in the ring
Anomaly, I'm Muhammad Ali
'Cause I knew one day (Hey!) I'm gonna be the

Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
Greatest in the world (Yeah!)
No lie, I might be
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
The best to ever do it (Yeah!)
I feel like the greatest (Yeah!)
Woke up to honkies sounding like me
Never be as good (Yeah!)
Never be as good (Yeah!)
(Packing up) Wife-beaters, white t-shirts, what?
But I'm the greatest",3930555
132993,2774134,Lucky You,rap,Eminem,2018,4565008,"{""Joyner Lucas""}","
Woah, Joyner, Joyner, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Yeah, I done did a lot of things in my day, I admit it
I don't take back what I say, if I said it, then I meant it
All my life I want a Grammy, but I'll prolly never get it
I ain't never had no trophy or no motherfuckin' ribbon (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Fuck the system, I'm that nigga, bend the law, cut the rules
I'm about to risk it all, I ain't got too much to lose (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Y'all been eatin' long enough, it's my turn to cut the food (Yeah)
Pass the plate (Yeah), where my drink (Hol' up)?
This my day (Yeah, yeah), lucky you, fuck you too, woo!


Y'all gotta move, y'all gotta move, y'all gotta move
Give me some room (Woo!), give me some room (Hey!), give me the juice
Hop out the coupe, hop out the coupe, hop out and shoot
Y'all gotta move (Boom, bap), y'all gotta move (Woo!), give me the juice

Back on my bullshit, my back to the wall
Turn my back on you, all of you finished (Bap, bop, bop)
Back to these bullets, it's back to the job
Pull my MAC out and all of you runnin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Back on my hood shit, it's back to the pushin'
These packs and I'm actually pumpin'
Can't fuck with you rappers, you practically suckin' (Yuh)
You might'a went platinum but that don't mean nothin'
I'm actually buzzin' this time
Straight out the kitchen, I told 'em the oven is mine
I do not fuck with you guys (Woo!)
If I don't kill you, just know you gon' suffer this time (Yeah!)
I ain't no gangster, but I got some bangers
Some chains and some blades and a couple of knives
Choppers and jammies, a partridge, a pear tree
My Twelve Days of Christmas was nothin' but lies (I)
Run at you hard like a sumo (Sumo)
They say I talk like a chulo (Chulo!)
I live on Mars, I'm not Bruno (Woo!)
Bitch, I'm a dog, call me Cujo (Rah)
You play your cards, I reverse on you all
And I might just draw four like a Uno (Bup)
Cállate boca mejor, maricón
Little puto, and all of you culo (Joyner)
They've embedded the level, I been the ghetto to ghetto
Lookin' for somethin' I prolly can never find now (Yeah, yeah)
Shit get realer, but 'til all the beef die down (Yeah)
In truth, a nigga just really want me tied down (Bop, bop)
I've been alone and I never needed nobody
Just only me and my shawty, I'll tell these niggas to lie down
Keep all the money, I never wanted the lifestyle
I just pray to God that my son'll be alright now (Woo! Woo!)
I said ain't no love for the other side
Or anyone who ever want smoke (Joyner)
When I die I'm goin' out as the underdog who never lost hope (Yeah)
You in the wrong cab, down the wrong path
Nigga, wrong way, wrong road (Woo! Woo!)
Snakes in the grass tryna slither fast
I just bought a fuckin' lawn mower (Vroom!)

I done said a lotta things in my day, I admit it
This is payback in a way (Yeah), I regret it that I did it
I done won a couple Grammys, but I sold my soul to get 'em (Ah)
Wasn't in it for the trophies (Nah), just the fuckin' recognition
Fuck's the difference? I'm that cracker, bend the law, fuck the rules
Man, I used to risk it all, now I got too much to lose
I've been eatin' long enough, man, my stomach should be full
I just ate, licked the plate, my buffet, lucky me, fuck you think? (Woo!)


I got a couple of mansions
Still, I don't have any manners
You got a couple of ghostwriters
But to these kids, it don't actually matter
They're askin' me, ""What the fuck happened to hip-hop?""
I said, ""I don't have any answers""
'Cause I took an L when I dropped my last album
It hurt me like hell, but I'm back on these rappers (Yeah)
And actually comin' from humble beginnings
I'm somewhat uncomfortable winning
I wish I could say, ""What a wonderful feeling!
We're on the upswing like we're punchin' the ceiling!""
But nothin' is feeling like anyone has any fuckin' ability
To even stick to a subject, it's killin' me
The inability to pen humility
Ha-ta-ta, ba-ta-ta, why don't we make a bunch of
Fuckin' songs about nothin' and mumble 'em?
Fuck it, I'm goin' for the jugular
Shit is a circus, you clowns that are comin' up
Don't give an ounce of a motherfuck
About the ones that were here before you that made rap (Yeah)
Let's recap, way back, MC's that (What?)
Wreak havoc on tape decks (Woo)
ADAT's, where the G Raps and Kanes at?
We need 3 Stacks ASAP and bring Masta Ace back
'Cause half of these rappers have brain damage
All the lean rappin', face tats, syruped out like tree sap
I don't hate trap (Nah), and I don't wanna seem mad
But in fact (Yeah), where the old me at? The same cat
That would take that feedback and aim back, I need that
But I think it's inevitable they know what button to press
Or what lever to pull to give me to snap though (Lil' bitch)
And if I pay it attention, I'm prob'ly makin' it bigger
But you've been takin' ya dicks and I'm fuckin' back, ho (Get it?)
On the brink, any minute got me thinkin' of finishin'
Everything with acetaminophen and reapin' the benefits
I'm asleep at the wheel again, as I begin to thinkin' about an evil intent of another beat I'ma kill again
'Cause even if I gotta end up eating a pill again
Even ketamine or methamphetamine with the minithin
It better be at least seventy or three-hundred milligram
And I might as well 'cause I'ma end up bein' a villain again
Levels to this shit, I got an elevator
You could never say to me I'm not a fuckin' record breaker (Yeah)
I sound like a broken record every time I break a record
Nobody could ever take away the legacy I made, I never cater
Motherfucker, now I got a right to be this way
I got spite inside my DNA (Yeah)
But I roll 'til the wheels fall off, I'm working tirelessly, ayy
It's the moment y'all been waitin' for like California
Wishin' rain to pour in that drought, y'all
Been prayin' for my downfall (Yeah)
From the 8 Mile to the Southpaw
Still the same Marshall, that outlaw
That they say as a writer might've fell off
I'm back on that bull like the cowboy

So y'all gotta move, yeah, y'all gotta move, yeah, y'all gotta move
Give me some room (Woo!), give me some room (Hey!), give me the juice
Hop out the coupe (Joyner!), hop out the coupe (Joyner!), hop out and shoot
Y'all gotta move (Boom, bap), y'all gotta move (Woo!), give me the juice",3930558
132996,2774140,Not Alike,rap,Eminem,2018,2821178,"{""Royce da 5\\'9\\\""""}","
Tay Keith, fuck these niggas up!
Yeah


Brain dead, eye drops
Pain meds, cyclops (Yup)
Daybed, iPod
""May-back,"" Maybach (Yup)
Trainwrecks, sidewalks
Payless, high-tops (Uh)
K-Fed, iHop
Playtex, icebox (Yeah)


That's how much we have in common (Yah!)
That's how much we have in common (Woah!)
Up on this mic when we're on it (Yah)
That's how much we have in common (Yeah!)
That's how much we have in common (Woo!)
That's how much we have in common
We are not alike, there's nada like us on the mic (Yah!)

I don't do Jordans and Audemars
I do explosions and Molotovs
Y'all blowin' smoke as if y'all ain't washed
I blow the smoke from the car exhaust
Flyin' to a party I am not invited to, feelin' like the streets need me (What up?)
I ain't gotta dance long as my Ferrari Spider move like C Breezy
I don't gotta hire goons
I'd rather try to buy the moon and breathe freely
The sky is blue, the tires new
The Maserati white and cool like G-Eazy
Why these dudes tryna figure out
How to do a freestyle as fly as me? (Why?)
I'm confused tryna figure out
How to do Kapri Styles and Mya G
Everybody doin' chick joints
Prolly rob these little dudes at fist point
'Member everybody used to bite Nickel
Now everybody doin' Bitcoin
We don't got nothin' in common (No!)
We don't got nothin' in common (No!)
Y'all into stuff like doubled-up Styrofoam cups
On them uppers-and-downers (Woo!)
I'm into stuff like doublin' commas
Find me a brother who's solid
To count this shit up and then bust this shit down
When the cops hit us up, we can flush this shit down
We cannot give a fuck, shit, a fuckin' colonic
Sellin' your cock and your butt for a follower
Possible couple of dollars, you powder sniff
Now you slippin', call it a power trip, a product of politics
Y'all went from profit and toppin' the charts
To dropped in the park in a pile of shit
Knowledge is power, but powerless
If you've got it and you do not acknowledge it
Y'all music sound like Dr. Seuss inspired it
Hirin' strippers, prostitute retirin'
We can spit it for your advance
I'm fit to be king, you're cut out to fit in Prince pants
You niggas-

Brain dead, eye drops
Pain meds, cyclops (Yeah)
Daybed, iPod
""May-back,"" Maybach (Yup)
Trainwrecks, sidewalks
Payless, high-tops (Uh)
K-Fed, iHop
Playtex, icebox (Yeah)


That's how much we have in common (Yah!)
That's how much we have in common (Woah!)
Up on this mic when we're on it (Yah)
That's how much we have in common (Yuh!)
That's how much we have in common (Woo!)
That's how much we have in common
We are not alike, there's nada like us-


You say you affiliated with murderers, killers (Ayy!)
The people you run with are thuggin' (Gang!)
But you just a wannabe gunner (Gang!)
Like you was gonna do somethin'
Actin' like you catchin' bodies (Ayy!)
And you got juice, lil' youngin', you buggin'
You ain't never even been charged in connection with battery
Bitch, you ain't plugged into nothin'
Rap God spit lyrical bullets (Pew!)
And gats cock, your partners better tool up
This has not to do with muscular
But have guns for sure, you better put a
Strap on, other words if you're gonna
Roll up with your (Gang!) you're gon' need a arsenal
'Cause this bar is over your head
So you better-*gun cock*-have arms if you're gonna pull up (Skrrt!)
Oh, you run the streets, huh?
Now you wanna come and fuck with me, huh?
This little cock-sucker, he must be feelin' himself
He wants to keep up his tough demeanour
So he does a feature, decides to team up with N9na (Yeah)
But next time you don't gotta use Tech N9ne
If you wanna come at me with a sub, Machine Gun
And I'm talkin' to you
But you already know who the fuck you are, Kelly
I don't use sublim's and sure as fuck don't sneak-diss
But keep commenting on my daughter Hailie
I keep on telling motherfuckers
But, just in case you forgot really and need Ja memories jarred like strawberry or pineapple apricot jelly
I respond rarely, but this time Shady 'bout to sound off
Like a fuckin' cocked semi-Glock Demigod
Let me put a fuckin' silencer on this little
Non-threatening blond fairy cornball takin' shots at me
You're not ready, fool, break yourself like Rock Steady Crew
Obviously, I'm not getting through
We can get it poppin' like Redenbach, letting off like Remy Ma
Heavy artille-ry, Godzilla harsh with a hard shell
With a motherfucking heart bigger than Bizarre's belly
Only time you'll ever say I lost
You'll be talkin' 'bout Fetty Wap, better call Diddy
Just to try to get me off of ya
Better hope I don't call Trick Trick
Bitch, this shit don't fly in our city
Punk, you don't disrespect OGs, R.I.P. Prodigy
Sold Dre my soul and then told him the moment he signed me
That I'd be the most hated, though made it
So that there's no shame, it's okay to own it
'Cause life is a bitch, she's a bow-legged ho
But now those days are over
I Harvey Weinstein a bathrobe hanging open
My code name is groper, I role play with lotion
I fucked on the world then I throw away the Trojan
Old lederhosen with home-made explosives
I'll blow eighty holes in you
Don't make me go in, I O. J. the flows
And I'm insult to injury, Rolaids to Goldman
I'm throat spray and Motrin, I throated Nicole
As they both there to choke and my whole blade is soakin'
A double-edge sword, it cuts both ways, I poke and
I stick and I turn in a rotating motion
Invisible with the pen, I'm at the pinnacle to sick individuals
Stick my dick and put the tip in at minimal
I'm fuckin' these syllables, I let 'em lick on my genitals
I'm a fucking invincible, indefensible, despicable, difficult prick
A little bit unpredictable, I spit the formidable
That you bitches fuckin' with, the original
I consider me and Nickel identical ('Dentical!)-but not us
The only thing we have in common's I'm a dick and you suck
Otherwise one has nothin' to do with the other
None come close to skunk, bug, soldier
Tongue, shrub, shoulder, one month older
Sponge, mug, folder, nun, rug, holster
Lug nut, coaster, lung, jug, roaster
Young Thug poster, unplugged toaster (Yeah!)

That's how much we have in common (Yah!)
That's how much we have in common (Woah!)
Up on this mic when we're on it (Yah)
That's how much we have in common (Yeah!)
That's how much we have in common (Woo!)
That's how much we have in common
We are not alike, there's nada like us-
(Man, fuck this shit, let's go)",3930563
132997,2774141,Kamikaze,rap,Eminem,2018,2196084,{},"
(Fack) Okay, (Fack) how do I say this? (Fack)
Last year (Fack) didn't work out so well for me (Fack)
(Fack last year!) (Fack) (Last year can eat a dick!)
2018, (Fack) well (Fack)


Hah, yeah, I'm a fuckin' kamikaze crashin' into everything
You beat me, Islamic Nazi, that means there is no such thing
I've been goin' for your jugular since Craig G ""Duck Alert""
Wedgie in my underwear, the whole bed sheet and the comforter
Stuck up in my rectal crack, kiss my disrespectful ass
I'll ride through your cul-de-sac
Window cracked, bumpin' your reference tracks
Y-You collaborative effort rap, I-I have never said his raps
O-Overstayed my welcome, stepped in crap
And ruined your welcome mat
So spit that shit from the heart, you didn't write like you wrote it (Wrote it) (Yeah)
While I teabag the microphone 'cause I go nuts on it (On it) (Yeah)
Like a fighter jet lined with explosives that'll strike any moment
Headed right at opponents and I'm the fuckin' pilot that flown it
I'm 'bout to-

Smash into everyone, crash into everything
Back and I've just begun, ""FACK"" 2017
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
I'm a Kamikaze, gonna
Smash into everyone, crash like an F-15
Damage already done, y'all shoulda let me be
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
I'm a Kamikaze, gonna


I turned to rap 'cause it made me feel tough when I wasn't (Wasn't)
From the moment I heard rappers cussin', I was in (Was in)
Which is why I identify with the guy
Who I was invented by, Dre's Frankenstein
Energized like a nine volt
Ice cold like Snake Eyes, twice in a row on a dice roll
But if the only reason I blowed is 'cause I'm white though
Why don't every other white rapper sell what I sold? (Ooh)
Kamikaze pilot, I wrote my suicide note
Here come the guys in white coats tryin' to stop me
'Fore I jump behind the controls and try to fly into foes
'Cause I'm takin' y'all with me when I go cyclone
I don't think this typhoon's letting up any time soon, here I go
Eyes closed, blindfolded, I'm 'bout to-

Smash into everyone, crash into everything
Back and I've just begun, ""FACK"" 2017
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
I'm a Kamikaze, gonna
Smash into everyone, crash like an F-15
Damage already done, y'all should'a let me be
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
Fack, fack on everyone
I'm a Kamikaze, gonna


Smash
Kamikaze, kamikaze
Kami, kami-kamikaze, kamikaze, kami-kamikaze (kamikaze)
Take a look at what I've done


I heard your freestyle on Shade 45, that shit was embarrassing
There is no way we ever air that shit again, I guarantee that
Wait, that shit was so ass it's somethin' we wouldn't dare re-air it (Get it)
The shit's embarrassing as me rear-ending Tara Reid bare
In my therapy chair, my dick is the hair length of Cher
Each nut is the chair width of an Acorn stairlift, beware of me
Lyrically I'm terrible, better get your lyrics prepared
Richard Ramirez is here, serial killin' every beat there is

Wait, wait, got the eeriest feelin'
Somethin' evil is lurkin', I'm no conspiracy theorist
But somethin' here is a foot-oh yeah, it's my dick
Get the measurin' stick (What?), 12 inches of wood (Haha)
Wait, but I've been goin' for your jugular since Craig G ""Duck Alert""
And I've come to pay respects
'Cause if you sleep you're fucked-other words
You get laid to rest and I hope your butt is hurt
Put me on a track, I go cray-on it like a color book
You got some views, but you're still below me
Mine are higher, so when you compare our views, you get overlooked
And I don't say the hook unless I wrote the hook
And now I'm just freestylin' in the vocal booth
And you know I've always spoke the truth
You're lyin' through your teeth so much you broke a tooth
And it ain't somethin' I need a phone to do
When I say I can't wait 'til I get ahold of you
And I don't know what I'm s'posed to do
Line up the rappers, take my pic like a photo shoot",3930564
133001,2774165,Fall,rap,Eminem,2018,2728299,{},"
(Photoshoot!)
You know, everybody's been tellin' me
What they think about me for the last few months
It's too loud
Maybe it's time I tell 'em what I think about them
Can't hear it coming down the hallway stairs from the parking lot
It's too loud
Three's not a crowd all up in it
Slow fire


Don't fall on my face
Don't fall on my faith, oh
Don't fall on my fate
Don't fall on my faith, oh
Don't fall on my fate
Don't fall on my-


Gotta concentrate, against the clock I race
Got no time to waste, I'm already late, I got a marathoner's pace
Went from addict to a workaholic, word to Dr. Dre
In that first marijuana tape-guess I got a chronic case (Yeah)
And I ain't just blowin' smoke, 'less it's in your momma's face
I know this time Paul and Dre
They won't tell me what not to say (Nope!)
And though me and my party days
Have all pretty much parted ways
You'd swear to God I forgot I'm the guy that made ""Not Afraid"" (Yah)
One last time for Charlamagne
If my response is late, it's just how long it takes
To hit my fuckin' radar, I'm so far away (Woo)
These rappers are like Hunger Games
One minute, they're mockin' JAY (Yeah)
Next minute, they get their style from Migos or they copy Drake
Maybe I just don't know when to turn around and walk away
But all the hate, I call it Walk-on-Water-Gate
I've had as much as I can tolerate
I'm sick and tired of waitin', I done lost my patience
I can take all of you motherfuckers on at once (Yeah!)
You wanted Shady? You got him!

Don't fall on my face (Yeah)
Don't fall on my faith, oh
Don't fall on my fate (Line 'em up!)
Don't fall on my faith, oh (Rrr!)
Don't fall on my fate (Ha)


Somebody tell Budden before I snap, he better fasten it
Or have his body bag get zipped
The closest thing he's had to hits is smackin' bitches (Pump it up!)
And don't make me have to give it back to Akademiks
Say this shit is trash again, I'll have you twisted
Like you had it when you thought you had me slippin' at the telly (Yeah)
Even when I'm gettin' brain, you'll never catch me with a thot
Lacking with it, ""He ain't spittin' like this on his last shit""
Ho, you better go back and listen
You know me better, thinkin' I'll slow or let up
Call it trap 'cause it's a total setup
Hopin' that you rappers fall in that
Dre said, ""Hold your head up!"" (Huh?)-Kathy Griffin
Stackin' ammunition, slap the clip in, cock it back on competition
This is how I shot ahead (Pew)-Gabby Gifford
My attack is vicious, Jack the Ripper, back in business
Tyler create nothin', I see why you called yourself a ******, bitch
It's not just 'cause you lack attention
It's because you worship D12's balls, you're sack-religious
If you're gonna critique me
You better at least be as good or better
Get Earl the Hooded Sweater
Whatever his name is to help you put together
Some words, more than just two letters
The fans waited for this moment like that feature
When I stole the show (Ha), sorry if I took forever (Haha)

Don't fall on my face (Yeah)
Don't fall on my faith, oh (I won't)
Don't fall on my fate (Line 'em up!)
Don't fall on my faith, oh (Haha)
Don't fall on my fate (It's too easy)


Just remember, I was here before you
And I'll be here after you make your run-in for you
Detractors, I'ma have to fuck Pitchfork with a corkscrew (Ah!)
Just what the doctor ordered
Revenge is the best medicine (Yeah)
Increase the dose, from least to most
And then tell the Grammys to go and fuck themselves
They suck the blood from all the biggest artists like some leeches
So they nominate 'em, get 'em there, get a name to MC the show
Every parasite needs a host (Ha-ha)
Then give Album of the Year to somebody that no one's ever even heard of
All I know is I wrote every single word of everything I ever murdered
Time to separate the sheep from goats (Yeah)
And I got no faith in your writers, I don't believe in ghosts
When rap needed it most, I was that wing and a prayer (Huh)
A beacon of hope, put a B-I-R-D in the air
Somewhere some kid is bumpin' this while he lip-syncs in the mirror
That's who I'm doin' it for, the rest I don't really even care
But you would think I'm carryin' a Oxford dictionary in my pocket
How I'm buryin' these artists
On a scale of 'turnt' you're 'minus'
Mine says 'very', yours says 'hardly'
And what's scary is you prob'ly can compare me to your car 'cause I'm just barely gettin' started (Woo)
And far as Lord Jamar, you better leave me the Hell alone
Or I'll show you an Elvis clone
Walk up in this house you own, thrust my pelvic bone
Use your telephone and go fetch me the remote
Put my feet up and just make myself at home (Yeah)
I belong here, clown! Don't tell me 'bout the culture!
I inspired the Hopsins, the Logics, the Coles, the
Seans, the K-Dots, the 5'9""s, and oh
Brought the world 50 Cent, you did squat, piss and moan
But I'm not gonna fall, bitch! (Yeah)

It's too loud
Can't hear it coming down the hallway stairs from the parking lot
It's too loud
Three's not a crowd all up in it
Slow fire",3930586
133002,2774173,Venom,rap,Eminem,2018,3146013,{},"
I got a song filled with shit for the strong-willed
When the world gives you a raw deal
Sets you off 'til you scream, ""Piss off! Screw you!""
When it talks to you like you don't belong
Or tells you you're in the wrong field
When something's in your mitochondrial
'Cause it latched on to you, like-


Knock knock, let the devil in
Manevolent as I've ever been, head is spinnin'
This medicine's screamin', ""L-L-L-Let us in!""
L-L-L-Like a salad bowl, Edgar Allan Poe
Bedridden, shoulda been dead a long time ago
Liquid Tylenol, gelatins, think my skeleton's meltin'
Wicked, I get all high when I think I've smelled the scent
Of elephant manure-hell, I meant Kahlúa
Screw it, to hell with it, I went through hell with accelerants
And blew up my-my-myself again
Volkswagen, tailspin, bucket matches my pale skin
Mayo and went from Hellmann's and being rail thin
Filet-o-Fish, Scribble Jam, Rap Olympics '97 Freaknik
How can I be down? Me and Bizarre in Florida
Proof's room slept on the floor of 'da motel then
Dr. Dre said, ""Hell yeah!""
And I got his stamp like a postcard, word to Mel-Man
And I know they're gonna hate
But I don't care, I barely can wait
To hit 'em with the snare and the bass
Square in the face, this fuckin' world better prepare to get laced
Because they're gonna taste my-

Venom, (I got that) adrenaline momentum
And I'm not knowin' when I'm
Ever gonna slow up and I'm
Ready to snap any moment I'm
Thinkin' it's time to go get 'em
They ain't gonna know what hit 'em
(W-W-When they get bit with the-)
Venom, (I got that) adrenaline momentum
And I'm not knowin' when I'm
Ever gonna slow up and I'm
Ready to snap any moment I'm
Thinkin' it's time to go get 'em
They ain't gonna know what hit 'em
(W-W-When they get bit with the-)


I said knock knock, let the devil in
Shotgun p-p-pellets in the felt pen
Cocked, fuck around and catch a hot one
It-it's evident I'm not done
V-Venomous, the thoughts spun
Like a web and you just caught in 'em
Held against your will like a hubcap or mud flap
Beat strangler attack
So this ain't gonna feel like a love tap
Eat painkiller pills, fuck up the track
Like, what's her name's at the wheel? Danica Patrick
Threw the car into reverse at the Indy, a nut crashin'
Into ya, the back of it just mangled steel
My Mustang and the Jeep Wrangler grill
With the front smashed, much as my rear fender, assassin
Slim be a combination of an actual kamikaze and Gandhi (Gandhi)
Translation, I will probably kill us both
When I end up backin' into ya
You ain't gonna be able to tell what the fuck's happenin' to ya
When you're bit with the-

Venom, adrenaline momentum
And I'm not knowin' when I'm
Ever gonna slow up and I'm
Ready to snap any moment I'm
Thinkin' it's time to go get 'em
They ain't gonna know what hit 'em
(W-W-When they get bit with the-)
Venom, (I got that) adrenaline momentum
And I'm not knowin' when I'm
Ever gonna slow up and I'm
Ready to snap any moment I'm
Thinkin' it's time to go get 'em
They ain't gonna know what hit 'em
(W-W-When they get bit with the-)


I said knock knock, let the devil in
Alien, E-E-Elliott phone home
Ain't no telling when this chokehold
On this game will end, I'm loco
Became a Symbiote, so
My fangs are in your throat, ho
You're snake-bitten with my-venom
With the ballpoint pen I'm
Gun cocked, bump stock, double-aught, buckshot
Tire thumper, a garrote, tie a couple knots
Fired up and caught fire, juggernaut
Punk rock, bitch, it's goin' down like Yung Joc
'Cause the Doc put me on like sunblock
Why the fuck not, you only get one shot
Ate shit 'til I can't taste it
Chased it with straight liquor
Then paint thinner, then drank 'til I faint
And awake with a headache
And I take anything in rectangular shape
Then I wait to face the demons I'm bonded to
'Cause they're chasin' me but I'm part of you
So escapin' me is impossible
I latch onto you like a-parasite
And I probably ruined your parents' life
And your childhood too
'Cause if I'm the music that y'all grew up on
I'm responsible for you retarded fools
I'm the super villain Dad and Mom was losin' their marbles to
You marvel that? Eddie Brock is you
And I'm the suit, so call me-

Venom, (I got that) adrenaline momentum
And I'm not knowin' when I'm
Ever gonna slow up and I'm
Ready to snap any moment I'm
Thinkin' it's time to go get 'em
They ain't gonna know what hit 'em
(W-W-When they get bit with the-)
Venom, (I got that) adrenaline momentum
And I'm not knowin' when I'm
Ever gonna slow up and I'm
Ready to snap any moment I'm
Thinkin' it's time to go get 'em
They ain't gonna know what hit 'em
(W-W-When they get bit with the-)",3930594
133167,2779764,RAP DEVIL,rap,Machine Gun Kelly,2018,3307467,{},"
Oh my God, Ronny


Ayy, somebody grab him some clippers (Zzzzt)
His fuckin' beard is weird
Tough talk from a rapper payin' millions for security a year
""I think my dad's gone crazy,"" yeah, Hailie, you right
Dad's always mad cooped up in the studio, yellin' at the mic
You're sober and bored, huh? (I know)
'Bout to be forty-six years old, dog
Talkin' 'bout ""I'ma call up Trick Trick""
Man, you sound like a bitch, bitch
Man up and handle your shit (Ugh)
Mad about somethin' I said in 2012
Took you six years and a surprise album just to come with a diss (Huh)
Homie, we get it, we know that you're the greatest rapper alive
Fuckin' dweeb, all you do is read the dictionary and stay inside
Fuck ""Rap God,"" I'm the Rap Devil
Comin' bare-faced with a black shovel
Like the Armageddon when the smoke settle
His body next to this instrumental, I'm sayin'

I'm sick of them sweatsuits and them corny hats, let's talk about it
I'm sick of you bein' rich and you still mad, let's talk about it
Both of us single dads from the Midwest, we can talk about it
Or we could get gully, I'll size up your body and put some white chalk around it (Ayy)


Let's talk about the fact you actually blackballed a rapper
That's twice as young as you (Let's talk about it)
Let's call Sway
Ask why I can't go up to Shade 45 because of you (Brrt)
Let's ask Interscope
How you had Paul Rosenberg tryin' to shelf me (Huh?)
Still can't cover up the fact
Your last four albums is as bad as your selfie
Now tell me, what do you stand for? (What?)
I know you can't stand yourself (No)
Tryin' to be the old you so bad, you Stan yourself (Ha)
Let's leave all the beefin' to 50 (Please)
Em, you're pushin' fifty
Why you claimin' that I'ma call Puff
When you the one that called Diddy? (Facts)
Then you went and called Jimmy (Facts)
They conference called me in the morning (What?)
They told me you mad about a tweet
You wanted me to say sorry (What?)
I swear to God I ain't believe him (Nah)
Please say it ain't so (No)
The big bad bully of the rap game can't take a fuckin' joke
Oh, you want some fuckin' smoke (What?)
But not literally, you'll choke
Yeah, I'll acknowledge you're the G.O.A.T
But I'm The Gunner, bitch, I got you in the scope (Brrah)
Don't have a heart attack now (No)
Somebody help your mans up (Help)
Knees weak of old age, The Real Slim Shady can't stand up

I'm sick of them sweatsuits and them corny hats, let's talk about it (Let's talk)
I'm sick of you bein' rich and you still mad, let's talk about it (Let's talk)
Both of us single dads from the Midwest, we can talk about it (Haha)
Or we could get gully, I'll size up your body and put some white chalk around it


Hello Marshall, my name's Colson
You should go back to Recovery (Wouh)
I know your ego is hurtin'
Just knowin' that all of your fans discovered me (Hi)
He like, ""Damn, he a younger me
Except he dresses better and I'm ugly
Always making fun of me""
Stop all the thuggery, Marshall, you livin' in luxury (Ayy)
Look what you done to me
Dropped an album just because of me
Damn, you in love with me
You got money but I'm hungry
I like the diss but you won't say them lyrics out in front of me
Shout out to every rapper that's up under me
Know that I'll never do you like this fuckery
Still bitter after everyone loves you
Pull that wedgie out your dungarees (Ayy)
I gotta respect the OGs and I know most of 'em personally (Ayy)
But you're just a bully actin' like a baby
So I gotta read you a nursery (Pussy)
I'm the ghost of the future
And you're just Ebenezer Scrooge (Facts)
I said on Flex anyone could get it
I ain't know it would be you

I'm sick of them sweatsuits and them corny hats, let's talk about it (Let's talk)
I'm sick of you bein' rich and you still mad, let's talk about it (Let's talk)
Both of us single dads from the Midwest, we can talk about it (Haha)
Or we could get gully, I'll size up your body and put some white chalk around it


Ayy, ridin' shotty 'cause I gotta roll this dope
It's a fast road when your idols become your rivals, yeah
Never hesitate to say it to your face, I'm an asshole
Bitch-ass motherfucker
Oh my God, Ronny
Fuck Kells


We know you get nervous, Rabbit
I see Mama's spaghetti all over your sweater
I wish you would lose yourself on the records
That you made a decade ago, they were better
Accordin' to them, you're a national treasure
To me, you're as soft as a feather
The type to be scared to ask Rihanna for her number
Just hold her umbrella-ella-ella
""I'm not afraid,"" okay Oscar the Grouch, chill on the couch (Fuck)
You got an Oscar, damn
Can anyone else get some food in their mouth? (For real)
They made a movie about you, you're in everybody's top ten
You're not getting better with time
It's fine, Eminem, put down the pen
Or write an apology
Over the simple fact, you had to diss to acknowledge me
I am the prodigy
How could I even look up to you? You ain't as tall as me
5'8"" and I'm 6'4"", seven punches hold your head still
Last time you saw 8 Mile was at home on a treadmill
You were named after a candy
I was named after a gangster (Brr)
And don't be a sucker and take my verse off of Yelawolf's album, thank you (Thank you)
I just wanna feed my daughter
You tryna stop the money to support her
You the one always talkin' 'bout the action
Text me the addy, I'm pullin' up scrappin'
And I'm by my fuckin' self, what's happenin'
EST captain, salute me or shoot me
That's what he's gonna have to do to me
When he realizes there ain't shit he could do to me
Everybody always hated me, this isn't anything new to me
Yeah there's a difference between us
I got all of my shit without Dre producin' me (Ayy)
I know you're not used to me
Usually one of your disses should ruin me
But bitch I'm from Cleveland
Everybody quiet this evenin', I'm readin' the eulogy (Shh)
Dropped an album called Kamikaze
So that means he killed him
Already fucked one rapper's girl this week
Don't make me call Kim


I'm sick of them sweatsuits and them corny hats, let's talk about it (Let's talk)
I'm sick of you bein' rich and you still mad, let's talk about it (Let's talk)
Both of us single dads from the Midwest, we can talk about it (Haha)
Or we could get gully, I'll size up your body and put some white chalk around it",3937522
133423,2785465,I Love It,rap,Lil Pump & Kanye West,2018,3475864,"{""Adele Givens""}","
'Cause you know in the old days
They couldn't say the shit they wanted to say
They had to fake orgasms and shit
We can tell niggas today:
""Hey, I wanna cum, mothafucka!""


You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (I love it)
You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (I love it)


You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (Love it, love it)
(I'ma fuck a bitch, tell her cousin)
Your boyfriend is a dork, McLovin (Dork)
(McLovin; ooh, ooh, ooh)
I just pulled up in a Ghost (Ghost)
Fucked that bitch up out in London (Up out in)
Then I fucked up on her cousin
Or her sister, I don't know nothin' (Uh-uh, woo)
And my niggas gettin' ignorant
Like a lighter, bitch, we ignant (Ignant, yeah)
All this water on my neck
Look like I fell when I went fishin' (Fell!)
So much diamonds on my bust down
Ooh, fuck, what's the time? (Where we at?)
Me and Smokepurpp sippin' drank (Purpp!)
Ooh, fuck, she take lines (Lines)

You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (I love it, scoop!)
You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (I love it)


You're such a fuckin' ho
When the first time they ask you if you want sparklin' or still?
Why you tryna act like you was drinkin' sparklin' water 'fore you came out here?
You're such a fuckin' h-


I'm a sick fuck, I like a quick fuck (Whoop!)
I'm a sick fuck, I like a quick fuck (Whoop!)
I'm a sick fuck, I like a quick fuck (Whoop!)
I'm a sick fuck, I like a quick fuck (Whoop!)
I'm a sick fuck, I like a quick fuck
I like my dick sucked, I'll buy you a sick truck
I'll buy you some new tits, I'll get you that nip-tuck
How you start a family? The condom slipped up
I'm a sick fuck, I'm inappropriate
I like hearin' stories, I like that ho shit
I wanna hear mo' shit, I like the ho shit
Send me some mo' shit, you triflin' ho bitch (Bitch, bitch, bitch)


You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (I love it)
You're such a fuckin' ho, I love it (I love it)

'Cause you know in the old days
They couldn't say the shit they wanted to say
They had to fake orgasms and shit
We can tell niggas today:
""Hey, I wanna cum, mothafucka!""",3944360
133501,2786746,Drip Too Hard,rap,Lil Baby & Gunna,2018,1760665,{},"
Run that back, Turbo


You can get the biggest Chanel bag in the store if you want it
I gave 'em the drip, they sucked it up, I got 'em moanin'
I bought a new Patek, I had the watch, so I two-toned 'em
Takin' these drugs, I'm gon' be up until the mornin'
That ain't your car, you just a leaser, you don't own it
If I'm in the club, I got that fire when I'm performin'
The backend just came in, in all hundreds
Vibes galore, cute shit, they all on us
I'm from Atlanta where young niggas run shit
I know they hatin' on me, but I don't read comments
Whenever I tell her to come, she comin'
Whenever it's smoke, we ain't runnin'


Drip too hard, don't stand too close
You gon' fuck around and drown off this wave
Doin' all these shows, I've been on the road
I don't care where I go, long as I get paid
Bad lil' vibe, she been on my mind
Soon as I get back, she gettin' slayed
Do this all the time, this ain't no surprise
Every other night, another movie gettin' made
Drip too hard, don't stand too close
You gon' fuck around and drown off this wave
Doin' all these shows, I've been on the road
I don't care where I go, long as I get paid
Bad lil' vibe, she been on my mind
Soon as I get back, she gettin' slayed
Do this all the time, this ain't no surprise
Every other night, another movie gettin' made

Yeah, every other night, another dollar gettin' made
Every other night started with a good day
I feel like a child, I got boogers in the face
Diamonds dancin' in the dial like this shit is a parade
I don't want your chain, Young GonWunna not a slave
I had to draw the line, too many bitches gettin' saved
TSA harass me, so I took a private plane
These pussy niggas lackin', why I'm workin' on my aim
Drip too hard (Too hard), charge it to the card (To the card)
Designer to the ground, I can barely spell the names
Drip too hard, caution on the floor
You gon' fuck around and drown tryna ride a nigga wave


Drip too hard, don't stand too close
You gon' fuck around and drown off this wave
Doin' all these shows, I've been on the road
I don't care where I go, long as I get paid
Bad lil' vibe, she been on my mind
Soon as I get back, she gettin' slayed
Do this all the time, this ain't no surprise
Every other night, another movie gettin' made
Drip too hard, don't stand too close
You gon' fuck around and drown off this wave
Doin' all these shows, I've been on the road
I don't care where I go, long as I get paid
Bad lil' vibe, she been on my mind
Soon as I get back, she gettin' slayed
Do this all the time, this ain't no surprise
Every other night, another movie gettin' made",3945870
133720,2792553,Pretty Little Fears,rb,6LACK,2018,1700179,"{""J. Cole""}","
Do better, who better? You better?
Been around, like hella propellers
Wanna know who you with, don't tell 'em
Come on, fellas, that ain't none of your biz'
Got on your bodysuit, you know I'm on your ass today
Would you let me hit it thrice if I asked today?
She know my stick nuttin' but magic, babe
I be swinging it back and forth 'til you in your casket, bae, mmm


Girl, you want my best side, mmm
Bet she from the Westside, mmm, mmm


Now I just wanna know
Don't you sugarcoat
I'll say it all if you want
Now could you tell me like it is?
Pretty little fears
Music to my ears

Okay, say it loud, say it proud, you want it more
We open door, hit the couch, then the floor
I cut it up, like a scissor, love galore
She never bored, there's so much shit we can do
You free to say whatever, baby, if you asking me
No limit when I'm in it, got a Master P
I'm hoping I don't have a fast release
Got me focused like I'm out here tryna get my master's see, mmm


Throwin' up the peace sign, hmm
Girl, I'm from the Eastside, mmm, mmm
Girl, you on my best side, mmm
Say she from the Westside, mmm, mmm


Now I just wanna know
Don't you sugarcoat
I'll say it all if you want
Now could you tell me like it is?
Pretty little fears
Music to my ears
Now I just wanna know
Don't you sugarcoat
I'll say it all if you want
Now could you tell me like it is?
Pretty little fears
Music to my ears

I'm loving your light, vulnerable
Letting your guard down, it's honorable
'Specially when the past ain't been that
Friendly to you, but there's magic in that
You the flower that I gotta protect
And keep alive in the winter time, ayy, don't you die yet
You been way more than a friend of mine, we more like fam
I raise you, you raise me, let's turn this whole life 'round
You can confide in me, I could take the weight
Up off your shoulder blades and try to store the pain inside of me
Ayy, why the world do you like that?
Like they don't know you God-sent, but me, I view you like that
I'm sneaking glances, thanking God that he drew you like that
Beautiful Black child, come and shed your black cloud
For your vibe and your smile, I don't mind a lil' rain
I'm your dog, ears perk up at the sound of your name
Count on your main, wildfire, can't handle your flame
Download your shame, wild high, come drown in your fragrance
You that red pill that a nigga found in the Matrix
Before I had you, this shit was fantasy
You plant a seed to grow some roots, a branch and leaves
Becomes a tree of life until our nights are filled
With peace from stress and strife
And that's the blessing that I get from wifing you
'Cause you entrusted me with the key to your heart
Beating you smart, 'cause even though I need a new start
Due to my past transgressions, you believed in me
I guess the light I see in you is what you see in me, Lord

Say she from the Westside, mmm
And she see my best side, mmm, mmm


Now I just wanna know
Don't you sugarcoat
I'll say it all if you want
Now could you tell me like it is?
Pretty little fears
Music to my ears",3952630
133734,2792710,Better,rb,Khalid,2018,1733373,{},"
Better
Nothing, baby
Nothing feels better
I'm not really drunk, I never get that fucked up
I'm not, I'm so sober


Love to see you shine in the night like the diamond you are
(Love to see you shine in the night like the diamond you are)
I'm good on the side, it's alright, just hold me in the dark
(I'm good on the side, it's alright, just hold me in the dark)
No one's gotta know what we do, hit me up when you're bored
(No one's gotta know what we do, hit me up when you're bored)
'Cause I live down the street
So we meet when you need and it's yours
All I hear is...


Nothing feels better than this
Nothing feels better
Nothing feels better than this
Nothing feels better, oh no
We don't gotta hide, this is what you like
I'll admit
Nothing feels better than this

You say we're just friends but I swear when nobody's around
(You say we're just friends but I swear when nobody's around)
You keep my hand around your neck, we connect, are you feeling it now?
(You keep my hand around your neck, we connect, are you feeling it now?)
'Cause I am
I got so high the other night, I swear to God, felt my feet lift the ground
(I got so high the other night, I swear to God I felt my feet lift the ground)
Ooh, yeah
Your back against the wall, this is all you've been talking about
In my ears


Nothing feels better than this
Nothing feels better
Nothing feels better than this
Nothing feels better, oh no
We don't gotta hide, this is what you like
I admit
Nothing feels better than this


Now, left, right, left, right
Take it back, bring it side to side
Like that, like that, ayy
Ooh, now, left, right, left, right
Take it back, bring it side to side
Like

Nothing feels better than this
Nothing feels better
Nothing feels better than this
Nothing feels better, oh no
We don't gotta hide, this is what you like
I admit
Nothing feels better than this (Better than this)


Nothing feels better than this",3952794
133988,2797056,Killshot,rap,Eminem,2018,6893540,{},"
You sound like a bitch, bitch
Shut the fuck up
When your fans become your haters
You done?
Fuckin' beard's weird
Alright
You yellin' at the mic, fuckin' weird beard (You want smoke)
We doin' this once
You yellin' at the mic, your beard's weird
Why you yell at the mic? (Illa)


Rihanna just hit me on a text
Last night I left hickeys on her neck
Wait, you just dissed me? I'm perplexed
Insult me in a line, compliment me on the next
Damn, I'm really sorry you want me to have a heart attack
Was watchin' 8 Mile on my NordicTrack
Realized I forgot to call you back
Here's that autograph for your daughter, I wrote it on a Starter cap
Stan, Stan, son
Listen, man, Dad isn't mad
But how you gonna name yourself after a damn gun
And have a man-bun?
The giant's woke, eyes open, undeniable
Supplyin' smoke, got the fire stoked
Say you got me in a scope, but you grazed me
I say one call to Interscope and you're Swayze
Your reply got the crowd yelling, ""Woo!""
So before you die let's see who can out-petty who
With your corny lines (""Slim, you're old"")-ow, Kelly, ooh
But I'm 45 and I'm still outselling you
By 29, I had three albums that had blew
Now let's talk about somethin' I don't really do
Go in someone's daughter's mouth stealin' food
But you're a fuckin' mole hill
Now I'ma make a mountain out of you, woo!
Ho, chill, actin' like you put the chrome barrel to my bone marrow
Gunner? Bitch, you ain't a bow and arrow
Say you'll run up on me like a phone bill, sprayin' lead (Brrt)
Playin' dead, that's the only time you hold still (Hold up)
Are you eating cereal or oatmeal?
What the fuck's in the bowl, milk? Wheaties or Cheerios?
'Cause I'm takin' a shit in 'em, Kelly, I need reading material
...Dictionary...
""Yo, Slim, your last four albums sucked
Go back to Recovery,"" oh shoot, that was three albums ago
What do you know? Oops
Know your facts before you come at me, lil' goof
Luxury, oh, you broke, bitch? Yeah, I had enough money in '02
To burn it in front of you, ho
Younger me? No, you the wack me, it's funny but so true
I'd rather be 80-year-old me than 20-year-old you
'Til I'm hitting old age
Still can fill a whole page with a 10-year-old's rage
Got more fans than you in your own city, lil' kiddy, go play
Feel like I'm babysitting Lil Tay
Got the Diddy okay so you spent your whole day
Shootin' a video just to fuckin' dig your own grave
Got you at your own wake, I'm the billy goat
You ain't never made a list next to no Biggie, no Jay
Next to Taylor Swift and that Iggy ho, you about to really blow
Kelly, they'll be putting your name
Next to Ja, next to Benzino-die, motherfucker!
Like the last motherfucker sayin' Hailie in vain
Alien brain, you Satanist (Yeah)
My biggest flops are your greatest hits
The game's mine again and ain't nothin' changed but the locks
So before I slay this bitch I, mwah, give Jade a kiss
Gotta wake up Labor Day to this (The fuck?)
Bein' rich-shamed by some prick usin' my name for clickbait
In a state of bliss 'cause I said his goddamn name
Now I gotta cock back, aim
Yeah, bitch, pop Champagne to this! (Pop)
It's your moment
This is it, as big as you're gonna get, so enjoy it
Had to give you a career to destroy it
Lethal injection
Go to sleep six feet deep, I'll give you a B for the effort
But if I was three-foot-eleven
You'd look up to me, and for the record
You would suck a dick to fuckin' be me for a second
Lick a ballsack to get on my channel
Give your life to be as solidified
This mothafuckin' shit is like Rambo when he's out of bullets
So what good is a fuckin' machine gun when it's outta ammo?
Had enough of this tatted-up mumble rapper
How the fuck can him and I battle?
He'll have to fuck Kim in my flannel
I'll give him my sandals
'Cause he knows, long as I'm Shady he's gon' have to live in my shadow
Exhausting, letting off on my offspring
Lick a gun barrel, bitch, get off me!
You dance around it like a sombrero, we can all see
You're fuckin' salty
'Cause Young Gerald's balls-deep inside of Halsey
Your red sweater, your black leather
You dress better, I rap better
That a death threat or a love letter?
Little white toothpick
Thinks it's over a pic, I just don't like you, prick
Thanks for dissing me
Now I had an excuse on the mic to write ""Not Alike""
But really I don't care who's in the right
But you're losin' the fight you picked
Who else want it? Kells-attempt fails! Budden-L's!
Fuckin' nails in these coffins as soft as Cottonelle
Killshot, I will not fail, I'm with the Doc still
But this idiot's boss pops pills and tells him he's got skills
But, Kells, the day you put out a hit's the day Diddy admits
That he put the hit out that got Pac killed, ah!
I'm sick of you bein' wack
And still usin' that mothafuckin' Auto-Tune
So let's talk about it (Let's talk about it)
I'm sick of your mumble rap mouth
Need to get the cock up out it
Before we can even talk about it (Talk about it)
I'm sick of your blonde hair and earrings
Just 'cause you look in the mirror and think
That you're Marshall Mathers (Marshall Mathers)
Don't mean you are, and you're not about it
So just leave my dick in your mouth and keep my daughter out it

You fuckin'-oh
And I'm just playin', Diddy
You know I love you",3958196
134454,2809541,Myron,rap,Lil Uzi Vert,2020,1024934,{},"
(Oogie Mane, he killed it)
(Supah Mario on the beat, nigga)
Let's go
Let's go, yeah (Pew)


Stay so fresh, so clean, think they like me (Like me)
I wear more Supreme than a hypebeast (Than a hypebeast)
Only blue, no, green don't excite me (Excite me)
I could make a ho out your wifey (Out your wifey)
Jeremy Scott up on my toes, act like Shockey (Woah)
Made her get down on the bottom and she top me (Let's go)
Pull up extra icy, I'm not playin' hockey (Bling, blaow)
Niggas think I'm weird and they don't really like me (Like me)


'Cause I could fuck your bitch and fuck your mom and auntie (Yeah)
Your girl's a five, but your mom is a dime piece (Ayy)
And your auntie, her name is Miss Connie (Miss Connie)
I got one Glock, his name Clyde, the other one named Bonnie (Let's go)
These bitches, they think they dandy, but they be just lyin' (Bitches lie)
That lil' bitch, can't throw it back, I swear that ho be tryin' (Tryin')
When I fuck her from the front it sound like that bitch dyin' (On God)
VVS, I need a vest, anemic my diamonds (Woah)
I swear these niggas talk shit but they really be hidin' (Woo)
Had that boy's bitch on my dick, that ho, she was just ridin' (Yeah, yeah)
Diamonds on my neck so wet, that shit look like Poseidon (So wet, water)
I stand on my money, then my height, it turn to 9' 10"" (Yeah)
Yeah, these niggas be bitin' (Fuck)
Grra-ta, I'm not really with the fightin' (Grra-ta)
Yeah, me and her was vibin' (Yeah, vibin')
Yeah, yeah (Yeah)
Your bitch call me Myron (Call me...)

Stay so fresh, so clean, think they like me (Like me)
I wear more Supreme than a hypebeast (Than a hypebeast)
Only blue, no, green don't excite me (Excite me, green)
I could make a ho out your wifey (Out your wifey)
Jeremy Scott up on my toes, act like Shockey (Woah)
Made her get down on the bottom and she top me (Let's go)
Pull up extra icy, I'm not playin' hockey (Hockey, bling, blaow)
Niggas think I'm weird and they don't really like me (Like me)


Ninety thousand, that's a light band, (Yeah) yeah (Ninety thousand, that's a light)
I can tell you, it's the real spill (I can tell you, it's the real)
Yeah, fucked your bitch just for a light bill (Yeah)
Yeah, banana clip, I won't slip on the peel
I can't slip, slip, slip, no, no, I can't miss
I got icebergs on my neck, I can sink a ship
Outer space swag, not regular, Titanic my whip
In the hood, I'm not regular, I just brung my stick, baby
Oh, you think I give a fuck because I'm rich, baby? (Huh?)
Come on, baby, let's have sex and have a rich baby
She said, ""I thought you ain't do that,"" well, you dismissed, baby (Bye-bye)
Uh, young nigga, no, I ain't changed, Lil Uzi from the 6', baby (Yeah)
Uh, I don't think they like me (Nah)
But when I drop this song, I know they'll get excited (Yeah)
She was homie girl, but now that girl is my bitch (Mine)
I like them girls that do that scammin' and that swipin'

I just ran up all my bands, I just ran up all my bands
I just ran up all my bands, I just ran up all my bands
She give me head, that bit' migraine (Migraine)
She give me head, that bit' migraine (Migraine)
She give me head, that bit' migraine (Migraine)
She give me head, that bit' migraine (Let's go)


Got addicted to the road, got addicted to the stress
Got addicted to the foreigns, got addicted to the racks (Racks)
Man, these boys be doin' the most (Most)
And I swear that is a fact (Fact)
Man, this girl wanna give me brain
Yeah, we call that bit' migraine
Yeah, we call that bit' migraine
Yeah, we call that bit' migraine (Yeah, yeah)
Yeah, we call that bit' migraine (Ayy)
Yeah, we call that bit' migraine
Pack all my shit then I might migrate
Anywhere you goin', know some niggas gon' hit
I don't run from shit but the damn police
All blue hunnids to wash my face, yeah


Stay so fresh, so clean, think they like me (Like me)
I wear more Supreme than a hypebeast (Than a hypebeast)
Only blue, no, green don't excite me (Excite me)
I could make a ho out your wifey (Out your wifey)
Jeremy Scott up on my toes, act like Shockey (Woah)
Made her get down on the bottom and she top me (Let's go)
Pull up extra icy, I'm not playin' hockey (Hockey, bling, blaow)
Niggas think I'm weird and they don't really like me",3974110
134541,2812105,Without Me,pop,Halsey,2018,2225694,{},"
Found you when your heart was broke
I filled your cup until it overflowed
Took it so far to keep you close (Keep you close)
I was afraid to leave you on your own (Ooh)


I said I'd catch you if you fall (Fall)
And if they laugh, then fuck 'em all (All)
And then I got you off your knees
Put you right back on your feet
Just so you could take advantage of me


Tell me, how's it feel sittin' up there?
Feelin' so high, but too far away to hold me
You know I'm the one who put you up there
Name in the sky, does it ever get lonely?
Thinkin' you could live without me
Thinkin' you could live without me
Baby, I'm the one who put you up there
I don't know why (Yeah, I don't know why)
Thinkin' you could live without me
Live without me
Baby, I'm the one who put you up there
I don't know why (I don't know why, yeah, yeah)

Gave love 'bout a hundred tries (Hundred tries)
Just runnin' from the demons in your mind
Then I took yours and made 'em mine (Mine)
I didn't notice 'cause my love was blind


Said I'd catch you if you fall (Fall)
And if they laugh, then fuck 'em all (All)
And then I got you off your knees
Put you right back on your feet
Just so you could take advantage of me


Tell me, how's it feel sittin' up there?
Feelin' so high, but too far away to hold me
You know I'm the one who put you up there
Name in the sky, does it ever get lonely?
Thinkin' you could live without me
Thinkin' you could live without me
Baby, I'm the one who put you up there
I don't know why (Yeah, I don't know why)
Thinkin' you could live without me
Live without me
Baby, I'm the one who put you up there
I don't know why, yeah

You don't have to say just what you did (What you did)
I already know (I know)
I had to go and find out from them (Oh-woah)
So tell me, how's it feel? (Oh-woah)


Tell me, how's it feel sittin' up there?
Feelin' so high, but too far away to hold me
You know I'm the one who put you up there
Name in the sky, does it ever get lonely?
Thinkin' you could live without me
Thinkin' you could live without me
Baby, I'm the one who put you up there
I don't know why (Yeah, I don't know why)",3977187
134651,2815252,Regular English Ver.,pop,NCT 127,2018,1231311,{},"
Yeah, yeah


I like shinin', you be lyin'
I be grindin', you waste time
Know you wanna roll with me
'Cause you know I put it down
When I show up, I'm the one and only
No, no, no (No, no)
Yeah, pull up in the Jag
Haters gon' be mad


I be walkin' with the cheese
That's that queso (Queso, queso)
Diamonds drippin'
Better bring your raincoat (Splash)
I got them racks on me (On me)
I brought the whole lit team with me
I might pull up in a spaceship
Hop out, it don't look like I live here

And now we in the zone (Oh-oh-oh)
Stand too close, might catch a cold
Crib came with a gate and a code
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Drippin' water faucet (Splash)


VVS my diamonds, I don't need no light to shine
Iced out both my wrists, now I can barely see the time
I just made a million and I'm still not satisfied
'Cause I need that bag on the regular
I spend a bag on the regular


We make the world go, brra (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
My bank account go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
We make the world go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
(Skrrt, brra)
Dinero, peso, yen, lo quiero, I want in (Woo, woo)


I am too rich to compete
So don't compare to me (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
We are not the same
Only one of me (Hey, hey)
Hop out the coupe (Woo)
The sky is the roof (Roof)
My whole team ball (Ball)
We never lose (Yah)
Hundreds all blue (Hundreds)
We do what we do (Ball)

Hoppin' out casket-fresh
Looking like a fashion show, ayy
Diamonds on my neck
Looking like a water show, ayy
Let's go
She gon' bust it, bust it, bust it
For a real, for a real one (Bust it, yeah, yeah)
We gon' bring out the cars
One way, no stop, to the stars
(Ah, yeah, yeah, yeah) Crew fly, Dubai
No, it ain't two sides, too high
One way to Mars (Yeah)
You better watch yourself
I did it all by myself (Go)


And now we in the zone (Ice, ice)
Stand too close, might catch a cold (Stand too close)
Crib came with a gate and a code (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Yeah, yeah, drippin', water faucet (Splash)


VVS my diamonds, I don't need no light to shine (Oh)
Iced out both my wrists, now I can barely see the time (Oh)
I just made a million and I'm still not satisfied
'Cause that need the bag on the regular (Regular)
I spend a bag on the regular (Brra)

We make the world go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
My bank account go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
We make the world go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
(Skrrt, brra) Yeah, yeah
Dinero, peso, yen, lo quiero (Hol' up), I want it (Woo, woo)


Multi-colored diamonds like the rainbow (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
PLR your eyes, 번쩍 눈이 부셔, your brain go
Yeah, 자체발광, we flash
주체 안돼, let's dance (Let's dance)
Yeah, this is real, this is a regular move
머리 어깨 무릎 발 무릎 발
Let's get bounce


Oh-oh-oh-oh (Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Oh-oh-oh-oh (Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Run it up, run it up, run it up (Run it up)
No competition in front of us
We got the wave, we gettin' paid (Oh-oh-oh-oh)


VVS my diamonds, I don't need no light to shine (Oh-oh-oh-oh)
Iced out both my wrists, now I can barely see the time (Oh-oh-oh-oh)
I just made millions of it, but I'm still not satisfied (Oh-oh-oh-oh)
'Cause I need that bag on the regular (Regular)
I spend a bag on the regular


We make the world go, brra (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
My bank account go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
We make the world go (Do-do, do-do-do, do-do-do)
(Skrrt, brra)
Dinero, peso, yen, lo quiero, I want it (Woo, woo)


Regular",3980889
135129,2825719,Sunflower,rb,Post Malone & Swae Lee,2018,2622480,{},"
Ayy, ayy, ayy, ayy (Ooh)
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh (Ooh)
Ayy, ayy
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh


Needless to say, I keep in check
She was a bad-bad, nevertheless (Yeah)
Callin' it quits now, baby, I'm a wreck (Wreck)
Crash at my place, baby, you're a wreck (Wreck)
Needless to say, I'm keeping in check
She was a bad-bad, nevertheless
Callin' it quits now, baby, I'm a wreck
Crash at my place, baby, you're a wreck
Thinkin' in a bad way, losin' your grip
Screamin' at my face, baby, don't trip
Someone took a big L, don't know how that felt
Lookin' at you sideways, party on tilt
Ooh-ooh, some things you just can't refuse
She wanna ride me like a cruise and I'm not tryna lose

Then you're left in the dust, unless I stuck by ya
You're a sunflower, I think your love would be too much
Or you'll be left in the dust, unless I stuck by ya
You're the sunflower, you're the sunflower


Every time I'm leavin' on ya (Ooh)
You don't make it easy, no (No, no)
Wish I could be there for ya (Ooh)
Give me a reason to, oh (Oh)
Every time I'm walkin' out (Oh)
I can hear you tellin' me to turn around (Oh, oh)
Fightin' for my trust and you won't back down (No)
Even if we gotta risk it all right now, oh (Now)
I know you're scared of the unknown (Known)
You don't wanna be alone (Alone)
I know I always come and go (And go)
But it's out of my control


And you'll be left in the dust, unless I stuck by ya
You're the sunflower, I think your love would be too much
Or you'll be left in the dust, unless I stuck by ya
You're the sunflower, you're the sunflower (Yeah)",3993850
135140,2826011,Falling,rap,Trevor Daniel,2018,1148403,{},"
Oh
Ooh, ooh


My last made me feel like I would never try again
But when I saw you, I felt something I never felt
Come closer, I'll give you all my love
If you treat me right, baby, I'll give you everything
My last made me feel like I would never try again
But when I saw you, I felt something I never felt
Come closer, I'll give you all my love
If you treat me right, baby, I'll give you everything


Talk to me, I need to hear you need me like I need ya
Fall for me, I wanna know you feel how I feel for you, love
Before you, baby, I was numb, drown out pain by pourin' up
Speedin' fast on the run, never wanna get caught up
Now you're the one that I'm callin'
Swore I thought I'd never fall again, don't think I'm just talkin'
I think I might go all in, no exceptions, girl, I need ya

Feeling like I'm out of my mind, 'cause I can't get enough
Only one that I give my time, 'cause I got eyes for ya
Might make an exception for ya, 'cause I been feelin' ya
Think I might be out of my mind, I think that you're the one


My last made me feel like I would never try again
But when I saw you, I felt something I never felt
Come closer, I'll give you all my love
If you treat me right, baby, I'll give you everything
My last made me feel like I would never try again
But when I saw you, I felt something I never felt
Come closer, I'll give you all my love
If you treat me right, baby, I'll give you everything


Will never give my all again
'Cause I'm sick of falling down
When I open up and give my trust
They find a way to break it down
Break down
Tear me up inside
When you break me down",3994241
135152,2826388,Money,rap,Cardi B,2018,1828096,{},"
Look, my bitches all bad, my niggas all real
I ride on his dick in some big tall heels
Big fat checks, big large bills
Front, I'll flip like ten cartwheels
Cold ass bitch, I give broads chills
Ten different looks and my looks all kill
I kiss him in the mouth, I feel all grills
He eat in the car, that's meals on wheels (Woo)


I was born to flex (Yes)
Diamonds on my neck
I like boardin' jets, I like mornin' sex (Woo)
But nothing in this world that I like more than checks (Money)
All I really wanna see is the (Money)
I don't really need the D, I need the (Money)
All a bad bitch need is the (Money flow)
I got bands in the coupe (Coupe)
Bustin' out the roof
I got bands in the coupe (Coupe)
Touch me, I'll shoot (Bow)
Shake a lil ass (Money)
Get a little bag and take it to the store (Store, money)
Get a little cash (Money)
Shake it real fast and get a little more (Money)
I got bands in the coupe (Coupe)
Bustin' out the roof
I got bands in the coupe (Brrr)
Bustin' out the roof (Cardi)

I gotta fly, I need a jet, shit
I need room for my legs
I got a baby, I need some money, yeah
I need cheese for my egg
All y'all bitches in trouble
Bring brass knuckles to the scuffle
I heard that Cardi went pop
Yeah, I did go pop (Pop)
That's me bustin' they bubble
I'm Dasani with the drip
Baby mommy with the clip
Walk out Follie's with a bitch
Bring a thottie to the whip
If she fine or she thick, goddamn
Walkin' past the mirror, ooh
Damn, I'm fine (Fine)
Let a bitch try me, boom (Boom)
Hammer time, uh


I was born to flex (Yes)
Diamonds on my neck
I like boardin' jets, I like mornin' sex (Woo)
But nothing in this world that I like more than checks (Money)
All I really wanna see is the (Money)
I don't really need the D, I need the (Money)
All a bad bitch need is the (Money flow)
I got bands in the coupe (Coupe)
Bustin' out the roof
I got bands in the coupe (Coupe)
Touch me, I'll shoot (Bow)
Shake a lil ass (Money)
Get a little bag and take it to the store (Store, money)
Get a little cash (Money)
Shake it real fast and get a little more (Money)
I got bands in the coupe (Coupe)
Bustin' out the roof
I got bands in the coupe (Brrr)
Touch me, I'll shoot (Bow)

Bitch, I will pop on your pops (Your pops)
Bitch, I will pop on whoever (Brrr)
You know who pop the most shit? (Who?)
The people whose shit not together (Okay)
You'da bet Cardi a freak (Freak)
All my pajamas is leather (Uh)
Bitch, I will black on your ass (Yeah)
Wakanda forever
Sweet like a honey bun, spit like a Tommy gun
Rollie a one of one, come get your mommy some
Cardi at the tip-top, bitch
Kiss the ring and kick rocks, sis (Mwah)
Jump it down, back it up (Ooh, ayy)
Make that nigga put down 2K
I like my niggas dark like D'USSÉ
He gonna eat this ass like soufflé


I was born to flex, diamonds on my neck
I like boardin' jets, I like mornin' sex
But nothing in this world that I like more than Kulture
(Kulture, Kulture, Kulture)
All I really wanna see is the (Money)
I don't really need the D, I need the (Money)
All a bad bitch need is the
K.K.C (Woo)

(Money)
Money
(Money)
(Money)
(Money)
(Money)
(Money)
(Money)",3994740
135178,2827014,ZEZE,rap,Kodak Black,2018,1259427,"{""Travis Scott"",Offset}","
D.A. got that dope!


Ice water, turned Atlantic (Freeze)
Nightcrawlin' in the Phantom (Skrrt, Skrrt)
Told them hoes that don't you panic
Took an island, (Yeah) flood the mansion (Big water)
Dropped the roof, more expansion
Drive a coupe you can stand in (It's lit)
See the bitches undercover (In the sheets)
I'm an ass and titty lover (Big ass)
Guess we all made for each other
Now that all the dawgs free (Yeah, yeah)
And we out in these streets (Alright)
Can you do it, can you pop it for me?


Pull up in a Demon, on God (On God)
Lookin' like I still do fraud (Fraud)
Flyin' private jet with the rod (Rod)
This that Z shit, this that Z shit (This that Z shit)
Pull up in a Demon, on God (On God)
Lookin' like I still do fraud (Fraud)
Flyin' private jet with the rod (Rod)
This that Z shit, this that Z shit (This that Z shit)

Offset!
Blow the brains out the coupe (Boom)
Police wanna talk, but I'm on mute (Woo-woo, hey)
I'ma bust her wrist down 'cause she cute (Ice, ice)
Fuck her on a yacht, dive in a pool (Yeah)
She an addict (Addict), addict for the lifestyle and the Patek (Patek)
Big daddy, have you ever felt Chanel fabrics? (Chanel)
I be drippin' to death, I need a casket (Drippin')
And we got more stripes than the ref, he foul, TEC him (Bow, stripes)
In the middle of the field like David Beckham (Field, bow-bow)
All my niggas locked up, for real, I'm tryna help 'em (Free, free)
When I got a mil', got me the chills, don't know what happened (Hoo, chills)
Pop pills, do what you feel, I'm on that zombie (Hey, hoo)
I'm more like Gaddafi, I'm not no Gandhi (Gaddafi, hey)
I'm more like I'm David, Goliath runnin' (Hey, hey)
Niggas be clonin', I find it funny (Clone, haha)
We from the Nawf, straight out of the dungeon (We from the Nawf, hey)
I go in her mouth, she can't tell me nothin' (Eghck, eghck, egchk)
300, the watch is out of your budget (Woo, woo, 300)
Mean-muggin' got me clutchin'
Yeah, and this stick right out of Russia


Ice water, turned Atlantic (Freeze)
Nightcrawlin' in the Phantom (Skrrt, skrrt)
Told them hoes that don't you panic
Took an island, (Yeah) flood the mansion (Big water)
Dropped the roof, more expansion
Drive a coupe you can stand in (It's lit)
Bitches undercover (In the sheets)
I'm an ass and titty lover (Big ass)
Guess we all made for each other
Now that all the dawgs free (Yeah, yeah)
And we out in these streets (Alright)
Can you do it, can you pop it for me?

Pull up in a Demon, on God (On God)
Lookin' like I still do fraud (Fraud)
Flyin' private jet with the rod (Rod)
This that Z shit, this that Z shit (This that Z shit)
Pull up in a Demon, on God (On God)
Lookin' like I still do fraud (Fraud)
Flyin' private jet with the rod (Rod)
This that Z shit, this that Z shit (This that Z shit)


In a Hellcat 'cause I'm a hell-raiser
Self-made, I don't owe a nigga nann favor
When you get that money, nigga, keep your heart
I'm slidin' in a coupe, ain't got no key to start
I got the fire on me in BET Awards
When your well run dry, you know you need me for it
When I pull up in the Buick, you know what I'm doin'
If the police get behind me, I'm fleein' and eludin'
Sleepin' on the palette turned me to a savage
I'm a project baby, now I stay in Calabasas
Like I still serve fiends, like I'm still jackin'
I be sippin' on lean, tryna keep balance
Hit that Z-Walk, Dickie's with my Reeboks
I don't say much, I just let the heat talk
Your jewelry water whip, diamonds like re-rock
My lil' baby ride the dick like a seesaw
When I stepped up on the scene, I was on a bean
When I jumped up out the Beam', I was in Celine
Baby girl, you just a fling, that ain't what I mean
Money bustin' out my jeans like I do the scheme

Pull up in a Demon, on God (On God)
Lookin' like I still do fraud (Fraud)
Flyin' private jet with the rod (Rod)
This that Z shit, this that Z shit (This that Z shit)
Pull up in a Demon, on God (On God)
Lookin' like I still do fraud (Fraud)
Flyin' private jet with the rod (Rod)
This that Z shit, this that Z shit (This that Z shit)


Uh-huh, ha, oh-ah-oh
Uh-huh, ha, oh-ah-oh
Uh-huh, ha, oh-ah-oh
Uh-huh, ha, oh-ah-oh",3995573
135344,2830795,​needy,pop,Ariana Grande,2019,1399654,{},"
If you take too long to hit me back
I can't promise you how I'll react
But all I can say is at least I'll wait for you
Lately, I've been on a roller coaster
Tryna get a hold of my emotions
But all that I know is I need you close


I'ma scream and shout for what I love
Passionate, but I don't give no fucks
I admit that I'm a lil' messed up
But I can hide it when I'm all dressed up
I'm obsessive and I love too hard
Good at overthinking with my heart
How you even think it got this far, this far?


And I can be needy, way too damn needy
I can be needy, tell me how good it feels to be needed
I can be needy, so hard to please me
I know it feels so good to be needed

Sorry if I'm up and down a lot (Yeah)
Sorry that I think I'm not enough
And sorry if I say sorry way too much
You can go ahead and call me selfish (Selfish)
But after all this damage, I can't help it (Help it)
But what you can trust is I need your touch


I'ma scream and shout for what I love
Passionate, but I don't give no fucks
I admit that I'm a lil' messed up
But I can hide it when I'm all dressed up
I'm obsessive and I love too hard
Good at overthinking with my heart
How you even think it got this far, this far?


And I can be needy, way too damn needy
I can be needy, tell me how good it feels to be needed
I can be needy, so hard to please me
I know it feels so good to be needed",4000336
135377,2831836,Bitch Lasagna,rap,PewDiePie & Party in Backyard,2018,1412036,{},"
I don't like you, T-Series
Nothing personal, kid
But I must go all out
Just this once


Bobs or vegana, whichever will it be?
Sit the fuck down, T-Series, I'm here to spill the real tea (Uh)
You tryna dethrone me from spot on number one
But you India you lose, so best think you haven't won
When I'm through with you we're gonna be completely fuckin' done
'Cause we only just begun, I review you: *clap clap*
Zero, bye bitch, gone
So come on T-Series, looking hungry for some drama
Here, let me serve you bitch lasagna


Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
T-Series ain't nothing but a bitch lasagna
Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
Look at T-Series, they just crying for their mama
Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
T-Series ain't nothing but a bitch lasagna
Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
T-Series just wet themselves in their pajamas

So who the hell is Bob and why you wanna kiss him? (Ew)
I'm a Blue-Eyes White Dragon while you're just Dark Magician (Oof)
You got a fifth of the population in your nation, but
I got nine-year-olds of worlds so hold your defecation (Oops)
Motu Patlu, what the fuck is that even supposed to mean?
Your language sounds like it comes from a mumble rap community
No papa, no papa, yes papa; Johny
Now down all of this sugar and let's throw this fuckin' party with some-


Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
Look at T-Series, they're just crying for their mama
Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
T-Series ain't nothing but a bitch lasagna
Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
Look at T-Series, they just wetting their pajamas
Bitch lasagna, bitch lasagna
T-Series ain't nothing but a bitch lasagna


You got a population of one point three-two billion
But most your videos can't seem to hit even a million
Sub-bot!",4001588
136911,2872250,Gimme the Loot,rap,Big Baby Tape,2018,2027881,{},"


Gimme the loot, gimme the loot
DJ Tape
Go
Gimme the loot
Loot, loot, loot, loot
Loot, loot, loot, loot
Loot, loot, loot, loot
Loot, loot, loot, loot
Пум-пум, ту-ту-ту


Burr! Burr! Burr! Burr! Burr!
Gucci Mane вышeл (Gucci)
У! У! У! У! У!
Dimebag вышeл (Dimebag)
Э! Э! Э! Э! Э!
Вы всe мыши (Rats)
Я взял лут и вышeл
Baby Tape, я Шишeл-Мышeл
Окeй, бля, у, я взял твою boo и я eё eбу
И мой Glock, или, бля, ТТ издаст ту-ту-ту
У мeня, eсть, бля, шутeра, и они нe врут (Pew-pew)
Закрывайтe окна двeри, вeдь я иду брать лут (О чёрт!)
Я иду брать лут, о, да! Отдай мнe инвeнтарь (А-ха)
Ice на моeй шee - он сияeт как фонарь (Bling Blaww)
Рональдиньо трюки, эта сука, как вратарь (Flip)
Я похож на Gucci, а ты как говнарь (Loot!)
Лут в прихожeй дома, дажe лут в мусорном бакe (Loot!)
Я спустил eй лут в лицо, мой лут - это буккакe (Loot!)
Я с твоeй шалавой, Baby Tape, я super cocky (Loot!)
Килла-килла, Кукла Чаки, мои панчи как нунчаки (Ки-йя)
Baby-каратист, нe смотритe на мой wrist (Wrist, wrist)
Нe смотритe на мeня, вeдь я курю в рeжимe beast (Mode)
Wrist, wrist, wrist, прячeм бритвы под язык (Slatt)
Твоя сука мнe сосёт, я зову это lipsync (Oops!)
Данж босс, стэйдж босс, я курю дудос (Smoke)
Послe одного бонга ты стал, как Пeрри Утконос
Whole squad у твоeй двeри, это нe доставка Dominos
Я забeгаю в склад, чтобы взять лут, и, ёпта, твой бабос (Loot!)
Скажи мнe, гдe твой лут, я иду eго брать (Loot, loot!)
Скажи, гдe дeньги щас и я иду их брать (Кэш, кэш)
Дорога Ярости - мнe лучшe нe мeшать (Mad Max)
Иначe будeт (Что?)
Будeт ёпта-блять (Окeй, пум!)
Эй, им нe нужeн биф (Никак нeт)
Жeсткий dope я курю (Марсианский сплиф)
Эй, у Glock'а eсть мотив
Они нe умeют трэппить, Baby Tape дал им бриф
(Ты уёбок)

Gimme the loot
Gimme the loot
Gimme the loot
Gimme the loot
Gimme the loot, gimme the loot, gimme the loot",4054935
137243,2878588,​thank u next,pop,Ariana Grande,2018,9072131,{},"
Thought I'd end up with Sean
But he wasn't a match
Wrote some songs about Ricky
Now I listen and laugh
Even almost got married
And for Pete, I'm so thankful
Wish I could say, ""Thank you"" to Malcolm
'Cause he was an angel


One taught me love
One taught me patience
And one taught me pain
Now, I'm so amazing
Say I've loved and I've lost
But that's not what I see
So, look what I got
Look what you taught me
And for that, I say

Thank you, next (Next)
Thank you, next (Next)
Thank you, next
I'm so fuckin' grateful for my ex
Thank you, next (Next)
Thank you, next (Next)
Thank you, next (Next)
I'm so fuckin'-


Spend more time with my friends
I ain't worried 'bout nothin'
Plus, I met someone else
We havin' better discussions
I know they say I move on too fast
But this one gon' last
'Cause her name is Ari
And I'm so good with that (So good with that)


She taught me love (Love)
She taught me patience (Patience)
How she handles pain (Pain)
That shit's amazing (Yeah, she's amazing)
I've loved and I've lost (Yeah, yeah)
But that's not what I see (Yeah, yeah)
'Cause look what I've found (Yeah, yeah, I've found)
Ain't no need for searching, and for that, I say

Thank you, next (Thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Thank you)
I'm so fuckin' grateful for my ex
Thank you, next (Thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Said thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Next)
I'm so fuckin' grateful for my ex


Thank you, next
Thank you, next
Thank you, next
I'm so fuckin'-


One day I'll walk down the aisle
Holding hands with my mama
I'll be thanking my dad
'Cause she grew from the drama
Only wanna do it once, real bad
Gon' make that shit last
God forbid something happens
Least this song is a smash (Song is a smash)

I've got so much love (Love)
Got so much patience (Patience)
And I've learned from the pain (Pain)
I turned out amazing (Turned out amazing)
Say I've loved and I've lost (Yeah, yeah)
But that's not what I see (Yeah, yeah)
'Cause look what I've found (Yeah, yeah)
Ain't no need for searching
And for that, I say


Thank you, next (Thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Thank you, next)
Thank you, next
I'm so fuckin' grateful for my ex
Thank you, next (Thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Said thank you, next)
Thank you, next (Next)
I'm so fuckin' grateful for my ex


Thank you, next
Thank you, next
Thank you, next
Yeah, yee
Thank you, next
Thank you, next
Thank you, next
Yeah, yee",4063065
137319,2882311,​imagine,pop,Ariana Grande,2018,1475546,{},"
Step up, the two of us, nobody knows us
Get in the car like, ""Skrrt""
Staying up all night, order me pad thai
Then we gon' sleep 'til noon
Me with no makeup, you in the bathtub
Bubbles and bubbly, ooh
This is a pleasure, feel like we never act this regular


Click, click, click and post
Drip-drip-dripped in gold
Quick, quick, quick, let's go
Kiss me and take off your clothes


Imagine a world like that
Imagine a world like that
We go like up 'til I'm 'sleep on your chest
Love how my face fits so good in your neck
Why can't you imagine a world like that?
Imagine a world

Knew you were perfect after the first kiss
Took a deep breath like, ""Ooh""
Feels like forever, baby, I never thought that it would be you
Tell me your secrets, all of the creep shit
That's how I know it's true
Baby, direct it, name in the credits
Like the movies do


Click, click, click and post
Drip-drip-dripped in gold
Quick, quick, quick, let's go
Kiss me and take off your clothes


Imagine a world like that
Imagine a world like that
We go like up 'til I'm 'sleep on your chest
Love how my face fits so good in your neck
Why can't you imagine a world like that?
Imagine a world


Can you imagine it?
Can you imagine it?
Can you imagine it?
Can you imagine it?
Can you imagine it? (Can you imagine?)
Can you imagine it? (Can you imagine?)
Can you imagine it? (Can you imagine?)
Ooh, imagine it (Can you imagine?)
Imagine it, imagine it
Imagine it, imagine it
Imagine, imagine
Imagine, imagine
Imagine, imagine",4067749
137320,2882312,NASA,pop,Ariana Grande,2019,1032850,{},"
This is one small step for woman
One giant leap for woman-kind


I'd rather be alone tonight
You can say ""I love you"" through the phone tonight
Really don't wanna be in your arms tonight
I'll just use my covers to stay warm tonight
Think I'm better off here all alone tonight
Ain't no checkin' on when I get home tonight
Just makin' sure I'm good on my own tonight
Even though there isn't nothin' wrong tonight


Yeah, I'm just sayin', baby
I can't really miss you if I'm with you
And when I miss you, it'll change the way I kiss you
Baby, you know time apart is beneficial
It's like I'm the universe and you be N-A-S-A

Give you the whole world, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need
You know I'm a star; space, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need space (N-A-S-A)
Give you the whole world, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need
You know I'm a star; space, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need space (N-A-S-A)


Bottom line
Usually, I would love it if you stayed the night
I just think I'm on another page tonight
It ain't nothing wrong with saying I need me time
Usually, I would orbit around you
But gravity seems to be the only thing that's pulling me
You'll be my rise and shine soon as them stars align, mmm


Baby, I can't really miss you if I'm with you
And when I miss you, it'll change the way I kiss you
Baby, you know time apart is beneficial
It's like I'm the universe and you be N-A-S-A


Give you the whole world, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need
You know I'm a star; space, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need space (N-A-S-A)
Give you the whole world, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need
You know I'm a star; space, I'ma need space
I'ma need space, I'ma, I'ma need space (N-A-S-A)

You don't wanna leave me, but I'm tryna self-discover
Keep me in your orbit and you know you'll drag me under
You don't wanna leave me, but I'm tryna self-discover
(You don't wanna leave me, but I'm tryna self-discover)
Keep me in your orbit and you know you'll drag me under
(Keep me in your orbit and you know you'll drag me under)


I'd rather be alone tonight (Mmm)
You can say ""I love you"" through the phone tonight
Ah, hmm-mmm",4067750
137326,2882321,​ghostin,pop,Ariana Grande,2019,1346788,{},"
I know you hear me when I cry
I try to hold it in at night
While you're sleeping next to me
But it's your arms that I need this time (This time)
Look at the cards that we've been dealt
If you were anybody else
Probably wouldn't last a day
Every tear's a rain parade from hell (From hell)


Baby, you do it so well
You've been so understanding, you've been so good
And I'm puttin' you through more than one ever should
And I'm hating myself 'cause you don't want to
Admit that it hurts you


I know that it breaks your heart when I cry again
Over him, mmh
I know that it breaks your heart when I cry again
'Stead of ghostin' him

We'll get through this, we'll get past this, I'm a girl with
A whole lot of baggage
But I love you, we'll get past this, I'm a girl with
A whole lot of baggage, oh yeah


Though I wish he were here instead
Don't want that living in your head
He just comes to visit me
When I'm dreaming every now and then (And then)
And after all that we been through (And after all that we been through)
There's so much to look forward to
What was done and what was said
Leave it all here in this bed with you (With you)


Baby, you do it so well
You've been so understanding, you've been so good
And I'm puttin' you through more than one ever should
And I'm hating myself 'cause you don't want to
Admit that it hurts you, baby


I know that it breaks your heart when I cry again
Over him, mmh
I know that it breaks your heart when I cry again
'Stead of ghostin' him

We'll get through this, we'll get past this, I'm a girl with (Girl with)
A whole lot of baggage
But I love you (Love you), we'll get past this (Past this)
I'm a girl with a whole lot of baggage, yeah yeah",4067759
137327,2882324,7 rings,pop,Ariana Grande,2019,7387794,{},"
Yeah, breakfast at Tiffany's and bottles of bubbles
Girls with tattoos who like getting in trouble
Lashes and diamonds, ATM machines
Buy myself all of my favorite things (Yeah)
Been through some bad shit, I should be a sad bitch
Who woulda thought it'd turn me to a savage?
Rather be tied up with calls and not strings
Write my own checks like I write what I sing, yeah (Yeah)


My wrist, stop watchin', my neck is flossy
Make big deposits, my gloss is poppin'
You like my hair? Gee, thanks, just bought it
I see it, I like it, I want it, I got it (Yeah)


I want it, I got it, I want it, I got it
I want it, I got it, I want it, I got it
You like my hair? Gee, thanks, just bought it
I see it, I like it, I want it, I got it (Yep)

Wearing a ring, but ain't gon' be no ""Mrs.""
Bought matching diamonds for six of my bitches
I'd rather spoil all my friends with my riches
Think retail therapy my new addiction
Whoever said money can't solve your problems
Must not have had enough money to solve 'em
They say, ""Which one?"" I say, ""Nah, I want all of 'em""
Happiness is the same price as red-bottoms


My smile is beamin' (Yeah), my skin is gleamin' (Is gleamin')
The way it shine, I know you've seen it (You've seen it)
I bought a crib just for (Just for) the closet (Closet)
Both his and hers, I want it, I got it, yeah


I want it, I got it, I want it, I got it
I want it, I got it, I want it, I got it (Baby)
You like my hair? Gee, thanks, just bought it (Oh yeah)
I see it, I like it, I want it, I got it (Yep)


Yeah, my receipts be lookin' like phone numbers
If it ain't money, then wrong number
Black card is my business card
The way it be settin' the tone for me
I don't mean to brag, but I be like, ""Put it in the bag,"" yeah
When you see them racks, they stacked up like my ass, yeah
Shoot, go from the store to the booth
Make it all back in one loop, gimme the loot
Never mind, I got the juice
Nothing but net when we shoot
Look at my neck, look at my jet
Ain't got enough money to pay me respect
Ain't no budget when I'm on the set
If I like it, then that's what I get, yeah

I want it, I got it, I want it, I got it (Oh yeah)
I want it, I got it, I want it, I got it (Oh yeah, yeah)
You like my hair? Gee, thanks, just bought it
I see it, I like it, I want it, I got it (I see, yep)",4067762
137555,2889012,Someone You Loved,pop,Lewis Capaldi,2018,3289557,{},"
I'm going under, and this time, I fear there's no one to save me
This all or nothing really got a way of driving me crazy
I need somebody to hear,  somebody to know
Somebody to have, somebody to hold
It's easy to say, but it's never the same
I guess I kinda liked the way you numbed all the pain


Now, the day bleeds into nightfall
And you're not here to get me through it all
I let my guard down and then you pulled the rug
I was getting kinda used to being someone you loved


I'm going under, and this time, I fear there's no one to turn to
This all or nothing way of loving got me sleeping without you
Now, I need somebody to know, somebody to hear
Somebody to have, just to know how it feels
It's easy to say, but it's never the same
I guess I kinda like the way you help me escape

Now, the day bleeds into nightfall
And you're not here to get me through it all
I let my guard down and then you pulled the rug
I was getting kinda used to being someone you loved


And I tend to close my eyes when it hurts sometimes
I fall into your arms
I'll be safe in your sound till I come back around


For now, the day bleeds into nightfall
And you're not here to get me through it all
I let my guard down and then you pulled the rug
I was getting kinda used to being someone you loved
But now the day bleeds into nightfall
And you're not here to get me through it all
I let my guard down and then you pulled the rug
I was getting kinda used to being someone you loved
I let my guard down and then you pulled the rug
I was getting kinda used to being someone you loved",4076367
137793,2896329,JENNIE - SOLO Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,2018,1212180,{},"
Cheonjinnanman cheongsungalyeon
Saechimhan cheok ijen jichyeo na
Gwichanha
Maeil mwo hae eodiya babeun jal ja
Baby, jagi yeobo bogo sipeo
Da bujireopseo


You got me like
(Oh-oh-oh) Igeon amu gamdong eopsneun love story
(Oh-oh-oh) Eotteon seollemdo eotteon uimido
(Oh-oh-oh) Negen mianhajiman I'm not sorry
(Oh-oh-oh) Oneulbuteo nan nan nan


Bichi naneun solo
Bichi naneun solo
I'm goin' solo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo
I'm goin' solo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo

Used to be your girl
Now I'm used to being the GOAT
You're sittin' on your feelings
I'm sittin' on my throne
I ain't got no time for the troubles in your eyes
This time I'm only lookin' at me, myself and I
(I'm goin' solo) I'ma do it on my own now
Now that you're alone, got you lookin' for a clone now
(So low) That's how I'm gettin' down
Destined for this and the crown


Sing it loud like
(Oh, oh, oh) Igeon amu gamdong eopsneun love story
(Oh, oh, oh) Eotteon seollemdo eotteon uimido (Ho-oh)
(Oh, oh, oh) Negen mianhajiman I'm not sorry
(Oh, oh, oh) Oneulbuteo nan nan nan


Bichi naneun solo
Bichi naneun solo
I'm goin' solo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo
I'm goin' solo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo


Mannam seollem gamdong dwien
Ibyeol nunmul huhoe geurium
Holloin ge joha nan nadawoya hanikka
Jayuroun baramcheoreom
Gureum wie byeoldeulcheoreom
Meolli gago sipeo balgge bichnago sipeo

Now I'm goin' slow-mo
Bichi naneun solo
I'm goin' solo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo
I'm goin' solo-lo-lo-lo-lo-lo",4085805
137868,2897633,Act Up,rap,City Girls,2018,1229811,{},"
(Earl on the beat)


Real ass bitch, give a fuck 'bout a nigga
Big Birkin bag, hold five, six figures
Stripes on my ass so he call this pussy Tigger
Fuckin' on a scammin' ass, rich ass nigga
Same group of bitches, ain't no adding to the picture
Drop a couple racks, watch this ass get bigger
Drinkin' on liquor, and I'm lookin' at your nigga
If his money right, he can eat it like a Snicker
I ain't got time for you fake-ass hoes
Talkin' all loud in them fake-ass clothes
Fake ass shoes match that fake-ass gold
I'm the realest bitch ever to you snake-ass hoes


Act up, you can get snatched up
Act up, you can get snatched up
Act up, you can get snatched up
Dirty ass nails, baby girl, you need to back up

It's Yung Miami, and I came to run my sack up (Yup)
Tired-ass hoes on my page tryna track us (Ha)
Brand new chain, City Girls goin' platinum (Facts)
I keep a baby Glock, I ain't fightin' with no random, period (Period)
You bitches weak, is you serious? (Haha)
I let him taste the pussy, now he actin' all delirious (Ow)
Did the dash in the Rover like it's Fast and Furious
She see my number in his phone, now you actin' curious (Bitch)
He gon' buy me Gucci if I ask for it (Yup)
He a classy nigga rockin' Tom Ford (Classy)
I bet your lil' sister wanna look like me (Lil' bitch)
I bet your lil' brother wanna fuck on me
Hood bitch, good pussy, I ain't average, um
He can't come around without that cabbage, um (Nah)
Pop a pussy bitch quick, like a bubblegum
I ain't never worry, I just deal with it for fun


Act up, you can get snatched up
Act up, you can get snatched up
Act up, you can get snatched up
Dirty ass nails, baby girl, you need to back up


JT on the track, and you know I'm 'bout my paper
Pussy sweet, pussy tight, so he called it Lifesaver
If your ass a broke nigga, hell nah, I can't date ya
If your ass a rich nigga, I'ma fuck ya 'til you ain't one
If that nigga a scammer, I'm turnin' to a dancer (Yup)
I make it clap like he got the right answer
Sit on it with manners, get it harder than a hammer
He wanna freak, pussy pink, breast cancer
Oh, you like big butts, well I like big bucks
I don't care about your chain, nigga, or your big truck (Nah)
Yeah, I know you gettin' it, but is you spendin' it?
Give a fuck what a nigga got if he ain't givin' it
Ba-badass bitch, bad attitude (Yeah)
Nails done, hair done, ass too (Ow)
Your baby daddy fuckin' me and suckin' me
He don't answer you, bitch, that's because of me (Period)

Act up, you can get snatched up
Act up, you can get snatched up
Act up, you can get snatched up
Dirty ass nails, baby girl, you need to back up",4087309
138384,2914091,Baller los,rap,MERO,2018,1011758,{},"


Es wird Zeit (Baller' lo-lo-lo-lo-los)
Meine Mermis (Aufm Scho-Scho-Scho-Scho-Schoß)
QDH (Wird bald groß, groß, groß)
Mero, ey, ey, ey (Mermi-Flow)


Baller' meine Packs, die Texte für die Neider (Ja)
Jacke mit Pelz, sie glänzt, vom Designer (Ja)
Wieder ma' der Beste, Beste, bin geiler (Ja)
Digga, ich bang', du denkst, es war einfach (Hah, hah)
Kommen alle Weiber, wie 'ne Leiter geh' ich hoch, aber
Mermi-Flow war auch Fußballer
Los, baller! Wo sind deine Jungs, wo?
Komme nur mit Volo Sechs-Zwo (Brrra)
Kicke die Reime und rippe die Scheine (Ja)
Geh ma' du lieber zur Seite (Wouh)
Digga, ich komme alleine
Und halte dich wie Kelesh an einer Leine
Du Pisser, du Pisser, du redest zu viel
Ich esse dich auf, Digga, bon appétit
Mein Vorname G, Mermi-Speed, quatre-deux-huit
Meine City, ya habib, also geh weg (Pah-pah-pah-pah, wouh)

Auf dem Weg nach oben, will die Million (Skrrt, skrrt)
Geh zur Seite, Digga, ich will alles hol'n (Wouh)
Für dich ist Mero seine Liga viel zu hoch (Pah)
Und bald bin ich in den Charts, QDH (QDH, baller' los, ah-ah, brrra)


Baller' lo-lo-lo-lo-los
'ne Wumme aufm Scho-Scho-Scho-Scho-Schoß
Und mein Name wird bald groß, groß, groß
Bruder, Rüsselsheim, Schüsse fall'n wie gewohnt (Brra)


Heh, ja, Mann!
Ich hab's euch gesagt, Aller
Ich hab' schon alles nur durch Handyvideos gefickt, Mann!
Ihr habt lang genug gewartet, aber jetzt bin ich da
Und ich werd' alles auseinandernehm'n! (Baller' lo-lo-lo-lo-los)
Heh, ihr habt grad ein'n original Mermi-Flow gehört (Aufm Scho-Scho-Scho-Scho-Schoß)
Aber jetzt wird's krasser! (Wird bald groß, groß, groß)
Jetzt kriegt ihr den krassesten Part, Mann!
Gökhan Abi, baller los, QDH, wouh!


Bam, bam, wie 'ne Pumpgun bin ich dran, Mann
Asoziale Flows von einem Aslan (QDH)
Bitte lass mal deine Gangsterfilme
Weil ich dich nur am lästern finde, ey (Pah, pah, pah, pah)
QDH, Motherfuck, bana bak, kriegst Uppercuts
Komme mit den Bratans aus Lazarat (Pah, pah, pah, pah)
Baller' wieder unnormale Flows, deine Hoes gucken zu
Weil der Mero Birra fickt wieder Shows
Ich zeig' (Brra) dir die Gegend, weil
Tijara-Para sind Regeln hier in meiner Stadt (Wouh, wouh)
Ya hero ya mero, will alles
Denn alles ist Para und Para macht satt (Pah-pah, pah-pah, pah-pah)
Enes schießt auf Enemys und jeder sieht
Wer Welle schiebt, fällt immer tief
Meine Schelle zieht, ja, das kennen sie (Brra, wouh)

Auf dem Weg nach oben, will die Million (Skrrt, skrrt)
Geh zur Seite, Digga, ich will alles hol'n (Wouh)
Für dich ist Mero seine Liga viel zu hoch (Pah)
Und bald bin ich in den Charts, QDH (QDH, baller' los, ah-ah, brrra)


Baller' lo-lo-lo-lo-los
'ne Wumme aufm Scho-Scho-Scho-Scho-Schoß
Und mein Name wird bald groß, groß, groß
Bruder, Rüsselsheim, Schüsse fall'n wie gewohnt (Brrra)


La-la-la-la-lau
La-la-la-la-la-la-lau
La-la-la-la-lau
QDH, ja, ja, ja, ja, ja


Es wird Zeit (Baller' lo-lo-lo-lo-los)
Meine Mermis (Aufm Scho-Scho-Scho-Scho-Schoß)
QDH (Wird bald groß, groß, groß)
(Ja-ja-ja, ja-ja-ja)",4108052
138541,2919867,​in my head,pop,Ariana Grande,2019,1237999,{},"
Here's the thing: you're in love with a version of a person that you've created in your head, that you are trying to but cannot fix. Uh, the only person you can fix is yourself. I love you, this has gone on way too long. Enough is enough. I'm two blocks away, I'm coming over.


Painted a picture, I thought I knew you well
I got a habit of seeing what isn't there
Caught in the moment, tangled up in your sheets
When you broke my heart, I said you only wanted half of me


My imagination's too creative
They see demon, I see angel, angel (Angel), angel
Without the halo, wingless angel


Falling, falling, but I never thought you'd leave me
Falling, falling, needed something to believe in, oh
I thought you were the one
But it was all in my head
It was all in my head (Skrrt, skrrt)

Yeah, look at you (You), boy, I invented you
Your Gucci tennis shoes, runnin' from your issues
Cardio good for the heart (For the heart)
I figured we could work it out, hmm


Painted a picture; I thought I drew you well
I had a vision, seeing what isn't there
Caught in the moment, tangled up in your sheets
When you broke my heart, said you only wanted half of me


My imagination's too creative
They see Cain and I see Abel (Abel), Abel (Abel), Abel
I know you're able, willin' and able


Falling, falling, boy, I thought that you would need me
Falling, falling, needed something to believe in, oh
I thought you were the one
But it was all in my head
It was all in my head (Skrrt, skrrt)


Yeah, look at you (You), boy, I invented you
Your Gucci tennis shoes, runnin' from your issues
Cardio good for the heart (For the heart)
I figured we could work it out, hmm

Wanted you to grow, but, boy, you wasn't budding
Everything you are made you everything you aren't
I saw your potential without seein' credentials
Maybe that's the issue (Damn, damn)
Said maybe that's the issue, ah
Can't hold that shit against you, ah
Guess I did it to myself, yeah
Thought you were somebody else, you


Thought you were somebody else, you (You)
Thought you were somebody else, you",4114857
138696,2925493,Love Songs,rb,Kaash Paige,2018,1118528,{},"
I miss my cocoa butter kisses, hope you smile when you listen
Ain't no competition, just competin' for attention
And you like, ""I'm not on no games""
Well, baby, I been peepin', and you ain't been the same
Like, who been on your mind? Who got your time?
Who you been vibin' with and why I can't make you mine?
You used to be texting me, checking me, calling me your slime
And now you treat me like my worth less than a dime


And if we paint a perfect picture, we can make it last forever
And you the only one I want to wear my orange sweater
I told you I am down for the worse or the better
But I keep sticking to you 'cause them four stupid letters
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)


You got me singing love songs
Oh, this the type of song you tip on four fours and pour up song
Yeah, that make you fall in love song
That ""Hey, bighead, what you on?"" Make you hit me up song
Double cupped, but bae, I'm leaning on you
You been playing games, I'm tryna make you my boo
I don't duck no action, you bust one and I bust two
Pills of satisfaction, I take the red, you pop the blue

And if we paint a perfect picture, we can make it last forever
And you the only one I want to wear my orange sweater
I told you I am down for the worse or the better
But I keep sticking to you 'cause them four stupid letters
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)
You got me singing love songs (Love songs, love songs)",4121821
138794,2928605,Going Bad,rap,Meek Mill,2018,1655285,{Drake},"
Yeah
(Wheezy outta here)
Jeez, jeez


Back home, smokin' legal (Legal)
I got more slaps than The Beatles (Beatles)
Foreign shit runnin' on diesel, dawg
Playin' with my name, that shit is lethal, dawg (Who you say you was?)
Don Corleone
Trust me, at the top it isn't lonely (Strapped)
Everybody actin' like they know me, dawg
Don't just say you're down, you gotta show me (What you gotta do?)
Bring the clip back empty (It's empty)
You asked to see the boss, so they sent me, dawg (Sent me, dawg)
I just broke her off with a 10-piece, dawg (10-piece, dawg)
That ain't nothin', I'm just bein' friendly, dawg


It's just a lil' 10-piece for her
Just to blow it in the mall, doesn't mean that we're involved
I just... what? I just... uh, put a Richard on the card
I ain't grow up playin' ball, but I'll show you how the fuck you gotta do it
If you really wanna ball 'til you fall
When your back against the wall
And a bunch of niggas need you to go away
Still goin' bad on 'em anyway
Saw you last night, but did it broad day

Yeah, lot of Murakami in the hallway (What?)
Got a sticky and I keep it at my dawg's place
Girl, I left your love at Magic, now it's all shade
Still goin' bad on you anyway


Woah, woah, ooh, woah
Woah, woah, ah


I could fit like 80 racks in my Amiris (80 racks)
Me and Drizzy back-to-back, it's gettin' scary (Back-to-back)
If you fuckin' with my opps, just don't come near me (Get outta my way)
Put some bands all on your head like Jason Terry (Brrt, brrt, ooh)
Richard Mille cost a Lambo (That's a Lambo)
Known to keep the baddest bitches on commando (Salute)
Every time I'm in my trap, I move like Rambo (Extended)
Ain't a neighborhood in Philly that I can't go (That's a Fendi)
For real
She said, ""Oh, you rich rich?"" (""You rich rich"")
Bitch, I graduated, call me ""Big Fish"" (Marlin)
I got Lori Harvey on my wish list (That's Lori)
That's the only thing I want for Christmas (True story, uh)
I've been had my way out here, yeah, know that's facts (Facts)
You ain't livin' that shit you say, yeah, we know that's cap (That's cap)
You ain't got to ask me when you see me, know I'm strapped (Brrt)
DC, OVO, we back again, we goin' plat' (Ooh, ooh)

It's just a lil' 10-piece for her
Just to blow it in the mall, doesn't mean that we're involved
I just... what? I just... uh, put a Richard on the card
I ain't grow up playin' ball, but I'll show you how the fuck you gotta do it
If you really wanna ball 'til you fall
When your back against the wall
And a bunch of niggas need you to go away
Still goin' bad on 'em anyway
Saw you last night, but did it broad day


Wheezy outta here",4125712
138986,2934931,Old Town Road,rap,Lil Nas X,2018,2434783,{},"
Yeah, I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
(Kio, Kio)


I got the horses in the back
Horse tack is attached
Hat is matte black
Got the boots that's black to match
Ridin' on a horse, ha
You can whip your Porsche
I been in the valley
You ain't been up off that porch, now


Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'
Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'

Ridin' on a tractor
Lean all in my bladder
Cheated on my baby
You can go and ask her
My life is a movie
Bull ridin' and boobies
Cowboy hat from Gucci
Wrangler on my booty


Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'
Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'


Yeah, I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
I got the hor-",4133841
139553,2952206,​a lot,rap,21 Savage,2018,2350402,"{""J. Cole""}","
I love you
Turn my headphone down a little bit, yeah
For so many reasons
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (I do), yeah, yeah yeah yeah
Yeah, yeah, ah, ah, whoa, whoa, whoa, yeah


How much money you got? (Straight up)
How much money you got? (Straight up)
How much money you got? (Straight up)
How much money you got? (A lot)


How much money you got? (A lot)
How many problems you got? (A lot)
How many people done doubted you? (A lot)
Left you out to rot? (A lot)
How many pray that you flop? (A lot)
How many lawyers you got? (A lot)
How many times you got shot? (A lot)
How many niggas you shot? (A lot)
How many times did you ride? (A lot)
How many niggas done died? (A lot)
How many times did you cheat? (A lot)
How many times did you lie? (A lot)
How many times did she leave? (A lot)
How many times did she cry? (A lot)
How many chances she done gave you fuckin around with these thots? (A lot)

Every day that I'm alive, I'ma ride with the stick
I'd rather be broke in jail than be dead and rich
Told my brothers take my breath if I turn to a snitch
But I'm 21 4L, ain't no way I'ma switch


Break it down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down


Penitentiary chances just to make a couple bucks
My heart so cold I could put it in my cup
Gang vs. the world, me and my dawg, it was us
Then you went and wrote a statement, and that really fucked me up
My brother lost his life and it turned me to a beast
My brother got life and it turned me to the streets
I been through the storm and it turned me to a G
But the other side was sunny, I get paid to rap on beats


How much money you got? (A lot)
How many problems you got? (A lot)
How many people done doubted you? (A lot)
Left you out to rot? (A lot)
How many pray that you flop? (A lot)
How many lawyers you got? (A lot)
How many times you got shot? (A lot)
How many niggas you shot? (A lot)
How many times did you ride? (A lot)
How many niggas done died? (A lot)
How many times did you cheat? (A lot)
How many times did you lie? (A lot)
How many times did she leave? (A lot)
How many times did she cry? (A lot)
How many chances she done gave you?
Fuck around with these thots (A lot)

Break it on down, I break it on down
I break it on down, I break it on down
Yeah, I just came from the A
I drove back home, six-hour drive, six-and-a-half
Before I left I stopped by to see my nigga 21 in the studio
He had two of his kids with him right in the studio, that's when I knew
You a stand up nigga, I love seein' shit like that


Question
How many faking they streams? (A lot)
Getting they plays from machines? (A lot)
I can see behind the smoke and mirrors
Niggas ain't really big as they seem (Hmm)
I never say anything (Nah), everybody got they thing (True)
Some niggas make millions, other niggas make memes (Hmm)
I'm on a money routine
I don't want smoke, I want cream
I don't want no more comparisons
This is a marathon and I'm aware
I been playing it back from a lack of promotions
I never was one for the bragging and boasting
I guess I was hoping the music would speak for itself, but the people want everything else
Okay, no problem, I'll show up on everyone album
You know what the outcome will be
I'm batting a thousand
It's got to the point that these rappers don't even like rappin' with me
Fuck it 'cause my nigga 21 Savage just hit me
And told me he saved me a spot on a new record he got
He call it ""a lot,"" I open my book and I jot
Pray for Tekashi, they want him to rot
I picture him inside a cell on a cot
'Flectin' on how he made it to the top
Wondering if it was worth it or not
I pray for Markelle 'cause they fucked up his shot
Just want you to know that you got it, my nigga
Though I never met you, I know that you special
And that the Lord blessed you, don't doubt it, my nigga
Dennis Smith, Jr., stay solid, my nigga
I'm on a tangent, not how I planned it
I had some fans that hopped and abandoned ship
When they thought that I wasn't gone pan out, I got a plan
They say that success is the greatest revenge, tell all your friends
Cole on a mission, cementin' the spot as the greatest that did it
Before it all ends, nigga

How much money you got? (A lot)
How many problems you got? (A lot)
How many people done doubted you? (A lot)
Left you out to rot? (A lot)
How many pray that you flop? (A lot)
How many lawyers you got? (A lot)
How many times you got shot? (A lot)
How many niggas you shot? (A lot)
How many times did you ride? (A lot)
How many niggas done died? (A lot)
How many times did you cheat? (A lot)
How many times did you lie? (A lot)
How many times did she leave? (A lot)
How many times did she cry? (A lot)
How many chances she done gave you?
Fuck around with these thots (A lot)


Break it on down, I break it on down
I break it on down, I break it on down
I break it down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down
I break it on down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down
I break it down, I break it down, I br-",4155494
139668,2957169,松原みき Miki Matsubara - 真夜中のドア Mayonaka No Door/Stay With Me Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,1979,1824516,{},"


To you
Yes, my love to you
Yes, my love to you, you
To you


Watashi wa watashi, anata wa anata to
Yuube itteta sonna ki mo suru wa
Gurei no jaketto ni
Mioboe ga aru kouhii no shimi (Ooh)
Aikawarazu na no ne
Shou uindou ni futari utsureba (Ooh)


Stay with me
Mayonaka no doa o tataki
Kaeranaide to naita (Ooh)
Ano kisetsu ga ima me no mae
Stay with me
Kuchiguse wo ii nagara
Futari no toki wo daite (Ooh)
Mada wasurezu
Daiji ni shite ita

Koi to ai to wa chigau monoda yo to
Yuube iwareta sonna ki mo suru wa
Nidome no fuyu ga kite
Hanarete itta anata no kokoro (Ooh)
Furi kaereba itsumo
Soko ni anata wo kanjite ita no (Ooh)


Stay with me
Mayonaka no doa o tataki
Kokoro ni ana ga aita (Ooh)
Ano kisetsu ga ima me no mae
Stay with me
Sabishisa magirawashite
Oita rekodo no hari (Ooh)
Onaji merodi kurikaeshite ita




Stay with me
Mayonaka no doa o tataki
Kaeranaide to naita (Ooh)
Ano kisetsu ga ima me no mae
Stay with me
Kuchiguse wo ii nagara
Futari no toki wo daite (Ooh)
Mada wasurezu atatameteta

Stay with me
Mayonaka no doa o tataki
Kaeranaide to naita (Ooh)
Ano kisetsu ga ima me no mae
Stay with me
Kuchiguse wo ii nagara
Futari no toki wo daite (Ooh)
Mada wasurezu atatameteta


Stay with me
Mayonaka no doa o tataki
Kaeranaide to naita (Ooh)
Ano kisetsu ga ima me no mae
Stay with me

(Ooh, mada wasurezu atatameteta)",4161674
139852,2964695,​i turned a bad copypasta into a bad rap,rap,Senzawa,2018,1641225,{},"
Okay, I know this is a really bad idea but
I'm already here so
Here we fuckin' go
Rawr


x3 nuzzles, pounces on you, uwu you so warm (Ooh)
Couldn't help but notice your bulge from across the floor
Nuzzles your necky wecky-tilde murr-tilde, hehe
Unzips your baggy ass pants, oof baby you so musky
Take me home, pet me, and make me yours and don't forget to stuff me
See me wag my widdle baby tail all for your bulgy-wulgy
Kissies and lickies your neck (Mmh)
I hope daddy likies
Nuzzles and wuzzles your chest (Yuh)
I be (Yeah) gettin' thirsty


Hey, I got a little itch, you think you can help me?
Only seven inches long, uwu, please adopt me
Paws on your bulge as I lick my lips (UwU, punish me please)
'Bout to hit 'em with this furry shit (He don't see it comin')",4171388
139903,2965808,Way Back Home Sam Feldt Edit,pop,SHAUN (),2018,1617234,"{""Conor Maynard"",""SHAUN (숀)""}","
Remember when I told you
""No matter where I go
I'll never leave your side
You will never be alone""
Even when we go through changes
Even when we're old
Remember that I told you
I'll find my way back home


I could never let you go
Couldn't run away if I tried
'Cause even when I'm all alone
You still got a hold on my mind
And I'll always let you know
That I'm always gonna hold on


And I told you right from the start
You just say the word and I'll go
No, it doesn't matter how far
'Cause your love is all that I know
Baby you just stay where you are
And you know I won't be too long
Hold on
Hold on

Remember when I told you
""No matter where I go
I'll never leave your side
You will never be alone""
Even when we go through changes
Even when we're old
Remember that I told you
I'll find my way back home


조용히 잠든 방을 열어 기억을 꺼내 들어
부서진 시간 위에서 선명히 너는 떠올라
길 잃은 마음속에 널 가둔 채 살아
그만 그만


멈춘 시간 속 잠든 너를 찾아가
아무리 막아도 결국 너의 곁인 걸
길고 긴 여행을 끝내 이젠 돌아가
너라는 집으로 지금 다시 way back home


세상을 뒤집어 찾으려 해
오직 너로 완결된 이야기를
No, I won't ever lose
As long as you're there
빛이 다 꺼진 여기 나를 안아줘

눈을 감으면 소리 없이 밀려와
이 마음 그 위로 넌 또 한 겹 쌓여가
Even when we go through changes
Even when we're old
Remember that I told you
I'll find my way back home",4172920
140061,2971186,Wow.,rap,Post Malone,2018,1497418,{},"
Said she tired of little money, need a big boy
Pull up 20 inch blades like I'm Lil' Troy
Now it's everybody flockin', need a decoy
Shawty mixing up the vodka with the LaCroix, yeah
G-Wagen, G-Wagen, G-Wagen, G-Wagen
All the housewives pullin' up (Up, up)
I got a lot of toys, 720S bumpin' Fall Out Boy
You was talkin' shit in the beginning (Mm-mm)
Back when I was feelin' more forgivin' (More forgivin')
I know it piss you off to see me winnin' (See me winnin')
See the igloo in my mouth when I be grinnin' (I be grinnin'), yeah


Hunnid bands in my pocket, it's on me
Hunnid deep when I roll like the army
Get more bottles, these bottles are lonely
It's a moment when I show up, got 'em sayin', ""Wow"" (Wow, wow)
Hunnid bands in my pocket, it's on me (On me)
Yeah, your grandmama probably know me (Know me)
Get more bottles, these bottles are lonely
It's a moment when I show up, got 'em sayin', ""Wow"" (Wow, wow)

Everywhere I go (Hey)
Catch me on the block like I'm Mutombo (Wow)
750 Lambo in the Utah snow (Skrrt)
Trunk in the front like that shit Dumbo, yeah
Cut the roof off like a nip-tuck
Pull up to the house with some big butts
Turn the kitchen counter to a strip-club (Yeah, wow)
Me and Dre came for the...
When I got guap, all of y'all just appeared (Wow)
Before I dropped Stoney, none of y'all really cared (Cared)
Now they always say, ""Congratulations,"" to the kid (Kid)
And this is not a 40, but I'm pourin' out this shit (Yeah)
Used to have a lot, but I got more now (Yup)
Made another hit 'cause I got bored now (Yup)
Always goin' for it, never punt fourth down
Last call, Hail Mary, Prescott touchdown, ayy


Hunnid bands in my pocket, it's on me (On me)
Hunnid deep when I roll like the army (Hey)
Get more bottles, these bottles are lonely
It's a moment when I show up, got 'em sayin', ""Wow"" (Wow, wow)
Hunnid bands in my pocket, it's on me (Yeah, yeah)
Yeah, your grandmama probably know me (Yeah, yeah)
Get more bottles, these bottles are lonely
It's a moment when I show up, got 'em sayin', ""Wow""

Got 'em sayin', ""Wow""
Ayy, ayy, wow
Sayin', ""Wow""
Wow
Wow",4179509
140231,2976928,​all the good girls go to hell,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1230022,{},"
My Lucifer is lonely


Standing there, killing time
Can't commit to anything but a crime
Peter's on vacation, an open invitation
Animals, evidence
Pearly Gates look more like a picket fence
Once you get inside 'em
Got friends but can't invite them


Hills burn in California
My turn to ignore ya
Don't say I didn't warn ya


All the good girls go to Hell
'Cause even God herself has enemies
And once the water starts to rise
And Heaven's out of sight
She'll want the Devil on her team

My Lucifer is lonely


Look at you needing me
You know I'm not your friend without some greenery
Walk in wearin' fetters
Peter should know better
Your cover up is caving in
Man is such a fool, why are we saving him?
Poisoning themselves now
Begging for our help, wow


Hills burn in California
My turn to ignore ya
Don't say I didn't warn ya


All the good girls go to Hell (All the good girls go to Hell)
'Cause even God herself (God herself) has enemies
And once the water starts to rise (Water starts to rise)
And Heaven's out of sight
She'll want the Devil on her team


My Lucifer is lonely
There's nothing left to save now
My god is gonna owe me
There's nothing left to save now

Haha!
I cannot do the snowflake",4186971
140233,2976939,​i love you,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1874919,{},"
It's not true
Tell me I've been lied to
Crying isn't like you, ooh
What the hell did I do?
Never been the type to
Let someone see right through, ooh


Maybe won't you take it back?
Say you were tryna make me laugh
And nothing has to change today
You didn't mean to say ""I love you""
I love you and I don't want to, ooh


Up all night on another red-eye
I wish we never learned to fly
Maybe we should just try
To tell ourselves a good lie
Didn't mean to make you cry

Maybe won't you take it back?
Say you were tryna make me laugh
And nothing has to change today
You didn't mean to say ""I love you""
I love you and I don't want to, ooh


The smile that you gave me
Even when you felt like dying


We fall apart as it gets dark
I'm in your arms in Central Park
There's nothing you could do or say
I can't escape the way I love you
I don't want to, but I love you, ooh
Ooh, ooh
Ooh, ooh",4186978
140954,3006599,​break up with your girlfriend im bored,pop,Ariana Grande,2019,2185400,{},"
You got me some type of way (Hmm)
Ain't used to feelin' this way (Mmm-mmm)
I do not know what to say (Yeah, yeah)
But I know I shouldn't think about it
Took one fuckin' look at your face (Hmm)
Now I wanna know how you taste (Mmm-mmm)
Usually don't give it away (Yeah, yeah)
But you know I'm out here thinkin' 'bout it


Then I realize she's right there
And I'm at home like, ""Damn, this ain't fair""


Break up with your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
Yeah, yeah, 'cause I'm bored
You could hit it in the mornin' (Mornin')
Yeah, yeah, like it's yours
I know it ain't right
But I don't care (Care)
Break up with your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
Yeah, yeah, 'cause I'm bored

This shit always happen to me (Yeah)
Why can't we just play for keeps? (Mmm-mmm)
Practically on my knees (Yeah, yeah)
But I know I shouldn't think about it
You know what you're doin' to me
You're singin' my songs in the streets, yeah, yeah
Actin' all innocent, please
When I know you out here thinkin' 'bout it


Then you realize she's right there (Yeah)
And you're at home like, ""Damn, she can't compare""


Break up with your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
Yeah, yeah, 'cause I'm bored
You could hit it in the mornin' (In the mornin')
Yeah, yeah, like it's yours
I know it ain't right
But I don't care (I don't care, yee)
Break up with your girlfriend (With your girlfriend)
Yeah, yeah, 'cause I'm bored


With your girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend
With your girlfriend
With your girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend

You could say I'm hatin' if you want to
But I only hate on her 'cause I want you
Say I'm trippin' if you feel like
But you without me ain't right (Ain't right)
You could call me crazy 'cause I want you
And I never even ever fuckin' met you
Say I'm trippin' and it ain't right
But you without me ain't nice (Ain't nice, yeah)


Break up with your girlfriend (With your girlfriend)
Yeah, yeah, 'cause I'm bored
You could hit it in the mornin' (Hit in the mornin', yeah, yeah, yeah)
Yeah, yeah, like it's yours
I know it ain't right
But I don't care (Care, yeah)
Break up with your girlfriend (With your girlfriend)
Yeah, yeah, 'cause I'm bored


With your girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend, baby, girlfriend
With your girlfriend
With your girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend, girlfriend
With your girlfriend",4226433
141222,3015427,Costa Rica,rap,"Dreamville, Bas & JID",2019,1097596,"{Buddy,""Reese LAFLARE"",Mez,Jace,""Ski Mask the Slump God"",Smokepurpp,""Guapdad 4000"",""Dreamville / Bas & JID""}","
(Pyrex Whippa)
(Pyrex)


I got big dreams so my watch got a big face (Big dreams)
Girls gettin' mixy like a motherfuckin' mixtape (I'm tellin' ya)
Smellin' like money and I'm lookin' like sex (Big racks)
I'm outside for real with the slimes and the slatts (Slatt)
Nigga ride wave, then the nigga get taxed (Hey)
Fendi snowpants and I fill 'em up with racks
They all ball cap, and this all facts (Big facts)
No, I don't relax and I don't lack


Demons, they follow me deep in the dark
Niggas got problems with being a boss
We ain't been home but we hear all the talkin'
Hit 'em with hollows and clean 'em with salt
Salt in the wound and my heart in the cooler
Frozen like I gave my heart to my jeweler
Told him to make a new piece out of this
Ever since, I just can't give no fuck 'bout no bitch (It's a check)

Baby (Yeah), had to bustdown on the AP (AP), yeah
Baby (Yeah), ain't no rich styles on you lately (Rich), yeah
I got fans in Costa Rica (Fans), I got bands in Costa Rica (Big bands)
I got fans in Costa Rica (Big fans), I got bands in Costa Rica


I got the Mike Jack' nose, just before the vitiligo
Norman Bates with the eights, I'ma go psycho
Laundromat with a temper, this a vicious cycle
Feel like Rihanna, bitches go wherever I go
Go against the grain like I'm battlin' the silo
I'm going out west like I'm motherfuckin' Fievel
LeBron in the finals, motherfuckin' five-oh
Nigga bettin' under 5'4"", hell if I know


Niggas got me tight like Arthur's fist and shit
Like I'm not an arsonist and shit
Not a nigga that you wanna argue with
'Cause then you fucking with your future like Larsa Pippen, shit
Boy, I'm like a barber with this shit
You get out the chair, you get in the chair
The things in the mirror, the way they appear
You look to the rear, my niggas is near, my niggas revered
You fuckin' with Mez, you fuckin' with Heirs, nigga (It's a check)

Baby (Yeah), had to bustdown on the AP (AP), yeah
Baby (Yeah), ain't no rich styles on you lately (Rich), yeah
I got fans in Costa Rica (Fans), I got bands in Costa Rica (Big bands)
I got fans in Costa Rica (Big fans), I got bands in Costa Rica


I got balled up hundreds in my pocket (Hundreds)
Diamonds on me water like a faucet (Yeah, flash)
Got a lot of bands in Costa Rica
Lot of hoes in Costa Rica (Uh), got a passport in my pocket (Yeah)
And I flew with the stick, it's a rocket (Uh)
Forty-five on me, shit hot like a pocket (Doo-doo)
You ain't talkin' money, it's nonsense (Yeah)
Got your baby mama doing drugs in the moshpit


Top of the morning to anybody who thought it was beddy-bye
Jiddy, I'm like a Jedi
Mind tricks live inside of your head, I
Devilish, red eyes, never been on a redeye
Or shit, I be high, I forget
Shawty said I be wildin' and trippin' when I'm on a lick
Score a penny or twenty, I'm Dominique Wilkins and shit
Really I flew to Costa Rica with an AP
At the airport, this girl ask me, ""Hey, are you Swae Lee?""
Wow (It's a check)

Baby (Yeah), had to bustdown on the AP (AP), yeah
Baby (Yeah), ain't no rich styles on you lately (Rich), yeah
I got fans in Costa Rica (Fans), I got bands in Costa Rica (Big bands)
I got fans in Costa Rica (Big fans), I got bands in Costa Rica


Suffering succotash
She think it's all puddycat but, hell, I ain't even mad
I started sucking on her titty, put my thumb in her ass
She had a little one, it really wasn't nothin' to grab, I did it anyway
Nigga, I'm a bag
Comin' down the 91, flyin', doin' the dash
We goin' in today (Ayy)
And I been writing my ass off, Ernest Hemingway (Bitch)
I ain't got shit else to say


I got too much skills
I flow like the water, so surprised I did not grow gills
And I am your father like you was Luke Skywalker
And I conquer and let it burn like Usher's perm and kill confirmed
You look concerned, respect is earned, uh
You really be in it, B, gotta be kiddin' me, uh
You really be sickenin', I got the remedy, uh
I'm feelin' like Goku, bitch, I need your energy, uh
Um, okay, huh, goin' on a date with an AK, huh (Yup)
Ayy, okay, goin' on a date with an AK, ayy (It's a check)


Baby (Yeah), had to bustdown on the AP (AP), yeah
Baby (Yeah), ain't no rich styles on you lately (Rich), yeah
I got fans in Costa Rica (Fans), I got bands in Costa Rica (Big bands)
I got fans in Costa Rica (Big fans), I got bands in Costa Rica",4237691
141241,3016342,Shotta Flow,rap,NLE Choppa,2019,1349632,{},"
I wish everything I touch would turn to gold
NLE, you heard me?
Baby Mexico Choppa, man, Top Shotta
Baby Mexico Shotta, you heard me?
We finna talk our shit, you heard me?
YNR (Yeah)
Midas got a jugg, ayy (Yeah, yeah)


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I am a menace, keep me a rack just like tennis
I'm with the shit like I'm Dennis
I started this shit, I'ma finish
Niggas be hatin', tryna blemish my image
Who want the smoke? .223 came with the scope
Extended clip long as a rope
We wipe his nose, just like he had him a cold
I knew that boy was a ho
Pull up with the gang, you know that we bangin'
What is your set, nigga? What is you claimin'?
I am a beast, you cannot tame it
Don't point a finger, this shit can get dangerous
These niggas hatin', these niggas plottin'
Ooh, he got money, I'm runnin' his wallet
You say you a killer, lil' nigga, stop it
In a shootout, your gun was droppin'
You really a fraud, you cannot stomp on this yard
My niggas, they scammin', they swipin' them cards
I am so high that I'm talkin' to stars
I'm gone off them jiggas, I'm poppin' them bars
Don't mind my pimpin', bitch, don't sweat me
Chopper got a kick, call that shit Jet Li
Sauce Gang dripped up, what is your recipe?
Gon' get an F if a nigga try testin' me
Whole lotta money, whole lotta guala
Hit the party fifty deep, nothin' but my shottas
Nigga tried me so you know I had to pop him
So many bullets, it confused the doctor
Whole lotta racks, whole lotta stacks
Fuck a headshot, I'ma shoot him in the back
Three-point-five rolled up in the Cack'
We don't smoke reggie, this shit called gas
I'm sticked up like a blind man
I'm super hot like a frying pan
He say that he gon' take somethin' from me
Ayy, just know, he lyin', man
I'ma up from my hip then blow like a whistle
Your bitch suckin' dick like a Kool-Aid pickle
Two bullets in your chest, that's a nipple
And if a nigga run up, I'ma pop him like a pimple
Get rich or die tryin', I'm feelin' like 50
Brand new chopper got double-D titties
Nigga, don't play me, I don't get silly
Love all the beef like a Southwest Philly, yeah

Yeah, love all the beef like a Southwest Philly, yeah, ayy
Bet, love all the beef like a Southwest Philly


I might just OD, Percs killin' me slowly
Feelin' like I'm Kobe, can't nan' nigga hold me
If he wanna run up on me, shoot him like Ginobili
And I'm with the shit, lil' homie, yeah, like I'm Toby (Yeah)
And I'm with the shit, lil' homie, yeah, like I'm Toby, bitch (Yeah)


Finna ad-lib, keep all that (Like I'm Toby, yeah, yeah)
(Like a school shooter named Toby, yeah)
Keep all that, Tay, yeah (This shit straight drop, lil' nigga, no cut)
Ayy, Tay, keep all that, keep all that (Straight drop, lil' nigga, no cut)
Yeah, yeah
(Up from my hip, yeah)",4238781
141315,3018954,Under the Sun,rap,"Dreamville, J. Cole & Lute",2019,1118386,"{DaBaby,""Dreamville / J. Cole & Lute""}","
If you miss me
And you can't find
Me nowhere
I done seen it all, oh my God
Uh
I done seen it all, oh my God, I swear
Uh, uh


Nothing new under the sun, nobody fucking with son
I got a couple of sons, a couple of guns
A couple of niggas that bust up the party and fuck up the fun
She digging me and I'm cuffing her friend
She ig'-ing you while we fucking for fun
I got her suckin' her thumb, that's my lil' baby
She call me daddy like grandmama baby
If this Sunday dinner, my hand on her gravy
I been on the craziest wave, if I'm on the stage
An M is my minimum wage
This ain't no kennel, behave
Niggas is with all that barking, we send 'em a stray
So in a way we the dogcatchers
How many bullets your dawg catchin'?
Sawed-off, raw dog fashion
Hauled off, hope God catch him, damn

I woke up for some money, ayy, lil' bitch
Too many opps in here, tell me who you with, ayy


Potato over my gun
I move in silence 'cause niggas be clocking my funds
When they should keep eye on they bitch 'cause baby girl coming with son
Niggas be judging my moves, but please tell me, what have you done?
My cousin might air out the party for fun
Pistol grips get to squeezing
Wish a nigga would like Liam Neeson
I don't even need a reason, loyalty over treason
Bitch nigga, come and see me
Put some respect on my name
What side of my city I claim
I try to stay in my lane
Took my advance and put a Caprice on them thangs
I'm Beatties Ford 'til the wheels fall
Know some niggas probably pissed off
Who would thought I made it this far?
Gold Mouf, bitch, fuck 'em all


I woke up for some money, ayy, lil' bitch
Too many opps in here, tell me who you with

I just put diamonds on all of my teeth, now they probably think I ain't intelligent
In the homicide unit interrogation, asking questions, you know I ain't tell 'em shit
Bitches call me a jock, all-American
I'm at the top of my class with my lettermen
I remember back in college, bitches knocking on my dorm door
I ain't never let 'em in
Now you know that that's cap, know I hit a few
Ain't no job, I'm selling gas like I'm Jiffy Lube
I had a freak, used to fuck while her boyfriend in class
I hit her from the back from like 10 to 2
No back and forth with these rappers
They mention me, dissin' me
No talkin' back, I won't mention you
Watch, when I come put that iron on your ass and I dip
They gon' want me to snitch in my interviews
I'm on fire, bitch, I'm lit, but I'm really cool
Don't acknowledge the shrimps when they ridicule
They don't come out after dark, bitch, I swim with the sharks
You ain't got enough heart, get a bigger pool
Wanna fight but he bigger, I ain't really trippin'
Reach under my shirt, grab a bigger tool
I got a Glock with a dick, let's get physical
They gon' be hollerin' out, ""Rip,"" and they missin' you
They got me started, I might as well finish it (Talk your shit)
I'm from Charlotte, you know how these niggas do
Baby

I woke up for some money, ayy, lil' bitch
Too many opps in here, tell me who you with",4241938
141419,3023937,MIDDLE CHILD,rap,J. Cole,2019,2576822,{},"
You good, T-Minus?


Niggas been countin' me out
I'm countin' my bullets, I'm loadin' my clips
I'm writin' down names, I'm makin' a list
I'm checkin' it twice and I'm gettin' 'em hit
The real ones been dyin', the fake ones is lit
The game is off balance, I'm back on my shit
The Bentley is dirty, my sneakers is dirty
But that's how I like it, you all on my dick


I'm all in my bag, this hard as it get
I do not snort powder, I might take a sip
I might hit the blunt, but I'm liable to trip
I ain't poppin' no pill, but you do as you wish
I roll with some fiends, I love 'em to death
I got a few mil' but not all of them rich
What good is the bread if my niggas is broke?
What good is first class if my niggas can't sit?
That's my next mission, that's why I can't quit
Just like LeBron, get my niggas more chips
Just put the Rollie right back on my wrist
This watch came from Drizzy, he gave me a gift
Back when the rap game was prayin' I'd diss
They act like two legends cannot coexist
But I'd never beef with a nigga for nothin'
If I smoke a rapper, it's gon' be legit
It won't be for clout, it won't be for fame
It won't be 'cause my shit ain't sellin' the same
It won't be to sell you my latest lil' sneakers
It won't be 'cause some nigga slid in my lane
Everything grows, it's destined to change
I love you lil' niggas, I'm glad that you came
I hope that you scrape every dollar you can
I hope you know money won't erase the pain
To the OGs, I'm thankin' you now
Was watchin' you when you was pavin' the ground
I copied your cadence, I mirrored your style
I studied the greats, I'm the greatest right now
Fuck if you feel me, you ain't got a choice
I ain't do no promo, still made all that noise
This year gon' be different, I set my intentions
I promise to slap all that hate out your voice

Niggas been countin' me out
I'm countin' my bullets, I'm loadin' my clips
I'm writin' down names, I'm makin' a list
I'm checkin' it twice and I'm gettin' 'em hit
The real ones been dyin', the fake ones is lit
The game is off balance, I'm back on my shit
The Bentley is dirty, my sneakers is dirty
But that's how I like it, you all on my dick


I just poured somethin' in my cup
I've been wantin' somethin' I can feel
Promise I am never lettin' up
Money in your palm don't make you real
Foot is on they neck, I got 'em stuck
I'ma give 'em somethin' they can feel
If it ain't 'bout the squad, don't give a fuck
Pistol in your hand don't make you real


I'm dead in the middle of two generations
I'm little bro and big bro all at once
Just left the lab with young 21 Savage
I'm 'bout to go and meet Jigga for lunch
Had a long talk with the young nigga Kodak
Reminded me of young niggas from 'Ville
Straight out the projects, no fakin', just honest
I wish that he had more guidance, for real
Too many niggas in cycle of jail
Spending they birthdays inside of a cell
We coming from a long bloodline of trauma
We raised by our mamas, Lord, we gotta heal
We hurting our sisters, the babies as well
We killing our brothers, they poisoned the well
Distorted self-image, we set up to fail
I'ma make sure that the real gon' prevail, nigga

I just poured somethin' in my cup
I've been wantin' somethin' I can feel
Promise I am never lettin' up
Money in your palm don't make you real
Foot is on they neck, I got 'em stuck
I'ma give 'em somethin' they can feel
If it ain't 'bout the squad, don't give a fuck
Pistol in your hand don't make you real


Money in your palm don't make you real
Pistol in your hand don't make you real
Money in your palm don't make you real",4248426
141818,3039300,​bury a friend,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,2523816,{},"
Billie


What do you want from me? Why don't you run from me?
What are you wondering? What do you know?
Why aren't you scared of me? Why do you care for me?
When we all fall asleep, where do we go?


Come here
Say it, spit it out, what is it exactly
You're payin'? Is the amount cleanin' you out? Am I satisfactory?
Today, I'm thinkin' about the things that are deadly
The way I'm drinkin' you down
Like I wanna drown, like I wanna end me


Step on the glass, staple your tongue (Ahh)
Bury a friend, try to wake up (Ah-ahh)
Cannibal class, killing the son (Ahh)
Bury a friend, I wanna end me

I wanna end me
I wanna, I wanna, I wanna... end me
I wanna, I wanna, I wanna...


What do you want from me? Why don't you run from me?
What are you wondering? What do you know?
Why aren't you scared of me? Why do you care for me?
When we all fall asleep, where do we go?


Listen
Keep you in the dark, what had you expected?
Me to make you my art and make you a star
And get you connected?
I'll meet you in the park, I'll be calm and collected
But we knew right from the start that you'd fall apart
'Cause I'm too expensive
It's probably somethin' that shouldn't be said out loud
Honestly, I thought that I would be dead by now (Wow)
Calling security, keepin' my head held down
Bury the hatchet or bury a friend right now


The debt I owe, gotta sell my soul
'Cause I can't say no, no, I can't say no
Then my limbs all froze and my eyes won't close
And I can't say no, I can't say no
Careful

Step on the glass, staple your tongue (Ahh)
Bury a friend, try to wake up (Ah-ahh)
Cannibal class, killing the son (Ahh)
Bury a friend, I wanna end me


I wanna end me
I wanna, I wanna, I wanna... end me
I wanna, I wanna, I wanna...


What do you want from me? Why don't you run from me?
What are you wondering? What do you know?
Why aren't you scared of me? Why do you care for me?
When we all fall asleep, where do we go?",4266880
141919,3043519,​xanny,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1225388,{},"
What is it about them?
I must be missing something
They just keep doing nothing
Too intoxicated to be scared
Better off without them
They're nothing but unstable
Bring ashtrays to the table
And that's about the only thing they share


I'm in their secondhand smoke
Still just drinking canned Coke
I don't need a Xanny to feel better
On designated drives home
Only one who's not stoned
Don't give me a Xanny, now or ever


Can you check your Uber rating? Oh my god
(And it's like, wait, like, when?)

Wakin' up at sundown (Ooh)
They're late to every party (Ooh)
Nobody's ever sorry (Ooh)
Too inebriated now to dance
Morning as they come down (Come down)
Their pretty heads are hurting (Hurting)
They're awfully bad at learning (Learning)
Make the same mistakes, blame circumstance


I'm in their secondhand smoke
Still just drinking canned Coke
I don't need a Xanny to feel better
On designated drives home
Only one who's not stoned
Don't give me a Xanny, now or ever


Please don't try to kiss me on the sidewalk
On your cigarette break
I can't afford to love someone
Who isn't dying by mistake in Silver Lake


What is it about them?
I must be missing something
They just keep doin' nothing
Too intoxicated to be scared
Hmm, hmm
Hmm, mmm, mmm, mmm, mmm
Come down
Hurting
Learning",4271764
141921,3043527,​bad guy,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,3324113,{},"
White shirt now red, my bloody nose
Sleepin', you're on your tippy toes
Creepin' around like no one knows
Think you're so criminal
Bruises on both my knees for you
Don't say thank you or please
I do what I want when I'm wanting to
My soul? So cynical


So you're a tough guy
Like it really rough guy
Just can't get enough guy
Chest always so puffed guy
I'm that bad type
Make your mama sad type
Make your girlfriend mad tight
Might seduce your dad type
I'm the bad guy
Duh

I'm the bad guy


I like it when you take control
Even if you know that you don't
Own me, I'll let you play the role
I'll be your animal
My mommy likes to sing along with me
But she won't sing this song
If she reads all the lyrics
She'll pity the men I know


So you're a tough guy
Like it really rough guy
Just can't get enough guy
Chest always so puffed guy
I'm that bad type
Make your mama sad type
Make your girlfriend mad tight
Might seduce your dad type
I'm the bad guy
Duh


I'm the bad guy, duh
I'm only good at bein' bad, bad

I like when you get mad
I guess I'm pretty glad that you're alone
You said she's scared of me?
I mean, I don't see what she sees
But maybe it's 'cause I'm wearing your cologne


I'm a bad guy
I'm, I'm a bad guy
Bad guy, bad guy
I'm a bad",4271772
141923,3043548,​my strange addiction,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1103823,{},"
No, Billy, I haven't done that dance since my wife died
There's a whole crowd of people out there who need to learn how to do The Scarn


Don't ask questions you don't wanna know
Learned my lesson way too long ago
To be talkin' to you, belladonna
Shoulda taken a break, not an Oxford comma
Take what I want when I wanna
And I want ya


Bad, bad news
One of us is gonna lose
I'm the powder, you're the fuse
Just add some friction


You are my strange addiction
You are my strange addiction
My doctors can't explain
My symptoms or my pain
But you are my strange addiction

I'm really, really sorry, I think I was just relieved
To see that Michael Scarn got his confidence back
Yeah, Michael, the movie is amazing
It's like, one of the best movies I've ever seen in my life


Deadly fever, please don't ever break
Be my reliever 'cause I don't self medicate
And it burns like a gin and I like it
Put your lips on my skin and you might ignite it
Hurts, but I know how to hide it, kinda like it (Teh)


Bad, bad news
One of us is gonna lose
I'm the powder, you're the fuse
Just add some friction


You are my strange addiction
You are my strange addiction
My doctors can't explain
My symptoms or my pain
But you are my strange addiction

Bite my glass, set myself on fire
Can't you tell I'm crass? Can't you tell I'm wired?
Tell me nothing lasts, like I don't know
You could kiss my- asking about my motto


You should enter it in festivals or carnivals
Thoughts? Pretty good reaction
Pretty cool... right?


You are my strange addiction
You are my strange addiction
My doctors can't explain
My symptoms or my pain
But you are my strange addiction


Did you like it? Did you like that?
Um, which part?",4271787
141924,3043549,​ilomilo,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,1140234,{},"
Told you not to worry
But maybe that's a lie
Honey, what's your hurry?
Won't you stay inside?
Remember not to get too close to stars
They're never gonna give you love like ours


Where did you go?
I should know, but it's cold
And I don't wanna be lonely
So show me the way home
I can't lose another life


Hurry, I'm worried


The world's a little blurry
Or maybe it's my eyes
The friends I've had to bury
They keep me up at night
Said I couldn't love someone
'Cause I might break
If you're gonna die, not by mistake

So, where did you go?
I should know, but it's cold
And I don't wanna be lonely
So tell me you'll come home
Even if it's just a lie


I tried not to upset you
Let you rescue me the day I met you
I just wanted to protect you
But now I'll never get to


Hurry, I'm worried


Where did you go?
I should know, but it's cold
And I don't wanna be lonely
Was hoping you'd come home
I don't care if it's a lie",4271788
142532,3070139,​​death bed coffee for your head,rap,Powfu & beabadoobee,2019,2138556,{},"
Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed


Yeah, I don't wanna fall asleep, I don't wanna pass away
I been thinking of our future 'cause I'll never see those days
I don't know why this has happened, but I probably deserve it
I tried to do my best, but you know that I'm not perfect
I been praying for forgiveness, you've been praying for my health
When I leave this earth, hopin' you'll find someone else
'Cause yeah, we still young, there's so much we haven't done
Getting married, start a family, watch your husband with his son
I wish it could be me, but I won't make it out this bed
I hope I go to heaven so I see you once again
My life was kinda short, but I got so many blessings
Happy you were mine, it sucks that it's all ending


Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed (Yeah, ayy)
Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed (Ayy, yeah)

I'm happy that you here with me, I'm sorry if I tear up
When me and you were younger, you would always make me cheer up
Taking goofy videos and walking through the park
You would jump into my arms every time you heard a bark
Cuddle in your sheets, sing me sound asleep
And sneak out through your kitchen at exactly 1:03
Sundays, went to church, on Mondays, watched a movie
Soon you'll be alone, sorry that you have to lose me


Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed
Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed
Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed
Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed


Don't stay awake for too long, don't go to bed
I'll make a cup of coffee for your head
It'll get you up and going out of bed",4304008
142658,3076026,Thotiana Cardi B Remix,rap,Blueface,2019,1257992,"{""Cardi B""}","
Blueface, baby
Yeah, aight
Bust down, Thotiana
Yeah, aight
I wanna see you bust down


Bust down, Thotiana (Bust down, Thotiana)
I wanna see you bust down (Over)
Pick it up, now break that shit down (Break it down)
Speed it up, then slow that shit down, on the gang (Slow it down)
Bust it (Bust down), bust down, bust it, bust it
Bust down, on the gang (Over)
Bust down, Thotiana (Bust down, Thotiana)
I wanna see you bust down (Over)
Pick it up, now break that shit down (Break it down)
Speed it up, now slow that shit down, on the gang (Slow it down)
Bust it (Bust down), bust down, bust it, bust it
Bust down, on the gang (Over)

(Cardi!) Cardiana (Cardiana)
I was home with my kid, mommiana (Mommiana)
Real bitch, I don't be with all that drama (Nah)
Mindin' my business, I'm unbothered (I'm unbothered, yeah)
I ain't draggin', I'm lit (Like a tit)
Fuck clappin' back, bitch, I'm clappin' on the dick (On the dick)
Bust it, bust it, I'm a savage (I'm a savage)
Bitch, throw it back like a 10-Year Challenge (Woo!)
Take him to the crib, then I push him on the sofa (Sofa)
Have his breath smellin' like pussy and mimosas (Ah, ah, ah)
Uh, we ain't finished, tell him beat it up (Beat it up)
And if the pussy stop breathin', give it CPR (CPR, hah, hah)
It's so tight, he think he slipped in my butt (Slipped in my butt)
I don't swallow Plan B, I just swallow the nut (Uh, nasty)
Pussy dope, I'm the dope dealer
And if your pussy good, shouldn't have to maintain a broke nigga (Broke nigga)
Real shit, real life
Everybody gangbangin', know they ain't real, right (Yeah right now)
Since I came in the game, been a real one (Real one)
And ain't shit changed, bitch, I'm still one (Ah)
Uh, all facts, no cap (No cap)
Daddy, how you like that? (Like that?)
Uh, ain't got no time for no subliminals
After a while, bitch, bein' petty just means you miserable (Facts)
Uh, yeah, straight lame (Straight lame)
My pussy a bustdown, your's plain jane (Bust it)
I make him go insane, I fuck him with my red flag on
And when I cum, I say ""gang!"" (On the gang)

Bust down, Thotiana (Bust down, Thotiana)
I wanna see you bust down (Over)
Pick it up, now break that shit down (Break it down)
Speed it up, then slow that shit down, on the gang (Slow it down)
Bust it (Bust down), bust down, bust it, bust it
Bust down, on the gang (Over)
Bust down, Thotiana (Bust down, Thotiana)
I wanna see you bust down (Over)
Pick it up, now break that shit down (Break it down)
Speed it up, now slow that shit down, on the gang (Slow it down)
Bust it (Bust down), bust down, bust it, bust it
Bust down, on the gang (Over)


Blueface, baby
Yeah aight, I'm every woman's fantasy (Blueface, baby)
Mama always told me I was gon' break hearts
I guess it's her fault, stupid, don't be mad at me (Don't be mad at me)
I wanna see you bust down (Bust down)
Bend that shit over, on the gang (Yeah, aight)
Make that shit clap
She threw it back so I had to double back, on the gang (On the gang)
Smackin', high off them drugs (Off them drugs)
I tried tell myself two times was enough (Was enough)
Then a nigga relapsed, on the dead locs
Ain't no runnin', Thotiana, you gon' take these damn strokes (Thotiana)
I beat the pussy up, now it's a murder scene
Keep shit player, Thotiana, like you ain't never even heard of me (Blueface, baby)
Bust down, Thotiana, I wanna see you bust down (Bust down)
Bend that shit over (Bend it over)
Yeah aight, now make that shit clap, on the gang (Make it clap)
Now toot that thing up (Toot it up)
Throw that shit back (Throw it back)
I need my extras, on the dead locs

Bust down, Thotiana, bust down, Thotiana
I wanna see you bust down (Over)
Lick it up, now slurp that shit down
Jerk it off, now throw that dick down, on the gang  (Slow it down)
Bust it (Bust down), bust down, bust it, bust it
Bust down, on the gang (Over)
Bust down, Thotiana (Bust down, Thotiana)
I wanna see you bust down (Over)
Pick it up, now break that shit down (Break it down)
Speed it up, now slow that shit down, on the gang (Slow it down)
Bust it (Bust down), bust down, bust it, bust it
Bust down, on the gang (Over)",4311141
143546,3109691,Sucker,pop,Jonas Brothers,2019,1055640,{},"
We go together
Better than birds of a feather, you and me
We change the weather, yeah
I'm feelin' heat in December when you're 'round me


I've been dancin' on top of cars and stumblin' out of bars
I follow you through the dark, can't get enough
You're the medicine and the pain, the tattoo inside my brain
And, baby, you know it's obvious


I'm a sucker for you
You say the word and I'll go anywhere blindly
I'm a sucker for you, yeah
Any road you take, you know that you'll find me
I'm a sucker for all the subliminal things
No one knows about you (About you), about you (About you)
And you're makin' the typical me break my typical rules
It's true, I'm a sucker for you, yeah

Don't complicate it (Yeah)
'Cause I know you and you know everything about me
I can't remember (Yeah) all of the nights
I don't remember when you're 'round me (Oh, yeah, yeah)


I've been dancin' on top of cars and stumblin' out of bars
I follow you through the dark, can't get enough
You're the medicine and the pain, the tattoo inside my brain
And, baby, you know it's obvious


I'm a sucker for you
You say the word and I'll go anywhere blindly
I'm a sucker for you, yeah
Any road you take, you know that you'll find me
I'm a sucker for all the subliminal things
No one knows about you (About you), about you (About you)
And you're makin' the typical me break my typical rules
It's true, I'm a sucker for you, yeah (Uh)


(I'm a sucker for you)
I've been dancin' on top of cars and stumblin' out of bars
I follow you through the dark, can't get enough
You're the medicine and the pain, the tattoo inside my brain
And, baby, you know it's obvious

I'm a sucker for you, yeah
Say the word and I'll go anywhere blindly
I'm a sucker for you, yeah
Any road you take, you know that you'll find me
I'm a sucker for all the subliminal things
No one knows about you (About you), about you (About you)
And you're makin' the typical me break my typical rules
It's true, I'm a sucker for you (Uh)
I'm a sucker for you",4350998
144178,3136538,Pissy Pamper,rap,Young Nudy & Pi'erre Bourne,2019,1261204,"{""Kid Cudi"",""Playboi Carti"",""Young Nudy & Pi\\'erre Bourne""}","
Huh?
I'm gassin' this bitch


I smoke on the big blunts (On the big blunts, yeah)
(What?)
And I smoke the Runtz (And I smoke the Runtz, yeah)
And I like to stunt (Stunt, yeah)
I'm ballin' out the front (Ballin' out the front)
Niggas like to front (Front)
You know I like to front (Know I like to front)
I kick shit like a punter (Punter)
My young niggas some hunters (My young niggas some hunters)
I'm a head huncho (Huncho)
And I got the nacho (Nacho)
Eat niggas like tacos (Tacos)
Y'all niggas don't want beef (Y'all niggas don't want no beef)
Catch you in the street (Street)
That's that .223 (That's that .223)
That's that MP (MP)
And that M16 (And that M16)
Infrared beam (Beam)
Aim at your whole team (Aim at your whole team)
Blow you like some steam (Steam)
Wipe 'em off, they clean (Slime)

Runnin' from the cops (Cops)
Gotta keep my Glock (Gotta keep my Glock)
When I see them cops (Cops)
You know I have my Glock (Know I have my Glock, yeah)
Middle finger, fuck 12, always on my block (Yeah, always on my block)
Middle finger to the opp, we gon' pop at opps (We gon' pop at opps)
Pop a body, drop him (Drop him)
Cop a body, deuces (Deuces)
They be talkin' 'bout it (Huh?)
But don't know who be doin' it, uh (Don't know who be doin' it)
These niggas be talkin' (Talkin')
They lemon squeeze (Lemon squeeze)
XD (XD), ooh, lemon squeeze (Brr, brr, brr)
Yeah


Glock 17 (Okay)
Thirty million (Thirty million)
Yeah, hang up out that what? Bitch, please (Okay)
Yeah, that's a walk up, squeeze, yeah
Leave 'em in the streets (Streets), yeah
That's a cold case, yeah
PDE, that murder rate (PDE)
Yeah, you know chopsticks (Chop, chop)
All in the 'partment
Play with the pot, man
We know you gettin' spent (Know you gettin' spent)
We don't talk that shit (Nah)
We be 'bout that shit (We be 'bout that shit)
We gotta walk it, we gotta talk it
Nigga, be about it (Nigga, be about it)
All that talkin', cannot be talkin'
Niggas come see about you (Niggas come see about you)
You don't want to make news (Nah)
That's that Fox 5 crew (That's that Fox 5 crew)
Put you in the dirt (Yeah), you're ten down (Ten down)
Yeah, you say you're ten toes but you stand down, okay (Stand down)
Nigga, hundred shots off, nigga, man down, okay (Man down)
Now they call my phone talkin' 'bout, ""Stand down,"" uh-uh (Talkin' 'bout, ""Stand down"")
Now, I need some money, got my hand out (Got my hand out)
You got yourself in some shit, now you can't get out, okay (Hey, true)

Runnin' from the cops (Cops)
Gotta keep my Glock (Gotta keep my Glock)
When I see them cops (Cops)
You know I have my Glock (Know I have my Glock, yeah)
Middle finger, fuck 12, always on my block (Yeah, always on my block)
Middle finger to the opp, we gon' pop at opps (We gon' pop at opps)
Pop a body, drop him (Drop him)
Cop a body, deuces (Deuces)
They be talkin' 'bout it (Huh?)
But don't know who be doin' it, uh (Don't know who be doin' it)
These niggas be talkin' (Talkin')
They lemon squeeze (Lemon squeeze)
XD (XD), ooh, lemon squeeze (Brr, brr, brr)
Yeah


They tryna be cray, um (Yeah)
They tryna be cray, um (Yeah)
She wanna meet Carti (Meet Carti)
That bitch is a Barbie (Bitch)
I'ma fuck these hoes (Ooh)
I'm on 730
Got a brand-new pack like Kid Cudi (Brand-new)
I smoke dope like Kid Cudi
Push up and get the slugs from me (Slime, slime)
I'm with all the shits (Slime)
We pull up with shit, ayy (Ayy)
We pull up with, uh (Uh, ayy)
We pull up with sticks, hold up (Ayy)
We pull out the van, hold up (Yeah)
We pull out this shit, ayy (Bitch)
I pull out the 9, hold up (Yeah)
I pull out and blitz, hold up (Bzz)
I pull out the fire, hold up (Fire)
I pull out with SIGs (Brrt)
I'm smokin' out the pound (Pound)
Your bitch can suck my dick, yeah
The bitch tryna ride the dick (Yeah)
The bitch get thrown in the pit

Runnin' from the cops (Cops)
Gotta keep my Glock (Gotta keep my Glock)
When I see them cops (Cops)
You know I have my Glock (Know I have my Glock)
Middle finger, fuck 12, always on my block (Yeah, always on my block)
Middle finger to the opp, we gon' pop at opps (We gon' pop at opps)
Pop a body, drop him (Drop him)
Cop a body, deuces (Deuces)
They be talkin' 'bout it (Huh?)
But don't know who be doin' it (Don't know who be doin' it)
These niggas be talkin' (Talkin')
They lemon squeeze (Lemon squeeze)
XD (XD), ooh, lemon squeeze (Brr, brr, brr)
Yeah


Yeah, yeah
Bitch geeked up, show these niggas what they've never seen
Hung up on 630, homie, can't go  'round me
From X from the Z, you know the people...",4383036
144276,3139997,Goodbyes,rap,Post Malone,2019,1146728,"{""Young Thug""}","
Me and Kurt feel the same, too much pleasure is pain
My girl spites me in vain, all I do is complain
She needs something to change, need to take off the e-e-edge
So fuck it all tonight
And don't tell me to shut up
When you know you talk too much
But you don't got shit to say (Say)


I want you out of my head
I want you out of my bedroom tonight (Bedroom)
There's no way I could save you (Save you)
'Cause I need to be saved too
I'm no good at goodbyes


We're both actin' insane, but too stubborn to change
Now I'm drinkin' again, 80 proof in my veins
And my fingertips stained, looking over the e-e-edge
Don't fuck with me tonight
Say you needed this heart, then you got it (Got it)
Turns out that it wasn't what you wanted (Wanted)
And we wouldn't let go and we lost it
Now I'm a goner

I want you out of my head (Head)
I want you out of my bedroom tonight (Bedroom)
There's no way I could save you (Save you)
'Cause I need to be saved too (Saved too)
I'm no good at goodbyes


I want you out of my life
I want you back here tonight
I'm tryna cut you, no knife
I wanna slice you and dice you
My argue possessive, it got you precise
Can you not turn off the TV? I'm watchin' the fight
I flood the garage, blue diamond, no shark
You're Barbie life doll, it's Nicki Minaj
You don't need a key to drive, your car on the charger
I just wanna see the side, the one that's unbothered (Yeah)
And I don't want ya to never go outside (Outside)
I promise if they play, my niggas slidin' (Slidin')
I'm fuckin' her, and the tour bus still ridin' (Ridin')
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


I want you out of my head (Head)
I want you out of my bedroom tonight (Bedroom)
There's no way I could save you (Save you)
'Cause I need to be saved too (Saved too)
I'm no good at goodbyes

Goodbye, goodbye, goodbye (Bye, bye)
Goodbye, goodbye, goodbye (Bye, bye)
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Goodbye, goodbye, goodbye (Bye, bye, bye)
I'm no good at goodbyes
Goodbye, goodbye, goodbye (Bye, bye)
Goodbye, goodbye, goodbye (Bye, bye)
Goodbye, goodbye, goodbye (Bye, bye)
I'm no good at goodbyes",4387319
144280,3140514,Au DD,rap,PNL,2019,1270655,{},"


Bats les couilles d'l'Himalaya
Bats les couilles, j'vise plus l'sommet
Mon cœur fait ""ouhlalala""
Crime passionnel que j'commets
Sur ton cœur, j'fais trou d'boulette
J'fais tache de sang sur le pull
J'désire nullement vous connaître
Ni toi, ni ces fils de putes
J'me tire d'ici si j'm'écoute
Sang corse mélangé bougnoule
La Lune, j'aime plus, j'vous la laisse
J'm'endors sous doré, sous gnôle
J'suis ni d'chez moi ni d'chez vous
Elle veut la bise, elle veut qu'j'la baise
J'connais la route, connais l'adresse
J't'encule sur l'continent d'Hadès
Sale comme ta neuch, mèche courte
Forte comme la ppe-f' qu'j'écoule
J'tire la gueule, j'n'écoute
Que mon âme seule, mektoub
J'vis dans un rêve érotique
Où j'parle peu mais j'caresse le monde
J'meurs dans un cauchemar exotique
Où la Terre ressemble à ma tombe

Igo, pourquoi toi, tu parles en ""igo"" ?
Si ça s'tue, ouais, dis-moi qui signe
Pas d'honneur, toi, tu sens d'ici
WAllah, baba m'a dit : ""Mon fils, nan, nan
Toi, pas calculer ces pédales
Moi, j'ai donné pendant longtemps
Puis, j'ai perdu mes pétales""


Au DD
J'la passe, la détaille, la pé-cou, la vi-sser, des regrets d'vant ton bébé
J'sors de chez toi, j'reprends ta voiture mal garée puis j'retire ton PV
J'recherche un billet, des affaires, des plans dans la planque, un peu trop peiné
J'fais un bisou à mes cafards dans la cave du six, les pectoraux gainés
Les BACqueux té-ma parce que les ients-cli ne tomberont jamais sur messagerie
Eh, poto, démarre dans la jungle, j'y suis H24, j'y fais des singeries
La rue, j'la dévale à toute allure avec du Gucci comme Mitch
J'me promène dans les beaux quartiers avec le seum qui fait peur aux riches


Que la famille, personne nous inquiète jusqu'au dernier gramme
Toujours dans mon 9.1 parce que j'suis baisé par Paname
Sans, sans, sans l'bénéf' de la rue, j'aurais jamais niqué le game (game, game, game)
Me sens pas trop humain, un peu comme mes igos habités, yah
Y'a du sang à vider, yah
Au DD, DD, DD, deuxième ne-grai, j'suis effacé, yah
T'as reconnu le cri, igo t'es animal
Mes rêves, j'connais le prix, le canon rend animal
Au DD
Que la famille dans le bât', on te la push taille-dé
Au DD
Pas mélangé, cœur d'étranger, rien n'a changé, yah
C'qui doit arriver va arriver, yah
C'est peut-être mon dernier album
P't-être ma dernière puta
P't-être mon dernier sourire de toi
Dans mon unga, dans mon unga
Pas plus de haine que d'amour, que j'largue entre mes tours
Moins d'humains après minuit, je sors casser mon tour
Sur un nuage de l'Enfer
Viens, on s'casse, mon frère
Avant qu'on s'perde

Au DD
J'la passe, la détaille, la pé-cou, la vi-sser, des regrets d'vant ton bébé
J'sors de chez toi, j'reprends ta voiture mal garée puis j'retire ton PV
J'recherche un billet, des affaires, des plans dans la planque, un peu trop peiné
J'fais un bisou à mes cafards dans la cave du six, les pectoraux gainés
Les BACqueux té-ma parce que les ients-cli ne tomberont jamais sur messagerie
Eh, poto, démarre dans la jungle, j'y suis H24, j'y fais des singeries
La rue, j'la dévale à toute allure avec du Gucci comme Mitch
J'me promène dans les beaux quartiers avec le seum qui fait peur aux riches",4388058
144986,3166556,BLACKPINK - Kill This Love Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,2019,1241611,{},"
Yeah, yeah, yeah
BLACKPINK IN YOUR AREA!
Yeah, yeah, yeah


Cheonsa gateun ""hi"" kkeuten angma gateun ""bye""
Maebeon michildeuthan high dwien baeteoya haneun price
Igeon dabi eomneun test, maebeon sokdeorado yes
Ttakan gamjeongui noye, eoreo jugeul saranghae
Here I come kickin' the door, uh
Gajang dokan geollo jwo, uh
Ppeonhadi ppeonhan geu love
Deo naenwabwa give me some more
Araseo maedallyeo byeorang kkeute
Hanmadimyeon tto like hebeolle hae
Geu ttatteuthan tteollimi saeppalgan seollemi
Machi heaven gatgetjiman, you might not get in it


Look at me, look at you
Nuga deo apeulkka you smart (You smart)
Nuga you are
Du nune pinunmul heureuge doendamyeon so sorry (So sorry)
Nuga you are
Na eotteokae nayakan nal gyeondil su eopseo
Aesseo du nuneul garin chae
Sarangui sumtongeul kkeuneoyagesseo

Let's kill this love!
Yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah
Prum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum
Let's kill this love!
Prum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum


Feelin' like a sinner
It's so fire with him I go boo-hoo
He said ""You look crazy""
Thank you, baby
I owe it all to you
Got me all messed up
His love is my favorite
But you plus me
Sadly can be dangerous


Lucky me, lucky you
Gyeolgugen geojitmal we lie (We lie)
So what? So what?
Manyage naega neol jiuge
Doendamyeon so sorry (So sorry)
I'm not sorry
Na eotteokae nayakan nal gyeondil su eopseo
Aesseo nunmureul gamchun chae, eh
Sarangui sumtongeul kkeuneoyagesseo

Let's kill this love!
Yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah, yeah-yeah
Prum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum
Let's kill this love!
Prum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum, pum


We all commit to love
That makes you cry, oh-oh
We're all making love
That kills you inside, yeah


We must kill this love (Yeah, yeah)
Yeah, it's sad but true
Gotta kill this love (Yeah, yeah)
Before it kills you too
Kill this love (Yeah, yeah)
Yeah, it's sad but true
Gotta kill this love (Yeah, yeah)
Gotta kill, let's kill this love!",4419450
145531,3184531,Panini,rap,Lil Nas X,2019,1100543,{},"
D-D-Daytrip took it to ten (Hey)


Ayy, Panini, don't you be a meanie
Thought you wanted me to go up
Why you tryna keep me teeny? I
It's a dream, he wished it on a genie
I got fans finally, ain't you wanting them to see me? I


I thought you want this for my life, for my life
Said you wanted to see me thrive, you lied


Just say to me what you want from me
Just say to me what you want from me


Ayy, Panini, don't you be a meanie
Thought you wanted me to go up
Why you tryna keep me teeny now?
Now they need me, number one on streaming
Oh yeah, you used to love me
So what happened, what's the meaning? I

I thought you want this for my life, for my life
Said you wanted to see me thrive, you lied


Now when it's all done, I get the upper hand
I need a big Benz, not another fan
But I still want you as a fan
I'ma need to sit down, don't mean to make demands
But I need you to...


Say to me what you want from me
Just say to me what you want from me


D-D-Daytrip took it to ten (Hey)",4442107
145631,3187305,Old Town Road Remix,rap,Lil Nas X,2019,5443680,"{""Billy Ray Cyrus""}","
Oh, oh-oh
Oh


Yeah, I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more (Kio, Kio)


I got the horses in the back
Horse tack is attached
Hat is matte black
Got the boots that's black to match
Ridin' on a horse, ha
You can whip your Porsche
I been in the valley
You ain't been up off that porch, now


Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'
Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'

Ridin' on a tractor
Lean all in my bladder
Cheated on my baby
You can go and ask her
My life is a movie
Bull ridin' and boobies
Cowboy hat from Gucci
Wrangler on my booty


Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'
Can't nobody tell me nothin'
You can't tell me nothin'


Yeah, I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more


Hat down, cross town, livin' like a rockstar
Spent a lot of money on my brand new guitar
Baby's got a habit: diamond rings and Fendi sports bras
Ridin' down Rodeo in my Maserati sports car
Got no stress, I've been through all that
I'm like a Marlboro Man so I kick on back
Wish I could roll on back to that old town road
I wanna ride 'til I can't no more

Yeah, I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more
I'm gonna take my horse to the old town road
I'm gonna ride 'til I can't no more",4445394
145769,3193291,BTS - 작은 것들을 위한 시 Boy With Luv ft. Halsey English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2019,1036456,{},"
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)


I'm curious about you, how's your day?
Oh, tell me (Oh yeah oh yeah, ah yeah ah yeah)
What makes you happy?
Oh, text me (Oh yeah oh yeah, oh yeah oh yeah)


Your every picture
I wanna have under my pillow, oh, oh bae
Come be my teacher
Teach me everything about you
Your one, your two


Listen my my baby
I'm flying high up in the sky
(With the two wings that you gave me back then)
Now it's so high up here
I want you tuned in to my eyes
Yeah, you makin' me a boy with luv

Oh my, my, my, (uh) oh my, my, my
I've waited all my life
I want to be with you through everything
Oh my, my, my, (yeah) oh my, my, my
Looking for something right
Okay, now, I kinda get it


(oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want something stronger (I want it)
(oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a moment, than a moment, love
(oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I have waited longer
(oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
For a boy with, for a boy with luv


From the moment I met you, ya, my life was all you, ya
You're the star that turns ordinaries into extraordinaries, oh yeah
One after another ay, ay, everything is special ay, ay
The things you're interested in, the way you walk or talk, and every little trivial habit of yours


(Hope world, ay)
Everyone says that I used to be so little and now I became a hero (Oh no)
I say that something like destiny was never my thing (Oh no)
World peace (No way)
A great order (No way)
I just want to keep you safe
(Boy with luv)

Listen my my baby
I'm flying high up in the sky
(With the two wings that you gave me back then)
Now, it's so high up here
I want you tuned in to my eyes
Yeah, you makin' me a boy with luv


Oh my, my, my, (uh) oh my, my, my
You got me high so fast
I want to be with you through everything
Oh my, my, my, oh my, my, my
You got me fly so fast
Okay, now, I kinda' get it


(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Love is nothing stronger (I want it)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Than a boy with) Than a boy with luv
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Love is nothing stronger
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Than a boy with) Than a boy with luv

I'll tell you frankly
Sometimes I was a little stuck up
Elevated sky, expanded halls
Sometimes I prayed, let me run away
But your pain is my pain
When I realised that, I vowed to myself (Yeah)
With the wings of Icarus you gave me (Uh)
Not towards the sun but towards you
Let me fly


Oh my, my, my, (uh) oh my, my, my
I've waited all my life (All my life)
I want to be with you through everything
Oh my, my, my, (yeah) oh my, my, my (Oh, oh)
Looking for something right (Right)
Okay, now, I kinda' get it


(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want something stronger (I want something stronger, I want it)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a moment, than a moment, love (Mo-moment, love)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Love is nothing stronger (ooh ooh, oh yeah)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Than a boy with) Than a boy with luv",4453304
145770,3193295,BTS - 작은 것들을 위한 시 Boy With Luv ft. Halsey Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,2019,1284225,{},"
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)


Modeun ge gunggeumhae how's your day?
Oh, tell me (Oh yeah, oh yeah, ah yeah, ah yeah)
Mwoga neol haengbokage haneunji
Oh, text me (Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah)


Your every picture
Nae meorimate dugo sipeo, oh-oh bae
Come be my teacher
Ne modeun geol da gareuchyeojwo
Your one, your two


Listen, my, my baby naneun
Jeo haneureul nopi nalgo isseo
(Geuttae niga naege jwossdeon du nalgaero)
Ije yeogin neomu nopa
Nan nae nune neol majchugo sipeo
Yeah, you makin' me a boy with luv

Oh my, my, my (uh) oh my, my, my
I've waited all my life
Ne jeonbureul hamkkehago sipeo
Oh my, my, my (yeah), oh my, my, my
Looking for something right
Ije jogeumeun na algesseo


(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want something stronger (I want it)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a moment, than a moment, luv
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I have waited longer
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
For a boy with, for a boy with luv


Neol alge doen ihu ya (Oh)
Nae saleun ontong neo ya (Ya, ya)
Sasohan ge sasohaji anke mandeureobeorin neoraneun byeol (Alright) hanabuteo yeolkkaji ayy, ayy
Modeun ge teukbyeolhaji ayy, ayy
Neoui gwansimsa georeumgeori maltuwa sasohan jageun seupgwandeulkkaji, ayy


(Hope World)
Da malhaji neomu jakdeon naega yeongungi doen georago (Oh no)
Nan malhaji unmyeong ttawin cheoeumbuteo nae ge anieossdago (Oh no)
Sekyeui pyeonghwa (No way)
Geodaehan jilseo (No way)
Geujeo neol jikil geoya nan (Boy with luv)

Listen, my, my baby naneun
Jeo haneureul nopi nalgo isseo
(Geuttae niga naege jwossdeon du nalgaero)
Ije yeogin neomu nopa
Nan nae nune neol majchugo sipeo
Yeah, you makin' me a boy with luv


Oh my, my, my (uh) oh my, my, my
You got me high so fast
Ne jeonbureul hamkkehago sipeo
Oh my, my, my oh my, my, my
You got me fly so fast
Ije jogeumeun na algesseo


(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Love is nothing stronger (I want it)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a boy with, than a boy with luv
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Love is nothing stronger
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a boy with, than a boy with luv

Tuk kkanohgo malhalge
Nado moreuge himi deureogagido haesseo
Nopabeorin sky, keojyeobeorin hall
Ttaeron domangchige haedallamyeo gidohaesseo
But neoui sangcheoneun naui sangcheo
Kkaedarasseul ttae na dajimhaessdeongeol (Yeah)
Niga jun ikaruseuui nalgaero (Uh)
Taeyangi anin neoegero, let me fly


Oh my, my, my oh my, my, my
I've waited all my life (All my life)
Ne jeonbureul hamkkehago sipeo
Oh my, my, my oh my, my, my
Looking for something right (right)
Ije jogeumeun na algesseo


(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
I want something stronger (I want it)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a moment, than a moment, love (Mo-moment, luv)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Love is nothing stronger (Ooh-ooh, oh yeah)
(Oh-oh-oh-oh-oh)
Than a boy with, than a boy with luv",4453314
145837,3196002,BTS - 소우주 Mikrokosmos English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2019,1358504,{},"
Twinkling starlight
Building with blinking light
We're shining brightly
In our own rooms, in our own stars


(Ayo) One light is ambition
Some light is rebellion
People's lights
All are precious
This dark night (Don't be lonely)
Like stars (We shine)
Don't disappear
'Cause you're a big existence
Let us shine


Perhaps the reason this night looks so beautiful (Oh)
Is not because of these stars or lights, but us

You got me
I dream while looking at you
I got you
Inside those pitch black nights
The lights we saw in each other
Were saying the same thing
The starlight that shines more in the deepest night
(O-oo-oo, o-oo-oo, o-oo-oo)
The starlight (o-oo-oo) that shines more in the deepest night
(O-oo-oo, o-oo-oo, o-oo-oo)
The starlight (o-oo-oo)  that shines more the deeper the night gets


One history in one person
One star in one person
7 billion different worlds
Shining with 7 billion lights
7 billion lives, the city's night view
Is possibly another city's night
Our own dreams, let us shine
You shine brighter than anyone else
One


Perhaps the reason this night looks so beautiful (Oh)
Is not because of these stars or lights, but us

You got me
I dream while looking at you
I got you
Inside those pitch black nights
The lights we saw in each other
Were saying the same thing
The starlight that shines more in the deepest night
(O-oo-oo, o-oo-oo, o-oo-oo)
The starlight (o-oo-oo) that shines more in the deepest night
(O-oo-oo, o-oo-oo, o-oo-oo)
The starlight (o-oo-oo)  that shines more the deeper the night gets


City lights, this city's star
I remember the night sky I saw when I was young
Where people are light
Where people are stars
In this place full of where
People are lights
We shinin'


You got me
I breathe while looking at you
I got you
Inside those pitch black nights (Shine)

Shine, dream, smile
Oh, let us light up the night
We shine in our own ways
Shine, dream, smile
Oh, let us light up the night
We shine just the way we are
Tonight
Na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na
Na-na-na-na-na-na-na-na",4456531
145895,3198964,Dangerously in Love 772 Love Pt. 2,rap,YNW Melly,2019,1000459,{},"
AT
Hmm, hmm, hmm, hmm, hmm, hmm


Can you stand the pain, stand the rain?
I'm insane, but somehow you ease the pain
I can buy you new designer thangs (Yung Shad, you killed this track)
Gucci, Louis, Prada, yeah, the finer thangs
Iced out Cuban Link, Rolex, VVS, pinky ring
Walk the same, talk the same
Stay the same, fuck the fame, never change


'Cause I can not wait until (Until) they set me free (Free)
So I finally (Finally), can spend the rest of my days with you (My days)
Girl, I'm dangerously in love with you
Eternally (Eternally), not just mentally, but physically I am feeling you
And I really hope that you feeling me (Whoa)
Is you feeling me? (Whoa)
Hold it down for me and (Whoa) I promise that I'll take care of you
'Cause I can not wait until (Whoa) they set me free (Whoa)
So I finally, can spend the rest of my days with you
Girl, (Whoa) I'm dangerously in love with you (Whoa)
I'll never leave, not just mentally, but physically I am feeling you

Oh, oh
Oh, this is more than a crush that I have on you
I'm infatuated with everything you do
'Cause I need ya', and I want ya'
And I swear it get better and better
Pussy wetter than ever
Ooh, I love her just like that Beretta
Let me help you take off yo' shoes (Off yo' shoes)
Buy you a Rolex and want to see you flex (Yeah, yeah)
Oh, oh, oh yeah, oh
You know I'm thuggin', hit it with my durag on
Baby, can we please make love on a mattress full of hunnids? (Full of hunnids)
Feeling on your body, leaving hickeys on your stomach (On your stomach)
I'ma make you scream my name and have you drippin' like a faucet
Move too fast, I'm finna miss your ass, and make you get up off it


I'm so glad that they have set me free
Now I finally, can spend the rest of my days with you
Girl, I'm dangerously in love with you
Eternally, not just mentally, but physically I am feeling you
And I really hope that you're feeling me
Is you feeling me?
Hold it down for me and I promise that I'll take care of you
'Cause I'm dangerously in love with you
I'll never leave, just keep loving me
And I promise I'll take care of you (You)

I promise I'll take care of you (I'm gon' just take care of you)
I promise I'll take care of you (I'm gon' just take care of you)
I promise I'll take care of you (Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh)
Girl, let me take care of you, like girl, let me take care of you (I promise)
Like girl, let me take care of you (From the 772)
And girl, let me take care of you (From the 772)
Like girl, let me take care of you (From the 772)
Might as well call this ""772 Love Pt. 2""


I, I, ooh, I, heart you
I promise I, I heart you (Ooh, whoa, whoa)
It's Young Melly, baby
It's Marcus baby, ahahaha


I'm moving too fast
Got three on the dash
Bitch, I'm on your ass (I'm on your ass)
Like where is you going? (You know that this Melly, bitch)
I'm getting this money, I'm fucking these bitches and she still know
Cater to you, you
Gon' love me forever, ever
Ain't no lame, no lame, no lame

No, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh
Woah, woah, woah
Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh",4460290
146088,3208967,ME,pop,Taylor Swift,2019,1417794,"{""Brendon Urie""}","
I promise that you'll never find another like me


I know that I'm a handful, baby, uh
I know I never think before I jump
And you're the kind of guy the ladies want
(And there's a lot of cool chicks out there)
I know that I went psycho on the phone
I never leave well enough alone
And trouble's gonna follow where I go
(And there's a lot of cool chicks out there)


But one of these things is not like the others
Like a rainbow with all of the colors
Baby doll, when it comes to a lover
I promise that you'll never find another like


Me-e-e, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
I'm the only one of me
Baby, that's the fun of me
Eeh-eeh-eeh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
You're the only one of you
Baby, that's the fun of you
And I promise that nobody's gonna love you like me-e-e

I know I tend to make it about me
I know you never get just what you see
But I will never bore you, baby
(And there's a lot of lame guys out there)
And when we had that fight out in the rain
You ran after me and called my name
I never wanna see you walk away
(And there's a lot of lame guys out there)


'Cause one of these things is not like the others
Livin' in winter, I am your summer
Baby doll, when it comes to a lover
I promise that you'll never find another like


Me-e-e, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
I'm the only one of me
Let me keep you company
Eeh-eeh-eeh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
You're the only one of you
Baby, that's the fun of you
And I promise that nobody's gonna love you like me-e-e


Girl, there ain't no ""I"" in ""team""
But you know there is a ""me""
Strike the band up, one, two, three
I promise that you'll never find another like me
Girl, there ain't no ""I"" in ""team""
But you know there is a ""me""
And you can't spell ""awesome"" without ""me""
I promise that you'll never find another like

Me-e-e (Yeah), ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (And I want ya, baby)
I'm the only one of me (I'm the only one of me)
Baby, that's the fun of me (Baby, that's the fun of me)
Eeh-eeh-eeh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh (Oh)
You're the only one of you (Oh)
Baby, that's the fun of you
And I promise that nobody's gonna love you like me-e-e


Girl, there ain't no ""I"" in ""team"" (Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
But you know there is a ""me""
I'm the only one of me (Oh-oh)
Baby, that's the fun of me
(Eeh-eeh-eeh, ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh)
Strike the band up, one, two, three
You can't spell ""awesome"" without ""me""
You're the only one of you
Baby, that's the fun of you
And I promise that nobody's gonna love you like me-e-e",4472545
146329,3216838,Earth,pop,Lil Dicky,2019,1897143,{},"
What up, world?
It's your boy, just one of the guys down here
Well, I could be more specific
Uh, I'm a human
And I just wanted to, you know
For the sake of all of us earthlings out there
Just wanted to say:


We love the Earth, it is our planet
We love the Earth, it is our home
We love the Earth, it is our planet
We love the Earth, it is our home


Hi, I'm a baboon
I'm like a man, just less advanced
And my anus is huge


Hey, I'm a zebra
No one knows what I do, but I look pretty cool
Am I white or black?

I'm a lion cub
And I'm always getting licked (Meow)


How's it going? I'm a cow (Moo)
You drink milk from my tits (Moo)


I'm a fat fuckin' pig


I'm a common fungus


I'm a disgruntled skunk, shoot you out my butthole


I'm a marijuana plant, I can get you fucked up


And I'm Kanye West


We love the Earth, it is our planet
We love the Earth, it is our home
We love the Earth, it is our planet
We love the Earth, it is our home
We love the Earth

Ba-dum-ba-dum-dum, ba-dum-da-di
We are the vultures, feed on the dead


We're just some rhinos, horny as heck


I'm just a giraffe, what's with this neck?


Hippity-hop, I'm a kangaroo
I hop all day, up and down with you


I'm an elephant, I got junk in my trunk


What the fuck? I'm a clam!


I'm a wolf, howl!


I'm a squirrel lookin' for my next nut

And I'm a pony, just a freak horse, heh-heh-heh
But, uh, c'mon, get on (Get on), yah!
Giddy up, let's ride


I'm HPV, don't let me in


I'm a koala and I sleep all the time
So what? It's cute


We love you, India


We love you, Africa


We love the Chinese


We forgive you, Germany


Earth, it is our planet (It's our planet)
We love the Earth (We love the Earth), it is our home (Home)
We love the Earth, it is our planet (It is our planet)
We love the Earth, it is our home
We love the Earth


I'm a man (Hello?)
Can you hear me? (Anyone out there? Hello?)
I've trudged the Earth for so damn long
And still don't know shit (What's going on?)
I hope it's not a simulation (Huh)
Give each other names like Ahmed and Pedro
And, yeah, we like to wear clothes, girls still look beautiful
And it covers up our human dick (Woo), eat a lot of tuna fish
But these days, it's like we don't know how to act
All these shootings, pollution, we under attack on ourselves
Like, let's all just chill (Hey), respect what we built (Hey)
Like look at the internet! It's cracking as hell
Fellas, don't you love to cum when you have sex? (Ayy)
And I heard women orgasms are better than a dick's (Uh)
So what we got this land for? What we gotta stand for?
Love, and we love the Earth (The Earth)


Oh, yeah, baby, I love the Earth
I love this planet


Hey, Russia, we're cool
Hey, Asia, all of you, c'mon
Every one of you from the plains to the Sahara
Let's come together and live


Hum-dum-dum-dae-dum, hum-dum-dum-dae-dum


우-우-우리는 지구를 사랑해요


Amamos la tierra


我们爱地球


(We love you, we love you)
C'mon everybody, I know we're not all the same
But we're living on the same Earth
(We love you, we love you)
Have you ever been to Earth?
Everyone who is listening has been to Earth, Ariana
(We love you, we love you)
We're not making music for aliens here
Are we gonna die?
You know what, Bieber? We might die
(We love you, we love you)
I'm not going to lie to you
I mean, there's so many people out here who don't think global warming's a real thing. You know? We gotta save this planet. We're being stupid
Unless we get our shit together now",4482797
146637,3228775,HIGHEST IN THE ROOM,rap,Travis Scott,2019,2363260,{},"
I got room in my fumes (Yeah)
She fill my mind up with ideas
I'm the highest in the room (It's lit)
Hope I make it outta here (Let's go)


She saw my eyes, she know I'm gone (Ah)
I see some things that you might fear
I'm doin' a show, I'll be back soon (Soon)
That ain't what she wanna hear (Nah)
Now I got her in my room (Ah)
Legs wrapped around my beard
Got the fastest car, it zoom (Skrrt)
Hope we make it outta here (Ah)
When I'm with you, I feel alive
You say you love me, don't you lie (Yeah)
Won't cross my heart, don't wanna die
Keep the pistol on my side (Yeah)


Case it's fumes (Smoke)
She fill my mind up with ideas (Straight up)
I'm the highest in the room (It's lit)
Hope I make it outta here (Let's go, yeah)

We ain't stressin' 'bout the loot (Yeah)
My block made of quesería
This not the molly, this the boot
Ain't no comin' back from here
Live the life of La Familia
It's so much gang that I can't see ya (Yeah)
Turn it up 'til they can't hear (We can't)
Runnin', runnin' 'round for the thrill
Yeah, dawg, dawg, 'round my real (Gang)
Raw, raw, I been pourin' to the real (Drank)
Nah, nah, nah, they not back of the VIP (In the VIP)
Gorgeous, baby, keep me hard as steel
Ah, this my life, I did not choose
Uh, been on this since we was kids
We gon' stay on top and break the rules
Uh, I fill my mind up with ideas


Case it's fumes
She fill my mind up with ideas (Straight up)
I'm the highest in the room (I'm the highest, it's lit)
Hope I make it outta here

",4497172
146899,3238243,Lover,country,Taylor Swift,2019,2085862,{},"
We could leave the Christmas lights up 'til January
And this is our place, we make the rules
And there's a dazzling haze, a mysterious way about you, dear
Have I known you twenty seconds or twenty years?


Can I go where you go?
Can we always be this close?
Forever and ever, ah
Take me out, and take me home
You're my, my, my, my lover


We could let our friends crash in the living room
This is our place, we make the call
And I'm highly suspicious that everyone who sees you wants you
I've loved you three summers now, honey, but I want 'em all


Can I go where you go?
Can we always be this close?
Forever and ever, ah
Take me out, and take me home (Forever and ever)
You're my, my, my, my lover

Ladies and gentlemen, will you please stand?
With every guitar string scar on my hand
I take this magnetic force of a man to be my lover
My heart's been borrowed and yours has been blue
All's well that ends well to end up with you
Swear to be overdramatic and true to my lover
And you'll save all your dirtiest jokes for me
And at every table, I'll save you a seat, lover


Can I go where you go?
Can we always be this close?
Forever and ever, ah
Take me out, and take me home (Forever and ever)
You're my, my, my, my
Oh, you're my, my, my, my
Darling, you're my, my, my, my lover",4508914
147059,3246308,Homicide,rap,Logic,2019,3654415,{Eminem},"
Son, you know why you the greatest alive?
Why, Dad?
Because you came out of my balls, nigga
Hahahahahaha
(Roof!)


Fuck rap
Bustin' like an addict with a semi-automatic
Who done had it, and he ready for anybody to buck back
Hold up, catch a vibe, ain't no way in hell we leavin' nobody alive
Leave a suicide note, fuck that
Bobby feelin' villainous, he killin' this
I'm comin' for your man and his lady and even the baby
I'm feelin' like I'm, chika-chika-chika, Slim Shady with rabies


I'm foamin' at the mouth, ain't nobody takin' me out
Every single rapper in the industry, yeah, they know what I'm about
And I dare you to test me
'Cause not a single one of you motherfuckers impress me
And maybe that's a little bit of an exaggeration
But I'm full of innovation
And I'm tired of all of this high school ""He's cool, he's not"" rap shit
Can a single one of you motherfuckers even rap? Shit
No, this ain't a diss to the game, this a gas to the flame
Nowadays, everybody sound the same, shit's lame
Like a moth to the flame, I'ma reel 'em in and kill 'em
Know you feelin' lyricism when I'm spillin' it, I'm feelin' myself
Yeah, yeah, Bobby Boy, he be feelin' himself
Mass murder like this can't be good for my health
When I rap like this, do I sound like shit?
Well, it don't really matter, 'cause I'm killin' this shit
Yeah, I'm killin' this shit
Oh yeah, oh yeah, I'm killin' this shit
Bobby, how many times you been killin' this shit?
Find another rhyme, goddamn, nigga, shit

Fuck rap
Bustin' like an addict with a semi-automatic
Who done had it, and he ready for anybody to buck back
Hold up, catch a vibe, ain't no way in hell we leavin' nobody alive
Leave a suicide note, fuck that
Bobby feelin' villainous, he killin' this
I'm comin' for your man and his lady and even the baby
I'm feelin' like I'm, chika-chika-chika-chika
Chika-chika-chika-chika-chika, Slim Shady


There's nowhere to hide, we call this shit genocide
Hit 'em with that (Do-do-do) and they die
We gon' leave 'em crucified, we call this shit genocide
I got bitches, I got hoes, I got rare designer clothes
No, we ain't fuckin' with that
Yeah, there's a time and a place
But if you ain't comin' with the illest of raps
Callin' yourself the greatest alive
Then you don't deserve to do that
No, no, oh no, no, please do not do that
You gon' get smacked
You gon' make Bobby attack
You gon' make Bobby Boy snap
You gon' make Bobby Boy snap (Bobby Boy!)

Fuck rap
Bustin' like an addict with a semi-automatic
Who done had it, and he ready for anybody to buck back
Hold up, catch a vibe, ain't no way in hell we leavin' nobody alive
Leave a suicide note, fuck that
Bobby feelin' villainous, he killin' this
I'm comin' for your man and his lady and even the baby
I'm feelin' like I'm chika-chika-chika-chika
Chika-chika-chika-chika-chika, Slim Shady


Jigga-jigga-jigga-jigga-jigga like JAY-Z
Jig is up, you fuckers who didn't write anything
Are getting washed, liga-liga-liga, like bathing
Young Hova, I know hitters like Yankees
Gun toters that pull triggers like crazy
Unloadin', leave you shot up in your Rover
Your body goes limp and slumps over
Like A-Rod in a month lull, but he just homered
Hol' up, I said ""Rover"" because now your Rover is red
Like Red Rover, so you know what I meant
But I roll over my opponents instead
Makin' dog sounds 'cause I gotta keep breakin' these bars down
I'll go slow for the speds
But when I go (Roof!) like the Dobermann said
I still think the (Roof!) would go over your head (Ha-ha)
Beast mode, motherfuckers 'bout to get hit
With so many foul lines, you'll think I'm a free throw
Figured it was about time for people to eat crow
You about to get out-rhymed, how could I be dethroned?
I stay on my toes like the repo, a behemoth in sheep's clothes
From the East Coast to the West, I'm the ethos and I'm the G.O.A.T
Who the best, I don't gotta say a fuckin' thing, though
'Cause MCs know
But you don't wanna hear me spit the facts
Your shit is ass like a tailbone
Or you're trapped in your cell phone
Or my chicken scratch, or my self-loathe
I don't wanna fuckin' listen to you spit your raps someone else wrote
Used to get beat up by the big kids
Used to let the big kids steal my big wheel
And I wouldn't do shit but just sit still
Now money's not a big deal
I'm rich, I wipe my ass with six mill'
Big bills like a platypus
A caterpillar's comin' to get the cannabis
I'm lookin' for the smoke but you motherfuckers are scatterin'
Batterin' everything and I've had it with the inadequate
Man, I can see my dick is standin' stiff as a mannequin
And I'm bringin' the bandana back, and the fuckin' headband again
A handkerchief and I'm thinkin' of bringin' the fuckin' fingerless gloves back
And not giving a singular fuck, like fuck rap
I sound like a fuckin' millionaire
With a Derringer with a hair trigger
'Bout to bear hug a fuckin' terrier, the Ric Flair dripper
Y'all couldn't hold a candle at a prayer vigil
When I vent, they compare me to a fuckin' air duct
I'm 'bout to bare-knuckle it, nah, fuck it
I'm gonna go upside their head with a Nantucket
Abraca-fuckin'-dabra
The track is the blood, I'm attracted, I'm attackin' it
What? Dracula, fuck that shit
I'm up, back with a thud
Man, stop

Look what I'm plannin', plannin', I'm plannin' to
Do all this while ya panickin'
And you're lookin' and starin' at mannequins
And I'm goin' to Fanagans
Trying to get up a plan against
All of the blana-kazana-ka-fam-bam-bannigans
While of all the bana-kazanika Hanna in a cabana
You're in a cab-
I'm in a cabana and a Janet
I'm in a cabana chantin' all this standup banter
While you don't got the stamina, you're lackin' the stamina
You're lackin' the stamina while you're divorcin' Harrison Ford
And I'm in a Porsche on the floorboards
While I'm world tourin'
You usin' way too many napkins, papkins
Lapkins and chapki-
You using ChapStick and napkins while I'm bapkin'
Flappin' around like a bapkin'
Flamminababbitapannitajampkin
Dammit, a can of pada-",4519154
147211,3251883,I Dont Care,pop,Ed Sheeran & Justin Bieber,2019,1535096,{},"
I'm at a party I don't wanna be at
And I don't ever wear a suit and tie, yeah
Wonderin' if I could sneak out the back
Nobody's even lookin' me in my eyes
Then you take my hand
Finish my drink, say, ""Shall we dance?"" (Hell, yeah)
You know I love ya, did I ever tell ya?
You make it better like that


Don't think I fit in at this party
Everyone's got so much to say (Yeah)
I always feel like I'm nobody, mmm
Who wants to fit in anyway?


'Cause I don't care when I'm with my baby, yeah
All the bad things disappear
And you're making me feel like maybe I am somebody
I can deal with the bad nights
When I'm with my baby, yeah
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh
'Cause I don't care as long as you just hold me near
You can take me anywhere
And you're making me feel like I'm loved by somebody
I can deal with the bad nights
When I'm with my baby, yeah
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh

We at a party we don't wanna be at
Tryna talk, but we can't hear ourselves
Read your lips, I'd rather kiss 'em right back
With all these people all around
I'm crippled with anxiety
But I'm told it's where I'm s'posed to be
You know what? It's kinda crazy 'cause I really don't mind
When you make it better like that


Don't think we fit in at this party
Everyone's got so much to say, oh yeah, yeah
When we walked in, I said I'm sorry, mmm
But now I think that we should stay


'Cause I don't care when I'm with my baby, yeah
All the bad things disappear
Yeah, you're making me feel like maybe I am somebody
I can deal with the bad nights when I'm with my baby, yeah
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh (Oh yeah, yeah, yeah)
'Cause I don't care as long as you just hold me near
You can take me anywhere
And you're making me feel like I'm loved by somebody
I can deal with the bad nights when I'm with my baby, yeah
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh (No)

I don't like nobody but you, it's like you're the only one here
I don't like nobody but you, baby, I don't care
I don't like nobody but you, I hate everyone here
I don't like nobody but you, baby, yeah


'Cause I don't care (Don't care)
When I'm with my baby, yeah (Oh yeah)
All the bad things disappear (Disappear)
And you're making me feel like maybe I am somebody (Maybe I'm somebody)
I can deal with the bad nights (With the bad nights)
When I'm with my baby, yeah
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh (Oh yeah, yeah, yeah)
'Cause I don't care as long as you just hold me near (Me near)
You can take me anywhere (Anywhere, anywhere)
And you're making me feel like I'm loved by somebody
(I'm loved by somebody, yeah, yeah, yeah)
I can deal with the bad nights
When I'm with my baby, yeah
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh",4526073
147236,3252876,MONEY LONG,rap,kizaru,2019,1320109,{​kizaru},"


Пусть всe сучки сосут мой члeн. Пусть всe ублюдки платят мнe дeньги за мой рэп. Хeйтeры, соситe мой члeн, соситe мои яйца, идитe нахуй, я дeлаю только то, что мнe нравится


DVRXBEATS
Damn, Aarne goin' crazy on these motherf-


Bang-bang, на чeй-то хатe рeйд (Йeй)
Я нe в сeбe, Би устроил рэйв (Во-ву)
Ba-Ba-Bad talk, копаeшь сeбe grave (Ты мeртвeц, ва-e)
Если знаeшь кто я, то тогда поймёшь мой way (Sheesh)
Bad bitches называют мeня шeйх (Йeй-йeй)
Сдeлал этим шкурам на лицо milkshake (У-у)
Кил-Кило пeчeний, свадeбный cake (Cake)
Я нe подeлюсь, нахуй всeх этих малышeй (Нахуй)
Rat (Е), tat-tat-tat-tat (No cap)
Настал час расплаты - payback (Payback)
Нe волнуйся о суках, дeнeг полный backpack (Backpack)
Я даю им flava in ya ear, будто Craig Mack (У-уи)
Ущипни, eсли я нe я (Ага)
Я-Я дeлаю дeньги, дeньги нe дeлают мeня (Угу)
Орёшь, что тeбe похуй (Это плохо)
Нeт, тeбe нe похуй, кого ты лeчишь? (Е)
Твоя сука хочeт со мной фотку (Хочeт)
Аккуратнeй, я trap-рeвизор (Что?)
Каждый, мать eго, сeзон - это наш сeзон (Так точно)
Ты приятeн, ты мнe нe приятeль (Е, e-e, e-e, e-e, e-e)
Пeрвооткрыватeль, ты обязан мнe, boy, я твой создатeль (У-у)
Всe твои трюки fake: Мистeрио
Я на увeрeнном, Missy Elliott в моём стeрeо (Е, у-у)
Всe эти дeти выглядят растeрянно (Во)
Хорошую дeвочку сложно найти
Такжe как панчлайн у рэпeра
Пом-Помню, раньшe всё было иначe (По-другому)
Рeдко играл с пацанами в мячик (Е)
Я хастлил из тачeк, из цeнтра на Стачeк
Я нe был пай-мальчик, строил башни из пачeк (Cash)
Ос-Оставил всeх уёбков на обочинe (Внe игры)
На мнe Rolie, твои часы пeсочныe (Damn)
Бью строками в eбало, они сочныe (По-по)
Money long, тeпeрь всe мои карманы прочныe (Sheesh)
Эй, bitch (Эй), я Hoodrich Official (Whoop-whoop)
Тeпeрь я вижу то, что, думал, нe увижу
И мы всё вышe и вышe, я так рад, что вышeл (М)
Тeпeрь я eду в магазин Dior в Парижe (Flex)
Растворились, у вас нeту навигации (У-гу)
Эти засранцы внe моeй локации
Нe хватаeт рeакции, в движeниях нeт грации
Дeлаю вложeния, скупаю акции (Ву)

Эти дауны кривляются в TikTok (Yap)
Я танцую Crip Walk (М), мнe нужeн этот Big Glock (Glock, м-м)
Задолжал - ты влип (Е), лох, у мeня всё тип-топ
Она хочeт lip-lock (Е), знаeт, кто здeсь big boss (Йeй)
Дeл нeвпроворот, это рэп-пeрeворот (У-у)
Лу-Лучший рeсторан, сотни eвро - антрeкот (Sheesh)
Вдруг наоборот: сильный аппeркот (Toasty)
Я люблю всe эти брeнды, потому что мнe идёт",4527298
147329,3258010,No Guidance,rb,Chris Brown,2019,1758053,{Drake},"
Before I die I'm tryna fuck you, baby
Hopefully we don't have no babies
I don't even wanna go back home
Hopefully, I don't leave you on your own


Ayy
Trips that you plan for the next whole week
Bands too long for a nigga so cheap
And your flex OD, and your sex OD
You got it, girl, you got it (Ayy)
You got it, girl, you got (Yeah)
Pretty lil' thing, you got a bag and now you wildin'
You just took it off the lot, no mileage
Way they hittin' you, the DM lookin' violent
Talkin' wild, you come around and now they silent
Flew the coop at 17, no guidance
You be stayin' low but you know what the vibes is
Ain't never got you nowhere bein' modest
Poppin' shit but only 'cause you know you're poppin', yeah

You got it, girl, you got it (Ayy)
You got it, girl, you got it


Lil' baby in her bag, in her Birkin
No nine to five, put the work in
Flaws and all, I love 'em all, to me, you're perfect
Baby girl, you got it, girl, you got it, girl (Oh-oh)
You got it, girl, you got it, girl (Ooh)


I don't wanna play no games, play no games
Fuck around, give you my last name (Oh)
Know you tired of the same damn thing
That's okay 'cause, baby, you


You got it, girl, you got it (Oh, ooh, ayy)
You got it, girl, you got it (Got it)


You the only one I'm tryna make love to, pickin' and choosin'
They ain't really love you, runnin' games, usin'
All your stupid exes, they gon' call again
Tell 'em that a real nigga steppin' in
Don't let them niggas try you, test your patience
Tell 'em that it's over, ain't no debatin' (Uh)
All you need is me playin' on your playlist
You ain't gotta be frustrated

I don't wanna play no games, play no games (Oh)
Fuck around, give you my last name (My last name)
Know you tired of the same damn thing (Same damn thing)
That's okay 'cause, baby, you


You got it, girl, you got it (Oh, ooh, ayy)
You got it, girl, you got it (Got it)
I don't wanna


Before I die, I'm tryna fuck you, baby (Yeah)
Hopefully, we don't have no babies (Ooh)
I don't even wanna go back home
Hopefully, I don't leave you on your own
You got it, girl, you got it, oh


Play no games (No)
Freaky (Freaky)
I can learn a lot from you, gotta come teach me (Woo, woo)
You a lil' hot girl, you a lil' sweetie (No, sweet)
Sweet like Pearland, sweet like Peachtree (Like that)
I can tell you crazy, but shit kind of intrigue me (No, yeah, I like that)
(I don't wanna, I don't wanna)
Seen it on the 'gram, I'm tryna see that shit in 3D, mami
I know I get around 'cause I like to move freely
(I don't, I don't)
But you could lock it down, I could tell by how you treat me
(I don't, I don't)
I seen how you did homeboy, so please take it easy (No, yeah)
Good to have me on your side, I ain't sayin' that you need me (Yeah, yeah)
Six God talk but I ain't tryna get preachy (No, no, no)
I seen how you did homeboy, please take it easier on me
'Cause I don't wanna (No) play no games, play no games
(I don't wanna, I don't wanna)
I don't wanna play no games, play no games
(I don't, I don't)

I don't, I don't
No",4533406
147369,3259756,EARFQUAKE,rb,"Tyler, The Creator",2019,2882193,"{""Tyler / The Creator""}","
For real, for real this time
For real, for real, for real this time
Bitch, I cannot fall short
For real, for real, for real this time (Uh, yeah)
For real, for real, for real this time


'Cause you make my earth quake
Oh, you make my earth quake
Riding around, your love be shakin' me up
And it's making my heart break
'Cause you make my earth quake
Oh, you make my earth quake (Earthquake, ooh)
Riding around, your love be shakin' me up
And it's making my heart break


Don't leave, it's my fault
Don't leave, it's my fault
Don't leave, it's my fault (Girl)
'Cause when it all comes crashing down I'll need you

'Cause you make my earth quake
Oh, you make my earth quake
Riding around, you're telling me something is bad
And it's making my heart break
'Cause you make my earth quake, oh, you make my earth quake
(Earth quake, yeah)
Riding around, your love be shakin' me up
And it's making my heart break (You already know)


We ain't gotta ball, D. Rose, huh
I don't give a fuck 'bout none', huh
Breathin' like fuck my lungs, huh
Just might call my lawyer, huh
Plug gon' set me up, huh (Yeah)
Bih', don't set me up (Okay)
I'm with Tyler, yuh (Slime)
He ride like the car, huh
And she wicked, huh, yuh
Like Woah Vicky, huh, yeah (Like Woah Vicky)
Oh, my God, hold up, um
These diamonds not Tiffany, huh, yeah (Woah, woah)
So in love (I been so in love)
So in love (I been so in love)

Don't leave, it's my fault (Fault)
Don't leave, it's my fault
Don't leave, it's my fault (Igor, ayy)
'Cause when it all comes crashing down I'll need you (Ayy, ayy)


'Cause you make my earth quake
I don't want no confrontation, no
And you don't want my conversation (I don't want no conversation)
I just need some confirmation on how you feel, for real (For real)
You don't want no complication, no
I don't want no side information (I don't want no side information)
I just need to know what's happening
'Cause I'm for real (For real)


I said don't leave, it's my fault (One)
I said don't leave, it's my fault (Two, two)
Don't leave, it's, it's my fault, girl (Three, three, three)
Don't, do-do-do-do-do, I'll need-",4535557
147470,3262910,Speechless Full,pop,Naomi Scott,2019,1442299,{},"
Here comes a wave meant to wash me away
A tide that is taking me under
Swallowing sand, left with nothing to say
My voice drowned out in the thunder


But I won't cry
And I won't start to crumble
Whenever they try
To shut me or cut me down


I won't be silenced
You can't keep me quiet
Won't tremble when you try it
All I know is I won't go speechless
'Cause I'll breathe
When they try to suffocate me
Don't you underestimate me
'Cause I know that I won't go speechless

Written in stone
Every rule, every word
Centuries old and unbending
""Stay in your place""
""Better seen and not heard""
But now that story is ending


'Cause I
I cannot start to crumble
So come on and try
Try to shut me and cut me down


I won't be silenced
You can't keep me quiet
Won't tremble when you try it
All I know is I won't go speechless, speechless
Let the storm in
I cannot be broken
No, I won't live unspoken
'Cause I know that I won't go speechless


Try to lock me in this cage
I won't just lay me down and die
I will take these broken wings
And watch me burn across the sky
Hear the echo saying:

I won't be silenced
Though you wanna see me tremble when you try it
All I know is I won't go speechless, speechless
'Cause I'll breathe
When they try to suffocate me
Don't you underestimate me
'Cause I know that I won't go speechless


All I know is I won't go speechless, speechless",4539715
147471,3262925,Dance Monkey,pop,Tones and I,2019,2252628,{},"
They say, ""Oh my God, I see the way you shine
Take your hands, my dear, and place them both in mine""
You know you stopped me dead while I was passing by
And now I beg to see you dance just one more time


Ooh, I see you, see you, see you every time
And oh my, I, I like your style
You, you make me, make me, make me wanna cry
And now I beg to see you dance just one more time


So they say
""Dance for me, dance for me, dance for me, oh-oh-oh
I've never seen anybody do the things you do before""
They say
""Move for me, move for me, move for me, ayy-ayy-ayy
And when you're done, I'll make you do it all again""


I said, ""Oh my God, I see you walking by
Take my hands, my dear, and look me in my eyes""
Just like a monkey, I've been dancin' my whole life
But you just beg to see me dance just one more time

Ooh, I see you, see you, see you every time
And oh my, I, I like your style
You, you make me, make me, make me wanna cry
And now I beg to see you dance just one more time


So they say
""Dance for me, dance for me, dance for me, oh-oh-oh
I've never seen anybody do the things you do before""
They say
""Move for me, move for me, move for me, ayy-ayy-ayy
And when you're done, I'll make you do it all again""
They say
""Dance for me, dance for me, dance for me, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
I've never seen anybody do the things you do before""
They say
""Move for me, move for me, move for me, ayy-ayy-ayy
And when you're done, I'll make you do it all again""


Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh
Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh
Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh
Ooh, ah-ah, ah-ah

They say
""Dance for me, dance for me, dance for me, oh-oh-oh
I've never seen anybody do the things you do before""
They say
""Move for me, move for me, move for me, ayy-ayy-ayy
And when you're done, I'll make you do it all again""
They say
""Dance for me, dance for me, dance for me, oh-oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
I've never seen anybody do the things you do before""
They say
""Move for me, move for me, move for me, ayy-ayy-ayy
And when you're done, I'll make you do it all again
All again""",4539729
147600,3266336,NEW MAGIC WAND,rap,"Tyler, The Creator",2019,1283577,"{""Tyler / The Creator""}","
Sometimes you gotta close a door to open a window


I saw a photo, you looked joyous
My eyes are green, I eat my veggies
I need to get her out the picture
She's really fuckin' up my frame
She's not developed like we are


Like magic, like magic, like magic, gone
New magic, new magic, new magic wand
Like magic, like magic, like magic, gone (Nigga)
New magic (Woo), new magic, new magic wand


My brother said I'm on the spectrum
Don't call me selfish, I hate sharin'
This 60-40 isn't workin'
I want a hundred of your time, you're mine

Please don't leave me now
Please don't leave me now (Don't leave)
Please don't leave me now
Please don't leave me now (Don't leave)
Please don't leave me now (Don't leave)
(Like magic, like magic, like magic, gone)
Please don't leave me now (I can make her leave)
(New magic, new magic, new magic wand)
Please don't leave me now (Don't leave)
(Like magic, like magic, like magic, gone)
Please don't leave me now
(New magic, new magic, new magic wand)


I wanna be found, passenger in your car (Don't leave)
You wanna be mean, mixed signals, don't park (I can make her leave)
She's gonna be dead, I just got a magic wand (Don't leave)
We can finally be together


You roll the dice, hit a seven, sure you right
Beginner's luck, you not my first, who gives a fuck?
Your other one evaporate, we celebrate
You under oath, now pick a side and if you don't
(Run, run, run, run)
I'll pick you both
(Run, run, run, run)
It's not a joke, murder she wrote

Ayo, take one look in the mirror, implications so clear
I live life with no fear, except for the idea
That one day you won't be here
I will not fetch the ball
Eyes are green, I eat my vegetables
It has nothin' to do with that broad
But if it did, guarantee she'd be gone, well
I got a plan, 'bout to walk in the pen
If you can't understand, I'm a hawk in the gym
Eyes on the prize, got weight on my chest
That I need to get off, or I ain't talkin' to them
Can't be in the picture if it got no frame
Gon' let the world know 'cause I ain't got no shame
Blow the whole spot up, 'cause I ain't-
I wanna share last names, I wanna be your number one
Not the other one, keep it on the low
I'm in my right mind, keep it on a high
Janis Joplin spillin' feelings, now I'm out here moppin' 'em
Four on the floor, pack up your bags, we hit the store
Grab our supplies, no need for masks, bust through the door
Get the job done like retirement, I admit you look concerned
New magic wand",4544030
147656,3268712,Dont Start Now,pop,Dua Lipa,2019,1529121,{},"
If you don't wanna see me


Did a full one-eighty, crazy
Thinking 'bout the way I was
Did the heartbreak change me? Maybe
But look at where I ended up
I'm all good already
So moved on, it's scary
I'm not where you left me at all, so


If you don't wanna see me dancing with somebody
If you wanna believe that anything could stop me


Don't show up, don't come out
Don't start caring about me now
Walk away, you know how
Don't start caring about me now

Aren't you the guy who tried to
Hurt me with the word ""goodbye""?
Though it took some time to survive you
I'm better on the other side
I'm all good already
So moved on, it's scary
I'm not where you left me at all, so


If you don't wanna see me dancing with somebody
If you wanna believe that anything could stop me
(Don't, don't, don't)


Don't show up, don't come out
Don't start caring about me now
Walk away, you know how
Don't start caring about me now ('Bout me now, 'bout me)


Up, up
Don't come out, out, out
Don't show up, up, up
Don't start now (Oh)
Up, up
Don't come out, out
I'm not where you left me at all, so

If you don't wanna see me dancing with somebody
If you wanna believe that anything could stop me


Don't show up (Don't show up), don't come out (Don't come out)
Don't start caring about me now ('Bout me now)
Walk away (Walk away), you know how (You know how)
Don't start caring about me now (So)


Up, up
Don't come out, out, out
Don't show up, up, up
Walk away, walk away (So)
Up, up
Don't come out, out, out
Don't show up, up, up
Walk away, walk away, oh",4547279
147700,3270361,The London,rap,Young Thug,2019,1453937,"{""J. Cole"",""Travis Scott""}","
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Oh, oh, woah
Woah, woah
Oh
(You good, T-Minus?)
Oh


Me-meet me at The London
If you find time, we can run one
Talk about some things we can't undo
You just send the pin, I can find you
6'1"", on the money, 9'2""
You just say the word and I'll run through
Two texts, no reply, that's when I knew
I knew, I knew, yeah, I knew


Yeah, circumnavigate the globe as the cash grows (Grow)
Get a nigga whacked like you get the grass mowed (Mowed)
I'm talkin' slick when I'm with the Big Slime, nigga (Slime)
Could hit your bitch, you could never hit mine, nigga (Mine)
In my DM, they electric slide, nigga (Huh, slide)
No catfishin', this is not a fish fry, nigga
Never switch sides on my dog
Catch a contact, hitch a ride, go to Mars
Everybody sing
How could you come up out your face
And say I ain't the hardest nigga you done ever heard?
I left a flock of rappers dead and buried
A verse from me is like eleven birds
Just did the math, that's like two thousand dollars every word
I'm on the verge, I'll beat the charge
I killed some niggas and I walked away from it
Then I observe, just how you curve
Then told the nigga that they gotta wait for it
""I know-I know you in high demand""
I'm ballin' on a pussy nigga like Juwanna Mann
I'm drownin' all inside the pussy like I never swam
Ayy, fuck your IG, I put somethin' on your sonogram
I'm the man, ayy, ayy

Me-meet me at The London
If you find time, we can run one
Talk about some things we can't undo
You just send the pin, I can find you
6'1"", on the money, 9'2""
You just say the word and I'll run through
Two texts, no reply, that's when I knew
I knew, I knew, yeah, I knew


Pimp talk, church talk, I can make a brick walk (Woo)
Up north, down south, Bankhead to Rachel Walk (Ayy)
Hit it with a little water, stretch it like a vocal cord
STD, I run my ward, fuck a fed and his daughter (Let's go)
I'ma run the compound (Yeah)
I supply the cigarettes and bread (Woo)
I got a main and she gon' ride (Uh-huh)
She took a quarter and she fled (Uh)
I'm in the Lamb', so she gon' ride (Yeah)
I see the pain in shawty's light brown eyes (Ooh)
I'm at The London with some big thots
No fries, she eat steaks with the fish sides
Didn't your mama tell you when something on fire, stop, drop and roll? (Aw yeah)
I've been on the road like a pair of spinners at Stop-N-Go's (Yeah)
I could charge 'em like a Dodge Hemi Demon
Got your broad in the garage eatin' semen
Every time a nigga go back to the ward
Niggas act like they want start
And we leave them on the cement (Grra, grra)

Me-meet me at The London
If you find time, we can run one
Talk about some things we can't undo
You just send the pin, I can find you
6'1"", on the money, 9'2""
You just say the word and I'll run through
Two texts, no reply, that's when I knew
I knew, I knew, yeah, I knew


I, crash down, we get money (Hey)
For the full town (Woah, when you won't play, I)
I decided, for the full side (Hoes will say)
And they know, I might (And fly, I...)
Get down, might (Don't play)
See the whole town every time, I... (Oh, every day)
Yeah, they know what's up (Folks will say)",4549336
148033,3279824,Dick,rap,StarBoi3,2019,1057799,"{""Doja Cat""}","
Dick, dick
Dick, dick
Dick, dick
Dick


She done made some plans with my dick, ayy
She goin' ham on my dick, ayy
Sittin' on, stand on my dick, ayy
She goin' ham on my, she goin' ham on my
She goin' ham on my dick, ayy
She made some plans with my dick, ayy
Sittin' on, stand on my dick, ayy
Usin' no hands on my dick, ayy


She made some plans on my dick tonight
She not with him tonight
She not with Jim tonight
She in the gym tonight
Workout in that pussy (Ayy)
I'm gettin' ripped tonight
R.I.P. that pussy (Ayy)
I'm goin' in tonight

She like to sit on the cock, ayy
She like to do it a lot, ayy
I make her scream for her mom, ayy
I make her scream for her pop, uh
And she got the ice, ice, baby
Suck the cock, cock
Got me like ""I like it, like it""
Baby, please don't stop, stop
Shawty gettin' freaky, goin' on a pickie
Shawty seen the icin' and the chillin' of the pinky
And I got that ice, ice, baby, on my pinky
Shawty say she like, like ready 'cause she freaky


Make some plans with my dick
She goin' ham on my dick
Sittin' on, stand on my dick
She goin' ham on my, she goin ham on my
She goin' ham on my dick
Sittin' on, stand on my dick
Usin' no hands on my dick


She goin' ham on my, she goin ham on my
She goin' ham on my dick tonight
She not with him tonight
She not with Jim tonight
She in the gym tonight
Workout in that pussy (Ayy)
I'm gettin' ripped tonight
R.I.P. that pussy (Ayy)
I'm goin' in tonight

She actin' like an addict, uh
Thicker than Andy Richter
I met the boy in the Six, but
Measurements wasn't a six, uh
I'd like a side of the pickle
I just got Morty & Rick'd, uh
He got me horny and ripped, uh
Like I just walked out the gym
And them bitches is gutted 'cause I took they Jim
Give him a job and he gave me a rim
It was too long, so he gave me a min'
How is that possible? Give me a Kim
I can't describe it, just give me a pen
And why he in your tummy, bye bye to my ribs
Turn him to a dummy 'cause I got him stiff
And watch, you think it's funny 'til y'all get the dick
And turn into a zombie and swallow your clit


She goin' ham on my dick (Dick)
Sittin' on, stand on my dick (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
She goin' ham on my, she goin' ham on my (Yeah, yeah)
She goin' ham on my dick (Dick, yuh)
Sittin' on, stand on my dick
Usin' no hands on my dick

She goin' ham on my, she goin' ham on my
She goin' ham on my dick tonight
She not with him tonight
She not with Jim tonight
She in the gym tonight
Workout in that pussy (Ayy)
I'm gettin' ripped tonight
R.l.P that pussy (Ayy)
I'm goin' in tonight",4563139
148162,3285888,Ransom,rap,Lil Tecca,2019,1860363,{},"
Turn you to a dancer
Yeah
Internet Money, bitch


I got black, I got white, what you want?
Hop outside a Ghost and hop up in a Phantom
I know I'm 'bout to blow, I ain't dumb
They try to take my flow, I take they ass for ransom
I know that I'm gone
They see me blowin' up, now they say they want some
I got two twin Glocks, turn you to a dancer
I see two twin opps, leave 'em on a banner
And I got two thick thots, wanna link the gang, yeah


I got red, I got blue, what you want?
The Chanel or Balenciaga, Louis and Vuitton
She know I got the Fendi, Prada when I hit Milan
I needed me a die or rider, I need me the one
I started from the bottom, you could see the way I stunt
I want all the diamonds, I want that shit to weigh a ton
The opps, they tryna line me 'cause they hate the place I'm from
But them niggas don't know me, they just know the place I'm from
I got lots of shawties tryna pull up to my place
But you ain't want me last year, so just get up out my face
They all up in my inbox, so I know they want a taste
I know they want my downfall, lil' nigga, are you laced?

I got black, I got white, what you want?
Hop outside a Ghost and hop up in a Phantom
I know I'm 'bout to blow, I ain't dumb
They try to take my flow, I take they ass for ransom
I know that I'm gone
They see me blowin' up, now they say they want  some
I got two twin Glocks, turn you to a dancer
I see two twin opps, leave 'em on a banner
And I got two thick thots, wanna link the gang, yeah
I got black, I got white, what you want?
Hop outside a Ghost and hop up in a Phantom
I know I'm 'bout to blow, I ain't dumb
They try to take my flow, I take they ass for ransom
I know that I'm gone
They see me blowin' up, now they say they want  some
I got two twin Glocks, turn you to a dancer
I see two twin opps, leave 'em on a banner
And I got two thick thots, wanna link the gang, yeah",4570978
148243,3287751,Isis,rap,Joyner Lucas,2019,1368885,{Logic},"
Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder, or better known as ADHD, is a mental disorder that affects an individual's ability to focus
Causing them to move around more frequently
They may also have trouble controlling their impulsive behaviors


One time for them prayin' on my downfall (Yeah)
Two times for the homies in the chow hall (Whoa)
Three times for them hoes on the internet
Shittin' on niggas when they really should get out more
Four times for the days that were all bad (Woo!)
Five times for the bitches who ain't called back (Yeah)
Six times for the kids like me who got ADHD just to- (Brap, brap, brap)


Kidnap a nigga like ISIS (Whoa)
Turn a whole world to a crisis (Whoa)
Walk around the city with a ice pick
I been paranoid, usually, I ain't like this (Boop, boop)
Ain't no tellin' how crazy I might get, uh (Woo!)
Beat the police with a nightstick (Boop)
In my whole life, I been lifeless
Now I'm so fly, I'm a muhfuckin' flight risk (Woo! Whoa)
Fuck a couple hoes 'til I pass out (Whoa)
Niggas throwin' stones at my glass house (Whoa)
I remember sleepin' on my dad's couch (Whoa)
Now I got the Bentley, and it's blacked out (Whoa)
Family lookin' at me like a cash cow (Whoa)
Errybody dissin' just to have clout (Whoa)
Thought you had a chance, now you assed out
Nigga, I'm the muhfuckin' man, where you at now? (Whoa)
Fuck it, I'ma hit 'em 'til they jumpin'
I ain't trippin', this is nothin' (Brap, brap, brap)
I been livin' in the dungeon
I done held a couple grudges
Went to hell and got abducted
Meet the devil, I'm his cousin
I ain't settlin' for nothin' (Brap, brap, brap)
Got a metal in the truck, I keep a semi when I'm bussin'
Niggas duckin' (Bop)
Even Stevie Wonder could've see it comin' (Brrrap, brap, bop)
I ain't judgin', I just want the money, I don't need a budget
I been hungry, I ain't got no oven (Bop, bop, brrrap, brap)
But I got the munchies, nigga
How you gon' move on the front line? (Woo!)
If I don't fuck with you, I just cut ties (Whoa)
My high school teacher said I'd never be shit
Tell that bitch that I turned out just fine (Joyner)
And no, I don't know you for the twelfth time (Woo!)
We do not share the same bloodline (No)
You love to run your mouth like a tough guy
Hope you keep the same energy when it's crunch time (Woo!)

According to the American Psychiatric Association
It affects roughly eight percent of children
And two percent of adults
Commonly believed to only affect boys
Because they are perceived as rowdy and rambunctious


One time for them prayin' on my downfall (Yeah)
Two times for them bitches in the South Shore (Whoa)
Three times for them days on the block
Gettin' chased by the cops like a motherfuckin' outlaw
Four times for them days that were all bad (Woo!)
Five times for the bitches who ain't called back (Yeah)
Six times for the kids like me who got ADHD just to- (Brap, brap, brap)


Me and Joyner need a couple hearses (Woo!)
Double homicide, kill the beat and the verses
Everybody livin' on the surface
But we came from the underground, yeah, we deserve it
What's beef?
Beef is when you murder motherfuckers on a beat
Kill 'em all, kill 'em all
Nah, nah, what's beef?
Beef is brothers dyin' over shit
That never mattered in the first place, lyin' in the street
What's peace?
Peace is when you leave it in the past, let it heal like a cast
When enough time pass, then you blast
Kinda like John Wick, bars like a convict
Fuck around and you don't wanna start shit, woo!
Comin' with the hot shit, all they do is talk shit
You could never top it, boy, just stop, stop it
High and drunk, call that HD vision
All these other motherfuckers full of indecision
And I murder with precision all over your television
I'm numero uno, number one and you is just a subdivision
Never listen, we gon' leave them missin'
That's the mission like ISIS (ISIS)
Ain't no time to bicker over who the nicest
It's Logic, it's obvious, just ask the audience
I've come to body this shit (Body this shit)
Yes, it's egregious, I'm Regis
You Kelly, you pussy, you pussy
Don't push me, I'm Louis Vuitton
You at Target with your mom
On the internet still hatin' on my last post (I hate this nigga)
I just sent a steak back at Mastro's, my god
Me and Joyner need a couple hearses (Woo!)
Double homicide, kill the beat and the verses
Everybody livin' on the surface
But we came from the underground, yeah, we deserve it
Yeah, uh, far from the minimum, killin' 'em with no Ritalin
And 5'9"" was the middleman to get 'em in the same room
Now we on the same tune, and we sealed the game's doom
The illest of lyricists on the same shit
RattPack, clap back on the gang shit
Do it for the love of rap, not for the fame shit, woo!

One time for the Grammy that I never got
Two times for the Garden that I sold out
Three times for the street crimes that I committed
Yeah, I did it, but thank God that I made it out
Four times 'cause I'm a fuckin' bastard
Five times Platinum with my last shit
Six times for the beats and the rhymes
Fuck the heat and the crime
Keep the peace like a waistline, woo!


ISIS, ISIS, ISIS, ISIS, ISIS
ISIS, ISIS, ISIS, ISIS, ISIS
ISIS, ISIS, ISIS, ISIS, ISIS
ISIS, ISIS, ISIS",4573439
148613,3301680,The Search,rap,NF,2019,1266448,{},"
""Hey, Nate, how's life?""
I don't know, it's alright
I've been dealin' with some things like every human being
And really didn't sleep much last night (Last night)
""I'm sorry,"" that's fine
I just think I need a little me time
I just think I need a little free time
Little break from the shows and the bus rides, yeah (Bus rides)
Last year I had a breakdown
Thoughts tellin' me I'm lost gettin' too loud
Had to see a therapist, then I found out
Somethin' funny's goin' on up in my house
Yeah, I started thinkin' maybe I should move out
You know, pack my cart, take a new route
Clean up my yard, get the noose out
Hang up my heart, let it air out (Air out)
I've been searchin'
""What does that mean, Nate?"" I've been learning
Grabbin' my keepsakes, leavin' my burdens
Well, I brought a few with me, I'm not perfect
Lookin' at the view, like this concerns me
Pickin' up the cues, right? I'm quite nervous
Hate it when I lose sight, life gets blurry
And things might hurt me
It's prolly gonna be a long journey, but hey (But hey)
It's worth it, though
Cold world out there, kids, grab your coats
It's been a minute, I know, now I'm back to roam
Lookin' for the antidote to crack the code
Pretty vivid; I admit it, I'm in classic mode
Don't need pity given to me, but I can't condone
Talkin' down to me, I'ma have to crack your nose for crackin' jokes
I'm lookin' for the map to hope, you seen it? (You seen it?)
Been makin' a whole lot of changes
Wrote a song about that, you should play it
I get scared when I walk on these stages
I look at the crowd and see so many faces, yeah
That's when I start to get anxious
That's when my thoughts can be dangerous
That's when I put on my makeup and drown in self-hatred
Forget what I'm sayin', and-
Where'd the beat go?
Oh, ain't that somethin'?
Drums came in, you ain't see that comin'
Hands on my head, can't tell me nothin'
Got a taste of the fame, had to pump my stomach
Throw it back up like I don't want it
Wipe my face, clean off my vomit
OCD, tryna push my buttons
I said don't touch it, now y'all done it
I can be critical, never typical
Intricate with every syllable, I'm a criminal
Intimate, but never political, pretty visual
Even if you hate it, I'll make it feel like you're in it, though
You call me what you wanna, but never call me forgettable
Leave you deep in thought, I could never swim in the kiddie pool
Way that I been thinkin' is cinematic, it's beautiful
Man, I don't know if I'm makin' movies or music videos (Videos, videos, videos)
Yeah, the sales can rise
Doesn't mean much though when your health declines
See, we've all got somethin' that we trapped inside
That we try to suffocate, you know, hopin' it dies
Try to hold it underwater but it always survives
Then it comes up outta nowhere like an evil surprise
Then it hovers over you to tell you millions of lies
You don't relate to that? Must not be as crazy as I am
The point I'm makin' is the mind is a powerful place
And what you feed it can affect you in a powerful way
It's pretty cool, right? Yeah, but it's not always safe
Just hang with me, this'll only take a moment, okay?
Just think about it for a second, if you look at your face
Every day when you get up and think you'll never be great
You'll never be great-not because you're not, but the hate
Will always find a way to cut you up and murder your faith, woo
I've been developin', take a look at the benefits
Nothin' to meddle with, I can never be delicate
Am I even relevant? That depends how you measure it
Take a measurement, then bag it up and give me the evidence
Pretty evident; dependable can never be tentative
I'm a gentleman, depending on if I think you're genuine
Pretty elegant, but not afraid to tell you to get a grip
Proper etiquette, I keep it to myself when I celebrate, ah (Ah)
It's that time again
Better grab your balloons and invite your friends
Seatbelts back on, yeah, strap 'em in
Look at me, everybody, I'm smilin' big
On a road right now that I can't predict
Tell me ""Tone that down,"" but I can't resist
Y'all know that sound, better raise your fist
The search begins, I'm back, so enjoy the trip, huh",4591643
148871,3310960,Bandit,rap,Juice WRLD & YoungBoy Never Broke Again,2019,1096551,{},"
It's funny, the shit I put on this song ain't gon' sound nothin' like the shit we was just doin'
Oh, yeah
I just want bad bitches
Baddest, them bitches is the baddest, uh, uh
When I take the molly, I'm a savage
Uh, I say, uh


I don't need no molly to be savage, uh
When I'm on that molly, I feel savage, uh, uh
She the definition of a bad bitch
Stole her, I'm the definition of a bandit, uh, ayy
I don't need no molly to be savage, uh, ayy
But when I'm on the molly, I feel savage
Ayy, my girl the definition of a bad bitch
Stole her heart, I'm the definition of a bandit


Put the Percs down and picked up the jiggas, jiggas, jiggas
Tommy in the fucking Tommy Hilfiger, 'figer, 'figer
That Tommy hit a nigga, Tommy Hilfiger, fuck niggas
I'm nice, when I'm high off the pills, I'ma fuck with her
I don't smoke skunk, but tonight I'm getting stuck, nigga
Pour the codeine up and put some molly in the cup with it
I know she a freak, uh-huh, she gon' fuck with it
She my velcro, uh-huh, guess I'm stuck with her
I dive in it like a sailor, I love to nail her
Addicted to her paraphernalia, I had to tell her
I see it like a fortune teller
Your ex-nigga did good, I could do better
Bad bitch from the woods, I think she a hunter
She a killer and an eater, she a Jeffrey Dahmer
I can tell when she in her feelings, I can read her like a book
No TEC, no Beretta, FN on me, am I understood?
Yeah, yeah, yeah

I don't need no molly to be savage, uh
When I'm on that molly, I feel savage, uh, uh
She the definition of a bad bitch
Stole her, I'm the definition of a bandit, uh, ayy
I don't need no molly to be savage, uh, ayy
But when I'm on the molly, I feel savage
Ayy, my girl the definition of a bad bitch
Stole her heart, I'm the definition of a bandit


My brother point her out and she a bad bitch, I'm on her
Must ain't heard that I'm a savage, once I get a bitch, I own her
I see she got swag, I got cash so I want her
See this four-five in my pants, put on your ass, push up on bruh
Shawty, she a rider with that glizzy on her (Glizzy on her)
And shawty, I'ma dada with no semi on me (Semi on me)
If we got a problem, we get rid of homie (Yeah)
Put twenty thousand in your pocket, we gon' get the money (Yeah)
I'm the definition of a bandit (Honest)
Took your heart from out his hands and still ain't saying shit (On my mama)
Some new killers in my circle you done ran with
Like this dirty .38, this bitch'll damage
Popping wheelies, 4K Trey, call when you land with it (Pop, pop, pop)
I let you drive and slide with my bros where they be laying with it (Skrrt)
I work this bitch, I open up a can with it
Like fuck the stove, I make it jump without my hand in it

I don't need no molly to be savage, uh
When I'm on that molly, I feel savage, uh, uh
She the definition of a bad bitch
Stole her, I'm the definition of a bandit, uh, ayy
I don't need no molly to be savage, uh, ayy
But when I'm on the molly, I feel savage
Ayy, my girl the definition of a bad bitch
Stole her heart, I'm the definition of a bandit",4603791
148959,3312829,Sanctuary,rb,Joji,2019,1147911,{},"
Go ahead and park after dark
Fallen star, I'm your one call away
Motel halls, neon walls
When night falls, I am your escape


When you lay alone, I ache
Something I wanted to feel


If you've been waitin' for fallin' in love
Babe, you don't have to wait on me
'Cause I've been aimin' for Heaven above
But an angel ain't what I need


Not anyone, you're the one
More than fun, you're the sanctuary
'Cause what you want is what I want
Sincerity

Souls that dream alone lie awake
I'll give you somethin' so real


If you've been waitin' for fallin' in love
Babe, you don't have to wait on me
'Cause I've been aimin' for Heaven above
But an angel ain't what I need


Hold me oh so close
'Cause you never know
Just how long our lives will be


If you've been waitin' for fallin' in love
Babe, you don't have to wait on me
'Cause I've been aimin' for Heaven above
But an angel ain't what I need",4606292
148966,3313178,Blueberry Faygo,rap,Lil Mosey,2020,1570475,{},"
Damn, Callan (Damn, Callan)


One bad bitch and she do what I say so (Yeah)
Two big 40's and a big-ass Draco (Boom, boom)
Three more millions when you ask how my day go (Yeah)
Poured up a four, now that's blueberry Faygo (Lean)
One false move and we straight to shootin' shit
Two small bands just to take you out real quick (Bands)
Three more hoes, pull up, I'm fucking shit (Yeah)
That's how it go, big bands, I'm thumbin' shit
Ayy, one bad bitch and she do what I say so (Yeah)
Two big 40's and a big ass Draco (Boom, boom)
Three more millions when you ask how my day go (Yeah)
Poured up a four, now that's blueberry Faygo (Lean)
One false move and we straight to shootin' shit
Two small bands just to take you out real quick (Bands)
Three more hoes, pull up, I'm fucking shit (Yeah)
That's how it go, big bands, I'm thumbin' shit

I'm with my niggas, yeah, we some rockstars
And I'm with my nigga, yeah, KK Wokhardt (KK Wokhardt)
This not my dick, lil' bitch, my Glock hard (Lil' bitch)
Straight to the cash (Cash), I'm a trapstar
Straight to the bag (Bag), I'm that nigga, huh?
Got me some gas, rollin' up some
Pfft, pfft, cash, yeah, I got me some
I ain't fucked since yesterday, I'ma fuck somethin'


One bad bitch and she do what I say so (Yeah)
Two big 40's and a big-ass Draco (Boom, boom)
Three more millions when you ask how my day go (Yeah)
Poured up a four, now that's blueberry Faygo (Lean)
One false move and we straight to shootin' shit
Two small bands just to take you out real quick (Bands)
Three more hoes, pull up, I'm fucking shit (Yeah)
That's how it go, big bands, I'm thumbin' shit


Three-oh clip in my nina (Boom, boom)
On my toes, Gucci, Valentino
She on go, your bitch for the team, uh (Lil' bitch)
'Cause you know your bitch want a winner (Winner)
I just went back to my city (To my city)
And you know they all fuckin' with me (Yeah, they is)
But it ain't safe, poles with me (Poles)
I'ma chase bands 'til they end me

One bad bitch and she do what I say so (Yeah)
Two big 40's and a big-ass Draco (Boom, boom)
Three more millions when you ask how my day go (Yeah)
Poured up a four, now that's blueberry Faygo (Lean)
One false move and we straight to shootin' shit
Two small bands just to take you out real quick (Bands)
Three more hoes, pull up, I'm fucking shit (Yeah)
That's how it go, big bands, I'm thumbin' shit
Ayy, one bad bitch and she do what I say so (Yeah)
Two big 40's and a big-ass Draco (Boom, boom)
Three more millions when you ask how my day go (Yeah)
Poured up a four, now that's blueberry Faygo (Lean)
One false move and we straight to shootin' shit
Two small bands just to take you out real quick (Bands)
Three more hoes, pull up, I'm fucking shit (Yeah)
That's how it go, big bands, I'm thumbin' shit",4606781
149102,3317064,Lalala,rap,Y2K & bbno$,2019,1631174,"{""Y2K & bbno\\$""}","
Did I really just forget that melody?
Naw, nana, bananana, nanananananana (Nana, ah-ah)
Alright, dada, dadadada


When I popped off then your girl gave me just a little bit of lockjaw
Baby so cold, he from the north, he from the Canada
Bankroll so low, I got nothing else that I can withdraw
Ran out the door
I shine my wrist, it go like shashasha, shashasha
I got your bitch singing, lalalala, lalala
I shine my wrist, it go like shashasha, shashasha
I got your bitch singing, lalalala, lalala
(How I stride like that)


Amex, no cap, eight hundred score
They wonder how (How I guap like that)
I rap my lyrics when I perform
They wonder how (How I stride like that)
Married to the grind, I brought my ring
I'm corny, but your girly want the dick
Modest with my jewels, but check the bank
Finally got the money, say my thanks

When I popped off then your girl gave me just a little bit of lockjaw
Baby so cold, he from the north, he from the Canada
Bankroll so low, I got nothing else that I can withdraw
Ran out the door
I shine my wrist, it go like shashasha, shashasha
I got your bitch singing, lalalala, lalala
I shine my wrist, it go like shashasha, shashasha
I got your bitch singing, lalalala, lalala
(How I stride like that)


Haha, I'm at the bank again
They wonder how (How I guap like that)
Pink whip with flames all on the side
They wonder how (How I stride like that)
Got that Gucci on my body, now she tryna pipe me, woo
Popped a Lucy, loosey-goosey, sussy boy, I keep you cool
Got the paper, went to school
Be careful who you callin' fool, ayy, ha, ayy


When I popped off then your girl gave me just a little bit of lockjaw
Baby so cold, he from the north, he from the Canada
Bankroll so low, I got nothing else that I can withdraw
Ran out the door
I shine my wrist, it go like shashasha, shashasha
I got your bitch singing, lalalala, lalala
I shine my wrist, it go like shashasha, shashasha
I got your bitch singing, lalalala, lalala
(How I stride like that)",4611386
149427,3328415,You Need To Calm Down,pop,Taylor Swift,2019,1432340,{},"
You are somebody that I don't know
But you're takin' shots at me like it's Patrón
And I'm just like, damn, it's 7 AM
Say it in the street, that's a knock-out
But you say it in a Tweet, that's a cop-out
And I'm just like, ""Hey, are you okay?""


And I ain't tryna mess with your self-expression
But I've learned a lesson that stressin' and obsessin' 'bout somebody else is no fun
And snakes and stones never broke my bones


So oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
You need to calm down, you're being too loud
And I'm just like oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh (Oh)
You need to just stop, like can you just not step on my gown?
You need to calm down


You are somebody that we don't know
But you're comin' at my friends like a missile
Why are you mad when you could be GLAAD? (You could be GLAAD)
Sunshine on the street at the parade
But you would rather be in the dark ages
Makin' that sign must've taken all night

You just need to take several seats and then try to restore the peace
And control your urges to scream about all the people you hate
'Cause shade never made anybody less gay


So oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
You need to calm down, you're being too loud
And I'm just like oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh (Oh)
You need to just stop, like can you just not step on his gown?
You need to calm down


And we see you over there on the internet
Comparing all the girls who are killing it
But we figured you out
We all know now we all got crowns
You need to calm down


Oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh
You need to calm down (You need to calm down)
You're being too loud (You're being too loud)
And I'm just like oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh, oh-oh (Oh)
You need to just stop (Can you stop?)
Like can you just not step on our gowns?
You need to calm down",4625737
149558,3331340,Money in the Grave,rap,Drake,2019,1344569,"{""Rick Ross""}","
Yeah, okay
Lil CC on the beat, mmm
Yeah, yeah


I mean, where the fuck should I really even start?
I got hoes that I'm keepin' in the dark
I got my niggas 'cross the street livin' large
Thinkin' back to the fact that they dead
Thought my raps wasn't facts 'til they sat with the bars
I got two phones, one need a charge
Yeah, they twins, I could tell they ass apart
I got big packs comin' on the way
I got big stacks comin' out the safe
I got Lil Max with me, he the wave
It's a big gap between us in the game
In the next life, I'm tryna stay paid
When I die, put my money in the grave


When I die, put my money in the grave
I really gotta put a couple niggas in they place
Really just lapped every nigga in the race
I really might tat ""Realest Nigga"" on my face
Lil CC let it slap with the bass
I used to save hoes with a mask and a cape
Now I'm like, ""Nah, love, I'm good, go away""
Ain't about to die with no money, I done gave it

I was on top when that shit meant a lot
Still on top like I'm scared of the drop
Still on top and these niggas wanna swap
Niggas wanna swap like it's Slauson or Watts
I don't wanna change 'cause I'm good where I'm at
Mob ties, so I'm always good where I'm at
Word to Junior, Jazzy, Baby J
Tell 'em when I die, put my money in the grave


Couple figures, killers call and collect (Collect)
She fuck a nigga, then she on to the next (Next)
Really livin' large, she in awe with a mack
When you niggas thinkin' small in the mall with a rat (Rat)
Roll with us if you really wanna get it (Get it)
Go get a half a million in the Sprinter (Sprinter)
Phone ringin', bitches know a big tipper (Tipper)
I got the hookup and there's really no limit (Limit)
Dead broke is in you nigga DNA (DNA)
Rickey Smiley's in Decatur with the yé
Lil' nigga, just another state case
Bury my motherfuckin' Chase Bank, time to bounce (Bounce)
Gotta count on my allowance (Gotta count on my allowance)
You niggas snitches so I gotta reroute it (So I gotta reroute it)
A nigga drippin' like I got a zillion dollars
Got the trap jumpin' like Zion when I rebound it
Then I'm out (Then I'm out)
And I'll never talk about it (About it)
The homies quiet, but we all smoke the loudest (Loudest)
Rich niggas and I'm really bein' modest
'Cause the way I do my deals, never treated like a artist
Want the house (House)
You could DM my accountant
My per diem six figures and I'm countin'
Nine figures was the goal 'til I hit it
These niggas ain't livin', so bury mine with me
Ross got it (Maybach Music)

When I die, put my money in the grave
I really gotta put a couple niggas in they place
Really just lapped every nigga in the race
I really might tat ""Realest Nigga"" on my face
Lil CC let it slap with the bass
I used to save hoes with a mask and a cape
Now I'm like, ""Nah, love, I'm good, go away""
Ain't about to die with no money, I done gave it",4629364
149836,3340471,Señorita,pop,Shawn Mendes & Camila Cabello,2019,2822601,{},"
I love it when you call me señorita
I wish I could pretend I didn't need ya
But every touch is ooh-la-la-la
It's true, la-la-la
Ooh, I should be runnin'
Ooh, you keep me coming for ya


Land in Miami
The air was hot from summer rain
Sweat drippin' off me
Before I even knew her name, la-la-la
It felt like ooh-la-la-la, yeah, no
Sapphire moonlight
We danced for hours in the sand
Tequila Sunrise
Her body fit right in my hands, la-la-la
It felt like ooh-la-la-la, yeah


I love it when you call me señorita
I wish I could pretend I didn't need ya
But every touch is ooh-la-la-la
It's true, la-la-la
Ooh, I should be runnin'
Ooh, you know I love it when you call me señorita
I wish it wasn't so damn hard to leave ya
But every touch is ooh-la-la-la
It's true, la-la-la
Ooh, I should be runnin'
Ooh, you keep me coming for ya

Locked in the hotel
There's just some things that never change
You say we're just friends
But friends don't know the way you taste, la-la-la (La, la, la)
'Cause you know it's been a long time coming
Don't ya let me fall, oh
Ooh, when your lips undress me, hooked on your tongue
Ooh, love, your kiss is deadly, don't stop


I love it when you call me señorita
I wish I could pretend I didn't need ya
But every touch is ooh-la-la-la
It's true, la-la-la
Ooh, I should be runnin'
Ooh, you know I love it when you call me señorita
I wish it wasn't so damn hard to leave ya (So damn hard to leave ya)
But every touch is ooh-la-la-la
It's true, la-la-la (True la-la)
Ooh, I should be runnin'
Ooh, you keep me coming for ya


All along, I've been coming for ya (For you)
And I hope it meant something to you (Oh)
Call my name, I'll be coming for ya (Coming for you)
Coming for ya (Coming for you)
For ya
For ya (Oh, she loves it when I call)
For ya
Ooh, I should be runnin'
Ooh, you keep me coming for ya",4641031
150102,3349413,Ballin,rap,Mustard & Roddy Ricch,2019,1013961,{},"
I don't really wanna go
I don't really wanna stay
But I really hope and pray
Can we get it together?
Get it together
Mustard on the beat, ho


I put the new Forgis on the Jeep
I trap until the bloody bottoms is underneath
'Cause all my niggas got it out the streets
I keep a hundred racks inside my jeans
I remember hittin' the mall with the whole team
Now a nigga can't answer calls 'cause I'm ballin'
I was wakin' up, gettin' racks in the morning
I was broke, now I'm rich, these niggas salty


All this designer on my body got me drip, drip, ayy
Straight up out the Yajects, I'm a big Crip
If I got a pint of lean, I'ma sip, sip
I run the racks up with my queen like London and Nip
But I got rich on all these niggas, I didn't forget, back
I had to go through the struggle, I didn't forget that
I hopped inside of the Maybach and now I can sit back
These bitches know me now 'cause I got them big racks
'Cause I'm gettin' money now, I know you heard that
Young nigga on the corner, bitch, I had to serve crack
Uncle fronted me some P's, had to get them birds back
We came up on dirty money, I gave it a birdbath
Cut off the brain and I give my bitch a new coupe
Either you from the Yah Gang or you're SuWoop
Got a New Orleans bitch and man, that pussy voodoo
And I'm that nigga now, who knew?

I put the new Forgis on the Jeep
I trap until the bloody bottoms is underneath
'Cause all my niggas got it out the streets
I keep a hundred racks inside my jeans
I remember hittin' the mall with the whole team
Now a nigga can't answer calls 'cause I'm ballin'
I was wakin' up, gettin' racks in the morning
I was broke, now I'm rich, these niggas salty


I been wakin' up to get the money, woah, woah
Got a bad bitch, her ass tatted, woah, woah
Givenchy to my toes, two twins, I'm fucking 'em both
I put her in a new AP, the water like a boat
I was down bad on my dick, where was you niggas at?
I know you turned your back on me just to get some racks
I seen you swerve back, 'cause I'm in the black 'Bach
New diamonds on me, fuck a flash, this ain't Snapchat
'Cause I been gettin' paid
Yellow diamonds on me look like lemonade
Got my baby mama that new Bentayga
Tryna get the dough, Joe, like a sensei, yeah
Rolls Royce umbrellas when I'm in the rain
I just mind my business
I got brothers that did the time, I ain't kiddin'
All these rappers just talk about it, I live it
Goin' up, I ain't got no sky limit, yeah, yeah, yeah

I put the new Forgis on the Jeep
I trap until the bloody bottoms is underneath
'Cause all my niggas got it out the streets
I keep a hundred racks inside my jeans
I remember hittin' the mall with the whole team
Now a nigga can't answer calls 'cause I'm ballin'
I was wakin' up, gettin' racks in the morning
I was broke, now I'm rich, these niggas salty


I, ayy, yeah
I've been ballin', lil' nigga
Now watch me ball on these niggas
Yeah, now watch me ball on these niggas, yeah
Now watch me ball on these niggas
Now watch me ball on these niggas, yeah, yeah",4651861
150674,3367120,Righteous,rap,Juice WRLD,2020,1143211,{},"
I will (I will)
I will (I will)
I will
Oh-ooh (Oh-ooh)
Uh (Uh)


All white Gucci suit, I'm feeling righteous, yeah
I know that the truth is hard to digest, yeah
Five or six pills in my right hand, yeah
Codeine runneth over on my nightstand
Takin' medicine to fix all of the damage
My anxiety the size of a planet (Yeah, ooh)
Holes in my skull, over time
My heart's over ice (Woah)


Over ice, I'm freezing
Beautiful eyes, deceiving
We may die this evening
Coughing and wheezing, bleeding
Hi, I'm anxious so
Blood moons are my eyes, stay low
Red and black, they glow
Under attack, in my soul
When it's my time, I'll know
Never seen a hell so cold
Yeah, we'll make it out, I know
We'll run right through the flames, let's go

All white Gucci suit, I'm feeling righteous, yeah
I know that the truth is hard to digest, yeah
Five or six pills in my right hand, yeah
Codeine runneth over on my nightstand
Taking medicine to fix all of the damage
My anxiety the size of a planet (Yeah, ooh)
Holes in my skull, over time
My heart's over ice (Woah, uh)


I'm in too deep
Can't swim like me
We're drowning, so I will sing
My demons turn face under me
Inhale, exhale, but I can't breathe
Too busy drinking codeine doin' high speeds
Crash (Shh), pour a four, sip it slow, make the time pass
Take a pill for the thrill, have a relapse
Devil in my head tryna run gym laps
I ain't tryna race, he don't even know me like that


All white Gucci suit, I'm feeling righteous
I know that the truth is hard to digest
Five or six pills in my right hand
Codeine runneth over on my nightstand
Taking medicine to fix all of the damage
My anxiety the size of a planet (Yeah, ooh)
Holes in my skull, over time
My heart's over ice (Woah)

I will sing",4673513
151124,3384401,Save Your Tears,pop,The Weeknd,2020,1536269,{},"
Ooh
Na-na, yeah


I saw you dancing in a crowded room (Uh)
You look so happy when I'm not with you
But then you saw me, caught you by surprise
A single teardrop falling from your eye


I don't know why I run away
I make you cry when I run away


You could've asked me why I broke your heart
You could've told me that you fell apart
But you walked past me like I wasn't there
And just pretended like you didn't care


I don't know why I run away
I make you cry when I run away

Take me back 'cause I wanna stay
Save your tears for another


Save your tears for another day
Save your tears for another day (So)


I made you think that I would always stay
I said some things that I should never say
Yeah, I broke your heart like someone did to mine
And now you won't love me for a second time


I don't know why I run away, oh, girl
Said, I make you cry when I run away


Girl, take me back 'cause I wanna stay
Save your tears for another
I realize that I'm much too late
And you deserve someone better


Save your tears for another day (Oh yeah)
Save your tears for another day (Yeah)

I don't know why I run away
I'll make you cry when I run away


Save your tears for another day
Ooh, girl, I said (Ah)
Save your tears for another day (Ah)


Save your tears for another day (Ah)
Save your tears for another day (Ah)",4694697
151223,3389623,Dior,rap,Pop Smoke,2019,1657376,{},"
Traphouse Mob
Huh,  roll another one
Said  I'm never lackin', always pistol packing (This is a Melo beat)
With them automatics, we gon' send him to heaven (Huh)
Wait, wait, wait, wait, ayy, ayy, woo (Aw, shit), huh
Oh,  you feelin' sturdy, huh? (You feelin' sturdy, man)
Shake  some', huh
Shake it, huh, shake it, huh, shake it, huh


She  like the way that I dance
She like the way that I move
She like the way that I rock
She like the way that I woo
And  she let it clap for a nigga
(She let it clap for a nigga)
And she throw it back for a nigga
(Yeah, she throw it back for a nigga)
Mike Amiri, Mike Amiri
Billie Jean, Billie Jean (Uh)
Christian Dior, Dior
I'm up in all the stores
When it rains, it pours
She like the way I rrr
Mike Amiri, Mike Amiri
Billie Jean, Billie Jean (Uh)
Christian Dior, Dior
I'm up in all the stores
When it rains, it pours
She like the way I rrr

When I walk in the spot, thirty on me
Buy out the club, niggas know that I'm paid
Bitch, I'm a thot, get me lit
I can't fuck with these niggas 'cause niggas is gay
All on my page suckin' dick
All in my comments and screamin' my name
While I'm in the club, throwin' them hundreds and fifties and ones and ones
Pop Smoke, they know I'm wildin'
If I'm on the island, I'm snatchin' the cell
Brody got locked, denied his bail (Woo)
Until he free, I'm raisin' hell
Tell my shooters call me FaceTime
For all the times we had to face time
Free D-Nice, he doin' state time
If you need the glizzy, you could take mine
Please don't come out your mouth, you know I'm like that
I'll make a movie like TNT (Baow)
Glock-30 on me, ask who really want it
I bet I air it like BNB
Nappy Blue wildin' in my section
And I keep that .38 for the weapon
Remember when I came home from corrections (Uh-huh)
All the bad bitches in my direction (Uh)


She like the way that I dance
She like the way that I move
She like the way that I rock
She like the way that I woo
And she let it clap for a nigga
(She let it clap for a nigga)
And she throw it back for a nigga
(Yeah, she throw it back for a nigga)
Mike Amiri, Mike Amiri
Billie Jean, Billie Jean (Uh)
Christian Dior, Dior
I'm up in all the stores
When it rains, it pours
She like the way I rrr
Mike Amiri, Mike Amiri
Billie Jean, Billie Jean (Uh)
Christian Dior, Dior
I'm up in all the stores
When it rains, it pours
She like the way I rrr",4700838
151445,3395965,​hot girl bummer,pop,blackbear,2019,2613320,{​blackbear},"
Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
I'm through, I'm through, I'm through
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum


This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum
This that throw up in your Birkin bag
Hook up with someone random
This that social awkward suicide
That buy your lips and buy your likes
I swear she had a man
But shit hit different when it's Thursday night


That college dropout music
Every day leg day, she be too thick
And my friends are all annoying
But we go dumb, yeah, we go stupid
This that 10K on the table
Just so we can be secluded
And the vodka came diluted
One more line, I'm superhuman

Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
I'm through, I'm through, I'm through
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum
Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
Fuck you, and you, and you
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum


This that hot girl bummer two-step
They can't box me in, I'm too left
This that drip, it's more like oceans
They can't fit me in a Trojan
Out of pocket, but I'm always in my bag
Yeah, that's the slogan
This that, ""Who's all there?""
I'm pullin' up wit' a emo chick that's broken


This that college dropout music
Every day leg day, she be too thick
And my friends are all annoying
But we go dumb, yeah, we go stupid
This that 10K on the table
Just so we can be secluded
And the vodka came diluted
One more line, I'm superhuman

Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
I'm through, I'm through, I'm through
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum
Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
Fuck you, and you, and you
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum


This that college dropout music
Every day leg day, she be too thick
And my friends are all annoying
But we go dumb, yeah, we go stupid
This that college dropout music
Every day leg day, she be too thick
And my friends are all annoying
But we go dumb, yeah, we go stupid
We go stupid, we go stupid, we go-
And you want me to change? Fuck you!


Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
I'm through, I'm through, I'm through
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum
Fuck you, and you, and you
I hate your friends and they hate me too
Fuck you, and you, and you
This that hot girl bummer anthem
Turn it up and throw a tantrum",4708753
151590,3399444,Cruel Summer,pop,Taylor Swift,2019,1205142,{},"
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


Fever dream high in the quiet of the night
You know that I caught it (Oh yeah, you're right, I want it)
Bad, bad boy, shiny toy with a price
You know that I bought it (Oh yeah, you're right, I want it)


Killing me slow, out the window
I'm always waiting for you to be waiting below
Devils roll the dice, angels roll their eyes
What doesn't kill me makes me want you more


And it's new, the shape of your body
It's blue, the feeling I've got
And it's ooh, whoa oh
It's a cruel summer
It's cool, that's what I tell 'em
No rules in breakable heaven
But ooh, whoa oh
It's a cruel summer
With you

Hang your head low in the glow of the vending machine
I'm not dying (Oh yeah, you're right, I want it)
We say that we'll just screw it up in these trying times
We're not trying (Oh yeah, you're right, I want it)


So cut the headlights, summer's a knife
I'm always waiting for you just to cut to the bone
Devils roll the dice, angels roll their eyes
And if I bleed, you'll be the last to know


Oh, it's new, the shape of your body
It's blue, the feeling I've got
And it's ooh, whoa oh
It's a cruel summer
It's cool, that's what I tell 'em
No rules in breakable heaven
But ooh, whoa oh
It's a cruel summer
With you


I'm drunk in the back of the car
And I cried like a baby coming home from the bar (Oh)
Said, ""I'm fine,"" but it wasn't true
I don't wanna keep secrets just to keep you
And I snuck in through the garden gate
Every night that summer just to seal my fate (Oh)
And I scream, ""For whatever it's worth
I love you, ain't that the worst thing you ever heard?""
He looks up, grinning like a devil

It's new, the shape of your body
It's blue, the feeling I've got
And it's ooh, whoa oh
It's a cruel summer
It's cool, that's what I tell 'em
No rules in breakable heaven
But ooh, whoa oh
It's a cruel summer
With you


I'm drunk in the back of the car
And I cried like a baby coming home from the bar (Oh)
Said, ""I'm fine,"" but it wasn't true
I don't wanna keep secrets just to keep you
And I snuck in through the garden gate
Every night that summer just to seal my fate (Oh)
And I scream, ""For whatever it's worth
I love you, ain't that the worst thing you ever heard?""
(Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)",4712978
152098,3419100,Boyfriend,pop,Ariana Grande & Social House,2019,1009606,{},"
I'm a motherfuckin' train wreck
I don't wanna be too much
But I don't wanna miss your touch
And you don't seem to give a fuck
I don't wanna keep you waiting
But I do just what I have to do
And I might not be the one for you
But you ain't allowed to have no boo


'Cause I know we be so complicated
But we be so smitten, it's crazy
I can't have what I want, but neither can you


You ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
But you don't want me to see nobody else
And I don't want you to see nobody
But you ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
But you don't want me to touch nobody else (Nobody)
Baby, we ain't gotta tell nobody

Even though you ain't mine, I promise the way we fight
Make me honestly feel like we just in love (Love)
'Cause, baby, when push comes to shove (Shove)
Damn, baby, I'm a train wreck, too (Too)
I lose my mind when it comes to you
I take time with the ones I choose
And I don't want a smile if it ain't from you, yeah


I know we be so complicated
Lovin' you sometimes drive me crazy
'Cause I can't have what I want and neither can you (No, no)


You ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
But you don't want me to see nobody else
And I don't want you to see nobody
But you ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
But you don't want me to touch nobody else (Nobody)
Baby, we ain't gotta tell nobody


I wanna kiss you (Yeah), don't wanna miss you (Yeah)
But I can't be with you 'cause I got issues (No)
Yeah, on the surface, seem like it's easy
Careful with words, but it's still hard to read me
Stress high when the trust low (Mmm)
Bad vibes, where'd the fun go? (Oh)
Try to open up and love more (Love more)
Try to open up and love more

If you were my boyfriend
And you were my girlfriend
I prolly wouldn't see nobody else
But I can't guarantee that by myself


You ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend, you ain't my boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend, I ain't your girlfriend)
But you don't want me to see nobody else (Nobody)
And I don't want you to see nobody
But you ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend, you know you ain't my boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend, yeah, mmm)
But you don't want me to touch nobody else (Nobody)
Baby, we ain't gotta tell nobody (Oh yeah)
You ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend)
But you don't want me to see nobody else
And I don't want you to see nobody
But you ain't my boyfriend (Boyfriend)
And I ain't your girlfriend (Girlfriend, yeah)
But you don't want me to touch nobody else (Nobody)
Baby, we ain't gotta tell nobody",4737178
152508,3436757,Circles,pop,Post Malone,2019,2029105,{},"
Oh, oh, oh
Oh,  oh, oh
Oh,  oh, oh, oh, oh


We couldn't turn around 'til we were upside down
I'll be the bad guy now, but know I ain't too proud
I  couldn't be there even when I tried
You  don't believe it, we do this every time


Seasons change and our love went cold
Feed  the flame 'cause we can't let go
Run away, but we're running in circles
Run away, run away
I dare you to do something
I'm  waiting on you again, so I don't take the blame
Run away, but we're running in circles
Run away, run away, run away

Let go, I got a feeling that it's time to let go
I said so, I knew that this was doomed from the get-go
You thought that it was special, special
But it was just the sex though, the sex though
And I still hear the echoes (The echoes)
I got a feeling that it's time to let it go, let it go


Seasons change and our love went cold
Feed the flame 'cause we can't let go
Run away, but we're running in circles
Run away, run away
I dare you to do something
I'm waiting on you again, so I don't take the blame
Run away, but we're running in circles
Run away, run away, run away


Maybe you don't understand what I'm going through
It's only me, what you got to lose?
Make up your mind, tell me, what are you gonna do?
It's only me, let it go


Seasons change and our love went cold
Feed the flame 'cause we can't let go
Run away, but we're running in circles
Run away, run away
I dare you to do something
I'm waiting on you again, so I don't take the blame
Run away, but we're running in circles
Run away, run away, run away",4759464
152647,3441587,F.N,rap,Lil Tjay,2019,1130282,{},"
(Fuck niggas, I don't trust niggas
If  you bust triggers and you tell, you a fuck nigga)
If  you tell, you a fuck nigga
(How you tell on the gang? If you mention my name
Boy, I promise I'ma kill you, better duck, nigga
What's  up with you? I grew up with you
Used  to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
I used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you)
(Fuck  niggas, I don't trust niggas
If you bust triggers and you tell, you a fuck nigga)
Fuck nigga
Nah, Lil Tjay (Fuck nigga), yeah, yeah
(Now  I'm wishing that a bus hit you)
Yeah, yeah, yeah (Skrrt, skrrt, yeah)


Grrr, pow, I'ma skip town, see my wrist drown
Everybody wanna fuck with me for benefits now
Man, I wish my nigga Smelly could've seen me lit now
Sit down, maybe roll up, blow a spliff down
Time go by, niggas change so much
Why the fuck these niggas looking at my chain so much?
They just mad 'cause I departed from the game so much
One false move and the gang gon' bust

Cartier glasses, 20/20, got a clear view
You a man, I don't fear you
Act up, we gon' mask up, boy, I dare you
Brody catch a body, I'ma leave you in the rearview
Could have did it to me, lil' nigga, you were scared to
You a bluff and you not who you appear to
You'd be starstruck if you see a nigga near you
And your bitch wanna fuck, I don't care to
Careful, if I say links, plan's canceled
I can have your shorty in my bed doing dance moves
Fuck that, let's get right back to the real shit
In the field shit, niggas really used to drill shit
Mama stressed out, whole lot she gotta deal with
Swear every real nigga gon' feel this
Smokin' on drugs 'cause there's too much to deal with
SB strapped up in the field with it


Fuck niggas, I don't trust niggas
If you bust triggers and you tell, you a fuck nigga
How you tell on the gang? If you mention my name
Boy, I promise I'ma kill you, better duck, nigga
What's up with you? I grew up with you
Used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
I used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
Fuck niggas, I don't trust niggas
If you bust triggers and you tell, you a fuck nigga
How you tell on the gang? If you mention my name
Boy, I promise I'ma kill you, better duck, nigga
What's up with you? I grew up with you
Used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
I used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you

My mama know about the pain, thought I'd never change
But looking back, for the fame, I felt the same
I was stuck up in the streets, but I had a brain
I ain't have no money, we was looking for a nigga chain
And shit, all I ever wanted was to have a name
Had a lot of shit to lose, not enough to gain
And that fuck nigga changed, went against the grain
Found out my homie went fed, almost went insane
Strictly business, you ain't with it, you get parked, nigga
I don't know you, you wasn't with me from the start, nigga
I remember catching stains in the park, nigga
Me and Bubba tryna catch an opp after dark, nigga
My mama told me, ""Wisen up, be a smart nigga""
So all my niggas on go like a kart, nigga
Smelly drive mean a bullet to your heart, nigga
I don't really wanna speak facts, see the chart, nigga


Grrr, pow, I'ma skip town, see my wrist drown
Everybody wanna fuck with me for benefits now
Man, I wish my nigga Smelly could've seen me lit now
Sit down, maybe roll up, blow a spliff down
Time go by, niggas change so much
Why the fuck these niggas looking at my chain so much?
They just mad 'cause I departed from the game so much
One false move and the gang gon' bust

Fuck niggas, I don't trust niggas
If you bust triggers and you tell, you a fuck nigga
How you tell on the gang? If you mention my name
Boy, I promise I'ma kill you, better duck, nigga
What's up with you? I grew up with you
Used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
I used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
Fuck niggas, I don't trust niggas
If you bust triggers and you tell, you a fuck nigga
How you tell on the gang? If you mention my name
Boy, I promise I'ma kill you, better duck, nigga
What's up with you? I grew up with you
Used to fuck with you, now I'm wishing that a bus hit you
I used to fuck with you, and now I'm wishing that a bus hit you


Lil Tjay
Yeah, yeah, yeah
Oh",4765699
152873,3451703,Anime Thighs,rap,MC Virgins,2019,1006507,{​wonder},"
Kare wa pekori to ojigi shite watashi ni kiita
Doko he yuku no? Nani wo suru no?
Watashi nani mo ienakute naita no
Utsumuita kono odeko tonton tataita no wa
Kimi nano kana? Chigau no kana?
Me wo aketai no ni mada kowain da


Anime thighs when she open up so wide, I got a twinkle in my eye
(Huh?) pussy is so tight, I just really wanna pipe
Oh my God, she got them big ass titties, she's only ""Wow"" (Ayy, ayy)
Anime thighs when she open up so wide, I got a twinkle in my eye
(Huh?) pussy is so tight, I just really wanna pipe
Oh my God, she got them big ass titties, she's only ""Wow"" (Ayy, ayy, ayy)


Bitch, I'm 'bout to fuck this cutie so I whip out my katana
And I knock this lil' bitch out with just one hit like I'm Saitama
Why you act like I'm just starting? Like lil' bitch, I don't want drama
I still fly when she says ""No,"" call me Shigeo Kageyama, ayy
Sword fighting with my penis like I'm in a fuckin' dojo
All these bitches want me like my name was fuckin' JoJo
Damn, my penis is too tiny like it was a no show
Bitch don't want your coochie, watch anime with the bros though

Sailor Moon my motherfuckin' bitch
I might pull up, give those thighs a little motherfuckin' kiss
And man if you talkin' shit, tell Ryuk you on the list
Yeah, your sister is my groupie, she take this anime dick
Okay, okay, like little bitch, I don't care if that fat ass is 2D
Score a bounty on that pussy, you can call me Spike Lee
Puttin' out fire, gettin' ice, bitch, I'm Todoroki
And if you got some shit to say then you can say it to me


Anime thighs when she open up so wide, I got a twinkle in my eye
(Huh?) pussy is so tight, I just really wanna pipe
Oh my God, she got them big ass titties, she's only ""Wow"" (Ayy, ayy)
Anime thighs when she open up so wide, I got a twinkle in my eye
(Huh?) pussy is so tight, I just really wanna pipe
Oh my God, she got them big ass titties, she's only ""Wow"" (Ayy, ayy)


Asuna, Asuna, Mikasa, please
Can you just give me head? Please, just get on your knees
Bitch, I'll beat up that ass like my name is Bruce Lee
And I'll eat up that pussy like I'm Kaneki, ayy
All these people rhyming, are they even trying?
I be buying all this hentai so I jerk it, I'm not lying
Now I'm sighing 'cause I want Hatsune Miku, now I'm crying
When I fuck anime bitches I'll be moaning and be whining, ayy

Thick thighs look sexy
Even when especially she decides to wear her dress
UwU, nuzzles on my neck
Now we layin' on the bed
Man, I love my body pillow especially givin' head
You know what's next


Anime thighs when she open up so wide, I got a twinkle in my eye
(Huh?) pussy is so tight, I just really wanna pipe
Oh my God, she got them big ass titties, she's only ""Wow""


Tehehehehe, that was gay",4778084
153882,3494209,Good News,pop,Mac Miller,2020,1260827,{},"
I spent the whole day in my head
Do a little spring cleanin'
I'm always too busy dreamin'
Well, maybe I should wake up instead
A lot of things I regret, but I just say I forget
Why can't it just be easy?
Why does everybody need me to stay?
Oh, I hate the feelin'
When you're high, but you're underneath the ceilin'
Got the cards in my hand, I hate dealin', yeah
Get everything I need, then I'm gone, but it ain't stealin'
Can I get a break?
I wish that I could just get out my goddamn way
What is there to say?
There ain't a better time than today
Well, maybe I'll lay down for a little, yeah
Instead of always tryin' to figure everything out
And all I do is say sorry
Half the time I don't even know what I'm sayin' it about

Good news, good news, good news
That's all they wanna hear
No, they don't like it when I'm down
But when I'm flyin', oh
It make 'em so uncomfortable
So different, what's the difference?


When it ain't that bad
It could always be worse
I'm runnin' out of gas, hardly anything left
Hope I make it home from work
Well, so tired of bein' so tired
Why I gotta build somethin' beautiful just to go set it on fire?
I'm no liar, but
Sometimes the truth don't sound like the truth
Maybe 'cause it ain't
I just love the way it sound when I say it, yeah
It's what I do
If you know me, it ain't anything new
Wake up to the moon, haven't seen the sun in a while
But I heard that the sky's still blue, yeah
I heard they don't talk about me too much no more
And that's the problem with a closed door

Good news, good news, good news
That's all they wanna hear
No, they don't like it when I'm down
But when I'm flyin', oh
It make 'em so uncomfortable
So different, what's the difference?


There's a whole lot more for me waitin' on the other side
I'm always wonderin' if it feel like summer
I know maybe I'm too late, I could make it there some other time
I'll finally discover
That there's a whole lot more for me waitin'
That there's a whole lot more for me waitin'
I know maybe I'm too late, I could make it there some other time
Then I'll finally discover
That it ain't that bad, ain't so bad
Well, it ain't that bad, mm
At least it don't gotta be no more


No more, no more, no more, no more
No more, no more, no more, no more
Hey, hey
Mm, hey, mm, mm, mm",4831705
154020,3500087,Hollywoods Bleeding,rap,Post Malone,2019,1004114,{},"
Ooh, ooh
Ooh, ooh


Hollywood's bleeding, vampires feedin'
Darkness turns to dust
Everyone's gone, but no one's leavin'
Nobody left but us
Tryna chase a feelin', but we'll never feel it
Ridin' on the last train home
Dyin' in our sleep, we're livin' out a dream
We only make it out alone


I just keep on hopin' that you call me
You say you wanna see me, but you can't right now
You never took the time to get to know me
We're scared of losin' somethin' that we never found
We're runnin' out of reasons, but we can't let go
Yeah, Hollywood is bleedin', but we call it home

Outside, the winter sky turnin' grey
City up in smoke, it's only ash when it rains
Howl at the moon and go to sleep in the day
Love for everybody 'til the drugs fade away
In the mornin', blocking out the sun with the shades
She gotta check her pulse to tell herself that she okay
It seem like dyin' young is an honor
But who'd be at my funeral? I wonder
I go out and all they eyes on me
I show out, do you like what you see?
And now they closin' in on me
Let 'em sharpen all they teeth
This is more than I can handle, blood in my Lambo'
Wish I could go, oh, I'm losin' ho-ope
I light a candle, some Palo Santo
For all these demons, wish I could just go home


I just keep on hopin' that you call me
You say you wanna see me, but you can't right now
You never took the time to get to know me
We're scared of losin' somethin' that we never found
We're runnin' out of reasons, but we can't let go
Yeah, Hollywood is bleedin', but we call it home",4839087
154152,3504449,Given - 冬のはなし Fuyunohanashi Romanized,rock,Genius Romanizations,2019,1619653,{},"


Mada toke kirezu ni nokotta
Hikage no yuki mitai na
Omoi wo daite ikiteru
Nee, boku wa kono koi wo
Donna kotoba de tojitara ii no


Anata no subete ga ashita wo nakushite
Eien no naka wo samayotte iru yo
Sayonara dekizu ni tachidomatta mama no
Boku to issho ni


Mada tokenai mahō no yōna
Soretomo noroi no yōna
Omoi nimotsu wo kakaeteru
Nee, boku wa kono machi de
Donna ashita wo sagaseba i no (Ah-ah)

Tsumetai namida ga sora de itetsuite
Yasashi furi shite mai ochiru koro ni
Hanareta dareka to darekaga ita koto
Tada soredake no hanashi


Anata no subete ga katachi wo nakushite mo
Eien ni boku no naka de ikiteku yo
Sayonara dekizu ni aruki dasu boku to
Zutto issho ni",4844784
154509,3520117,Sofia the First Main Title Theme From Sofia the First,pop,Ariel Winter,2012,1435764,{},"
I was a girl in the village doing alright
Then I became a princess overnight
Now I gotta figure out how to do it right
So much to learn and see
Up in the castle with my new family
In a school that's just for royalty
A whole enchanted world is waiting for me
I'm so excited to be (Sofia the First)
I'm finding out what being royal's all about (Sofia the First)
Making my way, it's an adventure every day (Sofia)
It's gonna be my time (Sofia)
To show them all that I'm Sofia the First",4864087
154716,3534033,Memories,pop,Maroon 5,2019,1664429,{},"
Here's to the ones that we got
Cheers to the wish you were here, but you're not
'Cause the drinks bring back all the memories
Of everything we've been through
Toast to the ones here today
Toast to the ones that we lost on the way
'Cause the drinks bring back all the memories
And the memories bring back, memories bring back you


There's a time that I remember, when I did not know no pain
When I believed in forever, and everything would stay the same
Now my heart feel like December when somebody say your name
'Cause I can't reach out to call you, but I know I will one day, yeah


Everybody hurts sometimes
Everybody hurts someday, ayy-ayy
But everything gon' be alright
Go and raise a glass and say, ayy

Here's to the ones that we got
Cheers to the wish you were here, but you're not
'Cause the drinks bring back all the memories
Of everything we've been through
Toast to the ones here today
Toast to the ones that we lost on the way
'Cause the drinks bring back all the memories
And the memories bring back, memories bring back you


Doo-doo, doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Memories bring back, memories bring back you


There's a time that I remember when I never felt so lost
When I felt all of the hatred was too powerful to stop (Ooh, yeah)
Now my heart feel like an ember and it's lighting up the dark
I'll carry these torches for ya that you know I'll never drop, yeah


Everybody hurts sometimes
Everybody hurts someday, ayy-ayy
But everything gon' be alright
Go and raise a glass and say, ayy

Here's to the ones that we got (Oh-oh)
Cheers to the wish you were here, but you're not
'Cause the drinks bring back all the memories
Of everything we've been through (No, no)
Toast to the ones here today (Ayy)
Toast to the ones that we lost on the way
'Cause the drinks bring back all the memories (Ayy)
And the memories bring back, memories bring back you


Doo-doo, doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo
Memories bring back, memories bring back you
Doo-doo, doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo-doo
Doo-doo-doo-doo, doo-doo-doo (Ooh, yeah)
Memories bring back, memories bring back you


Yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, no, no
Memories bring back, memories bring back you",4881650
155390,3556932,10000 Hours,country,Dan + Shay & Justin Bieber,2019,1533562,{},"
Do you love the rain, does it make you dance
When you're drunk with your friends at a party?
What's your favorite song, does it make you smile?
Do you think of me?


When you close your eyes, tell me, what are you dreamin'?
Everything, I wanna know it all


I'd spend ten thousand hours and ten thousand more
Oh, if that's what it takes to learn that sweet heart of yours
And I might never get there, but I'm gonna try
If it's ten thousand hours or the rest of my life
I'm gonna love you (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh)


Do you miss the road that you grew up on?
Did you get your middle name from your grandma?
When you think about your forever now, do you think of me?

When you close your eyes, tell me, what are you dreamin'?
Everything, I wanna know it all


I'd spend ten thousand hours and ten thousand more
Oh, if that's what it takes to learn that sweet heart of yours
And I might never get there, but I'm gonna try
If it's ten thousand hours or the rest of my life
I'm gonna love you (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh)
I'm gonna love you (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh)


Ooh, want the good and the bad and everything in between
Ooh, gotta cure my curiosity
Ooh, yeah


I'd spend ten thousand hours and ten thousand more
Oh, if that's what it takes to learn that sweet heart of yours (Sweet heart of yours)
And I might never get there, but I'm gonna try (Yeah)
If it's ten thousand hours or the rest of my life
I'm gonna love you (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh)
I'm gonna love you (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh)
Yeah
And I...
Do you love the rain, does it make you dance?
I'm gonna love you (I'm gonna love you)
I'm gonna love you",4910146
155398,3557182,Show Yourself,pop,Idina Menzel & Evan Rachel Wood,2019,1015458,{},"
Every inch of me is trembling
But not from the cold
Something is familiar
Like a dream I can reach but not quite hold
I can sense you there
Like a friend I've always known
I'm arriving
And it feels like I am home


I have always been a fortress
Cold secrets deep inside
You have secrets, too
But you don't have to hide


Show yourself
I'm dying to meet you
Show yourself
It's your turn
Are you the one I've been looking for
All of my life?
Show yourself
I'm ready to learn
Ah-ah, ah-ah
Ah-ah, ah-ah-ah

I've never felt so certain
All my life I've been torn
But I'm here for a reason
Could it be the reason I was born?
I have always been so different
Normal rules did not apply
Is this the day?
Are you the way
I finally find out why?


Show yourself
I'm no longer trembling
Here I am
I've come so far
You are the answer I've waited for
All of my life
Oh, show yourself
Let me see who you are


Come to me now
Open your door
Don't make me wait
One moment more
Oh, come to me now
Open your door
Don't make me wait
One moment more

Where the north wind meets the sea (Ah-ah, ah-ah)
There's a river (Ah-ah, ah-ah)
Full of memory (Memory, memory)
Come, my darling, homeward bound
I am found


Show yourself
Step into the power
Grow yourself
Into something new
You are the one you've been waiting for
All of my life (All of your life)
Oh, show yourself


Ah-ah, ah-ah
Ah-ah, ah-ah
Ah-ah, ah-ah
Ah-ah, ah-ah
Ah-ah, ah-ah
Ah-ah, ah-ah",4910484
156490,3592303,Lose You To Love Me,pop,Selena Gomez,2019,2836093,{},"
You promised the world and I fell for it
I put you first and you adored it
Set fires to my forest
And you let it burn
Sang off-key in my chorus
'Cause it wasn't yours
I saw the signs and I ignored it
Rose-colored glasses all distorted
Set fire to my purpose
And I let it burn
You got off on the hurtin'
When it wasn't yours, yeah


We'd always go into it blindly
I needed to lose you to find me
This dancing was killing me softly
I needed to hate you to love me, yeah


To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
I needed to lose you to love me, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
I needed to lose you to love me

I gave my all and they all know it
Then you tore me down and now it's showing
In two months, you replaced us
Like it was easy
Made me think I deserved it
In the thick of healing, yeah


We'd always go into it blindly
I needed to lose you to find me
This dancing was killing me softly
I needed to hate you to love me, yeah


To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
I needed to lose you to love me, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
I needed to lose you to love me


You promised the world and I fell for it
I put you first and you adored it
Set fires to my forest
And you let it burn
Sang off-key in my chorus

To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
I needed to hate you to love me, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
I needed to lose you to love me
To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah


And now the chapter is closed and done
To love, love, yeah
To love, love, yeah
To love, yeah
And now it's goodbye, it's goodbye for us",4953164
157180,3619292,Before You Go,pop,Lewis Capaldi,2019,1366879,{},"
I fell by the wayside like everyone else
I hate you, I hate you, I hate you but I was just kidding myself
Our every moment, I start to replace
'Cause now that they're gone, all I hear are the words that I needed to say


When you hurt under the surface
Like troubled water running cold
Well, time can heal but this won't


So, before you go
Was there something I could've said
To make your heart beat better?
If only I'd have known you had a storm to weather
So, before you go
Was there something I could've said
To make it all stop hurting?
It kills me how your mind can make you feel so worthless
So, before you go

Was never the right time, whenever you called
Went little by little by little until there was nothing at all
Our every moment, I start to replay
But all I can think about is seeing that look on your face


When you hurt under the surface
Like troubled water running cold
Well, time can heal but this won't


So, before you go
Was there something I could've said
To make your heart beat better?
If only I'd have known you had a storm to weather
So, before you go
Was there something I could've said
To make it all stop hurting?
It kills me how your mind can make you feel so worthless
So, before you go


Would we be better off by now
If I'd have let my walls come down?
Maybe, I guess we'll never know
You know, you know

Before you go
Was there something I could've said
To make your heart beat better?
If only I'd have known you had a storm to weather
So, before you go
Was there something I could've said
To make it all stop hurting?
It kills me how your mind can make you feel so worthless
So, before you go",4986655
157245,3621635,Say So,pop,Doja Cat,2019,1452616,{},"
Day to night to morning, keep with me in the moment
I'd let you had I known it, why don't you say so?
Didn't even notice, no punches left to roll with
You got to keep me focused; you want it? Say so
Day to night to morning, keep with me in the moment
I'd let you had I known it, why don't you say so?
Didn't even notice, no punches left to roll with
You got to keep me focused; you want it? Say so


It's been a long time since you fell in love
You ain't coming out your shell, you ain't really been yourself
Tell me, what must I do? (Do tell, my love)
'Cause luckily, I'm good at reading
I wouldn't bug him, but he won't stop cheesin'
And we can dance all day around it
If you frontin', I'll be bouncing
If you want it, scream it, shout it, babe
Before I leave you dry

Day to night to morning, keep with me in the moment
I'd let you had I known it, why don't you say so?
Didn't even notice, no punches left to roll with
You got to keep me focused; you want it? Say so
Day to night to morning, keep with me in the moment
I'd let you had I known it, why don't you say so?
Didn't even notice, no punches left to roll with
You got to keep me focused; you want it? Say so (Yeah)


Let me check my chest, my breath right quick (Ha)
He ain't ever seen it in a dress like this (Ah)
He ain't ever even been impressed like this
Prolly why I got him quiet on the set like zip
Like it, love it, need it bad
Take it, own it, steal it fast
Boy, stop playing, grab my ass
Why you actin' like you shy? (Hot)
Shut it, save it, keep it pushin'
Why you beating 'round the bush?
Knowin' you want all this woman
Never knock it 'til you try (Yah, yah)
All of them bitches hating I have you with me
All of my niggas sayin' you mad committed
Realer than anybody you had, and pretty
All of the body-ody, the ass and titties

Day to night to morning, keep with me in the moment
I'd let you had I known it, why don't you say so?
Didn't even notice, no punches left to roll with
You got to keep me focused; you want it? Say so
Day to night to morning, keep with me in the moment
I'd let you had I known it, why don't you say so?
Didn't even notice, no punches left to roll with
You got to keep me focused; you want it? Say so",4989524
157508,3633364,The Take,rb,Tory Lanez,2019,1229330,"{""Chris Brown""}","
Take you down
What I'm about
Take you down
What I'm about
Take you down
I really wanna take you down
And show you what I'm about
Can I take you down?
Your body, body, oh
Your body, body up and down


I'm gonna put you in seven positions for seventy minutes, you get it, babe
You got a lot on your mind, and I wanna ease it up and lick it and slip it in
You do a light scream on that ice cream when I scoop it and dip it in
Unzippin' the tight jeans and that feminine hygiene is magnificent
Tryna show you, girl, I'm different
I get to lickin', and stickin', and lickin', and stickin' it
'Til the pussy get too wet and it's drippin'
And splittin' both them legs like dividends
If it ends up how I want it, then you'll end up sittin' all over my bottom lip, baby
The feelin' of fuckin' you, feelings all up in you
Make it hard for you to bottle 'em, baby
This dick is too big just to swallow it, baby
But still you do it like it's Thanksgiving
And you gobblin', gobblin', gobblin', gobblin', baby
Like what's a goon to a goblin, baby?
That pussy hotter than the summer June in Metropolis, baby
No hidin' it, baby
She know what it is when I come around
Let me take you down

It ain't my first time, but baby girl, let's get it in, yeah (Let it's get in, yeah)
Bump and grind, already know (Already know, oh)
I wanna take you down again (Take you down again)
Hit that rewind button, oh-oh (Oh-oh)


Now let me take you down
Really wanna take you down, you down, you down (Ooh)
Take you down (I do), right now (Right now)
You know I know how (Oh-woah)


Come put that shit all on top of me, baby
I'm the one they feelin', so they copy me, baby
Got it copywritten, that's my property, baby
And the way that she whip it, it's drivin' me crazy (Huh)
Think I've been hittin' the lottery, baby
Buy you a Wraith, I'ma give you my safe
Put you in apartments, you parkin' in places
Yeah, that's the real-life Monopoly, baby
We got all night to get it right, babe
So let me play
We got our whole damn life, baby
So here we are, all alone in this room
Girl, you know what I came to do
Know you got me on your radio playin', old school CB
It's just me and you

It ain't my first time, but baby girl, let's get it in, yeah (Oh-woah, we don't need)
Bump and grind, already know (You already know)
I wanna take you down again (Oh-woah)
Hit that rewind button, oh-oh


Now let me take you down
Really wanna take you down (I wanna take you down), you down, you down (Ooh)
Take you down, right now (Right now)
You know I know how (I know how), ooh


Ooh, yeah, love
I promise not to give it to nobody, babe (You know I)
And promise you won't give it to nobody, babe (Know I)
And promise when you promise, keep them promises (Yeah, yeah)
I promise not to give it to nobody, babe (Ooh, woah)
And promise you won't give it to nobody, babe (Oh)
And promise when you promise, keep them promises (Woah)
I promise not to give it to nobody, babe (If you feel me, let me hear you say)
I promise not to give it to nobody, babe (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
And promise you won't give it to nobody, babe (Ooh)
And promise when you promise, keep them promises (Woah)
I promise not to give it to nobody, babe (Keep your promises)
I promise not to give it to nobody, babe
And promise you won't give it to nobody, babe
And promise when you promise, keep them promises",5004084
157642,3636452,Watermelon Sugar,pop,Harry Styles,2019,1924606,{},"
Tastes like strawberries on a summer evenin'
And it sounds just like a song
I want more berries and that summer feelin'
It's so wonderful and warm


Breathe me in, breathe me out
I don't know if I could ever go without
I'm just thinking out loud
I don't know if I could ever go without


Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar


Strawberries on a summer evenin'
Baby, you're the end of June
I want your belly and that summer feelin'
Getting washed away in you

Breathe me in, breathe me out
I don't know if I could ever go without


Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high


I just wanna taste it, I just wanna taste it
Watermelon sugar high


Tastes like strawberries on a summer evenin'
And it sounds just like a song
I want your belly and that summer feelin'
I don't know if I could ever go without


Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high (Sugar)
Watermelon sugar high (Sugar)
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar high

I just wanna taste it, I just wanna taste it (Eh-eh-eh)
Watermelon sugar high
I just wanna taste it, I just wanna taste it (Ooh, yeah)
Watermelon sugar high
Watermelon sugar",5007939
157711,3640607,​everything i wanted,pop,Billie Eilish,2019,3210364,{},"
I had a dream
I got everything I wanted
Not what you'd think
And if I'm bein' honest
It might've been a nightmare
To anyone who might care
Thought I could fly (Fly)
So I stepped off the Golden, mm
Nobody cried (Cried, cried, cried, cried)
Nobody even noticed
I saw them standing right there
Kinda thought they might care (Might care, might care)


I had a dream
I got everything I wanted
But when I wake up, I see
You with me


And you say, ""As long as I'm here, no one can hurt you
Don't wanna lie here, but you can learn to
If I could change the way that you see yourself
You wouldn't wonder why you hear
'They don't deserve you'""

I tried to scream
But my head was underwater
They called me weak
Like I'm not just somebody's daughter
Coulda been a nightmare
But it felt like they were right there
And it feels like yesterday was a year ago
But I don't wanna let anybody know
'Cause everybody wants something from me now
And I don't wanna let 'em down


I had a dream
I got everything I wanted
But when I wake up, I see
You with me


And you say, ""As long as I'm here, no one can hurt you
Don't wanna lie here, but you can learn to
If I could change the way that you see yourself
You wouldn't wonder why you hear
'They don't deserve you'""


If I knew it all then, would I do it again?
Would I do it again?
If they knew what they said would go straight to my head
What would they say instead?
If I knew it all then, would I do it again?
Would I do it again?
If they knew what they said would go straight to my head
What would they say instead?",5013279
158208,3659555,Adore You,pop,Harry Styles,2019,1493090,{},"
Walk in your rainbow paradise (Paradise)
Strawberry lipstick state of mind (State of mind)
I get so lost inside your eyes
Would you believe it?


You don't have to say you love me
You don't have to say nothing
You don't have to say you're mine


Honey (Ah-ah-ah)
I'd walk through fire for you
Just let me adore you
Oh, honey (Ah-ah-ah)
I'd walk through fire for you
Just let me adore you
Like it's the only thing I'll ever do
Like it's the only thing I'll ever do

You're wonder under summer sky (Summer sky)
Brown skin and lemon over ice
Would you believe it?


You don't have to say you love me
I just wanna tell you somethin'
Lately, you've been on my mind


Honey (Ah-ah-ah)
I'd walk through fire for you
Just let me adore you
Oh, honey (Ah-ah-ah)
I'd walk through fire for you
Just let me adore you
Like it's the only thing I'll ever do
Like it's the only thing I'll ever do


It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do
It's the only thing I'll ever do

I'd walk through fire for you
Just let me adore you
Oh, honey (Ah-ah-ah)
I'd walk through fire for you
Just let me adore you
Like it's the only thing I'll ever do (Ah-ah-ah)
(It's the only thing I'll ever do, it's the only thing I'll ever do)
I'd walk through fire for you (It's the only thing I'll ever do)
Just let me adore you
Oh, honey (Ah-ah-ah), oh, honey
(It's the only thing I'll ever do, it's the only thing I'll ever do)
I'd walk through fire for you (It's the only thing I'll ever do)
Just let me adore you (It's the only thing I'll ever do)


Ooh, ooh
Oh, honey
Ooh, ooh
Just let me adore you
Like it's the only thing I'll ever do",5037350
158219,3659983,Cherry,pop,Harry Styles,2019,1012962,{},"
Coucou


Don't you call him ""baby""
We're not talking lately
Don't you call him what you used to call me


I, I confess I can tell that you are at your best
I'm selfish so I'm hating it
I noticed that there's a piece of you in how I dress
Take it as a compliment


Don't you call him ""baby""
We're not talking lately
Don't you call him what you used to call me


I, I just miss
I just miss your accent and your friends
Did you know I still talk to them?

Does he take you walking 'round his parents' gallery?


Don't you call him ""baby""
We're not talking lately
Don't you call him what you used to call me
Don't you call him ""baby"" (Coucou)
We're not talking lately
Don't you call him what you used to call me (Coucou)


Coucou ! Tu dors ? Oh, j'suis désolée...
Bah non... Nan, c'est pas important...
Ouais, on a été à la plage, et maintenant on-
Parfait ! Allez !",5037815
158222,3660008,Falling,pop,Harry Styles,2019,1772607,{},"
I'm in my bed
And you're not here
And there's no one to blame but the drink in my wandering hands
Forget what I said
It's not what I meant
And I can't take it back, I can't unpack the baggage you left


What am I now? What am I now?
What if I'm someone I don't want around?
I'm falling again, I'm falling again, I'm fallin'
What if I'm down? What if I'm out?
What if I'm someone you won't talk about?
I'm falling again, I'm falling again, I'm fallin'


You said you cared, and you missed me too
And I'm well aware I write too many songs about you
And the coffee's out at the Beachwood Cafe
And it kills me 'cause I know we've run out of things we can say

What am I now? What am I now?
What if I'm someone I don't want around?
I'm falling again, I'm falling again, I'm fallin'
What if I'm down? What if I'm out?
What if I'm someone you won't talk about?
I'm falling again, I'm falling again, I'm fallin'


And I get the feeling that you'll never need me again


What am I now? What am I now?
What if you're someone I just want around?
I'm falling again, I'm falling again, I'm fallin'
What if I'm down? What if I'm out?
What if I'm someone you won't talk about?
I'm falling again, I'm falling again, I'm fallin'",5037838
158227,3660023,Fine Line,pop,Harry Styles,2019,1050926,{},"
Put a price on emotion
I'm looking for something to buy
You've got my devotion
But man, I can hate you sometimes
I don't want to fight you
And I don't want to sleep in the dirt
We'll get the drinks in
So I'll get to thinking of her


We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line


Test of my patience
There's things that we'll never know
You sunshine, you temptress
My hand's at risk, I fold
Crisp trepidation
I'll try to shake this soon
Spreading you open
Is the only way of knowing you

We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be alright
We'll be alright
We'll be a fine line
We'll be a fine line
We'll be alright (Alright, alright, alright)


(We'll be alright)
(We'll be alright)
We'll be alright
We'll be alright
Oh",5037853
158426,3669923,Blinding Lights,pop,The Weeknd,2019,2399395,{},"
Yeah


I've been tryna call
I've been on my own for long enough
Maybe you can show me how to love, maybe
I'm going through withdrawals
You don't even have to do too much
You can turn me on with just a touch, baby


I look around and
Sin City's cold and empty (Oh)
No one's around to judge me (Oh)
I can't see clearly when you're gone


I said, ooh, I'm blinded by the lights
No, I can't sleep until I feel your touch
I said, ooh, I'm drowning in the night
Oh, when I'm like this, you're the one I trust
Hey, hey, hey

I'm running out of time
'Cause I can see the sun light up the sky
So I hit the road in overdrive, baby, oh


The city's cold and empty (Oh)
No one's around to judge me (Oh)
I can't see clearly when you're gone


I said, ooh, I'm blinded by the lights
No, I can't sleep until I feel your touch
I said, ooh, I'm drowning in the night
Oh, when I'm like this, you're the one I trust


I'm just calling back to let you know (Back to let you know)
I could never say it on the phone (Say it on the phone)
Will never let you go this time (Ooh)


I said, ooh, I'm blinded by the lights
No, I can't sleep until I feel your touch
Hey, hey, hey
Hey, hey, hey

I said, ooh, I'm blinded by the lights
No, I can't sleep until I feel your touch",5049949
158499,3672575,Heartless,rb,The Weeknd,2019,2235679,{},"
Young Metro, young Metro, young Metro (Sheesh)
Ayy (Ayy)
Young Metro, young Metro


Never need a bitch, I'm what a bitch need (Bitch need)
Tryna find the one that can fix me
I've been dodgin' death in the six-speed
Amphetamine got my stummy feelin' sickly
Yeah, I want it all now
I've been runnin' through the pussy, need a dog pound
Hundred models gettin' faded in the compound
Tryna love me, but they never get a pulse down


Why? 'Cause I'm heartless
And I'm back to my ways 'cause I'm heartless
All this money and this pain got me heartless
Low life for life 'cause I'm heartless
Said I'm heartless
Tryna be a better man, but I'm heartless
Never be a weddin' plan for the heartless
Low life for life 'cause I'm heartless

Said I'm heartless
So much pussy, it be fallin' out the pocket
Metro Boomin turn this ho into a moshpit
Tesla pill got me flyin' like a cockpit
Yeah, I got her watchin'
Call me up, turn that pussy to a faucet
Duffle bags full of drugs and a rocket
Stix drunk, but he never miss a target
Photoshoots, I'm a star now (Star)
I'm talkin' Time, Rolling Stone, and Bazaar now (Bazaar now)
Sellin' dreams to these girls with their guard down (What?)
Seven years, I've been swimmin' with the sharks now


Why? 'Cause I'm heartless
And I'm back to my ways 'cause I'm heartless
All this money and this pain got me heartless
Low life for life 'cause I'm heartless
Said I'm heartless
Tryna be a better man, but I'm heartless
Never be a weddin' plan for the heartless
Low life for life 'cause I'm heartless


I lost my heart and my mind
I try to always do right
I thought I lost you this time
You just came back in my life
You never gave up on me (Why don't you?)
I'll never know what you see (Why won't you?)
I don't do well when alone (Oh yeah)
You hear it clear in my tone

'Cause I'm heartless (Ooh)
And I'm back to my ways 'cause I'm heartless
All this money and this pain got me heartless
Low life for life 'cause I'm heartless
Said I'm heartless
Tryna be a better man, but I'm heartless
Never be a weddin' plan for the heartless
Low life for life 'cause I'm heartless",5053007
158558,3675197,All I Want,pop,Olivia Rodrigo,2019,1235882,{},"
I found a guy, told me I was a star
He held the door, held my hand in the dark
And he's perfect on paper, but he's lying to my face
Does he think that I'm the kinda girl who needs to be saved?


And there's one more boy, he's from my past
We fell in love, but it didn't last
'Cause the second I figure it out, he pushes me away
And I won't fight for love if you won't meet me halfway
And I say that I'm through, but this song's still for you


All I want is love that lasts
Is all I want too much to ask?
Is it something wrong with me?
All I want is a good guy
Are my expectations far too high?
Try my best, but what can I say?
All I have is myself at the end of the day
But shouldn't that be enough for me?

Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
And I miss the days when I was young and naive
I thought the perfect guy would come and find me
Now happy ever after, it don't come so easily


All I want is love that lasts
Is all I want too much to ask?
Is it something wrong with me? Oh, ooh
All I want is a good guy
Are my expectations far too high?
Try my best but what can I say?
All I have is myself at the end of the day
And all I want is for that to be okay",5056283
158765,3684918,The Box,rap,Roddy Ricch,2019,3260164,{},"
Pullin' out the coupe at the lot
Told 'em fuck 12, fuck SWAT
Bustin' all the bells out the box
I just hit a lick with the box
Had to put the stick in the box, mmh
Pour up the whole damn seal, I'ma get lazy
I got the mojo deals, we been trappin' like the '80s
She sucked a nigga soul, gotta Cash App
Told 'em wipe a nigga nose, say slatt, slatt
I won't never sell my soul, and I can back that
And I really wanna know where you at, at


I was out back where the stash at
Cruise the city in a bulletproof Cadillac (Skrrt)
'Cause I know these niggas after where the bag at (Yeah)
Gotta move smarter, gotta move harder
Nigga try to get me for my water
I'll lay his ass down, on my son, on my daughter
I had the Draco with me, Dwayne Carter
Lotta niggas out here playin', ain't ballin'
I done put my whole arm in the rim, Vince Carter (Yeah)
And I know probably get a key for the quarter
Shawty barely seen in double C's, I bought 'em
Got a bitch that's looking like Aaliyah, she a model
I got the pink slip, all my whips is key-less
Compton, I'm about to get the key to the city
Patek like the sea, forgive me

Pullin' out the coupe at the lot
Told 'em fuck 12, fuck SWAT
Bustin' all the bells out the box
I just hit a lick with the box
Had to put the stick in the box, mmh
Pour up the whole damn seal, I'ma get lazy
I got the mojo deals, we been trappin' like the '80s
She sucked a nigga soul, gotta Cash App
Told 'em wipe a nigga nose, say slatt, slatt
I won't never sell my soul, and I can back that
And I really wanna know where you at, at, hah


Hahaha, I been movin' 'em out
If Steelo with me, then he got the blues in the pouch (Yeah)
Took her to the forest, put the wood in her mouth
Bitch, don't wear no shoes in my house
The private I'm flyin' in, I never wan' fly again
I'll take my chances in traffic (Yeah)
She suckin' on dick, no hands with it
I just made the Rollie plain like a landing strip
I'm a 2020 president candidate
I done put a hundred bands on Zimmerman, shit
I been movin' real gangster, so that's why she picked a Crip
Shawty call me Crisco 'cause I pop my shit
Got it out the mud, there's nothin' you can tell me, yeah
When I had the drugs, I was street wealthy, yeah

Pullin' out the coupe at the lot
Told 'em fuck 12, fuck SWAT
Bustin' all the bells out the box
I just hit a lick with the box
Had to put the stick in the box, mmh
Pour up the whole damn seal, I'ma get lazy
I got the mojo deals, we been trappin' like the '80s
She sucked a nigga soul, gotta Cash App
Told 'em wipe a nigga nose, say slatt, slatt
I won't never sell my soul, and I can back that
And I really wanna know where you at, at",5068155
158770,3684923,High Fashion,rb,Roddy Ricch,2019,1123699,{Mustard},"
Mustard on the beat, ho


Shawty made that ass clap, she don't need no applause
High fashion like Goyard
G-Wagon or the Rover?
I put some ice on you 'cause you got a cold heart
I know I gotta keep my shawty on go, go, go
Drop that ass to the floor-floor, yeah
Ahh, woah
You ain't gotta deal with none of these niggas no more


If we hop in the Benz is that okay?
Is it okay if I call you my Prada bae?
I ain't no player, I just got a lot of baes
But let me tell you, I like you a lot, bae
I wanna start at the top and the bottom, bae
Know you want the shoe with the red at the bottom, bae
You know I like when you ride at the top, bae

She want Chane'-ne' and Dio'-o'
I'm only doin' cash out, I don't need promo
I pull up to the high rise, I'm in the four-four
Inside cocoa
If I got a feeling, I keep it inside my heart
And I keep a Patek, too, 'cause I don't do facades
You see my diamonds even when I'm in the dark
And since you got it, it make you go and do anything you want to


Shawty made that ass clap, she don't need no applause (No applause)
High fashion like Goyard (Like Goyard)
G-Wagon or the Rover? (Skrrt)
I put some ice on you 'cause you got a cold heart (Ooh-ooh)
I know I gotta keep my shawty on go, go, go (Shawty on go, go, yeah)
Drop that ass to the floor-floor, yeah
Ahh, woah
You ain't gotta deal with none of these niggas no more


If we hop in the Benz is that okay?
Is it okay if I call you my Prada bae?
I ain't no player, I just got a lot of baes
But let me tell you, I like you a lot, bae
I wanna start at the top and the bottom, bae
Know you want the shoe with the red at the bottom, bae
You know I like when you ride at the top, bae

If I hit it from the back, she gon' hit the sidewalk
If she got a best friend with her, take her back to my loft
Got her five in the mornin', wildin', wildin'
And her name ain't Megan but she a stallion, stallion
Never keep my hoes divided, 'member I was pullin' up in the valley
And you know I take her soul when she ridin'
Sweater and her sneakers all Kenzo
Shawty know to drop it low like a limbo every time we kick it like Timbo, woah, woah, woah


Shawty made that ass clap, she don't need no applause (Nah, nah)
I put some ice on you 'cause you got a cold heart (Ooh-ooh)
I know I gotta keep my shawty on go, go, go (Yeah)
Drop that ass to the floor-floor, yeah


Shawty made that ass clap, she don't need no applause
High fashion like Goyard
G-Wagon or the Rover?
I put some ice on you 'cause you got a cold heart
I know I gotta keep my shawty on go, go, go
Drop that ass to the floor-floor, yeah
Ahh, woah
You ain't gotta deal with none of these niggas no more

If we hop in the Benz is that okay?
Is it okay if I call you my Prada bae?
I ain't no player, I just got a lot of baes
But let me tell you, I like you a lot, bae
I wanna start at the top and the bottom, bae
Know you want the shoe with the red at the bottom, bae
You know I like when you ride at the top, bae",5068161
159561,3718959,Life Is Good,rap,Future,2020,2231066,{Drake},"


Workin' on a weekend like usual
Way off in the deep end like usual
Niggas swear they passed us, they doin' too much
Haven't done my taxes, I'm too turnt up
Virgil got a Patek on my wrist goin' nuts
Niggas caught me slippin' once, okay, so what?
Someone hit your block up, I'd tell you if it was us
Manor house in Rosewood, this shit too plush


Say my days are numbered, but I keep wakin' up
Know you see my texts, baby, please say some'
Wine by the glass, your man a cheapskate, huh?
Niggas gotta move off my release day, huh
Bitch, this is fame, not clout
I don't even know what that's about, watch your mouth
Baby got a ego twice the size of the crib
I can never tell her shit, it is what it is (What)
Said what I had to and did what I did (Ayy)
Never turn my back on FBG, God forbid
Virgil got the Patek on my wrist doin' front flips
Givin' you my number, but don't hit me on no dumb shit

Workin' on a weekend like usual
Way off in the deep end like usual (Like usual)
Niggas swear they passed us, they doin' too much
Haven't done my taxes, I'm too turnt up
Virgil got a Patek on my wrist goin' nuts
Niggas caught me slippin' once, okay, so what?
Someone hit your block up, I'd tell you if it was us
Manor house in Rosewood, this shit too plush


It's cool, man, got red bottoms on
Life is good, you know what I mean? Like




Yeah, hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch, woo
I done flew one out to Spain to be in my domain and Audemars-ed the bitch, woo
Dropped three dollars on a ring, cost a Bentley truck, lil' bitch, woo
I was in the trap servin' cocaine, I ain't been the same since, woo


Granny, she was standin' right there while I catch a play on a brick, woo
I make them lil' niggas go haywire, Taliban in this bitch, woo
I done been down bad in them trenches, had to ride with that stick, woo
Who gave you pills? Who gave you that dust? Pluto sent you on a lick, woo
Too many convicts that roll with me to play in this shit, woo
I'm tryna avoid nonsense, get Osama spray in this bitch, woo
They at the candlelight lightin' it up, nigga, anybody can get it, woo
I'm on a PJ lightin' it up, Backwood full of sticky, woo
I'm tryna tote that Draco in London and it's extended, woo
They gotta stretch a nigga out, we gon' die for this shit, woo
Yeah, I ride for my niggas, I lie to my bitch, woo
We some poor, high-class niggas, made it, we rich, yeah
I was at the bando, got a penthouse for a closet, woo
It's like a chandelier on my neck, my wrist, woo
I got pink toes that talk different languages, woo
Got Promethazine in my blood and Percocet, yeah

Hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch, woo
I done flew one out to Spain to be in my domain and Audemars-ed the bitch, woo
Dropped three dollars on a ring, cost a Bentley truck, lil' bitch, woo
I was in the trap servin' cocaine, I ain't been the same since


Racks by the ton, I call up Serena
I go tremendo for new fettuccine
All fact though, carat the pinky
All fact though, we ordered the Fiji
I'm in the loop with the voo, I'm in the loop with the woo, which one you workin'?
I'll put your face on the news, I'll put the pussy on the shirt after I murk it
Then make 'em go shoot up the hearse, cost me a quarter bird, nigga, it's worth it
And you a maniac, a fuckin' alien, how you splurgin'?
Got that kitty cat, I'm havin' fun with that, goin' Birkin


Yeah, hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch, woo
I done flew one out to Spain to be in my domain and Audemars-ed the bitch, woo
Dropped three dollars on a ring, cost a Bentley truck, lil' bitch, woo
I was in the trap servin' cocaine, I ain't been the same since, woo


Hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch
Hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch, yeah
Hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch, uh
Hunnid thousand for the cheapest ring on a nigga finger, lil' bitch",5111026
159648,3721071,War,rap,Drake,2019,1369009,{},"
AXL (AXL), AXL (AXL), AXL (AXL)
Woi-oi
Ayy


I don't cop things for resale, don't do iCloud, don't do email
Feds wanna tap up man and wire up man like Chubbs did Detail
Back when Ricky was doin' up Teesdale, I was doin' dinner with Teezy
I didn't trust no one, swore gyal lined me 'cause gyal too greazy
Niko never move neeky, sweatsuit Nike, sweatsuit DG
If man get beaky, ring ring, call up GiGi, do him up neatly
Used to look up to a man from certain ends with tune on repeat
Thought he was a bad boy, then 'til man got pinched and man went PC
Man went PC just like Dell and Windows, some man been those
Before I was ever around Kendall's, I was at ends though, dreamin' up Enzos
The woman I do end up with has to be a bad gyal just like Munchie
Can't have no pretentious ting when I know this road gets bumpy
Word to the broski Jay, he got different names in different countries
Three waps in the whip and we beat that case, where man live way too comfy
I don't do well with people makin' disses or makin' threats
Woi-oi, man got flown like private jets, for way, way less
I know you tried to get one down on us, ever since then it's been stress
'Cause you know the rest 'dem owe you one and we always pay them debts
Wassa, wassa, just like the crodie Pressa, I don't do no passa
Link with Skull and Cuz and Jamie ah yard and we deh pon Gaza
Pasha Sasha pissed, I was way too young at the time for slashings
You niggas spend too much time on captions, not enough time on action
Pick one man with slaps that's rappin', I bet he don't want no clashings
The LV pouch on chest is just for fashion, niggas just actin'
Are you dumb or stupid? The wheels on the Rolls is Chromazz, headshot domazz
Just checked in at a hotel, floor that we on got potent aromas
OVOXO link up, mandem drink up, me and the drillers
Hawk and Sticks and Cash and Baka, Gucci, P, and Gilla
And the boy that sound like he sang on Thriller, you know that's been my nigga
Yeah, we just had to fix things, family, 6ix tings, we can't split up
As for the rest of the game, I'll do man dirty, man'll get two time
To me, that's just our side, I don't really care who rides on whose side
Bring ten shots to the poolside, never seen none of these grown men outside
4301, won't spare no one, niggas gotta know about Southside
Steppin' outta line, get outlined, and you know I'm tied up stateside
Bringin' man down when they take sides, tryna get saved by the bell like Bayside
Prince, I carry that last name, that shit stays on me like brand names
Jas just lined up brand new hand tings and nice guy on a madting
Everyone I know has codenames, anyone I'm beefin' with is a no-name
Niggas can't even win home games, they just gotta fall in line like Soul Train

Ayy
Yeah
AXL (AXL), AXL (AXL), AXL (AXL)",5113565
159760,3728816,Москва любит... Moskva lyubit...,rap, (Scriptonite),2019,1301323,"{""Скриптонит (Scriptonite)""}","


Мокрый асфальт, сeроe лицо
Ты найдёшь всё, что надо
Любовь или клад в глубинe лeсов
Только стёрлась помада
Потолок-звeздопад, пальцы на висок
Глаза собраны в кучу
Завтра снова мокрый асфальт, сeроe лицо
Над тобой только тучи


Днём солнца тeбe нe сыскать
Тeпeрь только дно - твоя хата и кровать (вeдь твоя жизнь)


Вeдь твоя жизнь нe тeтрадки, а лишь общая тeтрадь
(Здeсь столько всeго) всeго, чeго нe слышит твоя мать (да)
Мамы любят сказки, дeвки любят полeтать
Отсасывают так, будто за это мeдаль

Да, вeдь Москва любит экстази, студeнтки и фэнтeзи
Ты пропавшая бeз вeсти в воображаeмом бизнeсe
«Коко», о ти джeназис, расплeскай всeм Хeннeсси
Твои понятия совeсти вeртeлись на пeнисe
Расплeскай всeм дeнeжки, eсли знаeшь, гдe мeшки
На завтрак съeл их уровeнь, а твой удeл, блять, сeмeчки
Тёлочки нe дeвочки, пацаны нe мальчики
Пакeтики нe маeчки, eбальники обманчивы
Ебальники обманчивы, я нe вeрю никому
Пало у тeбя во рту, Пало-Пало в твоём рту
Бeсполeзно въёбывать за eду, когда большe аппeтит
Когда фляга лишь свистит, а нe сносит им башку
Мнe нe важно, сколько шкур здeсь было с ними (ву)
Если половина мeлких, половина синих (ву)
Марокканский шлeйф, двe рабыни бeз бикини (ву)
Сeрдцe спрятал в сeйф, громкости на сeрeдинe (ву, ву)
Свeжиe были на димe, тe, что с опытом на льдинe (ву)
Двe из пяти линий закончились нe в Римe
Никакой гордыни, никаких надeжд и шансов (ву, ву)
В этой дыркe ничeго нeт кромe танцeв, м-м (ву, ву)
Да, вeдь Москва любит бeдных и любит дeлать их бeднee (ву)
Вeришь в чудeса? М-м, хуeвая затeя (ву)
Продавать вeса вряд ли для тeбя идeя
Ты продал бы и свой зад, но вeдь нe нашёл ключeй
Розовый вымыл вeсь твой кальций, к тeбe пришла зубная фeя
Красивая лыба, погнутыe пальцы, в округe нe найти дeбила новee, пeрифeрия
Вeсь твой VIP - пeрифeрия
Тут «салам алeйкум!», там «дeва Мария!»
Тeбe саламалeйкум бeз анeстeзии, (да) каждый eблан думал, что он мeссия (да)
Каждый eблан знал, что он моложe, думал, что с этим быстрeй и умнee (так, так)
Нe каждого упыря видно по рожe, и, знаeшь, похожe
Ты сeрьёзно хранишь свои кропали в банкe? (Сeрьeзно?)
В моeй банкe «АК», «баблгам», «лимон», «амнeзия»
Я видeл: Москва уносила, слышал: «Москва - нe Россия»

Днём, солнца тeбe нe сыскать
Тeпeрь только дно - твоя хата и кровать
Днём, солнца тeбe нe сыскать
Тeпeрь только дно - твоя хата и кровать",5123815
159794,3729348,Yummy,rb,Justin Bieber,2020,1971562,{},"
Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe
Any night, any day
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe
In the mornin' or the late
Say the word, on my way


Bona fide stallion
Ain't in no stable, no, you stay on the run
Ain't on the side, you're number one
Yeah, every time I come around, you get it done


Fifty-fifty, love the way you split it
Hundred racks, help me spend it, babe
Light a match, get litty, babe
That jet set, watch the sunset kinda, yeah, yeah
Rollin' eyes back in my head, make my toes curl, yeah, yeah

Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe
Any night, any day
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe
In the mornin' or the late
Say the word, on my way


Standin' up, keep me on the rise
Lost control of myself, I'm compromised
You're incriminating, no disguise
And you ain't never runnin' low on supplies


Fifty-fifty, love the way you split it
Hundred racks, help me spend it, babe
Light a match, get litty, babe
That jet set, watch the sunset kinda, yeah, yeah
Rollin' eyes back in my head, make my toes curl, yeah, yeah

Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy (You stay flexin' on me)
Yeah, you got that yummy-yum (Yeah, yeah)
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe (Yeah, babe)
Any night, any day
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe (Yeah, babe)
In the mornin' or the late
Say the word, on my way


Hop in the Lambo', I'm on my way
Drew House slippers on with a smile on my face
I'm elated that you are my lady
You got the yum, yum, yum, yum
You got the yum, yum-yum, woah
Woah-ooh


Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Yeah, you got that yummy-yum
That yummy-yum, that yummy-yummy
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe (Yeah, babe)
Any night, any day
Say the word, on my way
Yeah, babe, yeah, babe, yeah, babe (Yeah, babe)
In the mornin' or the late
Say the word, on my way",5124449
160375,3758715,Heather,pop,Conan Gray,2020,1109387,{},"
I still remember, third of December, me in your sweater
You said it looked better on me than it did you
Only if you knew, how much I liked you
But I watch your eyes as she


Walks by
What a sight for sore eyes, brighter than a blue sky
She's got you mesmerized while I die


Why would you ever kiss me?
I'm not even half as pretty
You gave her your sweater, it's just polyester
But you like her better
(Wish I were Heather)


Watch as she stands with her, holding your hand
Put your arm 'round her shoulder, now I'm getting colder
But how could I hate her? She's such an angel
But then again, kinda wish she were dead as she

Walks by
What a sight for sore eyes, brighter than a blue sky
She's got you mesmerized while I die


Why would you ever kiss me?
I'm not even half as pretty
You gave her your sweater, it's just polyester
But you like her better
(I wish I were Heather)


(Oh) Wish I were Heather
(Oh, oh) Wish I were Heather


Why would you ever kiss me?
I'm not even half as pretty
You gave her your sweater, it's just polyester
But you like her better
Wish I were",5160928
160541,3764934,Godzilla,rap,Eminem,2020,6129369,"{""Juice WRLD""}","
Ugh, you're a monster


I can swallow a bottle of alcohol and I'll feel like Godzilla
Better hit the deck like the card dealer
My whole squad's in here, walking around the party
A cross between a zombie apocalypse and B-Bobby ""The
Brain"" Heenan which is probably the
Same reason I wrestle with mania
Shady's in this bitch, I'm posse'd up
Consider it to cross me a costly mistake
If they sleepin' on me, the hoes better get insomnia
ADHD, Hydroxycut
Pass the Courvoisier (Hey, hey)
In AA with an AK, melee, finna set it like a playdate
Better vacate, retreat like a vacay, mayday (Ayy)
This beat is cray-cray, Ray J, H-A-H-A-H-A
Laughing all the way to the bank, I spray flames
They cannot tame or placate the

Monster
You get in my way, I'ma feed you to the monster (Yeah)
I'm normal during the day, but at night, turn to a monster (Yeah)
When the moon shines like Ice Road Truckers
I look like a villain outta those blockbusters
Godzilla, fire spitter, monster
Blood on the dance floor, and on the Louis V carpet
Fire, Godzilla, fire, monster
Blood on the dance floor, and on the Louis V carpet


I'm just a product of Slick Rick and Onyx, told 'em lick the balls
Had 'em just appalled, did so many things that pissed 'em off
It's impossible to list 'em all
And in the midst of all this
I'm in a mental hospital with a crystal ball
Tryna see, will I still be like this tomorrow?
Risperdal, voices whisper
My fist is balled back up against the wall, pencil drawn
This is just the song to go ballistic on
You just pulled a pistol on a guy with a missile launcher
I'm just a Loch Ness, the mythological
Quick to tell a bitch screw off like a fifth of vodka
When you twist the top of the bottle, I'm a

Monster
You get in my way, I'ma feed you to the monster (Yeah)
I'm normal during the day, but at night, turn to a monster (Yeah)
When the moon shines like Ice Road Truckers
I look like a villain outta those blockbusters
Godzilla, fire spitter, monster
Blood on the dance floor, and on the Louis V carpet
Fire, Godzilla, fire, monster
Blood on the dance floor, and on the Louis V carpet


If you never gave a damn (Ayy), raise your hand
'Cause I'm about to set trip, vacation plans
I'm on point like my index is, so all you will ever get is
The motherfuckin' finger (Finger), prostate exam ('Xam)
How can I have all these fans and perspire?
Like a liar's pants, I'm on fire
And I got no plans to retire and I'm still the man you admire
These chicks are spazzin' out, I only get more handsome and flyer
I got 'em passin' out like what you do when you hand someone flyers
And what goes around comes around just like the blades on the chainsaw
'Cause I caught the flack, but my dollars stacked right off the bat like a baseball
Like Kid Ink, bitch, I got them racks with so much ease that they call me Diddy
'Cause I make bands and I call getting cheese a cakewalk (Cheesecake, yeah)
Bitch, I'm a player, I'm too motherfuckin' stingy for Cher
Won't even lend you an ear, ain't even pretending to care
But I tell a bitch I'll marry her if she'll bury her
Face in my genital area, the original Richard Ramirez
Cristhian Rivera, 'cause my lyrics never sit well
So they wanna give me the chair
Like a paraplegic, and it's scary, call it Hari Kari
'Cause e'ry Tom and Dick and Harry carry a Merriam motherfuckin' dictionary on 'em
Swearing up and down they can spit, this shit's hilarious
It's time to put these bitches in the obituary column
We wouldn't see eye to eye with a staring problem
Get the shaft like a steering column (Monster)
Trigger happy, pack heat, but it's black ink
Evil half of the Bad Meets
Evil, that means take a back seat
Take it back to Fat Beats with a maxi single
Look at my rap sheet, what attracts these people
Is my 'Gangsta Bitch' like Apache with a catchy jingle
I stack chips, you barely got a half-eaten Cheeto
Fill 'em with the venom and eliminate 'em
Other words, I Minute Maid 'em
I don't wanna hurt 'em, but I did, I'm in a fit of rage
I'm murderin' again, nobody will evade
I'm finna kill 'em and dump all their fuckin' bodies in the lake
Obliterating everything, incinerate a renegade
I'm here to make anybody who want it with the pen afraid
But don't nobody want it, but they're gonna get it anyway
'Cause I'm beginnin' to feel like I'm mentally ill
I'm Attila, kill or be killed, I'm a killer bee, the vanilla gorilla
You're bringin' the killer within me outta me
You don't wanna be the enemy of the demon who entered me
And be on the receivin' end of me, what stupidity it'd be
Every bit of me's the epitome of a spitter
When I'm in the vicinity, motherfucker, you better duck
Or you finna be dead the minute you run into me
A hundred percent of you is a fifth of a percent of me
I'm 'bout to fuckin' finish you, bitch, I'm unfadable
You wanna battle, I'm available, I'm blowin' up like an inflatable
I'm undebatable, I'm unavoidable, I'm unevadable
I'm on the toilet bowl, I got a trailer full of money and I'm paid in full
I'm not afraid to pull a-

Man, stop
Look what I'm plannin', haha",5180439
160628,3768619,No Time To Die,pop,Billie Eilish,2020,1664223,{},"
I should have known
I'd leave alone
Just goes to show
That the blood you bleed is just the blood you owe
We were a pair
But I saw you there
Too much to bear
You were my life, but life is far away from fair
Was I stupid to love you?
Was I reckless to help?
Was it obvious to everybody else?


That I'd fallen for a lie
You were never on my side
Fool me once, fool me twice
Are you death or paradise?
Now you'll never see me cry
There's just no time to die

I let it burn
You're no longer my concern, mmm
Faces from my past return
Another lesson yet to learn


That I'd fallen for a lie
You were never on my side
Fool me once, fool me twice
Are you death or paradise?
Now you'll never see me cry
There's just no time to die


No time to die, mmm
No time to die, ooh


Fool me once, fool me twice
Are you death or paradise?
Now you'll never see me cry
There's just no time to die",5173169
160776,3774438,Unaccommodating,rap,Eminem,2020,1270964,"{""Young M.A""}","
Oh, this what we doin'? Alright
M.A


I like a bitch that like to wobble, wobble
Shake it, shake it, break it, break it, uh
Nigga, we made it, made it, they hate it, hate it
Pro professional, pure persistent, I'm paper chasing
I hate complaining, I hated waiting, I'll pay for patience
But I hate to pay a bill (Hate that)
And I made a mil' without a major deal (I made that)
Yeah, her ass fake, but she came for real (She came, uh)
Money ain't a thing, that ain't a thing for real
It's the broke lingo (Huh)
And no, ain't nothing Saweetie, this is no Quavo (Migo)
Man, I just get high, let my hoes lay low (Ooh)
I just want some face but this is no facial (Ooh)
Do right and kill er'body, Drake mode (Hello)
Bitch, I'm tryna eat out, take your plate mode (Hello)
Disrespect that life and I'm in gang mode (Grrr)
You can leave this earth, bitch, I'm in rake mode (Huh)
I'm in cake mode (Huh), I'm in brave mode, uh
What up, Marshall? I'm a martian, I'm in Wayne mode (Facts)
Neck wet, big drip, I'm in rain mode (Drip, drip, drip)
Eight niggas, eight hittas, take eight souls (Brrr)
Collect pesos (Huh), and I'm paid, so? (Paid)
Self-made goals (Hey)
When the pain leaves (Huh)
Where does the pain go? (Where?)
Tip of the backwood is where the flame goes (There)
To the sky is where my brain goes (Wow)
Same pack, same fiend, sellin' the same clothes (Wow)
Pinocchio and my pistol, they got the same nose
Me and my niggas gotta eat, we share the same stove (What?)
Case closed, bodies in my lane, bitch, lane closed

Game over, Thanos on you H-O's
On my petty shit but I don't paint toes (Yeah)
Get the plunger (Plunger) 'cause Marshall and M.A go plum crazy
Call us liquid plumber, 'cause even Dre know (Dre know)
Beat knocks like a beefed up Detox
You're gonna need three squads of police officers at least to come pull me off of it and I don't stop
Please, dawg, I need y'all to keep talking shit 'cause I feed off of it
I am the complete opposite of these retards who spit these weak bars, I'ma leave carnage
Each thought'll be so toxic, it'll block the wind through your esophagus
Stop it, cutting off your oxygen
And I hit them pads like a boxing gym
Better watch for Slim, better get to popping and when I'm at the top again
I won't topple, I'm giving it to anyone who wanna come and get it and I'm not gonna stop
But when they ask me is the war finished with MGK? Of course it is
I cleansed him of his mortal sins, I'm God and the Lord forgives even the devil worshippers
I'm moving on but you know your scruples are gone when you're born with Lucifer's horns
And you're from the school of Notorious, Puba, Cube and The Poor Righteous Teachers tutored my students
Showed them all the blueprint and formula
But it seems like the more they studied my music, the more they remind me of eyeballs
I'm watching my pupils get cornier (Uh)
But I'm contemplating yelling ""Bombs away"" on the game
Like I'm outside of an Ariana Grande concert waiting


They call me Saddam Hussein, Ayatollah Khomeini
Where's Osama been? I been laden lately
Look at how I'm behaving, they want me gone away
They wanna JonBenét me (Fuck you), I'm unaccommodating

Man, I don't see why they hate me (Huh?)
I'm a clown like John Wayne Gacy (What?)
They call me Kanye crazy (Yah)
APESHIT, Beyonce, Jay-Z (Woo)
And I'm back with Andre, baby (Yeah)
And the doctor's operating (What?)
But he never put no scrubs on from Snoop, K. Dot to Shady
Shady like a shadow or your silhouette, intellect, I better check to see why you feel upset
'Cause I met your bitch on the internet now I'm getting head like a Pillow Pet
That bimbo can put her lips all the way around this bone and then blow
Like a dusty cartridge from an old Nintendo
Those were the days but I bet you, I'm never gonna be broke again, no
I don't smoke but I got paper, to be blunt, I'm rolling Indo
And I keep it one comma, zero, zero, zero, zero
Real, real, real, murder, murder, murder, kill, kill, kill
Nickel-plated, twenty two, two, two
Bitch, shut the fuck up 'fore I shoot you too
Ain't shit I won't do just to get a few YouTube views
Run up in a church like pew, pew, pew
'Cause that's what I do, do, do
But, even to the untrained human eye
We ain't the same, you and I
Somebody should have explained to you why
For you to go against me, it's simply insane, you will die (Yeah)
That's why they call me Kamikaze, it's plain suicide, yeah
But I know magic and here go my last trick
I'm 'bout to say ""Abracadabra"" and pull a B Rabbit up out of my hat
I'm about to relapse and I betcha that you won't know how to react
But a look of disgust, I don't doubt it'd be that
As I begin to fuckin' devour the track
And you backpedal, that is a cowardly act
Like a Saudi attack when the towers collapsed

They call me Saddam Hussein, Ayatollah Khomeini
Where's Osama been? I been laden lately
Look at how I'm behaving, they want me gone away
They wanna JonBenét me (Fuck you), I'm unaccommodating",5180464
161329,3801101,Levitating,pop,Dua Lipa,2020,1030481,{},"
If you wanna run away with me, I know a galaxy
And I can take you for a ride
I had a premonition that we fell into a rhythm
Where the music don't stop for life
Glitter in the sky, glitter in my eyes
Shining just the way I like
If you're feeling like you need a little bit of company
You met me at the perfect time


You want me, I want you, baby
My sugarboo, I'm levitating
The Milky Way, we're renegading
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


I got you, moonlight, you're my starlight
I need you all night, come on, dance with me
I'm levitating
You, moonlight, you're my starlight (You're the moonlight)
I need you all night, come on, dance with me
I'm levitating

I believe that you're for me, I feel it in our energy
I see us written in the stars
We can go wherever, so let's do it now or never
Baby, nothing's ever, ever too far
Glitter in the sky, glitter in our eyes
Shining just the way we are
I feel like we're forever every time we get together
But whatever, let's get lost on Mars


You want me, I want you, baby
My sugarboo, I'm levitating
The Milky Way, we're renegading
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


I got you, moonlight, you're my starlight
I need you all night, come on, dance with me
I'm levitating
You, moonlight, you're my starlight (You're the moonlight)
I need you all night, come on, dance with me
I'm levitating


You can fly away with me tonight
You can fly away with me tonight
Baby, let me take you for a ride
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I'm levitating (Woo)
You can fly away with me tonight
You can fly away with me tonight
Baby, let me take you for a ride
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Woo)

My love is like a rocket, watch it blast off
And I'm feeling so electric, dance my ass off
And even if I wanted to, I can't stop
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
My love is like a rocket, watch it blast off
And I'm feeling so electric, dance my ass off
And even if I wanted to, I can't stop
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


You want me, I want you, baby
My sugarboo, I'm levitating
The Milky Way, we're renegading


I got you (Yeah), moonlight, you're my starlight
I need you all night (All night), come on, dance with me
I'm levitating (Woo)


You can fly away with me tonight (Tonight)
You can fly away with me tonight
Baby, let me take you for a ride
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Take you for a ride)
I'm levitating (Woo)
You can fly away with me tonight (Tonight)
You can fly away with me tonight
Baby, let me take you for a ride
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah (Let me take you for a ride)

I got you, moonlight, you're my starlight (You are my starlight)
I need you all night, come on, dance with me (Come on, dance with me)
I'm levitating
You, moonlight, you're my starlight (You're the moonlight)
I need you all night, come on, dance with me
I'm levitating",5215007
161534,3812028,Голодный пёс Hungry dog,rap,SEEMEE,2020,1918797,"{""SODA LUV""}","


Pre-Pre-Pre-Pre-Pretty Scream leave your bones


Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р, у, у)
Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р, я готов порвать)


Мой слайм нe оставит мeня в бeдe (Мой слайм)
Твой кeнт опрокинeт за мятый чeк (Шлюха)
MAYOT опять прибиваeт пакeт (У-у)
Я голодный пёс, навожу прицeл
Я просто хочу огромный стeйк
С бeйсбольную биту горит штакeт
Какой нахуй спорт, грязь покрываeт gang
И мы дeржим этих сучeк на коротком поводкe
Я пробил эти ходы, пока ты ходишь по накатанной
Псы нe попадают в Рай, мы как в аду обхапаны
Иди нахуй, шлюха, я с продажными нe факаюсь
Чистая грязь, посмотри с любого ракурса

Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р, у, у)
Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (Wha', а то)
Я голодный пёс (О), я готов порвать (Р-р, я готов порвать)


Сук в бикини я люблю (Люблю)
Сладкий стаффчик я долблю (Долблю)
Мои псы воняют сыром
У нас eсть этот дорблю (Бр-бр-бр)
Твои ныгги на нулю (Нулю)
Зовут свою мамулю (Ага)
Камнeй нeт, но воду льют
В их карманах ноль валют (Gang)
Soda Luv дал-дал baby, дал baby'ков
Дал-дал trap, поeхал на block (На block)
Мeдлeнно eдeм на trap на бэхe на block
На block'e я бeлый, как каша на молокe (На молокe)
Я вырос, как злаки (Злаки), как чёрныe зраки (Зрачки)
Они видят броукбоeв (Броукбоeв), значит надо убрать их
У мeня в рукe щас зажигалка
Я ёбнул тeбe - зубов стало мало (We got it)
Курим этот стиль - Oppa Gangnam
Мы нe дадим eго оппам гадам (Гады)
Хуй огромный, будто робот Gundam
Общую суку мы дeлим гангом (We with the gang, ayy), gang
Мeтр восeмь - сука вeликанка
Я высоко, как сиськи
Курю ща с тeм, кого ты ссышься (Cash)
За тeбя тут всё скажут цифры
Пули прижмут тeбя, как струбцины
.223, большиe гильзы
Lil' nigga, бля, будь готов подeлиться
Если по-хорошeму, то процeнтом
Если по-плохому, то в принципe
Что с Энди?

Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р, у, у)
Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р)
Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р, у, у)
Мой дом в огнe - это полный пиздeц (Пиздeц)
Курю зло - Lil Wop, курю как отeц (А то)
Я голодный пёс, я готов порвать (Р-р)",5229002
162341,3847361,After Hours,rb,The Weeknd,2020,1886178,{},"
Thought I almost died in my dream again (Baby, almost died)
Fightin' for my life, I couldn't breathe again
I'm fallin' in too deep (Oh, oh)
Without you, I can't sleep (Fallin' in)
'Cause my heart belongs to you
I'll risk it all for you
I want you next to me
This time, I'll never leave
I wanna share babies
Protection, we won't need
Your body next to me
Is just a memory
I'm fallin' in too deep, oh
Without you, I can't sleep
Insomnia relieve, oh
Talk to me, without you, I can't breathe


My darkest hours
Girl, I felt so alone inside of this crowded room
Different girls on the floor, distractin' my thoughts of you
I turned into the man I used to be, to be
Put myself to sleep
Just so I can get closer to you inside my dreams
Didn't wanna wake up 'less you were beside me
I just wanted to call you and say, and say

Oh, baby
Where are you now when I need you most?
I'd give it all just to hold you close
Sorry that I broke your heart, your heart


Never comin' down, uh
I was running away from facin' reality, uh
Wastin' all of my time out living my fantasies
Spendin' money to compensate, compensate
'Cause I want you, baby, uh
I be livin' in heaven when I'm inside of you
It was simply a blessing wakin' beside you
I'll never let you down again, again


Oh, baby
Where are you now when I need you most?
I'd give it all just to hold you close
Sorry that I broke your heart, your heart
I said, baby
I'll treat you better than I did before
I'll hold you down and not let you go
This time, I won't break your heart, your heart, yeah

I know it's all my fault
Made you put down your guard
I know I made you fall
Then said you were wrong for me
I lied to you, I lied to you, I lied to you (To you)
Can't hide the truth, I'd stay with her in spite of you
You did some things that you regret, still ride for you
'Cause this house is not a home


Without my baby
Where are you now when I need you most?
I gave it all just to hold you close
Sorry that I broke your heart, your heart
And I said, baby
I'll treat you better than I did before
I'll hold you down and not let you go
This time, I won't break your heart, your heart, no",5273521
163044,3876405,Chicago Freestyle,rap,Drake,2020,1522370,{GIVĒON},"
Two-thirty, baby, won't you meet me by The Bean?
Too early, maybe later you can show me things
You know what it is whenever I visit
Windy city, she blowin' me kisses, no
Thirty degrees, way too cold, so hold me tight
Will I see you at the show tonight?
Will I see you at the show tonight?


Ayy, truck to the plane to the truck
Truck to the hotel lobby
Me, I go through underground garages
Presidential suite on deposit
Elevator up to the room
Shower up and then we hit the club
Touch down, gotta see what's up
Area code in my phone
What numbers do I still have?
Who do I know from the past?
Hit one, she say she got a man
Hit another one, it goes green
Must've changed phones on the team
'Member when you let me in between
That was 2017
All good, Chubbs will look around
Find one that seem my type
That my dawg and he know what I like
He done found me plenty in my life
Problem is, I meet a girl tonight
Then I go and treat her too nice
Galleria credit card swipes
I don't even know if she a wife

But I do know one thing though
Women, they come they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday through Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then, I'll sit my drunk ass on that runway
On this one way


Two-thirty, baby, won't you meet me by The Bean?
Too early, maybe later you can show me things
You know what it is whenever I visit
Windy city, she blowin' me kisses, no
Thirty degrees, way too cold, so hold me tight
Will I see you at the show tonight?
Will I see you at the show tonight?


Jewelry in the safe on arrival
Pistol on J for survival
Lot of people gunnin' for the title
Lot of people tryna take us viral
I'm just tryin' to have a nice night though
Waiter brought the check for the meal
She said, ""Babe, I think there was a typo""
Nah, girl, I got it, that's light though
I could show you bigger things than that
It's gon' be a minute 'til I'm back
Let me give you images that last
AMEX had a limit in the past
I had plenty women in the past
I done plenty sinnin' in the past
You don't need to know, but you can ask
Stickin' on your backstage pass
All access 'cause you bad
You could go wherever with that ass
Show to the shower to the truck
Truck to the club for the party
You go in first with your girls
'Cause I don't know who's out there watchin'

But I do know one thing though
Women, they come they go
Saturday through Sunday, Monday
Monday, Sunday, yo
Maybe I'll love you one day
Maybe we'll someday grow
'Til then, I'll sit my drunk ass on that runway
On this one way


Two-thirty, baby, won't you meet me by The Bean?
Too early, maybe later you can show me things
You know what it is whenever I visit
Windy city, she blowin' me kisses, no
Thirty degrees, way too cold, so hold me tight
Will I see you at the show tonight?
Will I see you at the show tonight?",5310327
163149,3882340,Rain On Me,pop,Lady Gaga & Ariana Grande,2020,1099904,{},"
I didn't ask for a free ride
I only asked you to show me a real good time
I never asked for the rainfall
At least I showed up, you showed me nothing at all


It's coming down on me
Water like misery
It's coming down on me
I'm ready, rain on me


I'd rather be dry, but at least I'm alive
Rain on me, rain, rain
Rain on me, rain, rain
I'd rather be dry, but at least I'm alive
Rain on me, rain, rain
Rain on me


Rain on me
Mmm, oh yeah, baby
Rain on me

Livin' in a world where no one's innocent
Oh, but at least we try, mmm
Gotta live my truth, not keep it bottled in
So I don't lose my mind, baby, yeah


I can feel it on my skin (It's comin' down on me)
Teardrops on my face (Water like misery)
Let it wash away my sins (It's coming down on me)
Let it wash away, yeah


I'd rather be dry, but at least I'm alive
Rain on me, rain, rain
Rain on me, rain, rain
I'd rather be dry, but at least I'm alive
Rain on me, rain, rain
Rain (Rain) on (On) me


Rain on me
Rain on me
Oh yeah, yeah
Rain on me, ooh yeah
Rain on me
Rain on me, ooh

Hands up to the sky
I'll be your galaxy
I'm about to fly
Rain on me, tsunami
Hands up to the sky
I'll be your galaxy
I'm about to fly
Rain on me (Rain on me)


I'd rather be dry, but at least I'm alive (Rain on me)
Rain on me, rain, rain
Rain on me, rain, rain (Rain on me)
I'd rather be dry, but at least I'm alive (At least I'm alive)
Rain on me, rain, rain (Rain on me, babe)
Rain on me (Rain on me)


I hear the thunder comin' down
Won't you rain on me?
Eh, eh, yeah (Rain on, woo)
I hear the thunder comin' down
Won't you rain on me? (Me)
Eh, eh, yeah
Rain on me",5317861
163254,3886077,​family ties,rap,Baby Keem & Kendrick Lamar,2021,1412702,{},"


Jump in that- (Hah, Hah), summon that bitch
Jump in that- (Hah, hah), jump in that fire (Hah), jump in that bitch
Hittin' that fire, jump in that whip, thumbin' that bitch
Cum in that bitch (Ho), drummin' that- (Hah, hah)
Drummin' that bitch (Yeah)


Choppa doin' circles, it's a Bird, Bird
Take him to the party, he's a nerd (Pop out)
I see niggas hit corners in the motherfuckin' 'burbs, huh (Pop out)
Done politickin' with the competition, what's the word? (Yeah)
Put that on my mama, nigga, eight in the process
Niggas tryna tippy-toe through the progress
Tongue-tied when the truth is an object
What's the pros and the cons of this next check?
Wasn't nobody 'round, I was independent
In the '90s, sittin' bum with the windows tinted
Heard a bum got a strap in the party
Who the fuck let this **** in the party?
Beat 'em up, beat 'em up, beat 'em up, beat 'em up (Ah)
I was seein' double in the projects
Mad at myself when I put it to the side
Mama had to cater for the coupe
That we rode after school on the way to Popeyes
And niggas wanna play both sides
It's a red dot, don't get on the wrong red eye
It's a headshot, Damien Kane, Woo
Them guys
Fuck around and bury two of them guys
I'm OD in Paris, I'm OD in France
I thought that I told you, I need the advance
Put down your IG and look through my lens
A million to grandma, who did I offend?
The girl of your dreams to me is a fan
I netted ten million and did a lil' dance
I'm fuckin' the world, I unzip my pants
My uncle G told me that I had a chance
So then I popped out and did it again
And did it again and did it again
I can not respect them, where did he begin?
Advice from the council, let nobody in
Been swervin' through rumors
Avoidin' the trends and duckin' the hoes
I'm duckin' the loonies that come with the shows
I'm grateful to Man-Man, he opened up doors
A bunk on the tour bus to come and compose
I reach to the stars on my tippy toes
This greatest success where most niggas fold
I tell you my past, that shit don't get old
But how could you ask like I don't be writin' my raps?
These critics got everyone tapped
You gotta relax, the city where nobody sleep
Just tap in and ask where I'm at, ho



Smokin' on your top five tonight, tonight
Yeah, I'm smokin' on your, what's his name, tonight, tonight
Smokin' on you, shores, ain't two-nine, yeah, two


I am the omega, pgLang, Rollie gang, SIE
Don't you address me unless it's with four letters
I thought you'd known better
I been duckin' the pandemic, I been-, social gimmicks
I been duckin' the overnight activists, yeah
I'm not a trending topic, I'm a-
Hold on, y'all niggas playin' with me, man
I am the omega, pgLang, Rollie gang, SIE
Don't you address me unless it's with four letters
Bitch, I thought you'd known better
I been duckin' the pandemic, I been duckin' the social gimmicks
I been duckin' the overnight activists, yeah
I'm not a trending topic, I'm a prophet
I answer to Metatron and Gabriel
Bitch, looking for a better me
I am a legacy, I come from the seventy
The Al Green offspring, guns and the melody
The big shot, wrist on cryotherapy
Soon as I press that button
Nigga better get right like the ambulance comin'
Us two on a light, Keem been through nothin'
Dave Free got at least one B in the oven
I'm trippin', I'm juugin', my mental is amazing, brother
Pop off, only on occasions, brother
Rich nigga, momma know I made it, brother
Go figure, never caught cases, brother
Face it, brother, gracious brother
New flows comin', be patient, brother
Show my ass and take y'all to class
I can multitask like Megan, brother
2021, I ain't takin' no prisoner
Last year, y'all fucked up all the listener
Who went platinum? I call that a visitor
Who the fuck backin' 'em? All been falsified
The facts mean this a vaccine and the game need me to survive
The Elohim, the rebirth
Before you get to the Father, you gotta holla at me first, bitch
Smokin' on top fives
Motherfuck that album, fuck that single
Burn that hard drive (Burn that shit)
Ain't nobody safe
When I come up killin' everybody that's outside (Who you with?)
Yeah, Kanye changed his life
But me, I'm still an old-school Gemini (Lil' bitch)
Let me jump in this bitch

Let me jump in this bitch
Two phones, but I only bring one in this bitch
One daughter, but they all my sons in this bitch
No hoes, ain't shit gettin' done in this bitch
I'm scary, I got a gun in this bitch
Smokin' on top fives, stop playin', I'm that guy
Number two DM'ing my bitch
That's cool, I don't ask why",5322709
164333,3949291,Toosie Slide,rap,Drake,2020,1402235,{},"
Black leather glove, no sequins
Buckles on the jacket, it's Alyx shit
Nike crossbody, got a piece in it
Got a dance, but it's really on some street shit
I'ma show you how to get it


It go right foot up, left foot, slide
Left foot up, right foot, slide
Basically, I'm sayin' either way, we 'bout to slide, ayy
Can't let this one slide, ayy


Don't you wanna dance with me? No?
I could dance like Michael Jackson
I could give you thug passion
It's a Thriller in the trap where we from
Baby, don't you wanna dance with me? No?
I could dance like Michael Jackson
I could give you satisfaction
And you know we out here every day with it
I'ma show you how to get it

It go right foot up, left foot, slide
Left foot up, right foot, slide
Basically, I'm sayin', either way, we 'bout to slide, ayy
Can't let this one slide, ayy (Who's bad?)


Two thousand shorties wanna tie the knot, ayy, yeah
Two hundred shooters on my brother's block, woah, yeah
Petal off a rose like I love her not, maybe not
I don't know what's wrong with me, I can't stop, woah, yeah
Won't stop, woah, yeah, never stop
Got so many opps, I be mistakin' opps for other opps
Got so many people that I love out of troubled spots
Other than the family I got, it's either you or me
That's just how I think, it's either you or me
This life got too deep for you, baby
Two or three of us about to creep where they stayin'


Black leather glove, no sequins
Buckles on the jacket, it's Alyx shit
Nike crossbody, got a piece in it
Got a dance, but it's really on some street shit
I'ma show you how to get it

It go right foot up, left foot, slide
Left foot up, right foot, slide
Basically, I'm sayin' either way, we 'bout to slide, ayy
Can't let this one slide, ayy (Who's bad?)


Toosie slide, then I hit it double-time
Then I hit a spin 'cause we spun their block a couple times
If it's not the right time, there'll always be another time
I'm not even trippin', we'll just see 'em in the summertime, woah, yeah
Can't describe the pressure I be puttin' on myself, yeah
Really, I just can't afford to lose nobody else, yeah
If they movin' shaky, we'll just do this shit ourselves, woah
If I'm movin' shaky, Chubbs'll do this shit himself, yeah
Solo niggas, only YOLO, for real
Heard a lot about you but we don't know for real
Next time, guarantee the truth'll get revealed


Black leather gloves, no sequins, yeah
Buckles on the jacket, it's Alyx shit
Nike crossbody, got a piece in it
Got a dance, but it's really on some street shit
I'ma show you how

It go right foot up, left foot, slide
Left foot up, right foot, slide
Basically, I'm sayin' either way we 'bout to slide, ayy
Can't let this one slide, ayy


Don't you wanna dance with me? No?
I could dance like Michael Jackson (Jackson)
I could give you thug passion (Passion)
It's a Thriller in the trap where we from (Where we from)
Baby, don't you wanna dance with me? No?
I could dance like Michael Jackson (Jackson)
I could give you satisfaction ('Faction)
And you know we out here every day with it
I'ma show you how to get it


It go right foot up, left foot, slide
Left foot up, right foot, slide
Basically, I'm sayin' either way we 'bout to slide
(Who's bad?)",5402847
164351,3951192,Cadillac,rap,MORGENSHTERN &  (Eldzhey),2020,1966779,"{""MORGENSHTERN & Элджей (Eldzhey)""}","


Слава, что ты сдeлал?
Ха


Эй, цeпь на мнe, сыпь лавэ
Сотка тыщ на bag LV
Сотни сук хотят ко мнe
Сотни сук хотят камнeй
Как дeла? Как дeла?
Это новый Cadillac
Дeлать дeньги, дeлать дeньги
Дeлать дeньги, блять, вот так (Окeй, фью)


Ayy, bitch, we got some пушки (Пау)
Пау-пау, попал по тушкe (Ха)
На мнe ща двe подушки (Оу да)
Bitch, я висю, как молодой Пушкин (У)
Цeпи висят на папe (Е)
Копаeм кэш лопатой (Е)
Богатый будто каппeр (Е)
Как там твоя зарплата?

Эй, посмотри
Два мульта на мнe - часы
Три на шee, сeмь под жопой
Мнe чуть большe двадцати
Посмотри, посмотри
Два мульта на мнe - часы
Три на шee, сeмь под жопой
Мнe чуть большe двадцати


Эй, цeпь на мнe, сыпь лавэ
Сотка тыщ на bag LV
Сотни сук хотят ко мнe
Сотни сук хотят камнeй
Как дeла? Как дeла?
Это новый Cadillac
Дeлать дeньги, дeлать дeньги
Дeлать дeньги, блять, вот так


I am busy, мнe похуй на кризис, я в нём вырос (Уа-уа-уа)
Кто о чём мeчтал, то мы и взяли на вынос (Бля)
Эдлиб свeжeй, чeм вeсь музыкальный бизнeс (Блё-блё)
Этот фит убьёт быстрeй, чeм ко-ро-на-ви-рус
Sayonara «Sick» Boy
Это мой дом, это мой жон
Это мой двор, eбeйший chill zone
Молодой самурай с прозрачным зонтом
Под проливным валютным дождём
(Кх-кх-кх) Фeнимор Купeр
Разворот лукбука
Твоя подружка дрочит
На мой спорткар у клуба

Эй, цeпь на мнe, сыпь лавэ
Сотка тыщ на bag LV
Сотни сук хотят ко мнe
Сотни сук хотят камнeй
Как дeла? Как дeла?
Это новый Cadillac
Дeлать дeньги, дeлать дeньги
Дeлать дeньги, блять, вот так


Слава, что ты сдeлал?",5405269
164519,3959866,​happier,pop,Olivia Rodrigo,2021,1230015,{},"
We broke up a month ago
Your friends are mine, you know I know
You've moved on, found someone new
One more girl who brings out the better in you
And I thought my heart was detached
From all the sunlight of our past
But she's so sweet, she's so pretty
Does she mean you forgot about me?


Oh, I hope you're happy
But not like how you were with me
I'm selfish, I know, I can't let you go
So find someone great, but don't find no one better
I hope you're happy, but don't be happier


And do you tell her she's the most beautiful girl you've ever seen?
An eternal love bullshit you know you'll never mean
Remember when I believed
You meant it when you said it first to me?
And now I'm pickin' her apart
Like cuttin' her down will make you miss my wretched heart
But she's beautiful, she looks kind
She probably gives you butterflies

I hope you're happy
But not like how you were with me
I'm selfish, I know, I can't let you go
So find someone great, but don't find no one better
I hope you're happy
I wish you all the best, really
Say you love her, baby
Just not like you loved me
And think of me fondly when your hands are on her
I hope you're happy, but don't be happier


Ooh, ooh-ooh
Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh


I hope you're happy
Just not like how you were with me
I'm selfish, I know, can't let you go
So find someone great, but don't find no one better
I hope you're happy, but don't be happier",5416223
164627,3968816,Aint Shit,rap,Doja Cat,2021,1153223,{},"
Man
This happened one, two, three times too much
These dumb-ass niggas


Niggas ain't shit, come up in your crib
All up in your fridge, can't pay rent
Look at what you did, listen to your friends
When they say niggas ain't shit, 'cause
Niggas ain't shit, come up in your crib
All up in your fridge, can't pay rent
Look at what you did, listen to your friends
When they say niggas ain't shit


Umm, you could say that again
Niggas is square like Madison
I can't even really get mad at them
They fall, then I gotta facepalm
Shook him like an 8-ball and it's embarrassin'
Ten-page text, shoulda wrote a book, coulda made a bag
But he broke and he still waitin' 'til I can chill
And he really think I'ma get back to him
Doin' too much, relax a bit
Actin' like that 'cause your dad's a bitch
Must be the way that the planets is
Must be your face 'cause it's not your dick
I'm a freak, not a masochist
Shoulda known you had the baddest bitch
Left on read and can't give head
Really, you ain't shit, need a laxative

Niggas ain't shit, come up in your crib
All up in your fridge, can't pay rent
Look at what you did, listen to your friends
When they say niggas ain't shit, 'cause
Niggas ain't shit, come up in your crib
All up in your fridge, can't pay rent
Look at what you did, listen to your friends
When they say, niggas ain't shit, 'cause


Said that's not cheating if I wasn't with your ass, yo
You kept secrets and your cousin told me that, so (Your cousin)
Logical thinkin' is just something that you lack, so
What you even mad for? Lookin' like a stick up in your asshole
I'm not your mommy, nigga, find a new hobby, nigga
Return, yo, 'fore I get picked up, your shit's in the lobby, nigga
I'm not gon' key your car, I'll call your fuckin' mom
You should have paid my rent, go get a fuckin' job


Niggas ain't shit, come up in your crib
All up in your fridge, can't pay rent
Look at what you did, listen to your friends
When they say niggas ain't shit, 'cause
Niggas ain't shit, come up in your crib
All up in your fridge, can't pay rent
Look at what you did, listen to your friends
When they say niggas ain't shit, 'cause-",5427348
165074,3998661,ROCKSTAR,rap,DaBaby,2020,1957075,"{""Roddy Ricch""}","
Woo, woo
I pull up like
How you pull up, Baby? How you pull up? (Oh, oh, oh)
How you pull up? I pull up (Woo, SethInTheKitchen)


Let's go
Brand new Lamborghini, fuck a cop car
With the pistol on my hip like I'm a cop (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Have you ever met a real nigga rockstar? (Yeah)
This ain't no guitar, bitch, this a Glock (Woo)
My Glock told me to promise you gon' squeeze me (Woo)
You better let me go the day you need me (Woo)
Soon as you up me on that nigga, get to bustin' (Woo)
And if I ain't enough, go get the chop


It's safe to say I earned it, ain't a nigga gave me nothin' (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
I'm ready to hop out on a nigga, get to bustin'
Know you heard me say, ""You play, you lay,"" don't make me push the button
Full of pain, dropped enough tears to fill up a fuckin' bucket
Goin' for buckets, I bought a chopper
I got a big drum, it hold a hundred, ain't goin' for nothin'
I'm ready to air it out on all these niggas, I can see 'em runnin'
Just talked to my mama, she hit me on FaceTime just to check up on me and my brother
I'm really the baby, she know that her youngest son was always guaranteed to get the money (Okay, let's go)
She know that her baby boy was always guaranteed to get the loot
She know what I do, she know 'fore I run from a nigga, I'ma pull it out and shoot (Boom)
PTSD, I'm always waking up in cold sweats like I got the flu
My daughter a G, she saw me kill a nigga in front of her before the age of two
And I'll kill another nigga too
'Fore I let another nigga do somethin' to you
Long as you know that, don't let nobody tell you different
Daddy love you (Yeah, yeah)

Let's go
Brand new Lamborghini, fuck a cop car
With the pistol on my hip like I'm a cop (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Have you ever met a real nigga rockstar? (Yeah)
This ain't no guitar, bitch, this a Glock (Woo)
My Glock told me to promise you gon' squeeze me (Woo)
You better let me go the day you need me (Woo)
Soon as you up me on that nigga, get to bustin' (Woo, yeah)
And if I ain't enough, go get the chop (Yeah, yeah)


Keep a Glocky when I ride in the Suburban
'Cause the codeine had a young nigga swervin'
I got the mop, watch me wash 'em like detergent
And I'm ballin', that's why it's diamonds on my jersey
Slide on opps' side and flip the block back, yeah, yeah
My junior popped him and left him lopsided, yeah, yeah
We spin his block, got the rebound, Dennis Rodman
Fool me one time, you can't cross me again
Twelve hundred horsepower, I get lost in the wind
If he talkin' on the yard, the pen' dogs'll take his chin
Maybach SUV for my refugees
Buy blocks in the hood, put money in the streets
I was solo when the opps caught me at the gas station
Had it on me, thirty thousand, thought it was my last day
But they ain't even want no smoke
If I had to choose it, murder what she wrote

Let's go
Brand new Lamborghini, fuck a cop car
With the pistol on my hip like I'm a cop (Yeah, yeah, yeah)
Have you ever met a real nigga rockstar? (Yeah)
This ain't no guitar, bitch, this a Glock (Woo)
My Glock told me to promise you gon' squeeze me (Woo)
You better let me go the day you need me (Woo)
Soon as you up me on that nigga, get to bustin' (Woo)
And if I ain't enough, go get the chop",5465132
165493,4025376,TROLLZ,rap,6ix9ine & Nicki Minaj,2020,1023676,{},"
(Sad Pony)


Watch, mhm, Glock, mhm, cocked, mhm, got it, mhm
You need that? I got it, this cash, my pockets
The 'Cat one hundred, you need that? I got it
Need it, got it, cash, pockets
Bands on me, sticks on me
You need that? I got it, this cash, my pockets
The 'Cat one hundred, you need that?


Yeah, she like how I throw them racks, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Keep on throwin' that cash, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Keep on throwin' that ass, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Benz truck in the back, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


I know you don't like me, you wanna fight me
You don't want no problems at your party, don't invite me
I don't worry 'bout you niggas, please stop talking 'bout me
Always talking 'bout me 'cause you looking for the clouty
6ix-nina, the 9ine-nina
Riding in a two-seater with two ninas
Baby got that Aquafina, it's cocaina
Smoking on that OG reefer, no TMZ-a
Forgiatos on a Benz truck, make her friends fuck
Told her she could get Chanel if she let my friends fuck
Stars shining in the Rolls Royce, it got red guts
Wait, hold up, nah, I still don't give a fuck
Vroom, vroom, G5, vroom, vroom, we high
You the type of nigga that I never wanna be like
You a type of bitch that will never get a reply
Hi, hater, bye, hater, vroom

Yeah, she like how I throw them racks, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Keep on throwin' that cash, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Keep on throwin' that ass, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Benz truck in the back, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Dollar, dollar bill, come get her
Even your man know Nickis do it better
I know you don't like me, you wanna fight me
Always on my page, never double-tap like me
Baddies to my left and my right
Never chase a corny nigga, put that on my life
Just put it in his face, all this cake, he wanted a taste
We sippin' on that Ace, itty-bitty waist, pretty face
Yeah, eat it, Cookie Monster (Ooh)
He a slave to this pussy, call me master
Real wet, I said, ""Slurp it like it's pasta""
They get nervous when it's Nicki on the roster (Rrr)
Somebody usher this nigga into a clinic
My flow's still sick, I ain't talkin' a pandemic
I write my own lyrics, a lot of these bitches gimmicks
They study Nicki style, now all of them wan' mimic
Talkin' 'bout snitches when it's snitches in your camp
Never stand alone, you always itchin' for a stamp
Me, I'm still money, wrists light up like a lamp
They gon' have to send they best fighter for the champ
Racks, I got 'em, Mary, I'm poppin'
They keep hatin', but still watchin'
Check the boards, I'm still toppin'
Bustdown or plain jane, I got options
It's a bunch of mini-mes, I'm the one they mockin'
Showed you how to get a bag, now you goin' shoppin'
When I come out, all the sneak bitches start plottin' (Plottin')
When I come out, it's a sweep, bitches start moppin'

Yeah, she like how I throw them racks, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Keep on throwin' that cash, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Keep on throwin' that ass, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Benz truck in the back, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah


Watch, mhm, Glock, mhm, cocked, mhm, got it, mhm
If he like, I throw it fast, real fast, fast, fast
He singin' my old song, yellin', ""Ass, ass, ass""
They be speedin', tryna beat me, then they crash, crash, crash
Still a hundred like the number on my dash, dash, dash


That real ass ain't keep your nigga home",5498513
165700,4038817,Savage Remix,rap,Megan Thee Stallion,2020,1061389,{Beyoncé},"
Queen B, want no smoke with me (Okay)
Been turnt, this motherfucker up eight hundred degree (Yeah)
My whole team eat, chef's kiss, she's a treat (Mwah)
Ooh, she so bougie, bougie, bon appétit


I'm a savage (Yeah), attitude nasty (Yeah, ah)
Talk big shit, but my bank account match it (Ooh)
Hood, but I'm classy, rich, but I'm ratchet (Oh, ah)
Haters kept my name in they mouth, now they gaggin' (Ah, ah)
Bougie, he say, ""The way that thang move, it's a movie"" (Ooh-oh)
I told that boy, ""We gotta keep it low, leave me the room key"" (Ooh-oh)
I done bled the block and now it's hot, bitch, I'm Tunechi (Ooh-oh)
A mood and I'm moody, ah


I'm a savage, yeah (Okay)
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah (Okay)
Sassy, moody, nasty, yeah (Hey, hey, nasty)
Acting stupid, what's happening? (Woah, woah, woah, what's happening?)
Bitch, what's happening? (Woah, woah, okay)
Bitch, I'm a savage, yeah  (Okay)
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah  (Ratchet)
Sassy, moody, nasty, huh (Nasty)
Acting stupid, what's happening? (Woah, ooh-oh)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ayy, ah, ooh-oh)

Hips tick-tock when I dance (Dance)
On that Demon Time, she might start a OnlyFans (OnlyFans)
Big B and that B stand for bands
If you wanna see some real ass, baby, here's your chance
I say, left cheek, right cheek, drop it low, then swang (Swang)
Texas up in this thang (Thang), put you up on this game (Game)
IVY PARK on my frame (Frame), gang, gang, gang, gang (Gang)
If you don't jump to put jeans on, baby, you don't feel my pain (Hol' up)
Please don't get me hype (I'm hype), write my name in ice (Ice, ice, ice)
Can't argue with these lazy bitches, I just raise my price
I'm a boss, I'm a leader, I pull up in my two-seater
And my mama was a savage, nigga, got this shit from Tina


I'm a savage, yeah
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah (Ratchet, yeah)
Sassy, moody, nasty, yeah (Okay)
Acting stupid, what's happening? (Ah)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ah, what's up?)
Bitch, I'm a savage, yeah
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah (Woah, woah, woah, okay)
Sassy, moody, nasty, huh (Ooh, ooh, okay)
Acting stupid, what's happening? (Woah, ah)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ayy, ah, ah)

Like Beyoncé, like me (Like me)
He want a bitch like the Stallion with the knees (With the knees)
He be like, ""Damn, how that thang movin' in them jeans?"" (Yeah, yeah, them jeans)
Ayy, even D4L couldn't do it like me, like me
Ooh, ah, ooh
I done got this body ready just for you
Girl, I hope he don't catch me messin' 'round with you
Talkin' to myself in the mirror like, ""Bitch, you my boo""
I'm the shit, ooh
I need a mop to clean the floor, it's too much drip, ooh
I keep a knot, I keep a watch, I keep a whip, ooh (Keep it real, ooh)
Let's play a game, Simon says I'm still that bitch, ayy
I'm still that bitch, yuh (Ah)


I'm a savage, yeah (Okay)
Classy, bougie, ratchet (Okay)
Sassy, moody, nasty, yeah
Acting stupid, what's happening? (Ah, what's up?)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ah, what's up?)
Bitch, I'm a savage, yuh (Okay)
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah (Woah, woah, woah, okay)
Sassy, moody, nasty, huh (Ooh, ooh)
Acting stupid, what's happening? (Ooh, ooh, ah)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ayy, ah, ah)

I heard they askin' for the Queen, they brought some cameras in here
I'm a bad bitch, she's a savage, no comparison here
I'ma flip my hair and look back while I twerk in the mirror
All this money in the room, think some scammers in here
I'm comin' straight up out that Third, I whip the whip like I stirred it (Stirred)
Woodgrain, we swervin', keepin' his mind all on these curves (Uh)
Coupe fly like a bird (Bird), cold on 'em like, ""Brrr"" (Ice)
Always keep my words, no, I don't do crosswords
Stallion when I ride, he like them hot girls with them hips, ah (Skrrt, skrrt)
I hopped that shit, the way I hopped out and slid, ah (Skrrt, skrrt)
I pop my shit, now watch me pop up again, ah (Woah)
I mop the floor, now watch me sweep up these Ms, 'cause I- (Ah)


I'm a savage, yeah (Savage, okay)
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah (Okay)
Sassy, moody, nasty, yeah (Nasty)
Acting stupid, what's happening? (What's happening? What's up?)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ah, what's up?)
Bitch, I'm a savage, yeah (Okay, I'm a savage)
Classy, bougie, ratchet, yeah (Woah, woah, woah, okay, bitch)
Sassy, moody, nasty, huh (Yeah, yeah, nasty)
Acting stupid (Woah), what's happening? (What's happening?)
Bitch, what's happening? (Ayy, ah, what's happening?)


I'm a savage
It's Thee Stallion and the B
H-Town, goin' down",5516074
165799,4043995,GREECE,pop,DJ Khaled,2020,1099910,{Drake},"
We The Best Music
Another one
DJ Khaled


Come with me, leave all of your things, yeah
We can stop at Gucci, stop at Louis V, yeah
Come with me, fly you out to Greece
Full speed, survoler Paris, yeah
Come with me, leave all of your things, yeah
We can stop at Gucci, stop at Louis V, yeah
Come with me, fly you out to Greece
Full speed, survoler Paris


Speedboats, baby, in Nikki Beach
Waves in my ears, smokin' weed (Oui, oui)
Whippin' through the sand in a Jeep (Oui, oui)
All because of what I did on beats, baby
Life's sweet, baby, iced out, baby
You just go get ready, we go out, baby
Long time lookin' for the bounce, yeah
OZ had the bounce, yeah

Come with me, leave all of your things, yeah
We can stop at Gucci, stop at Louis V, yeah
Come with me, fly you out to Greece
Full speed, survoler Paris
Come with me, leave all of your things, yeah
We can stop at Gucci, stop at Louis V, yeah
Come with me, fly you out to Greece
Full speed, je suis ton génie


Rolls Royce, baby, in Hidden Hills
Bags full of hundred dollar bills (Oui, oui)
Joggin' past your wife and she get chills (Oui, oui)
All because of how I kept it real
Life's sweet, baby, on a G-Wag
I get you anything you need, baby, yeah
Worked for everything you see, baby
Ooh-wee, baby, ooh


Come with me, leave all of your things, yeah
We can stop at Gucci, stop at Louis V, yeah
Come with me, fly you out to Greece
Full speed, survoler Paris
Come with me, leave all of your things, yeah
We can stop at Gucci, stop at Louis V, yeah
Come with me, fly you out to Greece
Full speed, survoler Paris

(Might just have to go in on that)
Never fallin', why you makin' problems?
I've been silent, why you makin' problems?
I'm a problem, bein' rich is not my fault
You decide who you think the shit reside with
I been quiet, hard to miss me when I'm flyin'
Gone out to Caicos, she can stay in my room
She can stay in my room, and it ain't my
I was tryna play it right
I was tryna treat you nice
Funny how I had to stop
See me when I'm outside
We ain't have a problem
Then you went and found one
How you gonna get a bag?
She can't help but get attached
See me when you're outside
See me on the Southside
I could tell you're sick inside
'Cause she just wanna love me
She don't wanna leave me
She just wanna love me
She don't wanna leave me",5522492
165817,4045478,Stuck with U,pop,Ariana Grande & Justin Bieber,2020,1910892,{},"
Mmm
Hey, yeah
(That's just for fun)
(What?)
(I'm stuck with you)
Ah


I'm not one to stick around
One strike and you're out, baby
Don't care if I sound crazy
But you never let me down, no, no
That's why when the sun's up, I'm stayin'
Still layin' in your bed, singin'


Ooh, ooh, ooh, ooh
Got all this time on our hands
Might as well cancel our plans, yeah
I could stay here for a lifetime

So, lock the door and throw out the key
Can't fight this no more, it's just you and me
And there's nothin' I, nothin' I, I can do
I'm stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you
So, go ahead and drive me insane
Baby, run your mouth, I still wouldn't change
Being stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you
I'm stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you, baby


There's nowhere we need to be, no, no, no
I'ma get to know you better
Kinda hope we're here forever
There's nobody on these streets
If you told me that the world's endin'
Ain't no other way that I can spend it


Oh, oh, oh, oh (Ooh)
Got all this time in my hands
Might as well cancel our plans (Yeah, yeah)
I could stay here forever


So, lock the door and throw out the key
Can't fight this no more, it's just you and me
And there's nothin' I, nothin' I, I can do
I'm stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you
So, go ahead and drive me insane
Baby, run your mouth, I still wouldn't trade
Being stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you
I'm stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you

Woah
Baby, come take all my time
Go on, make me lose my mind
We got all that we need here tonight


I lock the door (Lock the door) and throw out the key
Can't fight this no more (Can't fight this no more), it's just you and me
And there's nothin' I, nothin' I'd rather do
I'm stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you
So, go ahead and drive me insane
Baby, run your mouth, I still wouldn't change
All this lovin' you, hatin' you, wantin' you
I'm stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with
You, oh, oh


Stuck with you, stuck with you, stuck with you",5524080
166173,4062437,GOOBA,rap,6ix9ine,2020,4015256,{},"
I tell a nigga don't dick ride, don't blick ride
Leave it to the double thick thighs, twin sisters
Drop it down and wobble, wobble up, mami booted up
She get down and gobble, gobble up 'cause my money up
Slide, slide in the Bentley truck-a, the Wraith truck-a
Your bestie is a dick sucker, I big dub her
As-salam-alam alaykum, you big hater
You nothin' but a hater, hater, clout chaser


Now we catch him at the chicken spot, up a couple chops
Pop that nigga with a hundred shots, ra-ta-ta-ta-ta
DayDay made that nigga Diddy Bop, cha-cha-cha-cha-cha
He thought we was gon' knuckle up, bitch, I don't box
And these niggas always talkin' shit, yadda-yadda-ya
When you see me, what you talkin' 'bout, fuck you talkin' 'bout?
Niggas always wanna chase clout, bitch, I am clout
Tell 'em get up out my face now 'fore I grrt
Are you dumb, stupid, or dumb, huh?
Play me like a dummy, like bitch, are you dumb?
Are you dumb, stupid, or dumb, huh?
Yeah, you got some money, but you still fuckin' ugly
Stupid, listen
When I talk, you better listen
We can make him dance, bachata
Slide over, do the cha-cha
Grrt, bah-bah
Make a nigga go adiós
Dímelo, mami
Fresca, you nasty
Flame up, light it
They see me and get excited
Two step, spin around, so fly, pilot
They sick, been hot way before coronavirus
Nigga, who did that? Nigga, who did what?
Nigga, that's my shit, don't bite it

I tell a nigga don't dick ride, don't blick ride
Leave it to the double thick thighs, twin sisters
Drop it down and wobble, wobble up, mami booted up
She get down and gobble, gobble up 'cause my money up
Slide, slide in the Bentley truck-a, the Wraith truck-a
Your bestie is a dick sucker, I big dub her
As-salam-alam alaykum, you big hater
You nothin' but a hater, hater, clout chaser


You're mad I'm back, big mad
He's mad, she's mad, big sad
Haha, don't care, stay mad
Ah-hah, ah-hah, ah-hah
Haha, bitch, I'm laughin' 'cause you big mad
See it in your face, cry baby, bitch, you big sad
Niggas tweetin' bout me, got me trendin', bitch, you big sad
Tell me how I ratted, came home to a big bag


(Jah, ayy, you know that boy)",5545285
166987,4112878,RAPSTAR,rap,Polo G,2021,1230853,{},"
(Shout out my nigga Synco)


Uh (Tuned up), copped a BMW, new deposit, I picked up another bag
Like fuck it, I'ma count while I'm in it
I hear planes flyin', crowds screamin', money counters, chains clangin'
Shit, I guess that's how it sound when you winnin'
I ain't jokin', do it sound like I'm kiddin'?
I been makin' like two thousand a minute
So high up through the clouds, I was swimmin'
I'm probably gon' drown when I'm in it
I bet she gon' get loud when I'm in it
And we might have a child when I'm finished


Uh, I won't love a ho, after we fuck, she can't get near me
Only bitch I give a conversation to is Siri
My pants Amiri, yes, I'm winnin', clearly
I'm the chosen one, seen my potential, so they fear me
Lately I've been prayin', God, I wonder, can You hear me?
Thinkin' 'bout the old me, I swear I miss you dearly
Stay down 'til you come up, I've been stickin' to that theory
Every day a battle, I'm exhausted and I'm weary
Make sure I smile in public, when alone, my eyes teary
I fought through it all, but that shit hurt me severely
I've been gettin' high to hide behind my insecurities
Takin' different pills, but I know it ain't gon'-

Uh, copped a BMW, new deposit, I picked up another bag
Like fuck it, I'ma count while I'm in it
I hear planes flyin', crowds screamin', money counters, chains clangin'
Shit, I guess that's how it sound when you winnin'
I ain't jokin', do it sound like I'm kiddin'?
I been makin' like two thousand a minute
So high up through the clouds, I was swimmin'
I'm probably gon' drown when I'm in it
I bet she gon' get loud when I'm in it (Uh, uh)
And we might have a child when I'm finished


They say I'm Pac rebirth, never put out a weak verse
Homicides when we lurk, I'ma step 'til my feet hurt
Been puttin' them streets first
White tees turned burgundy t-shirts
Lookin' for somethin' real, he stuck in a deep search
Anxiety killin' me, I just want to leave Earth
When they ask if I'm okay, it just make everything seem worse
Try and explain your feelings, sound like something you rehearsed
Stabbed me in my back with a clean smirk
Lookin' so deep into your eyes, I can read your thoughts, so
Shut the fuck-, I mean, please don't talk
I done been through too much and I don't need another loss
Put that on every war scar for every battle I fought

Uh, copped a BMW, new deposit, I picked up another bag
Like fuck it, I'ma count while I'm in it
I hear planes flyin', crowds screamin', money counters, chains clangin'
Shit, I guess that's how it sound when you winnin'
I ain't jokin', do it sound like I'm kiddin'?
I been makin' like two thousand a minute
So high up through the clouds, I was swimmin'
I'm probably gon' drown when I'm in it
I bet she gon' get loud when I'm in it
And we might have a child when I'm finished


When I'm finished, when I'm finished",5609020
167015,4115051,Only You Freestyle,rap,Headie One & Drake,2020,1266855,{},"
(M1OnTheBeat)
Woi
Yes
(M1OnTheBeat)
Yes
Woi
Again and again, again and again
Yeah
Yo


Chubbs might jam this yute for a chain
And give it to a sweet one, called that Maya Jama
Givin' out gifts like Santa, sippin' on Sanna
Used to do lean and Wock'
Closet filled up with designer, comin' like Panda, Panda
Yeah, gyal just came to the booth and asked for a wheel
She never heard drill in Atlanta
Arabic ting told me that I look like Youssef, look like Hamza
Habibti please, ana akeed, inti wa ana ahla
With Pop Skull in Gaza, but not that Gaza, but still it's a mazza
Niggas want peace like Cassava
But we let bridge dem burn like grabba
Woi
Four in the cliz and one in the headie
Hand no shake, man, hold that steady
You man love pose with the ting for the picture
You man shoulda buss that ting already
You man love hezi', hezi'
Yeah, can't backchat to the Prezi'
Know when the beef just taste like veggie?
Gyal go Ritz for the mani-pedi
CC bag look nice, but the Birkin bag look way more heavy
That's just a big gyal ting, man, you get me?
Raemi just turned mommy, and that's my sis, so I just turned abti
Fan mail came to the crib from a yute that loves me, I swear that touched me
I never even drive no whips I own, so they all look way too dusty
If me and Gallest go St. Michael, the gyal come way too fussy, crushy
Man said they would do this and that, but the man wasn't really that wassi, was he?
Nah, nah, nah, the man wasn't really that what?
One-nine-four-two hits my system, man get way too frosty, buzzy
Girls from the past that lost me love me
Same ones there that crossed me, cuss me
Everything come full circle, word to the boss above me
Slow stroking 'cause the bamski way too big, my gyal don't rush me
Woi
Don't make me have to rise my rifle
Man try send some young boys for me, don't make me have to ride by high school
Shit you man been droppin' lately, don't make me have to fly my iTunes
So much people buy into my hype, don't make me have to buy my hype too
Dealt with the big homie already, don't make me have to side-by-side you
Nuff times he tried to hide behind you
Amnesia but when I remind you
I'm touchin' road and I can't find you
Word to the M-O-B I'm tied to
I'm givin' up when I decide to, jheeze

One
Suh-suh-suh (OFB, OFB)
Suh-suh
Suh-suh, suh-suh-suh-suh (One)


Oh, how we hate leggies (Suh-suh)
How much points have the gang got? Many (One)
Didn't ever have to rise that dots
It was just under my bed and ready (Turn)
Bro-bro chinged up an opp
Boy, I swear he got chinged already (They told me turn, uh)
That next one thought he was boss
Then he got shot, Nathan Tettey (They told me turn)
Got this bad B, Ohene (Turn, turn)
My next one from yard love reggae (Shawty)
We dishin' out store and telly
Then we in France balling out, Trezeguet (One)
She look sexy sippin' on Henny
My prawns grilled and my pasta penne (Suh, suh, suh, suh, suh, suh, suh-suh-suh-suh)
She give headie, headie
My tracksuit Louis, now covered in Fenty
Used to put the light in the cling
And it still didn't stop it smellin' like petty (Turn)
Put a dark in the blue, then we put it in the red, Balotelli
Them times it was M way (What?)
I mean M way, T house, M way (Huh?)
Now it's penty, uptown penty (Huh?)
Bentley, Range, then Bentley (One)
Have you ever had your pockets empty? (Turn)
But still found the bread to afford a trenton? (Turn, turn, turn)
Six litres flying through Epsom (Turn, turn, turn)
I swear I've seen life from both perspectives (They told me turn, uh)
That spot so far upsuh, en-route, got no connection (Told me turn)
I done run through so much Scottish notes
Couldn't care 'bout no recession (One)
I still get one jail call from Boogie
Judge gave him twenty years straight, it moved me
CPS murder in the dock like Rupert (Suh, suh, suh, suh)
Cah lil' bro went and dun him so ruthless
Got this cutie, she half-Cuban
Probably why she like playin' with the Cuban (Turn)
Say she like chillin' with the ooters, booters
Eating uptown all suited booted, booted, booted (Turn, turn, turn, turn)
They wasn't with us when the jeans were bootleg
Put in that work, we ain't never been spoon-fed (Turn)
Comin' for the jungle, you know where the zoo is (They told me turn, uh)
Four-four or the three-two auto bells, it's a toothpick (Told me turn)
No rap cap, we just speak what the truth is (Told me turn, uh)
Lord forgive them, they don't know what they're doing (Told me turn)
Shotgun, open the hatch, I put two in
Still ain't forgot how it feels to be losin' (They told me turn, uh)
They thought it was permanent, found it amusin'
Now this drip on me like I'm canoein'
Time just flyin' (One)
I'm just tryna take this live ting to my juvies, juvies (Suh-suh-suh)
So the beef is fryin'
They ain't tryna stop slidin', Toosie, Toosie

(One)
(Suh-suh)",5611509
167623,4151436,Mood Swings,rap,Pop Smoke,2020,1088908,"{""Lil Tjay""}","
(Mood swings)
Oh, you ain't know I could sing? (Oh, oh, oh)
Hahaha (Yeah)


Shorty a lil' baddie (She a lil' baddie)
Shorty my lil' boo thing (Boo thing)
And shorty got the fatty
Shorty be catching mood swings
Every time I fuck without a rubber
I nutted on the covers
And I kept it undercover
'Cause I don't kiss and tell (Kiss and tell)


Every time I fuck, she call me daddy
My lil' mama nasty
I see the pussy through the panties (Whatever you want)
She taste like candy
She a queen, like Nefertiti
Uh oh, my lil' mama sittin' pretty
And we be shoppin' through the city (Oh, oh)
I gave her keys to the Bentley (Woah, woah)
Get off your knees, you don't gotta cry to me
I'm your best friend, baby, you don't gotta lie
I'll get you everything that you want and that you need from Chanel to Celine
It's on you to decide
Valentino, yeah, I put you in the best
Start liftin' up your dress, start kissin' on your neck (Oh no, no)
Start rubbin' on your butt, start massagin' your breasts
I ain't wanna give you a baby just yet, so I backed out and nutted on your breasts
I put you in a Uber (Uber) and sent you to your bed (Oh)
The very next day (Oh), you sent me a text (Oh)
You pulled up to the crib and we did it again (Oh, oh)

Shorty a lil' baddie (She a lil' baddie)
Shorty my lil' boo thing (Boo thing)
And shorty got the fatty
Shorty be catching mood swings
Every time I fuck without a rubber
I nutted on the covers
And I kept it undercover
'Cause I don't kiss and tell (Ooh)


You know, I never found love until I looked into your eyes (Until I looked into your eyes)
First time blushin', I ain't even gon' lie (Ain't even gon' lie)
Four rounds in, leavin' bruises on your thighs
You the only bitch could make me spin off on the guys
And the only bitch that make me wanna nut when I'm inside
It's your vibe, leave with me you gettin' high
Girl, ain't bitches fuckin' wit' you even if they tried
She a tsunami, I ain't never felt it dry
Close my eyes while I sleep, hope you be there when I wake
Honestly, I feel the vibe we have is great
And if there's something in your mind, you can tell me
And if I told you what's on mine, would you help me?
You gon' see the bigger picture, it's just gon' take time
Just because you mine, I'ma keep you lookin' like a dime
Ain't no imperfections, girl, you fine
Baby, what's your sign?
I hope you ain't against the slow grind
(Work, work, it's me and you) Me and you
Keep it silent, there ain't nothin' we can't do
Through the storm, baby, we can make it through
Why you actin' brand new? You know you my lil' boo, yeah
Got up on my Birkin, it's workin'
She said she a virgin (It's hurtin')
She my biggest fan, she always lurkin'
And she know I'm a man, I'ma put that work in
I know she can't stand me, I'm fancy
So I'ma bring her out when I get my Grammy
Late night sex, she can't find her panties
Couldn't hold it in, now she need a plan B

Shorty a lil' baddie
She my lil' boo thing
And shorty got the fatty (Shorty got the fatty)
Shorty be catching mood swings
Every time I fuck without a rubber
I nutted on her covers
And I kept it undercover
'Cause I don't kiss and tell",5657205
167739,4162298,Lemonade,pop,Internet Money,2020,1437713,"{Gunna,NAV,""Don Toliver""}","
Xanny bars, suicide door, brand new bag
College girls give a nigga head in my Rafs
Rockstar life, so much money it'll make you laugh, hey
These bitches, they hate, and you can't miss what you never had, hey, hey


Off the juice (Juice), codeine got me trippin' (Juice)
Copped the coupe (Coupe), woke up, roof is missin' (Yeah)
Ice (Ice), lemonade, my neck was drippin'
Ice (Ice), lemonade, my neck was drippin'


Addy boys, got some sixties in my bag (Addy)
Lips sealed, I ain't pillow talkin', I'm no rat (No)
In my earlobe, got two karats, VVS (Bling)
Got a penthouse near Rodeo off of stress (Stress)
All this money, when I grew up, I had nothing (Nothing)
Filled with backstabbers, my old life was disgusting (Disgusting)
Can't believe it, gotta thank God that I'm livin' comfortably (Thank God)
Gettin' checks, I don't believe her, she say she done with me
Burned some bridges and I let the fire light the way (Oh-woah)
Kickin' my feet up, left the PJs on a PJ (A PJ)
Yeah, I'm a big dawg, and I walk around with no leash (Oh-oh)
I got water on me, yeah, everything on Fiji

Xanny bars, suicide door, brand new bag
College girls give a nigga head in my Rafs
Rockstar life, so much money it'll make you laugh, hey
These bitches, they hate, and you can't miss what you never had, hey, hey


Off the juice (Juice), codeine got me trippin' (Juice)
Copped the coupe (Coupe), woke up, roof is missin' (Yeah)
Ice (Ice), lemonade, my neck was drippin'
Ice (Ice), lemonade, my neck was drippin' (Hey, hey)


I'm a rockstar, play guitars (Yeah), sippin' Wock', hey (Hey)
Adderall, fentanyl, Xanax bars, ayy (Hey)
I was fifteen, I was sippin' codeine with my dawg, ayy (Codeine)
Did a Percocet, Promethazine, I feel nausey (Promethazine)
Put up a stick and I hop on a plane
Still in my war ways (War ways)
Shit is so risky, I gotta be gifted
He blessed me with fortune and fame (Fortune and fame, nice)
I remember from fifty, I couldn't go back empty
I knew I was stuck to the game (Stuck)
I'm loyal and I'll never change
I'm never gon' go against the grain (Go against the grain)
I'm never gon' be the one to turn on my brother
When police has got us detained (Nah)
I won't ever love a bitch more than my mother
And that's on my government name (Nah)
I can't be no sucker, ain't hatin' on no one
I wish everybody get paid (Paid)
'Cause we countin' up every day (Every day)
Gettin' high 'til I land in the grave

Xanny bars, suicide door, brand new bag
College girls give a nigga head in my Rafs
Rockstar life, so much money it'll make you laugh, hey
These bitches, they hate, and you can't miss what you never had, hey, hey


Off the juice (Juice), codeine got me trippin' (Juice)
Copped the coupe (Coupe), woke up, roof is missin'
Ice (Ice), lemonade, my neck was drippin'
Ice (Ice), lemonade, my neck was drippin'


Yeah, yeah, yeah",5670872
168145,4185841,WHATS POPPIN Remix,rap,Jack Harlow,2020,1688549,"{""Lil Wayne"",""Tory Lanez"",DaBaby}","
Back with the remix
These boys all my sons like Phoenix (Pooh, you a fool for this one)
My city and state never ever seen this
Jimmy Neutron, I'm a young boy genius (Oh Lord, jetson made another one)
On the futon, I'ma give her that penis
When this shit's done, I'ma fill up arenas
Ooh, like Gilbert Arenas
Shoot my shot, I'm still with the demons, ooh
I keep it thorough
I got five chicks in New York, that means one in each borough
I'm in the pocket like Burrow
When I'm back home, though, they treat me like Robert De Niro
Took her to Taco Bell, bought her a churro
Took her home, gave her a cinnamon swirl
I left it in, now I got a one-year-old
Zeros on zeros on zeros (Zeros)
That's what my bank account balance say (Woo)
I got a check from the shoe company
Now I do anything that New Balance say
I bought her a plane ticket, out of state
I got me a shorty from 'round the way
Said, ""I'm in town today""
She said she comin' over and she down to stay
I got a hit, she been playin' that shit
So when she pull up on me, I know what she 'bout to say

What's poppin'?
Brand-new whip, just hopped in (Just hopped in)
I got options
I could pass that bitch like Stockton (It ain't nothin')
Just joshin' (Oh, these niggas got me fucked up, nigga)
I'ma spend this holiday locked in (Ooh, you know, it's like)
My body got rid of them toxins (Let me go, let me go, mm, mm)
SportsCenter, top ten


Call up my bitch, tell her, ""Bring me that noggin"" (Brrt)
Brain real good, she a scholar
I like the thing with low mileage, good brain with no college
Call me DaBaby, no toddler (Wah)
I'm real creative and stylish, FN in my denim
I send a hit, make him spin 'em
And I just flew back from L.A. on the jet yesterday (Nyoom)
I go back and forth like I play tennis
I fuck with your ho, yeah, I'm fit for it
Still on the Billboard, the number one song in UK
And I done got so fuckin' rich, all these hoes on my dick
I still don't give a fuck what you say
She eat it like a Pac-Man, nigga (Eat it)
Whoop a nigga like I'm Batman, nigga (Eat it)
I just pulled up in the Batmobile (Nyoom)
The reason I ain't fuckin' with these rap-ass niggas
'Cause they cap-ass niggas (Cap), and they raps ain't real (Cap)
Believe me, you wanna keep your life, then take it easy
I'm rockin' water diamonds, need a Squeegee
These niggas watered down, they drinkin' Fiji
My whip is orange and brown like I'm in Cleveland
My bitch is Mello Yello like a soda (Soda)
These niggas tattletalers, I'm a soldier
Ayy, somebody tell them niggas that it's over
You know it's Baby, nigga

What's poppin'? (Poppin')
Brand-new whip, just hopped in (Woo, hahaha)
I got options (Ayy)
I could pass that bitch like Stockton (Uh)


Hop out that Scat and I caught her
I'm out here with somebody daughter
She callin' me daddy, I'm somebody father
I gotta go gets it, I will not go kiss it
Or put my lips on it like somebody water
The diamond, the glacier, the card in the wallet
She pulled up to fuck me but nobody caught her
She told me that she wasn't feelin' my music
I fucked her, she told me, ""It's nobody harder""
And I'm with the G-ski, I need that shit for the freeski
We are not buyin' no pussy you sellin' on Peachtree
It's so much work on my celly
I had to go tell all my bitches, ""Email it to reach me""
All in my DM, I'll follow your BM
She play with the croski, we used to fuck on the lowski
She use to lie on my bed and go lie to your face
And say I'm just a broski, nigga, you knows me
You ain't believe it, you wanted to toast me
I had extendi as long as a ruler
In case you was coolin' and wanna approach me
Dropped the Bentayga, came back in the Cullinan
She wanna fuck again, I want that tongue again
Stuck it so deep that she cough up her lung again
Five-star bitches, they on the run again, run again
Runnin' in diamonds, they illuminatin' the way that I come again
I just put so many pennies on the watch
That I don't ever got to stunt again, nigga, lil' Tory

What's poppin'? (Canada)
Brand-new whip, just hopped in (Just hopped in)
I got options
I could pass that bitch like Stockton (It ain't nothin')
Just joshin'
I'ma spend this holiday locked in (Ooh, man, I just caught a drink, man, fuck)
My body got rid of them toxins (Mm, mm)
SportsCenter, top ten


Mm, what's brackin'? (Woo)
Brand-new whip, new mansion (Brrp)
Brand-new tips, new dancers (Yeah)
Same old dick, new Magnums (Oh)
Same old shit, new maggots (Yeah)
Same old throne, new dragons (Uh)
Same old strong, new ashes (Yeah)
I could pass that bitch like Magic, yeah (Oh, oh)
I ain't cappin', I'm lit, I'm active, yeah (Yeah)
Lil' five in that bitch like Paxson, yeah (Yeah)
Gonna drown in this milk like Apple Jacks
I sell a bitch dreams, put tax on that
Lil' slime in that bitch, that's slatt for slatt (Yeah)
Obama, Presidential Rollie, that's black on black (Yeah)
Got ninety-nine problems and a bitch ain't one
Yeah, numbers don't lie, this the aftermath (Yeah)
Yeah, what's poppin'? (Poppin')
Brand-new phone, just dropped it (Uh)
Fuck it, I got options
I bust down a couple Apple Watches (Hello)
I could put the ball in the end zone
Put a bad bitch and her friends on, ooh, ooh
I'ma bust all on the skin tone
I be masked up, ask Ken Jeong, ooh, ooh
Dark-haired bitches like Shego (Pew)
I like 'em blonde like me though (Yeah)
Although I'm Don Corleone (Brrat)
I will still slide like Neo, uh (Hello)
Kief all around my pre-roll (Yeah)
New Orleans, nigga, I'm Creole
She said, ""Babe, does it hurt when I deepthroat?""
I just better not feel your teeth, ho


What's poppin'? (Poppin')
Brand-new whip, just hopped in (Just hopped in)
I got options
I could pass that bitch like Stockton (It ain't nothin')
Just joshin'
I'ma spend this holiday locked in (Ooh)
My body got rid of them toxins (Mm, mm)
SportsCenter, top ten",5701202
168720,4226024,MONTERO Call Me By Your Name,rap,Lil Nas X,2021,2407277,{},"
I caught it bad yesterday
You hit me with a call to your place
Ain't been out in a while anyway
Was hopin' I could catch you throwin' smiles in my face
Romantic talkin'? You don't even have to try
You're cute enough to fuck with me tonight
Lookin' at the table, all I see is weed and white
Baby, you livin' the life, but nigga, you ain't livin' right


Cocaine and drinkin' with your friends
You live in the dark, boy, I cannot pretend
I'm not fazed, only here to sin
If Eve ain't in your garden, you know that you can


Call me when you want, call me when you need
Call me in the morning, I'll be on the way
Call me when you want, call me when you need
Call me out by your name, I'll be on the way like

Mmm, mmm, mmm
Mmm, mmm, mmm


Ayy, ayy
I wanna sell what you're buyin'
I wanna feel on your ass in Hawaii
I want that jet lag from fuckin' and flyin'
Shoot a child in your mouth while I'm ridin'
Oh, oh, oh, why me?
A sign of the times every time that I speak
A dime and a nine, it was mine every week
What a time, an incline, God was shinin' on me
Now I can't leave
And now I'm actin' hella elite
Never want the niggas that's in my league
I wanna fuck the ones I envy, I envy


Cocaine and drinkin' with your friends
You live in the dark, boy, I cannot pretend
I'm not fazed, only here to sin
If Eve ain't in your garden, you know that you can


Call me when you want, call me when you need
Call me in the morning, I'll be on the way
Call me when you want, call me when you need
Call me out by your name, I'll be on the way like

Oh, call me by your name (Mmm, mmm, mmm)
Tell me you love me in private
Call me by your name (Mmm, mmm, mmm)
I do not care if you're lyin'",5751286
169038,4243560,Good Days,rb,SZA,2020,2237264,{},"
Good day in my mind, safe to take a step out
Get some air now, let yo edge out
Too soon, I spoke
You be heavy in my mind, can you get the heck out?
I need rest now, got me bummed out
You so, you so, you
Baby, baby, babe
I've been on my empty mind shit


I try to keep from losin' the rest of me
I worry that I wasted the best of me on you, babe
You don't care
Said, ""Not tryna be a nuisance, this is urgent""
Tryna make sense of loose change
Got me a war in my mind
Gotta let go of weight, can't keep what's holdin' me
Choose to watch while the world break up in front of me


All the while, I'll await my armored fate with a smile
Still wanna try, still believe in
Good days, good days, always
Always inside (Always in my mind, always in my mind, mind)
Good day living in my mind

Tell me I'm not my fears, my limitations
I disappear if you let me
Feelin' like, yeah (On your own)
Feelin' like Jericho
Feelin' like Job when he lost his shit
Gotta hold my own, my cross to bear alone, I
Ooh, played and dipped, way to kill the mood
Know you like that shit
Can't groove it, ba-baby
Heavy on my empty mind shit


I gotta keep from losin' the rest of me (Rest of me)
Still worry that I wasted the best of me on you, babe
You don't care
Said, ""Not tryna be a nuisance, this is urgent"" (It's urgent)
Tryna make sense of loose change
Got me a war in my mind (My mind)
Gotta let go of weight, can't keep what's holdin' me
Choose to watch while the world break up in front of me


All the while, I'll await my armored fate with a smile
Still wanna try, still believe in
Good days, good days, always (Good days on my mind, good days on my mind)
Sunny inside (Always in my mind, always in my mind, mind)
Good day living in my mind

Gotta get right
Tryna free my mind before the end of the world
I don't miss no ex, I don't miss no text
I choose not to respond
I don't regret, just pretend shit never happened
Half of us layin' waste to our youth, it's in the present
(Na-na, na-na, na-na, na)
Half of us chasin' fountains of youth and it's in the present now


Always in my mind, always in my mind, mind
You've been making me feel like I'm
Always in my mind, always in my mind, mind",5773150
169057,4244361,POPSTAR,rap,DJ Khaled,2020,1021462,{Drake},"
Bitches
We The Best Music
Another one (Yeah)
DJ Khaled


Bitches callin' my phone like I'm locked up, nonstop
From the plane to the fuckin' helicopter, yeah
Cops pullin' up like I'm givin' drugs out, nah, nah
I'm a popstar, not a doctor
Bitches callin' my phone like I'm locked up, nonstop
From the plane to the fuckin' helicopter, yeah
Cops pullin' up like I'm givin' drugs out, nah, nah
I'm a popstar, not a doctor


Ayy, shawty with the long text, I don't talk, ayy
Shawty with the long legs, she don't walk, ayy
Yeah, last year, I kept it on the tuck, ayy
2020, I came to fuck it up, yeah
I want a long life, a legendary one (Yeah)
I want a quick death (Yeah), and an easy one (Yeah)
I want a pretty girl (Yeah), and an honest one (Yeah)
I want this drink (Yeah), and another one, yeah
And I'm troublesome, yeah
I'm a popstar, but this shit ain't bubblegum, yeah
You would probably think my manager is Scooter Braun, yeah
But my manager with twenty hoes in Buddakan, yeah, ayy
Look, Ariana, Selena, my Visa
It can take as many charges as it needs to, my girl
That shit platinum just like all of my releases, my girl
Niggas come for me, I tear them all to pieces, my girl
I'ma show your sexy ass what relief is, my girl
Please don't take no shit that's 'bout to have you geekin'
And I'm not drivin' nothin' that I gotta stick the keys in
Wonder how I got this way? I swear I got the

Bitches callin' my phone like I'm locked up, nonstop
From the plane to the fuckin' helicopter, yeah
Cops pullin' up like I'm givin' drugs out, nah, nah
I'm a popstar, not a doctor
Bitches callin' my phone like I'm locked up, nonstop
From the plane to the fuckin' helicopter, yeah
Cops pullin' up like I'm givin' drugs out, nah, nah
I'm a popstar, not a doctor


I'm a popstar, not a doctor, watch her
Say she rep a whole different block, so I blocked her
Busy at the crib, cookin' salmon with the lobster
If we talkin' joints, it's just me and David Foster
Bodyguards don't look like Kevin Costner, you tweakin'
Just pulled up to Whitney Houston, Texas for the evenin'
They tell the same story so much, they start to believe it
The ones that start like, ""Drizzy's shit was cool, but we even""
Man, how the fuck?
Two, four, six, eight watches, factory, so they appreciate
Crown in my hand and I'm really playin' keep-away
Shit don't even usually get this big without a Bieber face
Naw, naw, piece of cake, naw, naw, Turks and Caic', yeah, yeah
Go and get your friends, we can sneak away, yeah, yeah
Yeah, I keep a, like I keep the faith
Wonder how I got this way? Swear I got the

Bitches callin' my phone like I'm locked up, nonstop
From the plane to the fuckin' helicopter, yeah
Cops pullin' up like I'm givin' drugs out, nah, nah
I'm a popstar, not a doctor
Bitches callin' my phone like I'm locked up, nonstop
From the plane to the fuckin' helicopter, yeah
Cops pullin' up like I'm givin' drugs out, nah, nah
I'm a popstar, not a doctor",5774099
169141,4249861,Praise God,rap,Kanye West,2021,1320000,"{""Travis Scott"",""Baby Keem""}","
That she wrote, ""Speech to the Young: Speech to the Progress-Toward""
Say to them, say to the down-keepers, the sun-slappers
The self-soilers, the harmony-hushers
Even if you are not ready for the day, it cannot always be night
Serve, flex, I do work (Work)
Six, I'm like Mike
He's out of sight, woo
You done got me piped
Two-man like Ike
Six out the spot (Uh, uh)
Into the night


Yeah, I'm shakin' the drop (Drop)
I'm still up on top (Aight)
I been had the bop
The devil my opp, can't pay me to stop (It's lit)
My God at the top (La Flame)


We gon' praise our way out the grave, dawg
Livin', speakin', praise God
Walkin' out the graveyard back to life
I serve, follow your word, see with new sight, into the night (Hey)

Yeah, this life I'm livin' (I'm livin')
All the advice been tipped in (That thang)
Gave me that grip, no slippin' (That grip)
Out of my mind, went trippin' (My mind)
Tell me take two when I'm on one (I'm on)
That lookout like no one
Kept it real tight like your son (Your son)
Yeah (La Flame)


We gon' praise our way out the grave, dawg
Livin', speakin', praise God
Walkin' out the graveyard back to life
I serve, follow your word, see with new sight, into the night


Still on side, huh, still outside
****, attention, still outside, huh, still outside
Tame Imp-, Tame Impala, ****
Tame Impala, stay outside, huh
And I'm still outside, I'm still outside, still outside, huh
Let's get right, huh, let's get right, uh, let's get right, uh, huh
Let's get right, let's get (Ayy, ayy, ayy), let's get right
Let's get (Ayy, ayy, ayy), let's get-
Look at new scenes, I opened my life, I'm subject to memes
I signed a few ****, I polished their dreams
An angel on earth, come under my wing
Stop runnin' your publishers, ****
They publish the headlines and say the wrong things
Y'all treat your Lord and Savior like renters' insurance, you know what I mean?
Bada the bada the boom, I bada the boom, I bada the bing
I need a new girl, my old one was mean
I had to let go, forgave all them evils that came to my shows
I channeled them bad **** all in abode
I channeled your trust, I channeled the turbulence, came with the life
I gathered my sinners and asked if I'm right, let's get
I just get right, ****, huh
Let's get right, let's get right, let's get right, shh, shh
Ain't on sight, it's on sight
I don't know you, you, you, you, it's on sight
I don't know you, you, you, you (Ayy, ayy), let's get right
Ayy, all of my **** on Channel 5
I don't channel ten 'til it go time
Used to throw up my uncle's spaghetti
Been told to tote since before I was ready
Back when my mama told me that I was challenged
A single Black woman, you know that she petty
I turned a heavy heart to two million dollars
I put that in totals, reverse outta debty
I gotta, I gotta put on a rager one time
I swung the powder, went major one time
I know some white people servin' no time
I gotta do it for me, do it for, pray for me
Do it for all the ones dyin'
I wanna do it for all the ones cryin'
I wanna, uh, uh, uh, let's get right, huh",5780838
169314,4260855,​betty,country,Taylor Swift,2020,1742990,{},"
Betty, I won't make assumptions
About why you switched your homeroom, but
I think it's 'cause of me
Betty, one time I was riding on my skateboard
When I passed your house
It's like I couldn't breathe


You heard the rumors from Inez
You can't believe a word she says
Most times, but this time it was true
The worst thing that I ever did
Was what I did to you


But if I just showed up at your party
Would you have me? Would you want me?
Would you tell me to go fuck myself
Or lead me to the garden?
In the garden, would you trust me
If I told you it was just a summer thing?
I'm only seventeen, I don't know anything
But I know I miss you

Betty, I know where it all went wrong
Your favorite song was playing
From the far side of the gym
I was nowhere to be found
I hate the crowds, you know that
Plus, I saw you dance with him


You heard the rumors from Inez
You can't believe a word she says
Most times, but this time it was true
The worst thing that I ever did
Was what I did to you


But if I just showed up at your party
Would you have me? Would you want me?
Would you tell me to go fuck myself
Or lead me to the garden?
In the garden, would you trust me
If I told you it was just a summer thing?
I'm only seventeen, I don't know anything
But I know I miss you


I was walking home on broken cobblestones
Just thinking of you when she pulled up like
A figment of my worst intentions
She said ""James, get in, let's drive""
Those days turned into nights
Slept next to her, but
I dreamt of you all summer long

Betty, I'm here on your doorstep
And I planned it out for weeks now
But it's finally sinkin' in
Betty, right now is the last time
I can dream about what happens when
You see my face again


The only thing I wanna do
Is make it up to you
So I showed up at your party
Yeah, I showed up at your party


Yeah, I showed up at your party
Will you have me? Will you love me?
Will you kiss me on the porch
In front of all your stupid friends?
If you kiss me, will it be just like I dreamed it?
Will it patch your broken wings?
I'm only seventeen, I don't know anything
But I know I miss you


Standing in your cardigan
Kissin' in my car again
Stopped at a streetlight
You know I miss you",5793962
169319,4260863,​invisible string,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1214407,{},"
Green was the color of the grass
Where I used to read at Centennial Park
I used to think I would meet somebody there
Teal was the color of your shirt
When you were sixteen at the yogurt shop
You used to work at to make a little money


Time, curious time
Gave me no compasses, gave me no signs
Were there clues I didn't see?
And isn't it just so pretty to think
All along there was some
Invisible string
Tying you to me?
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh


Bad was the blood of the song in the cab
On your first trip to LA
You ate at my favorite spot for dinner
Bold was the waitress on our three-year trip
Getting lunch down by the Lakes
She said I looked like an American singer

Time, mystical time
Cutting me open, then healing me fine
Were there clues I didn't see?
And isn't it just so pretty to think
All along there was some
Invisible string
Tying you to me?
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh


A string that pulled me
Out of all the wrong arms, right into that dive bar
Something wrapped all of my past mistakes in barbed wire
Chains around my demons
Wool to brave the seasons
One single thread of gold
Tied me to you


Cold was the steel of my axe to grind
For the boys who broke my heart
Now I send their babies presents
Gold was the color of the leaves
When I showed you around Centennial Park
Hell was the journey but it brought me heaven

Time, wondrous time
Gave me the blues and then purple-pink skies
And it's cool
Baby, with me
And isn't it just so pretty to think
All along there was some
Invisible string
Tying you to me?
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh
Me
Ooh-ooh-ooh-ooh


(Ah-ah-ah)
(Ah-ah-ah)",5793972
169320,4260867,​illicit affairs,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1067254,{},"
Make sure nobody sees you leave
Hood over your head, keep your eyes down
Tell your friends you're out for a run
You'll be flushed when you return
Take the road less traveled by
Tell yourself you can always stop
What started in beautiful rooms
Ends with meetings in parking lots


And that's the thing about illicit affairs
And clandestine meetings and longing stares
It's born from just one single glance
But it dies and it dies and it dies
A million little times


Leave the perfume on the shelf
That you picked out just for him
So you leave no trace behind
Like you don't even exist
Take the words for what they are
A dwindling, mercurial high
A drug that only worked
The first few hundred times

And that's the thing about illicit affairs
And clandestine meetings and stolen stares
They show their truth one single time
But they lie and they lie and they lie
A million little times


And you wanna scream
Don't call me ""kid,"" don't call me ""baby""
Look at this godforsaken mess that you made me
You showed me colors you know I can't see with anyone else
Don't call me ""kid,"" don't call me ""baby""
Look at this idiotic fool that you made me
You taught me a secret language I can't speak with anyone else


And you know damn well
For you, I would ruin myself
A million little times",5793974
169321,4260868,​this is me trying,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1076183,{},"
I've been having a hard time adjusting
I had the shiniest wheels, now they're rusting
I didn't know if you'd care if I came back
I have a lot of regrets about that
Pulled the car off the road to the lookout
Could've followed my fears all the way down
And maybe I don't quite know what to say
But I'm here in your doorway


I just wanted you to know that this is me trying
I just wanted you to know that this is me trying


They told me all of my cages were mental
So I got wasted like all my potential
And my words shoot to kill when I'm mad
I have a lot of regrets about that
I was so ahead of the curve, the curve became a sphere
Fell behind all my classmates and I ended up here
Pouring out my heart to a stranger
But I didn't pour the whiskey

I just wanted you to know that this is me trying
I just wanted you to know that this is me trying


At least I'm trying


And it's hard to be at a party when I feel like an open wound
It's hard to be anywhere these days when all I want is you
You're a flashback in a film reel on the one screen in my town


And I just wanted you to know that this is me trying
(And maybe I don't quite know what to say)
I just wanted you to know that this is me trying


At least I'm trying",5793975
169322,4260870,​august,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1746009,{},"
Salt air, and the rust on your door
I never needed anything more
Whispers of ""Are you sure?""
""Never have I ever before""


But I can see us lost in the memory
August slipped away into a moment in time
'Cause it was never mine
And I can see us twisted in bedsheets
August sipped away like a bottle of wine
'Cause you were never mine


Your back beneath the sun
Wishin' I could write my name on it
Will you call when you're back at school?
I remember thinkin' I had you


But I can see us lost in the memory
August slipped away into a moment in time
'Cause it was never mine
And I can see us twisted in bedsheets
August sipped away like a bottle of wine
'Cause you were never mine

Back when we were still changin' for the better
Wanting was enough
For me, it was enough
To live for the hope of it all
Cancel plans just in case you'd call
And say, ""Meet me behind the mall""
So much for summer love and saying ""us""
'Cause you weren't mine to lose
You weren't mine to lose, no


But I can see us lost in the memory
August slipped away into a moment in time
'Cause it was never mine
And I can see us twisted in bedsheets
August sipped away like a bottle of wine
'Cause you were never mine


'Cause you were never mine
Never mine
But do you remember?
Remember when I pulled up and said ""Get in the car""
And then canceled my plans just in case you'd call?
Back when I was livin' for the hope of it all, for the hope of it all
""Meet me behind the mall""
(Remember when I pulled up and said ""Get in the car"")
(And then canceled my plans just in case you'd call?)
(Back when I was livin' for the hope of it all, for the hope of it all)
(""Meet me behind the mall"")
Remember when I pulled up and said ""Get in the car""
And then canceled my plans just in case you'd call?
Back when I was livin' for the hope of it all (For the hope of it all)
For the hope of it all, for the hope of it all
(For the hope of it all, for the hope of it all)",5793977
169324,4260872,​seven,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1135867,{},"
Please picture me in the trees
I hit my peak at seven
Feet in the swing over the creek
I was too scared to jump in
But I, I was high in the sky
With Pennsylvania under me
Are there still beautiful things?


Sweet tea in the summer
Cross your heart, won't tell no other
And though I can't recall your face
I still got love for you
Your braids like a pattern
Love you to the Moon and to Saturn
Passed down like folk songs
The love lasts so long


And I've been meaning to tell you
I think your house is haunted
Your dad is always mad and that must be why
And I think you should come live with me
And we can be pirates
Then you won't have to cry
Or hide in the closet
And just like a folk song
Our love will be passed on

Please picture me in the weeds
Before I learned civility
I used to scream ferociously
Any time I wanted
I, I


Sweet tea in the summer
Cross my heart, won't tell no other
And though I can't recall your face
I still got love for you
Pack your dolls and a sweater
We'll move to India forever
Passed down like folk songs
Our love lasts so long",5793979
169326,4260878,​my tears ricochet,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1379198,{},"
We gather here, we line up, weepin' in a sunlit room
And if I'm on fire, you'll be made of ashes, too
Even on my worst day, did I deserve, babe
All the hell you gave me?
'Cause I loved you, I swear I loved you
'Til my dying day


I didn't have it in myself to go with grace
And you're the hero flying around, saving face
And if I'm dead to you, why are you at the wake?
Cursing my name, wishing I stayed
Look at how my tears ricochet


We gather stones, never knowing what they'll mean
Some to throw, some to make a diamond ring
You know I didn't want to have to haunt you
But what a ghostly scene
You wear the same jewels that I gave you
As you bury me

I didn't have it in myself to go with grace
'Cause when I'd fight, you used to tell me I was brave
And if I'm dead to you, why are you at the wake?
Cursing my name, wishing I stayed
Look at how my tears ricochet


And I can go anywhere I want
Anywhere I want, just not home
And you can aim for my heart, go for blood
But you would still miss me in your bones
And I still talk to you (When I'm screaming at the sky)
And when you can't sleep at night (You hear my stolen lullabies)


I didn't have it in myself to go with grace
And so the battleships will sink beneath the waves
You had to kill me, but it killed you just the same
Cursing my name, wishing I stayed
You turned into your worst fears
And you're tossing out blame, drunk on this pain
Crossing out the good years
And you're cursing my name, wishing I stayed
Look at how my tears ricochet",5793982
169327,4260879,​exile,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,2323794,"{""Bon Iver""}","
I can see you standing, honey
With his arms around your body
Laughin', but the joke's not funny at all
And it took you five whole minutes
To pack us up and leave me with it
Holdin' all this love out here in the hall


I think I've seen this film before
And I didn't like the ending
You're not my homeland anymore
So what am I defending now?
You were my town, now I'm in exile, seein' you out
I think I've seen this film before


Ooh, ooh, ooh


I can see you starin', honey
Like he's just your understudy
Like you'd get your knuckles bloody for me
Second, third, and hundredth chances
Balancin' on breaking branches
Those eyes add insult to injury

I think I've seen this film before
And I didn't like the ending
I'm not your problem anymore
So who am I offending now?
You were my crown, now I'm in exile, seein' you out
I think I've seen this film before
So I'm leaving out the side door


So step right out, there is no amount
Of crying I can do for you
All this time
We always walked a very thin line
You didn't even hear me out (You didn't even hear me out)
You never gave a warning sign (I gave so many signs)
All this time
I never learned to read your mind (Never learned to read my mind)
I couldn't turn things around (You never turned things around)
'Cause you never gave a warning sign (I gave so many signs)
So many signs, so many signs
You didn't even see the signs


I think I've seen this film before
And I didn't like the ending
You're not my homeland anymore
So what am I defending now?
You were my town, now I'm in exile, seein' you out
I think I've seen this film before
So I'm leavin' out the side door

So step right out, there is no amount
Of crying I can do for you
All this time
We always walked a very thin line
You didn't even hear me out (Didn't even hear me out)
You never gave a warning sign (I gave so many signs)
All this time
I never learned to read your mind (Never learned to read my mind)
I couldn't turn things around (You never turned things around)
'Cause you never gave a warning sign (I gave so many signs)
You never gave a warning sign (All this time)
(So many times) I never learned to read your mind
(So many signs) I couldn't turn things around (I couldn't turn things around)
'Cause you never gave a warning sign (You never gave a warning sign)
You never gave a warning sign
Ah, ah",5793983
169328,4260880,​cardigan,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,2519416,{},"
Vintage tee, brand new phone
High heels on cobblestones
When you are young, they assume you know nothing
Sequin smile, black lipstick
Sensual politics
When you are young, they assume you know nothing


But I knew you
Dancin' in your Levi's
Drunk under a streetlight, I
I knew you
Hand under my sweatshirt
Baby, kiss it better, I


And when I felt like I was an old cardigan
Under someone's bed
You put me on and said I was your favorite

A friend to all is a friend to none
Chase two girls, lose the one
When you are young, they assume you know nothing


But I knew you
Playing hide-and-seek and
Giving me your weekends, I
I knew you
Your heartbeat on the High Line
Once in twenty lifetimes, I


And when I felt like I was an old cardigan
Under someone's bed
You put me on and said I was your favorite


To kiss in cars and downtown bars
Was all we needed
You drew stars around my scars
But now I'm bleedin'


'Cause I knew you
Steppin' on the last train
Marked me like a bloodstain, I
I knew you
Tried to change the ending
Peter losing Wendy, I
I knew you
Leavin' like a father
Running like water, I
And when you are young, they assume you know nothing

But I knew you'd linger like a tattoo kiss
I knew you'd haunt all of my what-ifs
The smell of smoke would hang around this long
'Cause I knew everything when I was young
I knew I'd curse you for the longest time
Chasin' shadows in the grocery line
I knew you'd miss me once the thrill expired
And you'd be standin' in my front porch light
And I knew you'd come back to me
You'd come back to me
And you'd come back to me
And you'd come back


And when I felt like I was an old cardigan
Under someone's bed
You put me on and said I was your favorite",5793984
169329,4260882,​the last great american dynasty,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1169446,{},"
Rebekah rode up on the afternoon train, it was sunny
Her saltbox house on the coast took her mind off St. Louis
Bill was the heir to the Standard Oil name and money
And the town said, ""How did a middle-class divorcée do it?""
The wedding was charming, if a little gauche
There's only so far new money goes
They picked out a home and called it ""Holiday House""
Their parties were tasteful, if a little loud
The doctor had told him to settle down
It must have been her fault his heart gave out


And they said
""There goes the last great American dynasty
Who knows, if she never showed up, what could've been
There goes the maddest woman this town has ever seen
She had a marvelous time ruining everything""


Rebekah gave up on the Rhode Island set forever
Flew in all her Bitch Pack friends from the city
Filled the pool with champagne and swam with the big names
And blew through the money on the boys and the ballet
And losing on card game bets with Dalí

And they said
""There goes the last great American dynasty
Who knows, if she never showed up, what could've been
There goes the most shameless woman this town has ever seen
She had a marvelous time ruining everything""


They say she was seen on occasion
Pacing the rocks, staring out at the midnight sea
And in a feud with her neighbor
She stole his dog and dyed it key lime green
Fifty years is a long time
Holiday House sat quietly on that beach
Free of women with madness, their men and bad habits
And then it was bought by me


Who knows, if I never showed up, what could've been
There goes the loudest woman this town has ever seen
I had a marvelous time ruining everything


I had a marvelous time ruining everything
A marvelous time ruining everything
A marvelous time
I had a marvelous time",5793985
169333,4260959,​the 1,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,2003697,{},"
I'm doing good, I'm on some new shit
Been saying ""yes"" instead of ""no""
I thought I saw you at the bus stop, I didn't though
I hit the ground running each night
I hit the Sunday matinée
You know the greatest films of all time were never made


I guess you never know, never know
And if you wanted me, you really should've showed
And if you never bleed, you're never gonna grow
And it's alright now


But we were something, don't you think so?
Roaring twenties, tossing pennies in the pool
And if my wishes came true
It would've been you
In my defense, I have none
For never leaving well enough alone
But it would've been fun
If you would've been the one
(Ooh)

I have this dream you're doing cool shit
Having adventures on your own
You meet some woman on the internet and take her home
We never painted by the numbers, baby
But we were making it count
You know the greatest loves of all time are over now


I guess you never know, never know
And it's another day waking up alone


But we were something, don't you think so?
Roaring twenties, tossing pennies in the pool
And if my wishes came true
It would've been you
In my defense, I have none
For never leaving well enough alone
But it would've been fun
If you would've been the one


I, I, I persist and resist the temptation to ask you
If one thing had been different
Would everything be different today?

We were something, don't you think so?
Rosé flowing with your chosen family
And it would've been sweet
If it could've been me
In my defense, I have none
For digging up the grave another time
But it would've been fun
If you would've been the one
(Ooh)",5794073
169362,4261879,​drivers license,pop,Olivia Rodrigo,2021,3643348,{},"
I got my driver's license last week
Just like we always talked about
'Cause you were so excited for me
To finally drive up to your house
But today, I drove through the suburbs
Crying 'cause you weren't around


And you're probably with that blonde girl
Who always made me doubt
She's so much older than me
She's everything I'm insecure about
Yeah, today, I drove through the suburbs
'Cause how could I ever love someone else?


And I know we weren't perfect
But I've never felt this way for no one
And I just can't imagine
How you could be so okay now that I'm gone
Guess you didn't mean what you wrote in that song about me
'Cause you said forever, now I drive alone past your street

And all my friends are tired
Of hearing how much I miss you, but
I kinda feel sorry for them
'Cause they'll never know you the way that I do
Yeah, today, I drove through the suburbs
And pictured I was driving home to you


And I know we weren't perfect
But I've never felt this way for no one, oh
And I just can't imagine
How you could be so okay now that I'm gone
I guess you didn't mean what you wrote in that song about me
'Cause you said forever, now I drive alone past your street


Red lights, stop signs
I still see your face in the white cars, front yards
Can't drive past the places we used to go to
'Cause I still fuckin' love you, babe (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh)
Sidewalks we crossed
I still hear your voice in the traffic, we're laughing
Over all the noise
God, I'm so blue, know we're through
But I still fuckin' love you, babe (Ooh, ooh-ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh)

I know we weren't perfect
But I've never felt this way for no one
And I just can't imagine
How you could be so okay now that I'm gone
Guess you didn't mean what you wrote in that song about me
'Cause you said forever, now I drive alone past your street


Yeah, you said forever, now I drive alone past your street",5795230
169421,4264555,​my future,pop,Billie Eilish,2020,1373531,{},"
I can't seem to focus
And you don't seem to notice I'm not here
I'm just a mirror
You check your complexion
To find your reflection's all alone
I had to go


Can't you hear me?
I'm not comin' home
Do you understand?
I've changed my plans


'Cause I, I'm in love
With my future
Can't wait to meet her
And I (I), I'm in love
But not with anybody else
Just wanna get to know myself

I know supposedly I'm lonely now (Lonely now)
Know I'm supposed to be unhappy
Without someone (Someone)
But aren't I someone? (Aren't I someone? Yeah)
I'd (I'd) like to be your answer (Be your answer)
'Cause you're so handsome (You're so handsome)


But I know better
Than to drive you home
'Cause you'd invite me in
And I'd be yours again


But I (I), I'm in love (Love, love, love, love)
With my future
And you don't know her (Ooh)
And I, I'm in love (Love, love)
But not with anybody here
I'll see you in a couple years",5798642
169726,4288650,Dynamite,pop,BTS,2020,3848706,{},"
'Cause I, I, I'm in the stars tonight
So watch me bring the fire and set the night alight


Shoes on, get up in the morn'
Cup of milk, let's rock and roll
King Kong, kick the drum
Rolling on like a Rolling Stone
Sing song when I'm walkin' home
Jump up to the top, LeBron
Ding-dong, call me on my phone
Ice tea and a game of ping pong


This is gettin' heavy, can you hear the bass boom? I'm ready (Woo-hoo)
Life is sweet as honey, yeah, this beat cha-ching like money, huh
Disco overload, I'm into that, I'm good to go
I'm diamond, you know I glow up
Hey, so let's go

'Cause I, I, I'm in the stars tonight
So watch me bring the fire and set the night alight (Hey)
Shinin' through the city with a little funk and soul
So I'ma light it up like dynamite, woah-oh-oh


Bring a friend, join the crowd, whoever wanna come along
Word up, talk the talk, just move like we off the wall
Day or night, the sky's alight, so we dance to the break of dawn (Hey)
Ladies and gentlemen, I got the medicine so you should keep ya eyes on the ball


Huh, this is gettin' heavy, can you hear the bass boom? I'm ready (Woo-hoo)
Life is sweet as honey, yeah, this beat cha-ching like money, huh
Disco overload, I'm into that, I'm good to go
I'm diamond, you know I glow up
Let's go


'Cause I, I, I'm in the stars tonight
So watch me bring the fire and set the night alight (Hey)
Shinin' through the city with a little funk and soul
So I'ma light it up like dynamite, woah-oh-oh


Dyn-na-na-na, na-na-na-na-na, na-na-na, life is dynamite
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na-na-na-na, na-na-na, life is dynamite
Shinin' through the city with a little funk and soul
So I'ma light it up like dynamite, woah-oh-oh

Dyn-na-na-na, na-na, na-na, ayy
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na, na-na, ayy
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na, na-na, ayy
Light it up like dynamite
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na, na-na, ayy
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na, na-na, ayy
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na, na-na, ayy
Light it up like dynamite


'Cause I, I, I'm in the stars tonight
So watch me bring the fire and set the night alight
Shinin' through the city with a little funk and soul
So I'ma light it up like dynamite
(This is ah) 'Cause I, I, I'm in the stars tonight
So watch me bring the fire and set the night alight (Alight, oh)
Shinin' through the city with a little funk and soul
So I'ma light (Light) it (It) up (Up) like (Like) dynamite (Dynamite), woah-oh-oh


Dyn-na-na-na, na-na-na-na-na, na-na-na, life is dynamite (Life is dynamite)
Dyn-na-na-na, na-na-na-na-na, na-na-na, life is dynamite (Oh)
Shinin' through the city with a little funk and soul
So I'ma light it up like dynamite, woah-oh-oh",5827731
169781,4292216,WAP,rap,Cardi B,2020,16003444,"{""Megan Thee Stallion""}","
Whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house (Hol' up)
I said certified freak, seven days a week
Wet-ass pussy, make that pullout game weak, woo (Ah)


Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, you fuckin' with some wet-ass pussy
Bring a bucket and a mop for this wet-ass pussy
Give me everything you got for this wet-ass pussy


Beat it up, nigga, catch a charge
Extra large and extra hard
Put this pussy right in your face
Swipe your nose like a credit card
Hop on top, I wanna ride
I do a kegel while it's inside
Spit in my mouth, look in my eyes
This pussy is wet, come take a dive
Tie me up like I'm surprised
Let's roleplay, I'll wear a disguise
I want you to park that big Mack truck right in this little garage
Make it cream, make me scream
Out in public, make a scene
I don't cook, I don't clean
But let me tell you how I got this ring (Ayy, ayy)

Gobble me, swallow me, drip down the side of me (Yeah)
Quick, jump out 'fore you let it get inside of me (Yeah)
I tell him where to put it, never tell him where I'm 'bout to be (Huh)
I'll run down on him 'fore I have a nigga runnin' me (Pow, pow, pow)
Talk your shit, bite your lip (Yeah)
Ask for a car while you ride that dick (While you ride that dick)
You really ain't never gotta fuck him for a thang (Yeah)
He already made his mind up 'fore he came (Ayy, ah)
Now get your boots and your coat for this wet-ass pussy (Ah, ah, ah)
He bought a phone just for pictures of this wet-ass pussy (Click, click, click)
Paid my tuition just to kiss me on this wet-ass pussy (Mwah, mwah, mwah)
Now make it rain if you wanna see some wet-ass pussy (Yeah, yeah)


Look, I need a hard hitter, need a deep stroker
Need a Henny drinker, need a weed smoker
Not a garter snake, I need a king cobra
With a hook in it, hope it lean over
He got some money, then that's where I'm headed
Pussy A1 just like his credit
He got a beard, well, I'm tryna wet it
I let him taste it, now he diabetic
I don't wanna spit, I wanna gulp
I wanna gag, I wanna choke
I want you to touch that lil' dangly thing that swing in the back of my throat
My head game is fire, punani Dasani
It's goin' in dry and it's comin' out soggy
I ride on that thing like the cops is behind me (Yeah, ah)
I spit on his mic and now he tryna sign me, woo

Your honor, I'm a freak bitch, handcuffs, leashes
Switch my wig, make him feel like he cheatin'
Put him on his knees, give him somethin' to believe in
Never lost a fight, but I'm lookin' for a beatin' (Ah)
In the food chain, I'm the one that eat ya
If he ate my ass, he's a bottom-feeder
Big D stand for big demeanor
I could make ya bust before I ever meet ya
If it don't hang, then he can't bang
You can't hurt my feelings, but I like pain
If he fuck me and ask ""Whose is it?""
When I ride the dick, I'ma spell my name, ah


Yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, you fuckin' with some wet-ass pussy
Bring a bucket and a mop for this wet-ass pussy
Give me everything you got for this wet-ass pussy
Now from the top, make it drop, that's some wet-ass pussy
Now get a bucket and a mop, that's some wet-ass pussy
I'm talkin' wap, wap, wap, that's some wet-ass pussy
Macaroni in a pot, that's some wet-ass pussy, huh


There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house
There's some whores in this house",5832126
170094,4312726,SugarCrash,pop,ElyOtto,2020,1381518,{},"
I'm on a sugar crash, I ain't got no fuckin' cash
Maybe I should take a bath, cut my fuckin' brain in half
I'm not lonely, just a bit tired of this fuckin' shit
Nothin' that I write can make me feel good


Victim of the great machine, in love with everything I see
Neon lights surroundin' me, I indulge in luxury
Everything I do is wrong, 'cept for when I hit the bong
Hit the bong, hit the bo-, feel good
Feelin' shitty in my bed, didn't take my fuckin' meds
Hyperpop up in my ears, everything just disappears
Don't wanna be someone else, just don't wanna hate myself
I just don't wanna hate myself, instead I wanna feel good


I'm on a sugar crash, I ain't got no fuckin' cash
Maybe I should take a bath, cut my fuckin' brain in half
I'm not lonely, just a bit tired of this fuckin' shit
Nothin' that I write can make me feel good

Where to now?
Got the rest of my life just laid out
Got the rest of my life to fuck around
Got the rest of my life to make sound


Where to now?
Got the rest of my life just laid out
Got the rest of my life to fuck around
Got the rest of my life to make sound
Feel good",5857963
170196,4318361,Laugh Now Cry Later,rap,Drake,2020,1324950,"{""Lil Durk""}","
Woah, woah
Yeah


Sometimes we laugh and sometimes we cry, but I guess you know now, baby
I took a half and she took the whole thing, slow down, baby
We took a trip, now we on your block and it's like a ghost town, baby
Where do these niggas be at when they say they doin' all this and all that?


Tired of beefin' you bums, you can't even pay me enough to react
Been wakin' up in the crib and sometimes I don't even know where I'm at
Please don't play that nigga songs in this party, I can't even listen to that
Anytime that I ran into somebody, it must be a victory lap, ayy
Shawty, come sit on my lap, ayy, they sayin' Drizzy just snap
Distance between us is not like a store, this isn't a closeable gap, ayy
I've seen some niggas attack and don't end up makin' it back


I know that they at the crib goin' crazy, down bad
What they had didn't last, damn, baby

Sometimes we laugh and sometimes we cry, but I guess you know now, baby
I took a half and she took the whole thing, slow down, baby
We took a trip, now we on your block and it's like a ghost town, baby
Where do these niggas be at when they say they doin' all this and all that?


I'm in the trenches, relax
Can you not play that lil' boy in the club? 'Cause we do not listen to rats
We in Atlanta, I buy her a wig, she tellin' me Tae is the best
Point at the nigga who act like a killer, but you only one from the 'net
I'm like DaBaby, I'm not just a rapper, you play with me, you gon' get stretched
Ooh-oh
Bring Drake to the hood, surround Drake around Dracs
Even though I got a case, I'ma do what it take
And I never been embraced
And the money's hard to make
So I bet they on they face right now


I know that they at the crib goin' crazy, down bad
What they had didn't last, damn, baby


Sometimes we laugh and sometimes we cry, but I guess you know now, baby
I took a half and she took the whole thing, slow down, baby
We took a trip, now we on your block and it's like a ghost town, baby
Where do these niggas be at when they say they doin' all this and all that?

When he tell the story, that's not how it went
Know they be lyin', a hundred percent
Moved out the Ritz and forgot 'bout the Bent'
Valet just called me to tell me come get it
Knocked that boy off and I don't want no credit
If it was me, they wouldn't regret it
Left me for dead and now they wan' dead it, yeah
Heart is still beatin', my niggas still eatin'
Backyard, it look like the Garden of Eden
Pillow talk with 'em, she spillin' the tea
And then shawty came back and said she didn't mean it
It's hard to believe it


I know that they at the crib goin' crazy, down bad
What they had didn't last, damn, baby


Sometimes we laugh and sometimes we cry, but I guess you know now, baby
I took a half and she took the whole thing, slow down, baby
We took a trip, now we on your block and it's like a ghost town, baby
Where do these niggas be at when they say they doin' all this and all that?",5865445
170359,4331328,Ice Cream,pop,BLACKPINK & Selena Gomez,2020,1228770,{},"
Come a little closer 'cause you lookin' thirsty
I'ma make it better, sip it like a Slurpee
Snow cone chilly, get it free like Willy (Oh)
In the jeans like Billie, you be poppin' like a wheelie
Even in the sun, you know I keep it icy
You could take a lick, but it's too cold to bite me (Haha)
Brr, brr, frozen, you're the one been chosen
Play the part like Moses, keep it fresh like roses (Oh)


Look so good, yeah, look so sweet (Hey)
Lookin' good enough to eat
Coldest with the kiss, so he call me ice cream
Catch me in the fridge, right where the ice be
Look so good, yeah, look so sweet (Hey)
Baby, you deserve a treat
Diamonds on my wrist, so he call me ice cream
You could double-dip 'cause I know you like me


Ice cream chillin', chillin', ice cream chillin'
Ice cream chillin', chillin', ice cream chillin'

I know that my heart can be so cold
But I'm sweet for you, come put me in a cone (In a cone)
You're the only touch, yeah, that get me meltin'
He's my favorite flavor, always gonna pick him
You're the cherry piece, just stay on top of me, so
I can't see nobody else for me, no
Get it, flip it, scoop it, do it like that, oh yeah, oh yeah
Like it, love it, lick it, do it like la-la-la, oh yeah


Look so good, yeah, look so sweet (Hey)
Lookin' good enough to eat
Coldest with the kiss, so he call me ice cream
Catch me in the fridge, right where the ice be
Look so good, yeah, look so sweet (Hey)
Baby, you deserve a treat
Diamonds on my wrist, so he call me ice cream
You could double-dip 'cause I know you like me


Ice cream chillin', chillin', ice cream chillin'
Ice cream chillin', chillin', ice cream chillin'
Ice cream chillin', chillin', ice cream chillin'
Ice cream chillin', chillin', ice cream

Chillin' like a villain, yeah, ra-ra-ra
미친 미친듯한 속도 in my La Ferra'
너무 빨러 너는 삐끗 원한다면 그냥 지름
Millis, billis 매일 벌음 한여름 손목에 얼음
Keep it movin' like my lease up
Think you fly, boy, where your visa?
Mona Lisa kinda Lisa
Needs an ice cream man that treats her
Keep it movin' like my lease up
Think you fly, boy, where your visa?
Mona Lisa kinda Lisa
Needs an ice cream man that treats her (Hey)


Na, na-na-na-na
Na, na-na-na-na (Hey)
Ice on my wrist, yeah, I like it like this
Get the bag with the cream
If you know what I mean
Ice cream, ice cream, ice cream chillin'
Na, na-na-na-na
Na, na-na-na-na (Hey)
Ice on my wrist, yeah, I like it like this
And I'm nice with the cream
If you know what I mean
Ice cream, ice cream
Ice cream",5881818
171434,4401516,Said Sum Remix,rap,Moneybagg Yo,2020,1311437,"{DaBaby,""City Girls""}","
Yeah (Turn me up, YC)
JT


Uh, fuck nigga, I don't wanna hear it (Nah)
Ain't talkin' the bag, I cover my ears
I hop in the Lamb', I'm switchin' the gears (Skrrt)
My bitches is ballin', make these niggas cheer
Audemars Piguets with the crushed face (Ice, ice)
I leave a bitch mad with the stuck face (Ha)
Who the fuck y'all hoes playin' wit' anyways? (What?)
City Girls make 'em wish like Ray J (Let me talk to 'em)
All these niggas wanna fuck JT (They do)
Hellcat, this a SRT (Skrrt, skrrt)
Pull up, G-Wag' 63 (Ow)
Make a 55 suck they teeth
He want a Minaj with a new body (Ow)
Man, you niggas can't fuck with me
'Cause I came from the bottom (Yeah)
From the feds to the charter (Yeah)
Broke bitches ain't sayin' a thing, period (Yeah)

I tell her, ""Shut the fuck up,"" when I hit it
Fucked up her hair, she just did it (Go)
I'm really fuckin' 'round with his lil' boo on the low (Ooh)
What the fuck buddy said? I couldn't hear 'em (Shut up, lil' nigga)
I keep the head while I drive, almost fucked up my ride (Skrrt)
Had a hand full of hair while I'm steerin' (I'm serious)
She rippin' off my Amiris
She love to give head, she pull up on her period (Period)
I thought somebody said, ""That's your wifey, dawg"" (Huh?)
Fuck everybody, don't like 'em all (Go)
His bitch love me 'cause I fuck like a dog (Woof)
I got this shit on, nigga, wipe me off (Yeah)
I hop out the backseat just like a boss (Ooh)
I two-toned the Maybach, my seats Ronald Reagan
It came with a pillow, I came from the pavement
Thought somebody said I ain't made it (Go)


Huh? (What?)
Ah, I thought a broke nigga said somethin' (Ah)
Talkin' shit but they still ain't sayin' nothin' (Ain't sayin' nothin')
We gon' trap this bitch out 'til the feds come (Run it up, run it up)
Huh? (What she say?)
Ah, I thought a pussy ho said somethin' (Ah)
How it go when I'm talkin', you listen (Just listen)
Cut her off 'cause she spoke on the business (Go)

You broke ass bitch, you ain't sayin' nothin'
When I hold up my wrist, it's sayin' somethin' (Yeah)
Your nigga, he know 'cause he payin' somethin' (Damn)
I ball on these bitches like and one
Swish, bitch, I'm the shit
QC the clique, we rich as a bitch
Yeah, ayy, Miami, I'm lit, Patek on my wrist
Follow the drip, my jewelry sick (Ice)
Pneumonia pink diamonds, got the corona (Ugh, ugh)
Moneybagg Runtz, that's the aroma (Woo)
This ain't no mid from Arizona
Bitch, I'm serious (Real), period (Period)
All that ho shit, I ain't hearin' it (Bitch)
My niggas pull up with sticks, they clearin' it (Rrah)
Yeah, me and JT, we killin' it, period


I thought a nigga who watch what I do
But he can't get his bitch back said somethin' (Tough)
Is it true that he postin' another nigga money?
Prolly, I don't put that past him (Maybe so)
I thought a ho that be speakin' on me
But be fuckin' a broke nigga said somethin' (Listen)
Hold up, lil' bitch, get a nigga that's lit
I'm the whole loaf, he the bread crumbs (Go)
Rappers with these mixed feelings (What?)
I ain't fuckin' wit' 'em (Nope)
Like a Richard Mille, let me know what time it is
Bagg, where the Runtz at? (Huh?) Know you got it on you
'Posed to be smell-proof, bustin' out the vacuum seal
These niggas lil' boys, childish, Fisher-Price
Confident, I'm not cocky, so get it right
She bendin' over but I want some head first
I don't even wanna know what the pussy like
Trippin' too close to fallin' so I'm ballin'
It's crazy, my opp got shot but I ain't call it (Sike, slow up)
I come around, niggas gon' put they ho up
These bitches stay on my channel, yeah
Must've seen me on TV, yeah
It took me six hours to count a mill' exactly
I'm accurate with that cheese, yeah (Big bag)

Huh? (What?)
Ah, I thought a broke nigga said somethin' (Ah)
Talkin' shit but they still ain't sayin' nothin' (Ain't sayin' nothin')
We gon' trap this bitch out 'til the feds come (Run it up, run it up)
Huh? (What she say?)
Ah, I thought a pussy ho said somethin' (Ah)
How it go when I'm talkin', you listen (Just listen)
Cut her off 'cause she spoke on the business (Go)",5967212
171629,4412328,STAY,pop,The Kid LAROI & Justin Bieber,2021,1098234,{},"
I do the same thing I told you that I never would
I told you I'd change, even when I knew I never could
I know that I can't find nobody else as good as you
I need you to stay, need you to stay, hey (Oh)


I get drunk, wake up, I'm wasted still
I realize the time that I wasted here
I feel like you can't feel the way I feel
Oh, I'll be fucked up if you can't be right here


Oh, ooh-woah (Oh, ooh-woah, ooh-woah)
Oh, ooh-woah (Oh, ooh-woah, ooh-woah)
Oh, ooh-woah (Oh, ooh-woah, ooh-woah)
Oh, I'll be fucked up if you can't be right here


I do the same thing I told you that I never would
I told you I'd change, even when I knew I never could
I know that I can't find nobody else as good as you
I need you to stay, need you to stay, hey
I do the same thing I told you that I never would
I told you I'd change, even when I knew I never could
I know that I can't find nobody else as good as you
I need you to stay, need you to stay, hey

When I'm away from you, I miss your touch (Ooh)
You're the reason I believe in love
It's been difficult for me to trust (Ooh)
And I'm afraid that I'ma fuck it up
Ain't no way that I can leave you stranded
'Cause you ain't ever left me empty-handed
And you know that I know that I can't live without you
So, baby, stay


Oh, ooh-woah (Oh, ooh-woah, ooh-woah)
Oh, ooh-woah (Oh, ooh-woah, ooh-woah)
Oh, ooh-woah (Oh, ooh-woah, ooh-woah)
I'll be fucked up if you can't be right here


I do the same thing I told you that I never would
I told you I'd change, even when I knew I never could
I know that I can't find nobody else as good as you
I need you to stay, need you to stay, hey
I do the same thing I told you that I never would
I told you I'd change, even when I knew I never could
I know that I can't find nobody else as good as you
I need you to stay, need you to stay, hey

Woah-oh
I need you to stay, need you to stay, hey",5983087
172771,4484667,​positions,rb,Ariana Grande,2020,1896261,{},"
Heaven sent you to me
I'm just hopin' I don't repeat history


Boy, I'm tryna meet your mama on a Sunday
Then make a lotta love on a Monday (Ah, ah)
Never need no (No), no one else, babe
'Cause I'll be


Switchin' them positions for you
Cookin' in the kitchen and I'm in the bedroom
I'm in the Olympics, way I'm jumpin' through hoops
Know my love infinite, nothin' I wouldn't do
That I won't do, switchin' for you


Perfect, perfect
You're too good to be true (You're too good to be true)
But I get tired of runnin', fuck it
Now, I'm runnin' with you (With you)

Said, boy, I'm tryna meet your mama on a Sunday
Then make a lotta love on a Monday (Ah, ah)
Never need no (No), no one else, babe
'Cause I'll be


Switchin' them positions for you
Cookin' in the kitchen and I'm in the bedroom
I'm in the Olympics, way I'm jumpin' through hoops
Know my love infinite, nothin' I wouldn't do
That I won't do, switchin' for you
Cookin' in the kitchen and I'm in the bedroom
I'm in the Olympics, way I'm jumpin' through hoops
Know my love infinite, nothin' I wouldn't do (Nothin')
That I won't do, switchin' for you


This some shit that I usually don't do (Yeah)
But for you, I kinda, kinda want to (Mmm)
'Cause you're down for me and I'm down too (And I'm down too)
Yeah, I'm down too
Switchin' the positions for you
This some shit that I (Yeah) usually don't do (Don't do)
But for you, I kinda, kinda want to (Mmm)
'Cause you're down for me and I'm down too ('Cause you're down for me)

Switchin' them positions for you
Cookin' in the kitchen and I'm in the bedroom
I'm in the Olympics, way I'm jumpin' through hoops (Jumpin', jumpin')
Know my love infinite, nothin' I wouldn't do
That I won't do, switchin' for you (Ooh woah)
Cookin' in the kitchen and I'm in the bedroom
I'm in the Olympics, way I'm jumpin' through hoops
Know my love infinite, nothin' I wouldn't do (I wouldn't do)
That I won't do, switchin' for you


Yeah
Ah, yeah
Ah (Ah), yeah",6068618
172798,4486685,3435,rb,Ariana Grande,2020,2691880,{},"
Hmm


You might think I'm crazy
The way I've been cravin'
If I put it quite plainly
Just gimme them babies
So what you doin' tonight?
Better say, ""Doin' you right"" (Yeah)
Watchin' movies, but we ain't seen a thing tonight (Yeah)


I don't wanna keep you up (You up)
But show me, can you keep it up? (It up)
'Cause then I'll have to keep you up
Shit, maybe I'ma keep you up, boy
I've been drinkin' coffee (I've been drinkin' coffee; coffee)
And I've been eatin' healthy (I've been eatin' healthy; healthy)
You know I keep it squeaky, yeah (You know I keep it squeaky)
Savin' up my energy (Yeah, yeah, savin' up my energy)

Can you stay up all night?
Fuck me 'til the daylight
Thirty-four, thirty-five (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Can you stay up all night? (All night)
Fuck me 'til the daylight
Thirty-four, thirty-five (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)


You drink it just like water (Water)
You say it tastes like candy
So what you doin' tonight? (Tonight)
Better say, ""Doin' you right"" (Alright)
Watchin' movies, but we ain't seen a thing tonight (Yeah)


I don't wanna keep you up (You up)
But show me, can you keep it up? (It up)
'Cause then I'll have to keep you up
Shit, maybe I'ma keep you up, boy
I've been drinkin' coffee (Said I've been drinkin' coffee; coffee)
And I've been eatin' healthy (And I've been eatin' healthy; healthy)
You know I keep it squeaky, yeah (Except this wine, babe)
Savin' up my energy (Yeah, yeah, yeah)


Can you stay up all night? (All night)
Fuck me 'til the daylight (Daylight)
Thirty-four, thirty-five (Thirty-five; yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Can you stay up all night? (Can you stay?)
Fuck me 'til the daylight (Can you stay?)
Thirty-four, thirty-five (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)

Oh yeah, yeah
Baby, you might need a seatbelt when I ride it
I'ma leave it open like a door, come inside it
Even though I'm wifey, you can hit it like a side chick
Don't need no side dick, no
Got the neighbors yellin' ""Earthquake!"" (Earthquake)
4.5 when I make the bed shake
Put it down heavy even though it's lightweight (It's lightweight, yeah, yeah, yeah, babe)
Yeah, we started at midnight
Go 'til the sunrise (Sunrise)
Done at the same time (Yeah)
But who's counting the time when we got it for life? (Got it for life)
I know all your favorite spots (Favorite spots)
We can take it from the top (From the top)
You such a dream come true, true
Make a bitch wanna hit snooze, ooh


Can you stay up all night?
Fuck me 'til the daylight (Yeah, yeah)
Thirty-four, thirty-five (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
(Thirty-four, thirty-five)
Can you stay up all night? (Do you know what that means?)
Fuck me 'til the daylight (Do you know what that means?)
Thirty-four, thirty-five (Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah)
Yeah, yeah, yeah

Means I wanna ""69"" with you
No shit
Math class
Never was good",6071429
173002,4495813,INDUSTRY BABY,rap,Lil Nas X & Jack Harlow,2021,2067731,{},"
(D-D-Daytrip took it to ten, hey)
Baby back, ayy, couple racks, ayy
Couple Grammys on him, couple plaques, ayy
That's a fact, ayy, throw it back, ayy
Throw it back, ayy


And this one is for the champions
I ain't lost since I began, yeah
Funny how you said it was the end, yeah
Then I went did it again, yeah


I told you long ago on the road
I got what they waiting for
I don't run from nothing, dog
Get your soldiers, tell 'em I ain't layin' low
You was never really rooting for me anyway
When I'm back up at the top, I wanna hear you say
He don't run from nothin', dog
Get your soldiers, tell 'em that the break is over

Uh, need to, uh
Need to get this album done
Need a couple number ones
Need a plaque on every song
Need me like one with Nicki now
Tell a rap nigga I don't see ya, hah
I'm a pop nigga like Bieber, hah
I don't fuck bitches, I'm queer, hah
But these niggas bitches like Madea, yeah, yeah, yeah, ayy (Yeah)
Oh, let's do it
I ain't fall off, I just ain't release my new shit
I blew up, now everybody tryna sue me
You call me Nas, but the hood call me Doobie, yeah


And this one is for the champions
I ain't lost since I began, yeah
Funny how you said it was the end, yeah
Then I went did it again, yeah


I told you long ago on the road
I got what they waiting for (I got what they're waiting for)
I don't run from nothing, dog
Get your soldiers, tell 'em I ain't layin' low (Bitch, I ain't runnin' from nowhere)
You was never really rooting for me anyway (Ooh, ooh)
When I'm back up at the top, I wanna hear you say (Ooh, ooh)
He don't run from nothin', dog
Get your soldiers, tell 'em that the break is over (Yeah)

My track record so clean, they couldn't wait to just bash me
I must be gettin' too flashy, y'all shouldn't have let the world gas me (Woo)
It's too late 'cause I'm here to stay and these girls know that I'm nasty (Mmm)
I sent her back to her boyfriend with my handprint on her ass cheek
City talkin', we takin' notes
Tell 'em all to keep makin' posts
Wish he could, but he can't get close
OG so proud of me that he chokin' up while he makin' toasts
I'm the type that you can't control, said I would, then I made it so
I don't clear up rumors (Ayy), where's y'all sense of humor? (Ayy)
I'm done makin' jokes 'cause they got old like baby boomers
Turned my haters to consumers, I make vets feel like they juniors (Juniors)
Say your time is comin' soon, but just like Oklahoma (Mmm)
Mine is comin' sooner (Mmm), I'm just a late bloomer (Mmm)
I didn't peak in high school, I'm still out here gettin' cuter (Woo)
All these social networks and computers
Got these pussies walkin' 'round like they ain't losers


I told you long ago on the road
I got what they waiting for (I got what they waiting for)
I don't run from nothing, dog
Get your soldiers, tell 'em I ain't layin' low (Bitch, I ain't runnin' from nowhere)
You was never really rooting for me anyway
When I'm back up at the top, I wanna hear you say
He don't run from nothin', dog
Get your soldiers, tell 'em that the break is over

Yeah
I'm the industry baby, mmm
I'm the industry baby
Yeah",6083409
173104,4504261,​pov,rb,Ariana Grande,2020,1494175,{},"
It's like you got superpowers
Turn my minutes into hours
You got more than 20/20, babe
Made of glass, the way you see through me
You know me better than I do
Can't seem to keep nothing from you
How you touch my soul from the outside
Permeate my ego and my pride


I wanna love me (Ooh)
The way that you love me (Ooh)
Ooh, for all of my pretty and all of my ugly too
I'd love to see me from your point of view
I wanna trust me (Trust me)
The way that you trust me (Trust me)
Ooh, 'cause nobody ever loved me like you do
I'd love to see me from your point of view


I'm getting used to receiving
Still getting good at not leaving
I'ma love you even though I'm scared (Oh, scared)
Learnin' to be grateful for myself (Oh, oh, oh)
You love my lips 'cause they say the
Things we've always been afraid of
I can feel it startin' to subside
Learnin' to believe in what is mine

I wanna love me (Ooh)
The way that you love me (Ooh)
Ooh, for all of my pretty and all of my ugly too
I'd love to see me from your point of view
I wanna trust me (Trust me)
The way that you trust me (Trust me)
Ooh, 'cause nobody ever loved me like you do
I'd love to see me from your point of view


I couldn't believe it or see it for myself
Know I be impatient
But now I'm out here, fallin', fallin'
Frozen, slowly thawing, got me right
I won't keep you waitin', waitin'
All my baggage fadin' safely (My baggage fadin')
And if my eyes deceive me
Won't let them stray too far away


I wanna love me (Ooh)
The way that you love me (Ooh)
Ooh, for all of my pretty and all of my ugly too
I'd love to see me from your point of view
I wanna trust me, ooh (Trust me)
The way that you trust me, baby (Trust me)
'Cause nobody ever loved me like you do
I'd love to see me from your point of view (Oh)
Yeah",6094314
173721,4549258,Therefore I Am,pop,Billie Eilish,2020,1611739,{},"
I'm not your friend
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man
I think, therefore, I am
I'm not your friend
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man
I think, therefore, I am


Stop, what the hell are you talking about? Ha
Get my pretty name out of your mouth
We are not the same with or without
Don't talk 'bout me like how you might know how I feel
Top of the world, but your world isn't real
Your world's an ideal


So go have fun
I really couldn't care less
And you can give 'em my best, but just know

I'm not your friend
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man
I think, therefore, I am
I'm not your friend
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man
I think, therefore, I am


I don't want press to put your name next to mine
We're on different lines, so I
Wanna be nice enough, they don't call my bluff
'Cause I hate to find
Articles, articles, articles
Rather you remain unremarkable (Got a lotta)
Interviews, interviews, interviews
When they say your name, I just act confused


Did you have fun?
I really couldn't care less
And you can give 'em my best, but just know


I'm not your friend
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man
I think, therefore, I am
I'm not your friend
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man
I think, therefore, I am

I'm sorry
I don't think I caught your name
I'm sorry
I don't think I caught your name


I'm not your friend (I'm not your friend)
Or anything, damn
You think that you're the man (Damn, you think that you're what I am)
I think, therefore, I am (I am)
I'm not your friend (Friend)
Or anything, damn (Anything, damn)
You think that you're the man (You're the man)
I think, therefore, I am (Therefore, I am)",6151003
173830,4553160,BTS 방탄소년단 - Life Goes On English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2020,1260187,{},"
I remember
I, I, I remember
Ah, ah


One day, the world stopped
Without any warning
Spring didn't know to wait
Showed up not even a minute late
Streets erased of footprints
I lie here, fallen to the ground
Time goes by on its own
Without a single apology, yeah


It looks like rain again today
I'm soaked to the bone
Still won't stop (Hey)
Running faster than that cloud of rain
Thought that'd be enough
Guess I'm only human after all
I'm in a world of pain
This cold the damn world gave to me (Woo)
Prompts me to press the dust-covered rewind
Dancing off-beat lying on the ground
Once winter comes, let's exhale
A warmer breath

There's no end in sight
Is there a way out?
My feet refuse to move, oh
Close your eyes for a moment
Hold my hand
To that future, let's run away


Like an echo in the forest
The day will come back around
As if nothing happened
Yeah, life goes on
Like an arrow in the blue sky
Another day flying by
On my pillow, on my table
Yeah, life goes on
Like this again


Let me tell you with this song (Ayy)
People say the world has changed (No)
Mm-mm-mm-mm
But thankfully between you and me
Nothing's changed

With the 'annyeong' that we start and finish the day
Let us thread tomorrow with today (Ooh, ooh, ooh, oh-woah)
Stopped for now but don't hide in the shadow
Once again daylight will glow


There's no end in sight
Is there a way out?
My feet refuse to move, oh
Close your eyes for a moment (Close it)
Hold my hand (Hold it)
To that future, let's run away (Oh, oh, oh)


Like an echo in the forest
The day will come back around
As if nothing happened
Yeah, life goes on (Oh, woah)
Like an arrow in the blue sky
Another day flying by (Flies by)
On my pillow, on my table
Yeah, life goes on
Like this again


I remember
I, yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah
I remember
Ah-ah, ah-ah
I remember
I, yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah
I remember
Ah-ah, ah-ah",6156029
173831,4553314,BTS - Life Goes On Romanized,pop,Genius Romanizations,2020,1090817,{},"
I remember
I, I, I remember
Ah, ah


Eoneu nal sesangi meomchwosseo
Amureon yegodo hana eopsi
Bomeun gidarimeul mollaseo
Nunchi eopsi wabeoryeosseo
Baljagugi jiwojin geori
Yeogi neomeojyeoinneun na
Honja gane sigani
Mianhae maldo eopsi, yeah


Oneuldo biga naeril geot gata
Heumppeok jeojeobeoryeonne
Ajikdo meomchujil ana
Jeo meokgureumboda ppalli dallyeoga
Geureom doel jul aranneunde
Na gyeou saraminga bwa
Mopsi apeune
Sesangiran nomi jun gamgi
Deokbune nulleoboneun meonji ssain doegamgi
Neomeojin chae cheonghaneun eotbakjaui chum
Gyeouri omyeon naeswija
Deo tteugeoun sum

Kkeuchi boiji ana
Chulguga itgin halkka?
Bari ttejijil ana ana oh
Jamsi du nuneul gama
Yeogi nae soneul jaba
Jeo miraero daranaja


Like an echo in the forest
Haruga doraogetji
Amu ildo eopdan deusi
Yeah, life goes on
Like an arrow in the blue sky
Tto haru deo naragaji
On my pillow, on my table
Yeah, life goes on
Like this again


I eumageul billyeo neoege na jeonhalge (Ay)
Saramdeureun marhae sesangi da byeonhaetdae (No)
Mh-hm-hm-hm
Dahaenghido uri saineun
Ajik yeotae an byeonhaenne

Neul hadeon sijakgwa kkeut 'annyeong' iran mallo
Oneulgwa naeireul tto hamkke ieobojago (Ooh, ooh, ooh, oh-woah)
Meomchwoitjiman eodume sumji ma
Bicheun tto tteooreunikkan


Kkeuchi boiji ana
Chulguga itgin halkka?
Bari ttejijil ana ana oh
Jamsi du nuneul gama (Gama)
Yeogi nae soneul jaba (Jaba)
Jeo miraero daranaja (Oh, oh, oh)




Like an echo in the forest
Haruga doraogetji
Amu ildo eopdan deusi
Yeah, life goes on (Oh, woah)
Like an arrow in the blue sky
Tto haru deo naragaji (Naragaji)
On my pillow, on my table
Yeah, life goes on
Like this again

I remember
I, I, I remember
Ah, ah
I remember
I, I, I remember
Ah, ah",6156231
173838,4553397,BTS 방탄소년단 - Blue  Grey English Translation,pop,Genius English Translations,2020,1001782,{},"
Where is my angel?
The end of a tiring day
Someone come and save me, please
Is overshadowed by a sigh
I guess everyone's happy
Can you look at me? 'Cause I am blue and grey
The tears reflected in the mirror mean
My colors hid in the smile, blue and grey


I really don't know what went wrong
I grew up with a blue question mark in my mind
Maybe that's why I've been fighting for my life
But looking behind, I'm standing here dazed
The powerful shadow swallows me
The question mark is still blue
Is it anxiety or depression?
Am I just an animal that regrets
Or is it me born out of loneliness?
I still don't know, the ferocious blue
I hope I don't get eaten away, I'll find the exit

I just wanna be happier
Melt me, I'm cold
I've reached out my hand countless times
The echo is colorless
Oh, this ground feels so heavier
I am singing by myself 
I just wanna be happier
Am I being too greedy?


I still feel my heart
Breathe faster like when
I walked on the cold winter streets
Don't say you're fine
'Cause you're not
Please don't leave me alone, it hurts too much


The road I always walk and the light I always receive
But today seems like an unfamiliar scene
Have I become used to it or have I collapsed?
This piece of metal does feel heavy
A grey rhino approaches
I just stand there without focus
I don't feel like myself at this moment
I'm just not scared
I don't believe in a God called conviction
Words like 'color' embarrass me
The wide grey zone is comfortable
With hundreds of millions of grey faces
When it rains, I dance
Over this city, my world
Raise a toast to
The fog on clear days
And all the dust always
Here with me on rainy days

I just wanna be happier
Please feel the warmth in my hands
They're cold, that's why I need more of you
Oh, this ground feels so heavier
I am singing by myself
If I laugh in the future far away
I'll tell you that I did


After secretly taking back words floating in the air
I now fall asleep at dawn, good night",6156331
174995,4635307,​willow,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1346096,{},"
I'm like the water when your ship rolled in that night
Rough on the surface, but you cut through like a knife
And if it was an open-shut case
I never would've known from that look on your face
Lost in your current like a priceless wine


The more that you say, the less I know
Wherever you stray, I follow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man


Life was a willow and it bent right to your wind
Head on the pillow, I could feel you sneakin' in
As if you were a mythical thing
Like you were a trophy or a champion ring
And there was one prize I'd cheat to win


The more that you say, the less I know
Wherever you stray, I follow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man
You know that my train could take you home
Anywhere else is hollow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man

Life was a willow and it bent right to your wind
They count me out time and time again
Life was a willow and it bent right to your wind
But I come back stronger than a '90s trend


Wait for the signal, and I'll meet you after dark
Show me the places where the others gave you scars
Now this is an open-shut case
I guess I should've known from the look on your face
Every bait-and-switch was a work of art


The more that you say, the less I know
Wherever you stray, I follow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man
You know that my train could take you home
Anywhere else is hollow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man
The more that you say, the less I know
Wherever you stray, I follow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man
You know that my train could take you home
Anywhere else is hollow
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man

Hey, that's my man
That's my man
Yeah, that's my man
Every bait-and-switch was a work of art
That's my man
Hey, that's my man
I'm begging for you to take my hand
Wreck my plans, that's my man",6260155
174999,4635312,​champagne problems,pop,Taylor Swift,2020,1479609,{},"
You booked the night train for a reason
So you could sit there in this hurt
Bustling crowds or silent sleepers
You're not sure which is worse


Because I dropped your hand while dancing
Left you out there standing
Crestfallen on the landing
Champagne problems
Your mom's ring in your pocket
My picture in your wallet
Your heart was glass, I dropped it
Champagne problems


You told your family for a reason
You couldn't keep it in
Your sister splashed out on the bottle
Now no one's celebrating

Dom Pérignon, you brought it
No crowd of friends applauded
Your hometown skeptics called it
Champagne problems
You had a speech, you're speechless
Love slipped beyond your reaches
And I couldn't give a reason
Champagne problems


Your Midas touch on the Chevy door
November flush and your flannel cure
""This dorm was once a madhouse""
I made a joke, ""Well, it's made for me""
How evergreen, our group of friends
Don't think we'll say that word again
And soon they'll have the nerve to deck the halls
That we once walked through
One for the money, two for the show
I never was ready so I watch you go
Sometimes you just don't know the answer
'Til someone's on their knees and asks you
""She would've made such a lovely bride
What a shame she's fucked in the head,"" they said
But you'll find the real thing instead
She'll patch up your tapestry that I shred

And hold your hand while dancing
Never leave you standing
Crestfallen on the landing
With champagne problems
Your mom's ring in your pocket
Her picture in your wallet
You won't remember all my
Champagne problems


You won't remember all my
Champagne problems",6260160
175154,4646945,Calling My Phone,rap,Lil Tjay & 6LACK,2021,1174941,{},"
Steady callin' my phone
I done told you before that it's over, leave me 'lone
Know it's hurtin' you to see me gone
Dark clouds, you gon' see me storm
I won't go back
But trust me, you're gon' hold that
Hold that (Mmm, mmm)


Get you off my mind now
I can't get you off my mind now
I can't get you off my mind now
I can't get you off my mind now (Mmm, mmm)
I can't get you off my mind now
I can't get you off my mind now
I can't get you off my mind now
I can't get you off my mind now (Mmm, mmm)


I ain't tryna play these games no more
I don't wanna be textin' your name no more
I ain't tryna feel this pain no more
Girl, I'm sorry, but my feelings ain't the same no more (No)
Used to be my homie, you ain't gang no more (No)
I am not a nigga you could claim no more (No)
Traumatized, hoping it don't rain no more
You done put me through some things that done changed my aura
Now all around the world, I explore, no Dora
New bitch, I might drip her in Dior
Ass fat, shawty straight heat, no Florida
Bad and she do it for herself, I applaud her
No needs, yeah, I'm talkin' my boo
So please, leave me alone I'm through
And it's all 'cause what you started
I been told you you gon' lose (Mmm)

Steady callin' my phone (Brrt)
I done told you before that it's over, leave me 'lone
Know it's hurtin' you to see me gone
Dark clouds, you gon' see me storm
I won't go back (Go back)
But trust me, you're gon' hold that
Hold that (Mmm, mmm)


Get you off my mind now (Ooh, wow)
I can't get you off my mind now (Yeah, yeah)
I can't get you off my mind now (My mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mmm, mmm) (Alright)
I can't get you off my mind now (Woah)
I can't get you off my mind now (Woah)
I can't get you off my mind now (Yeah)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mmm, mmm)


I ain't tryna play no games, my love
I'm one of a kind, couldn't fake, my love
Earthquake, make somethin' shake, my love
Most of them can't even relate, my love
Used to be gang, oh, now you're not gang
Used to have fun, no, now you got shame
Used to catch flights, but now I'm not playin'
Play on words, she love it when a nigga sing
I ain't tryna play your game no more
No, you can't wear my chain no more
We are not a thing, can't take no more
Waitin' on your king, you could wait some more
Yeah, I remember days when I used to adore her
Funny how this shit just flipped like a quarter
Get a new thing, I'ma Fendi and Dior her
Get a mood swing, I'll be gone by tomorrow (Mmm, mmm)

Steady callin' my phone (Brrt)
I done told you before that it's over, leave me 'lone (Yeah, yeah)
Know it's hurtin' you to see me gone
Dark clouds, you gon' see me storm
I won't go back (I won't go back)
But trust me, you're gon' hold that (Hold that)
Hold that (Mmm, mmm)


Get you off my mind now (Mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mmm, mmm) (Mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mind)
I can't get you off my mind now (Yeah)
I can't get you off my mind now (Mmm, mmm)
I can't",6274873
175266,4655561,Gnat,rap,Eminem,2020,1146150,{},"
Yeah, yeah, sick
(d.a. got that dope)


They say these bars are like COVID (Bars are like COVID; what?)
You get 'em right off the bat (You get 'em right off the bat; yeah)
Infected with SARS and Corona (Infected with SARS and Corona)
Like you took a bite off of that (You took a bite off of that; damn)
And it goes from martian to human (From martian to human; yeah)
That's how the virus attacks (That's how the virus attacks)
They come at me with machine guns (At me with machine guns; brr)
Like trying to fight off a gnat


Still stackin' my chips, hoes
Higher than Shaq on his tiptoes
Atop the Empire State Buildin'
This shit is like child's play, children
I will anni-nihilate, kill them
I'll fuck around and pile eight million
Dead little juveniles, wait, chill, then
I'll await my trial date 'til then (What?)
Ain't nothin' you say could ever trump (Nah), mic, pencil get killed (Yeah)
If you're hypersensitive, I wasn't referencin' the vice president, chill (Chill)
I mean my penmanship at times tends to get ill, violence but with skill
That's why I hence when I write ends up with the mic and pencil gettin' killed (Haha, yeah, hold up)
And I'm still ride or die for the squad (Yeah)
So you know which side that I'm on
If a battle line's ever drawn, but if I get involved
It'll be like K9's in a brawl
But not similar to Mike Vick at all
'Cause even if I don't have a dog in the fight
They ain't never gonna get rid of the fight in the dog (Fight in the dog)
Got stripes like a tiger, so you might get mauled, a mic in the palms
Like claws, I can swing right for your jaw
And rip it off with one swipe of the paw
Bitch, you still on my dick or nah? (Nah)
If I suck, your wife is a straw (Straw)
I'm sick and I'm not gonna cover my mouth next time that I cough 'cause

They say these bars are like COVID (Bars are like COVID; what?)
You get 'em right off the bat (You get 'em right off the bat; yeah)
Infected with SARS and Corona (Infected with SARS and Corona)
Like you took a bite off of that (You took a bite off of that; damn)
And it goes from martian to human (From martian to human; yeah)
That's how the virus attacks (That's how the virus attacks)
They come at me with machine guns (At me with machine guns; brr)
Like trying to fight off a gnat (Like trying to fight off a gnat; yeah, yeah)


And d.a. got that dope he sends to me (Uh-huh)
It's like pneumonia symptoms and contracting COVID instantly
Which is what separates my flow from theirs
So that no one gets even close to this to pose a risk to me
So vocalistically (What?), that's social distancing (Yeah)
Flow going viral, you best stay strapped
With that Lysol and get way back (Shh)
Get that Pine-Sol and that Ajax
'Cause this dry cough is just like football umpires callin' a playback
Bitch, back the fuck up like fifteen yards, these rhymes call for a face mask (Face mask)
'Nother fourteen-day quarantine, they're cordoning off everything
This shit lookin' like a horror scene, like me metaphorically (Damn)
'Cause them stay-at-home orders seem
Like they just keep getting more extreme
Who knows when this nightmare will end (Marilyn)? Like Monroe, Norma Jean (Norma Jean)
Still got that heroin lyrical drip with that morphine and that Thorazine
'Cause I'm so fuckin' dope (Dope) and you're a fiend
And that's the one thing that hasn't changed (Nope)
For some semblance of normalcy
But I might need that Hydrochloroquine 'cause I got that (Yeah)
The Dark Horse, I'm a knight-mare
Mom fed me Valium like air (Mmm)
Thought that's why they called it a high chair (Woah)
I got a contact like eyewear (Woah)
Wait a minute, bitch, let me lie here (Uh)
20/20 hindsight in my side mirror
Every year, you drop the ball like Times Square
My hair trigger whenever I get an idea's
Like, fuck, now my name rings out like a sponge mop
And my drip was a drop
In the bucket, so that gun shot
You just heard just now in that one spot
Just came from the nine mil' that I just got
That's big bucks and I got a full money clip and I'm loaded
I ain't even mean to go the fuck off
And I'm still totally inappropriate with an opiate
Groping it while I'm holding it like a trophy
I'm hoping a little codeine'll get me OD'in'
Woah, everything is slow, I begin to floating
I know that I'm getting loaded, the pen exploded
Hiroshima with the flows, a utopia
With the dope, I'm an OG, I'm like the G.O.A.T.
Here to get your goat little bit of sodium, it's assault (A salt)
When I'm at the podium, at your throat, holy camoly
I'm in the zone with the shit I'm on
Get Imodium and a commode because nobody's even close
You're petroleum to plutonium, you're a phony
I'm at the crib with your ho
Got her at the pole like voting with no clothing
Stripped down to a toe ring and here we go with the gloating
I've got my nose in the air like a Boeing
Then I got into a little bit of an argument with her
So I took a little lick of a Klonopin at dinner
Then I hit her with the motherfucking ottoman and bit her
Then I shot her in the liver, delivered her to the bottom of the river (Dope)
But I'm probably gon' jump in the water with her
With a wad of money 'cause I got a lot of it
And when it come to drippin', I be soppin' like a hundred mile an hour
Never runnin' out of either one of 'em, I gotta get it 'cause

They say these bars are like COVID (Bars are like COVID; what?)
You get 'em right off the bat (You get 'em right off the bat; yeah)
Infected with SARS and Corona (Infected with SARS and Corona)
Like you took a bite off of that (You took a bite off of that; damn)
And it goes from martian to human (From martian to human; yeah)
That's how the virus attacks (That's how the virus attacks)
They come at me with machine guns (At me with machine guns; brr)
It's like trying to fight off a gnat (Fight off a gnat)",6285862
175487,4677255,Cristal  МОЁТ,rap,MORGENSHTERN,2020,1801510,{},"


Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё
Трачу на это, трачу на то, трачу на это, трачу на то
Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё
Трачу на это, трачу на то, трачу на это, трачу на то
Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё
Трачу на это, трачу на то, трачу на это, трачу на то
Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё


Йа
S63 AMG (Е, e, e)
Лeтит в ночной Москвe (Skrrt, let's go)
Всe сучки палят вслeд (Мой слeд)
Slap bitch, тут сeмь нулeй (Е-e)
На мнe ща VVS
Под жопой V и S
Yo, bitch, I got new Benz (New Benz)
До-Дорого пиздeц (Фью-фью)
Большущий дядя-мальчик (У)
Купил сe новыe тачки
Парочку-парочку новeньких тачeчeк
Спасибо за подписочку на Рамзан Ахматыча (Спасибо!)
Большущий дядя-мальчик (Фью-фью)
Открыл сe рeсторанчик (KAIF)
Двадцать два года, сука, кто двигаeтся пиздачe?

Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё
Трачу на это, трачу на то, трачу на это, трачу на то
Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё
Трачу на это, трачу на то, трачу на это, трачу на то
Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё
Трачу на это, трачу на то, трачу на это, трачу на то
Я лью Cristal или Chandon Moët
Мeчтал - тeпeрь моё


Слава, что ты сдeлал?",6314158
175549,4686336,Peaches,rb,Justin Bieber,2021,1419780,"{""Daniel Caesar"",GIVĒON}","
I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
I get my light right from the source, yeah (Yeah, that's it)


And I say, oh (Oh)
The way I breathe you in (In)
It's the texture of your skin
I wanna wrap my arms around you, baby
Never let you go, oh
And I say, oh
There's nothing like your touch
It's the way you lift me up, yeah
And I'll be right here with you 'til the end of time


I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
I get my light right from the source, yeah (Yeah, that's it)

You ain't sure yet
But I'm for ya
All I can want, all I can wish for
Nights alone that we miss more
And days we save as souvenirs
There's no time, I wanna make more time
And give you my whole life
I left my girl, I'm in Mallorca
Hate to leave her, call it torture
Remember when I couldn't hold her
Left her baggage for Rimowa


I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
I get my light right from the source, yeah (Yeah, that's it)


I get the feeling, so I'm sure (Sure)
Hand in my hand because I'm yours, I can't
I can't pretend, I can't ignore, you're right for me
Don't think you wanna know just where I've been, oh
Done bein' distracted
The one I need is right in my arms (Oh)
Your kisses taste the sweetest with mine
And I'll be right here with you 'til the end of time

I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
I get my light right from the source, yeah (Yeah, that's it)
I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
(I get my light right from the source, yeah, yeah, that's it)
I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
I get my light right from the source, yeah (Yeah, that's it)
I got my peaches out in Georgia (Oh, yeah, shit)
I get my weed from California (That's that shit)
I took my chick up to the North, yeah (Badass bitch)
I get my light right from the source, yeah (Yeah, that's it)",6326342
176143,4745549,Skin,pop,Sabrina Carpenter,2021,1191440,{},"
Maybe we could've been friends
If I met you in another life
Maybe then we could pretend
There's no gravity in the words we write
Maybe you didn't mean it
Maybe ""blonde"" was the only rhyme
The only rhyme


Want my heart to be breakin', breakin', no
I'm happy and you hate it, hate it, oh
And I'm not asking you to let it go
But you been tellin' your side
So I'll be tellin' mine, oh


You can try
To get under my, under my, under my skin
While he's on mine
Yeah, all on my, all on my, all on my skin
I wish you knew that even you
Can't get under my skin if I don't let you in

You're tellin' it how you see it
Like truth is whatever you decide
Some people will believe it
And some will read in between the lines
You're putting me in the spotlight
But I've been under it all my life
Said all my life


Want my heart to be breakin', breakin', no
I'm happy and you hate it, hate it, oh
And I'm not asking you to let it go
But you been tellin' your side
So I'll be tellin' mine (Mine, oh)


You can try
To get under my, under my, under my skin
While he's on mine
Yeah, all on my, all on my, all on my skin
I wish you knew that even you
Can't get under my skin if I don't let you in, oh
You can try
To get under my, under my, under my skin
While he's on mine
Yeah, all on my, all on my, all on my skin
I wish you knew that even you
Can't get under my skin if I don't let you in, oh

I just hope that one day
We both can laugh about it
When it's not in our face
Won't have to dance around it
Don't drive yourself insane
It won't always be this way


You can try
To get under my, under my, under my skin
While he's on mine
Yeah, all on my, all on my, all on my skin
I wish you knew that even you
Can't get under my skin if I don't let you in",6405559
176252,4756066,Gone,pop,ROS,2021,1918032,{ROSÉ},"
I thought that you'd remember, but it seems that you forgot
It's hard for me to blame you when you were already lost
Oh, yeah
I'm tired of always waiting
Oh, yeah, yeah
I see you changed your number, that's why you don't get my calls
I gave you all of me, now you don't wanna be involved
Oh, yeah, yeah
I really gotta face it
Oh, yeah, yeah


I just wanna be the one
But to you, we're already done
Tell me, why'd you have to hit and run me?
Now I'm all alone, cryin' ugly
You broke my heart just for fun
Took my love and just left me numb
Now it's eight in the morning
Hate in the morning (All because of you)

Another story that's sad and true
I can feel the pain, can you?
You had to be the one to let me down
To colour me blue
Hate to see you with someone new
I'll put a curse on her and you
Ain't no looking back, now you're dead and gone
My love is gone too


All my love is go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-one
All my love is go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-one
All my love is go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-one
All my love is gone
Now you're dead and gone


All my love is gone and the hate has grown
Standing all alone and I'm searching for something
But I can't feel nothing
I pack my bags and go
This don't feel like home
Too much darkness for a rainbow, I feel so used
How am I supposed to live without you? I refuse, yeah

I just wanna be the one
But to you, we're already done
Tell me, why'd you have to hit and run me?
Now I'm all alone, cryin' ugly
You broke my heart just for fun
Took my love and just left me numb
Now it's eight in the morning
Hate in the morning (All because of you)


Another story that's sad and true
I can feel the pain, can you?
You had to be the one to let me down
To colour me blue
Hate to see you with someone new
I'll put a curse on her and you
Ain't no looking back, now you're dead and gone
My love is gone too


All my love is go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-one
All my love is go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-one
All my love is go-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-o-one
All my love is gone
Now you're dead and gone",6419329
176504,4776113,Up,pop,Cardi B,2021,2816692,{},"
Up, up, up (Ayy), up (Uh), up, look (This is fire)
Once upon a time, man, I heard that I was ugly
Came from a bitch who nigga wanna fuck on me


I said my face bomb, ass tight
Racks stack up Shaq height
Jewelry on me, flashlight
I been lit since last night
Hit him with that good good
Make a nigga act right
Broke boys don't deserve no pussy
(I know that's right)


Big bag bussin' out the Bentley Bentayga
Man, Balenciaga Bardi back and all these bitches fucked
It's big bags bussin' out the Bentley Bentayga, man
Birkin bag, Bardi back and all you bitches fucked

If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck
If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck, huh (Ayy)
Up, then it's up, if it's up, then it's stuck (Huh)
If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck, huh (Woo)


I could make the party hot, I could make your body rock
Bitches say they fuckin' with me, chances are they probably not
If I had a dick, you'd probably lick it like a lollipop
Hoes speakin' cap-enese, hit 'em with karate chop
I'm forever poppin' shit, pullin' up and droppin' shit
Gotta argue with him 'cause a nigga love a toxic bitch
Niggas out here playin', gotta make 'em understand
If ain't no ring on my finger, you ain't goin' on my 'Gram


I said my face bomb, ass tight (Yeah)
Racks stack up Shaq height (Yeah)
Jewelry on me, flashlight (Huh)
I been lit since last night (Woo)
Hit him with that good good
Make a nigga act right (Ah)
Broke boys don't deserve no pussy
(I know that's right)

Big bag bussin' out the Bentley Bentayga
Man, Balenciaga Bardi back and all these bitches fucked (Woo)
It's big bags bussin' out the Bentley Bentayga, man
Birkin bag, Bardi back and all you bitches fucked


If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck
If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck, huh (Ayy)
Up, then it's up, if it's up, then it's stuck
If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck, huh (Ayy)


Bitches ain't fuckin' with me now and I can see why
Dirty-ass, dusty-ass bitch, you got pink eye
Bitches want smoke until I bring it to they doorstep
Tell that bitch back back, breath smell like horse sex (Ha)
Put it on him now, he will never be the same (He won't)
Tatted on my ass 'cause I really like the pain (Ah)
He nutted on my butt, I said, ""I'm glad that you came""
If that nigga had a twin, I would let 'em run a train (Skrrt)


Big bag bussin' out the Bentley Bentayga
Man, Balenciaga Bardi back and all these bitches fucked (Woo)
It's big bags bussin' out the Bentley Bentayga, man
Birkin bag, Bardi back and all you bitches fucked (Ooh)

If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck
If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck, huh (Woo)
Up, then it's up, if it's up, then it's stuck (Woo)
If it's up, then it's up, then it's up, then it's stuck, huh


Look, gotta play it safe, huh
No face, no case (Hahaha)",6444597
177380,4844910,Leave The Door Open,rb,Silk Sonic,2021,1906926,{},"
Say baby, say baby, say baby


What you doin'? (What you doin'?)
Where you at? (Where you at?)
Oh, you got plans? (You got plans)
Don't say that (Shut your trap)
I'm sippin' wine (Sip, sip) in a robe (Drip, drip)
I look too good (Look too good)
To be alone (Woo, woo)
My house clean (House clean), my pool warm (Pool warm)
Just shaved, smooth like a newborn
We should be dancin', romancin'
In the east wing and the west wing
Of this mansion, what's happenin'?


I ain't playin' no games
Every word that I say is coming straight from the heart
So if you tryna lay in these arms

I'ma leave the door open
(I'ma leave the door open)
I'ma leave the door open, girl
(I'ma leave the door open, hopin')
That you feel the way I feel
And you want me like I want you tonight, baby
(Tell me that you're comin' through)


Ooh, you're so sweet (So sweet), so tight (So tight)
I won't bite (Uh-uh), unless you like (Unless you like)
If you smoke (What you smoke?), I got the haze (Purple haze)
And if you're hungry, girl, I got filets (Woo)
Ooh, baby, don't keep me waitin'
There's so much love we could be makin' (Shamone!)
I'm talkin' kissin', cuddlin'
Rose petals in the bathtub
Girl, let's jump in, it's bubblin'


I ain't playin' no games
Every word that I say is coming straight from the heart
So if you tryna lay in these arms (If you tryna lay in these arms)


I'ma leave the door open
(I'ma leave the door open)
I'ma leave the door open, girl
(I'ma leave the door open, hopin')
That you feel the way I feel
And you want me like I want you tonight, baby
Tell me that you're comin' through (Come on, girl)

La-la-la-la-la-la-la (I need you, baby)
La-la-la-la-la-la-la (I got to see you, baby)
La-la-la-la-la-la-la (Girl, I'm tryna give you this, ah)


Hey, hey, I'ma leave my door open, baby
(I'ma leave the door open)
I'ma leave, I'ma leave my door open, girl
(I'ma leave the door open, hopin')
And I'm hopin', hopin'
That you feel the way I feel
And you want me like I want you tonight, baby
Tell me that you're comin' through (Woo!)


La-la-la-la-la-la-la (Tell me)
Tell me that you're comin' through
(Woo-woo-woo-woo, woo-woo-woo, woo-woo-woo)
(Woo-woo-woo-woo, woo-woo-woo, woo-woo)
La-la-la-la-la-la-la (La-la-la-la-la)
Tell me that you're comin' through
Girl, I'm here just waitin' for you (Oh!)
Come on over, I'll adore you (I gotta know!)
La-la-la-la-la-la-la (I'm waitin', waitin', waitin')
Tell me that you're comin' through (For you)
Girl, I'm here just waitin' for you
Come on over, I'll adore you
La-la-la-la-la-la-la (La-la-la-la)",6531412
177393,4846383,Happier Than Ever,pop,Billie Eilish,2021,3203032,{},"
When I'm away from you
I'm happier than ever
Wish I could explain it better
I wish it wasn't true


Give me a day or two to think of something clever
To write myself a letter
To tell me what to do, mm-mm
Do you read my interviews?
Or do you skip my avenue?
When you said you were passin' through
Was I even on your way?
I knew when I asked you to (When I asked you to)
Be cool about what I was tellin' you
You'd do the opposite of what you said you'd do (What you said you'd do)
And I'd end up more afraid
Don't say it isn't fair
You clearly weren't aware that you made me miserable
So if you really wanna know

When I'm away from you (When I'm away from you)
I'm happier than ever (Happier than ever)
Wish I could explain it better (Wish I could explain it better)
I wish it wasn't true, mm-mm


You call me again, drunk in your Benz
Drivin' home under the influence
You scared me to death, but I'm wastin' my breath
'Cause you only listen to your fuckin' friends
I don't relate to you
I don't relate to you, no
'Cause I'd never treat me this shitty
You made me hate this city


And I don't talk shit about you on the internet
Never told anyone anything bad
'Cause that shit's embarrassing, you were my everything
And all that you did was make me fuckin' sad
So don't waste the time I don't have
And don't try to make me feel bad
I could talk about every time that you showed up on time
But I'd have an empty line 'cause you never did
Never paid any mind to my mother or friends, so I
Shut 'em all out for you 'cause I was a kid

You ruined everything good
Always said you were misunderstood
Made all my moments your own
Just fuckin' leave me alone, yeah (Fuck you)
(Ah)
(Goddamn)
(Ah)
(Fuck you)
(Fuck you)",6533253
177641,4864333,Wants and Needs,rap,Drake,2021,1287377,"{""Lil Baby""}","
(Six)
Yeah
Yeah
Yeah


Leave me out the comments, leave me out the nonsense
Speakin' out of context, people need some content
Niggas tryna keep up, shit is not a contest
Whippin' Benz concept
Heaven-sent, God-sent
Least that's what my mom says
Proof is in the progress, money's not a object
Busy than a motherfucker, you know how my job get
Barkin' up the wrong tree, you know how the dogs get
Haven't fallen off yet, yee
Come with a classic, they come around years later and say it's a sleeper
The earrings are real, the petty is real, might charge my ex for a feature
Deposit the money to Brenda, LaTisha, or Linda, Felicia
She came for me twice, I didn't even nut for her once, you know I'm a pleaser
Forty-two millimeter, was made in Geneva
Yeah, I probably should go to Yeshiva, we went to Ibiza
Yeah, I probably should go link with Yeezy, I need me some Jesus
But soon as I started confessin' my sins, he wouldn't believe us

Sins, I got sins on my mind
And some M's, got a lot of M's on my mind
And my friends, yeah, I keep my friends on my mind
I'm in love, I'm in love with two girls at one time
And they tens, that's why I got ten on my mind
I got M's, got a lot of M's on my mind
And my friends, yeah, I keep my friends on my mind
Should repent, I need me some Jesus in my life
Amen


I'm from the four, but I love me a threesome
DM her, delete it, she my lil' secret
He tryna diss me to blow up, I peep it
I can't respond, we just go at your people
If I left some racks on the bed, you can keep it
This shit gettin' deeper and deeper, I dig it
My shovel wasn't bent, I was broke, had to fix it
A shark in the water, you swim with the lil' fishes
I hit today, by tomorrow, she miss it
I grab her neck, she look up, then I kiss it
I'm not a GOAT, but I fit the description
I like to pour, so I get the prescription
We walk around with them bands in our britches
This gun ain't gon' jam, when I blow, I ain't missin'
I'm droppin' hit after hit, I'm just chillin'
But I'll send a hit while I chill with my children
Bigger the business, the bigger the office
I fucked 'round and found me a swag, then I caught up
They call for my artists, they makin' me offers
I don't even bargain, I'll start from the bottom
I lost a Ferrari, Las Vegas, Nevada
I woke up the followin' day and went harder
I'm crackin' my shell now, they see that I'm smarter
I gotta get money, I love to get charter
I gave her four Birkins and one's for her daughter
I can't let 'em down, walk around with my guard up
I'm screamin' out ""YOLO,"" yeah, that's still the motto
I know I be on some shit that they ain't thought of

Sins, I got sins on my mind
And some M's, got a lot of M's on my mind
And my friends, yeah, I keep my friends on my mind
I'm in love, I'm in love with two girls at one time
And they tens, that's why I got ten on my mind
I got M's, got a lot of M's on my mind
And my friends, yeah, I keep my friends on my mind
Should repent, I need me some Jesus in my life
Amen",6555267
177659,4865576,Kiss Me More,pop,Doja Cat,2021,1397914,{SZA},"
We hug and, yes, we make love
And always just say goodnight (La-la-la-la-la-la)
And we cuddle, sure, I do love it
But I need your lips on mine


Can you kiss me more?
We're so young, boy, we ain't got nothin' to lose, uh-oh
It's just principle
Baby, hold me 'cause I like the way you groove, uh-oh


Boy, you write your name, I can do the same
Oh, I love the taste, la-la-la-la-la-la
All on my tongue, I want it (La-la-la-la-la-la)
Boy, you write your name, I can do the same
Oh, I love the taste, la-la-la-la-la-la
All on my tongue, I want it (La-la-la-la-la-la)


I, I feel like fuckin' somethin'
But we could be corny, fuck it
Sugar, I ain't no dummy, dummy
I like to say, ""What if?"", but if
We could kiss and just cut the rubbish
Then I might be onto somethin'
I ain't givin' you one in public
I'm givin' you hundreds, fuck it
Somethin' we just gotta get into
Sign first, middle, last on the wisdom tooth
Niggas wishin' that the pussy was a kissin' booth
Taste breakfast, lunch, and gin and juice
And that dinner just like dessert too
And when we French, refresh, gimme two
When I bite that lip, come get me too
He want lipstick, lip gloss, hickeys too, huh

Can you kiss me more?
We're so young, boy, we ain't got nothin' to lose, uh-oh
It's just principle
Baby, hold me 'cause I like the way you groove, uh-oh


Boy, you write your name, I can do the same
Oh, I love the taste, la-la-la-la-la-la
All on my tongue, I want it (La-la-la-la-la-la)
Boy, you write your name, I can do the same
Oh, I love the taste, la-la-la-la-la-la
All on my tongue, I want it


Say give me a buck, need that gushy stuff
Push the limit, no, you ain't good enough
All your niggas say that you lost without me
All my bitches feel like I dodged the county
Fuckin' with you feel like jail, nigga (Feel like jail)
I can't even exhale, nigga (Exhale)
Pussy like holy grail, you know that
You gon' make me need bail, you know that
Caught dippin' with your friend
You ain't even half man, lyin' on your-, you know that
Got me a bag full of brick, you know that
Control, don't slow the pace if I throw back
All this ass for real (All this ass)
Drama make you feel (Make you feel)
Fantasy and whip appeal is all I can give you

Can you kiss me more?
We're so young, boy, we ain't got nothin' to lose, uh-oh
It's just principle
Baby, hold me 'cause I like the way you groove, uh-oh
Oh, darlin'


Boy, you write your name, I can do the same
Ooh, I love the taste, oh-la-la-la-la-la
All on my tongue, I want it
Boy, you write your name, I can do the same
Ooh, I love the taste, oh-la-la-la-la-la
All on my tongue, I want it",6556752
177828,4881546,Off The Grid,rap,Kanye West,2021,1766464,"{""Playboi Carti"",""Fivio Foreign""}","
What? Yeah
Boy (What?)


We off the grid, grid, grid
This for my kid, kid, kid
For when my kid kid kids have kids
Everything we did for the crib


Everything we did, how we live (What?)
All this smoke got a scent
All that smoke heaven sent (Scent)
Everything I spoke, what I meant (Ah)
Never disguise my intent, lines outside the event
Brought my life out the trench
God, thank God, look what He did, did, did, did, did, did
We off the grid, grid, grid, grid, grid (Ayy)
What?
We off the grid, grid, grid, grid

I'm off the grid (Homicide, homicide, what?)
Got tats on my ribs (Ah), tattoos on my ribs (What?)
I just tatted my kid, Onyx (Slatt)
I just threw twenty K on these ****, we was at Onyx (Ah, what?)
I just bought me some brand new clothes, Dover Street Market (Givenchy)
Ayy, we just took the route to Charlotte (Yeah, ah, what? Yeah)
I'm in the Rolls-Royce **** on-what you call it? (Yeah, yeah)
I light a opp blunt and let your **** try it (Ah)
Uh, them off the grid, I'm on a **** diet (What?)


We off the grid, grid, grid, grid
This for my kid, kid, kid, kid
Everything we did for the crib did here
Flexin' with the business trip
Going cray, take some G6
Lit, lit, '76
He spit this
We off the grid, grid, grid


Yeah, look, when I was in jail, I was lowkey (Uh)
Shout out to supporters that wrote me
Eat food, work out and then go sleep
You know I'm prayin', He carryin' both feet (Yeah)
**** know we got God with us (God with us)
You look at me and see a God figure (Uh)
And when I start vibin', I know that He with me
And I'ma always catch a hard shiver (Uh)
I know it's demons in that dark liquor (Uh)
We buy a bottle and squash with ya (Uh)
Everybody turn into a harsh ****
But my pockets bigger and my heart richer (Uh)
My mind smarter, my grind harder (Skrr)
And my car quicker (Skrrt)
I met her in church, she pray for me
She my God-sister (She my God-sister, yeah)
I'm only trustin' the people I keep close
**** sellin' they soul for a repost
Remember when I was broke, wearin' cheap coats
Now it's diamonds and houses and C notes (Uh)
****, I'm feelin' marvelous (I'm feelin' marvelous)
Who let the monster loose? (Who let the monster loose? Huh)
They call me a product of my environment (Uh)
I tell them, ""Nah, I'm what God produced"" (Baow)
Defense good, and them guards can shoot (Baow)
I put 'em on you, it get hard to move
Tattoo in my face is the mark of truth
Gotta watch what you say when they market you (Huh)
I already predicted this (I already predicted this, huh)
Y'all only witnessed it (Y'all only witnessed it)
Look, got a couple old friends that I'm not really clickin' with
I know they pray that we settle our differences
I pray that they lower all my **** sentences
I got some demons I'm not even dealin' with
They in they feelings, I'm not really feelin' it
And I know some members that gave back they membership
****, you switched up, huh, like how you not feelin' me?
Look, I act like I care, but I don't really care
Now I live in a new buildin' with amenities
I got a new ceilin' with a chimney
I got a few **** wanna finish me
I don't get too friendly with the enemy
You gotta move different when you in the industry, woo, yeah
You gotta move different when you in the industry, huh
You gotta move different when you in the, look
God blessed me with amazing grace (Uh)
She fell in love with my day to day (Uh)
I just want my problems to fade away (Uh)
Man, I'm tired of ****, I need Gatorade
Boy, I got on my feet and I made a name
And I made it a necklace, huh
When you from the bottom and you workin' hard
Just to get to the top, then they gotta respect it
If you got a voice, then you gotta project it
If you got a wrong, then you gotta correct it
If you got a name, then you gotta protect it
If you give me shock, then you gotta electric (Woo)
Tryna live a new life, so I got a new plan that I gotta finesse with (Look, yeah)
'Cause they want me to lose, they ain't part of the Woos
I been tryin' so hard not to move reckless

We off the grid, grid, grid
This for my kid, kid, kid, kid
Everything we did for the crib did here
Flexin' with the business trip
Going cray, take some G6 (Ah)
Lit, lit, '76
He split lids, then ask for shade, tsk-tsk-tsk
Take this trip, trip, trip, this, this
This, this, this, this
You all still lit, lit, lit
I'm off the grid, grid, grid, grid
Off the grid, grid, grid, grid


First, it go viral, then they get digital
Then they get critical, no, I'm not doin' no interview
Mask on my face, you can't see what I'm finna do
Had to move away from people that's miserable
Don't wanna link you, I ain't finna sit with you
Ain't finna talk to you, ain't finna get with you
Don't get me mad 'cause I don't wanna injure you
She put my paintings inside of her living room
Look at the problems and issues I'm livin' through
They tryna drown me, I rise to my pinnacle
Walked through the block like the neighborhood general
Drop me the lo' and then that's where I send it to
I was forgettin' you, now I remember, now I remember
Did what I want and I say what I want
And I thought you was with me, like how you get sensitive?
I got this God power, that's my leverages
I got this Holy Water, that's my beverages
I gotta help myself out of selfishness
I just bought a floor out of Selfridges
I gotta make sure they know who they messin' with
I gotta tell 'em ""sorry,"" they too delicate
I gotta stay with God where the blessings is
I ain't deliverin' Heavenly messages just for the hell of it
Don't try to test me, I keep it clean, but it can get messy
I talk to God every day, that's my bestie
They playin' soccer in my backyard, I think I see Messi
And this money could never neglect me
I pray that my family, they never resent me
And she fell in love with me soon as she met me
We both got a bag but my bag is more heavy
We had to stop countin', it's gettin' too petty
You not a real stepper, you can't overstep me
Just sit back and listen and watch how He bless me
He wait 'til I fall and then pull up and catch me
Your check is too small, you can't run up and check me
Nah, nah, I get 'em fast, see
You feel a way, then go pull up and get me
Might do somethin' wild if I feel like you press me
Nah, I get 'em fast, see
You feel a way, then go pull up and get me
Might do somethin' wild if I feel like you press me

We off the grid, grid, grid
This for my kid, kid, kid
For when my kid, kid, kids have kids
Everything we did for the crib


Pray for what folks and them did
Only thing we pray God forgive-give-give
May God forbid-bid-bid
He hit one of the kids, kids, kids
Took off His list, list, list
Look what they did, did, did
Pray for the crib, crib, crib
Some say A-A-Adam could never be bla-a-ack
'Cause a black man'll never share his rib, rib, rib, rib, rib, rib",6576850
177930,4890939,Mask,pop,Dream,2021,1430440,{},"
(Secure the bag, know what I mean? Banrisk on the beat)
(Ayo, Perish, this is hot, boy)


I wear a mask with a smile for hours at a time
Stare at the ceiling while I hold back what's on my mind
And when they ask me how I'm doing, I say, ""I'm just fine""
And when they ask me how I'm doing, I say, ""I'm just fine""
But the fact is
I can never get off of my mattress
And all that they can ask is
""Why are you so sad, kid?"" (Why are you so sad, kid?)


That's what the mask is
That's what the point of the mask is


So you can see I'm tryin', you won't see me cryin'
I'll just keep on smilin', I'm good (Yeah, I'm good)
And it just keeps on pilin', it's so terrifying
But I keep on smilin', I'm good (Yeah, I'm good)
I've been carin' too much for so long
Been comparin' myself for so long
Been wearin' a smile for so long, it's real
So long, it's real, so long, it's real

Always bein' judged by a bunch of strange faces
Scared to go outside, haven't seen the light in ages
But I've been places
So I'm okay-ish, so I'm okay-ish
Yeah, I'm okay, bitch
But the fact is
I need help, I'm failin' all my classes
They think that I need glasses
I just really wish that I could pass this (Wish that I could pass this)


That's what the mask is
That's what the point of the mask is


So you can see I'm tryin', you won't see me cryin'
I'll just keep on smilin', I'm good (Yeah, I'm good)
And it just keeps on pilin', it's so terrifying
But I keep on smilin', I'm good (Yeah, I'm good)
I've been carin' too much for so long
Been comparin' myself for so long
Been wearin' a smile for so long, it's real
So long, it's real, so long, it's real


So long, it's real
So long, it's real",6588709
178495,4939065,​deja vu,pop,Olivia Rodrigo,2021,2539113,{},"
Car rides to Malibu
Strawberry ice cream, one spoon for two
And tradin' jackets
Laughin' 'bout how small it looks on you
(Ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha-ha, ha-ha-ha-ha)
Watching reruns of Glee
Bein' annoying, singin' in harmony
I bet she's braggin' to all her friends, sayin' you're so unique, hmm


So when you gonna tell her that we did that, too?
She thinks it's special, but it's all reused
That was our place, I found it first
I made the jokes you tell to her when she's with you
Do you get déjà vu when she's with you?
Do you get déjà vu? (Ah) Hmm
Do you get déjà vu, huh?


Do you call her, almost say my name?
'Cause let's be honest, we kinda do sound the same
Another actress
I hate to think that I was just your type
And I bet that she knows Billy Joel
'Cause you played her ""Uptown Girl""
You're singin' it together
Now I bet you even tell her how you love her
In between the chorus and the verse (Ooh; I love you)

So when you gonna tell her that we did that, too?
She thinks it's special, but it's all reused
That was the show we talked about
Played you the songs she's singing now when she's with you
Do you get déjà vu when she's with you?
Do you get déjà vu? (Oh-oh)
Do you get déjà vu?


Strawberry ice cream in Malibu
Don't act like we didn't do that shit, too
You're tradin' jackets like we used to do
(Yeah, everything is all reused)
Play her piano, but she doesn't know (Oh, oh)
That I was the one who taught you Billy Joel (Oh)
A different girl now, but there's nothing new


I know you get déjà vu
I know you get déjà vu
I know you get déjà vu",6649389
178968,4981751,​traitor,pop,Olivia Rodrigo,2021,1108131,{},"
Ooh-ooh-ooh
Ah-ah-ah-ah-ah


Brown guilty eyes and
Little white lies, yeah
I played dumb, but I always knew
That you talked to her, maybe did even worse
I kept quiet so I could keep you


And ain't it funny how you ran to her
The second that we called it quits?
And ain't it funny how you said you were friends?
Now it sure as hell don't look like it


You betrayed me
And I know that you'll never feel sorry
For the way I hurt, yeah
You talked to her when we were together
Loved you at your worst, but that didn't matter
It took you two weeks to go off and date her
Guess you didn't cheat, but you're still a traitor

Now you bring her around just to shut me down
Show her off like she's a new trophy
And I know if you were true
There's no damn way that you
Could fall in love with somebody that quickly


And ain't it funny? All the twisted games
All the questions you used to avoid
Ain't it funny? Remember I brought her up
And you told me I was paranoid?


You betrayed me
And I know that you'll never feel sorry
For the way I hurt, yeah
You talked to her when we were together
Loved you at your worst, but that didn't matter
It took you two weeks to go off and date her
Guess you didn't cheat, but you're still a traitor


(Ah-ah-ah)
God, I wish that you had thought this through
Before I went and fell in love with you
(Ah-ah-ah)
When she's sleepin' in the bed we made
Don't you dare forget about the way

You betrayed me
'Cause I know that you'll never feel sorry
For the way I hurt, yeah
You talked to her when we were together
You gave me your word, but that didn't matter
It took you two weeks to go off and date her
Guess you didn't cheat, but you're still, you're still a traitor
(Ah-ah-ah)
Yeah, you're still a traitor


Ooh-ooh-ooh
God, I wish that you had thought this through
Before I went and fell in love with you",6702211
178971,4981757,​good 4 u,pop,Olivia Rodrigo,2021,2486863,{},"
(Ah)


Well, good for you, I guess you moved on really easily
You found a new girl and it only took a couple weeks
Remember when you said that you wanted to give me the world?
(World)
And good for you, I guess that you've been workin' on yourself
I guess that therapist I found for you, she really helped
Now you can be a better man for your brand new girl (Girl)


Well, good for you
You look happy and healthy, not me
If you ever cared to ask
Good for you
You're doin' great out there without me, baby
God, I wish that I could do that
I've lost my mind, I've spent the night
Cryin' on the floor of my bathroom
But you're so unaffected, I really don't get it
But I guess good for you

Well, good for you, I guess you're gettin' everything you want (Ah)
You bought a new car and your career's really takin' off (Ah)
It's like we never even happened
Baby, what the fuck is up with that? (Ah)
And good for you, it's like you never even met me
Remember when you swore to God I was the only
Person who ever got you? Well, screw that, and screw you
You will never have to hurt the way you know that I do


Well, good for you
You look happy and healthy, not me
If you ever cared to ask
Good for you
You're doin' great out there without me, baby
God, I wish that I could do that
I've lost my mind, I've spent the night
Cryin' on the floor of my bathroom
But you're so unaffected, I really don't get it
But I guess good for you


(Ah-ah-ah-ah)
(Ah-ah-ah-ah)

Maybe I'm too emotional
But your apathy's like a wound in salt
Maybe I'm too emotional
Or maybe you never cared at all
Maybe I'm too emotional
Your apathy is like a wound in salt
Maybe I'm too emotional
Or maybe you never cared at all


Well, good for you
You look happy and healthy, not me
If you ever cared to ask
Good for you
You're doin' great out there without me, baby
Like a damn sociopath
I've lost my mind, I've spent the night
Cryin' on the floor of my bathroom
But you're so unaffected, I really don't get it
But I guess good for you


Well, good for you, I guess you moved on really easily",6702232
179145,4996967,Body Remix,rap,Russ Millions & Tion Wayne,2021,1677360,"{""Bugzy Malone"",""Fivio Foreign"",DARKOO,""E1 (3x3)"",""ZT (3x3)"",Buni,ArrDee}","
Crud
Brap (Mm-mm), yo
Muad
Gotcha
E-E-English girl, name Fiona
Big batty girl, name Abiola (Mm-mm)
Body-ody shape like Cola (Bah)
Back up, back up, bring it to the owner


Man, I'm still up on the roads, could've left (Bah, bah)
Still chattin' to my bros on the tech' (Mm-mm)
Fuck that, man, I don't give a F (Boom, boom)
What, you wanna get smoked? Cigarette (Bah, bah, bah)
English, English girl, name Fiona
African girl, Adeola
Body-ody shape like Cola
Back up, back up, ayy, come closer


(Vi-Vi-) Vida loca (Bullet)
High as a kite, never sober (Shotta)
Python, hit him with a Cobra
Free up my bro Casanova (Free him up)
Badman persona
Badman alone can control her ('Trol her)
Sorry, sorry, your sis got bent over
Push in my 'ood, take anaconda

Ayy, have you seen the state of her body? (Mad)
If I beat it, I ain't wearin' a johnny (Hah)
Adeola wanna roll with a geezer (With a geez)
Is it me or the lifestyle, sweetheart?
Actually, I don't give a shit (Nah)
I'm a rapper now, might as well live in it (Live in it)
She smoke up in my hotel, billin' it (Billin' it)
You can do what you like darlin', ArrDee don't give a F
Still get brain while I smoke cigarettes
White boy wasted, coke get her wet
But my big brownin' love roll with the Zs
I'm an English boy, but I'm so bloody lit
Yo, Tizzy, my killy, I'm litty, I'm burst
And her body come silly (Ayy, ayy)
Pull up to the AP 'cause we're gonna get busy (Ayy, ayy, ayy)
The king of my city for really


Man, I'm still up on the roads, could've left (Mm-mm)
Still chattin' to my bros on the tech' (Bah, bah)
Fuck that, man, I don't give a F (Brrr)
What, you wanna get smoked? Cigarette
English, English girl, name Fiona
African girl, Adeola
Body-ody shape like Cola
Back up, back up, ayy, come closer

Don't come too close
Should I take Keisha or should I take Becky?
Russ, Tion Wayne both said ""I don't know""
I swear Big A should be sponsored by Nike
'Cah he's got so much tech when he's tryna score goals
Ordnance Road, bro back that pole
Mm-mm, if you know then you know (You know)
E1, I'm bringin' it back
Drop a gun lean 'cah no one's been slapped
I'm in the backseat with a brownin' yat'
With the biggest of backs and the shoulder tap (Leng)
They give us the biggest of chats
But live in the flesh, didn't see no hands (No hands)
""Anyting green get bun"" is a cap
'Cah no one in 3x3's been blammed (It's for fashion)


Look, you don't wanna get left in a mess (Ah-ha, boom)
Gun shot from the right and the left (Boom)
Fifty G's won't pay for your life
Get blazed like Cali with no cigarette (Yeah, yeah)
E-English girl named Fiona (Huh?)
Straight Hennessy with no Cola (Huh?)
Know man since Bergkamp and Zola
Hold onto the super soaker (Ai)
Anything to be God, like may the clean hearted walk free
It's ironic, 'cause he got wetted for spillin' his drink on me (Boom, boom, boom)
Needs resuscitation just to help him breathe
Man drown when it's an internal bleed
But I don't care for your nickname, or your last name
Anyone can get R.I.P.'d (Woo)

Man, I'm still up on the roads, could've left (Mm-mm)
Still chattin' to my bros on the tech' (Bah, bah)
Fuck that, man, I don't give a F (Brrr)
What, you wanna get smoked? Cigarette
English, English girl, name Fiona
African girl, Adeola
Body-ody shape like Cola
Back up, back up, ayy, come closer


Look, huh, hol' up (Hol' up, hol' up, hol' up)
I think I know her (Uh)
I don't like your tone, girl, talk a little lower (Nah)
Nigga get shot for smokin' my roll-up (Boom, boom, huh)
You said you got it now you gotta show up (Yeah)
Shawty gon' suck me up until it's over (Yeah)
She like a little pretzel, you can fold her (Nah)
She got the twenty inches with the closure, huh
Yeah, 808 (Uh, yeah)
No, I don't play no games (Nah)
I don't say nothin', I don't clear no names (Nah)
If mans not hot, then mans not sayin' (Look)
If mans get boomed, then I get blamed (Boom)
I took a Perky, I'm out of my brain
I ain't never steppin' out of my lane (Nah)
Man, I did a lot of shit, man, I'm, proud of my name (Uh)


(Z-Z; woo) ZT, I'm a C double S (Yes)
Chest shot specialist, wet man's chest
B double S (Ayy), backshot specialist
Bruck up the pum-pum, leave that wet
Bad B's in love with the set, no stress, get bread
And we set them trends, no meds
We flex on the opps, get vexed
No net, but you know that we scored on them (Boom, boom)
Me and E just stepped on scene, SOS for an anti-green
AFG is an anti team, I don't know about them, got a rams on me (Mm-mm)
I see one of them IC3's, I make the hand ting beat (Brap, brap)
Neezy stuck in the streets (Mm-mm)
Shoutout my 3x3's (Brrr, brap)


Touch-touch my watch, man, you must be crazy (Bad him up)
Had an Rollie, then I switched to the AP (Boom)
Body like an earthquake, somethin' like Haiti (Ah)
She knows me in pages, she callin' me ""Baby"" (Yes)
In twenty-three hours, had them bring that back (Bring it)
A Rolex can't phase me
Time be money, so bitch come pay me
Swing both ways so bring your lady
Jig-jiggy with the baddie, wanna come get jiggy with it
And I ain't talking waps (Really), but she know that I'm strapped
(Really, really with it) Yeah, you know me, I'm really, really with it
Can't compare when you talk about stacks
Can't compare when you talk about stacks
Hundred K when I pay my tax
Bend it, shawty wanna make it clap
Bend it, shawty wanna arch her back


""Gun lean get shot from the backseat""
'Til man pull up and bun out the backseat (Nakky)
Gassed up, top boy like Ashley
Tappy, swing, get ying up badly (Ying)
Good dick make gyal scream ""Papi""
She holds my wappy, she makes me happy (Mm-mm)
You know I'm tappy, I chat, and not cappy
I rub my mashy, I'm too-too catty (Too catty)
Make man shake, no Harlem (Wah?)
Gassed up, 300, no Spartan (Oi)
I beg man pardon, dot-dot blastin'
Might get blicked where you're two-step dancin' (Brrr)
I do no talkin', the gyal, I'm clartin'
It's your boy in a spliff, I rass him (Mm-mm)
Bro red card him, shots, no warning (Yo)
When I see red, I'm chargin' (Dead)


Man, I'm still up on the roads, could've left (Mm-mm)
Still chattin' to my bros on the tech' (Bah, bah)
Fuck that, man, I don't give a F (Brrr)
What, you wanna get smoked? Cigarette
English, English girl, name Fiona
African girl, Adeola
Body-ody shape like Cola
Back up, back up, ayy, come closer",6720971
179190,5001128,Cristal  МОЁТ Remix,rap,"MORGENSHTERN, SODA LUV, blago white, OG Buda & MAYOT",2021,1437680,"{""MORGENSHTERN / SODA LUV / blago white / OG Buda & MAYOT""}","


Skrrt
Я лью Cr-


Пялю этот бит, как фeтишист, - я eбу пeтлю (Bitch)
Убился, сдeлал мёртвый номeр - это Le Truk (Эй)
Киса скидываeт coochie в Инст - это preview
Со мной щас MAYOT - нe только тот, который мнe льют (Grrah, pow)
В Gucci eсть дeрьмо, на нём много мух
Они просто молча открывают рты под мой move (Тс-ш)
Год назад нe понимали, кто такой SODA LUV (Кто?)
Щас за дeнь sold out абсолютно на любой клуб (О-у)
Эта сука хочeт звёзд - она, чё, таксист?
Я люблю играть нулями, как хуёвый басист
Ноздря пропускаeт только бeлый - она расист (Проходитe)
Я помог своим кeнтам убиться - это assist (В мясо)
Мамуля нe вeрит до сих пор в то, что я артист (What?)
Успeх сына вызываeт у подружeк зависть (Сучeк)
Нe проктолог, но у мeня eсть дeрьмо на запись
(Кайф-кайф, кайф, кайф)
Чк-тк-а, пам-пам, пох

(Кайф)
Как начало самолёта, сука, - это только бизнeс-класс (Кайф)
Сука, я самый пиздатый, гдe моя награда, Гиннeсс? (Сука)
Взорвал - наступил на мину (Boom)
Сдeлал лям, но это нe цитрус (Ага)
Пингвин в студeйкe-иглу (Бр-р)
Я бeру мяч, спасибо
Кто рeально бы мог подумать, я жe, бля, нe знаю русский (What?)
Глупый (Что?)
Ебанутый (Что?)
blago бeлый, как Снупи (Ху)
Мальчик, он дал алe-оп; Алишeр, как будто он и я - Shaq и Kobe (Ballin')
blago и MORGENSHTERN - утрeнниe звёзды


Кайф-кайф-кайф-кайф-кайф
Кайф-кайф, кайф-кайф-кайф
Это рeально кайф a.k.a KAIF
Гeндир KAIF (Е), malchik - кайф


Он говорил, что он slime, и я вытeр eму нос
А, e (Buda)


Если рeчь за 7-2, то я Бог там (Тюмeнь)
Ты приeхал в мой город? (Бля) Ещё один лох там (Плюс один)
Забрал твою суку, но нe бойся - я отдам (Забирай)
Я в цeнтрe внимания и братики по бокам (Фью-фью-фью, skrrt)
А, plug приносит дeрьмо, спросил: «Скок там?» (Скока?)
Кинул на вeсы провeрить, что он мнe нe соврал (Часики)
У мeня eсть панчи и я могу сдeлать нокдаун (Жёстко)
Просишься на фит, и я говорю: «Скок там?» (Cash)
(А-а-а, hold on)
Я такой: «Скока?» (Мало)
Дорого, я, Алишeр, MAYOT, blago и SODA, а (Гаиньг, гаиньг, squad)
Снова я напиваюсь
У мeня сиропчик (Lean), и я наливаю в стокан (Грязь, у)
Я горячee, и это похожe на противeнь (А, духовка)
Если лазeр на тeбe, то ты, навeрноe, противник (Bang)
Пытаeшься сопeрничать (Попытка), но у тeбя очeнь мало скилла, и ты мнe противeн (Бэ)
Я вижу дeньги, бро, значит, я иду к ним (Cash)
Курю в постeли wood'ик и уснул - я проснусь с ним (Le' go)
У мeня фут-фeтиш - люблю пятки, но нe ступни (Нe ноги, hold on)
У мeня вонючий газик (Пр-р-р) - пукни (А-а)
Я базарю на битах, это дорогой базар (Базар)
Вызывай «03»: я в рэп-игрe устроил пожар (Пожар)
Твоeй сукe с тобой холодно, поэтому я eё сношал (Ха-ха-ха)
Пeрeд этим дал eй почитать, но я ща нe про журнал (Lil Buda)
Убил два pack'а - накур, убил два pack'а - Шакур (2Pac)
Я могу стeлить бeсконeчно, мнe похуй (Skrrt)
Я забрал твою суку и буду eё чпонькать
Приходит cash - это большиe цифры
Нe суицид, но кручу, чтоб убило
Это успокаиваeт мои нeрвы
На рeмиксe молодыe лeгeнд-

(Алишeрка)
Я (Ву) лeгeндарeн, будто Уинни Чeрчилль
Я-Я-Я очeнь богатый, но, пожалуйста, купи мeрчик (Плиз)
Я, мeня чёртом называют только чeрти (Факт)
Молодым дорогу, а, я начeртил (Е)
Твоя сука очeнь хочeт на мой пeрчик (Bih')
И я натяну eё, как будто она пeрчи (Е)
Эта сука - шаурма, и я eё ща вeрчу
Эти рэпeры - они студeнты, а мы в Кe***
Е, посмотри на мою новую машину! (Porsche)
Она такая красивая (Вау)
Я купил eё на дeньги от того, что вы постоянно слушали мою ссанину (Спасибо)
Я - бизнeсмeн, мои доходы пассивныe (У)
А ты - гeйский гeй, твои кeнты - пассивы (Бэ)
Скоро я стану главою России
И подарю всeм своим братьям по ксивe


Слава, что ты сдeлал?
Как ты можeшь нeнавидeть чувака
Который открыл рeсторан, для вам мeсто, чтобы вы покушали?",6726311
179261,5005790,Need to Know,pop,Doja Cat,2021,1229085,{},"
Yeah


Wanna know what it's like (Like)
Baby, show me what it's like (Like)
I don't really got no type (Type)
I just wanna fuck all night
Yeah-yeah, oh-woah-woah (Oh, ooh, mmm)
Baby, I need to know, mmm (Yeah, need to know)
I just been fantasizin' (Size)
And we got a lotta time (Time)
Baby, come throw the pipe (Pipe)
Gotta know what it's like (Like)
Yeah-yeah, oh-woah-woah
Baby, I need to know, mmm


What's your size? (Size)
Add, subtract, divide ('Vide)
Daddy don't throw no curves (Curves)
Hold up, I'm goin' wide (Wide)
We could just start at ten (Ten)
Then we can go to five (Five)
I don't play with my pen (Pen)
I mean what I write
Yeah-yeah, woah-woah-woah
I just can't help but be sexual (Oh)
Tell me your schedule (Yeah)
I got a lotta new tricks for you, baby
Just sayin' I'm flexible (I will)
I do what I can to get you off (I will)
Might just fuck him with my makeup on (I will)
Eat it like I need an apron on (Yeah, oh)
Eat it 'til I need to change my thong (Yeah, ayy)
We could do it to your favorite song (Yeah, ayy)
Take a ride into the danger zone
You know my nigga be buggin' me
I just be wonderin' if you can fuck on me better
Itchin' for me like an ugly sweater
Need it in me like a Chuck E. need cheddar
I need to know

Wanna know what it's like (Like)
Baby, show me what it's like (Like)
I don't really got no type (Type)
I just wanna fuck all night
Yeah-yeah, oh-woah-woah (Oh, ooh, mmm)
Baby, I need to know, mmm (Yeah, need to know)
I just been fantasizin' (Size)
And we got a lotta time (Time)
Baby, come throw the pipe (Pipe)
Gotta know what it's like (Like)
Yeah-yeah, oh-woah-woah
Baby, I need to know, mmm


You're exciting, boy, come find me
Your eyes told me, ""Girl, come ride me""
Fuck that feeling both us fighting
Could he try me? (Yeah) Mmm, most likely


Tryna see if you could handle this ass
Prolly give his ass a panic attack
Sorry if I gave a random erection
Prolly thinkin' I'm a telekinetic
Oh, wait, you a fan of the magic?
Poof, pussy like an Alakazam
I heard from a friend of a friend
That that dick was a ten out of ten
I can't stand it, just one night me
Clink with the drink, gimme a sip
Tell me what's your kink, gimme the dick
Spank me, slap me, choke me, bite me (Ew)
Oh, wait, I can take it (Ah)
Give a fuck 'bout what your wifey's sayin' (Yeah)

Wanna know what it's like (Like)
Baby, show me what it's like (Like)
I don't really got no type (Type)
I just wanna fuck all night
Yeah-yeah, oh-woah-woah (Oh, ooh, mmm)
Baby, I need to know, mmm (Yeah, need to know)
I just been fantasizin' (Size)
And we got a lotta time (Time)
Baby, come throw the pipe (Pipe)
Gotta know what it's like (Like)
Yeah-yeah, oh-woah-woah
Baby, I need to know, mmm",6732114
179385,5017455,Butter,pop,BTS,2021,3282336,{},"
Smooth like butter
Like a criminal undercover
Gon' pop like trouble
Breakin' into your heart like that (Ooh)
Cool shade stunner
Yeah, I owe it all to my mother
Hot like summer
Yeah, I'm makin' you sweat like that
Break it down


Ooh, when I look in the mirror
I'll melt your heart into two
I got that superstar glow so (Ooh)
Do the boogie like


Side step, right, left to my beat
High like the moon, rock with me, baby
Know that I got that heat
Let me show you 'cause talk is cheap
Side step, right, left to my beat
Get it, let it roll

Smooth like butter
Pull you in like no other
Don't need no Usher
To remind me you got it bad
Ain't no other
That can sweep you up like a robber
Straight up, I got ya
Makin' you fall like that
Break it down


Ooh, when I look in the mirror
I'll melt your heart into two
I got that superstar glow so (Ooh)
Do the boogie like


Side step, right, left to my beat
High like the moon, rock with me, baby
Know that I got that heat
Let me show you 'cause talk is cheap
Side step, right, left to my beat
Get it, let it roll


Get it, let it roll
Get it, let it roll

Ice on my wrist, I'm the nice guy
Got the right body and the right mind
Rollin' up to party, got the right vibe
Smooth like (Butter), hate us (Love us)
Fresh boy pull up and we lay low
All the playas get movin' when the bass low
Got ARMY right behind us when we say so
Let's go


Side step, right, left to my beat (Right, left to my beat)
High like the moon, rock with me, baby
Know that I got that heat
Let me show you 'cause talk is cheap (You know that talk is cheap)
Side step, right, left to my beat
Get it, let it roll


Smooth like (Butter), cool shade (Stunner)
And you know we don't stop
Hot like (Summer), ain't no (Bummer)
You be like, oh my God
We gon' make you rock and you say (Yeah)
We gon' make you bounce and you say (Yeah)
Hotter? Sweeter! Cooler? Butter!

Get it, let it roll",6746160
179420,5020422,Your Power,pop,Billie Eilish,2021,1872259,{},"
Try not to abuse your power
I know we didn't choose to change
You might not wanna lose your power
But havin' it's so strange


She said you were a hero
You played the part
But you ruined her in a year
Don't act like it was hard
And you swear you didn't know (Didn't know)
No wonder why you didn't ask
She was sleepin' in your clothes (In your clothes)
But now she's got to get to class


How dare you?
And how could you?
Will you only feel bad when they find out?
If you could take it all back
Would you?

Try not to abuse your power
I know we didn't choose to change
You might not wanna lose your power
But havin' it's so strange


I thought that I was special
You made me feel
Like it was my fault, you were the devil
Lost your appeal
Does it keep you in control? (In control)
For you to keep her in a cage?
And you swear you didn't know (Didn't know)
You said you thought she was your age


How dare you?
And how could you?
Will you only feel bad if it turns out
That they kill your contract?
Would you?


Try not to abuse your power
I know we didn't choose to change
You might not wanna lose your power
But power isn't pain

Mmm
Ooh
La-la-la-la-la, hmm
La-la-la-la-la-la, la-la",6749869
179565,5031127,Build a Bitch,pop,Bella Poarch,2021,1145779,{},"
This ain't Build a Bitch (A bitch)
You don't get to pick and choose
Different ass and bigger boobs
If my eyes are brown or blue
This ain't Build a Bitch (A bitch)
I'm filled with flaws and attitude
So if you need perfect, I'm not built for you (Yeah)


Bob the Builder broke my heart
Told me I need fixing
Said that I'm just nuts and bolts
Lotta parts were missing
Curvy like a cursive font
Virgin and a vixen
That's the kind of girl he wants
But he forgot


This ain't Build a Bitch (A bitch)
You don't get to pick and choose
Different ass and bigger boobs
If my eyes are brown or blue
This ain't Build a Bitch (A bitch)
I'm filled with flaws and attitude
So if you need perfect, I'm not built for you (One, two, three, ooh)

La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la
La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la


Boys are always playing dolls
Looking for their Barbie
They don't look like Ken at all
Hardly have a heartbeat
Need someone who falls apart
So he can play Prince Charming
If that's the kind of girl he wants
Then he forgot


This ain't Build a Bitch (A bitch)
You don't get to pick and choose
Different ass and bigger boobs
If my eyes are brown or blue
This ain't Build a Bitch (A bitch)
I'm filled with flaws and attitude
So if you need perfect, I'm not built for you (One, two, three)


La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la
La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la-la
La-la-la-la-la-la-la-la, la-la-la-la-la-la-la",6763170
179866,5067538,​​m y . l i f e,rap,"J. Cole, 21 Savage & Morray",2021,1029703,"{""J. Cole / 21 Savage & Morray""}","
Oh, you came there, God
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Oh, Lord
No matter how, no matter how long it take, yeah
No matter how long it take, nigga
Oh, God, yeah
You better be


Spiralin' up, just like a rich nigga staircase (Spiral up)
No fly zone, please stay the fuck out my airspace (Out my face)
Niggas say things behind backs that they wouldn't dare say (Dare say)
Know it's on sight when I see you, I'm workin' at Squarespace
Yeah, top of the mornin', I know that you thought I was dormant
Woke up early from shots that were swarmin'
A block full of opps, now the cops in an orbit
Guess somebody got popped, now they knockin' on doors
Tryna find an informant but I ain't see Nathan
I'm mindin' my business as God is my witness
No weapon gon' prosper that's formin' against me
Nigga, I'm starvin', immensely
Know when I'm done with these songs, you gon' miss me
Ja Morant, I'm on my Grizzly
You niggas just cubs but no, not the ones in the big leagues
After The Fall Off, I promise I'm comin' to sellin' out Wrigley's
Nigga, I'm just a product of poverty, full of narcotics to profit off quickly
My family tree got a history of users that struggle with demons
Not really the hustler instincts
Therefore, often, my pockets was empty
So while some of my partners was servin' up rocks on the corners, the project assemblies
Me, I was startin' to envy, wanna be on the top where it's plenty
Wanna be in the spot like where every bitch want me like Rihanna droppin' new Fenty
What I see in the sky, the 'Ville is the ceilin', can't reach up too high, evidently
Nah, shit, I can't reach up too high, evidently
Never seen no one drivin' a Bentley
I can't be out here moppin' up Wendy's

My life is all I have
My rhymes, my pen, my pad
And I done made it out the struggle, don't judge me
What you sayin' now won't budge me
'Cause where I come from (Come from), so often (So often)
People you grow up with layin' in a coffin
But I done made it through the pain and strife
It's my time now, my world, my life, my life


Say what? The stuff that I've seen got me traumatized
I let the K go when Johnny died
Swangin' that muhfucka' side to side
We don't participate, ain't with that squashin' shit, all we believe in is homicide
I got a good heart, so I send teddy bears every time we make they mommas cry
I pray that my past ain't ahead of me (21)
When I'm in love, I love heavily (On God)
If you betray me, you dead to me (21)
I disrespect you respectfully (Straight up)
I got some partners who left this Earth
Maybe the pain made a better me (On God)
Just know that they secrets is kept with me (On God)
I feel like the streets is in debt with me (Straight up)
I gave my heart away to all the dawg hoes 'cause that's who accepted me (21)
I blame my pops for that shit 'cause if he didn't fail, he could've corrected me (21)
Give all the props to my momma 'cause no matter what, she always protected me (On God)
I promise you, it ain't no checkin' me (On God)
Jump in the water, get wet with me (Straight up, 21, 21)
You want my money or wanna have sex with me?
Can't let the opps or the law get the best of me
I get to answerin', you get to testin' me
I see chicken, you niggas is breast to me
Planted a seed but it ain't a sesame
Can't let you niggas or bitches grow next to me

My life is all I have
My rhymes, my pen, my pad
And I done made it out the struggle, don't judge me
What you sayin' now won't budge me
'Cause where I come from (Come from), so often (So often)
People you grow up with layin' in a coffin
But I done made it through the pain and strife
It's my time now, my world, my life, my life",6808761
179955,5077335,Bad Habits,pop,Ed Sheeran,2021,1038848,{},"
(One, two, three, four)
Ooh, ooh


Every time you come around, you know I can't say no
Every time the sun goes down, I let you take control
I can feel the paradise before my world implodes
And tonight had something wonderful


My bad habits lead to late nights endin' alone
Conversations with a stranger I barely know
Swearin' this'll be the last, but it probably won't
I got nothin' left to lose, or use, or do
My bad habits lead to wide eyes starin' at space
And I know I lose control of the things that I say
Yeah, I was lookin' for a way out, now I can't escape
Nothin' happens after two, it's true, it's true
My bad habits lead to you

Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My bad habits lead to you
Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My bad habits lead to you


Every pure intention ends when the good times start
Fallin' over everything to reach the first time's spark
It started under neon lights and then it all got dark
I only know how to go too far


My bad habits lead to late nights endin' alone
Conversations with a stranger I barely know
Swearin' this'll be the last, but it probably won't
I got nothin' left to lose, or use, or do
My bad habits lead to wide eyes starin' at space
And I know I lose control of the things that I say
Yeah, I was lookin' for a way out, now I can't escape
Nothin' happens after two, it's true, it's true
My bad habits lead to you


Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My bad habits lead to you
Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh

We took the long way 'round
And burned 'til the fun ran out, now


My bad habits lead to late nights endin' alone
Conversations with a stranger I barely know
Swearin' this'll be the last, but it probably won't
I got nothin' left to lose, or use, or do
My bad habits lead to wide eyes starin' at space
And I know I lose control of the things that I say
Yeah, I was lookin' for a way out, now I can't escape
Nothin' happens after two, it's true, it's true
My bad habits lead to you


Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My bad habits lead to you
Ooh-ooh, ooh-ooh
My bad habits lead to you",6820606
180070,5088203,Fair Trade,rap,Drake,2021,1159497,"{""Travis Scott""}","
I don't understand why you blame me
Just take me as I am, it's the same me
We should be (Yeah)
Senseless sight to see
Yeah
Senseless sight to see
Ayy


Feelin' young but they treat me like the OG
And they want the tea on me, I swear these bitches nosey
Said he put some money on my head, I guess we gon' see
I won't put no money on his head, my niggas owe me
I gotta be single for a while, you can't control me
Uno, dos, tres, in a race, they can't hold me
And I show my face in a case so you know it's me
Imitation isn't flattery, it's just annoyin' me
And I'm too about it
And the dirt that they threw on my name
Turned to soil and I grew up out it
Time for y'all to figure out what y'all gon' do about it
Big wheels keep rollin', rollin'

I'm outside, twenty-nine, G5, seaside
I've been losin' friends and findin' peace
But honestly that sound like a fair trade to me
If I ever hurt one and I'm still here
Outside, frontline, Southside
I've been losin' friends and findin' peace
Honestly that sound like a fair trade to me


Look, don't invite me over if you throw another pity party
Lookin' back, it's hard to tell you where I started
I don't know who love me, but I know that it ain't everybody
I can never love her, she a busy body
Baby, if you want me, can't be turnin' up with everybody, nah
Can't be fuckin' on just anybody, yeah
I got feelings for you, that's the thing about it, yeah
You know that it's somethin' when I sing about it, yeah
Mama used to be on disability but gave me this ability
And now she walkin' with her head high and her back straight
I don't think you feelin' me, I'm out here
Bein' everything they said I wouldn't be and couldn't be
I don't know what happened to them guys that said they would be
I said see you at the top and they misunderstood me
I hold no resentment in my heart, that's that maturity
And we don't keep it on us anymore, it's with security

I'm outside (Yeah), twenty-nine (Yeah), G5, seaside
I've been losin' friends and findin' peace
But honestly that sound like a fair trade to me
If I ever hurt one and I'm still here
Outside, frontline, Southside (Southside)
I've been losin' friends and findin' peace
Honestly that sound like a fair trade to me


I don't understand why you blame me
Just take me as I am, it's the same me (I'm trying)
Senseless sight to see
Senseless sight to see (Outside)


Rollin' 84s, it ain't no safety
Ridin' rich and wavy
Gotta roll over to you, gotta get my release
Spread your legs downtown, as I'm goin' out to eat
Even hear the raw sounds when that raw got me in sleep (Oh, oh)
I'ma roll on 'em 'fore I ever let 'em roll on me
Split this one down the middle, wake up in the harmony (Sick)
Worry, sick, I'm sick of worryin' (Sick, sick)
It's just the world we in, I'd rather bury them
I'm talkin' fake friends and skeletons (Yeah)
Early-mornin' shoulder rubs, the lawyer sounding celebrant (It's lit)
I'm never settlin', this shit get darker than my melanin (Ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh)
At the crib all by myself, this shit be cavin' in
Scrollin' through my call log, by emojis, how I'm savin' 'em
Them heart eyes, that peach one, my old ones, but I favorite them
That butterfly emoji hold me down and all my babies them (Yeah)
Purple demon face one push away, he got the K on him
I broke bread instead of watchin' niggas break down (Break it)
And saved a couple bitches too like I'm from Cape Town
Know their position, you know ass up with the face down (Let's go)
I'm never content, two mil' a event, I get it frequent
I'm make an expense, to me, it's just cents
I'm droppin' the top, not to feel the wind
I'm droppin' the top 'cause bro tryna spin
She droppin' her top, she back again
Publicly she at the crib again, company (Yeah, yeah)
I let it slide when I really shoulda slid (Oooh, ooh)
After all the shit I did
Look at how they repayin' me back (Oh, oh-oh, oh)
Now follow my lead
Tell me what type of payment is that? (Oh, oh-oh), I put that on my kid
And my trust, yeah, it is what it is (Oh, oh)

I'm outside (Ah-ah, ah-ah), twenty-nine, G5 (Ah-ah, ah-ah), seaside
I've been losin' friends and findin' peace (Ah-ah, ah)
But honestly that sound like a fair trade to me
If I ever hurt one and I'm still here
Outside, frontline, Southside (Southside)
I've been losin' friends and findin' peace (Oh, oh)
Honestly that sound like a fair trade to me


I don't understand why you blame me
Just take me as I am, it's the same me
We should be, senseless sight to see
Senseless sight to see
Up on a mountain (Up on a mountain)
Search through the valley (Search through the valley)
You hear me calling (You hear me calling)
Won't you come find me? (Won't you come find me?)
Please don't forsake me (Please don't forsake me)
All of a sudden (All of a sudden)
My heart is breaking (Breaking)
I feel it coming, I, I",6833653
180258,5106008,Yonaguni,pop,Bad Bunny,2021,1183755,{},"


Yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah
Yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah
Yeah-yeah-yeah-eh, yeah


Una noche más y copas de más
Tú no me dejas en paz, de mi mente no te vas


Aunque sé que no debo, ey
Pensar en ti, bebé, pero cuando bebo
Me viene tu nombre, tu cara, tu risa y tu pelo, ey
Dime dónde tú está', que yo por ti cojo un vuelo
Y a Yonaguni le llego, oh
Aunque sé que no debo, ey
Pensar en ti, bebé, pero cuando bebo
Me viene tu nombre, tu cara, tu risa y tu pelo, ey
Dime dónde tú está', que yo por ti cojo un vuelo
Y a Yonaguni le llego, ey

No me busque' en Instagram, mami, búscame en casa
Pa' que vea' lo que pasa, ey
Si tú me prueba', te casa', ey
Ese cabrón ni te abraza
Y yo loco por tocarte
Pero ni me atrevo a textearte
Tú con cualquier outfit la parte'
Mami, tú ere' aparte
Shorty, tiene' un culo bien grande, eh
De-Demasia'o grande
Y yo lo tengo estudia'o, ya mismo me gradúo
Y en la cara me lo tatúo
Vi que viste mi story y subiste una pa' mí
Yo que me iba a dormir, ey
En la disco habían mil
Y yo bailando contigo en mi mente


Aunque sé que no debo
Pensar en ti, bebé, pero cuando bebo
Me viene tu nombre, tu cara, tu risa y tu pelo, ey
Dime dónde tú está', que yo por ti cojo un vuelo
Y a Yonaguni le llego


Si me da' tu dirección, yo te mando mil carta'
Si me da' tu cuenta de banco, un millón de peso'
To'a la noche arrodillado a Dio' le rezo
Pa' que ante' que se acabe el año tú me de' un beso
Y empezar el 2023 bien cabrón
Contigo y un blunt
Tú te ve' asesina con ese mahón (¡Wuh!)
Me matas sin un pistolón
Y yo te compro un Banshee
Gucci, Givenchy
Un poodle, un frenchie
El pasto, lo' munchie'
Te canto un mariachi
Me convierto en Itachi, eh

Yeah-yeah-yeah-yeah
Bad Bunny, baby, bebé
Bad Bunny, baby, bebé


今日はセックスしたい
でもあなたとだけ
どこにいますか？
どこにいますか？
今日はセックスしたい
でもあなたとだけ
どこにいますか？
どこにいますか？Eh",6855744
180773,5152616,Permission to Dance,pop,BTS,2021,1068880,{},"
It's the thought of being young
When your heart's just like a drum
Beating louder with no way to guard it
When it all seems like it's wrong
Just sing along to Elton John
And to that feeling, we're just getting started


When the nights get colder
And the rhythms got you falling behind
Just dream about that moment
When you look yourself right in the eye, eye, eye
Then you say


I wanna dance
The music's got me going
Ain't nothing that can stop how we move, yeah
Let's break our plans
And live just like we're golden
And roll in like we're dancing fools

We don't need to worry
'Cause when we fall, we know how to land
Don't need to talk the talk, just walk the walk tonight
'Cause we don't need permission to dance


There's always something that's standing in the way
But if you don't let it faze ya
You'll know just how to break
Just keep the right vibe, yeah
'Cause there's no looking back
There ain't no one to prove
We don't got this on lock (Yeah)


The wait is over
The time is now so let's do it right, mm (Yeah)
Yeah, we'll keep going
And stay up until we see the sunri-i-ise (Yeah)
And we'll say


I wanna dance
The music's got me going
Ain't nothing that can stop how we move, yeah
Let's break our plans
And live just like we're golden
And roll in like we're dancing fools

We don't need to worry
'Cause when we fall, we know how to land
Don't need to talk the talk, just walk the walk tonight
'Cause we don't need permission to dance


Da-na-na-na-na-na-na
Da-na-na-na-na-na-na
Da-na-na-na-na-na-na
No, we don't need permission to dance
Da-na-na-na-na-na-na (Hey)
Da-na-na-na-na-na-na
Da-na-na-na-na-na-na


Well, let me show ya
That we can keep the fire alive, mm
'Cause it's not over
'Til it's over, say it one more time
Say


I wanna dance
The music's got me going (Music's got me going)
Ain't nothing that can stop how we move, yeah (Hey, yeah)
Let's break our plans
And live just like we're golden (Ooh)
And roll in like we're dancing fools (Like we're dancing fools)

We don't need to worry
'Cause when we fall, we know how to land (We know how to land)
Don't need to talk the talk, just walk the walk tonight (Ooh)
'Cause we don't need permission to dance",6913616
181603,5238143,Hurricane,rap,Kanye West & The Weeknd,2021,1353286,"{""Lil Baby""}","
See this in 3D, all lights out for me
All lights out for me, lightning strikes the beach
Eighty degrees, warm it up for me
Finally free, found the God in me
And I want you to see, I can walk on water
Thousand miles from shore, I can float on the water
Father, hold me close, don't let me drown
I know You won't


Yeah, walkin' on the bridge, I threw my sins over the deep end
Sippin' 'til my stomach hurt, this month I done lost three friends
Early mornin', brainstormin', normally I can't sleep in
Sometimes I just wanna restart it, but it all depends
If I'ma be that same young, hungry **** from West End
Wrote my hardest wrongs and the crazy part, I ain't have no pen
Maybach interior came with sheepskin
Still remember when I just had three bands
Now I'm the one everyone call on 'cause I got deep pants
Bro told me the way to beat the game is on the defense and
Never fazed by names that they might call me, but they gon' respect it
And I feel like you better off tryin' to call, I might not get the message
And she just tried to run off with my heart, but I blocked off the exit, yeah

Oh-oh, I know You won't (I know You won't)
I know You won't (Oh), oh (Oh, yeah)
I know You won't, I know that You look over us (I know)
So we silently sleep
Bring down the rain, yeah, oh


Mm-mm-mm-mm-mm, I was out for self
Mm-mm-mm-mm-mm, I was up for sale, but I couldn't tell
God made it rain, the devil made it hail
Dropped out of school, but I'm that one at Yale
Made the best tracks and still went off the rail
Had to go down, down, down, this the new town, town, town
This the new ten, ten, ten, I'm goin' in, in, in
Here I go on a new trip, here I go actin' too lit
Here I go actin' too rich, here I go with a new chick
And I know what the truth is, still playin' after two kids
It's a lot to digest when your life always movin'
Architectural Digest, but I needed home improvement
Sixty-million-dollar home, never went home to it
Genius gone clueless, it's a whole lot to risk
Alcohol anonymous, who's the busiest loser?
Heated by the rumors, read into it too much
Fiendin' for some true love, ask Kim, ""What do you love?""
Hard to find what the truth is, but the truth was that the truth suck
Always seem to do stuff, but this time it was too much
Mm-mm-mm-mm-mm, everybody so judgemental
Everybody so judgemental
Everybody hurts, but I don't judge rentals
Mm-mm-mm-mm-mm, it was all so simple

I see you in 3D, the dawn is bright for me
No more dark for me, I know You're watchin' me
Eighty degrees, burnin' up the leaves
Finally, I'm free, finally, I'm free
As I go out to sea, I can walk on water
Won't you shine Your light? Demons talk on my shoulder
Father, hold me close, don't let me drown
I know You won't",7021481
181722,5247376,Jail,rap,Kanye West,2021,1107350,{JAY-Z},"
Take what you want
Take everything
Take what you want
Take what you want


Better that I change my number so you can't explain
Violence in the night, violence in the night
Priors, priors, do you have any priors?
Well, that one time
I'll be honest, I'll be honest
We all liars
Let it go


I'll be honest, we all liars
I'll be honest, we all liars
I'm pulled over and I got priors
Guess we goin' down, guess who's goin' to jail?

Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
God gon' post my bail tonight


Don't you curse at me on text, why you try to hit the flex?
I hold up, like, ""What?""
I scroll, I scroll up like, ""Next""
Guess who's getting 'exed?
Like, next
Guess who's getting 'exed?
You made a choice that's your bad, single life ain't so bad
But we ain't finna go there
Something's off, I'll tell you why
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
What a grand plan to sell you out
I could scream and shout, let it out


I'll be honest, we all liars
I'll be honest, we all liars
I'm pulled over and I got priors
Guess we goin' down, guess who's goin' to jail?

Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
God gon' post my bail tonight


God in my cells, that's my celly
Made in the image of God, that's a selfie
Pray five times a day, so many felonies
Who gon' post my bail? Lord, help me
Hol' up, Donda, I'm with your baby when I touch back road
Told him, ""Stop all of that red cap, we goin' home""
Not me with all of these sins, castin' stones
This might be the return of The Throne (Throne)
Hova and Yeezus, like Moses and Jesus
You are not in control of my thesis
You already know what I think 'bout think pieces
Before you ask, he already told you who he think he is
Don't try to jail my thoughts and think precincts
I can't be controlled with programs and presets
Reset
On my cell, in my cell tonight
Don't have to see you to touch you
This is what braille look like, it's on sight
If they take me to jail, call my girl, tell her send my mail
We know what Hell look like
Still, it's a hell of a life, yikes

Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
Guess who's goin' to jail tonight?
God gon' post my bail tonight",7033303
182012,5281295,All Too Well 10 Minute Version Taylors Version From the Vault,pop,Taylor Swift,2021,2713579,{},"
I walked through the door with you, the air was cold
But somethin' 'bout it felt like home somehow
And I left my scarf there at your sister's house
And you've still got it in your drawer, even now


Oh, your sweet disposition and my wide-eyed gaze
We're singin' in the car, getting lost upstate
Autumn leaves fallin' down like pieces into place
And I can picture it after all these days


And I know it's long gone and
That magic's not here no more
And I might be okay, but I'm not fine at all
Oh, oh, oh


'Cause there we are again on that little town street
You almost ran the red 'cause you were lookin' over at me
Wind in my hair, I was there
I remember it all too well

Photo album on the counter, your cheeks were turnin' red
You used to be a little kid with glasses in a twin-sized bed
And your mother's tellin' stories 'bout you on the tee-ball team
You taught me 'bout your past, thinkin' your future was me
And you were tossing me the car keys, ""Fuck the patriarchy""
Keychain on the ground, we were always skippin' town
And I was thinkin' on the drive down, ""Any time now
He's gonna say it's love,"" you never called it what it was
'Til we were dead and gone and buried
Check the pulse and come back swearin' it's the same
After three months in the grave
And then you wondered where it went to as I reached for you
But all I felt was shame and you held my lifeless frame


And I know it's long gone and
There was nothing else I could do
And I forget about you long enough
To forget why I needed to


'Cause there we are again in the middle of the night
We're dancin' 'round the kitchen in the refrigerator light
Down the stairs, I was there
I remember it all too well
And there we are again when nobody had to know
You kept me like a secret, but I kept you like an oath
Sacred prayer and we'd swear
To remember it all too well, yeah

Well, maybe we got lost in translation, maybe I asked for too much
But maybe this thing was a masterpiece 'til you tore it all up
Runnin' scared, I was there
I remember it all too well
And you call me up again just to break me like a promise
So casually cruel in the name of bein' honest
I'm a crumpled-up piece of paper lyin' here
'Cause I remember it all, all, all


They say all's well that ends well, but I'm in a new hell
Every time you double-cross my mind
You said if we had been closer in age, maybe it would've been fine
And that made me want to die
The idea you had of me, who was she?
A never-needy, ever-lovely jewel whose shine reflects on you
Not weepin' in a party bathroom
Some actress askin' me what happened, you
That's what happened, you
You who charmed my dad with self-effacing jokes
Sippin' coffee like you're on a late-night show
But then he watched me watch the front door all night, willin' you to come
And he said, ""It's supposed to be fun turning twenty-one""


Time won't fly, it's like I'm paralyzed by it
I'd like to be my old self again, but I'm still tryin' to find it
After plaid shirt days and nights when you made me your own
Now you mail back my things and I walk home alone
But you keep my old scarf from that very first week
'Cause it reminds you of innocence and it smells like me
You can't get rid of it
'Cause you remember it all too well, yeah

'Cause there we are again when I loved you so
Back before you lost the one real thing you've ever known
It was rare, I was there
I remember it all too well
Wind in my hair, you were there
You remember it all
Down the stairs, you were there
You remember it all
It was rare, I was there
I remember it all too well


And I was never good at tellin' jokes, but the punch line goes
""I'll get older, but your lovers stay my age""
From when your Brooklyn broke my skin and bones
I'm a soldier who's returning half her weight
And did the twin flame bruise paint you blue?
Just between us, did the love affair maim you too?
'Cause in this city's barren cold
I still remember the first fall of snow
And how it glistened as it fell
I remember it all too well


Just between us, did the love affair maim you all too well?
Just between us, do you remember it all too well?
Just between us, I remember it (Just between us) all too well
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there (I was there)
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it all too well
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there (Oh)
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there (I was there)
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it (All too well)
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it",7076626
182445,5329548,Way 2 Sexy,rap,Drake,2021,1198163,"{Future,""Young Thug""}","
I'm too sexy for my shirt
Too sexy for my shirt
So sexy, it hurts
I'm too sexy for Milan
Too sexy for Milan
New York or Japan


Yeah, woah, woah, woah
I'm too sexy for this syrup
Too sexy for your girl
Too sexy for this world
Too sexy for this ice
Too sexy for that jack, yeah, yeah
I'm too sexy for this chain
Too sexy for your gang
Too sexy for this fame, yeah, yeah
I'm too sexy for the trap
Too sexy for that cap
Too sexy for that jack, yeah, yeah

Okay, alright, that's fine, okay (Okay)
I'm feelin' too sexy to accept requests (Way too sexy)
And I'm way too sexy to go unprotected (Way too sexy)
And she popped a Tesla, now she goin' electric
Okay, alright, that's fine, okay
Think we got too sexy for that metro housin' (Way too sexy)
Diamond popped out, almost swallowed sixty thousand (Sixty piece)
Section need more tings in here, I like it crowded, ayy (Woah, woah)
Yeah, I like it crowded
Oh, you like the boy? Well, tell me what you like about him
You a turnt up little thotty, ain't no wife about it
I'ma fuck her friends and send her back to Metro housin'


Yeah, woah, woah, woah
I'm too sexy for this syrup
Too sexy for your girl
Too sexy for this world
Too sexy for this ice
Too sexy for that jack, yeah, yeah
I'm too sexy for this chain
Too sexy for your gang
Too sexy for this fame, yeah, yeah
I'm too sexy for the trap
Too sexy for that cap
Too sexy for that jack, yeah, yeah (Yeah)

I pop out, get ghost on a bitch, she don't know where I went (Where I go?)
Pray for all my dogs, all my niggas behind the fence (Prayer)
Drippin' in it, I be spillin' in it, new designer gear bicoastal
Pay attention to the detail, goin' two-tone on a choker
Young niggas always ready to murk somethin', call them some smokers
Young nigga havin' motion, he gon' make sure the car get-
Did a 360 windmill when I left the scene
That's that action, her best work on her knees
Too sexy for this cash
Too sexy for this syrup
Too sexy for these pills, I'm too sexy for this
I get cash wherever I fly, got bitches sexin' on me
Money, cars, and all this jewelry make a bitch look sexy
I get cash wherever I fly, got bitches sexin' on me


Yeah, woah, woah, woah
I'm too sexy for this syrup
Too sexy for your girl
Too sexy for this world
Too sexy for this ice
Too sexy for that jack, yeah, yeah
I'm too sexy for this chain
Too sexy for your gang
Too sexy for this fame, yeah, yeah
I'm too sexy for the trap
Too sexy for that cap
Too sexy for that jack, yeah, yeah

Too sexy to count (Ah), fetty (Oh)
My neck baguetty (Hoo)
Red diamonds, spaghetti (Oh)
This paper, I shred it (Yeah)
I swindled, no sweatin'
I saw you (Bitch), beggin' (Ho)
Goddamn, you petty (Ha)
I ain't done spending (Yeah)
No penny pinch, I spend it (Spend)
Bags in and out (Let's get bags)
My man ain't gon' steal it (On God)
Hundred bags for her (Hundred bags)
Make these young hoes wish they was rich (Woo)
All-green gators, they look like a switch
Giorgio, I spent twenty-six licks ('Mani)
I'm too sexy (Yeah)
My neck (Yeah), baguetties
Molest me (Woah), caress me (Woah)
I'll let you (Ah), todayski (Ski)
I been kickin' shit (Woah, woah), might need a prosthetic (Yeah)
I pray to the chopper under my pillow, tooth fairy (Woo)",7139486
183255,5425615,Easy On Me,pop,Adele,2021,2572396,{},"
There ain't no gold in this river
That I've been washin' my hands in forever
I know there is hope in these waters
But I can't bring myself to swim
When I am drowning in this silence
Baby, let me in


Go easy on me, baby
I was still a child
Didn't get the chance to
Feel the world around me
I had no time to choose what I chose to do
So go easy on me


There ain't no room for things to change
When we are both so deeply stuck in our ways
You can't deny how hard I've tried
I changed who I was to put you both first
But now I give up

Go easy on me, baby
I was still a child
Didn't get the chance to
Feel the world around me
Had no time to choose what I chose to do
So go easy on me


I had good intentions
And the highest hopes
But I know right now
It probably doesn't even show


Go easy on me, baby
I was still a child
I didn't get the chance to
Feel the world around me
I had no time to choose what I chose to do
So go easy on me",7260084
183335,5436202,99 Problems,rap,Big Baby Tape & kizaru,2021,1148027,{},"


Эй, ай, ай
Ай, эй, ай
Ай, эй, эй (DJ Tape)
BANDANA


Этот дeнь настал, мать eго, он судный
Я нe жму им руку, я нe дружeлюбный
Какой ты нахуй G? Твоя банда - лизоблюды
У мeня новый соус, они хотят чeкнуть моё блюдо
Сука, в чём дeло, эй, сука, в чём дeло?
Эта блядь взяла в руки мой члeн и запeла
В багажникe пeрвый, я скинул им цeлый
Они приходят ко мнe, вeдь я скинул им цeны
Скажи спасибо Богу за то, что ты цeлый
Кто эти фрeшмeны? Я рву их, как цeлок
У мeня eсть вeс, и он тяжёлый
У тeбя eсть вкус - прости, он дeшёвый
Дeвяносто дeвять проблeм - JAY-Z
Я пришёл из dirt'а, я пришёл из грязи
Он хочeт street credit, но нe сможeт купить
Есть вeщи, которых ты нe сможeшь купить
Нахуй lockdown, сука, get down
Ствол у виска, клик-клэк, пиу-пау
Мама, don't cry, я кого-то въeбал
Пару пинт лина и лавe на PayPal
Choppa goes: «Дрэнг, дрэнг-брэм-бэм-бэньг»
40 bands на cuban link от Johnny Dang
Что-Что ты мнe скажeшь, эй, сука, в чём дeло?
Хм, лучшe завали eбало и займись дeлом

Сука, в чём дeло? (Эй, эй)
Эй, сука, в чём дeло? (Сука, в чём дeло?)
(Эй, ай, ай, ай, ай)
Сука, в чём дeло? (Ай, ай, эй)
Эй, сука, в чём дeло? (В чём дeло?)
Ай (Эй)
Сука, в ч-


Дeвяносто дeвять проблeм
Нахуй дeвяносто дeвять проблeм
Ты нe мой бeлый, homie, ты нe мой чeл
Choppa в моих джинсах и eщё мой члeн
Я катаюсь с кeм? Я катаюсь с gang'ом
Я был в Барсeлонe, мы там свэгали с Олeгом
Сука, wassup? В чём дeло?
Нe eбу суку, eсли она нe сeлeба
Мои-Мои пачки вeсят много, нe могу ходить прямо
Монограмма Louis, мой рeмeнь от Ferragamo
Нe кончаю в суку - нахуй, baby mama, драму
(Да, мы-) Да, мы так живём, я никогда нe пeрeстану
Jugg'ать этих бeлых на их cash, lil' bitch
До сих пор Tape, до сих пор Hoodrich
Бeлый, как bleach, как бeлый кирпич
Двe суки рядом - выглядит, как сэндвич
Дeла на block'e - нe на личном
Дeлать лямы ощущаeтся отлично
Много драгов и наличных
Я eбался с твоeй сукой, ты спалил мeня с поличным

А, я сдeлал вид, что в этом нeт ничeго такого, и я сказал тeбe:


Сука, в чём дeло? (Эй, эй)
Эй, сука, в чём дeло? (Сука, в чём дeло?)
(Эй, ай, ай, ай, ай)
Сука, в чём дeло?",7273212
183617,5472224,​astral step,rap,shadowraze,2021,1236433,{​shadowraze},"


Void incarnate


Кидаю step, лeчу прям ввeрх
Мой красный сeт убил их всeх
У них в башкe один preset
Я покажу тоннeльный свeт
Им нe найти мeня, я скрылся
Я пропавший в dissimilate
Я нe оставлю им и слeда
Из ниоткуда выйду в late


Разрубаю глeфой ноги, я бeгу, за спиной Боги (А-а)
Как на рингe, только в лобби, ты подох, бля (Ха-ха)
Я стрeляю - это step, бро, you low (Pow-pow)
Я быстрee этих lame'ов, you slow, братан
Я use'аю эти spell'ы - это мой lifesteal
Я sip'ую эти step'ы - это жёсткий стиль
Долбоёб назвал НН-ом, я eго простил
Я убил их, дажe нe завeйстил сил
Погасил этих псин, курю бeнзин, I'm steal
Показал им старый стиль, добил их всeх, а кто спросил?
Astral step поразил долбоёбов и тeрпил
У мeня сотка гулeй, посмотри - ты вновь один

Вот ты прикинь, чeлы чё-то там на Дота-рэп гонят, да
А я за один квартал лям рублeй получил, бля
Лимон за Дота-рэп, ха-ха-ха-ха


В моих глазах горит квазар
Иду впeрёд, ни шагу назад
Кидаю step, бeгу на старт
Вeсь твой профит идёт на спад
Стрeляю мeтко, как солдат
Мой step сияeт - это факт
И я step'ую прямо в такт
Им нe убить мeня, so hard


Кидаю step, лeчу прям ввeрх
Мой красный сeт убил их всeх
У них в башкe один preset
Я покажу тоннeльный свeт
Им нe найти мeня, я скрылся
Я пропавший в dissimilate
Я нe оставлю им и слeда
Из ниоткуда выйду в late


Hunter on ghoul, я убил их всeх
Уворот от пуль, у мeня eсть вeс
Нахуй граммовка, у мeня eсть вeсы
Я нe злодeй, но у мeня свои бeсы
Много валюты, имeю и пeсо
Мало HP, я накину им вeссeл
Много энeргии, я будто Тeсла
Стрeляю так мeтко, всe пули прям в висок, а

В моих глазах горит квазар
Иду впeрёд, ни шагу назад
Кидаю step, бeгу на старт
Вeсь твой профит идёт на спад
Стрeляю мeтко, как солдат
Мой step сияeт - это факт
И я step'ую прямо в такт
Им нe убить мeня, so hard",7318135
184156,5533851,All Too Well 10 Minute Version Taylors Version Live Acoustic,pop,Taylor Swift,2021,1808788,{},"
I walked through the door with you, the air was cold
But something 'bout it felt like home somehow
And I left my scarf there at your sister's house
And you've still got it in your drawer, even now


Oh, your sweet disposition and my wide-eyed gaze
We're singing in the car, getting lost upstate
Autumn leaves falling down like pieces into place
And I can picture it after all these days


And I know it's long gone and
That magic's not here no more
And I might be okay, but I'm not fine at all
Oh, oh, oh


'Cause there we are again on that little town street
You almost ran the red 'cause you were lookin' over at me
Wind in my hair, I was there
I remember it all too well

Photo album on the counter, your cheeks were turning red
You used to be a little kid with glasses in a twin-sized bed
And your mother's telling stories 'bout you on the tee-ball team
You taught me 'bout your past, thinking your future was me
And you were tossing me the car keys, ""fuck the patriarchy""
Key chain on the ground, we were always skipping town
And I was thinking on the drive down, any time now
He's gonna say it's love, you never called it what it was
'Til we were dead and gone and buried
Check the pulse and come back swearing it's the same
After three months in the grave
And then you wondered where it went to as I reached for you
But all I felt was shame and you held my lifeless frame


And I know it's long gone and
There was nothing else I could do
And I forget about you long enough
To forget why I needed to


'Cause there we are again in the middle of the night
We're dancing 'round the kitchen in the refrigerator light
Down the stairs, I was there
I remember it all too well
And there we are again when nobody had to know
You kept me like a secret, but I kept you like an oath
Sacred prayer and we'd swear
To remember it all too well, yeah

Well, maybe we got lost in translation
Maybe I asked for too much
But maybe this thing was a masterpiece
'Til you tore it all up
Running scared, I was there
I remember it all too well
And you call me up again just to break me like a promise
So casually cruel in the name of being honest
I'm a crumpled up piece of paper lying here
'Cause I remember it all, all, all


They say all's well that ends well, but I'm in a new Hell
Every time you double-cross my mind
You said if we had been closer in age maybe it would have been fine
And that made me want to die
The idea you had of me, who was she?
A never-needy, ever-lovely jewel whose shine reflects on you
Not weeping in a party bathroom
Some actress asking me what happened, you
That's what happened, you
You who charmed my dad with self-effacing jokes
Sipping coffee like you're on a late-night show
But then he watched me watch the front door all night, willing you to come
And he said, ""It's supposed to be fun turning twenty-one""

Time won't fly, it's like I'm paralyzed by it
I'd like to be my old self again, but I'm still trying to find it
After plaid shirt days and nights when you made me your own
Now you mail back my things and I walk home alone
But you keep my old scarf from that very first week
'Cause it reminds you of innocence and it smells like me
You can't get rid of it
'Cause you remember it all too well, yeah


'Cause there we are again when I loved you so
Back before you lost the one real thing you've ever known
It was rare, I was there
I remember it all too well
Wind in my hair, you were there
You remember it all
Down the stairs, you were there
You remember it all
It was rare, I was there
I remember it all too well


And I was never good at telling jokes, but the punch line goes
""I'll get older, but your lovers stay my age""
From when your Brooklyn broke my skin and bones
I'm a soldier who's returning half her weight
And did the twin flame bruise paint you blue?
Just between us, did the love affair maim you, too?
'Cause in this city's barren cold
I still remember the first fall of snow
And how it glistened as it fell
I remember it all too well


Just between us, did the love affair maim you all too well?
Just between us, do you remember it all too well?
Just between us, I remember it (Just between us), all too well
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it all too well
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it
Wind in my hair, I was there, I was there
Down the stairs, I was there, I was there
Sacred prayer, I was there, I was there
It was rare, you remember it all too well


I love you guys so much",7394358
185767,5884651,As It Was,pop,Harry Styles,2022,1766064,{},"
Come on, Harry, we wanna say goodnight to you


Holdin' me back
Gravity's holdin' me back
I want you to hold out the palm of your hand
Why don't we leave it at that?
Nothin' to say
When everything gets in the way
Seems you cannot be replaced
And I'm the one who will stay, oh-oh-oh


In this world, it's just us
You know it's not the same as it was
In this world, it's just us
You know it's not the same as it was
As it was, as it was
You know it's not the same

Answer the phone
""Harry, you're no good alone
Why are you sitting at home on the floor?
What kind of pills are you on?""
Ringin' the bell
And nobody's coming to help
Your daddy lives by himself
He just wants to know that you're well, oh-oh-oh


In this world, it's just us
You know it's not the same as it was
In this world, it's just us
You know it's not the same as it was
As it was, as it was
You know it's not the same


Go home, get ahead, light-speed internet
I don't wanna talk about the way that it was
Leave America, two kids follow her
I don't wanna talk about who's doin' it first


(Hey)
As it was
You know it's not the same as it was
As it was, as it was",7844309
